ABBA|ABBA The Aramaic term of intimacy used in addressing one's father, somewhat equivalent to the English "Daddy." Christ uses Abba in addressing God the Father. St. Paul tells believers that their relationship with God through the Holy Spirit is so personal that they too may speak to Him as intimately as to their own father (Mark 14:36; Rom. 8:15).
ABSOLUTION|ABSOLUTION The prayer offered by a bishop or presbyter for the forgiveness of sins. Following His glorious Resurrection, Christ breathed on His Apostles and said, "Receive the Holy Spirit. If you forgive the sins of any, they are forgiven them; if you retain the sins of any, they are retained" John 20:22, 23). This gift of proclaiming God's forgiveness of sins remains forever in the Church. It is exercised in the sacraments of baptism and confession—the reconciliation to the Church of Christian believers who have sinned and repented. The priest or bishop is the witness who bears testimony to the repentance; only God forgives sins (see article, "Confession," at 1 John 1).
ADVENT|ADVENT A forty-day period of prayer, repentance, and fasting in preparation for Christmas. The word stems from the Latin word for "coming"; during the fast the faithful prepare for the coming of Christ at Christmas. See also FASTING.
AGAPE|AGAPE Greek for the unconditional love which God extends to His people. Agape also designates a communal meal connected to the Eucharist which was a practice of the early Church (1 Cor. 11:20 34).
ALLEGORY|ALLEGORY A story filled with symbolism illustrating a spiritual reality beyond the actual historical event being described. In the ancient Church, scholars of the School of Alexandria tended to consider many incidents in the Bible as allegorical, whereas the School of Antioch practiced a more historical approach to Scripture. Although Scripture contains some pure allegory (some parables of Christ, portions of Revelation), overemphasis on allegory may tend to de-emphasize or even deny the historicity of Holy Scripture. On the other hand, a denial of allegory robs the Scriptures of their deeper meaning. It is possible for a story to be both historical and allegorical. The majority of Church Fathers combined both elements in interpreting the Bible. See Luke 15:4-7; Gal. 4:21-26. See also TYPE.
ALLELUIA|ALLELUIA The Greek form of the Hebrew word Hallelujah, which means "praise God." Orthodox Christians sing a chorus of Alleluia interspersed with psalm verses prior to the Gospel reading at the Divine Liturgy.
ALMS|ALMS Works of mercy or monetary gifts given to help the poor. Throughout the Scriptures, God's people are called to help those less fortunate than themselves (see Matt. 25:31-46).
ALPHA AND OMEGA|ALPHA AND OMEGA The letters which begin and end the Greek alphabet, and symbolize the beginning and the end. The Alpha and the Omega is also used as a title of Christ (Rev. 1:8).
AMEN|AMEN "So be it" in Hebrew. Amen is said or sung at the close of a prayer or hymn, showing the agreement of the people to what has been said (Deut. 27:15 26; 1 Cor. 14:16).
ANGELS|ANGELS Bodiless powers created before the creation of the physical universe. The English word "angel" comes from the Greek word for "messenger." Throughout the Scripture, angels are messengers who carry the Word of God to earth (e.g. Gabriel's visit to Mary, Luke 1:26-38). The Orthodox Church teaches that there are nine "choirs" or groups of angels: Angels, Archangels, Powers, Authorities, Principalities, Dominions, Thrones, Cherubim, and Seraphim (see Gen. 3:24; Is. 6:2; Eph. 1:21; Col. 1:16; 1 Thess. 4:16; 1 Pet. 3:22).
ANNUNCIATION|ANNUNCIATION The visit of the Archangel Gabriel to the Virgin Mary to inform her that she had been chosen to bear Christ, the Son of God. The Feast of the Annunciation is celebrated exactly nine months before Christmas. Mary's Son was no ordinary child, but God's divine Son and Word in human flesh (see article, "Mary," at Luke 1; Is. 7:14; Luke 1:26-38; John 1:1-14).
ANTICHRIST|ANTICHRIST Literally, "against Christ" or "instead of Christ." Antichrist is used by John to refer to (a) the opponent of Christ who will arise at the end of this age, and (b) the "many antichrists" who stand against the Son of God (1 John 2:18, 22; 4:3).
APOSTASY|APOSTASY Literally, "turning away." This sin is committed when a Christian or body of believers rejects the true faith of Christ (1 Tim. 1:5 7; 4:1-3).
APOSTLE|APOSTLE Literally, "one who is sent." Apostle is used as a title for the Twelve Disciples who formed the foundation of the NT Church, replacing, symbolically, the twelve tribes of Israel. In order to maintain this symbolism, Matthias was elected to replace Judas (Acts 1:15 26). The word is also used of the Seventy (or 72) sent by Christ, as well as of Paul, the repentant persecutor whom the risen Jesus sent as "apostle to the Gentiles" (Rom. 11:13). Great missionaries in the Church, such as Mary Magdalene (the "apostle to the apostles"), Thekla, Nira, Vladimir, and Innocent of Alaska are called "equal to the apostles." The extension of the apostolic ministry in the Church today is in the episcopacy. See also EPISCOPACY.
ASCENSION|ASCENSION The ascent of Christ to Heaven following His Resurrection as Son of God in the flesh (Luke 24:50, 51; Acts 1:9-11). Christ's Ascension completes the union of God and humanity, for a Man who is God now reigns in Heaven.
ASCETICISM|ASCETICISM (from Gr. askesis, "athlete") A life of struggle—the crucifixion of the desires of the flesh, through a life of prayer, fasting, and self-denial. Through asceticism the Christian fights temptation to sin and thereby grows in spiritual strength. Such spiritual classics as The Philokalia and The Ladder of Divine Ascent give directions for the ascetic life (see Luke 9:23; Gal. 5:24).
AUTHORITY|AUTHORITY The rule of God over the world and the legitimate authority given by God to those ordained to shepherd the faithful (Heb. 13:17). Also, one of the nine choirs of angels. See also ANGELS.
BAPTISM|BAPTISM (from Gr. baptizo, "to be plunged") The sacrament whereby one is born again, buried with Christ, resurrected with Him and united to Him. In baptism, one becomes a Christian and is joined to the Church. In Christ's baptism, water was set apart unto God as the means by which the Holy Spirit would bring to us new life and entrance into the heavenly Kingdom (see article "Holy Baptism," at Rom. 6; Matt. 3:13
17; 28:19;|17; 28:19; Mark 16:16; Acts 2:38, 39; Rom. 6:3; Col. 2:12; 1 Pet. 3:21).
BEATITUDE|BEATITUDE Literally, "exalted happiness." The ninefold blessing of Christ in the Sermon on the Mount is called the Beatitudes (Matt. 5:3-12).
BELIEF|BELIEF The acceptance of the truths of the gospel. More than a mental assent, belief as used in the NT includes trusting in God from the heart. Such belief results from (1) hearing the Word of God (Rom. 10:17) and (2) a gift of the Holy Spirit (Eph. 2:8). Although a Christian is saved by belief in Christ, faith without action (that is, a distinct movement of the will to follow Christ) is hollow and void of the righteousness necessary to salvation (see article, "Justification by Faith," at Rom. 5; Matt. 7:21; John 3:16; James 2:14 26).
BENEDICTION|BENEDICTION Literally, "good word"; blessing. Benedictions were given by Christ (Luke 24:50, 51) and by the Apostles (2 Cor. 13:14), and are given by the bishop or priest at the close of every Divine Liturgy.
BISHOP|BISHOP (Gr. episkopos) Overseer. A bishop is the leader of a local community of Christians. In the New Testament there is no clear distinction between the offices of bishop and elder (presbyter), both of which function as leaders of the community. However, by the mid- to late first century, the Church began to reserve the title bishop for the men of spiritual qualification who were consecrated to follow the Apostles in their office of oversight (see article, "The Four 'Orders' in Church Government," at 1 Tim.; Acts 1:15 26; 14:23; 1 Tim. 3:1-7).
BORN AGAIN|BORN AGAIN Literally, "born from above." A person must be born again to new life in Christ to enter God's eternal Kingdom. This new birth takes place through the sacrament of Holy Baptism John 3:16; Rom. 6:3, 4; Gal. 3:27). Spiritual life begins by receiving the Holy Spirit in baptism, and it is a dynamic process which continues throughout life. See article, "The New Birth," at John 3.
BROTHERS OF THE LORD|BROTHERS OF THE LORD St. James, the first bishop of Jerusalem, Joses, Simon, and Judas are referred to as brothers of Christ (Matt. 13:55). In the ancient Middle East one's close relatives were frequently referred to as brothers and sisters. Also, there is an ancient tradition that the "brothers and sisters" of Christ were actually children of St. Joseph from an earlier marriage; they are called the children of Mary although they are actually her stepchildren. Thus, these references to siblings of Christ do not contradict the ancient belief of the Orthodox Church that the Virgin Mary was a virgin before, during, and after the birth of Christ. The absence of blood brothers is suggested by Christ's act of entrusting Mary to the care of the apostle John (John 19:26, 27), which would have been against the Mosaic Law had she had other natural children.
CANON|CANON Literally, "a rule." It describes (1) the inspired Books of the Bible—the Canon of Scripture; (2) the rules and decrees issued by the early Church (see Acts 15:23-29) and by Ecumenical Councils—Canon Law; and (3) certain parts of worship, such as the Liturgical Canon or the Canon of Matins.
CHRISMATION|CHRISMATION The sacrament completing baptism, whereby one receives the gift of the Holy Spirit through anointing with the Chrism, a specially prepared oil which must be consecrated by a bishop. On several occasions in Acts, a baptized Christian received the gift of the Holy Spirit through the laying on of the hands of an Apostle (see Acts 8:14-17; 19:6). Chrismation is a continuation of that ancient practice in the Church. See article, "Chrismation," at Acts 2.
CHURCH|CHURCH The faithful are called out of the world to be the Church: the body of Christ, the Bride of Christ, the New Israel, the ark of salvation, the assembly of the faithful. Through the Church, Christians are united to Christ and to each other. In this community, the believer receives the grace of God through the sacraments and hears the truth of the gospel. This mystical transformation of people into one body in Christ takes place in the Eucharist. Because Christ is the Head of the Church, the Church is a reflection of the Incarnation, with both human and divine qualities (see 1 Cor. 10:16, 17; Gal. 6:16; Eph. 4:12; 5:22-32).
COMMANDMENT|COMMANDMENT The Law of God, given first in the Ten Commandments on Mt. Sinai, and completed or fulfilled by the teaching of Christ (Ex. 20:1-17; Matt. 5:1—7:27; John 15:12).
COMMUNION|COMMUNION (Gr. koinonia) A common union of the most intimate kind, enjoyed by Christians with God and with each other in the Church. This communion is especially realized in the mystery of the Holy Eucharist John 6:56; 1 Cor. 10:16, 17).
CONFESSION (1)|CONFESSION (1) The avowal or verbal witness of faith in Christ, leading to salvation (Rom. 10:9). (2) The sacrament of the forgiveness of sins, whereby the repentant sinner confesses his sins to Christ in the presence of the priest, who pronounces God's absolution of those sins (see article, "Confession," at 1 John; John 20:22, 23; 1 John 1:9).
CONVERSION|CONVERSION The beginning of salvation, occurring when a person repents, believes the gospel, and enters into a personal relationship with Christ. Conversion is not merely a change of belief but the beginning of a new life in Christ (2 Cor. 5:17), which is a process of growth into the image and likeness of God. Our salvation is the working together of conversion, justification, and sanctification throughout life. 
CORRUPTION|CORRUPTION The state of mortality and sinfulness, the universal condition of fallen humanity. All are born into a world suffering the consequences of the Fall, the sin of Adam and Eve. These consequences include physical suffering, death, lack of perfection and a tendency to sin. See Ps. 53:3; Is. 53:6; Rom. 3:23; 1 John 5:19.
COSMOS|COSMOS The universe, or "world," created by God from nothing. It is controlled by God; He is the life of the world. Sin has corrupted the entire cosmos, and the rule of evil will not be abolished until the Second Coming of Jesus Christ. The universe will finally be redeemed by Christ when He comes again to transform the cosmos into a new heaven and a new earth. See Gen. 1:1; Rom. 8:19-22; Rev. 21:1.
COUNCIL|COUNCIL A group of Christians gathered to deliberate and ask for the guidance of the Holy Spirit to administer the Church and decide on various doctrinal, moral, and liturgical questions. The Orthodox Church is conciliar (operating by councils) on all levels, from a parish to a worldwide council. While councils are not seen as infallible, their decisions become part of Church life when they are received by the entire Church. Besides the Jerusalem Council recorded in Acts 15, the Church counts Seven Ecumenical Councils in her history.
COVENANT|COVENANT An agreement or testament between men or between God and His people. In the Old Testament, God chose the people of Israel, ending with John the Baptist, to prepare the way for the coming of His Only Begotten Son. Through Christ, the covenant was perfected, and the promises of God to Abraham and the Jews are fulfilled through the Church, the New Israel, the New Covenant people of God. See Gen. 13:14
16;|16; Gal. 3:6-9; 1 Pet. 2:9, 10.
CREATION|CREATION (Gr. ktisis) Everything made by God. The term creation is applied to the cosmos in general and to mankind in particular. Our regeneration in Christ and the resurrection of the dead are both often called the "new creation." Creation has no existence apart from God, but is nevertheless distinct from God. (That which is not created, such as divine grace, the divine energies, belongs to God the Father, Son, and Holy Spirit.)
CREED|CREED A statement of belief. Creeds in their earlier forms were used by the apostles, and many are recorded in the New Testament (Eph. 5:14; 1 Tim. 3:16; 2 Tim. 2:11-13). The creed used throughout the Church was adopted at the Council of Nicea in A.D. 325 and expanded at the Council of Constantinople in A.D. 381. The Nicene Creed is used at baptisms, the Divine Liturgy, and in personal daily prayers.
CRUCIFIXION|CRUCIFIXION A form of execution of criminals used by the ancient Romans in which the offender is nailed through his wrists and ankles to a cross. A crucified person usually died from suffocation after becoming too exhausted to pull himself up in order to breathe. Besides Christ Himself (Matt. 27:35-50), the Apostles Peter, Andrew, James the Less, and Simon were also crucified.
CURSE|CURSE (Gr. anathema) To cut off, separate; the opposite of blessing. A divine curse is God's judgment. Christ delivers believers from the curse caused by their inability to live by the law of God (see Gen. 3:14-19; 9:25; Mark 11:21; Gal. 3:10-14).
DAMNATION|DAMNATION Eternity spent in hell under sentence of personal condemnation for rejecting the love and truth of God as revealed perfectly in Jesus Christ and the Holy Spirit. See Matt. 25:31-46; John 3:18.
DARKNESS|DARKNESS A symbol of sin and rejection of God, who is light and whose followers walk in the light of righteousness. See John 1:5; Rom. 13:12.
DEACON|DEACON Literally, "servant." Originally seven deacons were ordained to assist the apostles with the temporal affairs of the Church (Acts 6:1-7). This established office has continued in the Church. A deacon assists the bishop and priest, but cannot preside over the Eucharist, give blessings or pronounce absolution. In the New Testament (Rom.16:1) and the early Church, women also served as deacons or deaconesses (1 Tim. 3:813; see note on v. 11).
DEIFICATION|DEIFICATION The grace of God through which believers grow to become like Him and enjoy intimate communion with the Father through the Son in the Holy Spirit (see article, "Deification," at 2 Pet. 1; 2 Cor. 3:18; 5:17; 2 Pet. 1:2-4).
DEPARTED|DEPARTED The dead. Following death and judgment, those who have accepted God's truth and love as fully revealed in Christ and the Holy Spirit inherit eternal life in heaven. Those who have rejected His gift inherit eternal darkness. See Luke 16:19-31; Heb. 9:27.
DEVIL|DEVIL Satan, the leader of the fallen angels. Called by Jesus the father of lies John 8:44), Satan tempts the faithful to join his rebellion against God. The Greek word for devil means "separator"; he seeks to pull people away from God. Although not evil by nature, the devil turned by his free choice from what was according to nature to what was against it. At the end of time, Christ will judge the devil and his followers and cast them into hell. See Matt. 25:41; Luke 10:18; 1 Pet. 5:8.
DISCIPLESHIP|DISCIPLESHIP The life of learning, growing, self-sacrifice, and commitment required of every Christian. A Christian not only believes in Christ but leaves everything to follow Him. See Matt. 4:18-22; 7:21-23; Luke 9:23; Gal. 5:24.
DOCTRINE|DOCTRINE The teaching of the Church, called variously the doctrine of Christ (2 John 9), the apostles' doctrine (Acts 2:42), or sound doctrine (Titus 1:9; see 2 Tim. 3:16; Rom. 16:17).
EASTER|EASTER The Feast of the Resurrection of Christ, also known as Pascha (from the Hebrew word for Passover). Christ proclaimed Himself as the true Passover and offered Himself as a sacrifice. Orthodox Christians celebrate Easter according to the decree of the Council of Nicea in A.D. 325: the first Sunday following the first full moon following the spring equinox following the Jewish Passover. Thus, Orthodox Easter is often one, four, or five weeks after the western Easter.
ENERGY|ENERGY Used theologically, that which radiates from the hidden essence or nature of God. The energies of God, such as grace, are not created, and allow the believer to enter into a personal relationship with God while preserving the unique character of God, whose essence always remains hidden from humanity. Moses was permitted to see the glory of God, His energies, but was forbidden to gaze on the face of God, His hidden essence. See Ex. 33:18-23; 2 Pet. 1:2-4.
EPIPHANY|EPIPHANY Literally, "a breaking through from above"; the word means a manifestation of God. Examples of epiphanies are the burning bush (Ex. 3:1-6) and the Transfiguration of Christ (Matt. 17:1-13). Twelve days after Christmas, the Church celebrates the Feast of Epiphany to honor the manifestation of the Holy Trinity at the Baptism of Christ (Mark 1:9-11). See also THEOPHANY.
EPISCOPACY|EPISCOPACY The order of bishops in the Church (from Gr. episkopos, "overseer"). See also BISHOP.
ESCHATOLOGY|ESCHATOLOGY The study of the last days (Gr. eschaton). According to the Holy Scriptures, Christ will come again at the end of time to judge the living and the dead, destroy the power of evil, and fully reveal the everlasting Kingdom (Matt. 25:3146; Rev. 20:10—21:1). See also SECOND COMING.
ESSENCE|ESSENCE (Gr. ousia) Also translated as substance, nature or being. God the Father, the Son, and the Holy Spirit are "of one essence." Jesus Christ is "of one essence" with God the Father and the Holy Spirit in His divinity, and "of one essence" with all human beings in His humanity. God's essence is beyond the understanding and comprehension of His creatures. God can be known by humans through the divine energies and operations of the Father, Son, and Holy Spirit (Ex. 33:18-23). See also ENERGY.
EUCHARIST|EUCHARIST Taken from a Greek word meaning "thanksgiving," Eucharist designates Holy Communion, the central act of Christian worship. At the Last Supper Christ gave thanks (Matt. 26:27; 1 Cor. 11:24), and embodied in the communion service is our Own thanksgiving. The word came into use very early, as exemplified by its use in the writings of the apostles ("Now concerning the Eucharist...." Didache 9:1) and the letters of St. Ignatius of Antioch (Ign. Phil. 4:1, about A.D. 107).
EVANGELIST|EVANGELIST One who preaches the gospel; used especially of Matthew, Mark, Luke, and John, who wrote the four NT Gospels.
EXCOMMUNICATION|EXCOMMUNICATION Literally, "out of communion." This judgment is pronounced by the Church on willfully heretical, immoral, or divisive persons who refuse to repent of their sins, it excludes them from the sacramental life of the Church (1 Cor. 5:1-5) Excommunication is not viewed as eternal damnation but a discipline pertaining only to this life. It is administered for the salvation of the person cut off from communion, with the hope that this act will ultimately bring the sinner to repentance.
FAITH|FAITH Belief and trust in Christ as one's Savior. The effects of this faith are freedom from the power of the devil, the attainment of virtue, and progress toward perfection and union with God. One is saved by faith through grace - a living faith manifested by a righteous life (see article, "Justification by Faith," at Rom. 5; Rom. 3:28; Gal. 2:16; Eph. 2:8; James 2:14 17).
FASTING|FASTING An ascetic exercise whereby one gives up certain foods, usually meat and dairy products, as a means of disciplining the body. Fasting is a part of the ascetic life and a sign of repentance. Orthodox Christians fast on most Wednesdays and Fridays (in memory of the betrayal and crucifixion of Christ) and during four fasting seasons: (1) Advent, the forty days before Christmas; (2) Great Lent, forty days before Palm Sunday and the week before Easter, (3) two weeks before the Feast of Ss. Peter and Paul (June 29); and (4) two weeks before the Feast of the Falling Asleep of the Virgin Mary (Aug. 15). See Matt. 6:16; Rom. 13:14; Gal. 5:16, 17.
FATHER (1)|FATHER (1) God the Father is one of the three Persons of the Holy Trinity. God the Son is eternally begotten of God the Father. God the Holy Spirit eternally proceeds from God the Father (see Matt. 28:19; John 14:10; 15:26). (2) "Father" is a title given to one's spiritual father based on the custom of the Jews, who spoke of their father Abraham or their father David, and on the words of Paul, who called himself the father of his flock. See Luke 1:73; Acts 4:25 with center-column note; 1 Cor. 4:15.
FELLOWSHIP|FELLOWSHIP (Gr. koinonia) Literally, "communion"; the unity of believers through Christ based on the fellowship of the Father, Son, and Holy Spirit. Christians are united into a special fellowship through their love for one another and common union with Christ (Acts 2:42; 1 John 1:3, 7). See also COMMUNION.
FILIOQUE|FILIOQUE A Latin word meaning "and the Son." Western churches began adding this word to the Nicene Creed several centuries after it was written: "I believe In the Holy Spirit . . . who proceeds from the Father and the Son." This "filioque clause" is judged by the Orthodox Church as error because it is contrary to what Jesus taught (John 15:26); thus, it confuses correct belief concerning the Holy Trinity. The addition of the filioque in the West was a major factor contributing to the Great Schism m A . D . 1054.
FLESH (1)|FLESH (1) In New Testament usage, flesh refers to fallen human nature, which, through its ties to the world and mortality, struggles against spiritual growth and leads one into sin. Christians are called to subdue the lusts of the flesh so that they may grow in union with Christ (see Rom. 8:4 9; Gal. 5:16-24). (2) In Christology, flesh refers to the sinless human nature of Christ, or the Body of Christ. In liturgical usage, there is reference to the flesh of Christ in the Eucharist.
FORGIVENESS:|FORGIVENESS: The remission of sin and guilt through the love of Christ. Forgiveness is given originally in baptism; forgiveness for continuing sin is reclaimed through repentance. As God has forgiven the sins of believers, so are Christians to forgive those who have sinned against them (Matt. 6:14, 15; 18:21-35; 1 John 1:9).
FORNICATION|FORNICATION (Gr. porneia): The sin of sexual intercourse outside of marriage The word is also applied to polygamy and to many successive marriages. The Greek term means sexual immorality in general. Fornication is strongly condemned in Scripture (see 1 Cor. 6:16 18; Gal. 5:19; Col. 3:5.)
FREE WILL|FREE WILL The freedom to choose between good and evil, between God and sin which is one aspect of humanity created in the image of God. According to Orthodox teaching, sin stains the image of God but does not destroy it. Human beings may choose to accept or reject the gospel, but must suffer the consequences of their decision (see Gen. 3:22, 23; Rev. 3:20).
GENTILE|GENTILE A non-Jew. Christ and His Apostles preached the gospel first to the Jews, who were chosen by God to prepare the way for the Messiah. Christ died for all, Jew and Gentile; thus, salvation is offered to the Gentiles as well as to the Jews. Those Gentiles who believe in Christ become the true sons of Abraham, who was chosen by God before the Law was given. See Acts 11; 15:1-29; Rom. 1:16; Gal. 3:6-9.
GIFTS|GIFTS Charismatic or spiritual gifts are blessings and abilities given by the Holy Spirit to believers for the building up of the body of Christ. The gifts of the Spirit serve the general good of the whole Church. It is possible to confuse spiritual gifts with natural talents and emotions, or to misuse the genuine gifts of the Holy Spirit, resulting in pride and self-righteousness. For this reason, the Orthodox Church has always stressed humility and obedience to spiritual authority in the use of the gifts. Note that the Holy Spirit Himself is a gift (Rom. 5:5), as are baptism and the other sacraments. See Rom. 12:6 8; 1 Cor. 12; 13; 1 John 3:24.
GLORY|GLORY The divine splendor of God, or a specific manifestation of God's presence frequently likened to a cloud, smoke, or brilliant light. To serve and worship God is to glorify Him. Through the Holy Spirit, Christians are being changed to be like God and to reflect His glory. (See Ex. 19:9, 16-18; Is. 60:1; Luke 2:9; Rom. 8:16 18; 2 Cor. 3:18; 4:6.) See also SHEKINAH.
GLOSSOLALIA|GLOSSOLALIA Literally, "speaking in tongues." St. Paul uses the term to describe not an emotional experience but a spiritual gift (1 Cor. 12:10), though not one of the higher gifts (1 Cor. 14:1-5). At Pentecost the gift was given to allow those present to hear the gospel in their native language (Acts 2:6); in Corinth, the gift is an ecstatic utterance (1 Cor. 14:2). The Apostle warns against too much emphasis on this experience, urging instead that believers seek to manifest love (1 Cor. 13:1) and communicate the gospel intelligibly (1 Cor. 14:19). Glossolalia has never played a significant role in historic Orthodox spirituality. See 1 Cor. 12—14.
GNOSTICISM|GNOSTICISM A very complex ancient heresy that was manifested in many different forms and beliefs. The Gnostics taught that Christ had imparted secret knowledge "gnosis," to a select few, who in turn transmitted hidden truths to an elite. Central to Gnosticism is the denial of the goodness of matter, leading to a denial of the reality of the Incarnation of the Son of God and of His bodily Resurrection. Several schools of Gnosticism taught that salvation consisted of liberation from the physical body and of growth to a higher, non-physical, spiritual level of existence. Orthodoxy has always rejected Gnosticism, teaching that the world and man were created good and will be redeemed by Christ and transformed at the end of this age (Gen. 1:1-31; Rom. 8:1922; I Cor. 15:35-55; Rev. 21:1).
GOSPEL|GOSPEL Literally, "the good news." The term comes from the ancient title announcing the ascension of a new ruler to the throne. The Christian gospel is summarized in the statement, "Repent, for the kingdom of heaven is at hand!" (Matt. 3:2; 4:17).
GRACE|GRACE The gift of God's own presence and action in His creation. Through grace, God forgives sins and transforms the believer into His image and likeness. Grace is not merely unmerited favor—an attitude of God toward the believer. Grace is God's uncreated energy bestowed in the sacraments and is therefore truly experienced. A Christian is saved through grace, which is a gift of God and not a reward for good works. However, because grace changes a person, he or she will manifest the effects of grace through righteous living. See John 1:17; Rom. 5:21; Eph. 1:7; 2:8; 2 Thess. 1:12; 1 Pet. 5:5.
HADES|HADES A Greek word equivalent to the Hebrew Sheol—the realm of the dead. Following His burial and before His glorious Resurrection, Christ liberated the righteous dead in Hades, enabling them to enter Paradise because He had destroyed sin and death by His life-giving death (1 Pet. 3:18-20).
HEART|HEART In scriptural terms, the spiritual center of one's being. The heart is the seat of divine presence and grace and the source of moral acts. The transformation of the heart is the major work of God's saving grace. See Matt. 5:8; 6:21; 22:37; Luke 6:45; John 7:38; Rom. 2:29; 10:9, 10; Heb. 13:9.
HERESY|HERESY Following one's own choice or opinion instead of divine truth preserved by the Church, so as to cause division among Christians. Heresy is a system of thought which contradicts true doctrine. It is false teaching, which all true Christians must reject (Matt. 7:15; 2 Pet. 2:1).
HOLY|HOLY Literally, "set apart" or separated unto God; also, blessed, righteous, sinless. The word, therefore, refers to God as the source of holiness, to the Church and its sacraments, to worshipers of the true God, and to those of outstanding virtue. Those who are transformed by the Holy Spirit become holy as God is holy (Rom. 12:1; 1 Pet. 1:14 16; 2:9).
HOPE|HOPE An expectation of something desired. Christian hope is trust and confidence in the eternal goodness of God, a faith that Christ has overcome the suffering of this world. God is both the cause and goal of hope (John 16:20-24, 33; Rom. 5:2; 8:24, 25; 2 Thess. 2:16).
HYPOSTASIS|HYPOSTASIS A technical theological term for "person" or something which has an individual existence. The word is used to describe the three Persons of the Godhead: the Father, Son, and Holy Spirit. Hypostasis is also used to describe the one Person of Christ, who is both truly divine and truly human.
ICON|ICON Image. Christ is "the image of the invisible God" (Col. 1:15). Because Christ is God who became Man, He can Himself be pictured or imaged. Thus, icons of Christ— together with those of His saints - express the reality of the Incarnation. Orthodox Christians honor or venerate icons, but never worship them, for worship is due to God alone. The honor given to icons passes on to the one represented on the icon, as a means of thanksgiving for what God has done in that person's life.
IDOL|IDOL A statue or other image of a false god; also, anything that is worshiped in place of the one true God. Money, possessions, fame, even family members can become idols if we put them ahead of God (see Lev. 26:1; Col. 3:5).
ILLUMINATION|ILLUMINATION Enlightenment. In the Bible, darkness is often used as an image of sin and death. To be illuminated is to be shown the true path of righteousness in God, thereby being led out of the darkness of sin and death. Baptism is called illumination, because in it we are delivered from sin and death and regenerated by the Holy Spirit. See Ezra 9:8; Ps. 13:3; 18:28; Eph. 1:18.
IMAGE|IMAGE (Gr. eikon) Literally, "icon." The Bible teaches that man was created in the image and likeness of God. Men and women reflect the divine image in their ability to reason and to rule nature, and in freedom of action. Although sin has darkened or stained God's image, it has not annihilated it. Through Christ, the image of God is renewed in man as believers are transformed by the grace of the Holy Spirit. See Gen. 1:26; Rom. 8:29; 2 Cor. 3:18. See also ICON.
IMMANUEL|IMMANUEL "God is with us," a title of Christ the Messiah, God in the flesh (Is. 7:14; Matt. 1:22, 23).
IMMORTALITY|IMMORTALITY Eternal life. Those who follow Christ will rise to eternal life with Him in heaven; those who reject Him will be resurrected to eternity in hell (John 3:16-18; 5:26-29).
INCARNATE|INCARNATE From Latin, meaning "to become flesh." Christ is God Incarnate: He became flesh—that is, human—thereby sanctifying human flesh and reuniting all humanity to God. According to Orthodox doctrine, Jesus Christ is perfect God and perfect Man (Luke 1:26 38; John 1:1-14; Phil. 2:5-7).
INCENSE|INCENSE The sap of the frankincense tree, or other aromatic substances, dried and burned in honor of God. The offering of incense has been associated with the worship of God since God commanded Moses to burn incense to Him in the tabernacle. The prophet Malachi (1:11) predicts, "among the Gentiles [the Church] . . . incense shall be offered . . ." The Magi offered frankincense to the infant Christ. Incense manifests the prayers of the saints as they ascend to heaven. It is found in every revelation of the worship of God in heaven. See Ex. 30:1-8; Matt. 2:9-11; Rev. 5:8.
INFANT BAPTISM|INFANT BAPTISM There are numerous biblical passages which support the ancient Christian practice of infant baptism, which was universal in the Church until the Anabaptist reaction after the Protestant Reformation. Among these are: "Let the little children come to Me, and do not forbid them; for of such is the kingdom of heaven" (Matt. 19:14); the baptism of whole households and families, presumably including children (Acts 16:14, 15, 25 33); and Paul's comparison between circumcision, which was given to infants, and baptism (Col. 2:11, 12). See John 3:3-6; Rom. 6:3, 4; Gal. 3:27; 1 Pet. 3:21.
INTERCESSION|INTERCESSION Supplication to God in behalf of another person. Christ intercedes before God the Father in behalf of the repentant sinner, and God's people intercede for one another (see Is. 53:12; Jer. 27:18; Rom. 8:34).
JEW|JEW Originally one of God's chosen people who followed the covenant given to Moses by God. In the Old Testament, the Jews are (1) citizens of Judah; (2) the postexilic people of Israel; or (3) the worshipers of Yahweh. God chose the Jews to prepare the way for the coming of the Messiah, Jesus Christ, the Only Begotten Son of God. Through Christ the distinction between Jew and Gentile has been overcome, and all those who follow Him have become the true chosen people of God. See Acts 22:3; Rom. 1:16; 2:28, 29; Gal. 3:28; 1 Pet. 2:9.
JUDGMENT|JUDGMENT In the biblical sense, God's decision on the worthiness of one to enter heaven or to be condemned to hell. Following death, all will be judged, and Christ will return again to confirm that judgment. Because of sin, no one can earn a place in heaven by his own righteousness. However, through Christ, sin is forgiven and overcome, and those who have followed Him are granted a place in heaven. See Matt. 25:31 46; John 5:24; 16:8-11; Heb. 9:27; Rev. 20:11-15.
JUSTIFICATION|JUSTIFICATION The act whereby God forgives the sins of a believer and begins to transform him or her into a righteous person. No person can earn justification by works of righteousness, for justification is the gift of God given to those who respond to the gospel with faith. God also helps those who cooperate with His grace to become righteous. Saving faith is not mere belief but a commitment to Christ that is manifested by works of righteousness (see article, "Justification by Faith," at Rom. 5; Rom. 5:1, 2; Gal. 2:16; Phil. 2:12, 13; James 2:24).
KENOSIS|KENOSIS Literally, "emptying." The word is associated with humility or humiliation. God the Word humbled Himself by becoming man (with no change in His divinity), suffering death on the Cross for the world and its salvation (Phil. 2:5-8).
KINGDOM OF GOD|KINGDOM OF GOD God's rule over the world, showing (1) His absolute sovereignty as Creator and (2) His sovereignty over the faithful who voluntarily submit to Him. The Kingdom of God was made manifest by Christ and is present in the world through the Church. The fullness of the Kingdom will come when Christ returns to judge the living and the dead, creating a new heaven and earth. See Mark 1:15; John 3:3 5; Rom. 8:20, 21; 1 Cor. 6:9, 10; Rev. 21:1—22:5.
KISS OF PEACE|KISS OF PEACE A kiss on the cheek or the shoulder given by one believer to another as a sign of Christian unity and fellowship (see 1 Cor. 16:20). The clergy, and in some places the faithful, exchange the kiss of peace before saying the Nicene Creed during the Divine Liturgy of the Orthodox Church.
KNOWLEDGE|KNOWLEDGE Knowing and experiencing the truth of God and salvation through Jesus Christ. Spiritual knowledge (1) is frequently identified with Christian doctrine; (2) is applied to the spiritual meaning of the Scripture; and (3) refers to mystical and contemplative knowledge, not merely intellectual knowledge of God. Its aim and effects are to enhance man's responsibility, to aid in discernment of good and evil, and to lead people to God. See Luke 12:47, 48; 1 Cor. 13:2; 2 Cor. 4:6; Eph. 4: 16.
KOINONIA|KOINONIA A Greek word meaning communion or intimate fellowship. This relationship exists between the three Persons of the Holy Trinity and also between Christians who are united by love into one body in Christ. See Acts 2:41, 42; 2 Cor. 13:14; 1 John 1:1-7. See also COMMUNION.
LAMB OF GOD|LAMB OF GOD Jesus Christ, the Lamb of God, offered Himself as a perfect sacrifice for the sins of the world (John 1:29). In the preparation service, the bread and wine are made ready to be consecrated in the Eucharist service to follow. The priest cuts out the center section of the loaf, called "the Lamb," for use in Communion as the Body of Christ.
LEAVENED|LEAVENED As in leavened bread, where a small amount of yeast will cause the whole loaf to rise, so a small amount of evil or good affects the whole body (see Luke 13:20, 21; 1 Cor. 5:7, 8). In contrast to the Old Testament bread, which was unleavened to show the Israelites' separation from the world (see Ex. 12:15-20), leavened bread—risen bread—is used in Orthodox Communion to show forth the Resurrection of Christ.
LIGHT|LIGHT The Bible frequently uses light as a symbol of God and of that which is good, that which overcomes the darkness of sin and death. Candles are used in churches to symbolize the light of Christ. Christians are lights shining in the world to show the way of righteousness and salvation (see Matt. 5:14; John 8:12).
LITURGY|LITURGY The work or public service of the people of God, which is the worship of the one true God. The Divine Liturgy is the Eucharistic service of the Orthodox Church.
LOVE|LOVE Charity, union, affection, friendship; unselfish concern for another's good. The love of Christians for each other and for the world is a reflection of the love between the three Persons of the Holy Trinity. See John 11:3, 36; 1 Cor. 13; 1 John 4:8, 16.
MAGNIFICAT|MAGNIFICAT The prayer or hymn sung by the Virgin Mary when she visited St. Elizabeth, the mother of St. John the Baptist, shortly after the Annunciation (Luke 1:46 55). Sung frequently during Matins in the Orthodox Church, this hymn takes its title from the Latin for the beginning phrase, "My soul magnifies the Lord." See 1 Sam. 2:1-10.
MAN|MAN (Gr. anthropos) Frequently used in the Bible in the generic sense for both man and woman. Man is the pinnacle of God's creation, for only he among the creatures was made in the image and likeness of God. See Gen. 1:26, 27; Luke 4:4.
MARTYR|MARTYR (Gr. martyria) Literally, "a witness." Normally, the term is used to describe those who give their lives for Christ. Martyria has two meanings: (1) witness or testimony, especially that which God bears to Christians, and which Christians bear to the world; and (2) martyrdom, especially Christ's Passion, and the martyrdom of Christians for the faith (see John 1:6-15; Acts 6:8—7:60).
MATINS|MATINS The early morning prayer service in the Orthodox Church.
MEDIATOR|MEDIATOR One who intervenes on behalf of another. Jesus Christ intervenes on behalf of the faithful before God the Father (1 Tim. 2:5).
MERCY|MERCY The compassionate, steadfast love of God for sinners. Christians reflect the mercy of God by caring for others. The most frequent prayer in Orthodox worship is "Lord, have mercy." See Matt. 5:7; Eph. 2:v7; Titus 3:4 7.
MESSIAH|MESSIAH The Christ, the anointed one of God. Jesus Christ is the Messiah, fulfilling all the promises made by God to His chosen people (see Is. 7:14; 9:6; Matt. 16:13 17).
MILLENNIUM|MILLENNIUM A thousand years. The Orthodox Church has traditionally taught that the thousand-year reign of Christ on earth before the final defeat of Satan, as recorded in Rev. 20:1-3, is symbolic of the rule of Christ through the Church, which is a manifestation of the Kingdom of God (see 2 Pet. 3:8).
MIND|MIND The intelligent faculty, the inner person; often used synonymously with "heart." There are two Greek words for mind: (1) nous, the mind which is separated from the sensible world and the passions (Rom. 8:7; 12:2); and (2) dianoia, the intellect (Matt. 22:37).
MIRACLE|MIRACLE A sign whereby God supersedes the normal laws of nature in a mysterious way in order to manifest His power as Master of the universe. Jesus Christ performed many miracles—some showing His mastery over nature, others demonstrating His power over sin, disease, and death. The apostles continued to manifest the power of God through miracles. Healings, weeping icons, and other contemporary miracles also show His power in the world today. See Matt. 8:1-34; John 11:144; Acts 3:1-9.
MISSION|MISSION A task given by God to His people. Christ sent the Seventy on a mission (Luke 10:1-24). St. Paul went on three missionary journeys to preach the gospel (Acts 13:1—14:28; 15:36—18:22; 18:23 21:16). The mission of the Church today is to proclaim Christ to the world.
MYSTERY|MYSTERY The ways of God, especially God's plan for salvation, which cannot be known with the rational, finite human mind, but can be experienced only by the revelation of God. The Orthodox Church also uses the term mystery for the sacraments of the Church. See Mark 4:11; 1 Cor. 2:7, 8; Eph. 5:32. see also SACRAMENT.
NATURE|NATURE The sum of the qualities shared by individuals of the same type. (The qualities which distinguish individuals of a type from one another make up the "person.") The Holy Trinity is one divine Nature in three Persons. Humanity is one human nature in many persons. Although stained by sin, human nature is good, having been created in the image of God. Through grace, the Holy Spirit restores the nature of believers to its true, uncorrupted state, so that they may grow into union with God. See Gen. 1:2631; 2 Cor. 3:18; 5:17.
NEW MAN|NEW MAN One who is being transformed or deified by the Holy Spirit into a new creature in communion with God (2 Cor. 5:17; Gal. 6:15).
NEW JERUSALEM|NEW JERUSALEM The center of the Kingdom of God which will be established following the Second Coming of Christ and the Last Judgment. The heavenly Jerusalem will take the place of the old earthly Jerusalem, and is called by Paul, "the mother of us all" (Gal. 4:26). See Rev. 3:12; 21:2.
OLD MAN|OLD MAN One not transformed by the Holy Spirit, still a slave to sin and death (Rom. 6:5 7; Eph. 4:20 24).
ORDINATION|ORDINATION The sacramental act setting a man apart for the ministry of the Church by the laying on of hands of a bishop. The original meaning of ordination includes both election and imposing of hands (see article, "Ordination," at Acts 14; Acts 6:1-6; 14:23; 1 Tim. 4:14).
ORIGINAL SIN|ORIGINAL SIN The fact that every person born comes into the world stained with the consequences of the sins of Adam and Eve and of their other ancestors. These consequences are chiefly: (1) mortality, (2) a tendency to sin, and (3) alienation from God and from other people. Original sin does not carry guilt, however, for a person is guilty only of his or her own sins, not of those of Adam. Therefore, the Orthodox Church does not believe that a baby who dies unbaptized is condemned to hell. See Gen. 3:1-24; Rom. 5:12-16.
PARABLE|PARABLE A story told to illustrate a greater truth through images related to the daily lives of the hearers. Christ's teaching is filled with parables (see article, "Parables," at Matt. 13; Matt. 13:1-54).
PARADISE|PARADISE The place of rest for the departed in Christ. The original Paradise, seen in Gen. 2:8 14, will be restored in its fullness following the Second Coming of Christ. See Luke 23:43; 2 Cor. 12:4; 2 Pet. 3:13; Rev. 2:7; 21:1.
PARADOX|PARADOX That which is true, but not conventionally logical: for example, that a virgin could bear a Son and yet remain a virgin, as did Mary; or that God can be One, yet three Persons. The Christian faith is full of paradoxes, because our intellect is not sufficient to comprehend the mind of God (see Is. 55:8, 9).
PASCHA|PASCHA Greek for "Passover." Originally Pascha designated the Jewish Passover; now, it is the Feast of the Resurrection of Christ. Christ is the Lamb of God whose sacrifice delivers the faithful from death, as the sacrifice of the Passover Lamb delivered the ancient Jews from slavery and death in Egypt (Ex. 12; 13; 1 Cor. 5:7, 8).
PASSION (1)|PASSION (1) A term used to describe the sacrifice of Christ on the Cross. (2) Holy Week is often called Passion Week, describing Christ's struggle and suffering in Jerusalem. (3) Passions are human appetites or urges&mdash;such as hunger, the desire for pleasure and sexual drives&mdash;which become a source of sin when not controlled or directed by submission to the will of God (Rom. 1:26; 7:5; Gal. 5:24; Col. 3:5).
PEACE|PEACE (Heb. shalom) Tranquillity, harmony with God, self, and other people made possible through Christ, who unites human beings to God and to each other. See Rom. 14:17; Gal. 5:22; Eph. 2:13-16; Phil. 4:6, 7.
PENTECOST|PENTECOST Originally an OT harvest festival celebrated fifty days following the Passover. In time, Pentecost became the commemoration of the giving of the Law to Moses on Mt. Sinai. Pentecost took on a new meaning with the descent of the Holy Spirit on the apostles at Pentecost. Through the Sacrament of Chrismation, Orthodox Christians experience their own personal Pentecost. Every Divine Liturgy becomes a Pentecost through the descent of the Holy Spirit on the faithful and the gifts (the bread and wine), transforming them into the Body and Blood of Christ. See Ex. 23:14-17; Lev. 23:15 21; Acts 2:1 41.
PERSON|PERSON (Gr. prosopon; Lat. persona) Regarding the Holy Trinity, there are three Divine Persons: God the Father, Son, and Holy Spirit. The Person of God the Son became Man, Jesus Christ, "for us and for our salvation" (Matt. 28:19). See also HYPOSTASIS.
PHARISEES|PHARISEES One of the parties of first-century Judaism. The Pharisees favored strict legalistic application of traditional interpretations of the Law stemming from oral Jewish traditions. Unlike the Sadducees, they believed in angels and in the resurrection of the dead. The Pharisees were generally hostile to the mission of Christ, who condemned their excessive legalism and their preoccupation with outward forms, ignoring true righteousness of the heart. See Matt. 3:7; 12:14; 22:34; 23:13-36. See also SADDUCEES.
PILGRIM|PILGRIM One who makes a journey to a religious shrine or a spiritual journey from sin and suffering in this life to eternal life with Christ in heaven. See Ps. 42:4; Heb. 11:13; 1 Pet. 2:11.
POWER (1)|POWER (1) A divine attribute or energy (Matt. 6:13; Luke 1:35; Rom. 1:16). (2) The authority and ability to act (Matt. 9:6). (3) A category of angelic beings (Eph. 1:21).
PRAISE|PRAISE To glorify and give thanks to God or to speak highly of someone or something (Judg. 5:3; Ps. 9:1-14; Rom. 15:11).
PRAYER|PRAYER Communion with God through words of praise, thanksgiving, repentance, supplication, and intercession. Prayer is "raising up the heart and mind to God" (St. John of Damascus). Usually prayer is verbal. However, prayer of the heart or in the Spirit, the highest form of prayer, is without words. See Matt. 6:5-13; 21:22; Rom. 8:26; Phil. 4:6; 1 Thess. 5:17.
PRESBYTER|PRESBYTER Literally, "elder"; now generally called "priest." Presbyter is one of the three orders of the ordained ministry of the Church: bishop, presbyter, and deacon (see article, "The Four 'Orders' in Church Government," at 1 Tim.; Acts 14:23; 15:4 23; 1 Tim. 5:17-19; Titus 1:5). See also BISHOP.
PROCEED|PROCEED To come forth from or come to. The Holy Spirit proceeds from the Father, the fountainhead of the Holy Trinity (John 15:26).
PROPHET|PROPHET One who proclaims the will of God and/or who foretells the future, especially the coming and mission of Christ, through the inspiration of the Holy Spirit. See Deut. 18:18; Acts 28:25.
PROPITIATION|PROPITIATION An offering that results in atonement, redemption, and reconciliation. Christ offered Himself on the Cross as a propitiation for our sins, to liberate humanity from sin and death. See Rom. 3:21-26; Heb. 2:17; 1 John 2:2; 4:10.
PROSELYTE|PROSELYTE Literally, "one who comes toward." A proselyte is a convert to the Faith, usually from another religion. In the New Testament, the word usually refers to a Gentile convert to Judaism (see Acts 2:10; 13:43).
PROVIDENCE|PROVIDENCE God's sovereign care in governing His creation, especially His care for the faithful (Rom. 8:28).
PURIFICATION|PURIFICATION The Old Testament rite whereby one is cleansed of ritual impurity caused by such things as contact with leprosy or a dead body, or sexual functions. This cleansing consisted of making a sacrifice or being sprinkled with "water of purification" (Num. 19:9). Christ liberated the faithful from these rites. Christians are purified by the sacraments and by their spiritual struggle towards transforming their passions. See Lev. 12:6; Num. 19:9 21; Matt. 15:11; Luke 2:22-33; Acts 10:9-16; 15:1-29.
RAPTURE|RAPTURE The gathering of the Church on earth in the presence of Christ when He comes again to judge the living and the dead (1 Thess. 4:15-17). Orthodox theologians reject the recent minority view that the Church will be taken out of the world before the time of trouble preceding the Second Coming. Christ specifically teaches the faithful will experience the trials of tribulation (Matt. 24:&gt;28). See also SECOND COMING.
RECONCILIATION|RECONCILIATION The removal of hostility and barriers between humans and God, and between individuals, accomplished by Christ (Rom. 5:11; 2 Cor. 5:18, 19).
REDEMPTION|REDEMPTION The deliverance of humanity from sin and death by Christ, who assumed humanity by His Incarnation, conquered sin and death by His life-giving death and glorious Resurrection, releases those who are in captivity to the evil one, and unites humanity to God by His Ascension (Gal. 3:13; Heb. 9:15). See also DEIFICATION and SALVATION.
REMEMBRANCE|REMEMBRANCE (Gr. anamnesis) Making present by means of recollection. The Eucharist is not merely a calling to mind but a remembrance of and mystical participation in the very sacrifice of Christ, His Resurrection, His Ascension, and His coming again (1 Cor. 11:23 26).
REMISSION|REMISSION The forgiveness and putting aside of sins. As the faithful are released from their sins through the sacramental life of the Church, they in turn are called to remit the sins of any who have offended them See John 20:23; Acts 2:37, 38.
REPENTANCE|REPENTANCE Literally, "a change of mind" or attitude, and thus of behavior. God is the author of repentance, which is an integral part of baptism, confession, and ongoing spiritual life. Repentance is not simply sorrow for sins but a firm determination to turn away from sin to a new life of righteousness in Jesus Christ. See Matt. 4:17; 2 Pet. 3:9; 1 John 1:9.
RESURRECTION|RESURRECTION The reunion of the soul and body after death which will revitalize and transform the physical body into a spiritual body. Jesus Himself is the firstfruits of perfect resurrection; He will never again be subject to death. Because He conquered death by His Resurrection, all will rise again: the righteous to life with Christ, the wicked to judgment. See John 5:28, 29; 1 Cor. 15:35 55.
RIGHTEOUSNESS|RIGHTEOUSNESS Being good, just, and blameless. All are called to a life of humble obedience to God. However, acts of righteousness cannot earn salvation. Rather, righteousness is the fruit of the Holy Spirit, and the way in which Christians respond with living faith to God's gift of salvation. See Matt. 5:6, 20; Rom. 4:3; Gal. 5:22; James 2:14-26.
RITES|RITES Forms of worship, music, vestments, and architecture. Most Orthodox Christians follow the liturgical practice of the ancient Churches in the east (Antioch, Jerusalem, and Alexandria), the rite commonly known as the Liturgy of St. John Chrysostom. However, some Orthodox follow a Western Rite, forms that developed in the west before the separation of Rome from the Orthodox Church.
RITUAL|RITUAL Ceremonies and texts used in the worship of the Church. Having her roots in the temple and synagogue, the Church has employed ritual in her worship from the very beginning. See also LITURGY and WORSHIP.
SABBATH|SABBATH The seventh day of the week, originally a day of rest, for after creation "God rested on the seventh day" (Gen. 2:2). Since Christ rose from the dead on the first day of the week, Sunday, the Church gathers on this day instead of the seventh to worship God. Sunday is also called "the Lord's Day" and "the eighth day," because it transcends the Sabbath and is seen as being a part of heavenly time rather than earthly time. See Ex. 20:8-11; Acts 20:7.
SACRAMENT|SACRAMENT Literally, a "mystery." A sacrament is a way in which God imparts grace to His people. Orthodox Christians frequently speak of seven sacraments, but God's gift of grace is not limited only to these seven&mdash;the entire life of the Church is mystical and sacramental. The sacraments were instituted by Christ Himself (John 1:16, 17). The seven mysteries are baptism (Matt. 28:18-20; Rom. 6:4; Gal. 3:27), chrismation (Acts 8:15-17; 1 John 2:27), the Holy Eucharist (Matt. 26:26 28; John 6:30-58; 1 Cor. 10:16; 11:23-31), confession John 20:22, 23; 1 John 1:8, 9), ordination (Mark 3:14; Acts 1:15-26; 6:1-6; 1 Tim. 3:1-13; 4:14), marriage (Gen. 2:18 25; Eph. 5:22-33), and healing or unction (Luke 9:1 6; James 5:14, 15).
SACRIFICE|SACRIFICE To offer something up to God. In the Old Covenant, God commanded His people to sacrifice animals, grain, or oil as an act of thanksgiving, praise, forgiveness, and cleansing. However, these sacrifices were only a foreshadowing of the one perfect sacrifice&mdash;Christ, the Word of God, who left the heavenly glory to humble Himself by becoming Man, giving His life as a sacrifice on the Cross to liberate humanity from the curse of sin and death. In the Eucharist, the faithful participate in the all-embracing, final and total sacrifice of Christ. See Lev. 1:1&mdash;7:38; 1 Cor. 11:23-26; Phil. 2:5-8; Heb. 9:1&mdash;10:18. See also REMEMBRANCE.
SADDUCEES|SADDUCEES A party in Judaism at the time of Christ. The Sadducees steadfastly held to a literal interpretation of the Law contained in the first five books of the Old Testament (the Pentateuch or Torah), and rejected traditional interpretations favored by other groups of Jews, especially the Pharisees. Sadducees came from the priestly class and rejected the resurrection of the dead and the existence of angels. Christ condemned these Jewish leaders for their preoccupation with outward forms, ignoring or neglecting true righteousness of the heart (Matt. 16:1-12).
SAINT|SAINT Literally, "a holy person." With God as the source of true holiness, all Christians are called to be saints (see Rom. 16:2; 1 Cor. 1:1, 2). But from the earliest times, the Church has designated certain outstanding men and women who have departed this life and reached deification as worthy of veneration and canonization as saints or holy persons.
SALVATION|SALVATION The fulfillment of humanity in Christ, through deliverance from the curse of sin and death, to union with God through Christ the Savior. Salvation includes a process of growth of the whole person whereby the sinner is changed into the image and likeness of God. One is saved by faith through grace. However, saving faith is more than mere belief. It must be a living faith manifested by works of righteousness, whereby we cooperate with God to do His will. We receive the grace of God for salvation through participation in the sacramental life of the Church. See articles, "The New Birth," at John 3; "Justification by Faith," at Rom. 5; and "Deification," at 2 Pet. 1; 2 Cor. 3:18; 4:16; 5:17; Eph. 2:8, 9; Phil. 2:12, 13; James 2:14 26; 1 Pet. 2:2. See also DEIFICATION, JUSTIFICATION, REDEMPTION and SACRAMENT.
SANCTIFICATION|SANCTIFICATION Literally, "being set apart" to God. The process of growth in Christ whereby the believer is made holy as God is holy, through the Holy Spirit (see article, "Deification," at 2 Pet. 1; Rom. 6:22 with center-column note; Rom. 15:16). See also DEIFICATION, JUSTIFICATION and SALVATION.
SANCTUARY|SANCTUARY The Holy of Holies or Most Holy Place&mdash;the place in the Old Testament tabernacle or temple containing the ark of the covenant, the dwelling place of God. Only the High Priest could enter the Most Holy Place and only on the Day of Atonement. When the early Christians built churches, they followed the general pattern of the temple, and the altar area is often called the sanctuary. See Ex. 26:31-35; 40:34, 35; Lev. 16:1-5; 1 Kin. 6:1-38; 8:1-11.
SECOND COMING|SECOND COMING At the end of the ages, Christ will come again to judge the living and the dead. Following the judgment, a new heaven and new earth will take the place of the old earth, which has been scarred by sin. Because Christ is already present through the Church, Christians enter into the Kingdom through their participation in the sacramental life of the Church as they await the coming of the Lord (see article, "The Second Coming of Christ," at Titus 2; Matt. 25:314 6; Rom. 8:18 21; 1 Thess. 4:16,17; Rev. 20:11 - 22:5). See also RESURRECTION.
SHEKINAH|SHEKINAH The glory of God, frequently revealed in the symbols of fire and cloud in the Old Testament. Although Christians experience the energies of God, including His glory, they never penetrate beyond the cloud to the inner essence of God, which remains hidden. See Ex. 13:21; 24:15 18; 33:18-23; 40:34, 35; 2 Chr. 7:1; Matt. 17:1-5. See also ENERGY and ESSENCE.
SIN|SIN (Gr. hamartia) Literally, "missing the mark." This word in ancient Greek could describe the action of an archer who failed to hit the target. All humans are sinners who miss the mark of perfection that God has set for His people, resulting in alienation from God, sinful actions that violate the law of God, and ultimately in death. See Matt. 5:48; Rom. 3:23; 6:23; 1 John 1:8.
SOJOURNER|SOJOURNER A stranger or foreigner. Because the Church exists in a sinful world that has rejected God, Christians citizens of the Kingdom of God&mdash;are strangers in a foreign land. Therefore, faithful sojourners are on guard, lest they adopt the ways of the fallen society in which they live. See 1 Pet. 2:11; 1 John 2:1 917.
SON OF MAN|SON OF MAN An important messianic title of Christ, who is perfect God and perfect Man. The Gospels reveal that Jesus often applied this title to Himself. In Christ, the Second Adam, God assumed and perfected sinful humanity, freeing those who follow
|Him from the consequences of the rebellion of the first man, Adam. See Mark 2:28; 9:31; Rom. 5:12-21; 1 Cor. 15:21, 22, 45-49. See also INCARNATION.
SORROW|SORROW Sadness and grief caused by the realization of one's sins. The Scriptures distinguish between godly sorrow, which produces repentance, and ungodly sorrow, the sadness of being found out, which produces death (Matt. 5:4; 2 Cor. 7:9, 10). Christ has conquered suffering and death, the cause of sadness, and turns true sorrow to joy for His followers (John 16:20-22, 33).
SOUL|SOUL A living substance, simple, bodiless, and invisible by nature, activating the body to which it brings life, growth, sensation and reproduction. The mind is not distinct from the soul but serves as a window to the soul. The soul is free, endowed with will, and the power to act. Along with the body, the soul is created by God in His image. The soul of man will never die (Gen. 1:26; 2:7; Matt. 10:28).
SPIRIT|SPIRIT (Gr. pneuma) Literally, "breath"; that which is living but immaterial. Spirit is used in three ways in Scripture. (1) The Holy Spirit is one of the three Persons of the Trinity (John 4:24; 20:22). (2) The angels are called spirits (Ps. 104:4). (3) The human spirit possesses the intuitive ability to know and experience God (Rom. 8:16; 1 Cor. 2:10 12).
SPIRITUALITY|SPIRITUALITY The ascetic and pious struggle against sin through repentance, prayer, fasting, and participation in the sacramental life of the Church. See Gal. 5:16 26; Phil. 2:12, 13. See also SYNERGISM.
STEWARD(SHIP)|STEWARD(SHIP) A steward is one who manages property belonging to another. All a Christian has belongs to God. Thus, the Christian gives back to God out of the material blessings he has received from God for the work of the Church. In the Old Testament God commanded the faithful to give ten percent of their goods to God; though not under law, Christians should give at least as much. Christians are also stewards of the spiritual knowledge which God has entrusted to us. We must preserve the heritage of apostolic doctrine intact for future generations. See Gen. 14:18-20; Lev. 27:30 33; 1 Cor. 4:1, 2; 2 Cor. 9:6 8; 1 Pet. 4:10.
SYMBOL|SYMBOL In Orthodox usage, the manifestation in material form of a spiritual reality. A symbol does not merely stand for something else, as does a "sign'; it indicates the actual presence of its subject. For example, the dove is the symbol which brought to Jesus the descent of the Holy Spirit (Matt. 3:13-16).
SYNAXIS|SYNAXIS Literally, "gathering" or "assembly." Synaxis is the word used for the ancient Greek Senate. The first part of the Divine Liturgy is called the synaxis because the faithful gather to sing, to hear the Scriptures read, and to hear the homily. The saints' days are also called a synaxis, such as the Synaxis of St. Michael and all the angels.
SYNERGISM|SYNERGISM (from Gr. syn: same, together; ergos: energy, work) Working together, the act of cooperation. In referring to the New Testament, synergism is the idea of being "workers together with" God (2 Cor. 6:1), or of working "out your own salvation . . . for it is God who works in you" (Phil. 2:12, 13). This is not a cooperation between "equals," but finite man working together with Almighty God. Nor does synergism suggest working for, or earning, salvation. God offers salvation by His grace, and man's ability to cooperate also is a grace. Therefore, man responds to salvation through cooperation with God's grace in living faith, righteous works and rejection of evil (James 2:14-26). See also FREE WILL and PASSIONS.
SYNOPTIC|SYNOPTIC (from Gr. syn: same, together; optic: eye, vision) The books of Matthew, Mark, and Luke, which hold essentially the same viewpoint and "look alike," are called the synoptic Gospels.
TEMPTATION|TEMPTATION The seductive attraction of sin. Christ was tempted by Satan and has overcome the power of temptation. Those united to Christ are given His power also to withstand the temptation of sin through patience, courage, and obedience. See Matt. 4:1-11; 1 Cor. 10:13; Heb. 2:17, 18; James 1:12.
THANKSGIVING|THANKSGIVING To be grateful, to offer thanks, especially to God for His love and mercy. The Eucharistic prayer is called the thanksgiving (see 1 Thess. 5:18).
THEOPHANY|THEOPHANY A manifestation of God in His uncreated glory. It refers also to Christ's resurrection appearances. The revelation of the Holy Trinity at the Baptism of Christ (Luke 3:21, 22) is the greatest theophany; it is celebrated in the Orthodox Church on Epiphany (Jan. 6). Other theophanies are found throughout the Bible. For example, God appeared to Abraham in the form of three men (Gen. 18:1-15), and to Jacob in a dream (Gen. 28:10 17). See also EPIPHANY.
THEOTOKOS|THEOTOKOS God-bearer, birth-giver, frequently translated "Mother of God." Because Jesus Christ is the divine Son of God, Mary is called the Mother of God to profess our faith that in the Incarnation, God was in her womb. Elizabeth called Mary "blessed" and "the mother of my Lord" (Luke 1:42, 43). At the Council of Ephesus in A.D. 431, the Church condemned Nestorius and other heretics who refused to call the Virgin Mary the Theotokos. For if it was not God in Mary's womb, there is no salvation for humanity. See article, "Mary," at Luke 1; Luke 1:26-43; John 1:1-14.) See also INCARNATION
TRADITION|TRADITION That which is handed down, transmitted. Tradition is the life of the Church in the Holy Spirit, for the Holy Spirit leads the Church "into all truth" (John 16:13) and enables her to preserve the truth taught by Christ to His Apostles. The Holy Scriptures are the core of Holy Tradition, as interpreted through the writings of the Fathers, the Ecumenical Councils, and the worship of the Church. Together, these traditions manifest the faith of the ancient undivided Church, inspired by the Holy Spirit to preserve the fullness of the gospel. See John 21:25; Acts 15:1-29; 2 Thess. 2:15.
TRANSFIGURATION|TRANSFIGURATION A change or transformation. Christ was transfigured on Mt. Tabor, showing He is God in the flesh (Matt. 17:1-8). Christians are called to be transformed by the Holy Spirit into the image and likeness of God (Rom. 12:1, 2). See article. "The Transfiguration," at Matt. 17. See also DEIFICATION.
TRIBULATION (THE)|TRIBULATION (THE) The Scriptures reveal that much trouble and violence&mdash;Great Tribulation&mdash;will engulf the world before the Second Coming of Christ (Matt. 24:4-29). See also ESCHATOLOGY, RAPTURE, and SECOND COMING.
TRISAGION|TRISAGION Literally, "Thrice Holy." The biblical Trisagion, "Holy, Holy, Holy," is the hymn of the angels before the throne of God (Is. 6:1-3; Rev. 4:8), and is one of the most important hymns of the Divine Liturgy. In the Tradition of the Church, this hymn has been amplified into the Trisagion frequently sung during services and said during prayers: "Holy God, Holy Mighty, Holy Immortal One, have mercy on us." The biblical use of "Holy" three times is an indication of the three Persons in the Godhead.
TYPE|TYPE A historical event that has a deeper meaning, pointing to our salvation in Christ. For example, the three days that Jonah spent in the belly of the fish is a type of the three days that Christ would spend in the tomb (Matt. 12:40). The serpent that Moses lifted up on the staff is a type of the lifting up of Christ on the Cross (John 3:14-16). The burning bush, aflame but not consumed, is a type of the Virgin Mary, who carried the incarnate God in her womb but was not consumed by His presence (Luke 1:2638). Noah's ark, which saved Noah and his family from death in the flood, is a type of baptism, which brings the believer from death to life (1 Pet. 3:18-22). See also ALLEGORY.
TRINITY|TRINITY God the Father and His Son and His Holy Spirit: one in essence and undivided. God revealed the mystery of the Trinity at Christ's baptism (Matt. 3:13 17), but even before that event, numerous Old Testament references pointed to the Trinity. For example, the frequent use of plural pronouns referring to the one God (Gen. 1:26); the three angels who appeared to Abraham (Gen. 18:1-16); and the Triple Holy hymn sung by the angels in Isaiah's vision (Is. 6:1 4) all suggest one God in three Persons, the Father, Son, and Holy Spirit (Matt. 28:19).
UNCTION|UNCTION Anointing of the sick with blessed oil, for the healing of body and soul. The gift of healing is bestowed by the Holy Spirit through the anointing, together with the prayers of the Unction service. See article "Healing," at James 5; James 5:14, 15; 1 John 2:20.) See also SACRAMENT.
UNLEAVENED BREAD|UNLEAVENED BREAD Bread baked without yeast. The Jews used unleavened bread for the Passover to symbolize the fact that they had no time to wait for the yeast to rise in the bread (Ex. 12:1-20). By contrast, the bread of the New Covenant is leavened. See also LEAVEN.
VESPERS|VESPERS The evening prayer service in the Orthodox Church.
VICE|VICE A particular immoral, depraved, or degrading habit, as contrasted with virtue. Christians are called to flee from the vices and preserve their purity (Rom. 13:13; Eph. 4:17-24). See also VIRTUE.
VIRTUE|VIRTUE A righteous characteristic such as self-control, patience, or humility; the opposite of vice or passion. As a person grows spiritually, he or she grows in virtue while the passions are conquered by the grace of God. See Phil. 4:8; 2 Pet. 1:2-7. See also PASSION.
WISDOM (OF GOD)|WISDOM (OF GOD) A name for God's Son and Word; Christ is the Wisdom of God. Also, wisdom is given to the Church as a gift of the Holy Spirit. See John 1:1; 1 Cor. 2:6-8; Col. 3:16.
WITNESS|WITNESS (Gr. martyria) One who testifies by word and deed. In the New Testament, the word is also rendered "martyr," a reference to those who give their lives for the gospel of Christ. Also, the Holy Spirit bears witness to the spirits of those who believe in Christ, that they belong to Him. See Rom. 8:16; Heb. 10:15; 12:1; 1 John 5:6 12; Rev. 11:3 12. See also MARTYR.
WORD OF GOD|WORD OF GOD (Gr. Logos) The Son of God, who from the mystery of His eternal birth is called the Word of the Father. The "Word became flesh" (John 1:14) for the salvation of the world. The Holy Scriptures are also called the Word of God, for they reveal the truth of God (John 1:1-14; 2 Pet. 1:19-21). See also INCARNATION.
WORSHIP|WORSHIP Literally, "to bow down." In the Christian sense worship is the adoration of God through participation in the services of the Church, the highest act of a Christian (John 4:19-24). See also LITURGY.
WORTHY|WORTHY (Gr. axios) Describes those who act in a manner befitting one who is a follower of Christ. No one is worthy of salvation in and of himself, but all are made worthy through Christ (see 1 Thess. 2:10-12).
ZEAL|ZEAL Devotion; enthusiastic obedience to God; a quality of divine diligence or fervor. Christians are (1) called to follow Christ with enthusiasm and zeal (Acts 18:25; Rom. 12:10, 11) and (2) warned against misguided enthusiasm, a zeal "not according to knowledge" (Rom. 10:2).
ANTIMENS OR ANTIMINSION|ANTIMENS OR ANTIMINSION (Gr. and Lat. compounds, "in place of a table"; Sl. Antimins). It is a rectangular piece of cloth, of linen or silk, with representations of the entombment of Christ, of the four Evangelists, and with scriptural passages related to the Eucharist. The antimens must be consecrated by the head of the church (a Patriarch or Archbishop) and must always lie on the Altar Table. No sacrament, especially the Divine Liturgy, can be performed without a consecrated antimens.
ANTIDORON|ANTIDORON (Gr. "instead of the gift"). A small piece of the altar bread (prosphoron) given to each of the faithful after the celebration of the Eucharist. Originally it was given to those who could not take communion, but it became a practice for it to be offered to all the faithful.
ANALOGION|ANALOGION (Gr. Sl. analoy). A wooden stand or podium placed on the right side of the soleas near the south door of the altar. Usually with a sloped top, it is used as a stand for the gospel book or an icon.
APOCRYPHA|APOCRYPHA (Gr. "hidden or secret"). Some of the books of the Bible not accepted by all denominations of Christians as true and divinely inspired. Some of them were written much later but attributed to important individuals of the apostolic times, thus bearing a misleading title (pseudepigrapha).
ALTAR BREAD|ALTAR BREAD (see Prosphoro).
AGE OF REASON|AGE OF REASON This is the time in life when an individual begins to distinguish between right and wrong and becomes morally responsible for himself. It is considered to begin at the age of seven or so, and no later than twelve.
ANTERI|ANTERI (see cassock).
ALTAR TABLE|ALTAR TABLE (Gr. Hagia Trapeza; Sl. Prestol). The square table in the middle of the altar, made of wood or marble, on which the Eucharist is offered. It is dressed with the "Altar Cloth" and contains the relics deposited there by the consecrating bishop. The center of the table is occupied by the folded Antiminsion, on which the ceremonial gospel book is placed, and behind this is the tabernacle with the "reserved gifts."
CHRISM|CHRISM (Gr. Myrron). Sanctified oil composed of several ingredients and fragrances, used in the sacrament of Chrismation (after Baptism). The Holy Chrism in the Orthodox Church is exclusively prepared by the Ecumenical Patriarchate and is blessed in a series of preparations and ceremonies. Holy Thursday is customarily the day of its consecration.  Chrismation. (see Baptism and Chrism).
CROSIER|CROSIER (Gr. Ravdos or Pateritsa). The pastoral staff of a bishop, signifying his responsibilities and the authority by which he spiritually rules his flock.  Crowns. (Gr. Stephana). A metal crown or wreath made of cloth in the shape of lemon blossoms, with which the priest "crowns" the newlyweds during the sacrament of Matrimony. The crowns are white, signifying purity, and represent the power that is given to the newlyweds to become "king and queen" of their home.
EAGLE|EAGLE (Gr. Dikephalos aitos; Sl. Orletz). Small circular rug or permanent design on the church's floor, presenting a double-headed eagle with outstretched wings soaring over a city. It signifies the watchfulness and authority of the bishop over his diocese. The double-headed eagle was also the symbol of the Byzantine Empire.  Easter. (Gr. Pascha or Lambri). The feast day of the resurrection of Christ, known also as "the Feast of Feasts." It is the greatest Orthodox festival, celebrated the Sunday following the first full moon after the Spring equinox. It is a movable feast, and the dates of the other movable feasts of the Orthodox Church are calculated from it.  Ecclesia. (Gr. "the gathering of the people").
ALTAR|ALTAR (Hebr. "a place of sacrifice"; Gr. hieron; Sl. prestol). In Orthodox architecture, the term signifies the area of the sanctuary divided from the rest of the church by the iconostasis.
CANONIZATION|CANONIZATION The official declaration by the Church that a deceased Christian of attested virtue is a saint, to be honored as such, and worthy of imitation by the faithful.  Canons (or Canon Law). The law of the church, containing the various rules, ecclesiastical decrees, and definitions concerning the faith or the lifestyle of Orthodox Christians. The Canons generally provide for all administrative or disciplinary questions that might arise in the Church, and, consequently, are not infallible but can be changed or re-interpreted by an Ecumenical Council. See also the article on the Canon Law of the Orthodox Church.  Capital Sin (or Mortal or Deadly sin). Great offenses against God, or moral faults which, if habitual, could result in the spiritual death of the individual. The following sins are considered to be mortal: pride, covetousness, lust, anger, gluttony, envy, and sloth. These are the "Seven Deadly Sins" of the phrase.  Cassock. (Gr. Raso; Sl. ryassa). The long black garment with large sleeves worn by the Orthodox clergy as their distinct attire. Another such cassock with narrow sleeves (Gr. Anteri; Sl. Podrasnik) is worn under the cassock. It symbolizes the death of a clergyman to this world and his burial and subsequent dedication to God and his heavenly kingdom.  Catechism. A summary of doctrine and instruction, teaching the Orthodox faith in the form of questions and answers. The catechetical or Sunday school of each parish is responsible for such instruction of children or other faithful.  Catechumen. (Gr. "those who learn the faith"). A convert to Christianity in the early church who received instruction in Christianity but was not yet baptized. Catechumens were permitted to attend the first part of the Eucharist (Liturgy of the Catechumens), but were dismissed before the Consecration of the Gifts.  Cathedral. (Gr. "the main chair"). The principal church of a bishop's jurisdiction, the chief church in every diocese.  Catholic. (Gr. "universal, concerning the whole"; Sl. Sobomaya). A term describing the universality of the Christian message, claimed to be exclusively theirs by the Orthodox Church. However, in the West, it has come to mean the Roman Catholic church (v. Eastern Orthodox Church).  Celibacy. The unmarried state of life. Unlike the Roman Church, Orthodoxy permits a clergyman to be married; however, his marriage must occur before his ordination to be a deacon or presbyter. Orthodox bishops are only chosen from the celibate clergy, but widowers, who have accepted monastic vows, may also be chosen.  Censer. (Gr. Thymiato; Sl. kadillo). A metal vessel hung on chains, used in church ceremonies for burning incense. There are twelve small bells attached to the chains, representing the message of the twelve Apostles.  Chalice. (Gr. Potirion; Sl. Vozduh). A large cup of silver or gold, with a long-stemmed base, used for the Eucharist. It is one of the most sacred vessels of the church and is handled only by the clergy.  Chancellor. (Gr. Protosyngelos). The chief administrator and church notary in a diocese or archdiocese. He is the immediate administrative assistant to the bishop and handles all records, certificates, and ecclesiastical documents of his jurisdiction.  Chant. (Gr. echos; Sl. glas). The music proper to the Orthodox services. There are eight tones or modes in the Orthodox Byzantine chant, chanted by the chanters or cantors.  Chanter. (Gr. Psaltis). A lay person who assists the priest by chanting the responses and hymns in the services or sacraments of the church. Today, chanters have been replaced to some extent by choirs.  Chapel. (Gr. Parekklisi[on]; Sl. Chasovnya). A side altar attached to a larger church or a small building or room built exclusively or arranged for the worship of God. A chapel can belong to an individual or an institution, or can be part of a parish church.  Chasuble. (Gr. feloni[on]; Sl. felon). A sleeveless garment worn by the presbyter in the celebration of the liturgy. Short in front, with an elongated back, and an opening for the head, it is one of the most ancient vestments of the Church, symbolizing the seamless coat of Christ.  Chatjis. (see Hatjis).  Cherubic Hymn. (Gr. "the song of the angels"). Liturgical hymn sung after the Gospel-reading and during the Great Entrance. Its text in English is as follows:
ECCLESIASTICAL|ECCLESIASTICAL Whatever deals with or pertains to the Church and its life.  Ecclesiology. The branch of theology studying the nature, constitution, function, and membership of the Church.  Ecumenical Council. (see council).  Ecumenical Patriarchate. The "First Among Equals" of all the Orthodox autocephalous churches, it was founded by St. Andrew the Apostle. Visit the Ecumenical Patriarchate of Constantinople home page for more information, historical notes, encyclicals, official documents, and photo and video galleries.  Ecumenism. The movement of Christian Churches toward a mutual understanding of their problems and the concept of unity and love willed by Christ.  Ektenial. (Gr. "long" or "elongated"). A type of petition or litany used in Orthodox services, particularly in the liturgy. They refer to the world in general, peace, leadership, and those in need. The response to an ektenial petition is "Lord have mercy."  Encyclical. (Gr. "moving in a circle"; "circulating"). A letter by the head of an Orthodox jurisdiction (Archbishop or Patriarch) to those under his spiritual authority. The content of such a letter may vary, but it must refer to specific administrative or spiritual topics concerning the faithful.  Engainia. (Gr. "blessing for renewal"). The ceremony of consecration of a new church, conducted only by a bishop. It is performed before the Eucharist, and it mainly consists of the washing of the Holy Table of the altar, the depositing of relics in it, and the blessing of the church icons.  Engolpion. (Gr. "upon the chest"). The bishop's medallion, usually of enamel and richly decorated with precious stones, hanging upon his chest and signifying his episcopal office.  Entrance. (Gr. Eisodos). The solemn procession of the celebrating clergy carrying the Gospel at the liturgy, after the antiphons (Small Entrance), and carrying the Holy Gifts during the chanting of the cherubic hymn (Great Entrance).  Epanokalymafko. The monastic black veil hanging over the back of the kalymafki of a celibate Orthodox clergyman, especially the prelate of a church (see kalymafki). Some Orthodox prelates of Slavic background wear white epanokalymafko.  Eparchy. (Gr. "province, region"). An ecclesiastical jurisdiction headed by a bishop, metropolitan, or archbishop.  Epigonation. (Gr. "on the knee"; Sl. Palitsa or Nabedrennik). An oblong or rhomboidal vestment (approx. 12 x 12 inches) suspended from the belt and hung over the right side above the knee of a clergyman of higher rank. It signifies the cloth used by Christ to wipe his disciples' feet before the Last Supper and also signifies the sword of the Spirit, which is the Word of God.  Epiklesis. (Gr. Epiklesis). Special prayer or petition by the Priest to "invoke" or to call upon the Holy Spirit, in order that God's Grace will descend for the consecration of the Holy Gifts at the Eucharist.  Epiphany. (Gr. Theophania; Sl. Bogoyavleniye). The feast in the Orthodox Church commemorating the baptism of Christ (January 6), and celebrating the ''manifestation'' of God in the Holy Trinity.  Episkopos. (see bishop).  Epitaphios. (Gr. "on the tomb"; Sl. Plaschanitsa).
ACOLYTE|ACOLYTE The follower of a priest; a person assisting the priest in church ceremonies or services. In the early Church, the acolytes were adults; today, however, the duties are performed by children (altar boys).
ALB|ALB (Lat.; Gr. stichari[on]; Sl. Podriznik). The long white undergarment of the clergy, with close sleeves, worn under the chasuble or the sakkos.
ABBOT|ABBOT (from Aram. abba, father; Gr. Hegoumenos, Sl. Nastoyatel). The head of a monastic community or monastery, appointed by a bishop or elected by the members of the community. He has ordinary jurisdiction and authority over his monastery, serving in particular as spiritual father and guiding the members of his community.
HAGIA SOPHIA|HAGIA SOPHIA (Gr. Agia Sophia). The Cathedral of Constantinople in which the Ecumenical Patriarchs and Byzantine Emperors were enthroned. It is the greatest Orthodox church, dedicated to the Holy Wisdom of God. It was built by the emperor Justinian in the year 532 A.D.; its architecture is an outstanding example of the so-called Byzantine Orthodox order. Select this link to visit the web site on Hagia Sophia.
GUARDIAN ANGEL|GUARDIAN ANGEL (Gr. Phylakas Angelos). The Orthodox believe that certain angels are appointed by God at baptism to guide and protect each faithful person. A prayer of the Orthodox Liturgy asks for "an angel of Peace, a faithful guide and guardian of our soul and bodies."  God-parents. (Godfather, Gr. Nounos; Godmother, Gr. Nouna). Sponsors at Baptism and Chrismation taking the responsibility for the faith and spiritual development of the newly-born Christian. The Orthodox people highly regard the spiritual bond and relationship between godparents and their godchildren, and marriage between them is prohibited (see affinity).
ABBESS|ABBESS (from masc. abbot; Gr. Hegoumeni). The female superior of a community of nuns, appointed by a bishop; Mother Superior. She has general authority over her community and nunnery under the supervision of a bishop.
EPITRACHELION|EPITRACHELION (Gr. "about the neck"). One of the most important vestments, hanging from the neck down to the feet. An Orthodox priest must wear this particular vestment to perform a sacrament.  Equal to the Apostles. (Gr. Isapostolos). An honorary title given to saints such as St. Constantine and Sts. Cyril and Methodios for their missionary work in the Church.  Eschatology. (Gr. "the last things to happen"). The theological field concerned with life after death, especially the "last things," i.e., the state of the dead, the Second Coming of Christ, and the Final Judgment.
AëR|AëR (Sl. Vozdukh). The largest of the three veils used for covering the paten and the chalice during or after the Eucharist. It represents the shroud of Christ. When the creed is read, the priest shakes it over the chalice, symbolizing the descent of the Holy Spirit.
CHRISOM|CHRISOM (Gr. Ladopano; Sl. knzhma). A piece of white linen for the wrapping of the infant after Baptism. The Orthodox preserve it as a sacred object because it signifies the purity and holiness of the baptized Christian.  Christology. A subject or field of dogmatic theology examining the belief of the church and the history of beliefs about Christ.  Churching. (Gr. Sarantismos). A service of thanksgiving and blessing of women after childbirth. In the Orthodox church, this rite is performed on the fortieth day after birth and is reminiscent of the Old Testament ceremony of purification (Lev. 12: 2-8) and the presentation of Jesus at the Temple (Luke 2: 22-29).  Communion. (Gr. koinonia). The receiving of the sacrament of the Eucharist after proper preparation, fasting, and confession. Orthodox Christians are encouraged to receive communion as often as possible, even daily.
ALL-SAINTS|ALL-SAINTS Sunday. (Gr. Agion Panton). A feast day of the Orthodox Church collectively commemorating all the Saints of the church who have remained anonymous. This feast day is celebrated on the Sunday following Pentecost.
AGRAPHA|AGRAPHA (Gr. "verbal words; not written"). Sayings or deeds of Christ which were never written or recorded in the Gospels (cf. John 21:25).
AKATHISTOS HYMN|AKATHISTOS HYMN A hymn of praise comprising twenty-four stanzas and sung at the Salutation Services, dedicated to Virgin Mary Theotokos. It is divided into four parts, one part sung on each Friday of the Great Lent. On the fifth Friday, the entire set is sung in commemoration of a miracle performed by the Virgin in Constantinople (626 A.D.). The hymn is also known as "Salutations" (Gr. Heretismoi).
ALPHA-OMEGA|ALPHA-OMEGA The first and the last letters of the Greek alphabet, symbolizing "the beginning and the end," or the divinity and eternity of Christ (Rev. 1: 8). These two letters also form the monogram of Christ.
DISMISSAL|DISMISSAL (Gr. Apolysis; Sl. Otpust). The closing prayers and benediction, including the dismissal hymn (Apolytikion), in a church service.  Dogma. Basic beliefs and truths contained in the Bible and the Holy Tradition of the Church as defined by the Ecumenical Councils and the Fathers of the Church. Dogma is studied in the field of dogmatic theology.  Dormition (see assumption).
HAGIOGRAPHY|HAGIOGRAPHY (Gr. Hagiologia). The writings of the Church Fathers and the study of the lives of the saints. The Orthodox Church is a reservoir of such writings, which the faithful are urged to read for their spiritual growth and development.  Hatjis. (or Chatzis; fem. Hatjina; Ar. "pilgrim"). A title or name given to those who made a pilgrimage to the Holy Land and are "baptized" in the Jordan River. Such a pilgrim may assume the title of Hatjis for the rest of his or her life. One also may attach this word before the baptismal name to produce a variation such as Hatji-Yiorgis or Hatji-Yiannis. Such names often become surnames, especially common among Greeks.  Hegoumenos. (see abbot).  Heresy. (Gr. "new and personal belief or idea"). The denial or rejection of a revealed dogma or belief accepted and professed by the Church. An individual who begins a heresy is a heretic and is excommunicated.  Heretismoi. (see Akathistos hymn).  Hermit. (see Anchorite).  Hesychasm. A spiritual movement in the Byzantine  Empire (fourteenth century) developed on Mount Athos, Greece. The term means "to be quiet" and signifies the system of spiritual development through meditation, contemplation, and perfection to the degree of absolute union with God (theosis). It is one of the forms of Orthodox Mysticism and is still practiced in the Orthodox world.  Heterodoxy. Different, alien, and presumably false belief or teaching. The Orthodox Church describes as such all other Christian denominations.  Hierarchy. The higher clergy or College of bishops who are assigned to rule over spiritual matters of the church.  Holy Water. (Gr. Agiasmos). Water blessed at the service of the "Great Blessing" on the feast day of Epiphany (Jan. 6) or on other occasions (Small Blessing). It is used for the blessing of people, as at Holy Communion, or for the blessing of things for their well-being.  Holy Wisdom. (see Hagia Sophia).  Horologion. (Gr. "Book of the Hours"; Sl. Chasoslov). The Liturgical book containing the services and prayers of the different hours of the day, i.e., Compline, Matins, Vespers, and the Office of the Hours (see hours).  Hours. In Orthodox monasteries, monks maintain special services for the main hours of the day. Each hour commemorates a special event, as follows:
AFFINITY|AFFINITY (Gr. Syngeneia). The spiritual relationship existing between an individual and his spouse's relatives, or, most especially, between godparents and godchildren. The Orthodox Church considers affinity an impediment to marriage.
FANAR|FANAR The Greek neighborhood of Constantinople (Istanbul) where the Ecumenical Patriarchate is situated.  Fasting. (see abstinence).  Fathers of the Church. (Gr. Pateres). Pious and educated individuals, most of them bishops, who lived during the first eight centuries of Christianity. They wrote extensively about, taught, explained, and defended the faith of the Church. The most important Orthodox Fathers are St. Basil the Great, St. Gregory of Nazianzus, St. Gregory of Nyssa, St. John Chrysostom, St. Athanasius the Great, St. Cyril of Alexandria, and St. John of Damascus.  Filioque. (Lat. "and from the Son"). Theological term referring to the procession of the Holy Spirit. Its insertion in the Creed by the Roman Church (1009 A.D.) became one of the main causes for the schism between the Orthodox and Catholic  Churches.
CALENDAR|CALENDAR (Gr. Hemerologion). The yearly system determining the Orthodox holidays and hours. The Orthodox year begins on September 1. Because all feasts were arranged according to the Julian (old) Calendar, many Orthodox churches follow it to the present day, while other Orthodox churches have adopted the Gregorian (new) Calendar (since 1924). See also the article on the Calendar of the Orthodox Church.  Candles. (Gr. Keri[on]). Candles made of beeswax are used in the Orthodox Church as a form of sacrifice and devotion to God or Saints. They are used in various Orthodox services and ceremonies and are symbolic of Christ, who is "the Light of the World." According to a different symbolism, the two elements of a candle represent the two natures of Christ: the Divine (the burning wick) and the Human (the wax body).  Canon. (Gr. "rule, measure, standard").
AMNOS|AMNOS (see lamb).
APOLYTIKION|APOLYTIKION (Gr. "dismissal"). The dismissal hymn sung in honor of a saint, Christ, or the Virgin Mary on the occasion of their feast day, especially at the end of the Vespers Service.  Apostolic Canons. A collection of eighty-five decrees of ecclesiastical importance, referring mainly to ordination and the discipline of the clergy. The church believes that they were originally written by the Apostolic fathers.  Apostolic Fathers. Men who lived during the first century of Christianity; for the most part, this group comprised the disciples of the Apostles; their teachings and writings are of great spiritual value to Christians. Major fathers are St. Ignatius of Antioch, St. Polycarp of Smyrna, St. Clement of Rome, and the unknown author of Didache.  Apostolic Succession. The direct, continuous, and unbroken line of succession transmitted to the bishops of the Church by the Apostles. The bishops, who form a collective body (that is the leadership of the Church), are considered to be successors of the Apostles, and, consequently, the duties and powers given to the Apostles by Christ are transmitted through "the laying-on-of-hands" to the bishops and priests who succeeded them by ordination (cheirotonia) to priesthood.  Archangels. An Angelic order of angels of higher rank. The names of two archangels, Michael and Gabriel, are known (feast day on November 8); they are also known as "leaders of the angelic armies" (taxiarchai).  Archbishop. A head bishop, usually in charge of a large ecclesiastical jurisdiction or archdiocese (see Metropolitan).  Archdeacon. A senior deacon, usually serving with a bishop of higher rank (Archbishop or Patriarch).  Archdiocese. An ecclesiastical jurisdiction, usually a metropolis headed by an Archbishop.  Archimandrite. (Gr. "head of the flock or cloister"). A celibate presbyter of high rank assisting the bishop or appointed abbot in a monastery. In the Russian tradition, some Archimandrites have the right to wear the mitre and the mantle (mitrophoros).  Armenian Church. A monophysite denomination which broke from the Orthodox Church in the fifth century (451 A.D.). Communities which belong to the Armenian Church exist in the United States and other parts of the world.  Artoclasia. (see Vespers).  Ascension. A movable feast day, forty days after Easter, commemorating the ascension of Christ into Heaven from the Mount  of Olives (Acts 1: 12).  Ascetic. (Gr. "one who practices [spiritual] exercises"). A monk who has accepted a monastic life and intensively practices self discipline, meditation, and self-denial, motivated by love of God.  Ascetic Theology. A theological field studying the teachings and the writings of the ascetics of the Church (see also mysticism).  Assumption or Dormition. A feast day (August 15) commemorating the "falling asleep" (koimisis) of the Virgin Mary.  Asterisk. (Gr. "little star"; Sl. Zvezditsa). A sacred vessel having two arched metal bands held together in such a fashion as to form the shape of a cross. It is placed on the paten and serves to prevent the veil from touching the particles of the Eucharist.  Atheism. (Gr. "godlessness"). Denial of the existence of God. An atheist accepts only the material and physical world or what can be proven by reason.  Atonement. (Gr. exilasmos). The redemptive activity of Christ in reconciling man to God. The Orthodox believe that Christ, through His death upon the cross, atoned or paid for human sins.  Autocephalous. (Gr. "appointing its own leader"). The status of an Orthodox church which is self-governed and also has the authority to elect or appoint its own leader or head (cephale).  Autonomy. (Gr. "self-rule"). The status of an Orthodox Church that is self-ruled. An autonomous church is governed by its prelate, who is chosen by a superior jurisdiction, usually by a patriarchate.  Axios. (Gr. "worthy"). An exclamation made at ordination to signify the worthiness of the individual chosen to become a clergyman.
COMMUNION OF SAINTS|COMMUNION OF SAINTS The Orthodox Church believes that all the people of God-members of the Church, either the living on earth or the departed in heaven-are in constant communion and fellowship with each other in faith, grace, and prayers, since they constitute one Body in Christ-the Church.  Compline. (Gr. Apodeipnon; Sl. Velikoye PovecheAye). A worship service performed after dusk. It is often combined with Vespers to form an all-night vigil. There is a Great Compline and its abridgement, known as Small Compline.  Confession. (Gr. Exomologisis). The act of confessing or acknowledgment of sins by an individual before God in the presence of a priest, who serves as a spiritual guide and confessor (pneumatikos) authorized to ask for forgiveness and to administer a penance.  Confessor.
APODOSIS|APODOSIS (Gr., Sl. Otdanive). The "octave-day" of a feast day which lasts more than one day and usually occurs eight days after the actual feast day. The Apodosis of Easter occurs forty days after the feast, on the eve of the Ascension.
ANCHORITE|ANCHORITE (Gr. Anachoritis, "a departurer"). A solitary monk or hermit; an individual who withdraws from society and lives a solitary life of silence and prayer.
CONSECRATION|CONSECRATION (Gr. Heirotonia). The ordination of an individual to priesthood through the sacrament of Holy Orders.  Consecration of a Church. (see Engainia).  Council, Ecumenical. (Gr. Synodos; Sl. Sobor). Assembly of representatives from all church jurisdictions convoked for the settlement of ecclesiastical or doctrinal problems and disputes. The Orthodox Church recognizes the following seven Ecumenical Councils:
DEACONESS|DEACONESS A pious lay woman assisting in the church as a caretaker or charity worker. The practice of using deaconesses in the Church was very ancient; however, it gradually disappeared.  Dikirotrikera. (Gr. "set of two and three candles"). A set of two candleholders, one a double-branched candlestick and another a triple-branched, both used by the bishop in blessing at the liturgy. The Dikeron (double candleholder) signifies the two natures of Christ, while the Trikeron (triple candleholder) signifies the Holy Trinity.  Diocese. (Gr. Episkopi). A town or fully organized church district under the ecclesiastical jurisdiction and pastoral direction of a bishop.  Diptychs. (Gr. "folding boards").
AGNETS|AGNETS (see lamb).
ANTIPHON|ANTIPHON (Gr. "alternate utterance or chanting").
ANATHEMA|ANATHEMA (Gr. "a curse, suspension"). The spiritual suspension with which the church may expel a person from his or her community for various reasons, especially denial of the faith or other mortal sins. The church also may proclaim an anathema against the enemies of the faith, such as heretics and traitors, in a special service conducted on the Sunday of Orthodoxy (first Sunday of Lent).
ABSTINENCE|ABSTINENCE (Gr. Nisteia). A penitential practice consisting of voluntary deprivation of certain foods for religious reasons. In the Orthodox Church, days of abstinence are observed on Wednesdays and Fridays, or during other specific periods, such as the Great Lent (see fasting).
APOLOGETICS|APOLOGETICS (Gr. "defenders").
PRESVYTERA|PRESVYTERA (Gr.; Sl. Matushka). An honorary title for the priest's wife or mother.  Prokeimenon. (Gr. "gradual introduction"). A liturgical verse or scriptural passage sung or read before the reading of the Epistle. It serves as an introduction to the theme of this particular reading.  Proskomide. (Gr. "gathering of gifts" or "preparing to receive the gifts"; Sl. Shertvennik). The Service of the preparation of the elements of bread and wine before the Liturgy. It takes place on the Table of Oblation (Prothesis), which is situated at the left (north) side of the altar.  Prosphoro. (Gr. "offering gift, an item dedicated to God and offered as a votive," also prosphora). The altar bread which is leavened and prepared with pure wheat flour to be used for the Eucharist. It is round and stamped on the top with a special seal (sphragis or Panagiari). Sometimes it is made in two layers symbolizing the two natures of Christ (Human and Divine). The inscribed parts of the top are used for the Eucharist, and the rest of it is cut into small pieces to be distributed to the faithful (antidoron).  Pulpit. (Gr.; Sl. Amvon, "an elevated place, podium"). A small raised platform or elaborate podium at the left (north) side of the solea and in the front of the iconostasis. Decorated with representations of the four Evangelists, it is the place on which the deacon or priest reads the Gospel and delivers his sermon.
MONOTHELITISM|MONOTHELITISM A heresy of the seventh century, which developed in an attempt to reconcile the monophysites with the Orthodox. The monothelites accept the two Natures of Christ, but deny His human will (Thelesis), accepting thereby only his Divine  Mortal Sins. (see capital sins).  Mother Church. The Church of Jerusalem, as being the first Christian Church. Commonly, the Orthodox consider as Mother Church the Ecumenical Patriarchate as being the senior Church of the Orthodox World.  Mount Athos. The center of Orthodox monasticism, situated on a conical mountain on the Chakidi Peninsula, Greece.
SAINTS|SAINTS (Gr. Agios). All holy men, women, and angels, who, through a pure and holy life on earth or through martyrdom and confession of faith in word and deeds, have merited the canonization of the Church. The saints and the other pious people who are in glory with God constitute the "Triumphant  Church." See the article on Saints in the Orthodox Church. .  Sakkos or Dalmatic. The main vestment worn by the bishop during the Liturgy. It originates from the vestments of the Byzantine emperor.  Salutations. (see Akathistos hymn).  Schism. Formal separation from the unity of the one true Church. Although the Christian Church has witnessed several schisms, the most disastrous was the separation of the Greek Eastern and the Roman  Western Church in 1054, dividing Christendom into two parts (see separate section on Church history).  See. (Gr. Hedra or Thronos). The official "seat" or city capital where a bishop resides (esp. for a large jurisdiction); hence, the territory of his entire jurisdiction may be called his See.  Service books. They are special books containing the hymns or the services of the Orthodox Church. There are eight, as follows: Gospel (Evangelion), Book of Epistles (Apostolos), Psalter (Octoechos or paraklitiki), Triodion, Pentecostarion, Twelve Menaia, Horologion, and Service or Liturgy book (Euchologio or Ieratiko).  Service Book or Ieratikon or Litourgikon or Euchologio. (Sl. Sluzhebnik). The liturgical book containing the prayers and ceremonial order of the various church services including the Liturgy.  Sign of the Cross. The Orthodox make the Sign of the Cross to signify their belief in the sacrifice of Christ upon the cross for man's salvation. It is made by the right hand in a cruciform gesture touching the forehead, chest, right and left shoulders with the tips of fingers (the thumb, index, and middle finger joined together as a symbol of the Holy Trinity, the ring and little fingers touching the palm as a symbol of the two Natures of Christ).  Solea. An area with elevated floor in front of the iconostasis of the church, where the various rites and church ceremonies are held.
SOTERIOLOGY|SOTERIOLOGY Theological field studying the mission and work of Christ as Redeemer (Soter). Also, refer to the article on the Dogmatic Tradition of the Orthodox Church.
VIGIL|VIGIL (Gr. olonychtia). Spiritual exercises during the night preceding the feast day of a saint or another major feast, observed by various spiritual preparations, prayers, and services.
SPHRAGIS|SPHRAGIS (see prosphoro).  Spiritual relationship. (see affinity).  Stavropegion. Monastery or monastic community directly under the jurisdiction of the Ecumenical Patriarchate.  Stichar. (see Alb).  Subdeacon. (Gr. hypodiakonos). A layman who has received a special blessing by the bishop to serve in the church, assisting in the services and ceremonies.  Synaxarion.
LOGOS|LOGOS (Gr. "word"). A symbol for Christ, the word incarnate, or "word made Flesh," which is also called "the Word of God" (cf. John 1:1-4).  Lord's Prayer. The prayer taught by Christ in the Sermon on the Mount (cf. Matt. 6: 9-33 and Luke 11: 2-4). It begins with the phrase "Our father..." and is the most common Orthodox prayer.
PAGANISM|PAGANISM Belief in religions other than Christianity, especially ancient Greek polytheism, which was a non-revealed religion.  Pall. (Gr. Omophorion). One of the bishop's vestments, made of a band of brocade, worn about the neck and around the shoulders. It signifies the Good Shepherd and the spiritual authority of a bishop.  Palm Sunday. (Gr. Kyriaki ton Vaion; Sl. Verbnoye Voskresenye). The Sunday before Easter, commemorating the triumphal entrance of Christ into Jerusalem. The Orthodox use palms or willow branches in the shape of a cross, which the priest distributes to the faithful after the liturgy.  Panagia. (Gr. "All Holy"). One of the Orthodox names used to address the Mother of God. In Orthodox art, the term Panagia denotes an icon depicting the Virgin Mary with the Christ Child, or the bishop's medallion (Encolpion) which usually is decorated with an icon of the Panagia (especially in the Russian Church). (See also Theotokos.)  Pantocrator. (Gr. "He who reigns over all; almighty"). One of the appellations of God. In Orthodox art, Pantocrator is the name of the fresco decorating the center of the dome, depicting Christ as the almighty God and Lord of the Universe.  Paraklitiki. (see Oktoechos).  Pascha. (see Easter).  Paschal week. (Gr. Diakaimsimos or "bright week"). The week following the Sunday of Easter (Pascha), signifying the spiritual renewal and joy brought to the world by the resurrected Christ.  Paschalion. The table of dates for Easter and all movable feasts of the year.  Pastoral theology. The theological field that studies the ways and methods to be used by the clergy for carrying through their duties as Pastors of the Church.  Paten. (Gr. Diskos). A small round and flat plate made of gold or silver on which the priest places the particles of bread at the celebration of the Eucharist.  Patriarch. (Gr. "in charge of the family"). The highest prelate in the Orthodox Church. Today, there are eight Orthodox prelates called patriarchs (see Patriarchate).  Patriarchate. An ecclesiastical jurisdiction governed by a patriarch. There are eight such jurisdictions today in the Orthodox Church, the four ancient Patriarchates of the East, and the four Slavic patriarchates.  Patristics. The theological field that studies the lives and the writings of the Fathers of the Church.  Patron Saint. (Gr. Poliouchos; Sl. Nebesny Pokrovitel). A saint chosen by a group, nation, or organization to be their special advocate, guardian, and protector. The Patron Saint of an individual is usually the saint after whom the individual is named. See also the article on Saints in the Orthodox Church.
KATHISMA|KATHISMA Liturgical hymn.
MONK|MONK (Gr. Monachos; fem. Monache). An individual who denies the world in order to live a religious life under the monastic vows of poverty, chastity, and obedience.
OBLATION|OBLATION (see Proskomide).  Offertory. (see Proskomide).  Oktoechos. (Gr. "eight modes" or Paraklitiki). Service book containing the canons and hymns of the eight tones or modes of Byzantine music. They are used in all services, arranged every eight weeks, one for each tone, and are attributed to St. John of Damascus (eighth century), one of the greatest Orthodox hymnographers and theologians.  Omophor. (see Pall).  Orarion. (Lat.) One of the deacon's vestments, made of a long band of brocade and worn over the left shoulder and under the right arm. It signifies the wings of the angels.  Ordination. (Gr. cheirotonia). The sacrament of the Holy Orders, imparted through the laying on of hands upon the candidate for the priesthood.  Orthodox. (Gr. "correct or true belief"). The common and official name used by the Greek Christians and Eastern Christian Church. The Orthodox Church maintains Her belief that She alone has kept the true Christian faith, complete and unaltered.  Orthodox Sunday. The first Sunday of Lent, commemorating the restoration of icons in the church (see Iconoclasm).  Orthros. (see Matins).
LAITY|LAITY (Gr. Laikos; Sl. Miryane). Members of the Church who are not ordained to the priesthood.  Lamb. (Gr. Amnos). The symbol for the sacrifice of Christ on the Cross (cf. John 1: 29). In the Orthodox liturgy, the amnos is the first square piece from the altar bread (prosphoro), inscribed with the letters ICXCNIKA (an abbreviated form for "Jesus Christ conquers"). This particular piece is to be consecrated during the Eucharist.  Lamentations service. (Gr. Epitaphios threnos). Special hymns referring to the sacrifice of Christ on the cross and His burial (see Epitaphios).  Lance or spear. (Gr. Lonche). A small, lance-shaped, double-edged knife used by the priest for the cutting of the altar bread in the service of the Preparation of the Holy Gifts (see Proskomide).  Language. According to the Orthodox tradition, the Church adopts and uses the language of any particular country or ethnic group that she serves. The main liturgical languages in the Orthodox Church are Greek, the various descendants of old Church Slavonic, and Arabic.  Last Supper. (Gr. Mystikos Deipnos; Sl. Taynya Vercherya). The last meal of Christ with His disciples in the "Upper Room" before his arrest. With this supper, he instituted the Sacrament of the Holy Eucharist.  Leavened Bread. (Gr. artos). Bread made with yeast (enzyma) and used for altar bread for the Orthodox Eucharist (as opposed to the unleavened bread used by the Latin Church). Leavened bread is also acceptable for the purpose in the more liberal Protestant churches.  Lent. (Gr. Sarakosti). The fifty day fast preceding Easter for the spiritual preparation of the faithful to observe the feast of the Resurrection. Besides Lent, the Orthodox Church has assigned a number of other fasting periods (see abstinence).
ICONOCLASM|ICONOCLASM (Gr. "the breaking of icons"). It refers to the conflict in the Byzantine Empire between 727 and 843 over the use of icons in the church. The Seventh Ecumenical Council (787 and 843) decreed the use of icons, following in the main teaching of St. John of Damascus.  Iconography. The study and the art of painting of icons. In the Orthodox Church, iconography was developed mainly in the monasteries, which became the centers of its study and development.
JURISDICTION|JURISDICTION (Gr. Dikaiodosia). The right and the authority of a bishop to rule over his diocese as a spiritual overseer. It includes legislative, judicial, and executive authority, which can be exercised only by individuals who have been canonically ordained and appointed to rule over the jurisdiction in question.
JESUS PRAYER|JESUS PRAYER A short prayer that the Orthodox constantly repeat to practice devotion to God; the tradition of repeating this distinctive prayer was developed in Orthodox monasteries. The text of the Jesus Prayer is: "Lord Jesus Christ, Son of God, have mercy on me, a sinner."
ICONOSTASIS|ICONOSTASIS (Gr. "an icon-stand"). In the Orthodox Church, the term signifies:
PEDALION|PEDALION (see Rudder).  Pentecost. (Gr. "fiftieth Day"). A feast celebrated fifty days after Easter, commemorating the descent of the Holy Spirit onto the disciples of Christ. It is considered to be the birthday of Christianity.  Pentecostarion. A liturgical book containing all the prayers, hymns, and services performed during the period of fifty days between the feasts of Easter and Pentecost.  Polychronion. (Gr. "for many years"). A prayer sung by the chanter or choir in honor of the celebrant bishop or presbyter. Its full version is: "for many years of life" (Gr. Eis Polla Eti Despota; Sl. Mnogaya Lyeta).  Polyeleos. (Gr. "oil candelabrum"; "abundance of oil and grace").
TYPIKON|TYPIKON (Gr. "following the order"; Sl. Sluzhebnik). Liturgical book which contains instructions about the order of the various church services and ceremonies in the form of a perpetual calendar.
MYSTICISM|MYSTICISM The search through various prayers and practices to achieve unity with God in life (theosis) (see hesychasm).
TABERNACLE|TABERNACLE (Gr. Artophorion; Sl. Darochranitelnitsa). An elaborate ark or receptacle kept on the Altar Table, in which the Holy Gifts of the Eucharist are preserved for the communion of the sick or for the Liturgy of the Presanctified Gifts during Lent.  Thaumatourgos. (Gr. "miracle-worker"; Sl. Chudotvorets). A title given to some saints distinguished among the faithful for their miracles.  Theotokos. A theological term commonly used by the Orthodox to indicate the doctrinal significance of Virgin Mary as Mother of God.  Theotokion. (Gr. "referring to Theotokos"; Sl. Bogorodichey). A hymn which refers to or praises Theotokos, the Mother of God.  Three hierarchs. The Orthodox Church considers in particular three bishops (hierarchs) of the Church as Her most important Teachers and Fathers, who contributed to the development and the spiritual growth of the Church. They are St. Basil the Great, St. Gregory the Theologian, and St. John Chrysostom. Their feast day is observed on January 30, a day also dedicated to Hellenic letters since the three hierarchs contributed to the development of Greek Christian education and literature.  Titular bishop. An auxiliary bishop without his own territorial or residential diocese, who is usually assisting a senior bishop with a large jurisdiction (Archbishop or Patriarch). The episcopal title of a titular bishop&nbsp;is taken from an ancient diocese which once flourished but now exists only in name, and, therefore, a titular bishop does not have his own jurisdiction.  Tradition, Orthodox. (Gr. Paradosis). The transmission of the doctrine or the customs of the Orthodox Church through the centuries, basically by word of mouth from generation to generation.  Transfiguration. (Gr. Metamorphosis). The transfiguration of Christ is a major feast day (August 6) commemorating the appearance of Christ in divine glory along with Moses and the prophet Elias on Mount Tabor (cf. Matt. 17: 1-7).  Triodion. (Gr. "three odes or modes").
NAME-DAY|NAME-DAY (Gr. Onomastiria or Onomastiki eorti). The tradition of the Orthodox people is to celebrate one's name-day instead of a birthday. Since the Orthodox people are usually named after a saint's name, all those having the same name celebrate together. Celebration of the name-day is considered to be spiritually important, and the celebrating individual develops special spiritual ties with his Patron Saint and consequently, with God.  Narthex. The vestibule area of the church, leading to the church proper or the nave. In the early Church, this area was assigned for penitents and those who were not yet baptized (catechumens).  Nave. The center, the church proper of an Orthodox Church, where the faithful remain to observe the liturgy and other services.  Neophyte. (Gr. Neophotistos). A newly baptized individual or convert of the early Church.  Nounos. (see godparents).  Novice. (Gr. Dokimos). An individual who accepted the monastic life, undergoing a period of probation in preparation for taking his vows.  Nun. (Gr. Monachi (fem), or Kalogria). A woman following the monastic life, living in a convent and leading a strict contemplative
KERI|KERI (see candles).  Kerygma. (Gr. "message; preaching"). Proclaiming or preaching the word of God in the manner of the Apostles. It is a method of church instruction centered mainly on Christ and the concept of salvation.  Koimissis. (see Dormition).
RASO|RASO (see cassock).  Reader. (Gr. Anagnostis, Sl. Chtets). The individual assigned to read, chant, and give responses in church services. Usually, such a person will be blessed by the bishop with special prayers and in a special ceremony.  Relics. (Gr. Leipsana Agia). The remains from the body of a Saint or even a Saint's possessions, such as clothes or vestments. The relics are honored and venerated by all Orthodox. Upon the consecration of a new church, the consecrating bishop embeds holy relics in the Altar Table, following the ancient traditions of the church in performing the Eucharist on the tombs of Martyrs (Martyria).  Rite. (Gr. Telete, Sl. Tchin). The performance of a religious ceremony following a prescribed order of words and actions (typikon).  Rudder. (Gr. Pedalion). The book containing the rules and regulations prescribed by the Ecumenical Synods and the Fathers. It is the Constitution of the Orthodox Church.
ILITON|ILITON (or Eiliton, Gr.). The silk cloth used to wrap the corporal (or antiminsion).
KALYMAUKI OR KAMILAFKI|KALYMAUKI OR KAMILAFKI (Sl. kamilavka). The black cylindrical hat worn by Orthodox clergy. The black monastic veil (epanokalynafkon) worn by the celibate clergy at various services or ceremonies is attached to the kalymauki (see Epanokalymafkon).  Kanon.
KOLYMBETHRA|KOLYMBETHRA A large, often movable, circular basin on a stand, containing the water for immersion in Baptism. It symbolizes the Jordan River or the pool of Siloam.  Kontakion. A liturgical hymn that gives an abbreviated form of the meaning or history of the feast of a given day. The kontakion is sung after the sixth ode of the Canon in the liturgy and the Service of the Hours. St. Romanos the Melodist is considered to be the most important hymnographer of the Kontakion.  Koumbaros (fem. koumbara).
ZONE|ZONE The belt or girdle worn by the priests on his stichar. It signifies the power of faith.
YEAR OF THE CHURCH|YEAR OF THE CHURCH (see calendar).
PARISH|The principal unit of Christian community headed by a parish priest selected by the bishop. A number of parishes make up a diocese.
PASTORAL LETTER|A letter sent from a bishop to the parishes of his diocese, often read out to people at Mass.
SACRAMENTS|The seven ceremonies that mark Catholics' religious development through life. They are Baptism, Eucharist (Communion), Reconciliation (often called Confession), Confirmation, Marriage, Holy Orders and the Anointing of the Sick.
SCRUTINEERS|Three cardinals chosen by lot at the start of a conclave to oversee the depositing of ballot papers into an urn on the Sistine Chapel's altar.  They shake the urn, count the ballots to assure the number of votes and voters matches, then open each ballot and record and read aloud the name on it.  They add the votes cast for each candidate to determine if a pope has been elected and handle the burning of the ballots and any notes taken by cardinals.  Three more cardinals are also chosen by lot at the start of a conclave to be revisers - tasked with recounting and verifying each round of balloting.
SCRIPTURE|The writings of the Old and New Testaments.
CATHEDRAL|The mother church of a diocese - so called because it contains the cathedra, or bishop's chair, the symbol of a bishop's authority in the area
PONTIFICAL COUNCIL|A department in the Vatican which does not exercise formal jurisdiction (unlike a congregation), but which helps or advises the Vatican and the international Church with a particular expertise, or to promote a particular mission. Heads of councils are known as heads.
CAMERLENGO|The camerlengo (Cardinal Tarcisio Bertone) is the most important Curial official during the interregnum, taking charge of and administering the property and finances of the Holy See, assisted by the vice chamberlain and a canonical adviser.  During the interregnum he reports to the college of cardinals, which governs the Church until a pope is elected. He also organizes the conclave, heading a three-member commission that oversees the physical preparations.  During the conclave, the camerlengo heads a "particular congregation" with three cardinals younger than 80 (chosen by lot and replaced every three days) which deals with lesser issues until a new pope is elected.
PRIEST|Someone who is ordained to the second level of ministry within the Church. Main duties include preaching, celebrating Mass, administering the other sacraments and exercising the principal pastoral role in a parish/community (referred to as Father with either first name or surname: Father John or Father Smith)
EVANGELISATION|The proclamation of Christ and his Gospel. Not to be confused with Evangelicals - a word used to describe some Christian groups (usually Protestant, often conservative in their attitudes to social questions, and literalist in their interpretation of the Bible).
IMMACULATE CONCEPTION|Belief that Mary the mother of Jesus was born free of original sin (NB not to be confused with the Virgin Birth - the belief that Jesus was conceived without sexual intercourse).
PAPACY|The office and jurisdiction of a pope; or the tenure or period of office of a pope. See also: Pontificate.
BLESSED SACRAMENT|The host (bread) consecrated during a Mass and distributed during communion. The Blessed Sacrament is also kept in a locked container (tabernacle) behind or beside the altar from where it is taken for distribution to the sick and veneration during services of Exposition or Benediction.
CONCLAVE|Meeting of cardinals to elect a new pope. All living cardinals are invited. Those under the age of 80 are eligible to vote.  During the conclave, cardinals reside within the Vatican and are not permitted any contact with the outside world.  The cardinals do not have to choose one of their own number - theoretically any baptised male Catholic can be elected pope - but tradition says that they will almost certainly give the job to a cardinal.  
VOCATION|A religious calling - all Christians have a vocation to be followers of Christ in the world. However, vocation is most colloquially used to describe vocations or callings to the priesthood or religious life.
SYNOD|A meeting of bishops to discuss doctrinal and pastoral needs of Church.
LIBERATION THEOLOGY|Theology attempting to articulate faith from the perspective of a group struggling to overcome oppression - vibrant in Latin America and after Second Vatican Council (Vatican II); the movement was clamped down on by the current Pope in his former role as John Paul II's doctrinal enforcer.
SECRETARIAT OF STATE|The oldest dicastery in the Curia; performs all the political and diplomatic functions of Vatican City and the Holy See. Headed by the Secretary of State (effectively prime minister), currently Cardinal Tarcisio Bertone.
CANONISATION|Final step in official process that declares a deceased person to be a saint and acknowledges they can be venerated by the universal Church as "an example of holiness that can be followed with confidence". Requires attribution of one further miracle after the candidate has been declared "blessed" through beatification.
DOXOLOGY|The final element of many Christian prayers, which gives praise and glory to the three persons of the Trinity - God the Father, Son and Holy Spirit.
CONVENT|An enclosed religious house where nuns (female religious) live under a rule and dedicate themselves to prayer.
SEMINARY|A college where men are trained for the priesthood.
PONTIFICATE|The office and jurisdiction of a pope; or the tenure or period of office of a pope. See also: Papacy.
BEATIFICATION|The third of four steps in the process by which a dead person officially becomes a saint. Requires at least one miracle to have been attributed to intercession of a candidate for sainthood who, once beatified, is given the title blessed.
MAGISTERIUM|The teaching office of the universal Church, articulated by a pope. Papal statements which teach on a matter of faith and morals are called magisterial pronouncements and are binding on Catholics. Most statements and documents of popes are not magisterial.
EXTRA OMNES|This Latin command orders those who are not authorised to be in the Sistine Chapel during the conclave to leave before the voting process starts.
CONSISTORY|An assembly of cardinals presided over by the pope.
COUNCIL (VATICAN)|A meeting of bishops/Church elders to discuss doctrinal and pastoral needs of Church. The most recent example was the Second Vatican Council (or Vatican II) held in Rome (1962-1965). The reforms of the Second Vatican Council were dramatic and profound, although there is now controversy about how they should be interpreted.
COLLEGE OF CARDINALS|The body of all cardinals of the Church. Its main functions are: to advise the pope about Church matters at an ordinary consistory and, on the death or abdication of a pope, to elect his successor at a conclave.
MISSAL|A book containing the order of services and prayers of the Mass.
MASS|Celebration of the Eucharist - central sacrament of the Church which also includes a liturgy of the word and a rite of penance.
NUNCIO|Pope's ambassador/representative in a country, with diplomatic status. It gives rise to the term nunciature, the nuncio's residence and the Vatican embassy, where the Pope will stay during his UK visit. The nunciature in London is in Wimbledon, and the nuncio is Archbishop Antonio Mennini.
TRIBUNAL|A dicastery/department with judicial jurisdiction in the Vatican's government. Individual dioceses may have local tribunals, which deal mostly with applications for the annulment of marriages.
ECUMENISM|Promotion of unity among all Christians.
SEDE VACANTE|The period between the death or resignation of one pope and the election of his successor. Period during which all major church decisions, such as new legislation or the appointment of bishops, is halted until a new pope is elected. Ordinary business and matters that cannot be postponed are decided by the College of Cardinals.
PENANCE|An action which expresses contrition for a sin following forgiveness by a priest in confessional. A penance is usually a prayer or series of prayers, but may require a specific act of reparation (eg returning stolen goods).
DOGMA/DOCTRINE|The revealed teachings of Christ as defined by the Church's magisterium, or teaching authority. Doctrine is what the Church believes.
MONASTERY|A religious house where monks live in a community under a rule and dedicate themselves to prayer.
BISHOPS' CONFERENCE|Assembly of diocesan bishops from a certain area. The Catholic Bishops' Conference of England and Wales (president: Archbishop Vincent Nichols of Westminster) is separate to the Bishops' Conference of Scotland (president: Archbishop Philip Tartaglia of Glasgow).
CARDINAL|Cleric (normally archbishop) appointed by the Pope to join the College of Cardinals - the Pope's principal advisers. When a pope dies or resigns, cardinals younger than 80 are eligible to vote for his successor in a conclave (style: Cardinal John Smith, Archbishop of Someplace; honorific: "Your eminence").  There are currently 203 cardinals from 69 countries. The rules of the Conclave were changed in 1975 to exclude all cardinals over the age of 80 from voting. The maximum number of cardinal electors is 120.
MINISTRY|The work of preaching the Gospel and celebrating the sacraments by those in Holy Orders or, in some cases, members of the laity. Members of the laity can also have an extraordinary ministry which assists the principal ministers (deacons, priests and bishops).
MONSIGNOR|Mode of address for members of clergy holding honorific titles granted by the Pope, usually at the request of a bishop. Being a monsignor does not imply one is a bishop, nor being a bishop imply that one is a monsignor.
SECRECY|Cardinals take two oaths of secrecy during a conclave: not to reveal to anyone anything directly or indirectly related to the election of the pope. The first is taken the first day a cardinal joins the general congregation; the second, at the start of the conclave. The few non-cardinals authorized to assist the cardinals while they are in conclave also take an oath of secrecy.
DIOCESE|The territory, or churches, under the authority and leadership of a bishop.
HOLY ORDERS|The state of having received Christian ordination (bishop, priest, or deacon).
APOSTOLIC SUCCESSION|The handing on of authority from the apostles to their successors (bishops). It has significance as one of the most jealously guarded traditions of the Roman Catholic Church. The Church of England also claims to be "apostolic" with the same handing down of authority via a 2,000 year-old chain of bishops.
CONGREGATION|1) An assembly of people gathered for religious worship; 2) a type of dicastery (or department) of the Curia, the Vatican's government. Each congregation is led by a prefect, who is a cardinal.  During the interregnum, daily general congregations are held, which all cardinals are eligible to attend. These discuss the needs of the Church and handle more serious church business that must be attended to between popes.  When the conclave begins, the camerlengo and three cardinals chosen by lot every three days handle the day-to-day business of the Holy See in what are known as particular congregations - although for the 2013 conclave the camerlengo was over 80, so his responsibilities passed to the next most senior cardinal (see "camerlengo").
MONASTIC LIFE|Consecrated life marked by the taking of religious vows (eg poverty, chastity, obedience), and living as part of a community in a monastery following the rule of a founding father - eg Saint Benedict for Benedictine monks and nuns.
PREFECT|The term for the head of a Vatican congregation.
CLERGY|The body of people ordained for religious service, (deacons, priests, bishops) as opposed to laity. NB religious (monks, nuns, friars) are not clergy, unless (in the case of male religious) they are also ordained.
TRIDENTINE MASS|The Latin Mass (authorized by the 16th Century Council of Trent) used until 1969 when Pope Paul VI authorised the use of a revised Mass which could be said in the language of the country.  Pope Benedict, concerned that the revised Mass lacks some of the majesty of the Latin Mass, and that it contains other undesirable elements - such as the priest turning to face the congregation, rather than away from them "towards God" - has issued a personal edict giving permission to Catholics who so wish to celebrate the Tridentine Mass once again.
POPE|The successor of St Peter as bishop of Rome and head of the Catholic Church. Pope Francis (formerly Cardinal Jorge Mario Bergoglio, Archbishop of Buenos Aires) is the 266th pope, elected after five ballots in March 2013 at the conclave following the resignation of Benedict XVI (formerly Cardinal Joseph Ratzinger) (honorific: "Your holiness").
RELIC|Any part of the physical remains of a saint or items that have touched the body of a saint. Every Catholic altar will have a relic within it - originating from the days when the early Christians celebrated Mass in the Catacombs.
ENCYCLICAL|A pastoral letter written by the Pope and published to outline Church teaching on an issue. Pope Benedict has produced three, including Caritas et Veritate, which dealt with dealt with the crisis in the world economy. Caritas in Veritate; Deus Caritas Est, his first, dealt with love.
INTERREGNUM|The interval between the end of a pope's pontificate and the accession of his successor.  Upon the death or resignation of a pope, the prefect of the papal household (German Archbishop Georg Gaenswein) informs the camerlengo (Cardinal Tarcisio Bertone - see separate entry) and then the dean of the college of cardinals (Cardinal Angelo Sodano), who informs the rest of the college, the ambassadors accredited to the Holy See and the heads of nations.  The camerlengo locks and seals the private apartment of the pope.  All the cardinals and archbishops in charge of Curial departments lose their jobs when the pope dies or resigns. These offices continue to operate, run by their secretaries, during the interregnum, but serious matters are set aside until the election of a new pope.  The secretary for relations with states (Archbishop Dominique Mamberti) and the sostituto (Archbishop Giovanni Becciu) also retain their positions.  Three major officials do not lose their jobs: the vicar of the diocese of Rome, who provides for the pastoral needs of the diocese of Rome (Cardinal Agostino Vallini); the major penitentiary, who deals with confessional matters reserved to the Holy See (Cardinal Manuel Monteiro de Castro); and the camerlengo.  During this period the college of cardinals governs the Church, although it cannot change the rules governing papal elections, appoint cardinals or make any decisions binding on the next pope.  During this period all the cardinals - retirees included - will begin to discuss in strict secrecy the merits of likely candidates. The cardinals meet daily in a congregation, presided over by the dean of the college (Cardinal Angelo Sodano), until the conclave begins.
AD LIMINA|A meeting between the diocesan bishops of a country and the Pope in Rome. Usually held every five years.
VESTMENTS|Garments worn by those celebrating Mass or administering sacraments (eg alb - long white tunic; chasuble - main outer-garment; stole - type of scarf worn around the neck).  The stole is the principle symbol of ministerial authority and is worn by deacons, priests and bishops when administering the sacraments.
INFIRMIERI|Three cardinals chosen by lot during a Conclave, tasked with overseeing balloting by any cardinal-electors who are too ill or infirm to sit through the voting sessions in the Sistine Chapel.  After depositing their votes in an urn, the Infirmieri go together to the sick cardinals with blank ballots and a locked box in which the completed ballots can be placed through a slit.  They then return to the Sistine Chapel and deliver the votes.
CURIA|Administrative structure of the Vatican; a collection of "government" departments.
ARCHBISHOP|A senior bishop, heading an archdiocese, appointed by the Pope after consultation with outgoing/neighbouring bishops and the Pope's local representative, the nuncio.  An archbishop has oversight of a number of dioceses; in England and Wales, there are five metropolitan areas which each have an archbishop.  Clergy can be appointed archbishop without actually serving as the archbishop of a particular archdiocese, usually when they are appointed to a senior position in a Vatican department. (Style: Archbishop John Smith of Someplace; honorific: "Your grace".)
DISCIPLE|Those who accepted Jesus' message to follow him, as opposed to the apostles.
DICASTERY|Vatican department with a jurisdiction.
DEAN|Cardinal who informs the rest of the college upon the death or abdication of a pope  and presides over their daily meetings before the conclave - currently Italian Cardinal Angelo Sodano.  Normally the dean would be responsible for the convoking and presiding over a conclave. However, when Benedict XVI resigned in February 2013, Cardinal Sodano was 85 and too old to vote, so the senior cardinal-elector, Giovanni Battista Re, takes on the responsibility of administering the oath of secrecy and presiding over the conclave. This includes presiding over daily meetings of cardinals until the conclave begins.  The dean is elected by and from the six cardinal bishops (currently Cardinal Sodano, Cardinal Bishop of Ostia and Albano, Cardinal Roger Etchegaray, Cardinal Bishop of Porto-Santa Rufina, Cardinal Giovanni Battista Re, Cardinal Bishop of Sabina-Poggio Mirteto, Cardinal Francis Arinze, Cardinal Bishop of Velletri-Segni, Cardinal Tarcisio Bertone, Cardinal Bishop of Frascati, and Cardinal Jose Saraiva Martins, Cardinal Bishop of Palestrina). The election must be approved by the Pope.  When a candidate achieves a two-thirds majority vote, Cardinal Re will ask him, on behalf of the entire college, if he accepts the election and what name he will take.
PAPAL INFALLIBILITY|Belief that a pope cannot err when he speaks in a formal capacity as head of the Church on matters of faith and morals. Infallibility was formally introduced at the First Vatican Council in 1870, and is rarely invoked.
LECTERN|The stand from which readings/sermons are given in church.
MONOPHYSITISM|A fifth-century heresy holding that in Christ there is only one nature (Greek: mono, single; physis, nature), a divine nature. Thus, Monophysitism denies the true human nature of Christ; this human nature is absorbed into Christ's divine nature, according to Monophysitism. This heresy arose primarily in reaction to Nestorianism (see below). Monophysitism, though condemned by Pope St. Leo the Great in his famous Tome Of 449 and by the ecumenical Council of Chalcedon in 451, persists to this day in parts of the East.        
SEMI-ARIANISM|A modified form of Arianism (see above) that flourished after the Council of Nicaea had condemned Arianism in 325. The Semi-Arians were often "moderates" who wanted to forge a "compromise" between those who held to the Church's strict teaching concerning the divinity of Christ and Christ's consubstantiality with the Father and those tempted by Arianism to deny many great truths. Sometimes referred to as Arianizers, the Serni-Arians also included those who wished to substitute homo-i-ousios ("of like substance") or homoios ("similar") for the orthodox Nicene homo-ousios ("one in being" or "consubstantial") with the Father. There were a number of differing positions that fell within the general category of Semi-Arianism; their common theme was an unwillingness to accept that the Nicene term homo-ousios was necessary to the Church's orthodox doctrine of the Holy Trinity.        
ADOPTIONISM|Adoptionism held that Jesus was not really God but merely a man to whom special graces had been given and who achieved a kind of divine status at his baptism. This idea that Christ as a man was only the "adopted" son of God proved to be a persistent heresy. It was condemned by Pope St. Victor 1, who excommunicated Theodotus of Byzantium for Adoptionism. The same heresy was condemned in 785 and again in 794 by Pope Adrian 1. Revived by Peter Abelard in the twelfth century, Adoptionism was again condemned by Pope Alexander III in 1177.        
DONATISM|A fourth- and fifth-century African heresy holding that the validity of the sacraments depends upon the moral character of the minister of the sacraments and that sinners cannot be true members of the Church or even tolerated by the Church if their sins are publicly known. Donatism began as a schism when rigorists claimed that a bishop of Carthage, Caecilian (fl. ca. 313), was not a true bishop because he had been ordained by a bishop who had been an apostate under the Diocletian persecution. The Donatists ordained their own bishops, one of whom was Donatus, for whom the heresy is named. Donatism was condemned by Pope Miltiades (311-3 14) and by the (local) Council of Arles in 314, but it nevertheless persisted in North Africa until the Muslim conquest in the seventh century. The great St. Augustine (354-430) wrote extensively against Donatism.        
MACEDONIANISM|A heresy named after Macedonius, an Arian bishop of Constantinople (d. ca. 362,) whose followers denied the divinity of the Holy Spirit: the Spirit was declared by them not to proceed from the Father but to be a creation of the Son. Macedonianism was condemned in 381 by the ecumenical Council of Constantinople, which added to the Nicene Creed an affirmation of belief in the divinity of the Holy Spirit and the consubstantiality of the Holy Spirit with the Father and the Son.        
PRISCILLIANISM|A fourth-century heresy originating in Spain and combining forms of both Modalism and Gnosticism (see above). It denied Christ's divinity and real humanity, holding that human souls were united to bodies in punishment for their sins.        
MONTANISM.|A second-century heretical movement that professed belief in a new "Church of the Spirit". The Montanists believed they enjoyed the direct inspiration of the Holy Spirit. This claim meant that their fanatically rigorous views concerning morality superseded the authentic revelation of Christ that had been handed down in the Church. The heresy of Montanism, which claimed the great Tertullian (160-220) himself, was condemned by several Eastern synods and, finally, by Pope Zephyrinus around the year 202.        
NOVATIANISM|A schism that became a heresy. It originated with Novatian, a Roman priest who became an antipope, claiming the papacy in 251 in opposition to the true pope, St. Cornelius. The Novatianists adopted a moral rigorism similar to that of Donatism (see above). Those guilty of grave sin were excluded from the Church permanently, and absolution was refused to those guilty of the sins of murder and adultery.        
VALENTINIANISM|A form of the ancient heresy of Gnosticism (see above) based on the teaching of one Valentinus, who lived in Rome between 136 and 165. The Valentinians claimed that the visible world had been created by the God of the Old Testament but that only the invisible world was real. According to them, Christ came to deliver mankind from its bondage to matter and the physical world; most of mankind, however, wholly engrossed in matter, would nevertheless end in eternal perdition. The great St. Irenaeus (ca. 125-ca. 202) inveighed against Valentinianism in particular in his magisterial work Against the Heresies
ARIANISM|A major heresy that arose in the fourth century and denied the divinity of Jesus Christ. First effectively advanced by Arius (256-336), a priest of Alexandria, who denied that there were three distinct divine Persons in God. For Arius, there was only one Person, the Father. According to Arian theory, the Son was created ("There was a time when he was not"). Christ was thus a son of God, not by nature, but only by grace and adoption. This theory logically evacuates the doctrine of the Incarnation of God in Christ of all meaning: if God did not become man, then the world has not been redeemed and the faith itself eventually dissolves. Arianism was formally condemned in 325 by the first ecumenical Council of Nicaea, which formulated and promulgated the original version of the Nicene Creed; but Arianism and Semi-Arianism (see below) nevertheless continued to prevail in its original form in many areas for more than a century. Arianism was combatted by the great St. Athanasius of Alexandria (296-373) among others; but the heresy nevertheless persisted, especially among the barbarians, for several centuries.        
PELAGIANISM|A heretical doctrine on divine grace taught by Pelagius (355-425), a monk from the British Isles who first propagated his views in Rome in the time of Pope Anastasius I. Pelagius argued that the Church's teaching that in order to do good, divine grace in the soul was necessary. This canceled human free will. Pelagianism included a cluster of other beliefs and essentially entailed a denial of the Church's doctrine of Original Sin. It was condemned by local councils in Africa in 416 and 417, and also by Pope St. Innocent I in the latter year. It was condemned again in 418 by his successor, Pope St. Zosimus. Semi-Pelagianism, a related heresy, was condemned by the local Council of Orange in 529 but has long persisted among those who question Original Sin and the supremacy of divine grace.        
MODALISM|A form of Trinitarian heresy of the second and third centuries, Modalism held that there is only one Person in God, who manifests himself in various ways, or modes. Sabellianism (see below) was a form of Modalism, as was Priscillianism (see below). 
NESTORIANISM|A fifth-century heresy claiming that there are two distinct Persons in the Incarnate Christ, one human and one divine. The Church teaches that Christ was and is a divine person who took on a human nature. According to Nestorianism, it is unthinkable that God was born, crucified, and died; nor could Mary really have been the mother of God, but only the mother of a human being conjoined to God. Nestorianism, which took its name from Nestorius, a bishop of Constantinople (d. ca. 451), was condemned by the ecumenical Council of Ephesus in 431. Overemphasizing the humanity of Christ, Nestorianism is the opposite heresy from Monophysitism (see above), which overemphasized Christ's divinity.        
MARCIONISM|A second-century heresy of Marcion (ff. ca. 140) and his followers, who rejected the Old Testament and much of the New Testament, except for the Gospel of Luke and ten of the Letters of St. Paul. The Marcionists claimed to preach a purer gospel after the manner of St. Paul; for them Christianity was purely a gospel of love to the exclusion of any law. Only virgins, widows, and celibates were baptized by the Marcionists; married people could not advance beyond the catechumenate.        
APOLLINARIANISM|This heretical doctrine of Apollinaris (310-390), bishop of Laodicea in Asia Minor, held that Christ had a human body but only a sensitive soul-and no rational human mind or human free will, these having been replaced in Christ by the divine Logos, or Word of God. This theory was condemned by Roman synods in 377 and 381 and by the ecumenical Council of Constantinople in the latter year.        
ANOMEANIS|A radical variant of Arianism (see below), Anomeanism held that the Son was "unlike" (Greek: animoios) the Father.        
SUBORDINATIONISM|A general name for all the fourth century heresies that admitted only God the Father as God. See the entries above for Arianism, Anomeanism, Macedonianism, Modalism, and Semi-Arianism; all of these heresies are forms of Subordinationism.        
SABELLIANISM|A third-century heresy named after a theologian, Sabellius (fl. ca. 215). The Sabellians believed that there was only one Person in God, with three "modes", or aspects, of manifesting himself as Creator, Redeemer, and Sanctifier. It was thus a form of Modalism (see above). Jesus Christ was merely a temporary manifestation in the flesh of the eternal God. This heresy was also known by the name of Patripassianism, since it held that it was the Father who suffered on the cross. It was condemned by Pope St. Callistus I, but as a form of Modalism it has persisted in history in connection with other heresies.        
AFRICA|  
ACHSAH|Anklet, Caleb's only daughter ( 1 Chronicles 2:49 ). She was offered in marriage to the man who would lead an attack on the city of Debir, or Kirjath-sepher. This was done by Othniel (q.v.), who accordingly obtained her as his wife ( Joshua 15:16 -19;  Judges 1:9 -15). 
AHIAN|   AHIAN  a-hi'-an ('achyan, "brotherly"): A son of Shemida of the tribe of Manasseh ( 1 Chronicles 7:19 ).
ASSARION|   ASSARION  as-a'-ri-on. See  FARTHING .
ASARELAH|   ASHARELAH; ASARELAH  ash-a-re'-la ('asar'elah): One of the Asaphites appointed by David to the temple service ( 1 Chronicles 25:2 ); in  1 Chronicles 25:14  he is called Jesharelah. The latter element in both forms may be ('el) "God," but the meaning of the former part in the first form is doubtful. Thes. compares 'acar, "to bind," "whom God has bound (by a vow)."  ASARELAH  as-a-re'-la. See  ASHARELAH .
AHIKAM|Brother of support = helper, one of the five whom Josiah sent to consult the prophetess Huldah in connection with the discovery of the book of the law ( 2 Kings 22:12 -14;  2 Chronicles 34:20 ). He was the son of Shaphan, the royal secretary, and the father of Gedaliah, governor of Judea after the destruction of Jerusalem by the Babylonians ( 2 Kings 25:22 ;  Jeremiah 40:5 -16;  43:6 ). On one occasion he protected Jeremiah against the fury of Jehoiakim ( Jeremiah 26:24 ). It was in the chamber of another son (Germariah) of Shaphan that Baruch read in the ears of all the people Jeremiah's roll. 
ARPHAD|   ARPAD; ARPHAD  ar'-pad; ar'-fad ('arpadh, "support"): A city of Syria, captured frequently by the Assyrians, and finally subjugated by Tiglath-pileser III in 740 B.C., after a siege of two years. It is now the ruin Tell Erfad, 13 miles Northwest of Aleppo. Arpad is one of the conquered cities mentioned by Rabshakeh, the officer of Sennacherib, in his boast before Jerusalem ( 2 Kings 18:34 ;  2 Kings 19:13   Isaiah 36:19 ;  Isaiah 37:13 ; the King James Version Arphad). Isaiah puts a boast about its capture in the mouth of the Assyrian king ( Isaiah 10:9 ), and Jeremiah mentions it as "confounded" because of evil tidings, in the oracle concerning Damascus ( Jeremiah 49:23 ). On every occasion Arpad is mentioned with Hamath.  S. F. Hunter
ARAM|The son of Shem ( Genesis 10:22 ); according to  Genesis 22:21 , a grandson of Nahor. In  Matthew 1:3 , 4, and  Luke 3:33 , this word is the Greek form of Ram, the father of Amminadab ( 1 Chronicles 2:10 ). The word means high, or highlands, and as the name of a country denotes that elevated region extending from the northeast of Palestine to the Euphrates. It corresponded generally with the Syria and Mesopotamia of the Greeks and Romans. In  Genesis 25:20 ;  31:20 , 24;  Deuteronomy 26:5 , the word "Syrian" is properly "Aramean" (R.V.,  marg.). Damascus became at length the capital of the several smaller kingdoms comprehended under the designation "Aram" or "Syria." 
AHOLAH|She has her own tent, a name used by Ezekiel ( 23:4 ,  5,  36,  44) as a symbol of the idolatry of the kingdom of Israel. This kingdom is described as a lewdwoman, an adulteress, given up to the abominations and idolatries of the Egyptians and Assyrians. Because of her crimes, she was carried away captive, and ceased to be a kingdom. (Comp.  Psalm 78:67 -69;  1 Kings 12:25 -33;  2 Chronicles 11:13 -16.) 
AHIHUD|Brother (i.e.,  "friend") of union.  (1.) A son of Bela, the son of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:7 ). (2.) Name different in Hebrew, meaning brother of Judah. Chief of the tribe of Asher; one of those appointed by Moses to superintend the division of Canaan among the tribe ( Numbers 34:27 ). 
AGEE|Fugitive, the father of Shammah, who was one of David's mighty men ( 2 Samuel 23:11 ) 
ABITAL|Father of dew; i.e., "fresh", David's fifth wife ( 2 Samuel 3:4 ). 
ACHSA|   ACHSA  ak'-sa: Used in the King James Version in  1 Chronicles 2:49  for ACHSAH, which see.
AHIMOTH|   AHIMOTH  a-hi'-moth ('achimoth, "brother of death," or, "my brother is death"): A descendant of Kohath the son of Levi ( 1 Chronicles 6:25 ); ancestor of Elkanah the father of Samuel. The name Mahath holds a similar place in the list that follows ( 1 Chronicles 6:35 ).
AZOR|   AZOR  a'-zor Azor, "help"(?): An ancestor of Jesus Christ ( Matthew 1:13f ).
AARON|The eldest son of Amram and Jochebed, a daughter of Levi ( Exodus 6:20 ). Some explain the name as meaning mountaineer, others mountain of strength, illuminator. He was born in Egypt three years before his brother Moses, and a number of years after his sister Miriam ( 2:1 , 4;  7:7 ). He married Elisheba, the daughter of Amminadab of the house of Judah ( 6:23 ;  1 Chronicles 2:10 ), by whom he had four sons, Nadab and Abihu, Eleazar and Ithamar. When the time for the deliverance of Isarael out of Egypt drew nigh, he was sent by God ( Exodus 4:14 , 27-30) to meet his long-absent brother, that he might co-operate with him in all that they were required to do in bringing about the Exodus. He was to be the "mouth" or "prophet" of Moses, i.e., was to speak for him, because he was a man of a ready utterance ( 7:1 , 2, 9, 10, 19). He was faithful to his trust, and stood by Moses in all his interviews with Pharaoh. When the ransomed tribes fought their first battle with Amalek in Rephidim, Moses stood on a hill overlooking the scene of the conflict with the rod of God in his outstretched hand. On this occasion he was attended by Aaron and Hur, his sister's husband, who held up his wearied hands till Joshua and the chosen warriors of Israel gained the victory ( 17:8 -13). Afterwards, when encamped before Sinai, and when Moses at the command of God ascended the mount to receive the tables of the law, Aaron and his two sons, Nadab and Abihu, along with seventy of the elders of Israel, were permitted to accompany him part of the way, and to behold afar off the manifestation of the glory of Israel's God ( Exodus 19:24 ;  24:9 -11). While Moses remained on the mountain with God, Aaron returned unto the people; and yielding through fear, or ignorance, or instability of character, to their clamour, made unto them a golden calf, and set it up as an object of worship ( Exodus 32:4 ;  Psalm 106:19 ). On the return of Moses to the camp, Aaron was sternly rebuked by him for the part he had acted in this matter; but he interceded for him before God, who forgave his sin ( Deuteronomy 9:20 ). On the mount, Moses received instructions regarding the system of worship which was to be set up among the people; and in accordance therewith Aaron and his sons were consecrated to the priest's office ( Leviticus 8 ; 9). Aaron, as high priest, held henceforth the prominent place appertaining to that office. When Israel had reached Hazeroth, in "the wilderness of Paran," Aaron joined with his sister Miriam in murmuring against Moses, "because of the Ethiopian woman whom he had married," probably after the death of Zipporah. But the Lord vindicated his servant Moses, and punished Miriam with leprosy ( Numbers 12 ). Aaron acknowledged his own and his sister's guilt, and at the intercession of Moses they were forgiven. Twenty years after this, when the children of Israel were encamped in the wilderness of Paran, Korah, Dathan, and Abiram conspired against Aaron and his sons; but a fearful judgment from God fell upon them, and they were destroyed, and the next day thousands of the people also perished by a fierce pestilence, the ravages of which were only stayed by the interposition of Aaron ( Numbers 16 ). That there might be further evidence of the divine appointment of Aaron to the priestly office, the chiefs of the tribes were each required to bring to Moses a rod bearing on it the name of his tribe. And these, along with the rod of Aaron for the tribe of Levi, were laid up overnight in the tabernacle, and in the morning it was found that while the other rods remained unchanged, that of Aaron "for the house of Levi" budded, blossomed, and yielded almonds ( Numbers 17:1 -10). This rod was afterwards preserved in the tabernacle ( Hebrews 9:4 ) as a memorial of the divine attestation of his appointment to the priesthood. Aaron was implicated in the sin of his brother at Meribah ( Numbers 20:8 -13), and on that account was not permitted to enter the Promised Land. When the tribes arrived at Mount Hor, "in the edge of the land of Edom," at the command of God Moses led Aaron and his son Eleazar to the top of that mountain, in the sight of all the people. There he stripped Aaron of his priestly vestments, and put them upon Eleazar; and there Aaron died on the top of the mount, being 123 years old ( Numbers 20:23 -29. Comp.  Deuteronomy 10:6 ;  32:50 ), and was "gathered unto his people." The people, "even all the house of Israel," mourned for him thirty days. Of Aaron's sons two survived him, Eleazar, whose family held the high-priesthood till the time of Eli; and Ithamar, in whose family, beginning with Eli, the high-priesthood was held till the time of Solomon. Aaron's other two sons had been struck dead ( Leviticus 10:1 , 2) for the daring impiety of offering "strange fire" on the alter of incense. The Arabs still show with veneration the traditionary site of Aaron's grave on one of the two summits of Mount Hor, which is Marked by a Mohammedan chapel. His name is mentioned in the Koran, and there are found in the writings of the rabbins many fabulous stories regarding him. He was the first anointed priest. His descendants, "the house of Aaron," constituted the priesthood in general. In the time of David they were very numerous ( 1 Chronicles 12:27 ). The other branches of the tribe of Levi held subordinate positions in connection with the sacred office. Aaron was a type of Christ in his official character as the high priest. His priesthood was a "shadow of heavenly things," and was intended to lead the people of Israel to look forward to the time when "another priest" would arise "after the order of Melchizedek" ( Hebrews 6:20 ). (see  MOSES .) 
AZALIAH|   AZALIAH  az-a-li'-a atsalyahu, ("Yahweh has set aside"): A son of Meshullam and father of Shaphan the scribe, famous in connection with the discovery of the law in the reign of King Josiah ( 2 Kings 22:3 ).
ASHHUR|   ASHHUR  ash'-ur (ashchur, the King James Version Ashur): The "father of Tekoa" ( 1 Chronicles 2:24 ;  1 Chronicles 4:5 ), probably the founder of the village. The original meaning of the name is the "man of Horus," Ashurites (ha-'ashuri). This name occurs in the list of Ish-bosheth's subjects ( 2 Samuel 2:9 ).  The Syriac, Arabic, and Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) versions read ha-geshuri, "the Geshurites," designating the small kingdom to the South or Southeast of Damascus. This reading, though adopted by Ewald, Thenius and Wellhausen, is untenable, for during the reign of Ish-bosheth Geshur was ruled by its own king Talmai, whose daughter was married to David ( 2 Samuel 3:3 ;  2 Samuel 13:37 ). Furthermore Geshur was too far away from the rest of Ishbosheth's territory. A more consistent reading is ha-'asheri, as given in the Targum of Jonathan and accepted by Kohler, Klost, Kirkpatrick and Budde, "those of the house of Asher" (compare  Judges 1:32 ). The term would, then, denote the country to the West of Jordan above Jezreel.  Samuel Cohon
ABIHUD|Father (i.e.,  "possessor") of renown.  (1.) One of the sons of Bela, the son of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:3 ); called also Ahihud (ver. 7). (2.) A descendant of Zerubbabel and father of Eliakim ( Matthew 1:13 ,  "Abiud"); called also Juda ( Luke 3:26 ), and Obadiah ( 1 Chronicles 3:21 ). 
ASHBEA|   ASHBEA  ash'-be-a, ash-be'-a ('ashbea`): "The house of Ashbea," a family of linen-workers mentioned in  1 Chronicles 4:21 . We might render beth 'ashbea` as their dwelling-place; nothing is known of such a place nor is this house of weavers referred to in any other place.
ALLONBACHUTH|Oak of weeping, a tree near Bethel, at the spot where Deborah, Rebekah's nurse, was buried ( Genesis 35:8 ). Large trees, from their rarity in the plains of Palestine, were frequently designated as landmarks. This particular tree was probably the same as the "palm tree of Deborah" ( Judges 4:5 ). 
AZOTUS|The Grecized form ( Acts 8:40 ,  etc.) of Ashdod (q.v.). 
APOLLONIA|A city of Macedonia between Amphipolis and Thessalonica, from which it was distant about 36 miles. Paul and Silas passed through it on their way to Thessalonica ( Acts 17:1 ). 
ABIEL|Father (i.e.,  "possessor") of God = "pious."  (1.) The son of Zeror and father of Ner, who was the grandfather of Saul ( 1 Samuel 14:51 ;  1 Chronicles 8:33 ;  9:39 ). In  1 Samuel 9:1 , he is called the "father," probably meaning the grandfather, of Kish.  (2.) An Arbathite, one of David's warriors ( 1 Chronicles 11:32 ); called also Abi-albon ( 2 Samuel 23:31 ). 
ARAH|   ARAH  a'-ra ('arach, "traveler"?):  (1) The son of Ulla, an Asherite ( 1 Chronicles 7:39 ).  (2) The head of a family that returned from the exile with Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:5   Nehemiah 7:10 ). He is sometimes identified with Arah of  Nehemiah 6:18  whose grand-daughter became the wife of Tobiah, the Ammonite who tried to thwart Nehemiah in rebuilding Jerusalem.
ANAMIM|The name of an Egyptian tribe descended from Mizraim ( Genesis 10:13 ;  1 Chronicles 1:11 ). 
ANATHOTHITE|   ANATHOTHITE  an'-a-thoth-it (ha-`annethothi): the Revised Version (British and American) form of the King James Version Anethothite, Anetothite, Antothite. An inhabitant of Anathoth, a town of Benjamin assigned to the Levites. The Anathothites are  (1) Abiezer, one of David's thirty heroes ( 2 Samuel 23:27   1 Chronicles 11:28 ;  1 Chronicles 27:12 ), and  (2) Jehu who came to David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:3 ).
AMAN|   AMAN  a'-man (Aman; Codex Vaticanus reads Adam): Tobit 14:10; Additions to Esther 12:6; 16:10, 17, probably in each case for Haman, the arch-enemy of the Jews in the canonical Book of Esther (compare  Esther 3:1  with Additions to Esther 12:6). In Additions to Esther (16:10) Aman is represented as a Macedonian, in all other points corresponding to the Haman of the Book of Esther.
AMANA|Perennial.  (1.) The Hebrew margin of  2 Kings 5:12  gives this as another reading of Abana (q.v.), a stream near Damascus. (2.) A mountain (Cant. 4:8), probably the southern summit of Anti-Libanus, at the base of which are the sources of the Abana. 
ANANIAS|A common Jewish name, the same as Hananiah.  (1.) One of the members of the church at Jerusalem, who conspired with his wife Sapphira to deceive the brethren, and who fell down and immediately expired after he had uttered the falsehood ( Acts 5:5 ). By common agreement the members of the early Christian community devoted their property to the work of furthering the gospel and of assisting the poor and needy. The proceeds of the possessions they sold were placed at the disposal of the apostles ( Acts 4:36 ,  37). Ananias might have kept his property had he so chosen; but he professed agreement with the brethren in the common purpose, and had of his own accord devoted it all, as he said, to these sacred ends. Yet he retained a part of it for his own ends, and thus lied in declaring that he had given it all. "The offence of Ananias and Sapphira showed contempt of God, vanity and ambition in the offenders, and utter disregard of the corruption which they were bringing into the society. Such sin, committed in despite of the light which they possessed, called for a special Mark of divine indignation." (2.) A Christian at Damascus ( Acts 9:10 ). He became Paul's instructor; but when or by what means he himself became a Christian we have no information. He was "a devout man according to the law, having a good report of all the Jews which dwelt" at Damascus ( 22:12 ). (3.) The high priest before whom Paul was brought in the procuratorship of Felix ( Acts 23:2 ,  5,  24). He was so enraged at Paul's noble declaration, "I have lived in all good conscience before God until this day," that he commanded one of his attendants to smite him on the mouth. Smarting under this unprovoked insult, Paul quickly replied, "God shall smite thee, thou whited wall." Being reminded that Ananias was the high priest, to whose office all respect was to be paid, he answered, "I wist not, brethren, that he was the high priest" ( Acts 23:5 ). This expression has occasioned some difficulty, as it is scarcely probable that Paul should have been ignorant of so public a fact. The expression may mean (a) that Paul had at the moment overlooked the honour due to the high priest; or (b), as others think, that Paul spoke ironically, as if he had said, "The high priest breaking the law! God's high priest a tyrant and a lawbreaker! I see a man in white robes, and have heard his voice, but surely it cannot, it ought not to be, the voice of the high priest." (See Dr. Lindsay on Acts,  in loco.) (c) Others think that from defect of sight Paul could not observe that the speaker was the high priest. In all this, however, it may be explained, Paul, with all his excellency, comes short of the example of his divine Master, who, when he was reviled, reviled not again. 
AFFLICTIONS|Common to all ( Job 5:7 ;  14:1 ;  Psalm 34:19 ); are for the good of men ( James 1:2 ,  3,  12;  2 Corinthians 12:7 ) and the glory of God ( 2 Corinthians 12:7 -10;  1 Peter 4:14 ), and are to be borne with patience by the Lord's people ( Psalm 94:12 ;  Proverbs 3:12 ). They are all directed by God ( Lamentations 3:33 ), and will result in the everlasting good of his people ( 2 Corinthians 4:16 -18) in Christ Jesus ( Romans 8:35 -39). 
ABIATHAR|Father of abundance, or my father excels, the son of Ahimelech the high priest. He was the tenth high priest, and the fourth in descent from Eli. When his father was slain with the priests of Nob, he escaped, and bearing with him the ephod, he joined David, who was then in the cave of Adullam ( 1 Samuel 22:20 -23;  23:6 ). He remained with David, and became priest of the party of which he was the leader ( 1 Samuel 30:7 ). When David ascended the throne of Judah, Abiathar was appointed high priest ( 1 Chronicles 15:11 ;  1 Kings 2:26 ) and the "king's companion" ( 1 Chronicles 27:34 ). Meanwhile Zadok, of the house of Eleazar, had been made high priest. These appointments continued in force till the end of David's reign ( 1 Kings 4:4 ). Abiathar was deposed (the sole historical instance of the deposition of a high priest) and banished to his home at Anathoth by Solomon, because he took part in the attempt to raise Adonijah to the throne. The priesthood thus passed from the house of Ithamar ( 1 Samuel 2:30 -36;  1 Kings 1:19 ;  2:26 ,  27). Zadok now became sole high priest. In  Mark 2:26 , reference is made to an occurrence in "the days of Abiathar the high priest." But from  1 Samuel 22 , we learn explicitly that this event took place when Ahimelech, the father of Abiathar, was high priest. The apparent discrepancy is satisfactorily explained by interpreting the words in Mark as referring to the life-time of Abiathar, and not to the term of his holding the office of high priest. It is not implied in Mark that he was actual high priest at the time referred to. Others, however, think that the loaves belonged to Abiathar, who was at that time ( Leviticus 24:9 ) a priest, and that he either himself gave them to David, or persuaded his father to give them. 
AHOLIBAMAH|Tent of the height, the name given to Judith, the daughter of Beeri = Anah ( Genesis 26:34 ;  36:2 ), when she became the wife of Esau. A district among the mountains of Edom, probably near Mount Hor, was called after her name, or it may be that she received her name from the district. From her descended three tribes of Edomites, founded by her three sons. 
ARVAD|Wandering, ( Ezek. 27:8 ), a small island and city on the coast of Syria, mentioned as furnishing mariners and soldiers for Tyre. The inhabitants were called Arvadites. The name is written Aruada or Arada in the Tell-el-Amarna tablets. 
ANEM|Two fountains, a Levitical city in the tribe of Issachar ( 1 Chronicles 6:73 ). It is also called En-gannim (q.v.) in  Joshua 19:21 ; the modern Jenin. 
ASSHUR|Second son of Shem ( Genesis 10:22 ;  1 Chronicles 1:17 ). He went from the land of Shinar and built Nineveh, etc. ( Genesis 10:11 , 12). He probably gave his name to Assyria, which is the usual translation of the word, although the form Asshur is sometimes retained ( Numbers 24:22 ,  24;  Ezek. 27:23 ,  etc.). In  Genesis 2:14  "Assyria" ought to be "Asshur," which was the original capital of Assyria, a city represented by the mounds of Kalah Sherghat, on the west bank of the Tigris. This city was founded by Bel-kap-kapu about B.C. 1700. At a later date the capital was shifted to Ninua, or Nineveh, now Koyunjik, on the eastern bank of the river. (see  CALAH ; NINEVEH.) 
ASHBELITE|   ASHBEL; ASHBELITE  ash'-bel, ash'-bel-it ('ashbel): The gentilic name "Ashbelite" is found in  Numbers 26:38 , second son of Benjamin ( Genesis 46:21 ). In  1 Chronicles 7:6-11  (6) "Jediael" ("known to God") is substituted for the heathen-sounding "Ashbel" ("Ishbaal," "man of Baal"). The chronicler, in this case, conforms literally to the principle laid down in  Hosea 2:17 ; the title "Baal" ("lord") was applied in early days (e.g. in the days of Saul) to the national God of Israel, but in later days the prophets objected to it because it was freely applied to heathen gods (compare ISH-BOSHETH). In  1 Chronicles 8:1  the three names Bela, Ashbel, Aharah (= Ahiram) are taken from  Numbers 26:38 , however, without change.  H. J. Wolf
AMMINADIB|A person mentioned in Cant. 6:12, whose chariots were famed for their swiftness. It is rendered in the margin "my willing people," and in the Revised Version "my princely people." 
ALVAN|   ALVAN  al'-van (`alwan, "tall"?): A son of Shobal, the Horite ( Genesis 36:23 ). In  1 Chronicles 1:40  the name is written Alian, Septuagint Olam. It is probably the same as Alvah of  Genesis 36:23 , which appears in  1 Chronicles 1:51  as Aliah.
ANTHOTHIJAH|   ANTHOTHIJAH  an-tho-thi'-ja (`anthothiyah, "belonging to Anathoth"(?)): A son of Shasak of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:24 ), written in the King James Version Antothijah.
ASHKENAZ|One of the three sons of Gomer ( Genesis 10:3 ), and founder of one of the tribes of the Japhetic race. They are mentioned in connection with Minni and Ararat, and hence their original seat must have been in Armenia ( Jeremiah 51:27 ), probably near the Black Sea, which, from their founder, was first called Axenus, and afterwards the Euxine. 
ALMODAD|Immeasurable, the first named of the sons of Joktan ( Genesis 10:26 ), the founder of an Arabian tribe. 
AIN|   AIN (2)  a'-in (`ayin, "eye or spring (of water)"):  (1) A town in the extreme Northwest corner of Canaan, so named, most probably, from a noted spring in the vicinity ( Numbers 34:11 ). Thomson and after him Robinson make Ain the same as `Ain el-`Asy, the chief source of the Orontes, some fifteen miles Southwest of Riblah, which, in turn, is about twenty miles Southwest of Emesa (Hums). As Ain is named in connection with Lake Gennesaret, some claim that Riblah of  Numbers 34:11  must be another place farther South and closer to that lake.  (2) A Levitical city ( Joshua 21:16 ) in the Negeb or southern part of Judah. It was first allotted to the tribe of Judah ( Joshua 15:32 ) but later to Simeon ( Joshua 19:7 ). The fact that it is several times named in immediate connection with Rimmon has lent plausibility to the view that we have here a compound word, and that we should read En-Rimmon, i.e. Ain-Rimmon (see  Joshua 15:32 ;  Joshua 19:7   1 Chronicles 4:32 ). See also  AYIN .  W. W. Davies  AIN (1)  See  AYIN .
AGAGITE|A name applied to Haman and also to his father ( Esther 3:1 ,  10;  8:3 ,  5). Probably it was equivalent to Amalekite. 
AZZUR|Helper.  (1.) The father of Hananiah, a false prophet ( Jeremiah 28:1 ). (2.) The father of Jaazaniah ( Ezek. 11:1 ). (3.) One of those who sealed the covenant with Jehovah on the return from Babylon ( Nehemiah 10:17 ). 
AHLAB|Fatness, a town of Asher lying within the unconquered Phoenician border ( Judges 1:31 ), north-west of the Sea of Galilee; commonly identified with Giscala, now el-Jish. 
ASHURBANIPAL|   ASHURBANIPAL  a-shoor-ba'-ne-pal (Ashur-bani-apal, "Ashur creates a son"): Before setting out on his last campaign to Egypt, Esarhaddon king of Assyria doubtless having had some premonition that his days were numbered, caused his son Ashurbanipal to be acknowledged the crown prince of Assyria (668 B.C.). At the same time he proclaimed his son Shamash-shum-ukin as the crown prince of Babylonia. At the father's death the latter, however, was only permitted to become viceroy of Babylonia.  Ashurbanipal is generally believed to be the great and noble Osnappar ( Ezra 4:10 ). See  OSNAPPAR . If this identification should not prove correct, the king is not mentioned by name in the Old Testament. In the annals of Ashurbanipal there is a list of twenty tributary kings in which Manasseh (written Minse) of the land of Judah is mentioned. With a few exceptions the list is the same as that given by Esarhaddon, his father. In  2 Chronicles 33:11  we learn that the captains of the host of the king of Assyria took Manasseh with hooks and bound him with fetters, and carried him to Babylon. The king to whom reference is made in this passage was either Esarhaddon or Ashurbanipal. If the latter, his restoration of Manasseh was paralleled in the instance of Necho, the vassal king of Memphis and Sais, who also had revolted from Assyria; for he was accorded similar treatment, being sent back to Egypt with special marks of favor, and reinstated upon his throne.  Another reference in the Old Testament, at least to one of the acts of Ashurbanipal, is the prophecy of Nahum, who in predicting the downfall of Nineveh, said, "Art thou (Nineveh) better than No-amon?" This passage is illustrated by the annals of the king, in which he recounts the destruction of the city. No (meaning "city") is the name of Thebes, while Amon (or Amen) was the chief deity of that city.  Esarhaddon died on his way to Egypt, which he had previously conquered, an insurrection having taken place. Tirhakah, whom Esarhaddon had vanquished, and who had fled to Ethiopia, had returned, and had advanced against the rulers appointed by Assyria. He formed a coalition with Necho and others. Not long after Ashurbanipal came to the throne, he set out for Egypt and defeated the forces. The leaders of the insurrection were carried to Nineveh in fetters. Necho, like Manasseh, as mentioned above, was restored to his rule at Sais. Tirhakah died shortly after. His sister's son Tanut-Amon (Tandami) then took up the cause, and after the departure of the Assyrian army he advanced against the Assyrian vassal governors. The Assyrian army returned and relieved the besieged. Tanut-Amon returned to Thebes, which was conquered and which was spoiled by the rapacious Assyrians, 663 B.C. This is what the prophet Nahum referred to (3:8). A few years later Psammetik, the son of Necho, who had remained faithful after his restoration, declared his independence. As the Assyrian army was required elsewhere, Egypt was henceforth free from the yoke of the Assyrian. Ba`al of Tyre, after a long siege, finally submitted. Yakinlu, king of Arvad, paid tribute and sent hostages. Other rebellious subjects, who had become emboldened by the attitude of Tirhakah, were brought into submission. Under Urlaki, the old enemy Elam, which had been at peace with Assyria since the preceding reign, now became aggressive and made inroads into Babylonia. Ashurbanipal marched through the Zagros mountains, and suddenly appeared before Susa. This move brought Teumman, who had in the meanwhile succeeded Urlaki, back to his capital. Elam was humiliated.  In 652 B.C. the insurrection of Shamash-shumukin, the king's brother, who had been made viceroy of Babylon, broke out. He desired to establish his independence from Assyria. After Ashurbanipal had overcome Babylon, Shamash-shum-ukin took refuge in a palace, set it on fire, and destroyed himself in the flames.  There is much obscurity about the last years of Ashurbanipal's reign. The decadence of Assyria had begun, which resulted not only in the loss to the title of the surrounding countries, but also in its complete annihilation before the century was over. Nineveh was finally razed to the ground by the Umman-Manda hordes, and was never rebuilt.  Ashurbanipal is also distinguished for his building operations, which show remarkable architectural ingenuity. In many of the cities of Assyria and Babylonia he restored, enlarged or embellished the temples or shrines. In Nineveh he reared a beautiful palace, which excelled all other Assyrian structures in the richness of its ornamentations.  During his reign the study of art was greatly encouraged. Some of his exquisite sculptures represent not only the height of Assyrian art, but also belong to the most important aesthetic treasures of the ancient world. The themes of many of the chief sculptures depict the hunt, in which the king took special delight.  Above all else Ashurbanipal is famous for the library he created, because of which he is perhaps to be considered the greatest known patron of literature in the pre-Christian centuries. For Bibliography see ASSYRIA.  A. T. Clay
AZEKAH|Dug over, a town in the Shephelah or low hills of Judah ( Joshua 15:35 ), where the five confederated Amoritish kings were defeated by Joshua and their army destroyed by a hailstrom ( 10:10 ,  11). It was one of the places re-occupied by the Jews on their return from the Captivity ( Nehemiah 11:30 ). 
ASHERAH|And pl. Asherim in Revised Version, instead of "grove" and "groves" of the Authorized Version. This was the name of a sensual Canaanitish goddess Astarte, the feminine of the Assyrian Ishtar. Its symbol was the stem of a tree deprived of its boughs, and rudely shaped into an image, and planted in the ground. Such religious symbols ("groves") are frequently alluded to in Scripture ( Exodus 34:13 ;  Judges 6:25 ;  2 Kings 23:6 ;  1 Kings 16:33 ,  etc.). These images were also sometimes made of silver or of carved stone ( 2 Kings 21:7 ; "the graven image of Asherah, " R.V.). (see  GROVE  .). 
AHIRAMITE|   AHIRAMITE  a-hi'-ram-it ('achirami, "of the family of Ahiram";  Numbers 26:38 ). See  AHIRAM .
ACHAN|Called also Achar, i.e., one who troubles ( 1 Chronicles 2:7 ), in commemoration of his crime, which brought upon him an awful destruction ( Joshua 7:1 ). On the occasion of the fall of Jericho, he seized, contrary to the divine command, an ingot of gold, a quantity of silver, and a costly Babylonish garment, which he hid in his tent. Joshua was convinced that the defeat which the Israelites afterwards sustained before Ai was a proof of the divine displeasure on account of some crime, and he at once adopted means by the use of the lot for discovering the criminal. It was then found that Achan was guilty, and he was stoned to death in the valley of Achor. He and all that belonged to him were then consumed by fire, and a heap of stones was raised over the ashes. 
ARABAH|Plain, in the Revised Version of  2 Kings 14:25 ;  Joshua 3:16 ;  8:14 ;  2 Samuel 2:29 ;  4:7  (in all these passages the A.V. has "plain");  Amos 6:14  (A.V. "wilderness"). This word is found in the Authorized Version only in  Joshua 18:18 . It denotes the hollow depression through which the Jordan flows from the Lake of Galilee to the Dead Sea. It is now called by the Arabs el-Ghor. But the Ghor is sometimes spoken of as extending 10 miles south of the Dead Sea, and thence to the Gulf of Akabah on the Red Sea is called the Wady el-Arabah. 
ADADAH|   ADADAH  a-da'-da (`adh`adhah): A city in the southern part of Judah ( Joshua 15:22 ). The older copies of the Greek text have Arouel, but that is not a sufficient reason for identifying the name with the Aroer of  1 Samuel 30:28 . Some scholars adopt the change of text, and identify the site with Ararah, about seven miles Southeast of Beer-sheba. Others identify it with Adadah, eight or nine miles Southeast of Arad.
ASHBEL|   ASHBEL; ASHBELITE  ash'-bel, ash'-bel-it ('ashbel): The gentilic name "Ashbelite" is found in  Numbers 26:38 , second son of Benjamin ( Genesis 46:21 ). In  1 Chronicles 7:6-11  (6) "Jediael" ("known to God") is substituted for the heathen-sounding "Ashbel" ("Ishbaal," "man of Baal"). The chronicler, in this case, conforms literally to the principle laid down in  Hosea 2:17 ; the title "Baal" ("lord") was applied in early days (e.g. in the days of Saul) to the national God of Israel, but in later days the prophets objected to it because it was freely applied to heathen gods (compare ISH-BOSHETH). In  1 Chronicles 8:1  the three names Bela, Ashbel, Aharah (= Ahiram) are taken from  Numbers 26:38 , however, without change.  H. J. Wolf
ARISTOBULUS|A Roman mentioned in Paul's Epistle to the Romans ( 16:10 ), whose "household" is saluated. 
AHAVA|Water, the river ( Ezra 8:21 ) by the banks of which the Jewish exiles assembled under Ezra when about to return to Jerusalem from Babylon. In all probability this was one of the streams of Mesopotamia which flowed into the Euphrates somewhere in the north-west of Babylonia. It has, however, been supposed to be the name of a place ( Ezra 8:15 ) now called Hit, on the Euphrates, east of Damascus. 
ABEDNEGO|Servant of Nego=Nebo, the Chaldee name given to Azariah, one of Daniel's three companions ( Dan. 2:49 ). With Shadrach and Meshach, he was delivered from the burning fiery furnace ( 3:12 -30). 
ALLON|Oak.  (1.) The expression in the Authorized Version of  Joshua 19:33 , "from Allon to Zaanannim," is more correctly rendered in the Revised Version, "from the oak in Zaanannim." The word denotes some remarkable tree which stood near Zaanannim, and which served as a landmark. (2.) The son of Jedaiah, of the family of the Simeonites, who expelled the Hamites from the valley of Gedor ( 1 Chronicles 4:37 ). 
ASTAROTH|   ASTAROTH  as'-ta-roth. See  ASHTAROTH .
ADDAR|Ample, splendid, son of Bela ( 1 Chronicles 8:3 ); called also "Ard" ( Genesis 46:21 ) 
ADINA|Slender, one of David's warriors ( 1 Chronicles 11:42 ), a Reubenite. 
ABIDAH|   ABIDAH  a-bi'-dah: Used in the King James Version in  Genesis 25:4  for ABIDA, which see.
ARDITES|   ARDITES  ar'-dits: Patronymic of ARD, which see.
ABRAM|Exalted father. (see  ABRAHAM .) 
ARABIA|Arid, an extensive region in the south-west of Asia. It is bounded on the west by the Isthmus of Suez and the Red Sea, on the south by the Indian Ocean, and on the east by the Persian Gulf and the Euphrates. It extends far into the north in barren deserts, meeting those of Syria and Mesopotamia. It is one of the few countries of the world from which the original inhabitants have never been expelled. It was anciently divided into three parts:,  (1.) Arabia Felix (Happy Arabia), so called from its fertility. It embraced a large portion of the country now known by the name of Arabia. The Arabs call it Yemen. It lies between the Red Sea and the Persian Gulf.  (2.) Arabia Deserta, the el-Badieh or "Great Wilderness" of the Arabs. From this name is derived that which is usually given to the nomadic tribes which wander over this region, the "Bedaween," or, more generally, "Bedouin,"  (3.) Arabia Petraea, i.e., the Rocky Arabia, so called from its rocky mountains and stony plains. It comprehended all the north-west portion of the country, and is much better known to travellers than any other portion. This country is, however, divided by modern geographers into (1) Arabia Proper, or the Arabian Peninsula; (2) Northern Arabia, or the Arabian Desert; and (3) Western Arabia, which includes the peninsula of Sinai and the Desert of Petra, originally inhabited by the Horites ( Genesis 14:6 ,  etc.), but in later times by the descendants of Esau, and known as the Land of Edom or Idumea, also as the Desert of Seir or Mount Seir. The whole land appears ( Genesis 10 ) to have been inhabited by a variety of tribes of different lineage, Ishmaelites, Arabians, Idumeans, Horites, and Edomites; but at length becoming amalgamated, they came to be known by the general designation of Arabs. The modern nation of Arabs is predominantly Ishmaelite. Their language is the most developed and the richest of all the Semitic languages, and is of great value to the student of Hebrew. The Israelites wandered for forty years in Arabia. In the days of Solomon, and subsequently, commercial intercourse was to a considerable extent kept up with this country ( 1 Kings 10:15 ;  2 Chronicles 9:14 ;  17:11 ). Arabians were present in Jerusalem at Pentecost ( Acts 2:11 ). Paul retired for a season into Arabia after his conversion ( Galatians 1:17 ). This country is frequently referred to by the prophets ( Isaiah 21:11 ;  42:11 ;  Jeremiah 25:24 ,  etc.) 
AHAZIAH|Held by Jehovah.  (1.) The son and successor of Ahab. He followed the counsels of his mother Jezebel, and imitated in wickedness the ways of his father. In his reign the Moabites revolted from under his authority ( 2 Kings 3:5 -7). He united with Jehoshaphat in an attempt to revive maritime trade by the Red Sea, which proved a failure ( 2 Chronicles 20:35 -37). His messengers, sent to consult the god of Ekron regarding his recovery from the effects of a fall from the roof-gallery of his palace, were met on the way by Elijah, who sent them back to tell the king that he would never rise from his bed ( 1 Kings 22:51 ;  2 Kings 1:18 ). (2.) The son of Joram, or Jehoram, and sixth king of Judah. Called Jehoahaz ( 2 Chronicles 21:17 ;  25:23 ), and Azariah ( 2 Chronicles 22:6 ). Guided by his idolatrous mother Athaliah, his reign was disastrous ( 2 Kings 8:24 -29;  9:29 ). He joined his uncle Jehoram, king of Israel, in an expedition against Hazael, king of Damascus; but was wounded at the pass of Gur when attempting to escape, and had strength only to reach Megiddo, where he died ( 2 Kings 9:22 -28). He reigned only one year. 
ANETHOTHITE|   ANETHOTHITE  an'-e-thoth-it: the King James Version form of Anathothite (thus the Revised Version (British and American)  2 Samuel 23:27 ).
AMMIEL|People of God.  (1.) One of the twelve spies sent by Moses to search the land of Canaan ( Numbers 13:12 ). He was one of the ten who perished by the plague for their unfavourable report ( Numbers 14:37 ). (2.) The father of Machir of Lo-debar, in whose house Mephibosheth resided ( 2 Samuel 9:4 ,  5;  17:27 ). (3.) The father of Bathsheba, the wife of Uriah, and afterwards of David ( 1 Chronicles 3:5 ). He is called Eliam in  2 Samuel 11:3 . (4.) One of the sons of Obed-edom the Levite ( 1 Chronicles 26:5 ). 
ATTAI|   ATTAI  at'-ta-i at'-i `attay, ("timely?"):  (1) A son of Jarha, the Egyptian, by a daughter of Sheshan ( 1 Chronicles 2:35 f ).  (2) A Gadite soldier who joined David's army at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:11 ).  (3) A son of Rehoboam and grandson of Solomon ( 2 Chronicles 11:20 ).
ABIDAN|Father of judgment; judge, head of the tribe of Benjamin at the Exodus ( Numbers 1:11 ;  2:22 ). 
AIATH|   AIATH  a'-yath (`ayyath): Found in  Isaiah 10:28 ; feminine form of the city AI (which see).
AMOZ|Strong, the father of the prophet Isaiah ( 2 Kings 19:2 ,  20;  20:1 ;  Isaiah 1:1 ;  2:1 ). As to his personal history little is positively known. He is supposed by some to have been the "man of God" spoken of in  2 Chronicles 25:7 , 8. 
ANTOTHITE|An inhabitant of Anathoth, found only in  1 Chronicles 11:28 ;  12:3 . In  2 Samuel 23:27  it is Anethothite; in  1 Chronicles 27:12 , Anetothite. (R.V.,  "Anathothite.") 
ACCO|   ACCO  ak'-o (`akko; [`Akcho]; Ake Ptolemais; Modern Arabic `Akka, English Acre; the King James Version Accho): A town on the Syrian coast a few miles north of Carmel, on a small promontory on the north side of a broad bay that lies between it and the modern town of Haifa. This bay furnishes the best anchorage for ships of any on this coast except that of George, at Beirut, and Alexandretta at the extreme north. As the situation commanded the approach from the sea to the rich plateau of Esdraelon and also the coast route from the north, the city was regarded in ancient times of great importance and at various periods of history was the scene of severe struggles for its possession. It fell within the bounds assigned to the Israelites, particularly to the tribe of Asher, but they were never able to take it ( Joshua 19:24-31   Judges 1:31 ).  It was, like Tyre and Sidon, too strong for them to attack and it became indeed a fortress of unusual strength, so that it many a siege, often baffling its assailants. In the period of the Crusades it was the most famous stronghold on the coast, and in very early times it was a place of importance and appears in the Tell el-Amarna Letters as a possession of the Egyptian kings. Its governor wrote to his suzerain professing loyalty when the northern towns were falling away (Am Tab 17 BM, 95 B). The Egyptian suzerainty over the coast, which was established by Thothmes III about 1480 B.C., was apparently lost in the 14th century, as is indicated in Tell el-Amarna Letters, but was regained under Seti I and his more famous son Rameses II in the 13th, to be again lost in the 12th when the Phoenician towns seem to have established their independence. Sidon however surpassed her sisters in power and exercised a sort of hegemony over the Phoenician towns, at least in the south, and Acco was included in it (Rawl. Phoenica, 407-8).  But when Assyria came upon the scene it had to submit to this power, although it revolted whenever Assyria became weak, as appears from the mention of its subjugation by Sennacherib (ib 449), and by Ashurbanipal (ib 458). The latter "quieted" it by a wholesale massacre and then carried into captivity the remaining inhabitants. Upon the downfall of Assyria it passed, together with other Phoenician towns, under the dominion of Babylon and then of Persia, but we have no records of its annals during that period; but it followed the fortunes of the more important cities, Tyre and Sidon. In the Seleucid period (BC 312-65) the town became of importance in the contests between the Seleucids and the Ptolemies. The latter occupied it during the struggles that succeeded the death of Alexander and made it their stronghold on the coast and changed the name to PTOLEMAIS, by which it was known in the Greek and Roman period as we see in the accounts of the Greek and Roman writers and in Josephus, as well as in New Testament (1 Maccabees 5:22; 10:39; 12:48;  Acts 21:7 ).  The old name still continued locally and reasserted itself in later times. The Ptolemies held undisputed possession of the place for about 70 years but it was wrested from them by Antiochus III, of Syria, in 219 B.C. and went into the permanent possession of the Seleucids after the decisive victory of Antiochus over Scopas in that year, the result of which was the expulsion of the Ptolemies from Syria, Palestine and Phoenicia (Ant., XII, iii, 3). In the dynastic struggles of the Seleucids it fell into the hands of Alexander Bala, who there received the hand of Cleopatra, the daughter of Ptolemy Philometor, as a pledge of alliance between them (ib XIII, iv, 1). Tigranes, king of Armenia, besieged it on his invasion of Syria, but was obliged to relinquish it on the approach of the Romans toward his own dominions (BJ, I, v, 3).  Under the Romans Ptolemais became a colony and a metropolis, as is known from coins, and was of importance, as is attested by Strabo. But the events that followed the conquests of the Saracens, leading to the Crusades, brought it into great prominence. It was captured by the Crusaders in 1110 A.D., and remained in their hands until 1187, when it was taken from them by Saladin and its fortifications so strengthened as to render it almost impregnable. The importance of this fortress as a key to the Holy Land was considered so great by the Crusaders that they put forth every effort during two years to recapture it, but all in vain until the arrival of Richard Coeur de Lion and Philip Augustus with reinforcements, and it was only after the most strenuous efforts on their part that the place fell into their hands, but it cost them 100,000 men. The fortifications were repaired and it was afterward committed to the charge of the knights of John, by whom it was held for 100 years and received the name of Jean d'Acre. It was finally taken by the Saracens in 1291, being the last place held by the Crusaders in Palestine  It declined after this and fell into the hands of the Ottomans under Selim I in 1516, and remained mostly in ruins until the 18th century, when it came into the possession of Jezzar Pasha, who usurped the authority over it and the neighboring district and became practically independent of the Sultan and defied his authority. In 1799 it was attacked by Napoleon but was bravely and successfully defended by the Turks with the help of the English fleet, and Napoleon had to abandon the siege after he had spent two months before it and gained a victory over the Turkish army at Tabor. It enjoyed a considerable degree of prosperity after this until 1831 when it was besieged by Ibrahim Pasha, of Egypt, and taken, but only after a siege of more than five months in which it suffered the destruction of its walls and many of its buildings. It continued in the hands of the Egyptians until 1840 when it was restored to the Ottomans by the English whose fleet nearly reduced it to ruins in the bombardment. It has recovered somewhat since then and is now a town of some 10,000 inhabitants and the seat of a Mutasarrifiyet, or subdivision of the Vilayet of Beirut. It contains one of the state prisons of the Vilayet, where long-term prisoners are incarcerated. Its former commerce has been almost wholly lost to the town of Haifa, on the south side of the bay, since the latter has a fairly good roadstead, while Acre has none, and the former being the terminus of the railway which connects with the interior and the Damascus-Mecca line, it has naturally supplanted Acre as a center of trade.  H. Porter
ADONIZEDEC|Lord of justice or righteousness, was king in Jerusalem at the time when the Israelites invaded Palestine ( Joshua 10:1 , 3). He formed a confederacy with the other Canaanitish kings against the Israelites, but was utterly routed by Joshua when he was engaged in besieging the Gibeonites. The history of this victory and of the treatment of the five confederated kings is recorded in  Joshua 10:1 -27. (Comp.  Deuteronomy 21:23 ). Among the Tell Amarna tablets (see  EGYPT ) are some very interesting letters from Adoni-zedec to the King of Egypt. These illustrate in a very remarkable manner the history recorded in  Joshua 10 , and indeed throw light on the wars of conquest generally, so that they may be read as a kind of commentary on the book of Joshua. Here the conquering career of the Abiri (i.e.,  Hebrews) is graphically described: "Behold, I say that the land of the king my lord is ruined", "The wars are mighty against me", "The Hebrew chiefs plunder all the king's lands", "Behold, I the chief of the Amorites am breaking to pieces." Then he implores the king of Egypt to send soldiers to help him, directing that the army should come by sea to Ascalon or Gaza, and thence march to Wru-sa-lim (Jerusalem) by the valley of Elah. 
ADIN|Effeminate.  (1.)  Ezra 8:6 .  (2.)  Nehemiah 10:16 . 
ARAMMAACAH|   ARAM-MAACAH  a-ram-ma'-a-ka. See  SYRIA .
ANUB|   ANUB  a'-nub (`anubh, "ripe"): A descendant of Judah and son of Hakkoz (the King James Version Coz)  1 Chronicles 4:8 .
ANDREW|Manliness, a Greek name; one of the apostles of our Lord. He was of Bethsaida in Galilee ( John 1:44 ), and was the brother of Simon Peter ( Matthew 4:18 ;  10:2 ). On one occasion John the Baptist, whose disciple he then was, pointing to Jesus, said, "Behold the Lamb of God" ( John 1:40 ); and Andrew, hearing him, immediately became a follower of Jesus, the first of his disciples. After he had been led to recognize Jesus as the Messiah, his first care was to bring also his brother Simon to Jesus. The two brothers seem to have after this pursued for a while their usual calling as fishermen, and did not become the stated attendants of the Lord till after John's imprisonment ( Matthew 4:18 ,  19;  Mark 1:16 ,  17). Very little is related of Andrew. He was one of the confidential disciples ( John 6:8 ;  12:22 ), and with Peter, James, and John inquired of our Lord privately regarding his future coming ( Mark 13:3 ). He was present at the feeding of the five thousand ( John 6:9 ), and he introduced the Greeks who desired to see Jesus ( John 12:22 ); but of his subsequent history little is known. It is noteworthy that Andrew thrice brings others to Christ, (1) Peter; (2) the lad with the loaves; and (3) certain Greeks. These incidents may be regarded as a key to his character. 
AHOLIAB|Tent of the father, an artist of the tribe of Dan, appointed to the work of preparing materials for the tabernacle ( Exodus 31:6 ;  35:34 ;  36:1 ,  2;  38:23 ). 
AHISAMACH|   AHISAMACH  a-his'-a-mak ('achicamakh, "my brother supports"): A man of the tribe of Dan, father of Oholiab, who was the assistant of Bezalel in the building of the tent of meeting and preparing its furniture ( Exodus 31:6 ;  Exodus 35:34 ;  Exodus 38:23 ).
ANTIPAS| (1.) Herod Antipas, a son of Herod the Great by his Samaritan wife Malthace. He was tetrarch of Galilee and Peraea during the whole period of our Lord's life on earth ( Luke 23:7 ). He was a frivolous and vain prince, and was chargeable with many infamous crimes ( Mark 8:15 ;  Luke 3:19 ;  13:31 ,  32). He beheaded John the Baptist ( Matthew 14:1 -12) at the instigation of Herodias, the wife of his half-brother Herod-Philip, whom he had married. Pilate sent Christ to him when he was at Jerusalem at the Passover ( Luke 23:7 ). He asked some idle questions of him, and after causing him to be mocked, sent him back again to Pilate. The wife of Chuza, his house-steward, was one of our Lord's disciples ( Luke 8:3 ). (2.) A "faithful martyr" ( Revelation 2:13 ), of whom nothing more is certainly known. 
AHILUD|   AHILUD  a-hi'-lud ('achiludh, "child's brother," perhaps): The father of Jehoshaphat, who is mentioned as "recorder" in both the earlier and the later lists under David, and in the list under Solomon ( 2 Samuel 8:16, 1_chronicles 18:15   2 Samuel 20:24   1 Kings 4:3 ). In the absence of proof we may assume that the father of Baana, one of Solomon's district superintendents, was the same Ahilud ( 1 Kings 4:12 ).
AZMAVETH|Strong as death.  (1.) One of David's thirty warriors ( 2 Samuel 23:31 ). (2.) An overseer over the royal treasury in the time of David and Solomon ( 1 Chronicles 27:25 ). (3.) A town in the tribe of Judah, near Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 12:29 ;  Ezra 2:24 ). (4.)  1 Chronicles 8:36  
ARAN|Wild goat, a descendant of Seir the Horite ( Genesis 36:28 ). 
ADAMAH|Red earth, a fortified city of Naphtali, probably the modern Damieh, on the west side of the sea of Tiberias ( Joshua 19:33 ,  36). 
ASHKELON|=Askelon=Ascalon, was one of the five cities of the Philistines ( Joshua 13:3 ;  1 Samuel 6:17 ). It stood on the shore of the Mediterranean, 12 miles north of Gaza.
ANANIAH|Protected by Jehovah, the name of a town in the tribe of Benjamin between Nob and Hazor ( Nehemiah 11:32 ). It is probably the modern Beit Hanina, a small village 3 miles north of Jerusalem. 
ALUSH|One of the places, the last before Rephidim, at which the Hebrews rested on their way to Sinai ( Numbers 33:13 ,  14). It was probably situated on the shore of the Red Sea. 
AHIRA|Brother of evil = unlucky, or my brother is friend, chief of the tribe of Naphtali at the Exodus ( Numbers 1:15 ;  2:29 ). 
AGUR|Gatherer; the collector, mentioned as author of the sayings in  Proverbs 30 . Nothing is known of him beyond what is there recorded. 
ABIGAL|   ABIGAIL; ABIGAL  ab'-i-gal, ab'-i-gal ('abhighayil, or 'abhighal, three times, or 'abhughayil, once, or 'abhighayil, once; "father," or "cause of joy"):  (1) The wife of Nabal, a rich shepherd of southern Judea, whose home was Maon ( 1 Samuel 25:2, 3 ); shortly after Nabal's death she became the wife of David. Nabal grazed his flocks in or along the Southern Wilderness, where David and his men protected them from marauding tribes, so that not a sheep was lost. When Nabal was sheep-shearing and feasting at Carmel (in Judea), David sent messengers requesting provisions for himself and men. But Nabal, who was a churlish fellow, answered the messengers insultingly and sent them away empty-handed. David, angered by such mean ingratitude, gathered his 400 warriors and set out to destroy Nabal and all he had ( 1 Samuel 25:22 ). Meanwhile Abigail, a woman "of good understanding, and of a beautiful countenance" ( 1 Samuel 25:3 ), heard of the rebuff given the men of David by her husband; and fearing what vengeance David in his wrath might work, she gathered a considerable present of food ( 1 Samuel 25:18 ), and hastened to meet the approaching soldiers. Her beautiful and prudent words, as also her fair face, so won David that he desisted from his vengeful purpose and accepted her gift ( 1 Samuel 25:32-35 ). When Abigail told Nabal of his narrow escape, he was stricken with fear, and died ten days afterward. Shortly after this David took Abigail to be his wife, although about the same time, probably a little before, he had also taken Ahinoam ( 1 Samuel 25:43 ); and these two were with him in Gath ( 1 Samuel 27:3 ). After David became king in Hebron, Abigail bore him his second son, Chileab ( 2 Samuel 3:3 ) or Daniel, as he is called in  1 Chronicles 3:1 .  (2) Sister of David and mother of Amasa, at one time commander of David's army ( 1 Chronicles 2:16, 17 ; Abigal  2 Samuel 17:25 ). In the first passage she is called David's sister, along with Zeruiah; while in the second she is called the "daughter of Nahash." Several explanations of this connection with Nahash have been suggested, any one of which would be sufficient to remove contradiction:  (1) That Nahash was another name of Jesse, as in  Isaiah 14:29 , mish-shoresh nachash yetse' (Qimchi);  (2) That Nahash was the wife of Jesse and by him mother of Abigail, which is least probable;  (3) That Nahash, the father of Abigail and Zeruiah, having died, his widow became the wife of Jesse, and bore sons to him;  (4) That the text of  2 Samuel 17:25  has been corrupted, "daughter of Nahash" having crept into the text. At all events she was the sister of David by the same mother.  Edward Mack
ABINOAM|Father of kindness, the father of Barak ( Judges 4:6 ;  5:1 ). 
ARUBOTH|   ARUBBOTH; ARUBOTH  a-rub'-oth, ar'-u-both (ha-'arubboth; the King James Version Aruboth): One of the 12 districts from which victuals for Solomon's household were obtained ( 1 Kings 4:10 ). With Arubboth are mentioned "Socoh, and all the land of Hepher," and as Socoh lay in the Shephelah ( Joshua 15:35 ), Arubboth probably lay in the southern part of the Shephelah.
AZIZA|   AZIZA  a-zi'-za (`aziza' "the powerful"): Aziza had taken a foreign wife ( Ezra 10:27 ): compare Zardeus (1 Esdras 9:28 the Revised Version (British and American)).
APHIK|( Judges 1:31 ); Aphek ( Joshua 13:4 ;  19:30 ), stronghold.  (1.) A city of the tribe of Asher. It was the scene of the licentious worship of the Syrian Aphrodite. The ruins of the temple, "magnificent ruins" in a "spot of strange wildness and beauty", are still seen at Afka, on the north-west slopes of Lebanon, near the source of the river Adonis (now Nahr Ibrahim), 12 miles east of Gebal. (2.) A city of the tribe of Issachar, near to Jezreel ( 1 Samuel 4:1 ;  29:1 ; Comp.  28:4 ). (3.) A town on the road from Damascus to Palestine, in the level plain east of Jordan, near which Benhadad was defeated by the Israelites ( 1 Kings 20:26 ,  30;  2 Kings 13:17 ). It has been identified with the modern Fik, 6 miles east of the Sea of Galilee, opposite Tiberias. 
AHUMAI|   AHUMAI  a-hu'-ma-i, a-hu'-mi ('achumay, "brother of water"(?)): A descendant of Shobal of the tribe of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:2 ).
AGABUS|A "prophet," probably one of the seventy disciples of Christ. He prophesied at Antioch of an approaching famine ( Acts 11:27 ,  28). Many years afterwards he met Paul at Caesarea, and warned him of the bonds and affliction that awaited him at Jerusalem should he persist in going thither ( Acts 21:10 -12). 
ATHACH|   ATHACH  a'-thak (`athakh, "lodging-place"): One of the cities of Judah to which David sent from Ziklag the spoil of the Amalekites ( 1 Samuel 30:30 ). Its site is unknown. Driver, Budde, and Wellhausen identify it with Ether ( Joshua 15:42 ).
ARTEMIS|   DIANA; ARTEMIS  di-an'-a (Artemis "prompt," "safe"): A deity of Asiatic origin, the mother goddess of the earth, whose seat of worship was the temple in Ephesus, the capital of the Roman province of Asia. Diana is but the Latinized form of the Greek word Artemis, yet the Artemis of Ephesus should not be confused with the Greek goddess of that name.  She may, however, be identified with the Cybele of the Phrygians whose name she also bore, and with several other deities who were worshipped under different names in various parts of the Orient. In Cappadocia she was known as Ma; to the Syrians as Atargatis or Mylitta; among the Phoenicians as Astarte, a name which appears among the Assyrians as Ishtar; the modern name Esther is derived from it. The same goddess seems to have been worshipped by the Hittites, for a female deity is sculptured on the rocks at Yazili Kaya, near the Hittite city of Boghazkeui. It may be shown ultimately that the various goddesses of Syria and Asia Minor all owe their origin to the earlier Assyrian or Babylonian Ishtar, the goddess of love, whose chief attributes they possessed. The several forms and names under which she appears axe due to the varying developments in different regions.  Tradition says that Diana was born in the woods near Ephesus, where her temple was built, when her image of wood (possibly ebony; Pliny, NH, xvi. 40;  Acts 19:35 ) fell from the sky (see also ASTRONOMY, sec. I, 8 (2)). Also according to tradition the city which was later called Ephesus was founded by the Amazons, and Diana or Cybele was the deity of those half-mythical people. Later when Ephesus fell into the possession of the Greeks, Greek civilization partly supplanted the Asiatic, and in that city the two civilizations were blended together. The Greek name of Artemis was given to the Asiatic goddess, and many of the Greek colonists represented her on their coins as Greek. Her images and forms of worship remained more Asiatic than Greek Her earliest statues were figures crudely carved in wood. Later when she was represented in stone and metals, she bore upon her head a mural headdress, representing a fortitled city wall; from it, drapery hung upon each side of her face to her shoulders. The upper part of her body was completely covered with rows of breasts to signify that she was the mother of all life. The lower arms were extended. The lower part of the body resembled a rough block, as if her legs had been wrapped up in cloth like those of an Egyptian mummy. In later times her Greek followers represented her with stags or lions standing at her sides. The most renowned of her statues stood on the platform before the entrance to her temple in Ephesus. As the statues indicate, she impersonated the reproductive powers of men and of animals and of all other life.  At the head of her cult was a chief priest, originally a eunuch who bore the name and later the title Megabyzos. Under him were priests known as Essenes, appointed. perhaps from the city officials, for but a single year; it was their duty to offer the sacrifices to the goddess in behalf of the city. Other subordinate classes of priests known as Kouretes, Krobatai and Hilroi performed duties which are now obscure. The priestesses were even more numerous, and, probably from their great numbers, they were called Melissai or bees; the Ephesian symbol therefore which appears commonly upon the coins struck in the city, is a bee. The Melissai, which in the early times were all virgins, were of three classes; it is no longer known just what the special duties of each class were. The ritual of the temple services consisted of sacrifices and of ceremonial prostitution, a practice which was common to many of the religions of the ancient Orient, and which still exists among some of the obscure tribes of Asia Minor.  The temple of Diana was not properly the home of the goddess; it was but a shrine, the chief one, devoted to her service. She lived in Nature; she was everywhere wherever there was life, the mother of all living things; all offerings of every possible nature were therefore acceptable to her; hence, the vast wealth which poured into her temple. Not only was she worshipped in her temple, but in the minute shrines or naoi which were sometimes modeled after the temple. More frequently the shrines were exceedingly crude objects, either of silver or stone or wood or clay. They were made at Ephesus by dependents of the temple, and carried by the pilgrims throughout the world. Before them Diana might also be worshipped anywhere, just as now from the soil of the sacred Mesopotamian city of Kerbela, where the sons of Ali were martyred, little blocks are formed and are carried away by the Shiah Moslems that they may pray upon sacred ground wherever they may be. The makers of the shrines of Diana formed an exceedingly large class among whom, in Paul's time, was Demetrius ( Acts 19:24 ). None of the silver shrines have been discovered, but those of marble and of clay have appeared among the ruins of Ephesus. They are exceedingly crude; in a little shell-like bit of clay, a crude clay female figure sits, sometimes with a tambourine in one hand and a cup in the other, or with a lion at her side or beneath her foot. Though the shrines were sold as sacred dwelling-places of the goddess, that the pilgrims who carried them to their distant homes, or buried them in the graves with their dead, might be assured of her constant presence, their real purpose was to increase the temple revenues by their sale at a price which was many times their cost. With the shrines of Diana may be compared the household gods of clay found in abundance among the ruins of the earlier Babylonian cities, especially those cities in which temples to the goddess Ishtar stood.  E. J. Banks  ARTEMIS  ar'-te-mis. See  DIANA .
APPLES|   APPLES OF SODOM  sod'-um: Josephus (BJ, IV, viii, 4) says that "the traces (or shadows) of the five cities (of the plain) are still to be seen, as well as the ashes growing in their fruits, which fruits have a color as if they were fit to be eaten; but if you pluck them with your hands they dissolve into smoke and ashes." What this "Dead Sea fruit" is, is uncertain. The name "Dead Sea apples" is often given to the fruit of the Solanum Sodomaean "a prickly shrub with fruit not unlike a small yellow tomato." Cheyne thinks that the fruits referred to by Josephus (compare Tacitus Hist. v.37) may be either  (1) those of the `osher tree (`usar, Calotropis procera, described by Hasselquist (Travels, 1766)), found in abundance about Jericho and near the Dead Sea, which are filled with dust when they have been attacked by an insect, leaving the skin only entire, and of a beautiful color. Tristram describes the fruit as being "as large as an apple of average size, of a bright yellow color, hanging three or four together close to the stem"; or as suggested by Tristram  (2) those of the wild colocynth; the fruit is fair of aspect with a pulp which dries up into a bitter powder (EB, article "Sodom," col. 4669, note 2). This colocynth is supposed to be the "wild vine" mentioned  2 Kings 4:39 . The "vine of Sodom" of  Deuteronomy 32:32  has been supposed to bear the "Dead Sea fruit"; but most modern writers regard the passage as figurative.  W. L. Walker
AZRIKAM|   AZRIKAM  az-ri'-kam (`azriqam, "my help has arisen"):  (1) A descendant of King David through Zerubbabel ( 1 Chronicles 3:23 ).  (2) A prince of Judah in the time of Ahaz. He was slain by Zichri, an Ephraimite soldier ( 2 Chronicles 28:7 ).  (3) One of Azel's sons, a Benjamite, descended from King Saul ( 1 Chronicles 8:38 ;  1 Chronicles 9:44 ).  (4) A Levite of the house of Merari and a resident of Jerusalem ( 1 Chronicles 9:14   Nehemiah 11:15 ).
AROD|   AROD  a'-rod, ar'-od ('arodh): The sixth son of Gad ( Numbers 26:17 ). His descendants are called Arodi or Arodites ( Genesis 46:16   Numbers 26:17 ).
AHZAI|   AHZAI  a'-zi ('achzay, "my protector"): A priest who resided in Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 11:13 ). The the King James Version has Ahasai which is probably the same as Jahzevah of  1 Chronicles 9:12 .
ASKELON|   ASKELON  as'-ke-lon: the King James Version form in  Judges 1:18   1 Samuel 6:17 ;  2 Samuel 1:20 , for ASHKELON (which see).
ABISHAG|Father of (i.e.,  "given to") error, a young woman of Shunem, distinguished for her beauty. She was chosen to minister to David in his old age. She became his wife ( 1 Kings 1:3 , 4, 15). After David's death Adonijah persuaded Bathsheba, Solomon's mother, to entreat the king to permit him to marry Abishag. Solomon suspected in this request an aspiration to the throne, and therefore caused him to be put to death ( 1 Kings 2:17 -25). 
ATAROTHADDAR|   ATAROTH-ADDAR  at'-a-roth-ad'-ar (`aTroth 'addar, "crowns of Addar"). See  ATAROTH (2) .
AMORITES|Highlanders, or hillmen, the name given to the descendants of one of the sons of Canaan ( Genesis 14:7 ), called Amurra or Amurri in the Assyrian and Egyptian inscriptions. On the early Babylonian monuments all Syria, including Palestine, is known as "the land of the Amorites." The southern slopes of the mountains of Judea are called the "mount of the Amorites" ( Deuteronomy 1:7 ,  19,  20). They seem to have originally occupied the land stretching from the heights west of the Dead Sea ( Genesis 14:7 ) to Hebron (13. Comp.  13:8 ;  Deuteronomy 3:8 ;  4:46 -48), embracing "all Gilead and all Bashan" ( Deuteronomy 3:10 ), with the Jordan valley on the east of the river ( 4:49 ), the land of the "two kings of the Amorites," Sihon and Og ( Deuteronomy 31:4 ;  Joshua 2:10 ;  9:10 ). The five kings of the Amorites were defeated with great slaughter by Joshua ( 10:10 ). They were again defeated at the waters of Merom by Joshua, who smote them till there were none remaining ( Joshua 11:8 ). It is mentioned as a surprising circumstance that in the days of Samuel there was peace between them and the Israelites ( 1 Samuel 7:14 ). The discrepancy supposed to exist between  Deuteronomy 1:44  and  Numbers 14:45  is explained by the circumstance that the terms "Amorites" and "Amalekites" are used synonymously for the "Canaanites." In the same way we explain the fact that the "Hivites" of  Genesis 34:2  are the "Amorites" of  Genesis 48:22 . Comp.  Joshua 10:6 ;  11:19  with  2 Samuel 21:2 ; also  Numbers 14:45  with  Deuteronomy 1:44 . The Amorites were warlike mountaineers. They are represented on the Egyptian monuments with fair skins, light hair, blue eyes, aquiline noses, and pointed beards. They are supposed to have been men of great stature; their king, Og, is described by Moses as the last "of the remnant of the giants" ( Deuteronomy 3:11 ). Both Sihon and Og were independent kings. Only one word of the Amorite language survives, "Shenir," the name they gave to Mount Hermon ( Deuteronomy 3:9 ). 
ABISHAI|Father of (i.e.,  "desirous of") a gift, the eldest son of Zeruiah, David's sister. He was the brother of Joab and Asahel ( 2 Samuel 2:18 ;  1 Chronicles 2:16 ). Abishai was the only one who accompanied David when he went to the camp of Saul and took the spear and the cruse of water from Saul's bolster ( 1 Samuel 26:5 -12). He had the command of one of the three divisions of David's army at the battle with Absalom ( 2 Samuel 18:2 , 5, 12). He slew the Philistine giant Ishbi-benob, who threatened David's life ( 2 Samuel 21:15 -17). He was the chief of the second rank of the three "mighties" ( 2 Samuel 23:18 ,  19;  1 Chronicles 11:20 , 21); and on one occasion withstood 300 men, and slew them with his own spear ( 2 Samuel 23:18 ). Abishai is the name of the Semitic chief who offers gifts to the lord of Beni-Hassan. See illustration facing page 10. 
AHIMAAZ|Brother of anger = irascible.  (1.) The father Ahinoam, the wife of Saul ( 1 Samuel 14:50 ). (2.) The son and successor of Zadok in the office of high priest ( 1 Chronicles 6:8 ,  53). On the occasion of the revolt of Absalom he remained faithful to David, and was of service to him in conveying to him tidings of the proceedings of Absalom in Jerusalem ( 2 Samuel 15:24 -37;  17:15 -21). He was swift of foot, and was the first to carry to David tidings of the defeat of Absalom, although he refrained, from delicacy of feeling, from telling him of his death ( 2 Samuel 18:19 -33). 
ARARAT|Sacred land or high land, the name of a country on one of the mountains of which the ark rested after the Flood subsided ( Genesis 8:4 ). The "mountains" mentioned were probably the Kurdish range of South Armenia. In  2 Kings 19:37 ,  Isaiah 37:38 , the word is rendered "Armenia" in the Authorized Version, but in the Revised Version, "Land of Ararat." In  Jeremiah 51:27 , the name denotes the central or southern portion of Armenia. It is, however, generally applied to a high and almost inaccessible mountain which rises majestically from the plain of the Araxes. It has two conical peaks, about 7 miles apart, the one 14,300 feet and the other 10,300 feet above the level of the plain. Three thousand feet of the summit of the higher of these peaks is covered with perpetual snow. It is called Kuh-i-nuh, i.e., "Noah's mountain", by the Persians. This part of Armenia was inhabited by a people who spoke a language unlike any other now known, though it may have been related to the modern Georgian. About B.C. 900 they borrowed the cuneiform characters of Nineveh, and from this time we have inscriptions of a line of kings who at times contended with Assyria. At the close of the seventh century B.C. the kingdom of Ararat came to an end, and the country was occupied by a people who are ancestors of the Armenians of the present day. 
ALMONDIBLATHAIM|   ALMON-DIBLATHAIM  al'-mon-dib-la-tha'-im (`almon dibhlathayim, "Almon of the double cake of figs"): A station in the wilderness journeyings of the Israelites, located in Moab between Diban-gad and the mountains of Abarim ( Numbers 33:46, 47 ). It was near the end of the forty years' wanderings. The name was probably given because the location was like two lumps of pressed figs. In both occurrences the word has the accusative ending of direction, and should properly be read: "Almon toward Diblathaim." It was probably the same place as Beth-diblathaim of  Jeremiah 48:22 , mentioned in the prophet's oracle against Moab.
ADLAI|   ADLAI  ad'-la-i, ad'-li (`adhlay; Septuagint Adli and Adai, "lax, weary"): The father of Shaphat, an overseer of David's herds in the lowlands ( 1 Chronicles 27:29 ).
ABRAHAM|Father of a multitude, son of Terah, named ( Genesis 11:27 ) before his older brothers Nahor and Haran, because he was the heir of the promises. Till the age of seventy, Abram sojourned among his kindred in his native country of Chaldea. He then, with his father and his family and household, quitted the city of Ur, in which he had hitherto dwelt, and went some 300 miles north to Haran, where he abode fifteen years. The cause of his migration was a call from God ( Acts 7:2 -4). There is no mention of this first call in the Old Testament; it is implied, however, in  Genesis 12 . While they tarried at Haran, Terah died at the age of 205 years. Abram now received a second and more definite call, accompanied by a promise from God ( Genesis 12:1 , 2); whereupon he took his departure, taking his nephew Lot with him, "not knowing whither he went" ( Hebrews 11:8 ). He trusted implicitly to the guidance of Him who had called him. Abram now, with a large household of probably a thousand souls, entered on a migratory life, and dwelt in tents. Passing along the valley of the Jabbok, in the land of Canaan, he formed his first encampment at Sichem ( Genesis 12:6 ), in the vale or oak-grove of Moreh, between Ebal on the north and Gerizim on the south. Here he received the great promise, "I will make of thee a great nation," etc. ( Genesis 12:2 , 3, 7). This promise comprehended not only temporal but also spiritual blessings. It implied that he was the chosen ancestor of the great Deliverer whose coming had been long ago predicted ( Genesis 3:15 ). Soon after this, for some reason not mentioned, he removed his tent to the mountain district between Bethel, then called Luz, and Ai, towns about two miles apart, where he built an altar to "Jehovah." He again moved into the southern tract of Palestine, called by the Hebrews the Negeb; and was at length, on account of a famine, compelled to go down into Egypt. This took place in the time of the Hyksos, a Semitic race which now held the Egyptians in bondage. Here occurred that case of deception on the part of Abram which exposed him to the rebuke of Pharaoh ( Genesis 12:18 ). Sarai was restored to him; and Pharaoh loaded him with presents, recommending him to withdraw from the country. He returned to Canaan richer than when he left it, "in cattle, in silver, and in gold" ( Genesis 12:8 ;  13:2.  Comp.  Psalm 105:13 ,  14). The whole party then moved northward, and returned to their previous station near Bethel. Here disputes arose between Lot's shepherds and those of Abram about water and pasturage. Abram generously gave Lot his choice of the pasture-ground. (Comp.  1 Corinthians 6:7. ) He chose the well-watered plain in which Sodom was situated, and removed thither; and thus the uncle and nephew were separated. Immediately after this Abram was cheered by a repetition of the promises already made to him, and then removed to the plain or "oak-grove" of Mamre, which is in Hebron. He finally settled here, pitching his tent under a famous oak or terebinth tree, called "the oak of Mamre" ( Genesis 13:18 ). This was his third resting-place in the land. Some fourteen years before this, while Abram was still in Chaldea, Palestine had been invaded by Chedorlaomer, King of Elam, who brought under tribute to him the five cities in the plain to which Lot had removed. This tribute was felt by the inhabitants of these cities to be a heavy burden, and after twelve years they revolted. This brought upon them the vengeance of Chedorlaomer, who had in league with him four other kings. He ravaged the whole country, plundering the towns, and carrying the inhabitants away as slaves. Among those thus treated was Lot. Hearing of the disaster that had fallen on his nephew, Abram immediately gathered from his own household a band of 318 armed men, and being joined by the Amoritish chiefs Mamre, Aner, and Eshcol, he pursued after Chedorlaomer, and overtook him near the springs of the Jordan. They attacked and routed his army, and pursued it over the range of Anti-Libanus as far as to Hobah, near Damascus, and then returned, bringing back all the spoils that had been carried away. Returning by way of Salem, i.e., Jerusalem, the king of that place, Melchizedek, came forth to meet them with refreshments. To him Abram presented a tenth of the spoils, in recognition of his character as a priest of the most high God ? Genesis 14:18 -20). In a recently-discovered tablet, dated in the reign of the grandfather of Amraphel ( Genesis 14:1 ), one of the witnesses is called "the Amorite, the son of Abiramu," or Abram. Having returned to his home at Mamre, the promises already made to him by God were repeated and enlarged ( Genesis 13:14 ). "The word of the Lord" (an expression occurring here for the first time) "came to him" ( 15:1 ). He now understood better the future that lay before the nation that was to spring from him. Sarai, now seventy-five years old, in her impatience, persuaded Abram to take Hagar, her Egyptian maid, as a concubine, intending that whatever child might be born should be reckoned as her own. Ishmael was accordingly thus brought up, and was regarded as the heir of these promises ( Genesis 16 ). When Ishmael was thirteen years old, God again revealed yet more explicitly and fully his gracious purpose; and in token of the sure fulfilment of that purpose the patriarch's name was now changed from Abram to Abraham ( Genesis 17:4 , 5), and the rite of circumcision was instituted as a sign of the covenant. It was then announced that the heir to these covenant promises would be the son of Sarai, though she was now ninety years old; and it was directed that his name should be Isaac. At the same time, in commemoration of the promises, Sarai's name was changed to Sarah. On that memorable day of God's thus revealing his design, Abraham and his son Ishmael and all the males of his house were circumcised ( Genesis 17 ). Three months after this, as Abraham sat in his tent door, he saw three men approaching. They accepted his proffered hospitality, and, seated under an oak-tree, partook of the fare which Abraham and Sarah provided. One of the three visitants was none other than the Lord, and the other two were angels in the guise of men. The Lord renewed on this occasion his promise of a son by Sarah, who was rebuked for her unbelief. Abraham accompanied the three as they proceeded on their journey. The two angels went on toward Sodom; while the Lord tarried behind and talked with Abraham, making known to him the destruction that was about to fall on that guilty city. The patriarch interceded earnestly in behalf of the doomed city. But as not even ten righteous persons were found in it, for whose sake the city would have been spared, the threatened destruction fell upon it; and early next morning Abraham saw the smoke of the fire that consumed it as the "smoke of a furnace" ( Genesis 19:1 -28). After fifteen years' residence at Mamre, Abraham moved southward, and pitched his tent among the Philistines, near to Gerar. Here occurred that sad instance of prevarication on his part in his relation to Abimelech the King ( Genesis 20 ). (see  ABIMELECH .) Soon after this event, the patriarch left the vicinity of Gerar, and moved down the fertile valley about 25 miles to Beer-sheba. It was probably here that Isaac was born, Abraham being now an hundred years old. A feeling of jealousy now arose between Sarah and Hagar, whose son, Ishmael, was no longer to be regarded as Abraham's heir. Sarah insisted that both Hagar and her son should be sent away. This was done, although it was a hard trial to Abraham ( Genesis 21:12 ). (see  HAGAR ; ISHMAEL.) At this point there is a blank in the patriarch's history of perhaps twenty-five years. These years of peace and happiness were spent at Beer-sheba. The next time we see him his faith is put to a severe test by the command that suddenly came to him to go and offer up Isaac, the heir of all the promises, as a sacrifice on one of the mountains of Moriah. His faith stood the test ( Hebrews 11:17 -19). He proceeded in a spirit of unhesitating obedience to carry out the command; and when about to slay his son, whom he had laid on the altar, his uplifted hand was arrested by the angel of Jehovah, and a ram, which was entangled in a thicket near at hand, was seized and offered in his stead. From this circumstance that place was called Jehovah-jireh, i.e., "The Lord will provide." The promises made to Abraham were again confirmed (and this was the last recorded word of God to the patriarch); and he descended the mount with his son, and returned to his home at Beer-sheba ( Genesis 22:19 ), where he resided for some years, and then moved northward to Hebron. Some years after this Sarah died at Hebron, being 127 years old. Abraham acquired now the needful possession of a burying-place, the cave of Machpelah, by purchase from the owner of it, Ephron the Hittite ( Genesis 23 ); and there he buried Sarah. His next care was to provide a wife for Isaac, and for this purpose he sent his steward, Eliezer, to Haran (or Charran,   Acts 7:2 ), where his brother Nahor and his family resided ( Genesis 11:31 ). The result was that Rebekah, the daughter of Nahor's son Bethuel, became the wife of Isaac ( Genesis 24 ). Abraham then himself took to wife Keturah, who became the mother of six sons, whose descendants were afterwards known as the "children of the east" ( Judges 6:3 ), and later as "Saracens." At length all his wanderings came to an end. At the age of 175 years, 100 years after he had first entered the land of Canaan, he died, and was buried in the old family burying-place at Machpelah ( Genesis 25:7 -10). The history of Abraham made a wide and deep impression on the ancient world, and references to it are interwoven in the religious traditions of almost all Eastern nations. He is called "the friend of God" ( James 2:23 ), "faithful Abraham" ( Galatians 3:9 ), "the father of us all" ( Romans 4:16 )
ARZA|   ARZA  ar'-za ('artsa'): A steward of King Elah, in whose house at Tirzah Zimri murdered the king at a drinking debauch. The text is not quite clear, and Arza might have been a servant of Zimri ( 1 Kings 16:9 ).
ABIJAH|Father (i.e.,  "possessor or worshipper") of Jehovah.  (1.)  1 Chronicles 7:8 .  (2.)  1 Chronicles 2:24 . (3.) The second son of Samuel ( 1 Samuel 8:2 ;  1 Chronicles 6:28 ). His conduct, along with that of his brother, as a judge in Beer-sheba, to which office his father had appointed him, led to popular discontent, and ultimately provoked the people to demand a royal form of government. (4.) A descendant of Eleazar, the son of Aaron, a chief of one of the twenty-four orders into which the priesthood was divided by David ( 1 Chronicles 24:10 ). The order of Abijah was one of those which did not return from the Captivity ( Ezra 2:36 -39;  Nehemiah 7:39 -42;  12:1 ). (5.) The son of Rehoboam, whom he succeeded on the throne of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 3:10 ). He is also called Abijam ( 1 Kings 14:31 ;  15:1 -8). He began his three years' reign ( 2 Chronicles 12:16 ;  13:1 , 2) with a strenuous but unsuccessful effort to bring back the ten tribes to their allegiance. His address to "Jeroboam and all Israel," before encountering them in battle, is worthy of being specially noticed ( 2 Chronicles 13:5 -12). It was a very bloody battle, no fewer than 500,000 of the army of Israel having perished on the field. He is described as having walked "in all the sins of his father" ( 1 Kings 15:3 ;  2 Chronicles 11:20 -22). It is said in  1 Kings 15:2  that "his mother's name was Maachah, the daughter of Abishalom;" but in  2 Chronicles 13:2  we read, "his mother's name was Michaiah, the daughter of Uriel of Gibeah." The explanation is that Maachah is just a variation of the name Michaiah, and that Abishalom is probably the same as Absalom, the son of David. It is probable that "Uriel of Gibeah" married Tamar, the daughter of Absalom ( 2 Samuel 14:27 ), and by her had Maachah. The word "daughter" in  1 Kings 15:2  will thus, as it frequently elsewhere does, mean grand-daughter. (6.) A son of Jeroboam, the first king of Israel. On account of his severe illness when a youth, his father sent his wife to consult the prophet Ahijah regarding his recovery. The prophet, though blind with old age, knew the wife of Jeroboam as soon as she approached, and under a divine impulse he announced to her that inasmuch as in Abijah alone of all the house of Jeroboam there was found "some good thing toward the Lord," he only would come to his grave in peace. As his mother crossed the threshold of the door on her return, the youth died, and "all Israel mourned for him" ( 1 Kings 14:1 -18). (7.) The daughter of Zechariah ( 2 Chronicles 29:1 ; Comp.  Isaiah 8:2 ), and afterwards the wife of Ahaz. She is also called Abi ( 2 Kings 18:2 ). (8.) One of the sons of Becher, the son of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 7:8 ). "Abiah," A.V. 
ASHURITES|Mentioned among those over whom Ish-bosheth was made king ( 2 Samuel 2:9 ). 
ADAMINEKEB|   ADAMI-NEKEB  ad'-a-mi ne'-keb 'adhami ha-neqebh, "the ground of the piercing," (that is of the pass, or defile): A place mentioned in indicating the border of Naphtali ( Joshua 19:33 ). In the King James Version, Adami and Nekeb are given as separate names, and it is an open question which view of the matter is correct. Most of the Greek texts give the names as two. The Vulgate has "Adami quae est Neceb." The Jerusalem Talmud gives two names, though instead of Hannekeb or Nekeb it has Siyadathah (Meg 1 1, or Neubauer's Geog du Talmud, 225). In the list of places conquered by Thothmes III of Egypt occurs the name NQBU (Tomkins, Rec of Past, new series, V, 47), which seems to be the same with Neqeb.  The list of names for the border of Naphtali ( Joshua 19:33, 34 ) has no name in common with the list of cities ( Joshua 19:35-38 ) unless Adami and Adamah are the same. The PE Survey maps locate Adamah at Damieh, about seven miles northwest of the exit of the Jordan from the Lake of Galilee, and Adami at Khurbet Adamah, five or six miles south of the exit. Conder, Tomkins and others place Adami at Damieh, and identify Nekeb by its Talmudic name in the neighboring ruin Seiyadeh. Conder says (art. "Nekeb," HDB) that the "pass" implied in the name Nekeb "is probably one leading from the eastern precipices near Tiberias."  Willis J. Beecher
AHIO|Brotherly.  (1.) One of the sons of Beriah ( 1 Chronicles 8:14 ). (2.) One of the sons of Jehiel the Gibeonite ( 1 Chronicles 8:31 ;  9:37 ). (3.) One of the sons of Abinadab the Levite. While Uzzah went by the side of the ark, he walked before it guiding the oxen which drew the cart on which it was carried, after having brought it from his father's house in Gibeah ( 1 Chronicles 13:7 ;  2 Samuel 6:3 ,  4). 
AZEM|   AZEM  a'-zem: the King James Version form for Ezem (thus the Revised Version (British and American)) ( Joshua 15:29 ;  Joshua 19:3 ).
ALEXANDRIA|The ancient metropolis of Lower Egypt, so called from its founder, Alexander the Great (about B.C. 333). It was for a long period the greatest of existing cities, for both Nineveh and Babylon had been destroyed, and Rome had not yet risen to greatness. It was the residence of the kings of Egypt for 200 years. It is not mentioned in the Old Testament, and only incidentally in the New. Apollos, eloquent and mighty in the Scriptures, was a native of this city ( Acts 18:24 ). Many Jews from Alexandria were in Jerusalem, where they had a synagogue ( Acts 6:9 ), at the time of Stephen's martyrdom. At one time it is said that as many as 10,000 Jews resided in this city. It possessed a famous library of 700,000 volumes, which was burned by the Saracens (A.D. 642). It was here that the Hebrew Bible was translated into Greek. This is called the Septuagint version, from the tradition that seventy learned men were engaged in executing it. It was, however, not all translated at one time. It was begun B.C. 280, and finished about B.C. 200 or 150. (see  VERSION .) 
ASHERITES|   ASHERITES  ash'-er-its (ha-'asheri): The descendants of Asher, Jacob's eighth son ( Judges 1:32 ).
ABISHUR|Father of the wall; i.e., "mason", one of the two sons of Shammai of the tribe of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:28 , 29). 
ASIEL|   ASIEL  a'-si-el, as'-i-el (Asiel; the King James Version Asael (Tobit 1:1)):  (1) Grandfather of Jehu, one of the Simeonite "princes" mentioned in  1 Chronicles 4:35  as sharing Judah's inheritance (see  Joshua 19:9 ).  (2) A swift writer engaged by Ezra to transcribe the law (2 Esdras 14:24).  (3) An ancestor of Tobit (Tobit 1:1). Compare Jahzeel or Jahziel ( Genesis 46:24 ).
APPHIA|Increasing, a female Christian at Colosse ( Philemon 1:2 ), supposed by some to have been the wife of Philemon. 
ADONIRAM|(Adoram,   1 Kings 12:18 ), the son of Abda, was "over the tribute," i.e., the levy or forced labour. He was stoned to death by the people of Israel ( 1 Kings 4:6 ;  5:14 ) 
ABELCHERAMIM|( Judges 11:33 ,  R.V.; A. V.,  "plain of the vineyards"), a village of the Ammonites, whither Jephthah pursued their forces. 
AVIM|A people dwelling in Hazerim, or "the villages" or "encampments" on the south-west corner of the sea-coast ( Deuteronomy 2:23 ). They were subdued and driven northward by the Caphtorim. A trace of them is afterwards found in  Joshua 13:3 , where they are called Avites. 
ANER|A boy.  (1.) A Canaanitish chief who joined his forces with those of Abraham in pursuit of Chedorlaomer ( Genesis 14:13 , 24). (2.) A city of Manasseh given to the Levites of Kohath's family ( 1 Chronicles 6:70 ). 
ARIDATHA|   ARIDATHA  ar-i-da'-tha, a-rid'-a-tha ('aridhatha'): A son of Haman ( Esther 9:8 ). It may be related to the Persian Hari-data, "given by Hari." The Septuagint reads Pharadatha.
ALEMETH|Covering.  (1.) One of the nine sons of Becher, the son of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 7:8 ). (2.) One of the sons of Jehoadah, or Jarah, son of Ahaz ( 1 Chronicles 8:36 ). (3.) A sacerdotal city of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 6:60 ), called also Almon ( Joshua 21:18 ), now Almit, a mile north-east of the ancient Anathoth. 
AMMINADAB|Kindred of the prince.  (1.) The father of Nahshon, who was chief of the tribe of Judah ( Numbers 1:7 ;  2:3 ;  7:12 ,  17;  10:14 ). His daughter Elisheba was married to Aaron ( Exodus 6:23 ). (2.) A son of Kohath, the second son of Levi ( 1 Chronicles 6:22 ), called also Izhar (2,  18). (3.) Chief of the 112 descendants of Uzziel the Levite ( 1 Chronicles 15:10 ,  11). 
APHEKAH|   APHEKAH  a-fe'-ka ('apheqah, "force" or "strength"): A city in the hill country of Judah ( Joshua 15:53 ).
AMZI|   AMZI  am'-zi (`amtsi, "my strength"):  (1) A Levite of the family of Merari ( 1 Chronicles 6:46 ).  (2) A priest of the family of Adaiah in the second temple. His father's name was Zechariah ( Nehemiah 11:12 ).
ABILENE|A plain, a district lying on the east slope of the Anti-Lebanon range; so called from its chief town, Abila ( Luke 3:1 ), which stood in the Suk Wady Barada, between Heliopolis (Baalbec) and Damascus, 38 miles from the former and 18 from the latter. Lysanias was governor or tetrarch of this province. 
ARELI|   ARELI  a-re'-li ('ar'eli, apparently the gentilic form of a compound that would mean "God's lioness," or "God's hearth"): One of the sons of Gad the son of Jacob ( Genesis 46:16   Numbers 26:17 ). "Arelites" (which see) is exactly the same word.
ADULLAM|One of the royal cities of the Canaanites, now `Aid-el-ma ( Joshua 12:15 ;  15:35 ). It stood on the old Roman road in the valley of Elah (q.v.), which was the scene of David's memorable victory over Goliath ( 1 Samuel 17:2 ), and not far from Gath. It was one of the towns which Rehoboam fortified against Egypt ( 2 Chronicles 11:7 ). It was called "the glory of Israel" ( Micah 1:15 ). The Cave of Adullam has been discovered about 2 miles south of the scene of David's triumph, and about 13 miles west from Bethlehem. At this place is a hill some 500 feet high pierced with numerous caverns, in one of which David gathered together "every one that was in distress, and every one that was in debt, and every one that was discontented" ( 1 Samuel 22:2 ). Some of these caverns are large enough to hold 200 or 300 men. According to tradition this cave was at Wady Khureitun, between Bethlehem and the Dead Sea, but this view cannot be well maintained. 
AMON|Builder.  (1.) The governor of Samaria in the time of Ahab. The prophet Micaiah was committed to his custody ( 1 Kings 22:26 ;  2 Chronicles 18:25 ). (2.) The son of Manasseh, and fourteenth king of Judah. He restored idolatry, and set up the images which his father had cast down. Zephaniah ( 1:4 ;  3:4 ,  11) refers to the moral depravity prevailing in this king's reign. He was assassinated ( 2 Kings 21:18 -26:  2 Chronicles 33:20 -25) by his own servants, who conspired against him. (3.) An Egyptian god, usually depicted with a human body and the head of a ram, referred to in  Jeremiah 46:25 , where the word "multitudes" in the Authorized Version is more appropriately rendered "Amon" in the Revised Version. In Nahum 3:8 the expression "populous No" of the Authorized version is rendered in the Revised Version "No-amon." Amon is identified with Ra, the sun-god of Heliopolis. (4.)  Nehemiah 7:59 . 
AZGAD|   AZGAD  az'-gad (`azgadh, "strong is Gad"): In the list of those who returned from Babylon with Zerubbabel are mentioned "the children of Azgad" (1,222,  Ezra 2:12 ; 2,322,  Nehemiah 7:17 ). 110 males with their chief returned with Ezra ( Ezra 8:12 ). Azgad was among the leaders who signed the Covenant after Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 10:15 ).
ANAMMELECH|One of the gods worshipped by the people of Sepharvaim, who colonized Samaria ( 2 Kings 17:31 ). The name means "Anu is king." It was a female deity representing the moon, as Adrammelech (q.v.) was the male representing the sun. 
ANTOTHIJAH|   ANTOTHIJAH  an-to-thi'-ja. See  ANTHOTHIJAH .
AIJELETH|Aijeleth Shahar: Hind of the dawn, a name found in the title of  Psalm 22 . It is probably the name of some song or tune to the measure of which the psalm was to be chanted. Some, however, understand by the name some instrument of music, or an allegorical allusion to the subject of the psalm. 
AMOS|Borne; a burden, one of the twelve minor prophets. He was a native of Tekota, the modern Tekua, a town about 12 miles south-east of Bethlehem. He was a man of humble birth, neither a "prophet nor a prophet's son," but "an herdman and a dresser of sycomore trees," R.V. He prophesied in the days of Uzziah, king of Judah, and was contemporary with Isaiah and Hosea ( Amos 1:1 ;  7:14 ,  15;  Zechariah 14:5 ), who survived him a few years. Under Jeroboam II. the kingdom of Israel rose to the zenith of its prosperity; but that was followed by the prevalence of luxury and vice and idolatry. At this period Amos was called from his obscurity to remind the people of the law of God's retributive justice, and to call them to repentance. The Book of Amos consists of three parts: (1.) The nations around are summoned to judgment because of their sins ( 1:1 - 2:3 ). He quotes  Joel 3:16 . (2.) The spiritual condition of Judah, and especially of Israel, is described ( 2:4 - 6:14 ). (3.) In 7:1-9:10 are recorded five prophetic visions. (a) The first two ( 7:1 -6) refer to judgments against the guilty people. (b) The next two ( 7:7 -9;  8:1 -3) point out the ripeness of the people for the threatened judgements. 7:10-17 consists of a conversation between the prophet and the priest of Bethel. (c) The fifth describes the overthrow and ruin of Israel ( 9:1 -10); to which is added the promise of the restoration of the kingdom and its final glory in the Messiah's kingdom. The style is peculiar in the number of the allusions made to natural objects and to agricultural occupations. Other allusions show also that Amos was a student of the law as well as a "child of nature." These phrases are peculiar to him: "Cleanness of teeth" [i.e., want of bread] ( 4:6 ); "The excellency of Jacob" ( 6:8 ;  8:7 ); "The high places of Isaac" ( 7:9 ); "The house of Isaac" ( 7:16 ); "He that createth the wind" ( 4:13 ). Quoted,  Acts 7:42 . 
ASHPENAZ|The master of the eunuchs of Nebuchadnezzar ( Dan. 1:3 ), the "Rabsaris" of the court. His position was similar to that of the Kislar-aga of the modern Turkish sultans. 
ABDIEL|Servant of God, ( 1 Chronicles 5:15 ), a Gadite chief. 
ASAREEL|   ASAREEL  a-sa'-re-el, a-sar'-e-el. See  ASAREL .
ABANA|Stony (Hebrews marg. "Amanah, " perennial), the chief river of Damascus ( 2 Kings 5:12 ). Its modern name is Barada, the Chrysorrhoas, or "golden stream," of the Greeks. It rises in a cleft of the Anti-Lebanon range, about 23 miles north-west of Damascus, and after flowing southward for a little way parts into three smaller streams, the central one flowing through Damascus, and the other two on each side of the city, diffusing beauty and fertility where otherwise there would be barrenness. 
ADDAN|   ADDAN  ad'-an ('addan; in Ne 'addon; connected in some way with the name of the god Addu): A name mentioned in the list of the returning exiles ( Ezra 2:59 , duplicated in  Nehemiah 7:61 ). It is one of several names of Babylonian localities from which came men who were unable to declare their genealogy as Israelites.
ARODI|   ARODI  ar'-o-di. See  AROD .
AHUZZATH|   AHUZZATH  a-huz'-ath ('achuzzath, "possession"): A "friend" perhaps a minister, of Abimelech, king of Gerar. He together with Phicol, commander of the army, accompanied their sovereign to Beersheba to make a covenant with Isaac ( Genesis 26:26 ). The termination "-ath" reminds us of Philistine proper names, such as Gath, Goliath, etc. Compare Genubath ( 1 Kings 11:20 ).
AMPLIATUS|   AMPLIATUS  am-pli-a'-tus (Ampliatos, Codex Sinaiticus, A,B,F, Ampliatus; Amplias, D,E,L,P, the Revised Version (British and American) form; the King James Version Amplias): The name of a member of the Christian community at Rome, to whom Paul sent greetings ( Romans 16:8 ). He is designated "my beloved in the Lord." It is a common name and is found in inscriptions connected with the imperial household. The name is found twice in the cemetery of Domitilla. The earlier inscription is over a cell which belongs to the end of the 1st century or the beginning of the 2nd century. The bearer of this name was probably a member of her household and conspicuous in the early Christian church in Rome.
AHAZ|Possessor.  (1.) A grandson of Jonathan ( 1 Chronicles 8:35 ;  9:42 ). (2.) The son and successor of Jotham, king of Judah ( 2 Kings 16 ;  Isaiah 7 -9;  2 Chronicles 28 ). He gave himself up to a life of wickedness and idolatry. Notwithstanding the remonstrances and warnings of Isaiah, Hosea, and Micah, he appealed for help against Rezin, king of Damascus, and Pekah, king of Israel, who threatened Jerusalem, to Tiglath-pileser, the king of Assyria, to the great injury of his kingdom and his own humilating subjection to the Assyrians ( 2 Kings 16:7 ,  9;  15:29 ). He also introduced among his people many heathen and idolatrous customs ( Isaiah 8:19 ;  38:8 ;  2 Kings 23:12 ). He died at the age of thirty-five years, after reigning sixteen years (B.C. 740-724), and was succeeded by his son Hezekiah. Because of his wickedness he was "not brought into the sepulchre of the kings." 
AZAREL|   AZAREL  az'-a-rel `azarel, ("God is helper"; the King James Version reads Azareel in numbers 1-5, Azarael in numbers 6):  (1) A Korahite who entered the army of David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:6 ).  (2) A musician in the temple appointed by lot; son of Heman ( 1 Chronicles 25:18 ; compare Uzziel,  1 Chronicles 25:4 ).  (3) A captain of the tribe of Dan in the service of David ( 1 Chronicles 27:22 ).  (4) One of those who had "strange wives," a son of Bani ( Ezra 10:41 ).  (5) The father of Amashai, a priest who dwelt in Jerusalem after the Exile ( Nehemiah 11:13 ).  (6) A priest's son who played the trumpet in the procession when the wall was dedicated ( Nehemiah 12:36 ).  A. L. Breslich
ASHKELONITES|   ASHKELONITES  ash'-ke-lon-its ( Joshua 13:3 ): The people of Ashkelon, who were Philistines.
ARISAI|   ARISAI  ar'-i-sai, a-ris'-a-i ('aricai): Probably a Persian word of unknown meaning. One of Haman's sons, slain by the Jews ( Esther 9:9 ).
ABIAH|   ABIA; ABIAH  a-bi'-a, a-bi'-ah: Variants for ABIJAH; which see.
ALIAN|   ALIAN  a-li'-an (`alyan): A descendant of Esau, and son of Shobal ( 1 Chronicles 1:40 ). In the corresponding earlier genealogy ( Genesis 36:23 ) the same person is given as Alvan (`alwan), the change of the third consonant being a simple one, common to Hebrew, occurring similarly in Aliah (which see). Alian is not to be identified with Aliah, since the groups of names in which these occur are quite different, and the context in each case is not the same.
ADONAI|   ADONAI  a-do'-ni, ad-o-na'-i ('adhonay): A Divine name, translated "Lord," and signifying, from its derivation, "sovereignty." Its vowels are found in the Massoretic Text with the unpronounceable tetragrammaton YHWH; and when the Hebrew reader came to these letters, he always substituted in pronunciation the word " 'adhonay." Its vowels combined with the tetragrammaton form the word "Yahweh (Yahweh)."  See  GOD, NAMES OF .
AGES|   AGES, ROCK OF  Applied to Yahweh as an encouragement for trust ( Isaiah 26:4  the Revised Version, margin; the King James Version "everlasting strength").  ROCK OF AGES  See  AGES, ROCK OF ;  ISAIAH, VII .
AMALEK|Dweller in a valley, the son of Eliphaz and grandson of Esau ( Genesis 36:12 ;  1 Chronicles 1:36 ); the chief of an Idumean tribe ( Genesis 36:16 ). His mother was a Horite, a tribe whose territory the descendants of Esau had seized. 
AMMONITESS|   AMMONITESS  am-on-i'-tes, a-mon'-i-tes (`ammonith): A woman of the Ammonites, Naamah, the mother of Rehoboam ( 1 Kings 14:21, 31   2 Chronicles 12:13 ;  2 Chronicles 24:26 ).
ARISTARCHUS|Best ruler, native of Thessalonica ( Acts 20:4 ), a companion of Paul ( Acts 19:29 ;  27:2 ). He was Paul's "fellow-prisoner" at Rome ( Colossians 4:10 ;  Philemon 1:24 ). 
ABANAH|   ABANAH  ab'-a-na, a-ba'-na ('abhanah (Kethibh, Septuagint, Vulgate)), or AMANA a-ma'-na ('amanah (Qere, Peshitta, Targum); the King James Version Abana (American Standard Revised Version, margin Amana), the Revised Version (British and American) ABANAH (Revised Version, margin Amanah)): Mentioned in  2 Kings 5:12 , along with the PHARPAR (which see), as one of the principal rivers of Damascus. The reading Amana (meaning possibly the "constant," or perennial stream) is on the whole preferable. Both forms of the name may have been in use, as the interchange of an aspirated b (bh = v) and m is not without parallel (compare Evil-merodach = Amilmarduk).  The Abanah is identified with the Chrysorrhoas ("golden stream") of the Greeks, the modern Nahr Barada (the "cold"), which rises in the Anti-Lebanon, one of its sources, the Ain Barada, being near the village of Zebedani, and flows in a southerly and then southeasterly direction toward Damascus. A few miles southeast of Suk Wady Barada (the ancient Abila; see ABILENE) the volume of the stream is more than doubled by a torrent of clear, cold water from the beautifully situated spring `Ain Fijeh (Greek pege, "fountain"), after which it flows through a picturesque gorge till it reaches Damascus, whose many fountains and gardens it supplies liberally with water. In the neighborhood of Damascus a number of streams branch off from the parent river, and spread out like an opening fan on the surrounding plain. The Barada, along with the streams which it feeds, loses itself in the marshes of the Meadow Lakes about 18 miles East of the city.  The water of the Barada, though not perfectly wholesome in the city itself, is for the most part clear and cool; its course is picturesque, and its value to Damascus, as the source alike of fertility and of charm, is inestimable.  C. H. Thomson
ALIAH|   ALIAH  a-li'-a (`alyah): One of the dukes, or heads of thousands of Edom ( 1 Chronicles 1:51 ). In  Genesis 36:40  the name is Alvah (`alwah), the only difference being the change of the weaker w, of Genesis to the somewhat stronger, y, of the later Chronicles, a change which is not infrequent in Hebrew. He is not to be confused, as in HDB, with the Alian of the same chapter.
ARAMITESS|   ARAMITESS  ar-am-it'-es, ar'-am-it-es, ar'-am-it-es ('arammiyah): The term applied to the concubine-mother of Machir, the father of Gilead ( 1 Chronicles 7:14 ); the inhabitants of Gilead were thus in part Arameans (Syrians) by descent.
ADRIA|( Acts 27:27 ; R.V.,  "the sea of Adria"), the Adriatic Sea, including in Paul's time the whole of the Mediterranean lying between Crete and Sicily. It is the modern Gulf of Venice, the Mare Superum_ of the Romans, as distinguished from the Mare Inferum_ or Tyrrhenian Sea. 
AVITES|   AVVIM; AVITES  av'-im a'-vits `awwim; Heuaioi, also unaspirated; (also used to represent the name of the Hivites): The early inhabitants of the southern extremity of Canaan afterward occupied by the Philistines ( Deuteronomy 2:23 ; compare Jos 13:3, 4, the King James Version "Avim," a'-vim).  The Avvim of  Joshua 18:23  was a town of Benjamin, not a people. Gesenius supposes the name to mean "dwellers in the desert," but it was more probably the name of some pre-Sem tribe. The Avvim are described as living in Chatserim or "encampments" and extending as far as the outskirts of Gaza.  AVITES  a'-vits. See  AVVIM .
ALEXANDER|Alexander Man-defender.  (1.) A relative of Annas the high priest, present when Peter and John were examined before the Sanhedrim ( Acts 4:6 ). (2.) A man whose father, Simon the Cyrenian, bore the cross of Christ ( Mark 15:21 ). (3.) A Jew of Ephesus who took a prominent part in the uproar raised there by the preaching of Paul ( Acts 19:33 ). The Jews put him forward to plead their cause before the mob. It was probably intended that he should show that he and the other Jews had no sympathy with Paul any more than the Ephesians had. It is possible that this man was the same as the following. (4.) A coppersmith who, with Hymenaeus and others, promulgated certain heresies regarding the resurrection ( 1 Timothy 1:19 ;  2 Timothy 4:14 ), and made shipwreck of faith and of a good conscience. Paul excommunicated him ( 1 Timothy 1:20 ; Comp.  1 Corinthians 5:5 ). Alexander the Great The king of Macedonia, the great conqueror; probably represented in Daniel by the "belly of brass" ( Dan. 2:32 ), and the leopard and the he-goat ( 7:6 ;  11:3 , 4). He succeeded his father Philip, and died at the age of thirty-two from the effects of intemperance, B.C. 323. His empire was divided among his four generals. 
ANATH|An answer; i.e., to "prayer", the father of Shamgar, who was one of the judges of Israel ( Judges 3:31 ). 
ACHAR|   ACHAR  a'-kar: Variant of ACHAN, which see.
ASAIAH|   ASAIAH  a-sa'-ya ([`asayah], "Yahweh has made," written Asahiah twice in the King James Version ( 2 Kings 22:12, 14 )):  (1) A Levite of the family of Merari, and one of those who helped bring the ark from the house of Obed-edom to Jerusalem ( 1 Chronicles 6:30 ;  1 Chronicles 15:6, 11 ).  (2) A leading man of the tribe of Simeon. He was in the incursion which attacked and dispossessed the MEUNIM (which see), or the shepherd people, in the valley of Gedor ( 1 Chronicles 4:36 ).  (3) An officer of Josiah sent to Huldah the prophetess for advice regarding the law book found by Hilkiah ( 2 Kings 22:12, 14 ; see ASAHIAH).  (4) A Shilonite resident of Jerusalem ( 1 Chronicles 9:5 ). He is called Maaseiah in  Nehemiah 11:5 .  W. W. Davis
AHOAH|Brotherly, one of the sons of Bela, the son of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:4 ). He is also called Ahiah (ver. 7) and Iri ( 1 Chronicles 7:7 ). His descendants were called Ahohites ( 2 Samuel 23:9 ,  28). 
ADONIKAM|Whom the Lord sets up, one of those "which came with Zerubbabel" ( Ezra 2:13 ). His "children," or retainers, to the number of 666, came up to Jerusalem ( 8:13 ). 
AHISHAHAR|   AHISHAHAR  a-hish'-a-har ('achishachar, "brother of dawn"): One of the sons of Bilhan, the son of Jediael, the son of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 7:10 ).
ASSIR|   ASSIR  as'-er (accir, "captive"):  (1) A Levite of the family of Korah ( Exodus 6:24   1 Chronicles 6:22 ).  (2) A son of Ebiasaph and grandson of Assir. Samuel was descended from him ( 1 Chronicles 6:23 ).  (3) A son of Jeconiah, king of Judah, according to the King James Version and the Revised Version, margin and the American Revised Version, margin. It is a question whether the Assir of this passage ( 1 Chronicles 3:17 ) is not a common adjective modifying Jeconiah. The the American Standard Revised Version and the Revised Version (British and American) render it "the captive." It is to be noticed, however, that there is no definite article in the Hebrew.
ABITUB|Father of goodness, a Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 8:11 ). 
ANCESTORS|   ANCESTORS  an'-ses-ters (ri'shonim, "first ones"): The word ancestor appears in the English Bible only once ( Leviticus 26:45 ). The Hebrew word, the ordinary adjective "first," occurs more than 200 times, and in a few places might fairly be rendered ancestors (e.g.  Deuteronomy 19:14   Jeremiah 11:10 ). In speaking of ancestors the Old Testament ordinarily uses the word for "fathers" ('abhoth).
ASHAN|   ASHAN  a'-shan (`ashan): An unknown site in the domain of Judah ( Joshua 15:42 ), possessed by Simeon ( Joshua 19:7 ), and mentioned among the priests' cities in  1 Chronicles 6:59 . (44) =  Joshua 21:16  (`ayin is a corruption of `ashan). Chorashan (or Borashan), which was probably the site of some reservoir in the Southwest part of Judah ( 1 Samuel 30:30 ), is the same as Ashan.
ARTAXERXES|The Greek form of the name of several Persian kings.  (1.) The king who obstructed the rebuilding of the temple ( Ezra 4:7 ). He was probably the Smerdis of profane history. (2.) The king mentioned in  Ezra 7:1 , in the seventh year (B.C. 458) of whose reign Ezra led a second colony of Jews back to Jerusalem, was probably Longimanus, who reigned for forty years (B.C. 464-425); the grandson of Darius, who, fourteen years later, permitted Nehemiah to return and rebuild Jerusalem. 
ABELSHITTIM|Meadow of the acacias, frequently called simply "Shittim" ( Numbers 25:1 ;  Joshua 2:1 ;  Micah 6:5 ), a place on the east of Jordan, in the plain of Moab, nearly opposite Jericho. It was the forty-second encampment of the Israelites, their last resting-place before they crossed the Jordan ( Numbers 33:49 ;  22:1 ;  26:3 ;  31:12 ; Comp.  25:1 ;  31:16 ). 
ADULLAMITE|An inhabitant of the city of Adullam ( Genesis 38:1 ,  12,  20). 
ARMONI|Inhabitant of a fortress, the first-named of the two sons of Saul and Rizpah. He was delivered up to the Gibeonites by David, and hanged by them ( 2 Samuel 21:8 ,  9). 
ACTS|Acts of the Apostles The title now given to the fifth and last of the historical books of the New Testament. The author styles it a "treatise" ( 1:1 ). It was early called "The Acts," "The Gospel of the Holy Ghost," and "The Gospel of the Resurrection." It contains properly no account of any of the apostles except Peter and Paul. John is noticed only three times; and all that is recorded of James, the son of Zebedee, is his execution by Herod. It is properly therefore not the history of the "Acts of the Apostles," a title which was given to the book at a later date, but of "Acts of Apostles," or more correctly, of "Some Acts of Certain Apostles." As regards its authorship, it was certainly the work of Luke, the "beloved physician" (Comp.  Luke 1:1 -4;  Acts 1:1 ). This is the uniform tradition of antiquity, although the writer nowhere makes mention of himself by name. The style and idiom of the Gospel of Luke and of the Acts, and the usage of words and phrases common to both, strengthen this opinion. The writer first appears in the narrative in 16:11, and then disappears till Paul's return to Philippi two years afterwards, when he and Paul left that place together ( 20:6 ), and the two seem henceforth to have been constant companions to the end. He was certainly with Paul at Rome (28;  Colossians 4:14 ). Thus he wrote a great portion of that history from personal observation. For what lay beyond his own experience he had the instruction of Paul. If, as is very probable, 2 Timothy was written during Paul's second imprisonment at Rome, Luke was with him then as his faithful companion to the last ( 2 Timothy 4:11 ). Of his subsequent history we have no certain information. The design of Luke's Gospel was to give an exhibition of the character and work of Christ as seen in his history till he was taken up from his disciples into heaven; and of the Acts, as its sequel, to give an illustration of the power and working of the gospel when preached among all nations, "beginning at Jerusalem." The opening sentences of the Acts are just an expansion and an explanation of the closing words of the Gospel. In this book we have just a continuation of the history of the church after Christ's ascension. Luke here carries on the history in the same spirit in which he had commenced it. It is only a book of beginnings, a history of the founding of churches, the initial steps in the formation of the Christian society in the different places visited by the apostles. It records a cycle of "representative events." All through the narrative we see the ever-present, all-controlling power of the ever-living Saviour. He worketh all and in all in spreading abroad his truth among men by his Spirit and through the instrumentality of his apostles. The time of the writing of this history may be gathered from the fact that the narrative extends down to the close of the second year of Paul's first imprisonment at Rome. It could not therefore have been written earlier than A.D. 61 or 62, nor later than about the end of A.D. 63. Paul was probably put to death during his second imprisonment, about A.D. 64, or, as some think, 66. The place where the book was written was probably Rome, to which Luke accompanied Paul. The key to the contents of the book is in 1:8, "Ye shall be witnesses unto me both in Jerusalem, and in all Judea, and in Samaria, and unto the uttermost part of the earth." After referring to what had been recorded in a "former treatise" of the sayings and doings of Jesus Christ before his ascension, the author proceeds to give an account of the circumstances connected with that event, and then records the leading facts with reference to the spread and triumphs of Christianity over the world during a period of about thirty years. The record begins with Pentecost (A.D. 33) and ends with Paul's first imprisonment (A.D. 63 or 64). The whole contents of the book may be divided into these three parts: (1.) Chaps. 1-12, describing the first twelve years of the Christian church. This section has been entitled "From Jerusalem to Antioch." It contains the history of the planting and extension of the church among the Jews by the ministry of Peter. (2.) Chaps. 13-21, Paul's missionary journeys, giving the history of the extension and planting of the church among the Gentiles. (3.) Chaps. 21-28, Paul at Rome, and the events which led to this. Chaps. 13-28 have been entitled "From Antioch to Rome." In this book it is worthy of note that no mention is made of the writing by Paul of any of his epistles. This may be accounted for by the fact that the writer confined himself to a history of the planting of the church, and not to that of its training or edification. The relation, however, between this history and the epistles of Paul is of such a kind, i.e., brings to light so many undesigned coincidences, as to prove the genuineness and authenticity of both, as is so ably shown by Paley in his Horae Paulinae. "No ancient work affords so many tests of veracity; for no other has such numerous points of contact in all directions with contemporary history, politics, and topography, whether Jewish, or Greek, or Roman." Lightfoot. (see  PAUL .) 
AHOHITE|An epithet applied to Dodo, one of Solomon's captains ( 1 Chronicles 27:4 ); to his son Eleazar, one of David's three mightiest heroes ( 2 Samuel 23:9 ;  1 Chronicles 11:12 ); and to Zalmon, one of the thirty ( 2 Samuel 23:28 ;  1 Chronicles 11:29 ), from their descent from Ahoah. 
AHIAH|   AHIAH  a-hi'-a: A variant in the King James Version ( 1 Samuel 14:3, 18   1 Kings 4:3   1 Chronicles 8:7 ) for AHIJAH, which see. Also in the Revised Version (British and American) ( Nehemiah 10:26 ).
ASHER|Happy, Jacob's eigth son; his mother was Zilpah, Leah's handmaid ( Genesis 30:13 ). Of the tribe founded by him nothing is recorded beyond its holding a place in the list of the tribes ( 35:26 ;  46:17 ;  Exodus 1:4 ,  etc.) It increased in numbers twenty-nine percent, during the thirty-eight years' wanderings. The place of this tribe during the march through the desert was between Dan and Naphtali ( Numbers 2:27 ). The boundaries of the inheritance given to it, which contained some of the richest soil in Palestine, and the names of its towns, are recorded in  Joshua 19:24 -31;  Judges 1:31 , 32. Asher and Simeon were the only tribes west of the Jordan which furnished no hero or judge for the nation. Anna the prophetess was of this tribe ( Luke 2:36 ). 
ARTEMAS|   ARTEMAS  ar'-te-mas (Artemas): One of the seventy disciples and bishop of Lystra, according to Dorotheus (Bibl. Maxima (Lugd. 1677), III, 429). He is mentioned in Titus 3:12 as one of the faithful companions of Paul. The name is probably Greek, a masculine form of Artemis, or, as has been suggested, a short form of Artemidorus, a common name in Asia Minor. These contracted forms were by no means rare in the Greek world. The Athenian orator, Lysias, was doubtless named after his grandfather, Lysanias, and at first may even have been called Lysanias himself.
ARMOUR|Is employed in the English Bible to denote military equipment, both offensive and defensive. (1.) The offensive weapons were different at different periods of history. The "rod of iron" ( Psalm 2:9 ) is supposed to mean a mace or crowbar, an instrument of great power when used by a strong arm. The "maul" ( Proverbs 25:18 ; cognate Hebrew word rendered "battle-axe" in  Jeremiah 51:20 ,  and "slaughter weapon" in  Ezek. 9:2 ) was a war-hammer or martel. The "sword" is the usual translation of hereb, which properly means "poniard." The real sword, as well as the dirk-sword (which was always double-edged), was also used ( 1 Samuel 17:39 ;  2 Samuel 20:8 ;  1 Kings 20:11 ). The spear was another offensive weapon ( Joshua 8:18 ;  1 Samuel 17:7 ). The javelin was used by light troops ( Numbers 25:7 ,  8;  1 Samuel 13:22 ). Saul threw a javelin at David ( 1 Samuel 19:9 ,  10), and so virtually absolved him from his allegiance. The bow was, however, the chief weapon of offence. The arrows were carried in a quiver, the bow being always unbent till the moment of action ( Genesis 27:3 ;  48:22 ;  Psalm 18:34 ). The sling was a favourite weapon of the Benjamites ( 1 Samuel 17:40 ;  1 Chronicles 12:2.  Comp.  1 Samuel 25:29 ). (2.) Of the defensive armour a chief place is assigned to the shield or buckler. There were the great shield or target (the tzinnah), for the protection of the whole person ( Genesis 15:1 ;  Psalm 47:9 ;  1 Samuel 17:7 ;  Proverbs 30:5 ), and the buckler (Hebrews mageen) or small shield ( 1 Kings 10:17 ;  Ezek. 26:8 ). In  Psalm 91:4  "buckler" is properly a roundel appropriated to archers or slingers. The helmet ( Ezek. 27:10 ;  1 Samuel 17:38 ), a covering for the head; the coat of mail or corselet ( 1 Samuel 17:5 ), or habergeon ( Nehemiah 4 ;16), harness or breat-plate ( Revelation 9:9 ), for the covering of the back and breast and both upper arms ( Isaiah 59:17 ;  Ephesians 6:14 ). The cuirass and corselet, composed of leather or quilted cloth, were also for the covering of the body. Greaves, for the covering of the legs, were worn in the time of David ( 1 Samuel 17:6 ). Reference is made by Paul ( Ephesians 6:14 -17) to the panoply of a Roman soldier. The shield here is the thureon, a door-like oblong shield above all, i.e., covering the whole person, not the small round shield. There is no armour for the back, but only for the front. 
AKELDAMA|   AKELDAMA  a-kel'-da-ma (Akeldama, or, in many manuscripts, Akeldamach; the King James Version, Aceldama): A field said in  Acts 1:19  to have been bought by Judas with the "thirty pieces of silver." In  Matthew 27:6, 7  it is narrated that the priests took the silver pieces which Judas had "cast down. into the sanctuary" and "bought with them the potter's field, to bury strangers in. Wherefore that field was called, The field of blood, unto this day." Doubtless it was a supposed connection between this potter's field and the potter's house ( Jeremiah 18:2 ) and the Valley of the Son of Hinnom ( Jeremiah 19:2 ) which influenced the selection of the present site which, like the Aramaic h-q-l-d-m-' (Dalman), is today known as haqq-ed-dumm, "field of blood."  Tradition, which appears to go back to the 4th century, points to a level platform on, and some distance up, the southern slope of the Wady er Rababi (Valley of Hinnom) just before it joins the Kidron Valley. Upon this spot there is a very remarkable ruin (78 ft. x 57 ft.) which for many centuries was used as a charnel house. The earth here was reputed to have the property of quickly consuming dead bodies. So great was its reputation that vast quantities of it are said to have been transported in 1215 A.D. to the Campo Santo at Pisa.  When this building was standing entire, the bodies were lowered into it through five openings in the roof and then left to disintegrate, so that a few years ago there were very many feet of bones all over the floor. These have now been removed. A little Southeast of this ruin is a new Greek monastery erected in recent years over the remains of a large number of cave tombs; many of the bones from "Akeldama" are now buried here.  E. W. G. Masterman
AZBUK|   AZBUK  az'-buk `azbuk: The father of a certain Nehemiah-not the great governor of the same name, though a contemporary ( Nehemiah 3:16 ).
ARAUNAH|Agile; also called Ornan  1 Chronicles 21:15 , a Jebusite who dwelt in Jerusalem before it was taken by the Israelites. The destroying angel, sent to punish David for his vanity in taking a census of the people, was stayed in his work of destruction near a threshing-floor belonging to Araunah which was situated on Mount Moriah. Araunah offered it to David as a free gift, together with the oxen and the threshing instruments; but the king insisted on purchasing it at its full price ( 2 Samuel 24:24 ;  1 Chronicles 21:24 ,  25), for, according to the law of sacrifices, he could not offer to God what cost him nothing. On the same place Solomon afterwards erected the temple ( 2 Samuel 24:16 ;  2 Chronicles 3:1 ). (see  ALTAR .) 
AMASAI|Burdensome.  (1.) A Levite, son of Elkanah, of the ancestry of Samuel ( 1 Chronicles 6:25 ,  35). (2.) The leader of a body of men who joined David in the "stronghold," probably of Adullam ( 1 Chronicles 12:18 ). (3.) One of the priests appointed to precede the ark with blowing of trumpets on its removal from the house of Obed-edom ( 1 Chronicles 15:24 ). (4.) The father of a Levite, one of the two Kohathites who took a prominent part at the instance of Hezekiah in the cleansing of the temple ( 2 Chronicles 29:12 ). 
ARMOURY|The place in which armour was deposited when not used ( Nehemiah 3:19 ;  Jeremiah 50:25 ). At first each man of the Hebrews had his own arms, because all went to war. There were no arsenals or magazines for arms till the time of David, who had a large collection of arms, which he consecrated to the Lord in his tabernacle (1 Sa,  21:9 ;  2 Samuel 8:7 -12;  1 Chronicles 26:26 ,  27). 
ARBATHITE|A name given to Abi-albon, or, as elsewhere called, Abiel, one of David's warriors ( 2 Samuel 23:31 ;  1 Chronicles 11:32 ), probably as being an inhabitant of Arabah ( Joshua 15:61 ), a town in the wilderness of Judah. 
ASSOS|A sea-port town of Proconsular Asia, in the district of Mysia, on the north shore of the Gulf of Adramyttium. Paul came hither on foot along the Roman road from Troas ( Acts 20:13 ,  14), a distance of 20 miles. It was about 30 miles distant from Troas by sea. The island of Lesbos lay opposite it, about 7 miles distant. 
ABIASAPH|Father of gathering; the gatherer, the youngest of the three sons of Korah the Levite, head of a family of Korhites ( Exodus 6:24 ); called Ebisaph ( 1 Chronicles 6:37 ). 
ARBA|Four, a giant, father of Anak. From him the city of Hebron derived its name of Kirjath-arba, i.e., the city of Araba ( Joshua 14:15 ;  15:13 ;  21:11 ;  Genesis 13:18 ;  23:2 ). (see  HEBRON .) 
ACHAZ|   ACHAZ  a'-kaz (Achaz), the King James Version ( Matthew 1:9 ): Greek form of Ahaz (thus the Revised Version (British and American)). The name of a King of Israel.
AZIEL|   AZIEL  a'-zi-el (`aziel, "God is power"); (compare Gray, Studies in Hebrew Proper Names, 210, 309): A Levite singer who played the psalteries ( 1 Chronicles 15:20 ); compare Jaaziel ( 1 Chronicles 15:18 ).
ARIMATHEA|A "city of the Jews" ( Luke 23:51 ), the birth-place of Joseph in whose sepulchre our Lord was laid ( Matthew 27:57 ,  60;  John 19:38 ). It is probably the same place as Ramathaim in Ephraim, and the birth-place of Samuel ( 1 Samuel 1:1 ,  19). Others identify it with Ramleh in Dan, or Rama (q.v.) in Benjamin ( Matthew 2:18 ). 
ACHBOR|Gnawing = mouse.  (1.) An Edomitish king ( Genesis 36:38 ;  1 Chronicles 1:49 ). (2.) One of Josiah's officers sent to the prophetess Huldah to inquire regarding the newly-discovered book of the law ( 2 Kings 22:12 ,  14). He is also called Abdon ( 2 Chronicles 34:20 ). 
AZARAEL|   AZARAEL  a-za'-ra-el. See  AZAREL .
AZUR|Helper.  (1.) The father of Hananiah, a false prophet ( Jeremiah 28:1 ). (2.) The father of Jaazaniah ( Ezek. 11:1 ). (3.) One of those who sealed the covenant with Jehovah on the return from Babylon ( Nehemiah 10:17 ). 
ASSYRIANS|   ASSYRIANS  a-sir'-i-ans ('ashshur): The inhabitants of Assyria. In Hebrew the name of the people is the same as that of the country. See  ASSYRIA .
AHUZAM|   AHUZZAM; AHUZAM  a-huz'-am, a-hu'-zam ('achuzzam, "possessor"). A son of Ashahur of the tribe of Judah, his mother's name was Naarah ( 1 Chronicles 4:6 ); written Ahuzam in the King James Version.
AHARAH|   AHARAH  a'-har-a, a-har'-a ('achrach; A, Aara; B, Iaphael, "brother of Rach," or, a brother's follower, though some regard it as a textual corruption for Ahiram): A son of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:1 ). See  AHIRAM .
AYIN|   AYIN  a'-yen: `ayin, "eye" or "fountain": The 16th letter of the Hebrew alphabet, so named, probably, because the original form resembled the eye. `Ayin (`) is usually neglected in pronunciation, and inverted comma (`) is the sign most commonly employed to represent it in transliteration.  The same sound is found in the Arabic and other Semitic languages. The Arabs have two pronunciations, one a very strong guttural formed at the back of the palate, something like a rattled "r" or "rg," the other similar in quality, only less harsh and guttural. The Septuagint reproduced the `ayin (`) in some cases by the Greek letter gamma (g). The numerical value of this letter is 70. An `ayin (`) begins each verse of the 16th section of  Psalm 119  in the Hebrew.  W.W. Davies
AKKAD|   AKKAD; AKKADIANS  ak'-ad, a-ka'-di-ans. See  ACCAD ;  ACCADIANS .
ABELMAIM|   ABEL-MAIM  a'-bel-ma'-im ('abhel mayim, "meadow of water"). See  ABEL-BETH-MAACAH .
ARCHITES|   ARCHITES  ar'-kits (ha-'arki; the King James Version Archi): A clan mentioned in connection with the marking of the southern boundary of Joseph ( Joshua 16:2 ). The phrase (gebhul ha-'arki `aTaroth) offers difficulties, and it has been suggested that the order of the last two words be changed to read "the border of Ataroth-of-the-Archites." See  ATAROTH . G. A. Smith identifies Ataroth with the present Atara on the high road from Jerusalem to Bethel, three and one-half miles South of Bethel and six East of the upper Beth-horon. Hushai, the "friend" of David, was an Arcbite ( 2 Samuel 16:16 ).  H. J. Wolf
AZNOTHTABOR|   AZNOTH-TABOR  az'noth-ta'-bor ('aznoth tabhor, "peaks of Tabor"): A place in western Naphtali, evidently in the vicinity of Mt. Tabor ( Joshua 19:34 ). The exact locality is not known.
ACHOR|Trouble, a valley near Jericho, so called in consequence of the trouble which the sin of Achan caused Israel ( Joshua 7:24 , 26). The expression "valley of Achor" probably became proverbial for that which caused trouble, and when Isaiah ( Isaiah 65:10 ) refers to it he uses it in this sense: "The valley of Achor, a place for herds to lie down in;" i.e., that which had been a source of calamity would become a source of blessing. Hosea also ( Hosea 2:15 ) uses the expression in the same sense: "The valley of Achor for a door of hope;" i.e., trouble would be turned into joy, despair into hope. This valley has been identified with the Wady Kelt. 
ARPHAXAD|Son of Shem, born the year after the Deluge. He died at the age of 438 years ( Genesis 11:10 -13;  1 Chronicles 1:17 ,  18;  Luke 3:36 ). He dwelt in Mesopotamia, and became, according to the Jewish historian Josephus, the progenitor of the Chaldeans. The tendency is to recognize in the word the name of the country nearest the ancient domain of the Chaldeans. Some regard the word as an Egypticized form of the territorial name of Ur Kasdim, or Ur of the Chaldees. 
AXHEAD|   AX (AXE); AX-HEAD  aks; aks'hed: Nine different Hebrew words have been rendered "ax":  (1) garzen. This unquestionably was one of the larger chopping instruments, as the uses to which it was put would imply ( Deuteronomy 19:5 ;  Deuteronomy 20:19   1 Kings 6:7   Isaiah 10:15 ). The modern ax used by the woodchoppers in Syria has a shape much like the ancient stone and bronze axes, with the exception that it is fastened to the handle by passing the latter through a hole in the ax-head, whereas the Egyptian sculptures show that their ax-heads were held to the handles by means of thongs. The so-called battle-ax found at Tell el-Chesy was probably fastened in this way. Syrian peasants are frequently seen carrying in their belts small hatchets the heads of which are shaped like a battle-ax and which are bound to the handles by thongs.  (2) ma`atsar, is used in  Isaiah 44:12  (King James Version renders "tongs") and in  Jeremiah 10:3 .  (3) qardom, is used in  Judges 9:48   1 Samuel 13:20, 21 ;  Psalm 74:5   Jeremiah 46:22 . The present Arabic word, qudum, which is the name for the native adze, is from the same origin. The adze is the only chopping instrument of the Syrian carpenter. He uses it for many purposes, where a foreigner would use a saw or chisel or plane, and with a skill which the foreigner envies. Many students of Syrian life believe that the adze is a tool which has survived from the early Hebrew times.  (4) barzel ( Deuteronomy 19:5   2 Kings 6:5 ): The interest associated with this word is that it literally means "iron," although the context indicates that it means "ax." If the word iron was not used here to mean "metal," then iron axes were used by the children of Israel. If iron axes existed, however, they have long since disappeared as the result of corrosion, since the only ones discovered have been of stone, copper or bronze. See  METALS .  (5) maghzirah ( 2 Samuel 12:31 ) is literally, "a cutting instrument," and might be rendered, "a blade" or sickle.  (6) megherah ( 1 Chronicles 20:2 ), translated in this one passage as axes, but better translated "saws."  (7) cherebh ( Ezekiel 26:9 ), rendered ax in this passage only. It is usually translated sword. It could also mean pick-axe.  (8) kashil ( Psalm 74:6  the King James Version), literally, "a feller," hence, an axe.  (9) mapets ( Jeremiah 51:20 ), literally, "a smiter," hence, a war club or battle-axe. The Greek word used in the New Testament is axine ( Matthew 3:10   Luke 3:9 ).  James A. Patch
ARELITES|   ARELITES  a-re'-lits: In  Numbers 26:17 . See  ARELI .
AMRAPHEL|King of Shinar, southern Chaldea, one of the confederates of Chedorlaomer, king of Elam, in a war against Sodom and cities of the plain ( Genesis 14:1 ,  4). It is now found that Amraphel (or Ammirapaltu) is the Khammu-rabi whose name appears on recently-discovered monuments. (see  CHEDORLAOMER ). After defeating Arioch (q.v.) he united Babylonia under one rule, and made Babylon his capital. 
ANETOTHITE|   ANETOTHITE  an'-e-toth-it: the King James Version form of Anathothite (thus the Revised Version (British and American)  1 Chronicles 27:12 ).
ARROWSNAKE|   ARROWSNAKE  ar'-o-snak: In  Isaiah 34:15  the Hebrew word kippoz, which in the King James Version is rendered "great owl," is in the English Revised Version rendered "arrowsnake," and in the American Standard Revised Version "dart-snake." Gesenius, who translates "arrowsnake," says "so called from the spring with which it propels itself." Others, from the mention of "make her nest, lay, and hatch," think some kind of bird is meant. See  OWL ;  SERPENT .
AMASHSAI|   AMASHSAI  a-mash'-si `amashcay, probably a textual error for `amashay; the ("s") implies a reading `-M-C-Y, based on a mistaken derivation from '-M-C. The original reading may have been `ammishay; compare AMASAI): Amashsai is a priestly name in the post-exilic list of inhabitants of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 11:13 ; Maasai,  1 Chronicles 9:12 ); the reading in Chronicles is ma`asay, the King James Version "Maasiai," the Revised Version (British and American) "Maasai."
ADAMI|   ADAMI  ad'-a-mi; a-da'-mi: Mentioned in the King James Version as a separate name, where the Revised Version (British and American) has ADAMI-NEKEB, which see ( Joshua 19:33 ).
AENON|Springs, a place near Salim where John baptized ( John 3:23 ). It was probably near the upper source of the Wady Far'ah, an open valley extending from Mount Ebal to the Jordan. It is full of springs. A place has been found called `Ainun, four miles north of the springs. 
AHUZZAM|   AHUZZAM; AHUZAM  a-huz'-am, a-hu'-zam ('achuzzam, "possessor"). A son of Ashahur of the tribe of Judah, his mother's name was Naarah ( 1 Chronicles 4:6 ); written Ahuzam in the King James Version.
ABRONAH|R.V., one of Israel's halting-places in the desert ( Numbers 33:34 , 35), just before Ezion-gaber. In A.V., "Ebronah." 
AMI|   AMI  a'-mi, a'-me ('ami): Ancestor of a family among "Solomon's servants" in the Return ( Ezra 2:57 ); the same as Amon in  Nehemiah 7:59 .
ARIDAI|   ARIDAI  ar'-i-di, a-rid'-a-i ('aridhay: a son of Haman ( Esther 9:9 )): The name may be related to the Persian Hari-dayas, "delight of Hari"; the text is very uncertain.
ABELBETHMAACHAH|Meadow of the house of Maachah, a city in the north of Palestine, in the neighbourhood of Dan and Ijon, in the tribe of Naphtali. It was a place of considerable strength and importance. It is called a "mother in Israel", i.e., a metropolis ( 2 Samuel 20:19 ). It was besieged by Joab ( 2 Samuel 20:14 ), by Benhadad ( 1 Kings 15:20 ), and by Tiglath-pileser ( 2 Kings 15:29 ) about B.C. 734. It is elsewhere called Abel-maim, meadow of the waters, ( 2 Chronicles 16:4 ). Its site is occupied by the modern Abil or Abil-el-kamh, on a rising ground to the east of the brook Derdarah, which flows through the plain of Huleh into the Jordan, about 6 miles to the west-north-west of Dan. 
ASAHEL|Made by God, the youngest son of Zeruiah, David's sister. He was celebrated for his swiftness of foot. When fighting against Ish-bosheth at Gibeon, in the army of his brother Joab, he was put to death by Abner, whom he pursued from the field of battle ( 2 Samuel 2:18 ,  19). He is mentioned among David's thirty mighty men ( 2 Samuel 23:24 ;  1 Chronicles 11:26 ). Others of the same name are mentioned ( 2 Chronicles 17:8 ;  31:13 ;  Ezra 10:15 ). 
ABSALOM|Father of peace; i.e., "peaceful" David's son by Maacah ( 2 Samuel 3:3 ; Comp.  1 Kings 1:6 ). He was noted for his personal beauty and for the extra-ordinary profusion of the hair of his head ( 2 Samuel 14:25 , 26). The first public act of his life was the blood-revenge he executed against Amnon, David's eldest son, who had basely wronged Absalom's sister Tamar. This revenge was executed at the time of the festivities connected with a great sheep-shearing at Baal-hazor. David's other sons fled from the place in horror, and brought the tidings of the death of Amnon to Jerusalem. Alarmed for the consequences of the act, Absalom fled to his grandfather at Geshur, and there abode for three years ( 2 Samuel 3:3 ;  13:23 -38). David mourned his absent son, now branded with the guilt of fratricide. As the result of a stratagem carried out by a woman of Tekoah, Joab received David's sanction to invite Absalom back to Jerusalem. He returned accordingly, but two years elapsed before his father admitted him into his presence ( 2 Samuel 14:28 ). Absalom was now probably the oldest surviving son of David, and as he was of royal descent by his mother as well as by his father, he began to aspire to the throne. His pretensions were favoured by the people. By many arts he gained their affection; and after his return from Geshur ( 2 Samuel 15:7 ; marg.,  R.V.) he went up to Hebron, the old capital of Judah, along with a great body of the people, and there proclaimed himself king. The revolt was so successful that David found it necessary to quit Jerusalem and flee to Mahanaim, beyond Jordan; where upon Absalom returned to Jerusalem and took possession of the throne without opposition. Ahithophel, who had been David's chief counsellor, deserted him and joined Absalom, whose chief counsellor he now became. Hushai also joined Absalom, but only for the purpose of trying to counteract the counsels of Ahithophel, and so to advantage David's cause. He was so far successful that by his advice, which was preferred to that of Ahithophel, Absalom delayed to march an army against his father, who thus gained time to prepare for the defence. Absalom at length marched out against his father, whose army, under the command of Joab, he encountered on the borders of the forest of Ephraim. Twenty thousand of Absalom's army were slain in that fatal battle, and the rest fled. Absalom fled on a swift mule; but his long flowing hair, or more probably his head, was caught in the bough of an oak, and there he was left suspended till Joab came up and pierced him through with three darts. His body was then taken down and cast into a pit dug in the forest, and a heap of stones was raised over his grave. When the tidings of the result of that battle were brought to David, as he sat impatiently at the gate of Mahanaim, and he was told that Absalom had been slain, he gave way to the bitter lamentation: "O my son Absalom, my son, my son Absalom! would God I had died for thee, O Absalom, my son, my son!" ( 2 Samuel 18:33.  Comp.  Exodus 32:32 ;  Romans 9:3 ). Absalom's three sons ( 2 Samuel 14:27 ; Comp.  18:18 ) had all died before him, so that he left only a daughter, Tamar, who became the grandmother of Abijah. 
ARMAGEDDON|Occurs only in  Revelation 16:16  (R.V.,  "Har-Magedon"), as symbolically designating the place where the "battle of that great day of God Almighty" (ver. 14) shall be fought. The word properly means the "mount of Megiddo." It is the scene of the final conflict between Christ and Antichrist. The idea of such a scene was suggested by the Old Testament great battle-field, the plain of Esdraelon (q.v.). 
ASAREL|   ASAREL  as'-ar-el ('asar'el, "God is ruler"; the King James Version Asareel): A descendant of Judah and a son of Jehallelel ( 1 Chronicles 4:16 ).
AGAG|Flame, the usual title of the Amalekite kings, as "Pharaoh" was of the Egyptian.  (1.) A king of the Amalekites referred to by Balaam ( Numbers 24:7 ). He lived at the time of the Exodus. (2.) Another king of the Amalekites whom Saul spared unlawfully, but whom Samuel on his arrival in the camp of Saul ordered, in retributive justice ( Judges 1 ), to be brought out and cut in pieces ( 1 Samuel 15:8 -33. Comp.  Exodus 17:11 ;  Numbers 14:45 ). 
ABIEZER|   ABIEZER  ab-i-e'-zer, a-bi-e'-zer ('abhi`ezer, "father of help," or "my father is help." Iezer, Iezerite (in the King James Version Jeezer, Jeezerite), is Abiezer with the letter beth omitted):  (1) A descendant of Joseph the son of Jacob, and head of one of the families of Manasseh that settled West of the Jordan ( Numbers 26:30   Joshua 17:1-6   1 Chronicles 7:14-19 ). As he was great uncle to Zelophehad's daughters, who brought a case before Moses ( Numbers 36 ), he must have been an old man at the time of the conquest. He was the son of Gilead the son of Machir, in the sense of being a more remote descendant, for Machir had sons before the death of Joseph ( Genesis 50:23 ). The Machir that possessed Gilead and Bashan because he was "a man of war" was the Manassite family of Machir, with Jair as its great general ( Joshua 17:1 ;  Joshua 13:30, 31, Numbers 32:39-41, Deuteronomy 3:12-15 ). To Abiezer and other sons of Gilead territory was assigned West of the Jordan.  In later generations the name survived as that of the family to which Gideon belonged, and perhaps also of the region which they occupied ( Judges 6:34 ;  Judges 8:2 ). They are also called Abiezrites ( Judges 6:11, 24, 8:32 ). The region was West of Shechem, with Ophrah for its principal city.  (2) One of David's mighty men, "the Anathothite" ( 2 Samuel 23:27   1 Chronicles 11:28 ), who was also one of David s month-by-month captains, his month being the ninth ( 1 Chronicles 27:12 ).  Willis J. Beecher
ABELMIZRAIM|Meadow of Egypt, or mourning of Egypt, a place "beyond," i.e., on the west of Jordan, at the "threshing-floor of Atad." Here the Egyptians mourned seventy days for Jacob ( Genesis 50:4 -11). Its site is unknown. 
ARIOCH|Lion-like, venerable.  (1.) A king of Ellasar who was confederate with Chedorlamer ( Genesis 14:1 , 9). The tablets recently discovered by Mr. Pinches (see  CHALDEA ) show the true reading is Eri-Aku of Larsa. This Elamite name meant "servant of the moon-god." It was afterwards changed into Rimsin, "Have mercy, O moon-god."  (2.)  Dan. 2:14 . 
AJALON|And Aij'alon, place of deer.  (1.) A town and valley originally assigned to the tribe of Dan, from which, however, they could not drive the Amorites ( Judges 1:35 ). It was one of the Levitical cities given to the Kohathites ( 1 Chronicles 6:69 ). It was not far from Beth-shemesh ( 2 Chronicles 28:18 ). It was the boundary between the kingdoms of Judah and Israel, and is frequently mentioned in Jewish history ( 2 Chronicles 11:10 ;  1 Samuel 14:31 ;  1 Chronicles 8:13 ). With reference to the valley named after the town, Joshua uttered the celebrated command, "Sun, stand thou still on Gibeon; and thou, Moon, in the valley of Ajalon" ( Joshua 10:12 ). It has been identified as the modern Yalo, at the foot of the Beth-horon pass (q.v.). In the Tell Amarna letters Adoni-zedek (q.v.) speaks of the destruction of the "city of Ajalon" by the invaders, and describes himself as "afflicted, greatly afflicted" by the calamities that had come on the land, urging the king of Egypt to hasten to his help. (2.) A city in the tribe of Zebulun ( Judges 12:12 ), the modern Jalun, three miles north of Cabul. 
APHARSACHITES|A company of the colonists whom the Assyrian king planted in Samaria ( Ezra 5:6 ;  6:6 ). 
ADNA|   ADNA  ad'-na (`adhna', "pleasure"; Aidaine):  (1) An Israelite in Ezra's time who, having married a foreign wife, divorced her. He belonged to Pahath-moab ( Ezra 10:30 ).  (2) A priest of the family of Harum, during the high-priesthood of Joiakim son of Jethua ( Nehemiah 12:12-15 ).
ATTALIA|   ATTALIA  at-a-li'-a Attalia: A city on the southern coast of Asia Minor in ancient Pamphylia which, according to  Acts 14:25 , was visited by Paul and Barnabas on the way to Antioch during their first missionary journey. The city was founded by Attalus II Philadelphus (159-138 B.C.), hence, its name Attalia, which during the Middle Ages was corrupted to Satalia; its modern name is Adalia. Attalia stood on a flat terrace of limestone, about 120 ft. high, near the point where the Catarrhactes River flowed into the sea. The river now, however, has practically disappeared, for the greater part of its water is turned into the fields for irrigation purposes. The early city did not enjoy the ecclesiastical importance of the neighboring city of Perga; but in 1084 when Perga declined, Attalia became a metropolis. In 1148 the troops of Louis IV sailed from there to Syria; in 1214 the Seljuks restored the city walls, and erected several public buildings. The city continued to be the chief port for ships from Syria and Egypt, and the point of entry to the interior until modern times, when the harbor at Mersine was reopened; it has now become a place of little importance.  The town possesses considerable which is of archaeological interest. The outer harbor was protected by ancient walls and towers now in ruins; its entrance was closed with a chain. The inner harbor was but a recess in the cliff. The city was surrounded by two walls which were constructed at various times from material taken from the ruins of the ancient city; the outer wall was protected by a moat. The modern town, lying partly within and partly without the walls is thus divided into quarters. In the southern quarter live the Christians; in the northern the Moslems. Among other objects of archaeological interest still to be seen may be mentioned the inscribed arched gateway of Hadrian and the aqueduct. Rich gardens now surround the town; the chief exports are grain, cotton, licorice root and valonia or acorn-cups.  E. J. Banks
AMITTAI|True, the father of Jonah the prophet, a native of Gath-hepher ( 2 Kings 14:25 ;  Jonah 1:1 ). 
ADITHAIM|   ADITHAIM  ad-i-tha'-im (`adhithayim "double ornament, passage, or prey"): A city in "the lowland" (Shephelah, not as the King James Version "valley") of Judah ( Joshua 15:36 ). Site unknown, but possibly same as ADIDA (which see).
ASSUR|   SHERGHAT, ASSHUR, ASSUR  shur'-gat, sher'-gat: The name of the first capital city of Assyria is known by the Arabs as Qala' at Sherghat, or the Fortress of Sherghat. Its ancient name was Asshur or Assur ( Genesis 10:11  margin). From it was derived the name of the country, Assyria, and of the people, Assyrians. The date of the founding of the city is not known. Apparently about 2000 B.C. a colony of Babylonians migrated northward along the Tigris River and settled upon the right shore about halfway between the Upper and Lower Zab, or halfway between the modern cities of Mosul and Bagdad. Assur, the local deity of the place, became the national god of Assyria. It is uncertain whether the deity gave the name to the city, or the city to the deity, but probably an early shrine of Assur stood there, and the people, building their city about it, became known as the Assyrians. At first the city was a Bah dependency, governed by priests from Babylonia. In time, as the city acquired a political significance, the power of the priesthood declined; allegiance to Babylonia ceased, and the Assyrian empire came into existence. About 1200 B.C. the political power had so increased that a new capital, Nimrud (Calah) was built to the North near the junction of the Upper Zab with the Tigris. In 722 B.C. the capital was transferred by Sargon to his new city, Dur-Sharrukin, and in 705 B.C. Sennacherib enlarged Nineveh, and it remained the capital city till the fall of the empire in 606 B.C. Assur, however, as the seat of the national deity, never ceased to be the chief religious center.  The mounds of Assur are among the largest in Mesopotamia. They rise abruptly from the Tigris, which they follow for about half a mile, and extend a quarter of a mile inland. In the surrounding plain are other mounds, marking the sites of temples, and indicating that a part of the city was without the walls. At the northern end the mounds are surmounted by a high conical peak, which represents the tower or ziggurat of the temple of Assur.  Of the early excavators Layard and Rassam examined the ruins, but the fanaticism of the surrounding Arabs prevented extensive excavations. In 1904 Dr. W. Andrae, for the Deutsche Orientgesellschaft, began the systematic excavations which have been continued by Dr. P. Maresch for ten years. Discoveries of the greatest importance have been made. The city was found to have been surrounded on the land side by a double wall. The space between the walls, several rods in width, was occupied by houses, possibly the homes of the soldiers. The base of the outer wall was of stone; above it were mud bricks strengthened at intervals with courses of burned bricks. Along the outer upper edge was a parapet, protected by battlements. From the floor of the parapet small holes were bored vertically downward, so that the soldiers, without exposing themselves, might discharge their arrows at the enemy close to the base of the wall. Many of the holes are still visible. The wall was pierced with several gateways; the names "Gate of Assur," "Gate of the Tigris," "Gate of the Sun God" have survived. At the sides of the gateways were small chambers for the guards, and from them passageways led to the parapet above. The gates were reached by bridges which spanned the moat. Along the river side the city was protected by a high steep embankment, which was built partly of limestone, but chiefly of square bricks laid in bitumen.  The temple of Assur at the northern end of the city has been thoroughly excavated. With its outer and inner court and tower it conformed in its general plan to the older Babylonian temples. Several of the palaces of the early kings were discovered, but the best-preserved of the palaces was one which the excavators have called the residence of the mayor. It stood near the western edge of the city on the main street which ran from the western gate to the Tigris. It consisted of two courts surrounded by chambers. Grooves in the paved floor conducted fresh water to the kitchen, the baths and the chambers, and round tiles beneath the floor carried away the waste water to the arched city sewer and to the Tigris. To the rear of the mayor's house was a crowded residential quarter. The streets were very narrow and winding. The houses were exceedingly small; in some of them one could not lie at full length upon the floor. Among their ruins appeared little but stone mortars and broken pottery and other essential household implements.  Near the southern end of the city a most remarkable discovery was made. About a hundred monoliths, from 4 to 8 ft. high, were found still standing erect. On the side of each one, near the top, was an inscription of several lines, dedicating the stone to some individual who had been of great service to the state. They were not tombstones; apparently they had been erected during the lifetime of the people whom they honored. Of the greatest interest was one which bore the name of Sammuramat or Semiramis, the once supposed mythical queen of Nineveh. Its translation reads: "The column of Sa-am-mu-ra-mat, the palace wife of Samsi-Adad, king of the world, king of Assyria, the mother of Adad-Nirari, king of the world, king of Assyria, the.... of Shalmaneser, king of the four regions." The inscription not only makes Semiramis a historical character, but places her among the foremost rulers of Assyria.  The tombs of the kings and nobles were found deep in the ruins in the very center of the city. They were rectangular structures of cut stone, covered above with a rounded arch of burned bricks. In some cases the massive stone doors still turned in their sockets. The roofs of many of them had fallen in; others, which were intact, were filled with dust. From the tombs a vast amount of silver, gold and copper jewelry and stone beads and ornaments were recovered.  One of the chief temples of the city stood at short distance without the eastern wall. Nothing but its foundations remain. However, the temple was surrounded by a park, traces of which still exist. The soil of the surrounding plain is a hard clay, incapable of supporting vegetable life. Into the clay large holes, several feet in diameter, were dug and filled with loam. Long lines of the holes may still be traced, each marking the spot where a tree, probably the date palm, stood in the temple park.  A modern cemetery on the summit of the main mound is still used by the neighboring Arabs, and therefore it will likely prevent the complete excavation of this oldest of the capital cities of Assyria.  See further ASSYRIA.  E. J. Banks  ASSHUR; ASSUR  ash'-oor, as'-oor. See  ASSYRIA .  ASSUR  as'-ur. See  ASUR .
ABINADAB|Father of nobleness; i.e., "noble."  (1.) A Levite of Kirjath-jearim, in whose house the ark of the covenant was deposited after having been brought back from the land of the Philistines ( 1 Samuel 7:1 ). It remained there twenty years, till it was at length removed by David ( 1 Samuel 7:1 , 2;  1 Chronicles 13:7 ). (2.) The second of the eight sons of Jesse ( 1 Samuel 16:8 ). He was with Saul in the campaign against the Philistines in which Goliath was slain ( 1 Samuel 17:13 ). (3.) One of Saul's sons, who peristed with his father in the battle of Gilboa ( 1 Samuel 31:2 ;  1 Chronicles 10:2 ). (4.) One of Solomon's officers, who "provided victuals for the king and his household." He presided, for this purpose, over the district of Dor ( 1 Kings 4:11 ). 
ADALIA|   ADALIA  a-da-li'-a ('adhalya', probably a Persian name, meaning unknown): One of the ten sons of Haman who were put to death by the Jews ( Esther 9:8 ).
ABIHAIL|Father of might.  (1.)  Numbers 3:35 .  (2.)  1 Chronicles 2:29 .  (3.)  1 Chronicles 5:14 . (4.) The second wife of King Rehoboam ( 2 Chronicles 11:18 ), a descendant of Eliab, David's eldest brother. (5.) The father of Esther and uncle of Mordecai ( Esther 2:15 ). 
ASRIEL|   ASRIEL  as'-ri-el ('asri'-el, "Vow of God"?): A man of Manasseh ( Numbers 26:31   Joshua 17:2 ). The form Asrielites, i.e. family of Asriel, occurs in  Numbers 26:31 . According to  1 Chronicles 7:14 , Asriel was born to Manasseh by an Aramitess concubine. the King James Version has "Ashnel."
AMASHAI|The son of Azareel, appointed by Nehemiah to reside at Jerusalem and do the work of the temple ( Nehemiah 11:13 ). 
ATROTHSHOPHAN|   ATROTH-SHOPHAN  at'-roth-sho'fan `Troth shophan; Septuagint gen sophan: A town built or fortified by the children of Gad East of the Jordan ( Numbers 32:35 ), named next to Aroer. If it had been at Khirbet `Attarus or Jebel `Attarus (HDB and EB, under the word) Aroer would hardly have been named between them. The King James Version reads Atroth, Shophah, understanding that two places are named. No identification is yet possible.
APELLES|A Christian at Rome whom Paul salutes ( Romans 16:10 ), and styles "approved in Christ." 
ALEPH|   ALEPH  a'-lef ('): The first letter of the Hebrew alphabet. It is nearly soundless itself and best represented, as in this Encyclopedia, by the smooth breathing ('), but it is the direct ancestor of the Greek, Latin and English "a" as in "father." In either case this beginning of the alphabet happens to be near the very basis of all speech-in one case the simple expiration of breath, in the other the simplest possible vocal action-the actual basis from which all other vowels are evolved. It became also the symbol for the number one (1) and, with the dieresis, 1,000. It is the symbol also for one of the most famous of Greek Biblical manuscripts, the Codex Sinaiticus. For name, written form, etc., see ALPHABET.  E. C. Richardson
AMAL|   AMAL  a'-mal (`amal, "toiler"): A son of Helem of the tribe of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 7:35 ).
AHOLIBAH|My tent is in her, the name of an imaginary harlot, applied symbolically to Jerusalem, because she had abandoned the worship of the true God and given herself up to the idolatries of foreign nations. ( Ezek. 23:4 ,  11,  22,  36,  44). 
ARDON|Descendant, the last of the three sons of Caleb by his first wife Azubah ( 1 Chronicles 2:18 ). 
AMALEKITES|   MOUNT OF THE AMALEKITES  ("Hill-country of the Amalekites" ( Judges 12:15 )): The Amalekites are usually connected with the valley ( Numbers 14:25   Judges 7:12 ), but appear from this passage to have had a settlement in the hill country of Ephraim.  See  AMALEKITE .
ABJECTS|( Psalm 35:15 ), the translation of a Hebrew word meaning smiters; probably, in allusion to the tongue, slanderers. (Comp.  Jeremiah 18:18. ) 
ABRECH|   ABRECH  a'-brek: Transliteration of the Hebrew 'abhrekh, in  Genesis 41:43  the Revised Version, margin, of which both the origin and meaning are uncertain. It was the salutation which the Egyptians addressed to Joseph, when he was made second to Pharaoh, and appeared in his official chariot.  (1) The explanations based upon Hebrew derivation are unsatisfactory, whether as the King James Version "bow the knee," from barakh (hiphil imperative) or marginal "tender father," or "father of a king" of the Targum. The form as Hiphil Imperative instead of habhrekh, is indefensible, while the other two derivations are fanciful.  (2) The surmises of Egyptologists are almost without number, and none are conclusive. Skinner in his Commentary on Genesis selects "attention!" after Spiegelberg, as best. Speaker's Commentary suggests "rejoice thou" from ab-nek. BDB gives preference to the Coptic a-bor-k, "prostrate thyself."  (3) The most satisfying parallel is the Assyrian abarakku, meaning "grand vizier" or "friend of a king," as suggested by Fried. Delitzsch; for Babylonian laws and customs were dominant in western Asia, and the Hyksos, through whom such titles would have been carried into Egypt, were ruling there at that time. Edward Mack
ASHVATH|   ASHVATH  ash'-vath (`ashwath): A man of Asher, of the house of Japhlet ( 1 Chronicles 7:33 ).
ARUBBOTH|   ARUBBOTH; ARUBOTH  a-rub'-oth, ar'-u-both (ha-'arubboth; the King James Version Aruboth): One of the 12 districts from which victuals for Solomon's household were obtained ( 1 Kings 4:10 ). With Arubboth are mentioned "Socoh, and all the land of Hepher," and as Socoh lay in the Shephelah ( Joshua 15:35 ), Arubboth probably lay in the southern part of the Shephelah.
APHEK|   APHEK  a'-fek ('apheq, "fortress"; Aphek):  (1) In  Joshua 12:18  we should probably read with the Septuagint "the king of Aphek in Sharon." This may correspond to Aphek in  1 Samuel 4:1 . It was a royal city of the Canaanites whose king was slain by Joshua. Probably it is the Aphek mentioned by Josephus as being near to Antipatris (BJ, II, xix, 1). Kakon, a strong position commanding the main entrance to Samaria might suit; but the name has perished.  (2) (Greek Taphek or Apheka): A city in the lot of Asher ( Joshua 13:4 ). The inhabitants were not ejected by Asher, nor is it said that they became tributary ( Judges 1:31 ). In this passage it is written 'aphiq (Hebrew). It may be represented by 'Afqa on Nahr Ibrahim, although this is probably farther north than we should expect.  (3) To this place the Philistines gathered their hosts, while the Israelites pitched by the fountain which is in Jezreel ( 1 Samuel 29:1 ). It has been generally supposed that these two positions were over against each other, and that therefore Aphek must be sought in the plain of Esdraelon. No place answering this description has been found here. Fuqu`ah on Mount Gilboa is plainly impossible. If, however, this was only the rallying point of the Philistines from which they went up to Jezreel ( 1 Samuel 29:11 ), it may be identical with the Aphek in the plain of Sharon (compare  1 Samuel 29:1  above).  (4) A city on the plateau east of the Jordan, where disaster befell Benhadad ( 1 Kings 20:26, 30 ). The same place may be intended in  2 Kings 13:17 . The modern Fiq or Afiq (for both forms are heard) on the brow of the hill beyond Qal`at el-Chucn, east of the Sea of Galilee, probably represents this ancient city.  W. Ewing
ATHENS|The capital of Attica, the most celebrated city of the ancient world, the seat of Greek literature and art during the golden period of Grecian history. Its inhabitants were fond of novelty ( Acts 17:21 ), and were remarkable for their zeal in the worship of the gods. It was a sarcastic saying of the Roman satirist that it was "easier to find a god at Athens than a man." On his second missionary journey Paul visited this city ( Acts 17:15 ; Comp.  1 Thessalonians 3:1 ), and delivered in the Areopagus his famous speech ( 17:22 -31). The altar of which Paul there speaks as dedicated "to the [properly "an"] unknown God" (23) was probably one of several which bore the same inscription. It is supposed that they originated in the practice of letting loose a flock of sheep and goats in the streets of Athens on the occasion of a plague, and of offering them up in sacrifice, at the spot where they lay down, "to the god concerned." 
ABIDA|Or Abi'dah, father of knowledge; knowing, one of the five sons of Midian, who was the son of Abraham by Keturah ( 1 Chronicles 1:33 ), and apparently the chief of an Arab tribe. 
AHASBAI|   AHASBAI  a-has'-bi ('achacbay, "blooming"): The father of Eliphelet, a Maacathite, a soldier in David's army ( 2 Samuel 23:34 ). He was either a native of Abel-beth-maacah ( 2 Samuel 20:14 ) or, more probably, of Maacah in Syria ( 2 Samuel 10:6 ). The list in  1 Chronicles 11:35, 36  gives different names entirely. Here we have Ur and Hepher, which simply show that the text is corrupt in one or both places.  AHASUERUS or ASSEURUS  a-haz-u-e'-rus, (Septuagint Assoueros, but in Tobit 14:15 Asueros; the Latin form of the Hebrew 'achashwerosh, a name better known in its ordinary Greek form of Xerxes): It was the name of two, or perhaps of three kings mentioned in the canonical, or apocryphal, books of the Old Testament.  1. In Esther:  There seems to be little reasonable doubt, that we should identify the Ahasuerus of Esther with the well-known Xerxes, who reigned over Persia from 485 to 465 B.C., and who made the great expedition against Greece that culminated in the defeat of the Persian forces at Salamis and Plataea. If Esther be taken as equivalent to Ishtar, it may well be the same as the Amestris of Herodotus, which in Babylonian would be Ammi-Ishtar, or Ummi-Ishtar. Amestris is said to have been the daughter of Otanes, a distinguished general of Xerxes, and the grand-daughter of Sisamnes, a notorious judge, who was put to death with great cruelty by the king because of malfeasance in office. Sisamnes may be in Babylonian Shamash-ammanu-(shallim). If he were the brother and Otanes the nephew of Mordecai, we can easily account for the ease with which the latter and has ward Esther, were advanced and confirmed in their Positions at the court, of Xerxes.  2. In Ezra:  An Ahasuerus is mentioned in  Ezra 4:6 , as one to whom some persons unnamed wrote an accusation against Judah and Jerusalem. Ewald and others have suggested that this Ahasuerus was Cambyses, the son and successor of Cyrus. It seems to be more probable that Xerxes, the son and successor of Darius Hystaspis, is meant: first, because in the following verse Artaxerxes, the son and successor of Xerxes, is mentioned; and secondly, because we have no evidence whatever that Cambyses was ever called Ahasuerus, whereas there is absolute certainty that the Pets Khshayarsha, the Hebrew 'achashwerosh, the Greek Assoueros or Xerxes, and the Latin Ahasuerus, are the exact equivalents of one another.  3. In Tobit:  In the apocryphal book of Tobit (14:15, the King James Version) it is said that before Tobias died he heard of the destruction of Nineveh, which was taken by Nabuchodonosor and Assuerus. This Assuerus can have been no other than Cyaxares, who according to Herodotus (i.196) took Nineveh and reduced the Assyrians into subjection, with the exception of the Babylonian district. As we shall see below, he was probably the same as the Ahasuerus of  Daniel 9:1 . The phrase "which was taken by Nabuchodonosor and Assuerus" is not found in the Syriac version of Tobit.  4. In Daniel:  An Ahasuerus is said in  Daniel 9:1  to have been the father of Darius the Mede, and to have been of the seed of the Medes. It is probable that this Ahasuerus is the same as the Uvakhshatara of the Persian recension of the Behistun inscription, which in the Babylonian is Umaku'ishtar, in the Susian Makishtarra, and in Herod Cyaxares. It will be noted that both the Greek Cyaxares and the Hebrew Akhashwerosh omit the preformative uwa- and the "t" of the Persian form Uvakhshatara. That this Median king had sons living in the time of Cyrus is shown by the fact that two rebel aspirants to the throne in the time of Darius Hystaspis claimed to be his sons, to wit: Fravartish, a Median, who lied saying, "I am Khshathrita of the family of Uvakhshatara" (Behistun Inscr, col. II, v); and Citrantakhma, who said, "I am king in Sagartia of the family of Uvakhshatara" (id, II, xiv). If we accept the identification of Gubaru with Darius the Mede, then the latter may well have been another of his sons, at first a sub-king to Astyages the Scythian, as he was later to Cyrus the Persian.  R. Dick Wilson
ADMIN|   ADMIN  ad'-min. See  ARNI .
ADMAH|Earth, one of the five cities of the vale of Siddim ( Genesis 10:19 ). It was destroyed along with Sodom and Gomorrah ( 19:24 ;  Deuteronomy 29:23 ). It is supposed by some to be the same as the Adam of  Joshua 3:16 , the name of which still lingers in Damieh, the ford of Jordan. (see  ZEBOIM .) 
AJAH|   AJAH  a'-ja. An Edomite tribe ( Genesis 36:24  the King James Version). See  AIAH .
ARUMAH|   ARUMAH  a-roo'-ma (arumah, "lofty"): The town in which Abimelech, the son of Jerubbaal (Gideon), dwelt when driven from Shechem ( Judges 9:41 ). The ruins El-Ormeh, 6 miles Southeast of Shechem, may be on the site, though its position is not known with certainty.
APOSTLES|   ACTS OF THE APOSTLES  a-pos'-ls: I. TITLE II. TEXT III. UNITY OF THE BOOK IV. THE AUTHOR V. CANONICITY VI. DATE VII. SOURCES USED BY LUKE VIII. THE SPEECHES IN THE ACTS IX. RELATION OF ACTS TO THE EPISTLES X. CHRONOLOGY OF ACTS XI. HISTORICAL WORTH OF ACTS XII. PURPOSE OF THE BOOK XIII. ANALYSIS LITERATURE  I. Title.  It is possible, indeed probable, that the book originally had no title. The manuscripts give the title in several forms. Aleph (in the inscription) has merely "Acts" (Praxeis). So Tischendorf, while Origen, Didymus, Eusebius quote from "The Acts." But BD Aleph (in subscription) have "Acts of Apostles" or "The Acts of the Apostles" (Praxeis Apostolon). So Westcott and Hort, Nestle (compare Athanasius and Euthalius). Only slightly different is the title in 31, 61, and many other cursives (Praxeis ton Apostolon, "Acts of the Apostles"). So Griesbach, Scholz. Several fathers (Clement of Alex, Origen, Dionysius of Alex, Cyril of Jerusalem, Chrysostom) quote it as "The Acts of the Apostles" (Hai Praxeis ton Apostolon). Finally A2 EGH give it in the form "Acts of the Holy Apostles" (Praxeis ton Hagion Apostolon). The Memphitic version has "The Acts of the Holy Apostles." Clearly, then, there was no single title that commanded general acceptance.  II. Text.  (1) The chief documents. These are the Primary Uncials (Codex Sinaiticus, Codex Alexandrinus, Codex Vaticanus, Codex Ephraemi Rescriptus, Codex Bezae), Codex Laudianus (E) which is a bilingual Uncial confined to Acts, later Uncials like Codex Modena, Codex Regius, Codex the Priestly Code (P), the Cursives, the Vulgate, the Peshitta and the Harclean Syriac and quotations from the Fathers. We miss the Curetonian and Syriac Sinaiticus, and have only fragmentary testimony from the Old Latin. (2) The modern editions of Acts present the types of text (Textus Receptus; the Revised Version (British and American); the critical text like that of Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek or Nestle or Weiss or von Soden). These three types do not correspond with the four classes of text (Syrian, Western, Alexandrian, Neutral) outlined by Hort in his Introduction to the New Testament in Greek (1882). These four classes are broadly represented in the documents which give us Acts. But no modern editor of the Greek New Testament has given us the Western or the Alexandrian type of text, though Bornemann, as will presently be shown, argues for the originality of the Western type in Acts. But the Textus Receptus of the New Testament (Stephanus' 3rd edition in 1550) was the basis of the King James Version of 1611. This edition of the Greek New Testament made use of a very few manuscripts, and all of them late, except Codex Bezae, which was considered too eccentric to follow. Practically, then, the King James Version represents the Syriac type of text which may have been edited in Antioch in the 4th century. Various minor errors may have crept in since that date, but substantially the Syriac recension is the text of the King James Version today. Where this text stands alone, it is held by nearly all modern scholars to be in error, though Dean Burgon fought hard for the originality of the Syriac text (The Revision Revised, 1882). The text of Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek is practically that of Codex Vaticanus, which is held to be the Neutral type of text. Nestle, von Soden, Weiss do not differ greatly from the text of Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek, though von Soden and Weiss attack the problem on independent lines. The text of the Revised Version (British and American) is in a sense a compromise between that of the King James Version and the critical text, though coming pretty close to the critical text. Compare Whitney, The Reviser's Greek Text, 1892. For a present-day appreciation of this battle of the texts see J. Rendel Harris, Side Lights on the New Testament, 1908. For a detailed comparison between the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American) Acts see Rackham, The Acts of the Apostles, xxii.  (3) In Acts the Western type of text has its chief significance. It is the meet of the late Friedrich Blass, the famous classicist of Germany, to have shown that in Luke's writings (Gospel and Acts) the Western class (especially D) has its most marked characteristics. This fact is entirely independent of theory advanced by Blass which will be cussed directly. The chief modern revolt against theories of Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek is the new interest felt in the value of the Western type of text. In particular Codex Bezae has come to the front in the Book of Acts. The feeble support that Codex Bezae has in its peculiar readings in Acts (due to absence of Curetonian Syriac and of the Old Latin) makes it difficult always to estimate the value of this document. But certainly these readings deserve careful consideration, and some of them may be correct, whatever view one holds of the Codex Bezae text. The chief variations are, as is usual with the Western text, additions and paraphrases. Some of the prejudice against Codex Bezae has disappeared as a result of modern discussion.  (4) Bornemann in 1848 argued that Codex Bezae in Acts represented the original text. But he has had very few followers.  (5) J. Rendel Harris (1891) sought to show that Codex Bezae (itself a bilingual MS) had been Latinized. He argued that already in 150 A.D. a bilingual manuscript existed. But this theory has not won a strong following.  (6) Chase (1893) sought to show that the peculiarities were due to translation from the Syriac.  (7) Blass in 1895 created a sensation by arguing in his Commentary on Acts (Acta Apostolorum, 24) that Luke had issued two editions of the Acts, as he later urged about the Gospel of Luke (Philology of the Gospels, 1898). In 1896 Blass published this Roman form of the text of Acts (Acta Apostolorum, secundum Formam quae videtur Romanam). Blass calls this first, rough, unabridged copy of Acts (beta) and considers that it was issued at Rome. The later edition, abridged and revised, he calls alpha. Curiously enough, in  Acts 11:28 , Codex Bezae has "when we had gathered together," making Luke present at Antioch. The idea of two editions is not wholly original with Blass. Leclerc, a Dutch philologist, had suggested the notion as early as the beginning of the 18th century. Bishop Lightfoot had also mentioned it (On a Fresh Revision of the New Testament, 29). But Blass worked the matter out and challenged the world of scholarship with his array of arguments. He has not carried his point with all, though he has won a respectable following. Zahn (Einl, II, 338, 1899) had already been working toward the same view (348). He accepts in the main Blass' theory, as do Belser, Nestle, Salmon, Zockler. Blass acknowledges his debt to Corssen (Der cyprianische Text der Acta Apostolorum, 1892), but Corssen considers the alpha text as the earlier and the beta text as a later revision.  (8) Hilgenfeld (Acta Apostolorum, etc., 1899) accepts the notion of two edd, but denies identity of authorship.  (9) Schmiedel (Encyclopedia Biblica) vigorously and at much length attacks Blass' position, else "the conclusions reached in the foregoing sections would have to be withdrawn." He draws his conclusions and then demolishes Blass! He does find weak spots in Blass' armor as others have done (B. Weiss, Der Codex D in der Apostelgeschichte, 1897; Page, Class. Rev., 1897; Harnack, The Acts of the Apostles, 1909, 45). See also Knowling, The Acts of the Apostles, 1900, 47, for a sharp indictment of Blass' theory as being too simple and lacking verification.  (10) Harnack (The Acts of the Apostles, 48) doubts if Luke himself formally published the book. He thinks that he probably did not give the book a final revision, and that friends issued two or more editions He considers that the so-called beta recension has a "series of interpolations" and so is later than the alpha text.  (11) Ramsay (The Church in the Roman Empire, 150; Paul the Traveler, 27; The Expositor, 1895) considers the beta text to be a 2nd-century revision by a copyist who has preserved some very valuable 2nd-century testimony to the text.  (12) Headlam (HDB) does not believe that the problem has as yet been scientifically attacked, but that the solution lies in the textual license of scribes of the Western type (compare Hort, Introduction, 122). But Headlam is still shy of "Western" readings. The fact is that the Western readings are sometimes correct as against the Neutral (compare  Matthew 27:49 ). It is not necessary in  Acts 11:20  to say that Hellenas is in Western authorities (AD, etc.) but is not a Western reading. It is at any rate too soon to say the final word about the text of Acts, though on the whole the alpha text still holds the field as against the beta text. The Syriac text is, of course, later, and out of court.  III. Unity of the Book.  It is not easy to discuss this question, apart from that of authorship. But they are not exactly the same. One may be convinced of the unity of the book and yet not credit it to Luke, or, indeed, to anyone in the 1st century. Of course, if Luke is admitted to be the author of the book, the whole matter is simplified. His hand is in it all whatever sources he used. If Luke is not the author, there may still have been a competent historian at work, or the book may be a mere compilation. The first step, therefore, is to attack the problem of unity. Holtzmann (Einl, 383) holds Luke to be the author of the "we" sections only. Schmiedel denies that the Acts is written by a companion of Paul, though it is by the same author as the Gospel bearing Luke's name. In 1845 Schleiermacher credited the "we" sections to Timothy, not to Luke. For a good sketch of theories of "sources," see Knowling on Acts, 25. Van Manen (1890) resolved the book into two parts, Acta Petri and Acta Pauli, combined by a redactor. Sorof (1890) ascribes one source to Luke, one to Timothy. Spitta also has two sources (a Pauline-Lukan and a Jewish-Christian) worked over by a redactor.  Clemen (1905) has four sources (History of the Hellenists, History of Peter, History of Paul, and a Journey of Paul), all worked over by a series of editors. Hilgenfeld (1895) has three sources (Acts of Peter, Acts of the Seven, Acts of Paul). Jungst (1895) has a Pauline source and a Petrine source J. Weiss (1893) admits sources, but claims that the book has unity and a definite aim. B. Weiss (1902) conceives an early source for the first part of the book. Harnack (The Acts of the Apostles, 1909, 41) has small patience with all this blind criticism: "With them the book passes as a comparatively late patchwork compilation, in which the part taken by the editor is insignificant yet in all cases detrimental; the `we' sections are not the property of the author, but an extract from a source, or even a literary fiction." He charges the critics with "airy conceit and lofty contempt." Harnack has done a very great service in carefully sifting the matter in his Luke the Physician (1907). He gives detailed proof that the "we" sections are in the same style and by the same author as the rest of the book (26-120). Harnack does not claim originality in this line of argument:  "It has been often stated and often proved that the 'we' sections in vocabulary, in syntax, and in style are most intimately bound up with the whole work, and that this work itself including the Gospel, in spite of all diversity in its parts, is distinguished by a grand unity of literary form" (Luke the Physician, 26). He refers to the "splendid demonstration of this unity" by Klostermann (Vindiciae Lucanae, 1866), to B. Weiss, who, in his commentary (1893, 2 Aufl, 1902) "has done the best work in demonstrating the literary unity of the whole work," to "the admirable contributions" of Vogel (Zur Charakteristik des Lukas, etc., 2 Aufl, 1899) to the "yet more careful and minute investigations" of Hawkins (Horae Synopticae, 1899, 2nd edition, 1909), to the work of Hobart (The Medical Language of Luke, 1882), who "has proved only too much" (Luke the Physician, 175), but "the evidence is of overwhelming force" (198). Harnack only claims for himself that he has done the work in more detail and with more minute accuracy without claiming too much (27). But the conversion of Harnack to this view of Acts is extremely significant. It ought not to be necessary any more to refute the partition theories of the book, or to set forth in detail the proofs for the unity of the book.  Perhaps the compilation theory of Acts is nowhere set forth more cogently than in McGiffert's The Apostolic Age (1897). See a powerful refutation of his argument by Ramsay in Pauline and Other Studies (1906, 302-21). "I think his clever argumentation is sophistical" (305). Harnack is fully aware that he has gone over to the rode of "Ramsay, Weiss and Zahn": "The results at which I have arrived not only approach very nearly to, but are often coincident with, the results of their research" (The Acts of the Apostles, 302). He is afraid that if these scholars failed to get the ear of critics "there is little prospect of claiming the attention of critics and compelling them to reconsider their position." But he has the advantage of coming to this conclusion from the other side. Moreover, if Harnack was won by the force of the facts, others may be. This brief sketch of Harnack's experience may take the place of detailed presentation of the arguments for the unity of the book. Harnack sets forth in great wealth of detail the characteristic idioms of the "we" sections side by side with parallels in other parts of Acts and the Gospel of Luke. The same man wrote the rest of Acts who wrote the "we" sections. This fact should now be acknowledged as proven. This does not mean that the writer, a personal witness in the "we" sections, had no sources for the other parts of Acts. This aspect of the matter will be considered a little later.  IV. The Author.  Assuming the unity of the book, the argument runs as follows: The author was a companion of Paul. The "we" sections prove that ( Acts 16:10-17 ;  Acts 20:6-16 ; 21; 21 27; 21 27 28). These sections have the fullness of detail and vivid description natural to an eye-witness. This companion was with Paul in the second missionary journey at Troas and at Philippi, joined Paul's party again at Philippi on the return to Jerusalem during the third tour, and probably remained with Paul till he went to Rome. Some of Paul's companions came to him at Rome: others are so described in the book as to preclude authorship. Aristarchus, Aquila and Priscilla, Erastus, Gaius, Mark, Silas, Timothy, Trophimus, Tychicus and others more or less insignificant from the point of view of connection with Paul (like Crescens, Demas, Justus, Linus, Pudens, Sopater, etc.) are easily eliminated. Curiously enough Luke and Titus are not mentioned in Acts by name at all. They are distinct persons as is stated in  2 Timothy 4:10  ff. Titus was with Paul in Jerusalem at the conference ( Galatians 2:1 ) and was his special envoy to Corinth during the time of trouble there. ( 2 Corinthians 2:1, 12:18. )  He was later with Paul in Crete ( Titus 1:5 ). But the absence of mention of Titus in Acts may be due to the fact that he was a brother of Luke (compare  2 Corinthians 8:18 ;  2 Corinthians 12:18 ). So A. Souter in DCG, article "Luke." If Luke is the author, it is easy to understand why his name does not appear. If Titus is his brother, the same explanation occurs. As between Luke and Titus the medical language of Acts argues for Luke. The writer was a physician. This fact Hobart (The Medical Language of Luke, 1882) has demonstrated. Compare Zahn, Einl, 2, 435; Harnack's Luke the Physician, 177. The arguments from the use of medical terms are not all of equal weight. But the style is colored at points by the language of a physician. The writer uses medical terms in a technical sense. This argument involves a minute comparison with the writings of physicians of the time. Thus in  Acts 28:3  ff kathapto, according to Hobart (288), is used in the sense of poisonous matter invading the body, as in Dioscorides, Animal. Ven. Proem. So Galen, De Typis 4 (VII, 467), uses it "of fever fixing on parts of the body." Compare Harnack, Luke the Physician, 177. Harnack agrees also that the terms of the diagnosis in  Acts 28:8  "are medically exact and can be vouched for from medical literature" (ibid., 176). Hobart has overdone his argument and adduced many examples that are not pertinent, but a real residuum remains, according to Harnack. Then pimprasthai is a technical term for swelling. Let these serve as examples. The interest of the writer in matters of disease is also another indication, compare  Luke 8:43 . Now Luke was a companion of Paul during his later ministry and was a physician. ( Colossians 4:14 ). Hence, he fulfils all the requirements of the case. The argument thus far is only probable, it is true; but there is to be added the undoubted fact that the same writer wrote both Gospel and Acts ( Acts 1:1 ). The direct allusion to the Gospel is reinforced by identity of style and method in the two books.  The external evidence is clear on the matter. Both Gospel and Acts are credited to Luke the physician. The Muratorian canon ascribes Acts to Luke. By the end of the 2nd century the authority of the Acts is as well established as that of the Gospel (Salmon, Introduction to the New Testament, 1885, 366). Irenaeus, Tertullian, Clement of Alexandria, all call Luke the author of the book. The argument is complete. It is still further strengthened by the fact that the point of view of the book is Pauline and by the absence of references to Paul's epistles. If one not Paul's companion had written Acts, he would certainly have made some use of them. Incidentally, also, this is an argument for the early date of the Acts. The proof that has won Harnack, the leader of the left in Germany, to the acknowledgment of the Lukan authorship of Acts ought to win all to this position.  V. Canonicity.  The use of the Acts does not appear so early or so frequently as is true of the gospels and the Pauline epistles. The reason obvious. The epistles had a special field and the gospels appealed to all. Only gradually would Acts circulate. At first we find literary allusions without the name of book or author. But Holtzmann (Einl, 1892, 406) admits the use of Acts by Ignatius, Justin Martyr, Polycarp. The use of the Gospel according to Luke by Tatian and Marcion really revolves knowledge of the Acts. But in Irenaeus frequently (Adv. Haer., i. 23, 1, etc.) the Acts is credited to Luke and regarded as Scripture. The Canon of Muratori list it as Scripture. Tertullian and Clement of Alexandria attribute the book to Luke and treat it as Scripture. By the times of Eusebius the book is generally acknowledged as part of the canon. Certain of the heretical parties reject it (like the Ebionites, Marcionites, Manicheans). But by this time the Christians had come to lay stress on history (Gregory, Canon and Text of the New Testament, 1907, 184), and the place of Acts is now secure in the canon.  VI. Date.  1. Luke's relations to Josephus.  The acceptance of the Lukan authorship settles the question of some of the dates presented by critics. Schmiedel places the date of Acts between 105 and 130 A.D. (Encyclopedia Biblica). He assumes as proven that Luke made use of the writings of Josephus. It has never been possible to take with much seriousness the claim that the Acts shows acquaintance with Josephus. See Keim, Geschichte Jesu, III, 1872, 134, and Krenkel, Josephus und Lucas, 1894, for the arguments in favor of that position. The words quoted to prove it are in the main untechnical words of common use. The only serious matter is the mention of Theudas and Judas the Galilean in  Acts 5:36  ff and Josephus (Ant., XX, v, 1). In Josephus the names occur some twenty lines apart and the resemblance is only slight indeed. The use of peitho in connection with Theudas and apostesai concerning Judas is all that requires notice. Surely, then, two common words for "persuade" and "revolt" are not enough to carry conviction of the writer's use of Josephus. The matter is more than offset by the differences in the two reports of the death of Herod Agrippa ( Acts 12:19-23 ; Josephus, Ant, XVIII, vi, 7, XIX, viii, 2). The argument about Josephus may be definitely dismissed from the field. With that goes all the ground for a 2nd-century date. Other arguments have been adduced (see Holtzmann, Einl, 1892, 405) such as the use of Paul's epistles, acquaintance with Plutarch, Arrian and Pausanias, because of imitation in method of work (i.e. parallel lives of Peter and Paul, periods of history, etc.), correction of Galatians in Acts (for instance,  Galatians 1:17-24  and  Acts 9:26-30   Galatians 2:1-10  and  Acts 15:1-33 ). The parallel with Plutarch is fanciful, while the use of Panl's epistles is by no means clear, the absence of such use, indeed, being one of the characteristics of the book. The variation from Galatians is far better explained on the assumption that Luke had not seen the epistles.  2. 80 A.D. Is the Limit if the Book Is to Be Credited to Luke.  The majority of modern critics who accept the Lukan authorship place it between 70 and 80 A.D. So Harnack, Lechler, Meyer, Ramsay, Sanday, Zahn. This opinion rests mainly on the idea that the Gospel according to Luke was written after the destruction of Jerusalem in 70 A.D. It is claimed that  Luke 21:20  shows that this tragedy had already occurred, as compared with  Mark 13:14  and  Matthew 24:15 . But the mention of armies is very general, to be sure. Attention is called also to the absence of the warning in Luke. Harnack (The Acts of the Apostles, 291) admits that the arguments in favor of the date 70 to 80 are by no means conclusive. He writes "to warn critics against a too hasty closing of the chronological question." In his new book (Neue Untersuchungen zur Apostelgeschichte, etc., 1911, S. 81) Harnack definitely accepts the date before the destruction of Jerusalem. Lightfoot would give no date to Acts because of the uncertainty about the date of the Gospel.  3. Before 70 A.D.  This date is supported by Blass, Headlam, Maclean, Rackham, Salmon. Harhack, indeed, considers that "very weighty considerations" argue for the early date. He, as already stated, now takes his stand for the early date. It obviously the simplest way to understand Luke's close of the Acts to be due to the fact that Paul was still in prison. Harnack contends that the efforts to explain away this situation are not "quite satisfactory or very illuminating." He does not mention Paul's death because he was still alive. The dramatic purpose to bring Paul to Rome is artificial. The supposition of a third book from the use of proton in  Acts 1:1  is quite gratuitous, since in the Koine, not to say the earlier Greek, "first was often used when only two were mentioned (compare "our first story" and "second story," "first wife" and "second wife"). The whole tone of the book is that which one would naturally have before 64 A.D. After the burning of Rome and the destruction of Jerusalem the attitude maintained in the book toward Romans and Jews would have been very difficult unless the date was a long times afterward Harnack wishes "to help a doubt to its lust dues." That "doubt" of Harnack is destined to become the certainty of the future. (Since this sentence was written Harnack has settled his own doubt.) The book will, I think, be finally credited to the time 63 A.D. in Rome. The Gospel of Luke will then naturally belong to the period of Paul's imprisonment in Caesarea. The judgment of Moffatt (Historical New Testament, 1901, 416) that "it cannot be earlier than 80 A.D. is completely upset by the powerful attack of Harnack on his own previous position. See also Moffatt's Introduction to the Literature of the New Testament (1911) and Koch's Die Abfassungszeit des lukanischen Geschichtswerkes (1911).  VII. Sources Used by Luke.  If we now assume that Luke is the author of the Acts, the question remains as to the character of the sources used by him. One is at liberty to appeal to  Luke 1:1-4  for the general method of the author. He used both oral and written sources. In the Acts the matter is somewhat simplified by the fact that Luke was the companion of Paul for a considerable part of the narrative (the "we" sections,  Acts 16:11-17 ;  Acts 20:5 ;  Acts 21:18 ;  Acts 27  and 28). It is more than probable that Luke was with Paul also during his last stay in Jerusalem and during the imprisonment at Caesarea.  There is no reason to think that Luke suddenly left Paul in Jerusalem and returned to Caesarea only when he started to Rome ( Acts 27:1 ). The absence of "we" is natural here, since it is not a narrative of travel, but a sketch of Paul's arrest and series of defenses. The very abundance of material here, as in  Acts 20  and 21, argues for the presence of Luke. But at any rate Luke has access to Paul himself for information concerning this period, as was true of the second, from  Acts 13  to the end of the book. Luke was either present or he could have learned from Paul the facts used. He may have kept a travel diary, which was drawn upon when necessary. Luke could have taken notes of Paul's addresses in Jerusalem ( Acts 22 ) and Caesarea ( Acts 24-26 ). From these, with Paul's help, he probably composed the account of Paul's conversion ( Acts 9:1-30 ). If, as I think is true, the book was written during Paul's first Roman imprisonment, Luke had the benefit of appeal to Paul at all points. But, if so, he was thoroughly independent in style and assimilated his materials like a true historian. Paul (and also Philip for part of it) was a host witness to the events about Stephen in  Acts 6:8-8:1  and a participant of the work in Antioch (11:19-30). Philip, the of Paul's company (21:8) on the last journey to Jerusalem, was probably in Caesarea still during Paul's confinement there. He could have told Luke the events in  Acts 6:1-7  and 8:4-40. In Caesarea also the story of Peter's work may have been derived, possibly even from Cornelius himself (9:32-11:18). Whether Luke ever went to Antioch or not we do not know (Codex Bezae has "we" in  Acts 11:28 ), though he may have had access to the Antiochian traditions. But he did go to Jerusalem. However, the narrative in  Acts 12  probably rests on the authority of John Mark ( Acts 12:12, 25 ), in whose mother's house the disciples were assembled. Luke was apparently thrown with Mark in Rome ( Colossians 4:10 ), if not before. For  Acts 1-5  the matter does not at first seem so clear, but these chapters are not necessarily discredited on that account. It is remarkable, as ancient historians made so little mention of their sources, that we can connect Luke in the Acts with so many probable fountains of evidence. Barnabas (4:36) was able to tell much about the origin of the work in Jerusalem. So could Mnason. Philip also was one of the seven (6:5; 21:8). We do not know that Luke met Peter in Rome, though that is possible. But during the stay in Jerusalem and Caesarea (two years) Luke had abundant opportunity to learn the narrative of the great events told in  Acts 1-5 . He perhaps used both oral and written sources for this section. One cannot, of course, prove by linguistic or historical arguments the precise nature of Luke's sources in Acts. Only in broad outlines the probable materials may be sketched.  XIII. Analysis. 1. The connection between the work of the apostles and that of Jesus ( Acts 1:1-11 ).  2. The equipment of the early disciples for their task ( Acts 1:12-2:47 ). (a) The disciples obeying Christ's parting command ( Acts 1:12-24 ). (b) The place of Judas filled ( Acts 1:15-26 ). (c) Miraculous manifestations of the presence of the Holy Spirit ( Acts 2:1-13 ). (d) Peter's interpretation of the situation ( Acts 2:14-36 ). (e) The immediate effect of the sermon ( Acts 2:37-41 ). (f) The new spirit in the Christian community ( Acts 2:42-47 ).  3. The development of the work in Jerusalem ( Acts 3:1-8:1 ). (a) An incident in the work of Peter and John with Peter's apologetic ( Acts 3 ). (b) Opposition of the Sadducees aroused by the preaching of the resurrection of Jesus ( Acts 4:1-31 ). (c) An internal difficulty, the problem of poverty ( Acts 4:32-5:11 ). (d) Great progress of the cause in the city ( Acts 5:12-16 ). (e) Renewed hostility of the Sadducees and Gamaliel's retort to the Pharisees ( Acts 5:17-42 ). (f) A crisis in church life and the choice of the seven Hellenists ( Acts 6:1-7 ). (g) Stephen's spiritual interpretation of Christianity stirs the antagonism of the Pharisees and leads to his violent death ( Acts 6:8-8:1 ).  4. The compulsory extension of the gospel to Judea, Samaria and the neighboring regions ( Acts 8:1-40 ). (a) The great persecution, with Saul as leader ( Acts 8:1-4 ). (b) Philip's work as a notable example of the work of the scattered disciples ( Acts 8:5-40 ).  5. The conversion of Saul changes the whole situation for Christianity ( Acts 9:1-31 ).  Read Complete Article...    APOSTLES, GOSPEL OF THE TWELVE  See  APOCRYPHAL GOSPELS .  TWELVE APOSTLES, GOSPELS OF THE  See  APOCRYPHAL GOSPELS .
AGAR|   AGAR  a'-gar (Agar). Found once in the Apocrypha in the Greek (Baruch 3:23) probably for the Old Testament Hagar, mother of Ishmael, whose children are mentioned with the merchants of Meran (Midian) and Teman. In  1 Chronicles 5:10  the "Hagarites" the King James Version, are located East of Gilead, and In the days of Saul were at war with the tribe of Reuben. See also  1 Chronicles 5:19, 20  and  1 Chronicles 27:31 . In  Psalm 83:6  the name of the same people is Hagarenes.
AMRAM|Kindred of the High; i.e., "friend of Jehovah."  (1.) The son of Kohath, the son of Levi. He married Jochebed, "his father's sister," and was the father of Aaron, Miriam, and Moses ( Exodus 6:18 ,  20;  Numbers 3:19 ). He died in Egypt at the age of 137 years ( Exodus 6:20 ). His descendants were called Amramites ( Numbers 3:27 ;  1 Chronicles 26:23 ).  (2.)  Ezra 10:34 . 
ANDRONICUS|Man-conquering, a Jewish Christian, the kinsman and fellowprisoner of Paul ( Romans 16:7 ); "of note among the apostles." 
ACCAD|The high land or mountains, a city in the land of Shinar. It has been identified with the mounds of Akker Kuf, some 50 miles to the north of Babylon; but this is doubtful. It was one of the cities of Nimrod's kingdom ( Genesis 10:10 ). It stood close to the Euphrates, opposite Sippara. (see  SEPHARVAIM .) It is also the name of the country of which this city was the capital, namely, northern or upper Babylonia. The Accadians who came from the "mountains of the east," where the ark rested, attained to a high degree of civilization. In the Babylonian inscriptions they are called "the black heads" and "the black faces," in contrast to "the white race" of Semitic descent. They invented the form of writing in pictorial hieroglyphics, and also the cuneiform system, in which they wrote many books partly on papyrus and partly on clay. The Semitic Babylonians ("the white race"), or, as some scholars think, first the Cushites, and afterwards, as a second immigration, the Semites, invaded and conquered this country; and then the Accadian language ceased to be a spoken language, although for the sake of its literary treasures it continued to be studied by the educated classes of Babylonia. A large portion of the Ninevite tablets brought to light by Oriental research consists of interlinear or parallel translations from Accadian into Assyrian; and thus that long-forgotten language has been recovered by scholars. It belongs to the class of languages called agglutinative, common to the Tauranian race; i.e., it consists of words "glued together," without declension of conjugation. These tablets in a remarkable manner illustrate ancient history. Among other notable records, they contain an account of the Creation which closely resembles that given in the book of Genesis, of the Sabbath as a day of rest, and of the Deluge and its cause. (see  BABYLON ; CHALDEA.) 
AMALEKITE|A tribe that dwelt in Arabia Petraea, between the Dead Sea and the Red Sea. They were not the descendants of Amalek, the son of Eliphaz, for they existed in the days of Abraham ( Genesis 14:7 ). They were probably a tribe that migrated from the shores of the Persian Gulf and settled in Arabia. "They dwelt in the land of the south...from Havilah until thou comest to Shur" ( Numbers 13:29 ;  1 Samuel 15:7 ). They were a pastoral, and hence a nomadic race. Their kings bore the hereditary name of Agag ( Numbers 24:7 ;  1 Samuel 15:8 ). They attempted to stop the Israelites when they marched through their territory ( Deuteronomy 25:18 ), attacking them at Rephidim ( Exodus 17:8 -13; Comp.  Deuteronomy 25:17 ;  1 Samuel 15:2 ). They afterwards attacked the Israelites at Hormah ( Numbers 14:45 ). We read of them subsequently as in league with the Moabites ( Judges 3:13 ) and the Midianites ( Judges 6:3 ). Saul finally desolated their territory and destroyed their power ( 1 Samuel 14:48 ;  15:3 ), and David recovered booty from them ( 1 Samuel 30:18 -20). In the Babylonian inscriptions they are called Sute, in those of Egypt Sittiu, and the Amarna tablets include them under the general name of Khabbati, or "plunderers." 
APHRAH|   APHRAH  af'-ra: the King James Version form for the Revised Version (British and American) BETH-LEAPHRAH ( Micah 1:10 ).
AHITUB|Brother of goodness = good.  (1.) The son of Phinehas. On the death of his grandfather Eli he succeeded to the office of high priest, and was himself succeeded by his son Ahijah ( 1 Samuel 14:3 ;  22:9 ,  11,  12,  20). (2.) The father of Zadok, who was made high priest by Saul after the extermination of the family of Ahimelech ( 1 Chronicles 6:7 ,  8;  2 Samuel 8:17 ). 
ANIM|Fountains, a city in the mountains of Judah ( Joshua 15:50 ), now el-Ghuwein, near Eshtemoh, about 10 miles south-west of Hebron. 
AZMON|   AZMON  az'-mon (`atsmon; Asemona, "strong"): On the Southwest border of Israel ( Numbers 34:4, 5   Joshua 15:4 ). Trumbull identifies it with `Ain el-Qaseimeh, Northwest of Kadesh Barnea (Kad. Baruch., 117, 289).
AZAZEL|( Leviticus 16:8 ,  10,  26,  Revised Version only here; rendered "scape-goat" in the Authorized Version). This word has given rise to many different views. Some Jewish interpreters regard it as the name of a place some 12 miles east of Jerusalem, in the wilderness. Others take it to be the name of an evil spirit, or even of Satan. But when we remember that the two goats together form a type of Christ, on whom the Lord "laid the iniquity of us all," and examine into the root meaning of this word (viz.,  "separation"), the interpretation of those who regard the one goat as representing the atonement made, and the other, that "for Azazel," as representing the effect of the great work of atonement (viz.,  the complete removal of sin), is certainly to be preferred. The one goat which was "for Jehovah" was offered as a sin-offering, by which atonement was made. But the sins must also be visibly banished, and therefore they were symbolically laid by confession on the other goat, which was then "sent away for Azazel" into the wilderness. The form of this word indicates intensity, and therefore signifies the total separation of sin: it was wholly carried away. It was important that the result of the sacrifices offered by the high priest alone in the sanctuary should be embodied in a visible transaction, and hence the dismissal of the "scape-goat." It was of no consequence what became of it, as the whole import of the transaction lay in its being sent into the wilderness bearing away sin. As the goat "for Jehovah" was to witness to the demerit of sin and the need of the blood of atonement, so the goat "for Azazel" was to witness to the efficacy of the sacrifice and the result of the shedding of blood in the taking away of sin. 
AMAZIAH|Strengthened by Jehovah.  (1.) A Levite, son of Hilkiah, of the descendants of Ethan the Merarite ( 1 Chronicles 6:45 ). (2.) The son and successor of Joash, and eighth king of the separate kingdom of Judah ( 2 Kings 14:1 -4). He began his reign by punishing the murderers of his father (5-7;  2 Chronicles 25:3 -5). He was the first to employ a mercenary army of 100,000 Israelite soldiers, which he did in his attempt to bring the Edomites again under the yoke of Judah ( 2 Chronicles 25:5 ,  6). He was commanded by a prophet of the Lord to send back the mercenaries, which he did ( 2 Chronicles 25:7 -10,  13), much to their annoyance. His obedience to this command was followed by a decisive victory over the Edomites ( 2 Chronicles 25:14 -16). Amaziah began to worship some of the idols he took from the Edomites, and this was his ruin, for he was vanquished by Joash, king of Israel, whom he challenged to battle. The disaster he thus brought upon Judah by his infatuation in proclaiming war against Israel probably occasioned the conspiracy by which he lost his life ( 2 Kings 14:8 -14,  19). He was slain at Lachish, whither he had fled, and his body was brought upon horses to Jerusalem, where it was buried in the royal sepulchre ( 2 Kings 14:19 ,  20;  2 Chronicles 25:27 ,  28). (3.) A priest of the golden calves at Bethel ( Amos 7:10 -17). (4.) The father of Joshah, one of the Simeonite chiefs in the time of Hezekiah ( 1 Chronicles 4:34 ). 
ANAK|Long-necked, the son of Arba, father of the Anakim ( Joshua 15:13 ;  21:11 ,  Hebrews Anok). 
ACHZIB|Falsehood.  (1.) A town in the Shephelah, or plain country of Judah ( Joshua 15:44 ); probably the same as Chezib of  Genesis 38:5  = Ain Kezbeh. (2.) A Phoenician city (the Gr. Ecdippa), always retained in their possession though assigned to the tribe of Asher ( Joshua 19:29 ;  Judges 1:31 ). It is identified with the modern es-Zib, on the Mediterranean, about 8 miles north of Accho. 
AZEL|Noble, a descendant of king Saul ( 1 Chronicles 8:37 ;  9:43 ,  44). 
ASAPH|Convener, or collector.  (1.) A Levite; one of the leaders of David's choir ( 1 Chronicles 6:39 ). Psalms 50 and 73-83 inclusive are attributed to him. He is mentioned along with David as skilled in music, and a "seer" ( 2 Chronicles 29:30 ). The "sons of Asaph," mentioned in  1 Chronicles 25:1 ,  2 Chronicles 20:14 , and  Ezra 2:41 , were his descendants, or more probably a class of poets or singers who recognized him as their master. (2.) The "recorder" in the time of Hezekiah ( 2 Kings 18:18 ,  37). (3.) The "keeper of the king's forest," to whom Nehemiah requested from Artaxerxes a "letter" that he might give him timber for the temple at Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 2:8 ). 
ARIMATHAEA|   ARIMATHAEA  ar-i-ma-the'-a (Arimathaia): "A city of the Jews," the home of Joseph in whose sepulchre the body of Jesus was laid. Its identity is the subject of much conjecture. The Onomasticon of Eusebius and Jerome identifies it with Ramathaim-Zophim in the hill-country of Ephraim ( 1 Samuel 11 ), which is Ramah the birthplace and burial-place of Samuel ( 1 Samuel 1:19 ;  1 Samuel 25:1 ), and places it near Timnah on the borders of Judah and Dan. G. A. Smith thinks it may be the modern Beit Rima, a village on an eminence 2 miles North of Timnah. Others incline to Ramallah, 8 miles North of Jerusalem and 3 miles from Bethel ( Matthew 27:57   Mark 15:43   Luke 23:51   John 19:38 ).  S. F. Hunter  JOSEPH OF ARIMATHAEA  (A Arimathaias; for etymology, etc., of Joseph, see general article on JOSEPH): Joseph of Arimathea-a place the locality of which is doubtful, but lying probably to the Northwest of Jerusalem-was a "rich man" ( Matthew 27:57 ), "a councilor of honorable estate," or member of the Sanhedrin ( Mark 15:43   Luke 23:50 ), "a good and righteous man.... who was looking for the kingdom of God" ( Luke 23:50   Mark 15:43 ), and "himself was Jesus' disciple" ( Matthew 27:57   John 19:38 ). Although he kept his discipleship secret "for fear of the Jews" ( John 19:38 ), he was yet faithful to his allegiance in that he absented himself from the meeting which found Jesus guilty of death (compare  Luke 23:51   Mark 14:64 ). But the condemnation of his Lord awakened the courage and revealed the true faith of Joseph. On the evening after the crucifixion he went "boldly" to Pilate and begged the body of Jesus. There is a fine touch in that he himself took down the body from the cross. With the assistance of Nicodemus he wound it in fine linen with spices (compare  Matthew 27:57 , Joseph was a "rich man") and brought it to the new sepulcher in the garden near the place of His crucifixion. There they "laid him in a tomb that was hewn in stone, where never man had yet lain" and `rolled a stone against the door of the tomb' (compare  Matthew 27:57-60   Mark 15:42-46   Luke 23:50-53   John 19:38-42 ). In this was held to be the fulfillment of the prophecy of  Isaiah 53:9 .  The Gospel of Peter, written probably in Syria about the middle of the 2nd century, gives a slightly different account. According to this Joseph, "the friend of Pilate and the Lord," was present at the trial of Jesus, and immediately upon its conclusion besought of Pilate that he might have the body for burial. This was granted, and after the crucifixion the Jews handed the body over to Joseph (compare Hennecke, Neutestamentliche Apokryphen, 27-30). Legends of a later origin record that Joseph was sent by Philip from Gaul to Britain along with 11 other disciples in 63 A.D., and built an oratory at Glastonbury (compare PHILIP, the Apostle), that he brought the Holy Grail to England, and that he freed Ireland from snakes.  C. M. Kerr
ARAMEANS|   ARAMAEANS; ARAMEANS  ar-a-me'-ans: Often in the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American) Syrians. See  SYRIA .
ATAD|Buckthorn, a place where Joseph and his brethren, when on their way from Egypt to Hebron with the remains of their father Jacob, made for seven days a "great and very sore lamentation." On this account the Canaanites called it "Abel-mizraim" ( Genesis 50:10 ,  11). It was probably near Hebron. The word is rendered "bramble" in  Judges 9:14 , 15, and "thorns" in  Psalm 58:9 . 
AMPLIAS|A Roman Christian saluted by Paul ( Romans 16:8 ). 
AUGUSTUS|Augustus The cognomen of the first Roman emperor, C. Julius Caesar Octavianus, during whose reign Christ was born ( Luke 2:1 ). His decree that "all the world should be taxed" was the divinely ordered occasion of Jesus' being born, according to prophecy ( Micah 5:2 ), in Bethlehem. This name being simply a title meaning "majesty" or "venerable," first given to him by the senate (B.C. 27), was borne by succeeding emperors. Before his death (A.D. 14) he associated Tiberius with him in the empire ( Luke 3:1 ), by whom he was succeeded. Augustus band ( Acts 27:1 .: literally,  of Sebaste,  the Greek form of Augusta,  the name given to Caesarea in honour of Augustus Caesar). Probably this "band" or cohort consisted of Samaritan soldiers belonging to Caesarea.
AMOK|   AMOK  a'-mok (`amoq, "deep"): A chief priest who came to Jerusalem with Zerubbabel ( Nehemiah 12:7 ) and the forefather of Eber, who was priest in the days of Joiakim ( Nehemiah 12:20 ).
ASUPPIM|( 1 Chronicles 26:15 ,  17,  Authorized Version; but in Revised Version,  "storehouse"), properly the house of stores for the priests. In  Nehemiah 12:25  the Authorized Version has "thresholds," marg. "treasuries" or "assemblies;" Revised Version, "storehouses." 
ARNAN|   ARNAN  ar'-nan (`arnan, "joyous"): A descendant of David and founder of a family ( 1 Chronicles 3:21 ). The Septuagint has Orna.
APPAIM|   APPAIM  ap'-aa-im, ap'-a-im (appayim, "nostrils"): A son of Nadab of the house of Jerahmeel, of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:30 f ).
ABIJAM|Father of the sea; i.e., "seaman" the name always used in Kings of the king of Judah, the son of Rehoboam, elsewhere called Abijah ( 1 Kings 15:1 , 7, 8). (see  ABIJAH .) 
AMINADAB|   AMINADAB  a-min'-a-dab (Aminadab): the King James Version: Greek form of Amminadab (which see). Thus the Revised Version (British and American) ( Matthew 1:4   Luke 3:33 ).
ARMENIA|High land, occurs only in Authorized Version,  2 Kings 19:37 ; in Revised Version, "Ararat," which is the Hebrew word. A country in western Asia lying between the Caspian and the Black Sea. Here the ark of Noah rested after the Deluge ( Genesis 8:4 ). It is for the most part high table-land, and is watered by the Aras, the Kur, the Euphrates, and the Tigris. Ararat was properly the name of a part of ancient Armenia. Three provinces of Armenia are mentioned in  Jeremiah 51:27 , Ararat, Minni, and Ashchenaz. Some, however, think Minni a contraction for Armenia. (see  ARARAT .) 
AIJALON|   AIJALON  a'-ja-lon ('ayyalon, "deerplace"; the King James Version, Ajalon ( Joshua 10:12 )):  (1) The name of a town allotted to the tribe of Dan ( Joshua 19:42 ), which was also designated a Levitical city ( Joshua 21:24 ), which fell to the Sons of Kohath ( 1 Chronicles 6:69 ). The first mention of Aijalon is in the narrative of Joshua's defeat of the five Amorite kings: "thou, Moon, in the valley of Aijalon" ( Joshua 10:12 ). The Danites failed to take it from the Amorites ( Judges 1:35 ), although the men of Ephraim held it in vassalage. Here Saul and Jonathan won a great victory over the Philistines ( 1 Samuel 14:31 ). At one time it was held by the tribe of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:13 ). Rehoboam fortified it against the kingdom of Israel ( 2 Chronicles 11:10 ). In the days of King Ahaz it was captured by the Philistines ( 2 Chronicles 28:18 ). It has been identified with the modern Yalo; its antiquity goes back to Tell el-Amarna Letters, in which it has mention. It Is situated Northwest of Jerusalem in a valley of the same name, which leads down from the mountains to the sea.  (2) A town in the tribe of Zebulun, site unknown, where Elon the judge was buried ( Judges 12:12 ).  Edward Mack
ARBITE|   ARBITE  ar'-bit (ha-'arbi): The Arbite or perhaps an inhabitant of Arabia in southern Judah ( Joshua 15:52 ). The epithet is used in connection with one of David's mighty men in  2 Samuel 23:35 ; where Paarai the Arbite occurs. In the parallel list ( 1 Chronicles 11:37 ) we have Naarai the son of Ezbai.
AMASA|Burden.  (1.) The son of Abigail, a sister of king David ( 1 Chronicles 2:17 ;  2 Samuel 17:25 ). He was appointed by David to command the army in room of his cousin Joab ( 2 Samuel 19:13 ), who afterwards treacherously put him to death as a dangerous rival ( 2 Samuel 20:4 -12). (2.) A son of Hadlai, and chief of Ephraim ( 2 Chronicles 28:12 ) in the reign of Ahaz. 
ATER|Shut; lame.  (1.)  Ezra 2:16 .  (2.)  Nehemiah 10:17 .  (3.)  Ezra 2:42 . 
ACHSHAPH|Fascination, a royal city of the Canaanites, in the north of Palestine ( Joshua 11:1 ;  12:20 ;  19:25 ). It was in the eastern boundary of the tribe of Asher, and is identified with the modern ruined village of Kesaf or Yasif, N.E. of Accho. 
ARMOURBEARER|An officer selected by kings and generals because of his bravery, not only to bear their armour, but also to stand by them in the time of danger. They were the adjutants of our modern armies ( Judges 9:54 ;  1 Samuel 14:7 ;  16:21 ;  31:6 ). 
ARGOB|Stony heap, an "island," as it has been called, of rock about 30 miles by 20, rising 20 or 30 feet above the table-land of Bashan; a region of crags and chasms wild and rugged in the extreme. On this "island" stood sixty walled cities, ruled over by Og. It is called Trachonitis ("the rugged region") in the New Testament ( Luke 3:1 ). These cities were conquered by the Israelites ( Deuteronomy 3:4 ;  1 Kings 4:13 ). It is now called the Lejah. Here "sixty walled cities are still traceable in a space of 308 square miles. The architecture is ponderous and massive. Solid walls 4 feet thick, and stones on one another without cement; the roofs enormous slabs of basaltic rock, like iron; the doors and gates are of stone 18 inches thick, secured by ponderous bars. The land bears still the appearance of having been called the `land of giants' under the giant Og." "I have more than once entered a deserted city in the evening, taken possession of a comfortable house, and spent the night in peace. Many of the houses in the ancient cities of Bashan are perfect, as if only finished yesterday. The walls are sound, the roofs unbroken, and even the window-shutters in their places. These ancient cities of Bashan probably contain the very oldest specimens of domestic architecture in the world" (Porter's Giant Cities). (see  BASHAN .) 
ARAMAEANS|   ARAMAEANS; ARAMEANS  ar-a-me'-ans: Often in the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American) Syrians. See  SYRIA .
ASHDODITES|   ASHDODITES  ash'-dod-its, ash'-doth-its: Inhabitants of ASHDOD (which see) ( Joshua 13:3 ; the King James Version Ashdothites,  Nehemiah 4:7 ).
ADDON|Low, one of the persons named in  Nehemiah 7:61  who could not "shew their father's house" on the return from captivity. This, with similar instances (ver. 63), indicates the importance the Jews attached to their genealogies. 
ABI|   ABI (1)  a'-bi ('abhi): The name of the mother of King Hezekiah, as given in  2 Kings 18:2 . Most naturally explained as a contraction of Abijah ("Yahweh is a father," or "is my father"), found in the parallel passage in  2 Chronicles 29:1 . The spelling in the oldest translations seems to indicate that 'abhi is not a copyist's error, but a genuine contracted form. She is spoken of as the daughter of Zechariah, and was of course the wife of Ahaz.  ABI (2)  a'-bi, in the composition of names ('abhi, "father"): The Hebrew words 'abh, "father," and 'ach, "brother," are used in the forming of names, both at the beginning and at the end of words, e.g. Abram ("exalted one"), Joah ("Yahweh is brother"), Ahab ("father's brother"). At the beginning of a word, however, the modified forms 'abhi and 'achi are the ones commonly used, e.g. Ahimelech ("king's brother") and Abimelech (by the same analogy "king's father").  These forms have characteristics which complicate the question of their use in proper names. Especially since the publication in 1896 of Studies in Hebrew Proper Names, by G. Buchanan Gray, the attention of scholars has been called to this matter, without the reaching of any perfect consensus of opinion.  The word 'abhi may be a nominative with an archaic ending ("father"), or in the construct state ("father-of"), or the form with the suffix ("my father"). Hence a proper name constructed with it may supposedly be either a clause or a sentence; if it is a sentence, either of the two words may be either subject or predicate. That is to say, the name Abimelech may supposedly mean either "father of a king," or "a king is father," or "a father is king," or "my father is king," or "a king is my father." Further, the clause "father of a king" may have as many variations of meaning as there are varieties of the grammatical genitive. Further still, it is claimed that either the word father or the word king may, in a name, be a designation of a deity. This gives a very large number of supposable meanings from which, in any case, to select the intended meaning.  The older scholarship regarded all these names as construct clauses. For example, Abidan is "father of a judge." It explained different instances as being different varieties of the genitive construction; for instance, Abihail, "father of might," means mighty father. The woman's name Abigail, "father of exultation," denotes one whose father is exultant. Abishai, "father of Jesse," denotes one to whom Jesse is father, and so with Abihud, "father of Judah," Abiel, "father of God," Abijah, "father of Yahweh." See the cases in detail in Gesenius' Lexicon.  The more recent scholarship regards most or all of the instances as sentences. In some cases it regards the second element in a name as a verb or adjective instead of a noun; but that is not important, inasmuch as in Hebrew the genitive construction might persist, even with the verb or adjective. But in the five instances last given the explanation, "my father is exultation," "is Jesse," "is Judah," "is God," "is Yahweh," certainly gives the meaning in a more natural way than by explaining these names as construct clauses.  There is sharp conflict over the question whether we ought to regard the suffix pronoun as present in these names-whether the five instances should not rather be translated Yahweh is father, God is father, Judah is father, Jesse is father, exultation is father. The question is raised whether the same rule prevails when the second word is a name or a designation of Deity as prevails in other cases. Should we explain one instance as meaning "my father is Jesse," and another as "God is father"?  A satisfactory discussion of this is possible only under a comprehensive study of Bible names. The argument is more or less complicated by the fact that each scholar looks to see what bearing it may have on the critical theories he holds. In the Hebrew Lexicon of Dr. Francis Brown the explanations exclude the construct theory; in most of the instances they treat a name as a sentence with "my father" as the subject; when the second part of the name is a designation of Deity they commonly make that the subject, and either exclude the pronoun or give it as an alternative. For most persons the safe method is to remember that the final decision is not yet reached, and to consider each name by itself, counting the explanation of it an open question.  See  NAMES, PROPER .  The investigations concerning Semitic proper names, both in and out of the Bible, have interesting theological bearings. It has always been recognized that words for father and brother, when combined in proper names with Yah, Yahu, El, Baal, or other proper names of a Deity, indicated some relation of the person named, or of his tribe, with the Deity. It is now held, though with many differences of opinion, that in the forming of proper names many other words, e.g. the words for king, lord, strength, beauty, and others, are also used as designations of Deity or of some particular Deity; and that the words father, brother, and the like may have the same use. To a certain extent the proper names are so many propositions in theology. It is technically possible to go very far in inferring that the people who formed such names thought of Deity or of some particular Deity as the father, the kinsman, the ruler, the champion, the strength, the glory of the tribe or of the individual. In particular one might infer the existence of a widely diffused doctrine of the fatherhood of God. It is doubtless superfluous to add that at present one ought to be very cautious in drawing or accepting inferences in this part of the field of human study.  Willis J. Beecher
ALEXANDRIANS|   ALEXANDRIANS  al-eg-zan'-dri-ans (Alexandreis): Jews of Alexandria, who had, with the Libertines and Cyrenians, a synagogue in Jerusalem. They were among those who disputed with Stephen ( Acts 6:9 ).
ARODITES|   ARODITES  a'-rod-its. See  AROD .
AARONITES|The descendants of Aaron, and therefore priests. Jehoiada, the father of Benaiah, led 3,700 Aaronites as "fighting men" to the support of David at Hebron ( 1 Chronicles 12:27 ). Eleazar ( Numbers 3:32 ), and at a later period Zadok ( 1 Chronicles 27:17 ), was their chief. 
ACHMETHA|( Ezra 6:2 ), called Ecbatana by classical writers, the capital of northern Media. Here was the palace which was the residence of the old Median monarchs, and of Cyrus and Cambyses. In the time of Ezra, the Persian kings resided usually at Susa of Babylon. But Cyrus held his court at Achmetha; and Ezra, writing a century after, correctly mentions the place where the decree of Cyrus was found. 
ADDI|Ornament, ( Luke 3:28 ), the son of Cosam, and father of Melchi, one of the progenitors of Christ. 
ARCHITE|The usual designation of Hushai ( 2 Samuel 15:32 ;  17:5 ,  14;  1 Chronicles 27:33 ), who was a native of Archi. He was "the king's friend", i.e., he held office under David similar to that of our modern privy councillor. 
AMPHIPOLIS|City on both sides, a Macedonian city, a great Roman military station, through which Paul and Silas passed on their way from Philippi to Thessalonica, a distance of 33 Roman miles from Philippi ( Acts 17:1 ). 
AVEN|Nothingness; vanity.  (1.) Hosea speaks of the "high places of Aven" ( 10:8 ), by which he means Bethel. He also calls it Beth-aven, i.e., "the house of vanity" ( 4:15 ), on account of the golden calves Jeroboam had set up there ( 1 Kings 12:28 ). (2.) Translated by the LXX. "On" in  Ezek. 30:17 . The Egyptian Heliopolis or city of On (q.v.). (3.) In  Amos 1:5  it denotes the Syrian Heliopolis, the modern Baalbec. 
AMMAH|A cubit, the name of a hill which Joab and Abishai reached as the sun went down, when they were in pursuit of Abner ( 2 Samuel 2:24 ). It lay to the east of Gibeon. 
ATAROTH|Crowns.  (1.) A city east of Jordan, not far from Gilead ( Numbers 32:3 ). (2.) A town on the border of Ephraim and Benjamin ( Joshua 16:2 ,  7), called also Ataroth-adar ( 16:5 ). Now ed-Da'rieh. (3.) "Ataroth, the house of Joab" ( 1 Chronicles 2:54 ), a town of Judah inhabited by the descendants of Caleb. 
AZARIAH|Whom Jehovah helps.  (1.) Son of Ethan, of the tribe of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:8 ). (2.) Son of Ahimaaz, who succeeded his grandfather Zadok as high priest ( 1 Chronicles 6:9 ;  1 Kings 4:2 ) in the days of Solomon. He officiated at the consecration of the temple ( 1 Chronicles 6:10 ). (3.) The son of Johanan, high priest in the reign of Abijah and Asa ( 2 Chronicles 6:10 ,  11). (4.) High priest in the reign of Uzziah, king of Judah ( 2 Kings 14:21 ;  2 Chronicles 26:17 -20). He was contemporary with the prophets Isaiah, Amos, and Joel. (5.) High priest in the days of Hezekiah ( 2 Chronicles 31:10 -13). Of the house of Zadok. (6.) Several other priests and Levites of this name are mentioned ( 1 Chronicles 6:36 ;  Ezra 7:1 ;  1 Chronicles 9:11 ;  Nehemiah 3:23 ,  etc.). (7.) The original name of Abed-nego ( Dan. 1:6 ,  7,  11,  16). He was of the royal family of Judah, and with his other two companions remarkable for his personal beauty and his intelligence as well as piety. (8.) The son of Oded, a remarkable prophet in the days of Asa ( 2 Chronicles 15:1 ). He stirred up the king and the people to a great national reformation. 
ADRIEL|Flock of God, the son of Barzillai, the Meholathite, to whom Saul gave in marriage his daughter Merab ( 1 Samuel 18:19 ). The five sons that sprang from this union were put to death by the Gibeonites ( 2 Samuel 21:8 ,  9. Here it is said that Michal "brought up" [R.V.,  "bare"] these five sons,  either that she treated them as if she had been their own mother,  or that for "Michal" we should read "Merab, " as in  1 Samuel 18:19 ). 
ATHARIM|   ATHARIM  ath'-a-rim (`atharim): the Revised Version (British and American) "The way of Atharim"; the King James Version "The way of the spies." the Revised Version (British and American) regards Atharim as a place (so Septuagint). the King James Version follows Syriac and Targum, rendering Atharim as if Tarim = spies. Dillmann translates "the caravan path," connecting it with Arabic athar, "a track or footprint." Here the king of Arad fought against Israel, taking some captives ( Numbers 21:1 ). See  HORMAH .
AHASUERUS|There are three kings designated by this name in Scripture.  (1.) The father of Darius the Mede, mentioned in  Dan. 9:1 . This was probably the Cyaxares I. known by this name in profane history, the king of Media and the conqueror of Nineveh. (2.) The king mentioned in  Ezra 4:6 , probably the Cambyses of profane history, the son and successor of Cyrus (B.C. 529). (3.) The son of Darius Hystaspes, the king named in the Book of Esther. He ruled over the kingdoms of Persia, Media, and Babylonia, "from India to Ethiopia." This was in all probability the Xerxes of profane history, who succeeded his father Darius (B.C. 485). In the LXX. version of the Book of Esther the name Artaxerxes occurs for Ahasuerus. He reigned for twenty-one years (B.C. 486-465). He invaded Greece with an army, it is said, of more than 2,000,000 soldiers, only 5,000 of whom returned with him. Leonidas, with his famous 300, arrested his progress at the Pass of Thermopylae, and then he was defeated disastrously by Themistocles at Salamis. It was after his return from this invasion that Esther was chosen as his queen. 
ADNAH|Delight.  (1.) A chief of the tribe of Manasseh who joined David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:20 ).  (2.) A general under Jehoshaphat, chief over 300,000 men ( 2 Chronicles 17:14 ). 
AVVIM|   AVVIM; AVITES  av'-im a'-vits `awwim; Heuaioi, also unaspirated; (also used to represent the name of the Hivites): The early inhabitants of the southern extremity of Canaan afterward occupied by the Philistines ( Deuteronomy 2:23 ; compare Jos 13:3, 4, the King James Version "Avim," a'-vim).  The Avvim of  Joshua 18:23  was a town of Benjamin, not a people. Gesenius supposes the name to mean "dwellers in the desert," but it was more probably the name of some pre-Sem tribe. The Avvim are described as living in Chatserim or "encampments" and extending as far as the outskirts of Gaza.
AVITH|   AVITH  a'-vith `awith: The royal city of Hadad king of Edom ( Genesis 36:35   1 Chronicles 1:46 ). The Septuagint reads Getthaim. There is no clue to its identification.
ASHRIEL|   ASHRIEL  ash'-re-el. See  ASRIEL .
AIJA|   AIJA  a-i'-ja (`ayya'): A form of name for city Ai, found in  Nehemiah 11:31 . See  AI ;  AIATH .
AMARIAH|Said by Jehovah.  (1.) One of the descendants of Aaron by Eleazar ( 1 Chronicles 6:7 , 52). He was probably the last of the high priests of Eleazar's line prior to the transfer of that office to Eli, of the line of Ithamar. (2.) A Levite, son of Hebron, of the lineage of Moses ( 1 Chronicles 23:19 ;  24:23 ). (3.) A "chief priest" who took an active part in the reformation under Jehoshaphat ( 2 Chronicles 19:11 ); probably the same as mentioned in  1 Chronicles 6:9 . (4.)  1 Chronicles 6:11 ;  Ezra 7:3 .  (5.) One of the high priests in the time of Hezekiah ( 2 Chronicles 31:15 ).  (6.)  Zephaniah 1:1 .  (7.)  Nehemiah 11:4 .  (8.)  Nehemiah 10:3 .  (9.)  Ezra 10:42 . 
ANAHARATH|   ANAHARATH  a-na'-ha-rath ('ana-charath, meaning unknown): A place which fell to the tribe of Issachar in the division of the land ( Joshua 19:19 ). Located in the valley of Jezreel toward the East, the name and site being preserved as the modern en-Na`-ura. BDB is wrong in assigning it to the tribe of Naphtali.
AMMI|My people, a name given by Jehovah to the people of Israel ( Hosea 2:1 ,  23. Comp.  1:9 ;  Ezek. 16:8 ;  Romans 9:25 ,  26;  1 Peter 2:10 ). 
ABIEZRITE|Father of help, a descendant of Abiezer ( Judges 6:11 , 24;  8:32 ). 
AHINADAB|Brother of liberality = liberal, one of the twelve commissariat officers appointed by Solomon in so many districts of his kingdom to raise supplies by monthly rotation for his household. He was appointed to the district of Mahanaim ( 1 Kings 4:14 ), east of Jordan. 
ASAHIAH|   ASAHIAH  as-a-hi'-a (`asayah, "Yahweh hath made"; the King James Version form; the Revised Version (British and American) ASAIAH): "The king's servant" sent by Josiah with Hilkiah, the priest, and others to inquire of Yahweh concerning the words of the book found in the temple ( 2 Kings 22:12, 14   2 Chronicles 34:20 ).
ARAD| (1.) Now Tell Arad, a Canaanite city, about 20 miles south of Hebron. The king of Arad "fought against Israel and took of them prisoners" when they were retreating from the confines of Edom ( Numbers 21:1 ;  33:40 ;  Judges 1:16 ). It was finally subdued by Joshua ( 12:14 ). (2.) One of the sons of Beriah ( 1 Chronicles 8:15 ). 
ADUMMIM|The red ones, a place apparently on the road between Jericho and Jerusalem, "on the south side of the torrent" Wady Kelt, looking toward Gilgal, mentioned  Joshua 15:7 ;  18:17 . It was nearly half-way between Jerusalem and Jericho, and now bears the name of Tal-at-ed-Dumm. It is supposed to have been the place referred to in the parable of the Good Samaritan ( Luke 10:30 -37). Recently a new carriage-road has been completed, and carriages for the first time have come along this road from Jerusalem. 
ABISHUA|Father of welfare; i.e., "fortunate."  (1.) The grandson of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:4 ). (2.) The son of Phinehas the high priest ( 1 Chronicles 6:4 , 5, 50;  Ezra 7:5 ). 
AMMISHADDAI|People of the Almighty, the father of Ahiezer, who was chief of the Danites at the time of the Exodus ( Numbers 1:12 ;  2:25 ). This is one of the few names compounded with the name of God, Shaddai, "Almighty." 
ANAB|Grape-town, one of the cities in the mountains of Judah, from which Joshua expelled the Anakim ( Joshua 11:21 ;  15:50 ). It still retains its ancient name. It lies among the hills, 10 miles south-south-west of Hebron. 
ABARIM|Regions beyond; i.e., on the east of Jordan, a mountain, or rather a mountain-chain, over against Jericho, to the east and south-east of the Dead Sea, in the land of Moab. From "the top of Pisgah", i.e., Mount Nebo (q.v.), one of its summits, Moses surveyed the Promised Land ( Deuteronomy 3:27 ;  32:49 ), and there he died ( 34:1 , 5). The Israelites had one of their encampments in the mountains of Abarim ( Numbers 33:47 , 48) after crossing the Arnon. 
ALVAH|   ALVAH  al'-va (`alwah): A chief (the King James Version duke) of Edom ( Genesis 36:40 ), called "Aliah" in  1 Chronicles 1:51 . Probably the same as Alvan, or Ahan, son of Shobal son of Seir ( Genesis 36:23   1 Chronicles 1:40 ).
ADONIBEZEK|Lord of Bezek, a Canaanitish king who, having subdued seventy of the chiefs that were around him, made an attack against the armies of Judah and Simeon, but was defeated and brought as a captive to Jerusalem, where his thumbs and great toes were cut off. He confessed that God had requited him for his like cruelty to the seventy kings whom he had subdued ( Judges 1:4 -7; Comp.  1 Samuel 15:33 ). 
AZAZIAH|Whom Jehovah strengthened.  (1.) One of the Levitical harpers in the temple ( 1 Chronicles 15:21 ). (2.) The father of Hoshea, who was made ruler over the Ephraimites ( 1 Chronicles 27:20 ). (3.) One who had charge of the temple offerings ( 2 Chronicles 31:13 ). 
AKAN|   AKAN  a'-kan (`aqan, "twisted"): A son of Ezer, a descendant of Esau of Seir ( Genesis 36:27 ). He is called Jaakan in  1 Chronicles 1:42 . The King James Version margin has Jakan.
AHISHAR|Brother of song = singer, the officer who was "over the household" of Solomon ( 1 Kings 4:6 ). 
ACHISH|Angry, perhaps only a general title of royalty applicable to the Philistine kings.  (1.) The king with whom David sought refuge when he fled from Saul ( 1 Samuel 21:10 -15). He is called Abimelech in the superscription of  Psalm 34 . It was probably this same king to whom David a second time repaired at the head of a band of 600 warriors, and who assigned him Ziklag, whence he carried on war against the surrounding tribes ( 1 Samuel 27:5 -12). Achish had great confidence in the valour and fidelity of David ( 1 Samuel 28:1 , 2), but at the instigation of his courtiers did not permit him to go up to battle along with the Philistine hosts ( 1 Samuel 29:2 -11). David remained with Achish a year and four months.  (2.) Another king of Gath, probably grandson of the foregoing, to whom the two servants of Shimei fled. This led Shimei to go to Gath in pursuit of them, and the consequence was that Solomon put him to death ( 1 Kings 2:39 -46). 
ASHDOTHPISGAH|( Deuteronomy 3:17 ;  Joshua 12:3 ;  13:20 ) in Authorized Version, but in Revised Version translated "slopes of Pisgah." In  Deuteronomy 4:49  it is translated in the Authorized Version "springs of Pisgah." The name Ashdoth is translated "springs" in the Authorized Version, but "slopes" in the Revised Version, of  Joshua 10:40  and  12:8 . It has been identified with the springs under Mount Nebo, now called `Ayun Musa. 
AHI|   AHI  a'-hi ('achi, "my brother," or perhaps a contraction from AHIJAH, which see): (1) A member of the tribe of Gad ( 1 Chronicles 5:15 ). (2) A member of the tribe of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 7:34 ).   AHI OR AH  In proper names ('achi or 'ach "brother"): The usage is practically the same with that of 'abh, 'abhi. See  ABI ;  NAMES, PROPER .
ASHIMA|   ASHIMA  a-shi'-ma, ash'-i-ma ('ashima'; Asimath): A deity worshipped at Hamath ( 2 Kings 17:30 ) of whom nothing further is known. It has been suggested that the name is the same as that of the goddess Simi, the daughter of the supreme god Hadad, who was worshipped at Membij, but there is nothing to support the suggestion.
ATHAIAH|   ATHAIAH  a-tha'-ya ('athayah = "Yahweh is helper"; Athea, or Atheai): He is designated ( Nehemiah 11:4 ) as a descendant of Judah and the son of Uzziah. After the return from Babylon, he dwelt in Jerusalem. In  1 Chronicles 9:4  his name is given as Uthai.
ALLEMETH|   ALLEMETH  al'-e-meth (`allemeth, "concealment"; the King James Version Alemeth,  1 Chronicles 6:60 ): Name of a town in tribe of Benjamin, near Anathoth, one of the cities given to the sons of Aaron, the same as Almon of  Joshua 21:18 . The the King James Version ALEMETH (which see) is based upon the Hebrew reading `alemeth. Its site is the modern Almit, a village a short distance Northeast of Anathoth.
AIAH|   AIAH  a'-ya ('ayyah, "falcon"; once in the King James Version Ajah,  Genesis 36:24 ):  (1) A Horite, son of Zibeon, and brother of Anah, who was father of one of Esau's wives ( Genesis 36:24   1 Chronicles 1:40 ).  (2) Father of Rizpah, a concubine of Saul, about whom Ishbosheth falsely accused Abner ( 2 Samuel 3:7 ), and whose sons were hanged to appease the Gibeonites, whom Saul had wronged ( 2 Samuel 21:8-11 ).
ARROWS|At first made of reeds, and then of wood tipped with iron. Arrows are sometimes figuratively put for lightning ( Deuteronomy 32:23 ,  42;  Psalm 7:13 ;  18:14 ;  144:6 ;  Zechariah 9:14 ). They were used in war as well as in the chase ( Genesis 27:3 ;  49:23 ). They were also used in divination ( Ezek. 21:21 ). The word is frequently employed as a symbol of calamity or disease inflicted by God ( Job 6:4 ;  34:6 ;  Psalm 38:2 ;  Deuteronomy 32:23.  Comp.  Ezek. 5:16 ), or of some sudden danger ( Psalm 91:5 ), or bitter words ( Psalm 64:3 ), or false testimony ( Proverbs 25:18 ). 
ARTS|   ARTS  See  CRAFTS .
ARNI|   ARNI  ar'-ni (Arnei, found only in  Luke 3:33  the Revised Version (British and American), following Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek): The name of an ancestor of Jesus Christ. But in the King James Version, following Textus Receptus of the New Testament, and in the genealogical list of  Matthew 13:4  the same person is called Aram (Greek: Aram) in both the King James Version and the Revised Version, margin. In Matthew the Revised Version (British and American), however, the form is Ram, which is nearest to the Old Testament name Ram (ram, "high"). Ram was great-grandson of Judah and ancestor of David ( Ruth 4:19   1 Chronicles 2:9, 10 ).
ACHAIA|The name originally of a narrow strip of territory in Greece, on the north-west of the Peloponnesus. Subsequently it was applied by the Romans to the whole Peloponnesus, now called the Morea, and the south of Greece. It was then one of the two provinces (Macedonia being the other) into which they divided the country when it fell under their dominion. It is in this latter enlarged meaning that the name is always used in the New Testament ( Acts 18:12 ,  27;  19:21 ;  Romans 15:26 ;  16:5 ,  etc.). It was at the time when Luke wrote the Acts of the Apostles under the proconsular form of government; hence the appropriate title given to Gallio as the "deputy," i.e., proconsul, of Achaia ( Acts 18:12 ). 
ASNAPPER|Probably the same as Assur-bani-pal (Sardanapalos of the Greeks), styled the "great and noble" ( Ezra 4:10 ), was the son and successor (B.C. 668) of Esar-haddon (q.v.). He was "luxurious, ambitious, and cruel, but a magnificent patron of literature." He formed at Nineveh a library of clay tablets, numbering about 10,000. These are now mostly in the British Museum. They throw much light on the history and antiquities of Assyria. Assur-bani-pal was a munificent patron of literature, and the conqueror of Elam. Towards the middle of his reign his empire was shaken by a great rebellion headed by his brother in Babylon. The rebellion was finally put down, but Egypt was lost, and the military power of Assyria was so exhausted that it could with difficulty resist the hordes of Kimmerians who poured over Western Asia. (see  NINEVEH .) 
ADINO|The Eznite, one of David's mighty men ( 2 Samuel 23:8 ). (see  JASHOBEAM .) 
ANNAS|Was high priest A.D. 7-14. In A.D. 25 Caiaphas, who had married the daughter of Annas ( John 18:13 ), was raised to that office, and probably Annas was now made president of the Sanhedrim, or deputy or coadjutor of the high priest, and thus was also called high priest along with Caiaphas ( Luke 3:2 ). By the Mosaic law the high-priesthood was held for life ( Numbers 3:10 ); and although Annas had been deposed by the Roman procurator, the Jews may still have regarded him as legally the high priest. Our Lord was first brought before Annas, and after a brief questioning of him ( John 18:19 -23) was sent to Caiaphas, when some members of the Sanhedrim had met, and the first trial of Jesus took place ( Matthew 26:57 -68). This examination of our Lord before Annas is recorded only by John. Annas was president of the Sanhedrim before which Peter and John were brought ( Acts 4:6 ). 
APHARSATHCHITES|   APHARSATHCHITES; APHARSACHITES  af-ar-sath'-kits, a-far'-sak-its ('apharcathkhaye'): A tribe living in Samaria that protested against the rebuilding of the Temple, and brought their complaint to Darius ( Ezra 4:9 ;  Ezra 5:6 ;  Ezra 6:6 ). The tribe has not yet been recognized with any certainty in the inscriptions. Rawlinson identifies them with the Persians; other scholars deny that any Assyrian king was ever so situated as to have been able to obtain colonists from Persia. Some maintain with Marquardt that the term is not the name of a tribe, but the title of certain officers under Darius. Fred. Delitzsch suggests the inhabitants of one of the two great Medean towns "Partakka" and "Partukka" mentioned in Esarhaddon's inscriptions. Andreas plausibly connects it with the Assyrian suparsak (Muss-Arnolt, Assyrian Dict., 1098), saqu (3) "general"; Scheft takes it from an old Iranian word aparasarka, "lesser ruler."  H. J. Wolf
ANANI|   ANANI  a-na'-ni `anani, perhaps a shortened form of Ananiah, "Yah has covered"): A son of Elioenai of the house of David, who lived after the captivity ( 1 Chronicles 3:24 ).
ALPHAEUS| (1.) The father of James the Less, the apostle and writer of the epistle ( Matthew 10:3 ;  Mark 3:18 ;  Luke 6:15 ;  Acts 1:13 ), and the husband of Mary ( John 19:25 ). The Hebrew form of this name is Cleopas, or Clopas (q.v.). (2.) The father of Levi, or Matthew ( Mark 2:14 ). 
ARCHELAUS|Ruler of the people, son of Herod the Great, by Malthace, a Samaritan woman. He was educated along with his brother Antipas at Rome. He inherited from his father a third part of his kingdom viz., Idumea, Judea, and Samaria, and hence is called "king" ( Matthew 2:22 ). It was for fear of him that Joseph and Mary turned aside on their way back from Egypt. Till a few days before his death Herod had named Antipas as his successor, but in his last moments he named Archelaus. 
ABIHU|Father of Him; i.e., "worshipper of God", the second of the sons of Aaron ( Exodus 6:23 ;  Numbers 3:2 ;  26:60 ;  1 Chronicles 6:3 ). Along with his three brothers he was consecrated to the priest's office ( Exodus 28:1 ). With his father and elder brother he accompanied the seventy elders part of the way up the mount with Moses ( Exodus 24:1 , 9). On one occasion he and Nadab his brother offered incense in their censers filled with "strange" (i.e.,  common) fire, i.e., not with fire taken from the great brazen altar ( Leviticus 6:9 ,  etc.), and for this offence they were struck dead, and were taken out and buried without the camp ( Leviticus 10:1 -11; Comp.  Numbers 3:4 ;  26:61 ;  1 Chronicles 24:2 ). It is probable that when they committed this offence they were intoxicated, for immediately after is given the law prohibiting the use of wine or strong drink to the priests. 
ALMON|Hidden, one of the sacerdotal cities of Benjamin ( Joshua 21:18 ), called also Alemeth ( 1 Chronicles 6:60 ). 
AVIMS|   AVIMS  av'-imz ( Deuteronomy 2:23 ). See  AVVIM .
AMMIHUD|People of glory; i.e., "renowned."  (1.) The father of the Ephraimite chief Elishama, at the time of the Exodus ( Numbers 1:10 ;  2:18 ;  7:48 ,  53). (2.)  Numbers 34:20 .  (3.)  Numbers 34:28 . (4.) The father of Talmai, king of Geshur, to whom Absalom fled after the murder of Amnon ( 2 Samuel 13:37 ). (5.) The son of Omri, and the father of Uthai ( 1 Chronicles 9:4 ). 
AMMIZABAD|People of the giver, the son of Benaiah, who was the third and chief captain of the host under David ( 1 Chronicles 27:6 ). 
AMMONITES|   AMMON; AMMONITES  am'-on, am'-on-its (`ammon; `ammonim):  The Hebrew tradition makes this tribe descendants of Lot and hence related to the Israelites ( Genesis 19:38 ). This is reflected in the name usually employed in Old Testament to designate them, Ben `Ammi, Bene `Ammon, "son of my people," "children of my people," i.e. relatives. Hence we find that the Israelites are commanded to avoid conflict with them on their march to the Promised Land ( Deuteronomy 2:19 ). Their dwelling-place was on the east of the Dead Sea and the Jordan, between the Arnon and the Jabbok, but, before the advance of the Hebrews, they had been dispossessed of a portion of their land by the Amorites, who founded, along the east side of the Jordan and the Dead Sea, the kingdom of Sihon ( Numbers 21:21-31 ).  We know from the records of Egypt, especially Tell el-Amarna Letters, the approximate date of the Amorite invasion (14th and 13th centuries, B.C.). They were pressed on the north by the Hittites who forced them upon the tribes of the south, and some of them settled east of the Jordan. Thus, Israel helped Ammonites by destroying their old enemies, and this makes their conduct at a later period the more reprehensible. In the days of Jephthah they oppressed the Israelites east of the Jordan, claiming that the latter had deprived them of their territory when they came from Egypt, whereas it was the possessions of the Amorites they took ( Judges 11:1-28 ). They were defeated, but their hostility did not cease, and their conduct toward the Israelites was particularly shameful, as in the days of Saul ( 1 Samuel 11 ) and of David ( 2 Samuel 10 ). This may account for the cruel treatment meted out to them in the war that followed ( 2 Samuel 12:26-31 ).  They seem to have been completely subdued by David and their capital was taken, and we find a better spirit manifested afterward, for Nahash of Rabbah showed kindness to him when a fugitive ( 2 Samuel 17:27-29 ). Their country came into the possession of Jeroboam, on the division of the kingdom, and when the Syrians of Damascus deprived the kingdom of Israel of their possessions east of the Jordan, the Ammonites became subjects of Benhadad, and we find a contingent of 1,000 of them serving as allies of that king in the great battle of the Syrians with the Assyrians at Qarqar (854 B.C.) in the reign of Shalmaneser II. They may have regained their old territory when Tiglath-pileser carried off the Israelites East of the Jordan into captivity ( 2 Kings 15:29   1 Chronicles 5:26 ). Their hostility to both kingdoms, Judah and Israel, was often manifested. In the days of Jehoshaphat they joined with the Moabites in an attack upon him, but met with disaster ( 2 Chronicles 20 ). They paid tribute to Jotham ( 2 Chronicles 27:5 ). After submitting to Tiglath-pileser they were generally tributary to Assyria, but we have mention of their joining In the general uprising that took place under Sennacherib; but they submitted and we find them tributary in the reign of Esarhaddon.  Their hostility to Judah is shown in their joining the Chaldeans to destroy it ( 2 Kings 24:2 ). Their cruelty is denounced by the prophet  Amos 1:13 , and their destruction by  Jeremiah 49:1-6, Ezekiel 21:28-32, Zephaniah 2:8, 9 . Their murder of Gedaliah ( 2 Kings 25:22-26   Jeremiah 40:14 ) was a dastardly act. Tobiah the Ammonites united with Sanballat to oppose Ne ( Nehemiah 4 ), and their opposition to the Jews did not cease with the establishment of the latter in Judea.  They joined the Syrians in their wars with the Maccabees and were defeated by Judas (1 Mac 5:6). Their religion was a degrading and cruel superstition. Their chief god was Molech, or Moloch, to whom they offered human sacrifices ( 1 Kings 11:7 ) against which Israel was especially warned ( Leviticus 20:2-5 ). This worship was common to other tribes for we find it mentioned among the Phoenicians.  H. Porter
ASPATHA|   ASPATHA  as-pa'-tha ('acpatha'): One of the ten sons of Haman ( Esther 9:7 ) (Pers aspadata, "given by a sacred horse," according to Thesaurus, Add. 71, after Pott and Benfey).
ABISHALOM|   ABISHALOM  a-bish'-a-lom: Variant of ABSALOM, which see.
AZAZ|   AZAZ  a'-zaz `azaz, ("powerful"): A descendant of Reuben ( 1 Chronicles 5:8 ).
APHSES|   APHSES  af'-sez: the King James Version form for the Revised Version (British and American) HAPPIZZEZ ( 1 Chronicles 24:15 ).
ABIALBON|Father of strength; i.e., "valiant", one of David's body-guard of thirty mighty men ( 2 Samuel 23:31 ); called also Abiel ( 1 Chronicles 11:32 ). 
ARPACHSHAD|   ARPACHSHAD  ar-pak'-shad. See  ARPHAXAD .
ARNON|Swift, the southern boundary of the territory of Israel beyond Jordan, separating it from the land of Moab ( Deuteronomy 3:8 ,  16). This river (referred to twenty-four times in the Bible) rises in the mountains of Gilead, and after a circuitous course of about 80 miles through a deep ravine it falls into the Dead Sea nearly opposite Engedi. The stream is almost dry in summer. It is now called el-Mujeb. The territory of the Amorites extended from the Arnon to the Jabbok. 
AHLAI|   AHLAI  a'-li ('achlay "O would that!"):  (1) A Son of Sheshan ( 1 Chronicles 2:31 ) or according to  1 Chronicles 2:34  a daughter of Sheshan, for here we read: "Now Sheshan had no sons, but daughters."  (2) The father of Zabad, a soldier in David's army ( 1 Chronicles 11:41 ).
ASSYRIA|The name derived from the city Asshur on the Tigris, the original capital of the country, was originally a colony from Babylonia, and was ruled by viceroys from that kingdom. It was a mountainous region lying to the north of Babylonia, extending along the Tigris as far as to the high mountain range of Armenia, the Gordiaean or Carduchian mountains. It was founded in B.C. 1700 under Bel-kap-kapu, and became an independent and a conquering power, and shook off the yoke of its Babylonian masters. It subdued the whole of Northern Asia. The Assyrians were Semites ( Genesis 10:22 ), but in process of time non-Semite tribes mingled with the inhabitants. They were a military people, the "Romans of the East." Of the early history of the kingdom of Assyria little is positively known. In B.C. 1120 Tiglath-pileser I., the greatest of the Assyrian kings, "crossed the Euphrates, defeated the kings of the Hittites, captured the city of Carchemish, and advanced as far as the shores of the Mediterranean." He may be regarded as the founder of the first Assyrian empire. After this the Assyrians gradually extended their power, subjugating the states of Northern Syria. In the reign of Ahab, king of Israel, Shalmaneser II. marched an army against the Syrian states, whose allied army he encountered and vanquished at Karkar. This led to Ahab's casting off the yoke of Damascus and allying himself with Judah. Some years after this the Assyrian king marched an army against Hazael, king of Damascus. He besieged and took that city. He also brought under tribute Jehu, and the cities of Tyre and Sidon. About a hundred years after this (B.C. 745) the crown was seized by a military adventurer called Pul, who assumed the name of Tiglath-pileser III. He directed his armies into Syria, which had by this time regained its independence, and took (B.C. 740) Arpad, near Aleppo, after a siege of three years, and reduced Hamath. Azariah (Uzziah) was an ally of the king of Hamath, and thus was compelled by Tiglath-pileser to do him homage and pay a yearly tribute. In B.C. 738, in the reign of Menahem, king of Israel, Pul invaded Israel, and imposed on it a heavy tribute ( 2 Kings 15:19 ). Ahaz, the king of Judah, when engaged in a war against Israel and Syria, appealed for help to this Assyrian king by means of a present of gold and silver ( 2 Kings 16:8 ); who accordingly "marched against Damascus, defeated and put Rezin to death, and besieged the city itself." Leaving a portion of his army to continue the siege, "he advanced through the province east of Jordan, spreading fire and sword," and became master of Philistia, and took Samaria and Damascus. He died B.C. 727, and was succeeded by Shalmanezer IV., who ruled till B.C. 722. He also invaded Syria ( 2 Kings 17:5 ), but was deposed in favour of Sargon (q.v.) the Tartan, or commander-in-chief of the army, who took Samaria (q.v.) after a siege of three years, and so put an end to the kingdom of Israel, carrying the people away into captivity, B.C. 722 ( 2 Kings 17:1 -6,  24;  18:7 ,  9). He also overran the land of Judah, and took the city of Jerusalem ( Isaiah 10:6 ,  12,  22,  24,  34). Mention is next made of Sennacherib (B.C. 705), the son and successor of Sargon ( 2 Kings 18:13 ;  19:37 ;  Isaiah 7:17 ,  18); and then of Esar-haddon, his son and successor, who took Manasseh, king of Judah, captive, and kept him for some time a prisoner at Babylon, which he alone of all the Assyrian kings made the seat of his government ( 2 Kings 19:37 ;  Isaiah 37:38 ). Assur-bani-pal, the son of Esarhaddon, became king, and in  Ezra 4:10  is referred to as Asnapper. From an early period Assyria had entered on a conquering career, and having absorbed Babylon, the kingdoms of Hamath, Damascus, and Samaria, it conquered Phoenicia, and made Judea feudatory, and subjected Philistia and Idumea. At length, however, its power declined. In B.C. 727 the Babylonians threw off the rule of the Assyrians, under the leadership of the powerful Chaldean prince Merodach-baladan ( 2 Kings 20:12 ), who, after twelve years, was subdued by Sargon, who now reunited the kingdom, and ruled over a vast empire. But on his death the smouldering flames of rebellion again burst forth, and the Babylonians and Medes successfully asserted their independence (B.C. 625), and Assyria fell according to the prophecies of Isaiah ( 10:5 -19), Nahum ( 3:19 ), and Zephaniah ( 3:13 ), and the many separate kingdoms of which it was composed ceased to recognize the "great king" ( 2 Kings 18:19 ;  Isaiah 36:4 ). Ezekiel (31) attests (about B.C. 586) how completely Assyria was overthrown. It ceases to be a nation. (see  NINEVEH ; BABYLON.) 
ABIUD|   ABIUD  a-bi'-ud ('Abioud, perhaps "my father is majesty"; see ABIHUD): Mentioned in the genealogy of Jesus ( Matthew 1:13  and not elsewhere) as the son of Zerubbabel. See  GENEALOGY .
ABDA|Servant. (1.) The father of Adoniram, whom Solomon set over the tribute ( 1 Kings 4:6 ); i.e., the forced labour (R.V.,  "levy"). (2.) A Levite of the family of Jeduthun ( Nehemiah 11:17 ), also called Obadiah ( 1 Chronicles 9:16 ). 
AROERITE|   AROERITE  a-ro'-er-it (ha-`aro`eri): A native of Aroer. The Aroerite was Hotham, father of two of David's heroes ( 1 Chronicles 11:44 ).
ASHUR|   ASHUR  ash'-ur. See  ASHHUR .
ANIAM|   ANIAM  a-ni'-am (`ani`am, "lament of the people"): A son of Shemidah of Manasseh ( 1 Chronicles 7:19 ).
ATHALIAH|Whom God afflicts.  (1.) The daughter of Ahab and Jezebel, and the wife of Jehoram, king of Judah ( 2 Kings 8:18 ), who "walked in the ways of the house of Ahab" ( 2 Chronicles 21:6 ), called "daughter" of Omri ( 2 Kings 8:26 ). On the death of her husband and of her son Ahaziah, she resolved to seat herself on the vacant throne. She slew all Ahaziah's children except Joash, the youngest ( 2 Kings 11:1 , 2). After a reign of six years she was put to death in an insurrection ( 2 Kings 11:20 ;  2 Chronicles 21:6 ;  22:10 -12;  23:15 ), stirred up among the people in connection with Josiah's being crowned as king. (2.)  Ezra 8:7 .  (3.)  1 Chronicles 8:26 . 
ADAH|Ornament.  (1.) The first of Lamech's two wives, and the mother of Jabal and Jubal ( Genesis 4:19 ,  20,  23). (2.) The first of Esau's three wives, the daughter of Elon the Hittite ( Genesis 36:2 , 4), called also Bashemath ( 26:34 ). 
ABEZ|Tin, or white, a town in the tribe of Issachar ( Joshua 19:20 ), at the north of the plain of Esdraelon. It is probably identified with the ruins of el-Beida. 
ANCIENTS|   ANCIENTS  an-shents: This word (except in one instance) renders the Hebrew word zeqenim, (pl of zaqen), which should always be translated "old men" or "elders." The Hebrew word never has the connotation which "ancients" has in modern English. The words "I understand more than the ancients" ( Psalm 119:100  the King James Version) do not mean that the Psalmist claims greater wisdom than his distant forbears but than his contemporaries with all their age and experience. In the parallel clause "teachers" is the corresponding word. In such phrases as "ancients of the people" ( Jeremiah 19:1  the King James Version), "ancients of the house of Israel" ( Ezekiel 8:12 ), "elders" would obviously be the correct rendering, as in the Revised Version (British and American). Even in  Isaiah 24:23  ("before his ancients gloriously" the English Revised Version) "elders" is the right translation (American Revised Version). The writer probably alludes to the Sinaitic; theophany witnessed by the "seventy. elders" ( Exodus 24:9-18 ) Generally speaking the word suggests the experience, insight and practical acquaintance with life which age ought to bring with it ( Psalm 119:100   Ezekiel 7:26 ). In one instance ( 1 Samuel 24:13 ) "ancients" is the right rendering for the Hebrew word qadhmonim, which means "men of former times."  Thomas Lewis
ANATHOTH|The name of one of the cities of refuge, in the tribe of Benjamin ( Joshua 21:18 ). The Jews, as a rule, did not change the names of the towns they found in Palestine; hence this town may be regarded as deriving its name from the goddess Anat. It was the native place of Abiezer, one of David's "thirty" ( 2 Samuel 23:27 ), and of Jehu, another of his mighty men ( 1 Chronicles 12:3 ). It is chiefly notable, however, as the birth-place and usual residence of Jeremiah ( Jeremiah 1:1 ;  11:21 -23;  29:27 ;  32:7 -9). It suffered greatly from the army of Sennacherib, and only 128 men returned to it from the Exile ( Nehemiah 7:27 ;  Ezra 2:23 ). It lay about 3 miles north of Jerusalem. It has been identified with the small and poor village of `Anata, containing about 100 inhabitants. 
AZUBAH|Deserted.  (1.) The wife of Caleb ( 1 Chronicles 2:18 ,  19). (2.) The daughter of Shilhi, and mother of king Jehoshaphat ( 1 Kings 22:42 ). 
ATTITUDES|   ATTITUDES  at'-i-tuds: Customs change slowly in Bible lands. This becomes clear by a comparison of the many references found in the Bible and other literatures of the Orient with existing circumstances and conditions. The same fact is attested by the pictures illustrating daily life upon the monuments of Assyria, Babylonia and Egypt in the countries between the Nile and the Tigris. Many of these, dating back to the second or third millennium before our era, prove conclusively that the same practices and usages as are now common among the inhabitants of those lands were in vogue in the days of Hammurabi and the early rulers of Egypt. This is especially true of matters pertaining to the worship of the gods, and of the attitudes or positions assumed in homage and respect to monarchs and those in authority.  The many references found in the Bible to these same usages prove that the Hebrews too had much in common with the nations around them, not only in creed, but also in the mode of worship, as well as in general everyday etiquette. This is not strange, at least among the Semitic peoples, for there is more or less agreement, even among all nations, ancient and modern, in the attitude of the worshipper in temple and high place.  The outward tokens of respect and honor shown by Orientals to their superiors, above all to monarchs, may seem exaggerated. But when we consider that the king was God's vicegerent upon the earth or over a certain country, and in some sense Divine, worthy even of adoration, it is not strange that almost equal homage should be paid him as the gods themselves. The higher the person was in power, the greater the honor and respect shown him. It is natural, therefore, that God, the Lord of Lords, and the King of Kings should be the recipient of the highest reverence and adoration.  There are several Hebrew words used to describe the various attitudes assumed by those who worshipped Yahweh and heathen gods; these same words are constantly employed in speaking of the homage or respect paid to rulers and persons in authority. The most common terms are those rendered "to stand," "to bow," "to kneel" and "prostrate oneself" or "fall on the face." It is not always easy to differentiate between them, for often one passes imperceptibly into the other. No doubt several attitudes were assumed by the worshipper or suppliant while offering a prayer or petition. The intensity, the ardor or earnestness with which such a petition or prayer was presented would naturally have much to do with the words and posture of the petitioner, though the same expression might be employed to designate his posture or attitude. Thus "to fall on the face" might be done in many different ways. The Moslems observe a regular course of nine or more different postures in their worship. These are more or less faithfully observed by the faithful everywhere. It is almost certain that the Hebrews in common with other Orientals observed and went through almost every one of these attitudes as they presented themselves in prayer to Yahweh. We shall call attention to just four postures:  (1) standing,  (2) bowing,  (3) kneeling, and  (4) falling on the face or prostration.  1. Standing:  This was one of the very common postures in prayer to God, especially in public worship. It is still customary to stand either erect or with slightly bowed head while offering the public prayers in the synagogue. This is likewise the common practice of a large number of Christians in this and other lands, and no doubt such a posture is sanctioned by the example of the early church and primitive Christians, who, in turn, adopted the usages of the Jewish church. The same practice was in vogue among the Persians, Egyptians and Babylonians and other ancient people as is evidenced by their sculptures and paintings. The famous stela of Hammurabi shows this great king in a standing position as he receives the famous Code from the sun-god.  There are numerous Babylonian and Assyrian seals on which are pictured a priest in a standing position before the throne of Sin or Shamash. In this attitude with uplifted hands, he is sometimes accompanied by the person in whose behalf prayers are made. A beautiful rock sculpture at Ibriz, Southeast of Eregli in Lycaonia, shows us a king or satrap in a standing position, worshipping a local Baal. E. J. Davies, the discoverer of this Hittite monument, in describing it, makes this remark, which we cannot refrain from inserting, inasmuch as it gives another proof of the unchangeable East. He says: "He (the god) wears boots turned up in front, and bound round the leg above the ankle by thongs and a piece of leather reaching half-way up the shin, exactly as it is worn to this day by the peasants of the plain of Cilicia round Adana." King Solomon, during at least a portion of his prayer at the dedication of the temple, stood before the altar with his hands stretched out toward heaven ( 1 Kings 8:22 ). Numerous allusions to prayer in the New Testament prove that standing was the common posture ( Matthew 6:5   Mark 11:25   Luke 18:11 ).  What has been said about standing while praying to God is true also of the attitude of the petitioner when paying homage or making an entreaty to man. The Assyrian and Babylonian monuments are full of evidence on this point; we shall give only one illustration: One of the sculptures describing the siege of Lachish by Sennacherib represents the monarch as seated upon his throne while the conquered stand or kneel before him. Joseph stood before Pharaoh ( Genesis 41:46 ). Solomon's advisers stood before him ( 2 Chronicles 10:6 ) and so did those of Rehoboam ( 2 Chronicles 10:8 ). The same attitude was assumed by suppliants in the Persian court ( Esther 5:2 ;  Esther 8:4 ). The same is true of Babylonia ( Daniel 1:19 ;  Daniel 2:2 ).  2. Kneeling:  Though standing seems to have been the usual attitude, it is quite certain that kneeling was common at all times. The monuments afford abundant proof for this statement; so too the many references in the Bible. Solomon not only stood before the altar on the occasion of dedicating his famous temple, but he also knelt ( 1 Kings 8:54   2 Chronicles 6:13 ). Josephus, describing this ceremony, says that the king at the conclusion of his prayer prostrated himself on the ground and in this posture continued worshipping for a long time. Ezra fell upon his knees as he addressed Yahweh in prayer ( Ezra 9:5 ). Daniel, too, knelt upon his knees and prayed three times a day ( Daniel 6:10 ). The same practice was observed by the apostles and the early church; for we read that Stephen ( Acts 7:60 ), Peter ( Acts 9:40 ), Paul ( Acts 20:36 ) and others ( Acts 21:5 ) assumed this posture as they prayed.  3. Bowing:  As already stated, it is not always easy to determine the exact posture of those described as kneeling or bowing, for this varied with the temperament of the suppliant and the intensity of his prayer or supplication. Eleazer when sent to select a wife for his master, Isaac, bowed before Yahweh ( Genesis 24:26 ). The Hebrews on leaving Egypt were commanded to bow to Yahweh ( Exodus 11:8 ;  Exodus 12:27, 28 ). The injunction of the Psalmist shows the prevalence of this posture in prayer: "O come, let us worship and bow down" ( Psalm 95:6 ). Isaiah refers to the same when he says: "Every knee shall bow" to God ( Isaiah 45:23 ). Paul also bowed his knees to the Father ( Ephesians 3:14 ). The same practice obtained among the heathen nations as they worshipped their gods or idols. Naaman bowed before Rimmon, his god. The numerous prohibitions in the Hebrew Scriptures against bowing down at the shrines of the nations around Israel prove the prevalence of this method of adoration. Indeed, one of the ten commandments is directed explicitly against bowing to or worshipping idols ( Exodus 20:5 ). The same prohibition was often repeated, as by Joshua (23:7) and the author of 2 Kings (17:35). Unfortunately, Israel did transgress in this very thing, for while still in the Wilderness they bowed down to the gods of Moab ( Numbers 25:2 ) and again after their settlement in Canaan ( Judges 2:12 ). Amaziah bowed down to the gods of Edom ( 2 Chronicles 25:14 ).  Like deference was also shown to angels or supernatural beings. Thus, Abraham bows to the three angels as they appear to him at Mamre ( Genesis 18:2 ). And so did Lot at Sodom ( Genesis 19:1 ). Joshua fell on his face before the prince of the host of Yahweh ( Joshua 5:14 ). This attitude was a common one to Ezekiel as he saw his wonderful visions ( Ezekiel 1:28 ;  Ezekiel 3:23 , and often). Daniel when he saw Gabriel in a vision was afraid and fell upon his face ( Daniel 8:17 ). The three disciples had the same experience on the Mount of Transfiguration ( Matthew 17:6 ).  Monarchs and persons of superior rank were the recipients of like honors and marks of respect. Joseph's brothers bowed as they came into his presence, thinking that he was an Egyptian of high rank ( Genesis 43:28 ). Bathsheba bowed to King David when she entered his presence in the interest of their son Solomon ( 1 Kings 1:16, 31 ). But such deference was not shown to monarchs only, for Jacob and his household bowed down seven times to the irate Esau ( Genesis 33:3 ). Abigail fell on her face before David as he was marching to avenge himself upon Nabal, her husband ( 1 Samuel 25:23 ). David too when he went to meet Jonathan fell on his face to the ground and bowed himself three times ( 1 Samuel 20:41 ). The Shunammite woman, as she came to entreat Elisha for the life of her boy, bowed before the prophet ( 2 Kings 4:37 ). The same custom prevailed not only among the Persians, as is evident from the Book of Esther and the monuments at Persepolis, but also in Babylonia, Assyria and other countries.  4. Prostration:  This was but a more intense way of showing one's regard or of emphasizing a petition. It was the token of abject subjection or the deepest reverence. Abraham, when Yahweh appeared to him and promised him a son, with profoundest gratitude and greatest joy fell prostrate on his face ( Genesis 17:3 ). Moses and Aaron were often found in this posture ( Numbers 14:5 ;  Numbers 16:4, 45 ; 20:6). Elijah, eccentric in many ways, cast himself upon the earth and placed his face between his knees (compare  1 Kings 18:42 ). Job fell on the ground and worshipped Yahweh ( Job 1:20 ). Such homage was often shown to our Saviour ( Mark 5:22   John 11:32 ), not because men realized that He was God in the flesh, but simply as a mark of respect for a great teacher and miracle-worker. It is to be noticed th at our Saviour never refused such homage, but accepted it as pertinent and proper. Did He not realize that honor and worship Divine belonged to Him, He would have refused them just as Peter did when Cornelius fell down at his feet and worshipped him ( Acts 10:25 ) or as the angel in  Revelation 19:10 , who said to John, prostrate at his feet, "See thou do it not: I am a fellow servant," etc . See ADORATION, iii .  W. W. Davies
AROER|Ruins.  (1.) A town on the north bank of the Arnon ( Deuteronomy 4:48 ;  Judges 11:26 ;  2 Kings 10:33 ), the southern boundary of the kingdom of Sihon ( Joshua 12:2 ). It is now called Arair, 13 miles west of the Dead Sea. (2.) One of the towns built by the tribe of Gad ( Numbers 32:34 ) "before Rabbah" ( Joshua 13:25 ), the Ammonite capital. It was famous in the history of Jephthah ( Judges 11:33 ) and of David ( 2 Samuel 24:5 ). (Comp.  Isaiah 17:2 ;  2 Kings 15:29. ) (3.) A city in the south of Judah, 12 miles south-east of Beersheba, to which David sent presents after recovering the spoil from the Amalekites at Ziklag ( 1 Samuel 30:26 ,  28). It was the native city of two of David's warriors ( 1 Chronicles 11:44 ). It is now called Ar'arah. 
AHAB|Father's brother.  (1.) The son of Omri, whom he succeeded as the seventh king of Israel. His history is recorded in  1 Kings 16 -22. His wife was Jezebel (q.v.), who exercised a very evil influence over him. To the calf-worship introduced by Jeroboam he added the worship of Baal. He was severely admonished by Elijah (q.v.) for his wickedness. His anger was on this account kindled against the prophet, and he sought to kill him. He undertook three campaigns against Ben-hadad II., king of Damascus. In the first two, which were defensive, he gained a complete victory over Ben-hadad, who fell into his hands, and was afterwards released on the condition of his restoring all the cities of Israel he then held, and granting certain other concessions to Ahab. After three years of peace, for some cause Ahab renewed war ( 1 Kings 22:3 ) with Ben-hadad by assaulting the city of Ramoth-gilead, although the prophet Micaiah warned him that he would not succeed, and that the 400 false prophets who encouraged him were only leading him to his ruin. Micaiah was imprisoned for thus venturing to dissuade Ahab from his purpose. Ahab went into the battle disguised, that he might if possible escape the notice of his enemies; but an arrow from a bow "drawn at a venture" pierced him, and though stayed up in his chariot for a time he died towards evening, and Elijah's prophecy ( 1 Kings 21:19 ) was fulfilled. He reigned twenty-three years. Because of his idolatry, lust, and covetousness, Ahab is referred to as pre-eminently the type of a wicked king ( 2 Kings 8:18 ;  2 Chronicles 22:3 ;  Micah 6:16 ). (2.) A false prophet referred to by Jeremiah ( Jeremiah 29:21 ), of whom nothing further is known. 
ACHIM|   ACHIM  a'-kim (Acheim): A descendant of Zerubbabel and ancestor of Jesus, mentioned only in  Matthew 1:14 .
ABAGTHA|One of the seven eunuchs in Ahasuerus's court ( Esther 1:10 ;  2:21 ). 
ADONIJAH|My Lord is Jehovah.  (1.) The fourth son of David ( 2 Samuel 3:4 ). After the death of his elder brothers, Amnon and Absalom, he became heir-apparent to the throne. But Solomon, a younger brother, was preferred to him. Adonijah, however, when his father was dying, caused himself to be proclaimed king. But Nathan and Bathsheba induced David to give orders that Solomon should at once be proclaimed and admitted to the throne. Adonijah fled and took refuge at the altar, and received pardon for his conduct from Solomon on the condition that he showed himself "a worthy man" ( 1 Kings 1:5 -53). He afterwards made a second attempt to gain the throne, but was seized and put to death ( 1 Kings 2:13 -25). (2.) A Levite sent with the princes to teach the book of the law to the inhabitants of Judah ( 2 Chronicles 17:8 ). (3.) One of the "chiefs of the people" after the Captivity ( Nehemiah 10:16 ). 
AMAM|   AMAM  a'-mam ('amam): A town in southern Palestine, which fell to Judah In the allotment of the land; occurs only in  Joshua 15:26 .
ARIEH|The lion, the name of one of the body-guard slain with Pekahiah at Samaria ( 2 Kings 15:25 ) by the conspirator Pekah. 
ADRAMMELECH|Adar the king.  (1.) An idol; a form of the sun-god worshipped by the inhabitants of Sepharvaim ( 2 Kings 17:31 ), and brought by the Sepharvite colonists into Samaria.  (2.) A son of Sennacherib, king of Assyria ( 2 Kings 19:37 ;  Isaiah 37:38 ). 
ALAMOTH|Virgins, a musical term ( 1 Chronicles 15:20 ), denoting that the psalm which bears this inscription ( Psalm 46 ) was to be sung by soprano or female voices. 
AHIAM|Mother's brother, one of David's thirty heroes ( 2 Samuel 23:33 ;  1 Chronicles 11:35 ). 
AMNON|Faithful.  (1.) One of the sons of Shammai, of the children of Ezra ( 1 Chronicles 4:20 ; Comp. 17). (2.) The eldest son of David, by Ahinoam of Jezreel ( 1 Chronicles 3:1 ;  2 Samuel 3:2 ). Absalom caused him to be put to death for his great crime in the matter of Tamar ( 2 Samuel 13:28 ,  29). 
ANAIAH|   ANAIAH  an-a-i'-a, a-ni'-a (`anayah, "Yah has answered"):  (1) a Levite who assisted Ezra in reading the law to the people ( Nehemiah 8:4 ), perhaps the person called Ananias in Esdras 9:43.  (2) One of those who sealed the covenant ( Nehemiah 10:22 ). He may have been the same as Anaiah (1).
AZZAN|   AZZAN  az'-an (`azzan, "strong" or "thorn"): Father of Paltiel of the tribe of Issachar. One of the commissioners selected to divide the land between the tribes ( Numbers 34:26 ).
ASENATH|An Egyptian name, meaning "gift of the sun-god", daughter of Potipherah, priest of On or Heliopolis, wife of Joseph ( Genesis 41:45 ). She was the mother of Manasseh and Ephraim (50-52;  46:20 ). 
AENEAS|   AENEAS  e-ne'-as ('Aineas): A paralytic at Lydda, who, after he "had kept his bed eight years," was miraculously healed by Peter ( Acts 9:33, 34 ).
ABIRAM|Father of height; i.e., "proud."  (1.) One of the sons of Eliab, who joined Korah in the conspiracy against Moses and Aaron. He and all the conspirators, with their families and possessions (except the children of Korah), were swallowed up by an earthquake ( Numbers 16:1 -27;  26:9 ;  Psalm 106:17 ). (2.) The eldest son of Hiel the Bethelite, who perished prematurely in consequence of his father's undertaking to rebuild Jericho ( 1 Kings 16:34 ), according to the words of Joshua ( 6:26 ). (see  JERICHO .) 
AMAD|   AMAD  a'-mad (`am`adh): A town in northern Palestine, which fell to the tribe of Asher in the division of the land ( Joshua 19:26 ). The modern ruin `Amud near Accho may be the site.
ASHTEROTH|Ashteroth Karnaim: Ashteroth of the two horns, the abode of the Rephaim ( Genesis 14:5 ). It may be identified with Ashtaroth preceding; called "Karnaim", i.e., the "two-horned" (the crescent moon). The Samaritan version renders the word by "Sunamein," the present es-Sunamein, 28 miles south of Damascus. 
ASSHURIM|   ASSHURIM  a-shoo'-rim ('ashshurim): Mentioned among the sons of Dedan, son of Jokshah, son of Abraham by Keturah ( Genesis 25:3 ).
ARPAD|( Isaiah 10:9 ;  36:19 ;  37:13 ), also Arphad, support, a Syrian city near Hamath, along with which it is invariably mentioned ( 2 Kings 19:13 ;  18:34 ;  Isaiah 10:9 ), and Damascus ( Jeremiah 49:23 ). After a siege of three years it fell (B.C. 742) before the Assyrian king Tiglath-pileser II. Now Tell Erfud. 
ABELMEHOLAH|Meadow of dancing, or the dancing-meadow, the birth-place and residence of the prophet Elisha, not far from Beth-shean ( 1 Kings 4:12 ), in the tribe of Issachar, near where the Wady el-Maleh emerges into the valley of the Jordan, "the rich meadow-land which extends about 4 miles south of Beth-shean; moist and luxuriant." Here Elisha was found at his plough by Elijah on his return up the Jordan valley from Horeb ( 1 Kings 19:16 ). It is now called `Ain Helweh. 
ADORAIM|   ADORAIM  ad-o-ra'-im ('adhorayim, "a pair of knolls," perhaps): One of several cities in Judah that were fortified by Rehoboam ( 2 Chronicles 11:9 ). The name appears in Josephus and in 1 Maccabees as Adora or Dora or Dor. Its location is indicated in general by that of the other cities which the record in Chronicles groups with it. Common consent identifies it with Dura, about five miles West by South of Hebron.
AHBAN|   AHBAN  a'-ban ('achban, "brother of an intelligent one"(?) Achbar): The son of Abishur of the tribe of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:29 ).
AKKUB|(another form of Jacob).  (1.) The head of one of the families of Nethinim ( Ezra 2:45 ). (2.) A Levite who kept the gate of the temple after the return from Babylon ( 1 Chronicles 9:17 ;  Ezra 2:42 ;  Nehemiah 7:45 ). (3.) A descendant of David ( 1 Chronicles 3:24 ). 
ALAMMELECH|   ALAMMELECH  a-lam'-e-lek: the King James Version ( Joshua 19:26 ) for ALLAMMELECH (which see).
APHARSITES|Another of the tribes removed to Samaria ( Ezra 4:9 ), or perhaps the same as the preceding. 
ARVADITES|   ARVAD; ARVADITES  ar'-vad, ar'-vad-its ('arwadh; Arados; modern Ruad): An island city off the coast of Syria some 30 miles North of Tripolis, and the race inhabiting it. It was a barren rock covered with fortifications and houses several stories in height. The island was about 800 ft. long by 500 wide, surrounded by a massive wall, and an artificial harbor was constructed on the East toward the main land. It developed into a trading city in early times, as did most of the Phoenician cities on this coast. It had a powerful navy, and its ships are mentioned in the monuments of Egypt and Assyria. It seems to have had a sort of hegemony over the northern Phoenician cities, from Mt. Cassius to the northern limits of Lebanon, something like that of Sidon in the South. It had its own local dynasty and coinage, and some of the names of its kings have been recovered. Its inhabitants are mentioned in the early lists of  Genesis 10:18 , and  Ezekiel 27:8, 11  refers to its seamen and soldiers in the service of Tyre. It brought under its authority some of the neighboring cities on the main land, such as Marathus and Simyra, the former nearly opposite the island and the latter some miles to the South.  Thothmes III, of Egypt, took it in his campaign in north Syria (1472 B.C.) and it is noticed in the campaigns of Rameses II in the early part of the 13th century B.C. (Breasted, Ancient Records). It is also mentioned in the Tell el-Amarna Lettersas being in league with the Amorites in their attacks upon the Egyptian possessions in Syria (44 and 28, B.M. Tell el-Amarna Letters). About the year 1200, or later, it was sacked by invaders from Asia Minor or the islands, as were most of the cities on the coast (Paton, Syria and Palestine, 145) but it recovered when they were driven back. Its maritime importance is indicated by the inscriptions of the Assyrian kings. Tiglath-pileser I (circa 1020) boasts that he sailed in the ships of Arvad. Asshur-nazir-pal (circa 876) made it tributary, but it revolted and we find 200 men of Arvad mentioned among the allies of Benhadad, of Damascus, at the great battle of Quarqar, when all Syria seems to have been in league against Shalmaneser II (circa 854). At this time the king of Arvad was Mattan Baal.  It was afterward tributary to Tiglath-pileser III and Sennacherib, the king who paid it to the latter being Abd-ilihit (circa 701). Ashurbanipal (circa 664) compelled its king Yakinlu to submit and send one of his daughters to become a member of the royal harem (Rawlinson, Phoenicia, 456-57). Under the Persians Arvad was allowed to unite in a confederation with Sidon and Tyre, with a common council at Tripolis(ib 484). When Alexander the Great invaded Syria in 332 B.C. Arvad submitted without a struggle under her king Strato, who sent his navy to aid Alexander in the reduction of Tyre. It seems to have received the favor of the Seleucid kings of Syria and enjoyed the right of asylum for political refugees. It is mentioned in a rescript from Rome about 138 B.C., in connection with other cities and rulers of the East, to show favor to the Jews. It was after Rome had begun to interfere in the affairs of Judea and Syria, and indicates that Arvad was of considerable importance at that time (see 1 Maccabees 15:16-23). The town is not mentioned in the New Testament, and in modern times has sunk to a small village, chiefly inhabited by fishermen. See  ARADUS .  H. Porter
AHINOAM|Brother of pleasantness = pleasant.  (1.) The daughter of Ahimaaz, and wife of Saul ( 1 Samuel 14:50 ). (2.) A Jezreelitess, the first wife of David ( 1 Samuel 25:43 ;  27:3 ). She was the mother of Amnon ( 2 Samuel 3:2 ). (See  1 Samuel 30:5 ,  18;  2 Samuel 2:2. ) 
ADER|   ADER  a'-der: Used in  1 Chronicles 8:15  the King James Version for EDER, which see.
AHIJAH|Brother (i.e.,  "friend") of Jehovah.  (1.) One of the sons of Bela ( 1 Chronicles 8:7 ,  R.V.). In A.V. called "Ahiah." (2.) One of the five sons of Jerahmeel, who was great-grandson of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:25 ). (3.) Son of Ahitub ( 1 Samuel 14:3 ,  18), Ichabod's brother; the same probably as Ahimelech, who was high priest at Nob in the reign of Saul ( 1 Samuel 22:11 ). Some, however, suppose that Ahimelech was the brother of Ahijah, and that they both officiated as high priests, Ahijah at Gibeah or Kirjath-jearim, and Ahimelech at Nob. (4.) A Pelonite, one of David's heroes ( 1 Chronicles 11:36 ); called also Eliam ( 2 Samuel 23:34 ). (5.) A Levite having charge of the sacred treasury in the temple ( 1 Chronicles 26:20 ). (6.) One of Solomon's secretaries ( 1 Kings 4:3 ). (7.) A prophet of Shiloh ( 1 Kings 11:29 ;  14:2 ), called the "Shilonite," in the days of Rehoboam. We have on record two of his remarkable prophecies,  1 Kings 11:31 -39, announcing the rending of the ten tribes from Solomon; and  1 Kings 14:6 -16, delivered to Jeroboam's wife, foretelling the death of Abijah the king's son, the destruction of Jeroboam's house, and the captivity of Israel "beyond the river." Jeroboam bears testimony to the high esteem in which he was held as a prophet of God ( 1 Kings 14:2 , 3). 
AHIMAN|Brother of a gift = liberal.  (1.) One of the three giant Anakim brothers whom Caleb and the spies saw in Mount Hebron ( Numbers 13:22 ) when they went in to explore the land. They were afterwards driven out and slain ( Joshua 15:14 ;  Judges 1:10 ). (2.) One of the guardians of the temple after the Exile ( 1 Chronicles 9:17 ). 
APPII|Appii Forum: I.e., "the Market of Appius" ( Acts 28:15 ,  R.V.), a town on the road, the "Appian Way," from Rome to Brundusium. It was 43 miles from Rome. Here Paul was met by some Roman Christians on his way to the capital. It was natural that they should halt here and wait for him, because from this place there were two ways by which travellers might journey to Rome. 
ABIMAEL|Father of Mael, one of the sons or descendants of Joktan, in Northern Arabia ( Genesis 10:28 ;  1 Chronicles 1:22 ). 
APHIAH|   APHIAH  a-fi'-a ('aphiach): A Benjaminate and an ancestor of King Saul ( 1 Samuel 9:1 ).
AMMON|Another form of the name Ben-ammi, the son of Lot ( Genesis 19:38 ). This name is also used for his posterity ( Psalm 83:7 ). 
ADBEEL|Miracle of God, the third of the twelve sons of Ishmael, and head of an Arabian tribe ( Genesis 25:13 ;  1 Chronicles 1:29 ). 
ALLAMMELECH|   ALLAMMELECH  a-lam'-e-lek ('allammelekh, "oak of a king"): A town in the tribe of Asher, the location of which is not known ( Joshua 19:26 ; the King James Version Alammelech).
ABEL|(Hebrews Hebhel), a breath, or vanity, the second son of Adam and Eve. He was put to death by his brother Cain ( Genesis 4:1 -16). Guided by the instruction of their father, the two brothers were trained in the duty of worshipping God. "And in process of time" (marg. "at the end of days",  i.e.,  on the Sabbath) each of them offered up to God of the first-fruits of his labours. Cain, as a husbandman, offered the fruits of the field; Abel, as a shepherd, of the firstlings of his flock. "The Lord had respect unto Abel and his offering; but unto Cain and his offering he had not respect" ( Genesis 4:3 -5). On this account Cain was angry with his brother, and formed the design of putting him to death; a design which he at length found an opportunity of carrying into effect ( Genesis 4:8 , 9. Comp. 1  John 3:12 ). There are several references to Abel in the New Testament. Our Saviour speaks of him as "righteous" ( Matthew 23:35 ). "The blood of sprinkling" is said to speak "better things than that of Abel" ( Hebrews 12:24 ); i.e., the blood of Jesus is the reality of which the blood of the offering made by Abel was only the type. The comparison here is between the sacrifice offered by Christ and that offered by Abel, and not between the blood of Christ calling for mercy and the blood of the murdered Abel calling for vengeance, as has sometimes been supposed. It is also said ( Hebrews 11:4 ) that "Abel offered unto God a more excellent sacrifice than Cain." This sacrifice was made "by faith;" this faith rested in God, not only as the Creator and the God of providence, but especially in God as the great Redeemer, whose sacrifice was typified by the sacrifices which, no doubt by the divine institution, were offered from the days of Adam downward. On account of that "faith" which looked forward to the great atoning sacrifice, Abel's offering was accepted of God. Cain's offering had no such reference, and therefore was rejected. Abel was the first martyr, as he was the first of our race to die. Abel (Hebrews `abhel), lamentation ( 1 Samuel 6:18 ), the name given to the great stone in Joshua's field whereon the ark was "set down." The Revised Version, however, following the Targum and the LXX., reads in the Hebrew text 'ebhen (= a stone), and accordingly translates "unto the great stone, whereon they set down the ark." This reading is to be preferred. Abel (Hebrews `abhel), a grassy place, a meadow. This word enters into the composition of the following words: 
AZZAH|   AZZAH  az'-a (`azzah, "strong"): the King James Version form ( Deuteronomy 2:23   1 Kings 4:24   Jeremiah 25:20 ) for the Revised Version (British and American) "Gaza."
AHIEZER|Brother of help; i.e., "helpful."  (1.) The chief of the tribe of Dan at the time of the Exodus ( Numbers 1:12 ;  2:25 ;  10:25 ). (2.) The chief of the Benjamite slingers that repaired to David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:3 ). 
APOLLOS|A Jew "born at Alexandria," a man well versed in the Scriptures and eloquent ( Acts 18:24 ; R.V.,  "learned"). He came to Ephesus (about A.D. 49), where he spake "boldly" in the synagogue ( 18:26 ), although he did not know as yet that Jesus of Nazareth was the Messiah. Aquila and Priscilla instructed him more perfectly in "the way of God", i.e., in the knowledge of Christ. He then proceeded to Corinth, where he met Paul ( Acts 18:27 ;  19:1 ). He was there very useful in watering the good seed Paul had sown ( 1 Corinthians 1:12 ), and in gaining many to Christ. His disciples were much attached to him ( 1 Corinthians 3:4 -7,  22). He was with Paul at Ephesus when he wrote the First Epistle to the Corinthians; and Paul makes kindly reference to him in his letter to Titus ( 3:13 ). Some have supposed, although without sufficient ground, that he was the author of the Epistle to the Hebrews. 
ARABIANS|   ARAB; ARABIANS  ar'-ab, a-ra'-bi-ans. See  ARABIA .
ARMORBEARER|   ARMOR-BEARER  ar'-mer-bar'-er (nose' keli; Greek uses a phrase, ho airon ta skeue, literally "the one carrying the armor"): One who carried the large shield and perhaps other weapons for a king ( 1 Samuel 31:4 ), commander-in-chief ( 2 Samuel 23:37 ), captain ( 1 Samuel 14:7 ) or champion ( 1 Samuel 17:7 ). All warriors of distinction had such an attendant. Rather than perish by the hand of a woman, Abimelech called upon his armor-bearer to give him the finishing stroke ( Judges 9:54 ), and when King Saul's armor-bearer refused to do this office for him that he might not become the prisoner of the Philistines, he took a sword himself and fell upon it ( 1 Samuel 31:4 ). David became Saul's armor-bearer for a time, and Jonathan's armor-bearer was a man of resource and courage ( 1 Samuel 14:7 ). The shield-bearer was a figure well known in the chariots of Egypt and Assyria and the Hittites, his business being to protect his fighting companion during the engagement.  T. Nicol.
ADAIAH|   ADAIAH  a-da'-ya, a-di'-a (`adhayah, "Yahweh hath adorned"):  (1) Apparently the seventh of the nine sons of Shimei, who is apparently the same with Shema, who is the fifth of the sons of Elpaal, who is the second of the two sons of Shaharaim and Hushim ( 1 Chronicles 8:21 ). Shaharaim and his descendants are listed with the descendants of Benjamin, though his relations to Benjamin are not stated.  (2) A Levite; ancestor to David's singer Asaph, and a descendant of the fifth generation from Gershom ( 1 Chronicles 6:41 ).  (3) The father of Maaseiah, who was one of the captains of hundreds associated with Jehoiada the priest in making Joash king ( 2 Chronicles 23:1 ).  (4) A resident of Bozkath, and father of Jedidah the mother of King Josiah ( 2 Kings 22:1 ).  (5) A descendant of Judah through Perez. His great-great-grandson Maaseiah resided in Jerusalem after Nehemiah had rehabilitated the city ( Nehemiah 11:5 ).  (6) One of the men of Israel, not a priest or Levite, but "of the sons of Bani," who promised Ezra that he would part with his foreign wife ( Ezra 10:29 ).  (7) The same man or another, in a different group of the sons of Bani ( Ezra 10:39 ).  (8) One of the priests of the latest Bible times, mentioned with a partial genealogy ( Nehemiah 11:12   1 Chronicles 9:12 ).  Willis J. Beecher
ASYNCRITUS|   ASYNCRITUS  a-sin'-kri-tus (Asunkritos, "incomparable"): An unknown Christian at Rome to whom Paul sent an affectionate salutation ( Romans 16:14 ).
ABIMELECH|My father a king, or father of a king, a common name of the Philistine kings, as "Pharaoh" was of the Egyptian kings.  (1.) The Philistine king of Gerar in the time of Abraham ( Genesis 20:1 -18). By an interposition of Providence, Sarah was delivered from his harem, and was restored to her husband Abraham. As a Mark of respect he gave to Abraham valuable gifts, and offered him a settlement in any part of his country; while at the same time he delicately and yet severely rebuked him for having practised a deception upon him in pretending that Sarah was only his sister. Among the gifts presented by the king were a thousand pieces of silver as a "covering of the eyes" for Sarah; i.e., either as an atoning gift and a testimony of her innocence in the sight of all, or rather for the purpose of procuring a veil for Sarah to conceal her beauty, and thus as a reproof to her for not having worn a veil which, as a married woman, she ought to have done. A few years after this Abimelech visited Abraham, who had removed southward beyond his territory, and there entered into a league of peace and friendship with him. This league was the first of which we have any record. It was confirmed by a mutual oath at Beer-sheba ( Genesis 21:22 -34). (2.) A king of Gerar in the time of Isaac, probably the son of the preceeding ( Genesis 26:1 -22). Isaac sought refuge in his territory during a famine, and there he acted a part with reference to his wife Rebekah similar to that of his father Abraham with reference to Sarah. Abimelech rebuked him for the deception, which he accidentally discovered. Isaac settled for a while here, and prospered. Abimelech desired him, however, to leave his territory, which Isaac did. Abimelech afterwards visited him when he was encamped at Beer-sheba, and expressed a desire to renew the covenant which had been entered into between their fathers ( Genesis 26:26 -31). (3.) A son of Gideon ( Judges 9:1 ), who was proclaimed king after the death of his father ( Judges 8:33 - 9:6 ). One of his first Acts was to murder his brothers, seventy in number, "on one stone," at Ophrah. Only one named Jotham escaped. He was an unprincipled, ambitious ruler, often engaged in war with his own subjects. When engaged in reducing the town of Thebez, which had revolted, he was struck mortally on his head by a mill-stone, thrown by the hand of a woman from the wall above. Perceiving that the wound was mortal, he desired his armour-bearer to thrust him through with his sword, that it might not be said he had perished by the hand of a woman ( Judges 9:50 -57). (4.) The son of Abiathar, and high priest in the time of David ( 1 Chronicles 18:16 ). In the parallel passage,  2 Samuel 8:17 , we have the name Ahimelech, and Abiathar, the son of Ahimelech. This most authorities consider the more correct reading.  (5.) Achish, king of Gath, in the title of  Psalm 34 . (Comp.  1 Samuel 21:10 -15.) 
AMRAMITES|   AMRAMITES  am'-ram-its (`amrami): The descendants of Amram, one of the Levitical families mentioned in  Numbers 3:27  and  1 Chronicles 26:23 , who had the charge of the tabernacle proper, guarding the ark, table, candlestick, etc., called in  1 Chronicles 26:22  "the treasures of the house of Yahweh."
ASNAH|   ASNAH  as'-na ('acnah, "thornbush"): One of the Nethinim, who returned with Zerubbabel from the exile ( Ezra 2:50 ).
ANAH|Speech.  (1.) One of the sons of Seir, and head of an Idumean tribe, called a Horite, as in course of time all the branches of this tribe were called from their dwelling in caves in Mount Seir ( Genesis 36:20 ,  29;  1 Chronicles 1:38 ). (2.) One of the two sons of Zibeon the Horite, and father of Esau's wife Aholibamah ( Genesis 36:18 ,  24). 
AZRIEL|   AZRIEL  az'-ri-el (`azri'el, "God's help"):  (1) One of the leading men of the half-tribe of Manasseh, East of the Jordan, who with others of his tribe was carried captive by the king of Assyria ( 1 Chronicles 5:24 ).  (2) The father of Jerimoth of the tribe of Naphtali in the reign of King David ( 1 Chronicles 27:19 ).  (3) The father of Seraiah, one of the officers sent by Jehoiakim to arrest Jeremiah and Baruch ( Jeremiah 36:26 ).
ADIEL|Ornament of God.  (1.) The father of Azmaveth, who was treasurer under David and Solomon ( 1 Chronicles 27:25 ).  (2.) A family head of the tribe of Simeon ( 1 Chronicles 4:36 ).  (3.) A priest ( 1 Chronicles 9:12 ). 
ABDON|Servile. (1.) The son of Hillel, a Pirathonite, the tenth judge of Israel ( Judges 12:13 -15). He is probably the Bedan of  1 Samuel 12:11 . (2.) The first-born of Gibeon of the tribe of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:30 ;  9:36 ). (3.) The son of Micah, one of those whom Josiah sent to the prophetess Huldah to ascertain from her the meaning of the recently discovered book of the law ( 2 Chronicles 34:20 ). He is called Achbor in  2 Kings 22:12 . (4.) One of the "sons" of Shashak ( 1 Chronicles 8:23 ). This is the name also of a Levitical town of the Gershonites, in the tribe of Asher ( Joshua 21:30 ;  1 Chronicles 6:74 ). The ruins of Abdeh, some 8 miles north-east of Accho, probably Mark its site. 
ALOTH|   ALOTH  a'-loth (`aloth): So found in the King James Version and the Revised Version, margin in  1 Kings 4:16 , where the Revised Version (British and American) has BEALOTH (be`aloth). A town, or district in northern Palestine, together with Asher under Baana, one of Solomon's twelve civil officers. Conder identifies with the ruin `Alia, near Achzib. There was another Bealoth in southern Palestine ( Joshua 15:24 ). The difference in the form of the word in the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American) is due to interpretation of the initial "b" as the preposition "in" in the former, and as part of the word itself in the latter.
ANTIPATRIS|A city built by Herod the Great, and called by this name in honour of his father, Antipater. It lay between Caesarea and Lydda, two miles inland, on the great Roman road from Caesarea to Jerusalem. To this place Paul was brought by night ( Acts 23:31 ) on his way to Caesarea, from which it was distant 28 miles. It is identified with the modern, Ras-el-Ain, where rise the springs of Aujeh, the largest springs in Palestine. 
AZAREEL|   AZAREEL  a-zar'-e-el. See  AZAREL .
AMMIHUR|   AMMIHUR  a-mi'-hur (the King James Version and the Revised Version, margin; `ammichur, "my kinsman is noble"; Emioud). See  AMMIHUD (4) .
ARAMZOBAH|( Psalm 60 ,  title), probably the region between the Euphrates and the Orontes. 
ATHENIANS|   ATHENIANS  a-the'-ni-ans Athenaioi: Inhabitants of Athens. Luke has a remark on their curiosity and their delight in novelty ( Acts 17:21 ). See  ATHENS .
AKRABBIM|Scorpions, probably the general name given to the ridge containing the pass between the south of the Dead Sea and Zin, es-Sufah, by which there is an ascent to the level of the land of Palestine. Scorpions are said to abound in this whole district, and hence the name ( Numbers 34:4 ). It is called "Maaleh-acrabbim" in  Joshua 15:3 , and "the ascent of Akrabbim" in  Numbers 34:4 . 
ANTIOCH| (1.) In Syria, on the river Orontes, about 16 miles from the Mediterranean, and some 300 miles north of Jerusalem. It was the metropolis of Syria, and afterwards became the capital of the Roman province in Asia. It ranked third, after Rome and Alexandria, in point of importance, of the cities of the Roman empire. It was called the "first city of the East." Christianity was early introduced into it ( Acts 11:19 ,  21,  24), and the name "Christian" was first applied here to its professors ( Acts 11:26 ). It is intimately connected with the early history of the gospel ( Acts 6:5 ;  11:19 ,  27,  28,  30;  12:25 ;  15:22 -35;  Galatians 2:11 ,  12). It was the great central point whence missionaries to the Gentiles were sent forth. It was the birth-place of the famous Christian father Chrysostom, who died A.D. 407. It bears the modern name of Antakia, and is now a miserable, decaying Turkish town. Like Philippi, it was raised to the rank of a Roman colony. Such colonies were ruled by "praetors" (R.V. marg.,   Acts 16:20 ,  21). (2.) In the extreme north of Pisidia; was visited by Paul and Barnabas on the first missionary journey ( Acts 13:14 ). Here they found a synagogue and many proselytes. They met with great success in preaching the gospel, but the Jews stirred up a violent opposition against them, and they were obliged to leave the place. On his return, Paul again visited Antioch for the purpose of confirming the disciples ( Acts 14:21 ). It has been identified with the modern Yalobatch, lying to the east of Ephesus. 
AZANIAH|   AZANIAH  az-a-ni'-a 'azanyah, ("Yahweh has given ear"): A son of Jeshua, a Levite who signed the covenant ( Nehemiah 10:9 ).
ABDI|My servant.  (1.)  1 Chronicles 6:44 .  (2.)  2 Chronicles 29:12 .  (3.)  Ezra 10:26 . 
ASHTERATHITE|   ASHTERATHITE  ash'-te-rath-it, ash-ter'-ath-it (ha-`ashterathi): A native of Ashtaroth: Uzzia, one of David's heroes ( 1 Chronicles 11:44 ).
ASSASSINS|   ASSASSINS  a-sas'-inz (sicarioi; the King James Version murderers): Josephus (BJ, II, xiii, 3, xvii) relates that "there sprang up in Jerusalem a class of robbers called Sicarii, who slew men in the daytime, and in the midst of the city. This they did chiefly when they mingled with the populace at the festivals, and, hiding short daggers in their garments, stabbed with them those that were their enemies. The first to be assassinated by them was Jonathan the high priest, and after him many were slain daily" (see also Ant, XX, viii, 6, ix). The name is derived from Latin sica, "a dagger." The sicarioi were implacable in their hatred to Rome and to those Jews who were suspected of leaning toward Rome. They took a leading part in the Jewish rebellion and in the disturbance previous to it, and also in the faction quarrels during the war. After the war they continued their nefarious practices in Egypt and Cyrene whither they had fled. Lysias mistook Paul for `the Egyptian who. led out into the wilderness the 4,000 men of the sicarioi' ( Acts 21:38 ).  S. F. Hunter
AHITHOPHEL|Brother of insipidity or impiety, a man greatly renowned for his sagacity among the Jews. At the time of Absalom's revolt he deserted David ( Psalm 41:9 ;  55:12 -14) and espoused the cause of Absalom ( 2 Samuel 15:12 ). David sent his old friend Hushai back to Absalom, in order that he might counteract the counsel of Ahithophel ( 2 Samuel 15:31 -37). This end was so far gained that Ahithophel saw he had no longer any influence, and accordingly he at once left the camp of Absalom and returned to Giloh, his native place, where, after arranging his wordly affairs, he hanged himself, and was buried in the sepulchre of his fathers ( 2 Samuel 17:1 -23). He was the type of Judas ( Psalm 41:9 ). 
ADORAM|see  ADONIRAM . 
ALAMETH|   ALAMETH  al'-a-meth (`alameth, "concealment";  1 Chronicles 7:8  the King James Version): The name of a son of Becher and grandson of Benjamin. His name was preserved as the name of a town near Anathoth (ALLEMETH,  1 Chronicles 6:60  the Revised Version (British and American)). Except for the strong pausal accent in the Hebrew the form of the word would be the same as ALEMETH (which see).
AHER|   AHER  a'-her ('acher, "another"; Aer): A man of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 7:12 ), apparently a contracted form, perhaps the same as Ahiram (King James Version) ( Numbers 26:38 ) or Aharah ( 1 Chronicles 8:1 ).
AGRIPPA|Agrippa I. The grandson of Herod the Great, and son of Aristobulus and Bernice. The Roman emperor Caligula made him governor first of the territories of Philip, then of the tetrarchy of Lysanias, with the title of king ("king Herod"), and finally of that of Antipas, who was banished, and of Samaria and Judea. Thus he became ruler over the whole of Palestine. He was a persecutor of the early Christians. He slew James, and imprisoned Peter ( Acts 12:1 -4). He died at Caesarea, being "eaten of worms" ( Acts 12:23 ), A.D. 44. (Comp. Josephus,  Ant. xix. 8.)  Agrippa II. Son of the foregoing, was born at Rome, A.D. 27. He was the brother of Bernice and Drusilla. The Emperor Claudius (A.D. 48) invested him with the office of superintendent of the Temple of Jerusalem, and made him governor (A.D. 50) of Chalcis. He was afterwards raised to the rank of king, and made governor over the tetrarchy of Philip and Lysanias ( Acts 25:13 ;  26:2 ,  7). It was before him that Paul delivered (A.D. 59) his speech recorded in  Acts 26 . His private life was very profligate. He died (the last of his race) at Rome, at the age of about seventy years, A.D. 100. 
ARETAS|The father-in-law of Herod Antipas, and king of Arabia Petraea. His daughter returned to him on the occasion of her husband's entering into an adulterous alliance with Herodias, the wife of Herod-Philip, his half-brother ( Luke 3:19 ,  20;  Mark 6:17 ;  Matthew 14:3 ). This led to a war between Aretas and Herod Antipas. Herod's army was wholly destroyed (A.D. 36). Aretas, taking advantage of the complications of the times on account of the death of the Emperor Tiberius (A.D. 37), took possession of Damascus ( 2 Corinthians 11:32 ; Comp.  Acts 9:25 ). At this time Paul returned to Damascus from Arabia. 
ASHNAH|   ASHNAH  ash'-na ('ashnah): Two sites,  (1)  Joshua 15:33 , a site in the lowlands of Judah, probably near Estaol and Zorah. The small ruin Aslin between those two places may retain an echo of the old name;  (2)  Joshua 15:43  an unknown site farther south.
ABDEEL|Servant of God, ( Jeremiah 36:26 ), the father of Shelemiah. 
ATARAH|   ATARAH  at'-a-ra, a-ta'-ra (`aTarah, "crown"): One of Jerahmeel's wives and mother of Onam ( 1 Chronicles 2:26 ).
ASIA|Is used to denote Proconsular Asia, a Roman province which embraced the western parts of Asia Minor, and of which Ephesus was the capital, in  Acts 2:9 ;  6:9 ;  16:6 ;  19:10 ,22;  20:4 , 16, 18, etc., and probably Asia Minor in  Acts 19:26 , 27;  21:27 ;  24:18 ;  27:2 . Proconsular Asia contained the seven churches of the Apocalypse ( Revelation 1:11 ). The "chiefs of Asia" ( Acts 19:31 ) were certain wealthy citizens who were annually elected to preside over the games and religious festivals of the several cities to which they belonged. Some of these "Asiarchs" were Paul's friends. 
ARCHI|A city on the boundary of Ephraim and Benjamin ( Joshua 16:2 ), between Bethel and Beth-horon the nether. 
ADMATHA|   ADMATHA  ad'-ma-tha, ad-ma'-tha ('adhmatha'): One of "the seven princes of Persia and Media, who saw the king's face, and sat first in the kingdom" ( Esther 1:14 ); compare  2 Kings 25:19   Ezra 7:14 . The Septuagint gives only three names.
AHIRAM|   AHIRAM  a-hi'-ram ('achiram, "exalted brother," or "my brother is exalted"):  A son of Benjamin. Mentioned third of the five in  Numbers 26:38, 39 . In  1 Chronicles 8:1  five sons are likewise mentioned, being explicitly numbered; the third name, Aharah ('achrach), is conjectured to be either a corruption of Ahiram or a different name for the same person. In  1 Chronicles 7:6  is a fuller list of Benjamite names, but it is fragmentary and not clear. In it occurs Aher ('acher), which may be either Ahiram or Aharah with the end of the word lost. In  Genesis 46:21  ten sons of Benjamin are mentioned, some being there counted as sons who, in the other lists, are spoken of as more remote descendants. In this list Ehi ('echi) is perhaps Ahiram shortened. See  AHARAH ;  AHER ; EHI.  Willis J. Beecher
ACHAICUS|   ACHAICUS  a-ka'-i-kus (Achaikos, "belonging to Achaia"): A name honorably conferred upon L. Mummius, conqueror of Corinth and Achaia (compare CORINTH). Achaicus was one of the leaders of the Corinthian church (to be inferred from  1 Corinthians 16:15 ) who, visiting Paul at Ephesus with Stephanas and Fortunatus, greatly relieved the Apostle's anxiety for the Corinthian church (compare  1 Corinthians 5:1 ). Paul admonishes the members of the Cor church to submit to their authority (compare  1 Thessalonians 5:12 ) and to acknowledge their work ( 1 Corinthians 16:15 ).
ARCHIPPUS|Master of the horse, a "fellow-soldier" of Paul's ( Philemon 1:2 ), whom he exhorts to renewed activity ( Colossians 4:17 ). He was a member of Philemon's family, probably his son. 
ASHDOD|Stronghold, a Philistine city ( Joshua 15:47 ), about midway between Gaza and Joppa, and 3 miles from the Mediterranean. It was one of the chief seats of the worship of Dagon ( 1 Samuel 5:5 ). It belonged to the tribe of Judah ( Joshua 15:47 ), but it never came into their actual possession. It was an important city, as it stood on the highroad from Egypt to Palestine, and hence was strongly fortified ( 2 Chronicles 26:6 ;  Isaiah 20:1 ). Uzziah took it, but fifty years after his death it was taken by the Assyrians (B.C. 758). According to Sargon's record, it was captured by him in B.C. 711. The only reference to it in the New Testament, where it is called Azotus, is in the account of Philip's return from Gaza ( Acts 8:40 ). It is now called Eshdud. 
ASER|   ASER  a'-ser (Aser): the King James Version: Greek form of Asher (thus the Revised Version (British and American)) ( Luke 2:36   Revelation 7:6 ).
ACCHO|Sultry or sandy, a town and harbour of Phoenicia, in the tribe of Asher, but never acquired by them ( Judges 1:31 ). It was known to the ancient Greeks and Romans by the name of Ptolemais, from Ptolemy the king of Egypt, who rebuilt it about B.C. 100. Here Paul landed on his last journey to Jerusalem ( Acts 21:7 ). During the crusades of the Middle Ages it was called Acra; and subsequently, on account of its being occupied by the Knights Hospitallers of Jerusalem, it was called St. Jean d'Acre, or simply Acre. 
ABNER|Father of light; i.e., "enlightening", the son of Ner and uncle of Saul. He was commander-in-chief of Saul's army ( 1 Samuel 14:50 ;  17:55 ;  20:25 ). He first introduced David to the court of Saul after the victory over Goliath ( 1 Samuel 17:57 ). After the death of Saul, David was made king over Judah, and reigned in Hebron. Among the other tribes there was a feeling of hostility to Judah; and Abner, at the head of Ephraim, fostered this hostility in the interest of the house of Saul, whose son Ish-bosheth he caused to be proclaimed king ( 2 Samuel 2:8 ). A state of war existed between these two kings. A battle fatal to Abner, who was the leader of Ish-boseth's army, was fought with David's army under Joab at Gibeon ( 2 Samuel 2:12 ). Abner, escaping from the field, was overtaken by Asahel, who was "light of foot as a wild roe," the brother of Joab and Abishai, whom he thrust through with a back stroke of his spear ( 2 Samuel 2:18 -32). Being rebuked by Ish-bosheth for the impropriety of taking to wife Rizpah, who had been a concubine of King Saul, he found an excuse for going over to the side of David, whom he now professed to regard as anointed by the Lord to reign over all Israel. David received him favourably, and promised that he would have command of the armies. At this time Joab was absent from Hebron, but on his return he found what had happened. Abner had just left the city; but Joab by a stratagem recalled him, and meeting him at the gate of the city on his return, thrust him through with his sword ( 2 Samuel 3:27 ,  31-39;  4:12.  Comp.  1 Kings 2:5 ,  32). David lamented in pathetic words the death of Abner, "Know ye not that there is a prince and a great man fallen this day in Israel?" ( 2 Samuel 3:33 -38.) 
ATHLAI|   ATHLAI  ath'-la-i `athlay, ("afflicted?"): A Jew, the son of Bebai, who was influenced by Ezra to put away his wife ( Ezra 10:28 ).
ABIA|My father is the Lord, the Greek form of Abijah, or Abijam ( Matthew 1:7 ), instead of Abiah ( 1 Chronicles 7:8 ). In  Luke 1:5 , the name refers to the head of the eighth of the twenty-four courses into which David divided the priests ( 1 Chronicles 24:10 ). 
ASHARELAH|   ASHARELAH; ASARELAH  ash-a-re'-la ('asar'elah): One of the Asaphites appointed by David to the temple service ( 1 Chronicles 25:2 ); in  1 Chronicles 25:14  he is called Jesharelah. The latter element in both forms may be ('el) "God," but the meaning of the former part in the first form is doubtful. Thes. compares 'acar, "to bind," "whom God has bound (by a vow)."
AHIMELECH|Brother of the king, the son of Ahitub and father of Abiathar ( 1 Samuel 22:20 -23). He descended from Eli in the line of Ithamar. In  1 Chronicles 18:16  he is called Abimelec, and is probably the same as Ahiah ( 1 Samuel 14:3 ,  18). He was the twelfth high priest, and officiated at Nob, where he was visited by David (to whom and his companions he gave five loaves of the showbread) when he fled from Saul ( 1 Samuel 21:1 -9). He was summoned into Saul's presence, and accused, on the information of Doeg the Edomite, of disloyalty because of his kindness to David; whereupon the king commanded that he, with the other priests who stood beside him (86 in all), should be put to death. This sentence was carried into execution by Doeg in the most cruel manner ( 1 Samuel 22:9 -23). Possibly Abiathar had a son also called Ahimelech, or the two names, as some think, may have been accidentally transposed in  2 Samuel 8:17 ;  1 Chronicles 18:16 , marg.;  24:3 , 6, 31. 
ADRAMYTTIUM|A city of Asia Minor on the coast of Mysia, which in early times was called AEolis. The ship in which Paul embarked at Caesarea belonged to this city ( Acts 27:2 ). He was conveyed in it only to Myra, in Lycia, whence he sailed in an Alexandrian ship to Italy. It was a rare thing for a ship to sail from any port of Palestine direct for Italy. It still bears the name Adramyti, and is a place of some traffic. 
HAZARENAN|Village of fountains, a place on the north-east frontier of Palestine ( Numbers 34:9 ,  10). Some have identified it with Ayan ed-Dara in the heart of the central chain of Anti-Libanus. More probably, however, it has been identified with Kuryetein, about 60 miles east-north-east of Damascus. (Comp.  Ezek. 47:17 ;  48:1. ) 
REAIAH|     re-a'-ya, re-i'-a (re'ayah, "Yah has seen"; Septuagint: Codex Vaticanus, Rhada, A, Rheia):  (1) The eponym of a Calebite family ( 1 Chronicles 4:2 ). The word "Reaiah" should probably be substituted for "Haroeh" in  1 Chronicles 2:52 , but both forms may be corruptions.  (2) A Reubenite ( 1 Chronicles 5:5 , the King James Version "Reaia").  See  JOEL .  (3) The family name of a company of Nethinim ( Ezra 2:47   Nehemiah 7:50  = 1Es 5:31).
MASTERS|   ASSEMBLIES,  OF  a-sem'-bliz, (ba`ale 'acuppoth,  Ecclesiastes 12:11 ): the American Revised Version, margin "collectors of sentences," thus Qimchi, Grotius and others. This has been variously interpreted. Tyler translates "editors of collections." Klienert renders "protectors of the treasure-chambers," 'acuppoth being considered equivalent to the 'acuppim of  1 Chronicles 26:15, 17   Nehemiah 12:25  (see ASUPPIM). The proverbs are like nails guarding the sacred storehouse, the book closing with this warning against touching the collection (compare  Revelation 22:18, 19 ). Delitzsch translates "like fastened nails which are put together in collections." "As ba`ale berith ( Genesis 14:13 ) signifies `the confederates,' ba`ale shebhu`ah ( Nehemiah 6:18 ) `the sworn,' and the frequently occurring ba`ale ha-`ir `the citizens': so ba`ale 'acuppoth means, the possessors of assemblies and of the assembled themselves, or the possessors of collections and of things collected. Thus ba`ale 'acuppoth will be a designation of the `words of the wise' (as in shalishim, "choice men" = choice proverbs,  Proverbs 22:20 , in a certain measure personified), as of those which form or constitute collections and which stand together in order and rank" ("Eccl," English translation, 434).  The Jerusalem Talmud takes 'acuppoth as the Sanhedrin. On the whole it is better to interpret the phrase "persons skilled in collections" of wise sayings, grouped in a compact whole (compare Wright, Eccl, 102).  S. F. Hunter
PUTHITES|     pu'-thits (puthi, "simple"; the King James Version Puhites): One of the families of Kiriath-jearim, grandchildren of Caleb ( 1 Chronicles 2:50, 53 ).
HADATTAH|New, one of the towns in the extreme south of Judah ( Joshua 15:25 ). 
CALEB|A dog.  (1.) One of the three sons of Hezron of the tribe of Judah. He is also called Chelubai ( 1 Chronicles 2:9 ). His descendants are enumerated (18-20,  42-49). (2.) A "son of Hur, the firstborn of Ephratah" ( 1 Chronicles 2:50 ). Some would read the whole passage thus: "These [i.e., the list in ver. 42-49] were the sons of Caleb. The sons of Hur, the firstborn of Ephratah, were Shobal, etc." Thus Hur would be the name of the son and not the father of Caleb (ver. 19). (3.) The son of Jephunneh ( Numbers 13:6 ;  32:12 ;  Joshua 14:6 ,  14). He was one of those whom Moses sent to search the land in the second year after the Exodus. He was one of the family chiefs of the tribe of Judah. He and Joshua the son of Nun were the only two of the whole number who encouraged the people to go up and possess the land, and they alone were spared when a plague broke out in which the other ten spies perished ( Numbers 13 ; 14). All the people that had been numbered, from twenty years old and upward, perished in the wilderness except these two. The last notice we have of Caleb is when (being then eighty-five years of age) he came to Joshua at the camp at Gilgal, after the people had gained possession of the land, and reminded him of the promise Moses had made to him, by virtue of which he claimed a certain portion of the land of Kirjath-arba as his inheritance ( Joshua 14:6 -15;  15:13 -15;  21:10 -12;  1 Samuel 25:2 , 3;  30:14 ). He is called a "Kenezite" in  Joshua 14:6 ,14. This may simply mean "son of Kenez" ( Numbers 32:12 ). Some, however, read "Jephunneh, the son of Kenez," who was a descendant of Hezron, the son of Pharez, a grandson of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:5 ). This Caleb may possibly be identical with (2). (4.) Caleb gave his name apparently to a part of the south country ( 1 Samuel 30:14 ) of Judah, the district between Hebron and Carmel, which had been assigned to him. When he gave up the city of Hebron to the priests as a city of refuge, he retained possession of the surrounding country ( Joshua 21:11 , 12; Comp.  1 Samuel 25:3 ). 
NEBO|Proclaimer; prophet.  (1.) A Chaldean god whose worship was introduced into Assyria by Pul ( Isaiah 46:1 ;  Jeremiah 48:1 ). To this idol was dedicated the great temple whose ruins are still seen at Birs Nimrud. A statue of Nebo found at Calah, where it was set up by Pul, king of Assyria, is now in the British Museum. (2.) A mountain in the land of Moab from which Moses looked for the first and the last time on the Promised Land ( Deuteronomy 32:49 ;  34:1 ). It has been identified with Jebel Nebah, on the eastern shore of the Dead Sea, near its northern end, and about 5 miles south-west of Heshbon. It was the summit of the ridge of Pisgah (q.v.), which was a part of the range of the "mountains of Abarim." It is about 2,643 feet in height, but from its position it commands a view of Western Palestine. Close below it are the plains of Moab, where Balaam, and afterwards Moses, saw the tents of Israel spread along. (3.) A town on the east of Jordan which was taken possession of and rebuilt by the tribe of Reuben ( Numbers 32:3 , 38;  1 Chronicles 5:8 ). It was about 8 miles south of Heshbon. (4.) The "children of Nebo" ( Ezra 2:29 ;  Nehemiah 7:33 ) were of those who returned from Babylon. It was a town in Benjamin, probably the modern Beit Nubah, about 7 miles north-west of Hebron. 
ELISEUS|     el-i-se'-us.  See  ELISHA .
DIBLATH|     dib'-lath.  See  DIBLAH .
ELHANAN|Whom God has graciously bestowed.  (1.) A warrior of the time of David famed for his exploits. In the Authorized Version ( 2 Samuel 21:19 ) it is recorded that "Elhanan the son of Jaare-oregim, a Bethlehemite, slew the brother of Goliath." The Revised Version here rightly omits the words "the brother of." They were introduced in the Authorized Version to bring this passage into agreement with  1 Chronicles 20:5 , where it is said that he "slew Lahmi the brother of Goliath." Goliath the Gittite was killed by David ( 1 Samuel 17 ). The exploit of Elhanan took place late in David's reign. (2.) The son of Dodo, and one of David's warriors ( 2 Samuel 23:24 ). 
BERIITES|   BERIAH;   be-ri'-a, be-ri'-its (beri`ah, "in shouting," probably derived from a Hebrew root meaning "to make noise," or "in evil," from another Hebrew root):  (1) A son of Asher and father of Heber and Malchiel ( Genesis 46:17   1 Chronicles 7:30, 31 ; the head of the family of the Beriites,  Numbers 26:44 ).  (2) A son of Ephraim, called Beriah by his father because "it went evil with his house" ( 1 Chronicles 7:23 ).  (3) A descendant of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:13, 16 ).  (4) A Levite in the line of Gershon ( 1 Chronicles 23:10 f ).
JANOAH|Or Jano'hah, rest.  (1.) A town on the north-eastern border of Ephraim, in the Jordan valley ( Joshua 16:6 ,  7). Identified with the modern Yanun, 8 miles south-east of Nablus. (2.) A town of Northern Palestine, within the boundaries of Naphtali. It was taken by the king of Assyria ( 2 Kings 15:29 ). 
MALLOTHI|My fulness, a Kohathite Levite, one of the sons of Heman the Levite ( 1 Chronicles 25:4 ), and chief of the nineteenth division of the temple musicians (26). 
SUKKIIMS|Dwellers in tents, (Vulg. and LXX.,  "troglodites;" i.e.,  cave-dwellers in the hills along the Red Sea). Shiskak's army, with which he marched against Jerusalem, was composed partly of this tribe ( 2 Chronicles 12:3 ). 
JESHOHAIAH|     jesh-o-ha'-ya, jesh-o-hi'-a (yeshochayah, meaning unknown): A prince in Simeon ( 1 Chronicles 4:36 ).
RAMA|( Matthew 2:18 ), the Greek form of Ramah.  (1.) A city first mentioned in  Joshua 18:25 , near Gibeah of Benjamin. It was fortified by Baasha, king of Israel ( 1 Kings 15:17 -22;  2 Chronicles 16:1 -6). Asa, king of Judah, employed Benhadad the Syrian king to drive Baasha from this city ( 1 Kings 15:18 ,  20). Isaiah ( 10:29 ) refers to it, and also Jeremiah, who was once a prisoner there among the other captives of Jerusalem when it was taken by Nebuchadnezzar ( Jeremiah 39:8 -12;  40:1 ). Rachel, whose tomb lies close to Bethlehem, is represented as weeping in Ramah ( Jeremiah 31:15 ) for her slaughtered children. This prophecy is illustrated and fulfilled in the re-awakening of Rachel's grief at the slaughter of the infants in Bethlehem ( Matthew 2:18 ). It is identified with the modern village of er-Ram, between Gibeon and Beeroth, about 5 miles due north of Jerusalem. (see  SAMUEL .) (2.) A town identified with Rameh, on the border of Asher, about 13 miles south-east of Tyre, "on a solitary hill in the midst of a basin of green fields" ( Joshua 19:29 ). (3.) One of the "fenced cities" of Naphtali ( Joshua 19:36 ), on a mountain slope, about seven and a half miles west-south-west of Safed, and 15 miles west of the north end of the Sea of Galilee, the present large and well-built village of Rameh. (4.) The same as Ramathaim-zophim (q.v.), a town of Mount Ephraim ( 1 Samuel 1:1 ,  19). (5.) The same as Ramoth-gilead (q.v.),  2 Kings 8:29 ;  2 Chronicles 22:6 .
BETHMEON|   BETH-MEON  beth-me'-on: A city of Moab ( Jeremiah 48:23 ), identical with BAAL-MEON (which see).
ZOBEBAH|     zo-be'-ba (ha-tsobhebhah, meaning uncertain): A Judahite name with the article prefixed ( 1 Chronicles 4:8 ); some would read "Jabez" instead as in  1 Chronicles 4:9 .
EGYPT|The land of the Nile and the pyramids, the oldest kingdom of which we have any record, holds a place of great significance in Scripture. The Egyptians belonged to the white race, and their original home is still a matter of dispute. Many scholars believe that it was in Southern Arabia, and recent excavations have shown that the valley of the Nile was originally inhabited by a low-class population, perhaps belonging to the Nigritian stock, before the Egyptians of history entered it. The ancient Egyptian language, of which the latest form is Coptic, is distantly connected with the Semitic family of speech. Egypt consists geographically of two halves, the northern being the Delta, and the southern Upper Egypt, between Cairo and the First Cataract. In the Old Testament, Northern or Lower Egypt is called Mazor, "the fortified land" ( Isaiah 19:6 ;  37:25 ,  where the A.V. mistranslates "defence" and "besieged places"); while Southern or Upper Egypt is Pathros, the Egyptian Pa-to-Res, or "the land of the south" ( Isaiah 11:11 ). But the whole country is generally mentioned under the dual name of Mizraim, "the two Mazors." The civilization of Egypt goes back to a very remote antiquity. The two kingdoms of the north and south were united by Menes, the founder of the first historical dynasty of kings. The first six dynasties constitute what is known as the Old Empire, which had its capital at Memphis, south of Cairo, called in the Old Testament Moph ( Hosea 9:6 ) and Noph. The native name was Mennofer, "the good place." The Pyramids were tombs of the monarchs of the Old Empire, those of Gizeh being erected in the time of the Fourth Dynasty. After the fall of the Old Empire came a period of decline and obscurity. This was followed by the Middle Empire, the most powerful dynasty of which was the Twelfth. The Fayyum was rescued for agriculture by the kings of the Twelfth Dynasty; and two obelisks were erected in front of the temple of the sun-god at On or Heliopolis (near Cairo), one of which is still standing. The capital of the Middle Empire was Thebes, in Upper Egypt. The Middle Empire was overthrown by the invasion of the Hyksos, or shepherd princes from Asia, who ruled over Egypt, more especially in the north, for several centuries, and of whom there were three dynasties of kings. They had their capital at Zoan or Tanis (now San), in the north-eastern part of the Delta. It was in the time of the Hyksos that Abraham, Jacob, and Joseph entered Egypt. The Hyksos were finally expelled about B.C. 1600, by the hereditary princes of Thebes, who founded the Eighteenth Dynasty, and carried the war into Asia. Canaan and Syria were subdued, as well as Cyprus, and the boundaries of the Egyptian Empire were fixed at the Euphrates. The Soudan, which had been conquered by the kings of the Twelfth Dynasty, was again annexed to Egypt, and the eldest son of the Pharaoh took the title of "Prince of Cush." One of the later kings of the dynasty, Amenophis IV., or Khu-n-Aten, endeavoured to supplant the ancient state religion of Egypt by a new faith derived from Asia, which was a sort of pantheistic monotheism, the one supreme god being adored under the image of the solar disk. The attempt led to religious and civil war, and the Pharaoh retreated from Thebes to Central Egypt, where he built a new capital, on the site of the present Tell-el-Amarna. The cuneiform tablets that have been found there represent his foreign correspondence (about B.C. 1400). He surrounded himself with officials and courtiers of Asiatic, and more especially Canaanitish, extraction; but the native party succeeded eventually in overthrowing the government, the capital of Khu-n-Aten was destroyed, and the foreigners were driven out of the country, those that remained being reduced to serfdom. The national triumph was Marked by the rise of the Nineteenth Dynasty, in the founder of which, Rameses I., we must see the "new king, who knew not Joseph." His grandson, Rameses II., reigned sixty-seven years (B.C. 1348-1281), and was an indefatigable builder. As Pithom, excavated by Dr. Naville in 1883, was one of the cities he built, he must have been the Pharaoh of the Oppression. The Pharaoh of the Exodus may have been one of his immediate successors, whose reigns were short. Under them Egypt lost its empire in Asia, and was itself attacked by barbarians from Libya and the north. The Nineteenth Dynasty soon afterwards came to an end; Egypt was distracted by civil war; and for a short time a Canaanite, Arisu, ruled over it. Then came the Twentieth Dynasty, the second Pharaoh of which, Rameses III., restored the power of his country. In one of his campaigns he overran the southern part of Palestine, where the Israelites had not yet settled. They must at the time have been still in the wilderness. But it was during the reign of Rameses III. that Egypt finally lost Gaza and the adjoining cities, which were seized by the Pulista, or Philistines. After Rameses III., Egypt fell into decay. Solomon married the daughter of one of the last kings of the Twenty-first Dynasty, which was overthrown by Shishak I., the general of the Libyan mercenaries, who founded the Twenty-second Dynasty ( 1 Kings 11:40 ;  14:25 ,  26). A list of the places he captured in Palestine is engraved on the outside of the south wall of the temple of Karnak. In the time of Hezekiah, Egypt was conquered by Ethiopians from the Soudan, who constituted the Twenty-fifth Dynasty. The third of them was Tirhakah ( 2 Kings 19:9 ). In B.C. 674 it was conquered by the Assyrians, who divided it into twenty satrapies, and Tirhakah was driven back to his ancestral dominions. Fourteen years later it successfully revolted under Psammetichus I. of Sais, the founder of the Twenty-sixth Dynasty. Among his successors were Necho ( 2 Kings 23:29 ) and Hophra, or Apries ( Jeremiah 37:5 ,  7,  11). The dynasty came to an end in B.C. 525, when the country was subjugated by Cambyses. Soon afterwards it was organized into a Persian satrapy. The title of Pharaoh, given to the Egyptian kings, is the Egyptian Per-aa, or "Great House," which may be compared to that of "Sublime Porte." It is found in very early Egyptian texts. The Egyptian religion was a strange mixture of pantheism and animal worship, the gods being adored in the form of animals. While the educated classes resolved their manifold deities into manifestations of one omnipresent and omnipotent divine power, the lower classes regarded the animals as incarnations of the gods. Under the Old Empire, Ptah, the Creator, the god of Memphis, was at the head of the Pantheon; afterwards Amon, the god of Thebes, took his place. Amon, like most of the other gods, was identified with Ra, the sun-god of Heliopolis. The Egyptians believed in a resurrection and future life, as well as in a state of rewards and punishments dependent on our conduct in this world. The judge of the dead was Osiris, who had been slain by Set, the representative of evil, and afterwards restored to life. His death was avenged by his son Horus, whom the Egyptians invoked as their "Redeemer." Osiris and Horus, along with Isis, formed a trinity, who were regarded as representing the sun-god under different forms. Even in the time of Abraham, Egypt was a flourishing and settled monarchy. Its oldest capital, within the historic period, was Memphis, the ruins of which may still be seen near the Pyramids and the Sphinx. When the Old Empire of Menes came to an end, the seat of empire was shifted to Thebes, some 300 miles farther up the Nile. A short time after that, the Delta was conquered by the Hyksos, or shepherd kings, who fixed their capital at Zoan, the Greek Tanis, now San, on the Tanic arm of the Nile. All this occurred before the time of the new king "which knew not Joseph" ( Exodus 1:8 ). In later times Egypt was conquered by the Persians (B.C. 525), and by the Greeks under Alexander the Great (B.C. 332), after whom the Ptolemies ruled the country for three centuries. Subsequently it was for a time a province of the Roman Empire; and at last, in A.D. 1517, it fell into the hands of the Turks, of whose empire it still forms nominally a part. Abraham and Sarah went to Egypt in the time of the shepherd kings. The exile of Joseph and the migration of Jacob to "the land of Goshen" occurred about 200 years later. On the death of Solomon, Shishak, king of Egypt, invaded Palestine ( 1 Kings 14:25 ). He left a list of the cities he conquered. A number of remarkable clay tablets, discovered at Tell-el-Amarna in Upper Egypt, are the most important historical records ever found in connection with the Bible. They most fully confirm the historical statements of the Book of Joshua, and prove the antiquity of civilization in Syria and Palestine. As the clay in different parts of Palestine differs, it has been found possible by the clay alone to decide where the tablets come from when the name of the writer is lost. The inscriptions are cuneiform, and in the Aramaic language, resembling Assyrian. The writers are Phoenicians, Amorites, and Philistines, but in no instance Hittites, though Hittites are mentioned. The tablets consist of official dispatches and letters, dating from B.C. 1480, addressed to the two Pharaohs, Amenophis III. and IV., the last of this dynasty, from the kings and governors of Phoenicia and Palestine. There occur the names of three kings killed by Joshua, Adoni-zedec, king of Jerusalem, Japhia, king of Lachish ( Joshua 10:3 ), and Jabin, king of Hazor ( 11:1 ); also the Hebrews (Abiri) are said to have come from the desert. The principal prophecies of Scripture regarding Egypt are these, Isaiah 19;  Jeremiah 43: 8 -13;  44:30 ; 46;  Ezek. 29 -32; and it might be easily shown that they have all been remarkably fulfilled. For example, the singular disappearance of Noph (i.e.,  Memphis) is a fulfilment of  Jeremiah 46:19 ,  Ezek. 30:13 . 
DALAIAH|     da-la'-a, da-la-i'-a.  See  DELAIAH .
MAACHAH|Oppression, a small Syrian kingdom near Geshur, east of the Hauran, the district of Batanea ( Joshua 13:13 ;  2 Samuel 10:6 , 8;  1 Chronicles 19:7 ). (2.) A daughter of Talmai, king of the old native population of Geshur. She became one of David's wives, and was the mother of Absalom ( 2 Samuel 3:3 ). (3.) The father of Hanan, who was one of David's body-guard ( 1 Chronicles 11:43 ). (4.) The daughter of Abishalom (called Absalom,   2 Chronicles 11:20 -22), the third wife of Rehoboam, and mother of Abijam ( 1 Kings 15:2 ). She is called "Michaiah the daughter of Uriel," who was the husband of Absalom's daughter Tamar ( 2 Chronicles 13:2 ). Her son Abijah or Abijam was heir to the throne. (5.) The father of Achish, the king of Gath ( 1 Kings 2:39 ), called also Maoch ( 1 Samuel 27:2 ). 
SHEALTIEL|Asked for of God, father of Zerubbabel ( Ezra 3:2 ,  8;  Nehemiah 12:1 ). 
OBADIAH|Servant of the Lord.  (1.) An Israelite who was chief in the household of King Ahab ( 1 Kings 18:3 ). Amid great spiritual degeneracy he maintained his fidelity to God, and interposed to protect The Lord's prophets, an hundred of whom he hid at great personal risk in a cave (4,  13). Ahab seems to have held Obadiah in great honour, although he had no sympathy with his piety (5,  6,  7). The last notice of him is his bringing back tidings to Ahab that Elijah, whom he had so long sought for, was at hand (9-16). "Go," said Elijah to him, when he met him in the way, "go tell thy lord, Behold, Elijah is here." (2.) A chief of the tribe of Issachar ( 1 Chronicles 7:3 ). (3.) A descendant of Saul ( 1 Chronicles 8:38 ). (4.) A Levite, after the Captivity ( 1 Chronicles 9:16 ). (5.) A Gadite who joined David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:9 ). (6.) A prince of Zebulun in the time of David ( 1 Chronicles 27:19 ). (7.) One of the princes sent by Jehoshaphat to instruct the people in the law ( 2 Chronicles 17:7 ). (8.) A Levite who superintended the repairs of the temple under Josiah ( 2 Chronicles 34:12 ). (9.) One who accompanied Ezra on the return from Babylon ( Ezra 8:9 ). (10.) A prophet, fourth of the minor prophets in the Hebrew canon, and fifth in the LXX. He was probably contemporary with Jeremiah and Ezekiel. Of his personal history nothing is known.  Obadiah, Book of Consists of one chapter, "concerning Edom," its impending doom ( 1:1 -16), and the restoration of Israel ( 1:17 -21). This is the shortest book of the Old Testament. There are on record the account of four captures of Jerusalem, (1) by Shishak in the reign of Rehoboam ( 1 Kings 14:25 ); (2) by the Philistines and Arabians in the reign of Jehoram ( 2 Chronicles 21:16 ); (3) by Joash, the king of Israel, in the reign of Amaziah ( 2 Kings 14:13 ); and (4) by the Babylonians, when Jerusalem was taken and destroyed by Nebuchadnezzar (B.C. 586). Obadiah ( 1:11 -14) speaks of this capture as a thing past. He sees the calamity as having already come on Jerusalem, and the Edomites as joining their forces with those of the Chaldeans in bringing about the degradation and ruin of Israel. We do not indeed read that the Edomites actually took part with the Chaldeans, but the probabilities are that they did so, and this explains the words of Obadiah in denouncing against Edom the judgments of God. The date of his prophecies was thus in or about the year of the destruction of Jerusalem. Edom is the type of Israel's and of God's last foe ( Isaiah 63:1 -4). These will finally all be vanquished, and the kingdom will be the Lord's (Comp.  Psalm 22:28 ). 
HAGARENES|   ; HAGARITES  See  HAGRITES .
NEBAIOTH|Height.  (1.) Ishmael's eldest son ( Genesis 25:13 ), and the prince of an Israelitish tribe (16). He had a sister, Mahalath, who was one of Esau's wives ( Genesis 28:9 ;  36:3 ). (2.) The name of the Ishmaelite tribe descended from the above ( Genesis 25:13 , 18). The "rams of Nebaioth" ( Isaiah 60:7 ) are the gifts which these wandering tribes of the desert would consecrate to God. 
GUDGODAH|     gud-go'-da (gudhgodhah): A place in the wilderness journeyings ( Deuteronomy 10:7 ), corresponding to Hor-haggidgad in  Numbers 33:32 . Septuagint in each case renders (Gadgad). The site cannot now be identified; but there may be an echo of the ancient name in that of Wady Gudaghid, a confluent of Wady Jerafeh, which comes down from et Tih into the `Arabah nearly due West of Petra. There are difficulties, however, as the consonants do not correspond.
DEDAN|Low ground.  (1.) A son of Raamah ( Genesis 10:7 ). His descendants are mentioned in Isaiah 21:13, and  Ezek. 27:15 . They probably settled among the sons of Cush, on the north-west coast of the Persian Gulf. (2.) A son of Jokshan, Abraham's son by Keturah ( 1 Chronicles 1:32 ). His descendants settled on the Syrian borders about the territory of Edom. They probably led a pastoral life. 
NAHALLAL|Pasture, a city in Zebulun on the border of Issachar ( Joshua 19:15 ), the same as Nahalol ( Judges 1:30 ). It was given to the Levites. It has been by some identified with Malul in the plain of Esdraelon, 4 miles from Nazareth. 
COLORS|   COLOR;   kul'-er, kul'-erz: The word translated "color" in the King James Version is `ayin, which literally means "eye" or "appearance," and has been so translated in the Revised Version (British and American). In the New Testament the Greek prophasis, has the meaning of pretense or show ( Acts 27:30 ; compare  Revelation 17:4  the King James Version). The references to Joseph's coat of many colors ( Genesis 37:3, 13, 12 ) and "garments of divers colors" ( 2 Samuel 13:18, 19 ) probably do not mean the color of the garment at all, but the form, as suggested in the American Revised Version, margin, "a long garment with sleeves." In  Judges 5:30  the word for "dip" or "dye" appears in the original and has been so translated in the American Standard Revised Version. (see DYE). In  1 Chronicles 29:2  riqmah, meaning "variegated," hence, "varicolored," is found. In  Isaiah 54:11 , pukh is used. This name was applied to the sulfide of antimony (Arabic kochl) used for painting the eyes. Hence, the American Revised Version, margin rendering "antimony" instead of "fair colors" (see PAINT). In  Ezekiel 16:16  Tala', is found, meaning "covered with pieces" or "spotted," hence, by implication "divers colors."  Although the ancient Hebrews had no specific words for "color," "paint" or "painter," still, as we know, they constantly met with displays of the art of coloring among the Babylonians ( Ezekiel 23:14 ) and Egyptians and the inhabitants of Palestine Pottery, glazed bricks, glassware, tomb walls, sarcophagi, wood and fabrics were submitted to the skill of the colorist. This skill probably consisted in bringing out striking effects by the use of a few primary colors, rather than in any attempt at the blending of shades which characterizes modern coloring. That the gaudy show of their heathen neighbors attracted the children of Israel is shown by such passages as  Judges 8:27   Ezekiel 23:12, 16 .  Two reasons may be given for the indefiniteness of many of the Biblical references to color.  (1) The origin of the Hebrew people: They had been wandering tribes or slaves with no occasion to develop a color language.  (2) Their religious laws: These forbade expression in color or form ( Exodus 20:4 ). Yielding to the attractions of gorgeous display was discouraged by such prophets as Ezekiel, who had sickened of the abominations of the Chaldeans ( Ezekiel 23:14, 15, 16 ); "And I said unto them, Cast ye away every man the abominations of his eyes" ( Ezekiel 20:7 ).  Indefiniteness of color language is common to oriental literature, ancient and modern. This does not indicate a want of appreciation of color but a failure to analyze and define color effects. The inhabitants of Syria and Palestine today delight in brilliant colors. Bright yellow, crimson, magenta and green are used for adornment with no evident sense of fitness, according to the foreigners' eyes, other than their correspondence with the glaring brightness of the eastern skies. A soapmaker once told the writer that in order to make his wares attractive to the Arabs he colored them a brilliant crimson or yellow. A peasant chooses without hesitation a flaring magenta or yellow or green zun-nar (girdle), rather than one of somber hues. The oriental student in the chemical or physical laboratory often finds his inability to distinguish or classify color a real obstacle. His closest definition of a color is usually "lightish" or "darkish." This is not due to color blindness but to a lack of education, and extends to lines other than color distinctions. The colloquial language of Palestine today is poor in words denoting color, and an attempt to secure from a native a satisfactory description of some simple color scheme is usually disappointing. The harmonious color effects which have come to us from the Orient have been, in the past, more the result of accident (see DYE) than of deliberate purpose, as witness the clashing of colors where modern artificial dyes have been introduced.  This inability of the peoples of Bible lands to define colors is an inheritance from past ages, a consideration which helps us to appreciate the vagueness of many of the Biblical references.  The following color words occur in the King James Version or Revised Version:  (1) bay,  (2) black,  (3) blue,  (4) brown,  (5) crimson,  (6) green,  (7) grey,  (8) hoar,  (9) purple,  (10) red,  (11) scarlet,  (12) sorrel,  (13) vermilion,  (14) white,  (15) yellow.  In addition there are indefinite words indicating mixtures of light and dark:  (a) grisled (grizzled),  (b) ringstraked (ringstreaked),  (c) speckled,  (d) spotted.  (1) Bay or Red:  Bay or red is more properly translated "strong" in the Revised Version (British and American).  (2) Black (Blackish):  Eight different words have been translated "black." They indicate various meanings such as "dusky like the early dawn," "ashen," "swarthy," "moved with passion." Black is applied to hair ( Leviticus 13:31   Songs 5:11   Matthew 5:36 ); to marble or pavement ( Esther 1:6 ); to mourning ( Job 30:28, 30   Jeremiah 14:2 ); to passion ( Jeremiah 8:21  the King James Version;  Lamentations 5:10 ); to horses ( Zechariah 6:2, 6   Revelation 6:5 ); to the heavens ( 1 Kings 18:45   Job 3:5   Proverbs 7:9  the King James Version;  Jeremiah 4:28   Micah 3:6 ); to the sun ( Revelation 6:12 ); to the skin (racial) ( Songs 1:5, 6 ); to flocks ( Genesis 30:32, 33, 15, 40 ); to brooks because of ice ( Job 6:16 ).  (3) Blue:  Blue (tekheleth, a color from the cerulean mussel): This word was applied only to fabrics dyed with a special blue dye obtained from a shellfish. See  DYE . shesh in one passage of the King James Version is translated "blue" ( Esther 1:6 ). It is properly translated in the Revised Version (British and American) "white cloth." "Blueness of a wound" ( Proverbs 20:30 ) is correctly rendered in the Revised Version (British and American) "stripes that wound." Blue is applied to the fringes, veil, vestments, embroideries, etc., in the description of the ark and tabernacle ( Exodus 25   Numbers 4:6 ;  Numbers 15:38 ); to workers in blue ( 2 Chronicles 2:7, 14 ;  2 Chronicles 3:14 ); to palace adornments ( Esther 1:6 ); to royal apparel ( Esther 8:15   Jeremiah 10:9   Ezekiel 23:6 ;  Ezekiel 27:7, 24 ).  (4) Brown:  The Hebrew word meaning "sunburnt" or "swarthy" is translated "black" in the Revised Version (British and American) ( Genesis 30:32 ).  (5) Crimson:  Crimson (karmil): This word is probably of Persian origin and applies to the brilliant dye obtained from a bug. A second word tola`ath, is also found. Its meaning is the same. See  DYE . Crimson is applied to raiment ( 2 Chronicles 2:7, 14 ;  2 Chronicles 3:14   Jeremiah 4:30  the King James Version); to sins ( Isaiah 1:18 ).  (6) Green (Greenish):  This word in the translation refers almost without exception to vegetation. The Hebrew yaraq, literally, "pale," is considered one of the three definite color words used in the Old Testament (see WHITE; RED). The Greek equivalent is chloros; compare English "chlorine." This word occurs in the following vs:  Genesis 1:30 ;  Genesis 9:3   Exodus 10:15   Leviticus 2:14  (the King James Version); 23:14 (the King James Version);  2 Kings 19:26   Psalm 37:2   Isaiah 15:6 ;  Isaiah 37:27   Job 39:8 ; chloros,  Mark 6:39   Revelation 8:7 ;  Revelation 9:4 . ra`anan, closely allied in meaning to yaraq, is used to describe trees in the following passages:  Deuteronomy 12:2   1 Kings 14:23 ;  2 Kings 16:4 ;  2 Kings 17:10 ;  2 Kings 19:26   2 Chronicles 28:4 ;  Job 15:32   Psalm 37:35 ;  Psalm 52:8   Songs 1:16   Isaiah 57:5   Jeremiah 2:20 ;  Jeremiah 3:6 ;  Jeremiah 11:16 ;  Jeremiah 17:2, 8 ;  Ezekiel 6:13   Hosea 14:8 . In the remaining verses the Hebrew equivalents do not denote color, but the condition of being full of sap, fresh or unripe (compare similar uses in English) ( Genesis 30:37  (the King James Version);  Judges 16:7, 8   Psalm 23:2   Songs 2:13   Job 8:16   Ezekiel 17:24 ;  Ezekiel 20:47 ;  Luke 23:31 ). In  Esther 1:6  the Hebrew word refers to a fiber, probably cotton, as is indicated by the American Revised Version, margin. Greenish is used to describe leprous spots in  Leviticus 13:49 ;  Leviticus 14:37 . The same word is translated "yellow" in  Psalm 68:13 .  (7) Gray:  The Hebrew sebhah, means old age, hence, refers also to the color of the hair in old age ( Genesis 42:38 ;  Genesis 44:29 ;  Genesis 44:31   Deuteronomy 32:25   Psalm 71:18   Hosea 7:9 ). See Hoar, next paragraph.  (8) Hoar (Hoary):  The same word which in other verses is translated "gray" is rendered "hoar" or "hoary," applying to the hair in  1 Kings 2:6, 9   Isaiah 46:4   Leviticus 19:32   Job 41:32   Proverbs 16:31 . Another Hebrew word is translated "hoar" or "hoary," describing "frost" in  Exodus 16:14   Job 38:29   Psalm 147:16 .  (9) Purple:  The Hebrew equivalent is 'argaman; Greek porphura. The latter word refers to the source of the dye, namely, a shell-fish found on the shores of the Mediterranean. See  DYE . This color, which varied widely according to the kind of shellfish used and the method of dyeing, was utilized in connection with the adornment of the tabernacle ( Exodus 25 ;  Exodus 26 ;  Exodus 26 27 ; 28; 35; 36; 38; 39  Numbers 4:13 ). There were workers in purple called to assist in beautifying the temple ( 2 Chronicles 2:7, 14 ;  2 Chronicles 3:14 ). Purple was much used for royal raiment and furnishings ( Judges 8:26   Esther 1:6 ;  Esther 8:15   Songs 3:10   Mark 15:17, 20   John 19:2, 5 ). Purple was typical of gorgeous apparel ( Proverbs 31:22   Jeremiah 10:9   Songs 7:5   Ezekiel 27:7, 16 ;  Luke 16:19   Acts 16:14   Revelation 17:4 ;  Revelation 18:12, 16 ).  (10) Red:  The Hebrew 'adhom, is from dam, "blood," hence, "bloodlike." This is one of the three distinctive color words mentioned in the Old Testament (see GREEN; WHITE), and is found in most of the references to red. Four other words are used:  (a) chakhlili, probably "darkened" or "clouded" ( Genesis 49:12   Proverbs 23:29 );  (b) chamar, "to ferment" ( Psalm 75:8  margin;  Isaiah 27:2  the King James Version);  (c) bahaT, probably "to glisten" ( Esther 1:6 );  (d) purros "firelike" ( Matthew 16:2, 3   Revelation 6:4 ;  Revelation 12:3 ). Red is applied to dyed skins ( Exodus 25:5 ;  Exodus 26:14 ;  Exodus 35:7, 23 ; 36:19:00; 39:34); to the color of animals ( Numbers 19:2   Zechariah 1:8 ;  Zechariah 6:2   Revelation 6:4 ;  Revelation 12:3 ); to the human skin ( Genesis 25:25 ; ruddy,  1 Samuel 16:12 ;  1 Samuel 17:42   Songs 5:10   Lamentations 4:7 ); to the eyes ( Genesis 49:12   Proverbs 23:29 ); to sores ( Leviticus 13 ); to wine ( Psalm 75:8  m;  Proverbs 23:31   Isaiah 27:2  the King James Version); to water ( 2 Kings 3:22 ); to pavement ( Esther 1:6 ); to pottage ( Genesis 25:30 ); to apparel ( Isaiah 63:2 ); to the sky ( Matthew 16:2, 3 ); to sins ( Isaiah 1:18 ); to a shield ( Nahum 2:3 ).  (11) Scarlet:  Scarlet and crimson colors were probably from the same source (see CRIMSON; DYE). tola`ath, or derivatives have been translated by both "scarlet" and "crimson" (Greek kokkinos). A Chaldaic word for purple has thrice been translated "scarlet" in the King James Version ( Daniel 5:7, 16, 29 ). Scarlet is applied to fabrics or yarn used  (a) in the equipment of the tabernacle ( Exodus 25   Numbers 4:8 );  (b) in rites in cleansing lepers ( Leviticus 14 ); in ceremony of purification ( Numbers 19:6 ); to royal or gorgeous apparel ( 2 Samuel 1:24   Proverbs 31:21   Lamentations 4:5 ; "purple";  Nahum 2:3   Matthew 27:28   Revelation 17:4 ;  Revelation 18:12, 16 ); to marking thread ( Genesis 38:28, 30   Joshua 2:18, 21 ); to lips ( Songs 4:3 ); to sins ( Isaiah 1:18 ); to ( Revelation 17:3 ); to wool ( Hebrews 9:19 ).  (12) Sorrel:  This word occurs once in the Revised Version (British and American) ( Zechariah 1:8 ).  (13) Vermilion:  This word, shashar, occurs in two passages ( Jeremiah 22:14   Ezekiel 23:14 ). Vermilion of modern arts is a sulfide of mercury. It is not at all improbable that the paint referred to was an oxide of iron. This oxide is still taken from the ground in Syria and Palestine and used for decorative outlining.  (14) White:  The principal word for denoting whiteness in the Hebrew was labhan, a distinctive color word. Some of the objects to which it was applied show that it was used as we use the word "white" ( Genesis 49:12 ). Mt. Lebanon was probably named because of its snow-tipped peaks ( Jeremiah 18:14 ). White is applied to goats ( Genesis 30:35 ); to rods ( Genesis 30:37 ); to teeth ( Genesis 49:12 ); to leprous hairs and spots ( Leviticus 13   Numbers 12:10 ); to garments ( Ecclesiastes 9:8 ;  Ecclesiastes 7:9 ); as symbol of purity ( Daniel 11:35 ;  Daniel 12:10   Isaiah 1:18 ); to horses ( Zechariah 1:8 ;  Zechariah 6:3, 1 ); to tree branches ( Joel 1:7 ); to coriander seed ( Exodus 16:31 ). The corresponding Greek word, leukos, is used in New Testament. It is applied to hair ( Matthew 5:36   Revelation 1:14 ); to raiment ( Matthew 17:2 ;  Matthew 28:3   Mark 9:3 ;  Mark 16:5   Luke 9:29   John 20:12 ;  Acts 1:10   Revelation 3:4, 5, 18 ;  Revelation 6:11 ;  Revelation 7:9, 13, 14 ; 19:14); to horses ( Revelation 6:2 ;  Revelation 19:11, 14 ); to a throne ( Revelation 20:11 ); to stone ( Revelation 2:17 ); to a cloud ( Revelation 14:14 ). Besides labhan, four other Hebrew words have been translated "white":  (a) chori, or chur, meaning "bleached," applied to bread ( Genesis 40:16 ); to linen ( Esther 1:6 ;  Esther 8:15 );  (b) tsach, or tsachor, literally, "dazzling," is applied to asses ( Judges 5:10 ); to human appearance ( Songs 5:10 ); to wool ( Ezekiel 27:18 );  (c) dar, probably mother of pearl or alabaster ( Esther 1:6 );  (d) rir, literally, "saliva," and, from resemblance, "white of egg" ( Job 6:6 ).  (15) Yellow:  This word occurs in  Esther 1:6  to describe pavement; in  Leviticus 13  to describe leprous hair; in  Psalm 68:13  to describe gold.  Mixtures of colors:  (a) grizzled (grisled), literally, "spotted as with hail," applied to goats ( Genesis 31:10, 12 ); to horses ( Zechariah 6:3, 1 );  (b) ringstreaked (ringstraked), literally, "striped with bands," applied to animals ( Genesis 30:35 ;  Genesis 31:8 );  (c) speckled, literally, "dotted or spotted," applied to cattle and goats ( Genesis 30:32 ;  Genesis 31:8 ); to a bird ( Jeremiah 12:9 ); to horses ( Zechariah 1:8  the King James Version);  (d) spotted, literally, "covered with patches," applied to cattle and goats ( Genesis 30:32 ). In  Jude 1:23  "spotted" means "defiled."  Figurative: For figurative uses, see under separate colors.  LITERATURE.  Perrot and Chipiez, History of Art in Ancient Egypt, History of Art in Chaldea and Assyria, History of Art in Phoenicia and its Dependencies; Wilkinson, The Ancient Egyptians; Jewish Encyclopedia;EB; Delitzsch, Iris.  James A. Patch
HARBONA|(a Persian word meaning "ass-driver"), one of the seven eunuchs or chamberlains of king Ahasuerus ( Esther 1:10 ;  7:9 ). 
JARAH|     ja'-ra (ya`rah, "honey-comb" (?)): A descendant of King Saul ( 1 Chronicles 9:42 ); but the Septuagint's Codices Vaticanus and Alexandrinus, have Iada = ya`dah, a name found in Septuagint of  1 Chronicles 8:36 , where Massoretic Text has yeho`addah, Jehoaddah. Some Hebrew manuscripts have ya`dah in 9:42, and it should probably be accepted as the correct reading there, for ya`dah = Jehoaddah yeho`addah, linguistically; compare Jonathan and Jehonathan, etc.
BEDAN|One of the judges of Israel ( 1 Samuel 12:11 ). It is uncertain who he was. Some suppose that Barak is meant, others Samson, but most probably this is a contracted form of Abdon ( Judges 12:13 ). 
TETH|     teth (T): The 9th letter of the Hebrew alphabet; transliterated in this Encyclopedia as "T" (a more intense "t"). It came also to be used for the number 9; and with waw ("w") for 15, with zayin ("z") for 16 (i.e. 9 plus 6 and 9 plus 7) to avoid forming regular series with the abbreviation for Yahweh. For name, etc., see ALPHABET.
BETHANOTH|House of answers, a city in the mountainous district of Judah ( Joshua 15:59 ). It has been identified with the modern Beit-`Anun, about 3 miles northeast of Hebron. 
LOINS|     loinz (chalats, Aramaic charats, mothen, kecel, yarekh; osphus): This variety of Hebrew synonyms seems to be used rather promiscuously for the loins, though there is no little difference in the secondary meanings of these words. They represent various modes of expressing the loins as the seat of strength and vigor ( Job 40:16 , Hebrew mothen, here used of Behemoth), the center of procreative power, the portion of the body which is girded about, and is considered as specially needful of covering, even under primitive conditions of life ( Job 31:20 ), and where painful disease most effectually unfits a man for work and warfare.  Jacob receives the Divine promise that "kings shall come out of (his) loins" (chalats,  Genesis 35:11 ), and we read of 66 souls "that came out of his loins" (yarekh) which went into Egypt ( Genesis 46:26 ). The Epistle to the Hebrews speaks of the Levites as having come out of the loins of Abraham ( Hebrews 7:5 ).  As the seat of strength (compare LEG; THIGH), the loins are girded with belts of leather ( 2 Kings 1:8   Matthew 3:4 ), or cloth, often beautifully embroidered ( Exodus 28:39 ), or of costly material ( Exodus 39:29   Jeremiah 13:1 f ). Girded loins are a sign of readiness for service or endeavor ( Exodus 12:11   1 Kings 18:46   2 Kings 4:29   Job 38:3   Proverbs 31:17   Luke 12:35   1 Peter 1:13 ). Of God it is said that "he looseth the bond of kings, and bindeth their loins with a girdle," i.e. strengthens them ( Job 12:18 ). On the loins the sword is worn ( 2 Samuel 20:8 ). It is a sign of mourning to gird the loins with sackcloth ( 1 Kings 20:32   Isaiah 32:11   Jeremiah 48:37   Amos 8:10 ; see also the First Papyrus of Elephantine, l. 20). A man whose strength is in his attachment to truth, in other words is faithful, is spoken of as having his loins girt about with truth ( Ephesians 6:14 ). Thus, the Messiah is described: "Righteousness shall be the girdle of his waist, and faithfulness the girdle of his loins" ( Isaiah 11:5 ). One of the most primitive modes of clothing consisted of a fleece tied around the loins ( Job 31:20 ).  The condition of unfitness for service is described in that the loins (kecel) are filled with a burning ( Psalm 38:7 , the King James Version "loathsome disease"), or that "a sore burden" is laid upon the "loins" (mothen,  Psalm 66:11 ). Thus the loins are made "continually to shake" ( Psalm 69:23 ), "the joints of (the) loins" (charats) are loosed ( Daniel 5:6 ), the "loins are filled with anguish" ( Isaiah 21:3 ). It is very likely that originally a disabling lumbago or the painful affections of the gall or the bladder (calculus, etc.) are meant, but very soon the expression becomes merely metaphorical to express personal helplessness, especially that which can but rely upon assistance and help from God.  H. L. E. Luering
ENHADDAH|   EN-HADDAH  en-had'-a (`en chaddah, "swift fountain"):  A town in the lot of Issachar mentioned along with En-gannim ( Joshua 19:21 ).  It is probably identical with Kefr Adan, a village some 3 miles West of Jenin.
ZADOK|Righteous.  (1.) A son of Ahitub, of the line of Eleazer ( 2 Samuel 8:17 ;  1 Chronicles 24:3 ), high priest in the time of David ( 2 Samuel 20:25 ) and Solomon ( 1 Kings 4:4 ). He is first mentioned as coming to take part with David at Hebron ( 1 Chronicles 12:27 ,  28). He was probably on this account made ruler over the Aaronites ( 27:17 ). Zadok and Abiathar acted as high priests on several important occasions ( 1 Chronicles 15:11 ;  2 Samuel 15:24 -29,  35,  36); but when Adonijah endeavoured to secure the throne, Abiathar went with him, and therefore Solomon "thrust him out from being high priest," and Zadok, remaining faithful to David, became high priest alone ( 1 Kings 2:27 ,  35;  1 Chronicles 29:22 ). In him the line of Phinehas resumed the dignity, and held it till the fall of Jerusalem. He was succeeded in his sacred office by his son Azariah ( 1 Kings 4:2 ; Comp.  1 Chronicles 6:3 -9). (2.) The father of Jerusha, who was wife of King Uzziah, and mother of King Jotham ( 2 Kings 15:33 ;  2 Chronicles 27:1 ). (3.) "The scribe" set over the treasuries of the temple by Nehemiah along with a priest and a Levite ( Nehemiah 13:13 ). (4.) The sons of Baana, one of those who assisted in rebuilding the wall of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 3:4 ). 
POOLS|Pools of Solomon The name given to three large open cisterns at Etam, at the head of the Wady Urtas, having an average length of 400 feet by 220 in breadth, and 20 to 30 in depth. These pools derive their chief supply of water from a spring called "the sealed fountain," about 200 yards to the north-west of the upper pool, to which it is conveyed by a large subterranean passage. They are 150 feet distant from each other, and each pool is 20 feet lower than that above it, the conduits being so arranged that the lowest, which is the largest and finest of the three, is filled first, and then in succession the others. It has been estimated that these pools cover in all a space of about 7 acres, and are capable of containing three million gallons of water. They were, as is generally supposed, constructed in the days of Solomon. They are probably referred to in Ecclesiastes 2:6. On the fourth day after his victory over the Ammonites, etc., in the wilderness of Tekoa, Jehoshaphat assembled his army in the valley of Berachah ("blessing"), and there blessed the Lord. Berachah has been identified with the modern Bereikut, some 5 miles south of Wady Urtas, and hence the "valley of Berachah" may be this valley of pools, for the word means both "blessing" and "pools;" and it has been supposed, therefore, that this victory was celebrated beside Solomon's pools ( 2 Chronicles 20:26 ). These pools were primarily designed to supply Jerusalem with water. From the lower pool an aqueduct has been traced conveying the water through Bethlehem and across the valley of Gihon, and along the west slope of the Tyropoeon valley, till it finds its way into the great cisterns underneath the temple hill. The water, however, from the pools reaches now only to Bethlehem. The aqueduct beyond this has been destroyed. 
TAXES|First mentioned in the command ( Exodus 30:11 -16) that every Jew from twenty years and upward should pay an annual tax of "half a shekel for an offering to the Lord." This enactment was faithfully observed for many generations ( 2 Chronicles 24:6 ;  Matthew 17:24 ). Afterwards, when the people had kings to reign over them, they began, as Samuel had warned them ( 1 Samuel 8:10 -18), to pay taxes for civil purposes ( 1 Kings 4:7 ;  9:15 ;  12:4 ). Such taxes, in increased amount, were afterwards paid to the foreign princes that ruled over them. In the New Testament the payment of taxes, imposed by lawful rulers, is enjoined as a duty ( Romans 13:1 -7;  1 Peter 2:13 ,  14). Mention is made of the tax (telos) on merchandise and travellers ( Matthew 17:25 ); the annual tax (phoros) on property ( Luke 20:22 ;  23:2 ); the poll-tax (kensos,  "tribute, "  Matthew 17:25 ;  22:17 ;  Mark 12:14 ); and the temple-tax ("tribute money" = two drachmas = half shekel,   Matthew 17:24 -27; Comp.  Exodus 30:13 ). (see  TRIBUTE .) 
PAMPHYLIA|Paul and his company, loosing from Paphos, sailed north-west and came to Perga, the capital of Pamphylia ( Acts 13:13 ,  14), a province about the middle of the southern sea-board of Asia Minor. It lay between Lycia on the west and Cilicia on the east. There were strangers from Pamphylia at Jerusalem on the day of Pentecost ( 2:10 ). 
DALMANUTHA|A place on the west of the Sea of Galilee, mentioned only in  Mark 8:10 . In the parallel passage it is said that Christ came "into the borders of Magdala" ( Matthew 15:39 ). It is plain, then, that Dalmanutha was near Magdala, which was probably the Greek name of one of the many Migdols (i.e.,  watch-towers) on the western side of the lake of Gennesaret. It has been identified in the ruins of a village about a mile from Magdala, in the little open valley of `Ain-el-Barideh, "the cold fountain," called el-Mejdel, possibly the "Migdal-el" of  Joshua 19:38 . 
SHAMARIAH|     sham-a-ri'-a, sha-mar'-ya.  See  SHEMARIAH .
NAGGAI|     nag'-i, nag'-a-i (Naggai; the King James Version Nagge): In  Luke 3:25 , the Greek form of the Hebrew name NOGAH (which see).
JAAREOREGIM|Forests of the weavers, a Bethlehemite ( 2 Samuel 21:19 ), and the father of Elhanan, who slew Goliath. In  1 Chronicles 20:5  called JAIR. 
CHISLON|     kis'-lon, kiz'-lon (kiclon, "strength"): A prince of Benjamin, the father of Elidad ( Numbers 34:21 ).
SHIZA|     shi'-za (shiza; Saiza): A Reubenite, one of David's leading warriors ( 1 Chronicles 11:42 ).
HIVITES|One of the original tribes scattered over Palestine, from Hermon to Gibeon in the south. The name is interpreted as "midlanders" or "villagers" ( Genesis 10:17 ;  1 Chronicles 1:15 ). They were probably a branch of the Hittites. At the time of Jacob's return to Canaan, Hamor the Hivite was the "prince of the land" ( Genesis 24:2 -28). They are next mentioned during the Conquest ( Joshua 9:7 ;  11:19 ). They principally inhabited the northern confines of Western Palestine ( Joshua 11:3 ;  Judges 3:3 ). A remnant of them still existed in the time of Solomon ( 1 Kings 9:20 ). 
DEPTHS|   SATAN,  OF  (ta bathea tou Satana): Found in  Revelation 2:24 , and has reference to false teaching at Thyatira. It is a question (that perhaps may not be decided) whether tou Satana, "of Satan," represents the claim of the false teachers, or is thrown in by the Lord. Did those false teachers claim to know "the depths" of Satan? Or was it that they claimed to know "the depths" of Deity, and the Lord said it was rather "the depths of Satan"? In either case the antithesis to "depths of Satan" is "depths of God," as referred to in  Romans 11:33   1 Corinthians 2:10 .  E. J. Forrester
JADDUA|Known.  (1.) One of the chiefs who subscribed the covenant ( Nehemiah 10:21 ). (2.) The last high priest mentioned in the Old Testament ( Nehemiah 12:11 ,  22), sons of Jonathan. 
CANDACE|The queen of the Ethiopians whose "eunuch" or chamberlain was converted to Christianity by the instrumentality of Philip the evangelist ( Acts 8:27 ). The country which she ruled was called by the Greeks Meroe, in Upper Nubia. It was long the centre of commercial intercourse between Africa and the south of Asia, and hence became famous for its wealth ( Isaiah 45:14 ). It is somewhat singular that female sovereignty seems to have prevailed in Ethiopia, the name Candace (compare "Pharaoh, " "Ptolemy, " "Caesar") being a title common to several successive queens. It is probable that Judaism had taken root in Ethiopia at this time, and hence the visit of the queen's treasurer to Jerusalem to keep the feast. There is a tradition that Candace was herself converted to Christianity by her treasurer on his return, and that he became the apostle of Christianity in that whole region, carrying it also into Abyssinia. It is said that he also preached the gospel in Arabia Felix and in Ceylon, where he suffered martyrdom. (see  PHILIP .) 
PEDAHEL|Redeemed of God, the son of Ammihud, a prince of Naphtali ( Numbers 34:28 ). 
GALEED|Heap of witness, the name of the pile of stones erected by Jacob and Laban to Mark the league of friendship into which they entered with each other ( Genesis 31:47 ,  48). This was the name given to the "heap" by Jacob. It is Hebrew, while the name Jegar-sahadutha, given to it by Laban, is Aramaic (Chaldee or Syriac). Probably Nahor's family originally spoke Aramaic, and Abraham and his descendants learned Hebrew, a kindred dialect, in the land of Canaan. 
TIBERIUS|Tiberius Caesar I.e., as known in Roman history, Tiberius Claudius Nero, only mentioned in  Luke 3:1 . He was the stepson of Augustus, whom he succeeded on the throne, A.D. 14. He was noted for his vicious and infamous life. In the fifteenth year of his reign John the Baptist entered on his public ministry, and under him also our Lord taught and suffered. He died A.D. 37. He is frequently referred to simply as "Caesar" ( Matthew 22:17 ,  21;  Mark 12:14 ,  16,  17;  Luke 20:22 ,  24,  25;  23:2 ;  John 19:12 ,  15). 
OLIVET|     ol'-i-vet.  See  OLIVES, MOUNT OF .
JEHOADDAN|Jehovah his ornament, the wife of King Jehoash, and mother of King Amaziah ( 2 Kings 14:2 ). 
MESHULLAM|Befriended.  (1.) One of the chief Gadites in Bashan in the time of Jotham ( 1 Chronicles 5:13 ). (2.) Grandfather of Shaphan, "the scribe," in the reign of Josiah ( 2 Kings 22:3 ). (3.) A priest, father of Hilkiah ( 1 Chronicles 9:11 ;  Nehemiah 11:11 ), in the reign of Ammon; called Shallum in  1 Chronicles 6:12 . (4.) A Levite of the family of Kohath ( 2 Chronicles 34:12 ), in the reign of Josiah. (5.)  1 Chronicles 8:17 . (6.)  1 Chronicles 3:19 . (7.)  Nehemiah 12:13 . (8.) A chief priest ( Nehemiah 12:16 ). (9.) One of the leading Levites in the time of Ezra ( 8:16 ). (10.) A priest ( 1 Chronicles 9:12 ). (11.) One of the principal Israelites who supported Ezra when expounding the law to the people ( Nehemiah 8:4 ). 
BUNAH|     bu'-na (bunah); A son of Jerahmeel ( 1 Chronicles 2:25 ).
KOA|He-camel, occurs only in  Ezek. 23:23 , some province or place in the Babylonian empire, used in this passage along with Shoa (q.v.). 
CLEOPAS|(abbreviation of Cleopatros), one of the two disciples with whom Jesus conversed on the way to Emmaus on the day of the resurrection ( Luke 24:18 ). We know nothing definitely regarding him. It is not certain that he was the Clopas of  John 19:25 , or the Alphaeus of  Matthew 10:3 , although he may have been Songs 
PYRRHUS|     pir'-us (Purros, "fiery-red"): The name is inserted in the text of the Revised Version (British and American) in  Acts 20:4  as that of the father of SOPATER (which see).
LEANNOTH|For answering; i.e., in singing, occurs in the title to  Psalm 88 . The title "Mahalath (q.v.) Leannoth" may be rendered "concerning sickness, to be sung" i.e., perhaps, to be sung in sickness. 
INCHES|   RAINFALL IN JERUSALEM IN   Year Amount  1861 27.30"  1862 21.86"  1863 26.54"  1864 15.51"  1865 18.19"  1866 18.55"  1867 29.42"  1868 29.10"  1869 18.61"  1870 13.19"  1871 23.17"  1872 22.26"  1873 22.72"  1874 29.75"  1875 27.01"  1876 14.41"  1877 26.00"  1878 32.21"  1879 18.04"  1880 32.11"  1881 16.50"  1882 26.72"  1883 31.92" 1884 23.16"  1885 29.47"  1886 31.69"  1887 29.81"  1888 37.79"  1889 13.16"  1890 35.51"  1891 34.72"  1892 31.23"  1893 30.54"  1894 35.38"  1895 23.15"  1896 32.90"  1897 41.62"  1898 28.66"  1899 22.43"  1900 21.20"  1901 17.42"  1902 25.51"  1903 18.04"  1904 34.48"  1905 34.22"  1906 28.14"  1907 27.22"  1908 31.87"  1909 21.13"  1910 24.64"  The amount of rainfall in ancient times was probably about the same as in present times, though it may have been distributed somewhat differently through the year, as suggested by Huntington. Conder maintains that the present amount would have been sufficient to support the ancient cities (Tent-Work in Palestine). Trees are without doubt fewer now, but meteorologists agree that trees do not produce rain.  4. Dry and Rainy Seasons;  The rainfall is largely on the western slopes of the mountains facing the sea, while on the eastern slopes there is very little. The moisture-laden air comes up from the sea with the west and southwest wind. When these currents strike the hills they are thrown higher up into the cooler strata, and the moisture condenses to form clouds and rain which increases on the higher levels. Having passed the ridge of the hills, the currents descend on the other side to warmer levels, where the moisture is easily held in the form of vapor so that no rain falls and few clouds are seen, except in the cold mid-winter months.  The summer months are practically rainless, with very few clouds appearing in the sky. From May 1 to the middle of October one can be sure of no rain; "The winter is past; the rain is over" ( Songs 2:11 ), so many sleep on the roofs of the houses or in tents of leaves and branches in the fields and vineyards throughout the summer. The continuous hot droughts make the people appreciate the springs and fountains of fresh running water and the cool shade of rock and tree.  The rainy season from October to May may be divided into three parts, the former, the winter, and the latter rains, and they are often referred to under these names in the Old Testament.  The "former rains" are the showers of October and the first part of November. They soften the parched ground so that the winter grain may be sown before the heavy continuous rains set in. The main bulk of the rain falls in the months of December, January and February. Although in these months the rains are frequent and heavy, a dark, foggy day is seldom seen. The "latter rains" of April are the most highly appreciated, because they ripen the fruit and stay the drought of summer. They were considered a special blessing: Yahweh "will come.... as the latter rain that watereth the earth" ( Hosea 6:3 ); "They opened their mouth wide as for the latter rain" ( Job 29:23 ); and as a reason for worshipping Yahweh who sent them, "Let us now fear Yahweh our God, that giveth rain, both the former and the latter, in its season" ( Jeremiah 5:24 ).  The rain storms always come from the sea with a west or southwest wind. The east wind is a hot wind and the "north wind driveth away rain" ( Proverbs 25:23 , the King James Version). "Fair weather cometh out of the north" ( Job 37:22 , the King James Version).  5. Biblical Uses:  The Psalmist recognizes that the "showers that water the earth" ( Psalm 72:6 ) are among the choicest blessings from the hand of Yahweh: "The early rain covereth it with blessings" ( Psalm 84:6 ). The severest punishment of Yahweh was to withhold the rain, as in the time of Ahab and Elijah, when the usual rain did not fall for three years ( 1 Kings 17 ); "the anger of Yahweh be kindled against you, and he shut up the heavens, so that there shall be no rain, and the land shall not yield its fruit; and ye perish quickly" ( Deuteronomy 11:17 ). Too much rain is also a punishment, as witness the flood ( Genesis 7:4 ) and the plague of rain and hail ( Ezra 10:9 ). Sending of rain was a reward for worship and obedience: "Yahweh will open unto thee his good treasure, the heavens, to give the rain of thy land in its season, and to bless all the work of thy hand" ( Deuteronomy 28:12 ). Yahweh controls the elements and commands the rain: "He made a decree for the rain" ( Job 28:26 ); "For he saith to the snow, Fall thou on the earth; likewise to the shower of rain" ( Job 37:6 ). LITERATURE  Palestine Exploration Fund Quarterly; meteorological observations from the Dead Sea, Jerusalem, Jaffa and Tiberias; various observers; Zeitschrift des deutschen Paldstina-Vereins; H. Hilderscheid, Die Niederschlagsverhdltnisse Paldstinas in alter and neuer Zeit; C. R. Conder, Tent-Work in Palestine; Edward Hull, Mount Seir, Sinai and Western Palestine; Ellsworth Huntington, Palestine and Its Transformation; bulletin of the Syrian Protestant College Observatory, Meteorological Observations in Beirut and Syria.  Alfred H. Joy
SHUBAEL|     shoo'ba-el, shoo-ba'-el (shubha'el):  (1) A Levite, son of Amram ( 1 Chronicles 24:20 ); one of the leaders of song in the temple ( 1 Chronicles 25:20 ).  See  SHEBUEL ;  Gray, HPN, 310 .  (2) A son of Heman ( 1 Chronicles 25:4 ).  See  SHEBUEL .
TIRATHITES|     ti'-rath-its (tir`athim; Codex Vaticanus and Codex Alexandrinus, Argathieim; Lucian, Tharathei: A family of scribes that dwelt at Jabez ( 1 Chronicles 2:55 ). The three families mentioned in this verse (Tirathites, Shimathites and Sucathites) are taken by Jerome to be three different classes of religious functionaries-singers, scribes, recorders ("canentes atque resonances et in tabernaculis commorantes"). The Targum takes the same view, save that the "Sucathites" are those "covered" with a spirit of prophecy. Bertheau sees the Tirathites as "gate-keepers" (Aramaic tera` = Heb sha`ar). Keil holds the three names to be those of the descendants of unknown men named Tira, Shemei and Sucah. The passage seems too obscure to admit of interpretation.  Horace J. Wolf
LAHMAM|     la'-mam (lachmam): A town in the Judean Shephelah ( Joshua 15:40 , the Revised Version margin "Lahmas") possibly the modern el-Lachm, 2 1/2 miles South of Beit Jibrin.
CHANGES|Changes of raiment: Were reckoned among the treasures of rich men ( Genesis 45:22 ;  Judges 14:12 ,  13;  2 Kings 5:22 ,  23). 
BETHSHEAN|House of security or rest, a city which belonged to Manasseh ( 1 Chronicles 7:29 ), on the west of Jordan. The bodies of Saul and his sons were fastened to its walls. In Solomon's time it gave its name to a district ( 1 Kings 4:12 ). The name is found in an abridged form, Bethshan, in  1 Samuel 31:10 , 12 and  2 Samuel 21:12 . It is on the road from Jerusalem to Damascus, about 5 miles from the Jordan, and 14 from the south end of the Lake of Gennesaret. After the Captivity it was called Scythopolis, i.e., "the city of the Scythians," who about B.C. 640 came down from the steppes of Southern Russia and settled in different places in Syria. It is now called Beisan. 
HEMAM|     he'-mam ( Genesis 36:22  the King James Version and the English Revised Version).  See  HEMAN ;  HOMAM .
BENHADAD|The standing title of the Syrian kings, meaning "the son of Hadad." (see  HADADEZER .) (1.) The king of Syria whom Asa, king of Judah, employed to invade Israel ( 1 Kings 15:18 ). (2.) Son of the preceding, also king of Syria. He was long engaged in war against Israel. He was murdered probably by Hazael, by whom he was succeeded ( 2 Kings 8:7 -15), after a reign of some thirty years. (3.) King of Damascus, and successor of his father Hazael on the throne of Syria ( 2 Kings 13:3 ,  4). His misfortunes in war are noticed by Amos ( 1:4 ). 
LUHITH|Made of boards, a Moabitish place between Zoar and Horonaim ( Isaiah 15:5 ;  Jeremiah 48:5 ). 
PHAROSH|     fa'-rosh (par`osh).  See  PAROSH .
HERES|Sun.  (1.) "Mount Heres" ( Judges 1:35 ), Hebrews Har-heres, i.e., "sun-mountain;" probably identical with Irshemesh in  Joshua 19:41 . (2.)  Isaiah 19:18 , marg. (see  ON .) 
JAPHO|Beauty, a sea-port in Dan ( Joshua 19:46 ); called Joppa (q.v.) in  2 Chronicles 2:16 ;  Ezra 3:7 ;  Jonah 1:3 ; and in New Testament. 
GEDEON|     ged'-e-on ( Hebrews 11:32  the King James Version).  See  GIDEON .
BLASTUS|Chamberlain to king Herod Agrippa I. ( Acts 12:20 ). Such persons generally had great influence with their masters. 
CILICIA|A maritime province in the south-east of Asia Minor. Tarsus, the birth-place of Paul, was one of its chief towns, and the seat of a celebrated school of philosophy. Its luxurious climate attracted to it many Greek residents after its incorporation with the Macedonian empire. It was formed into a Roman province, B.C. 67. The Jews of Cilicia had a synagogue at Jerusalem ( Acts 6:9 ). Paul visited it soon after his conversion ( Galatians 1:21 ;  Acts 9:30 ), and again, on his second missionary journey ( 15:41 ), "he went through Syria and Cilicia, confirming the churches." It was famous for its goat's-hair cloth, called cilicium. Paul learned in his youth the trade of making tents of this cloth. 
SHEPHO|   SHEPHI,   she'-fi, she'-fo (shephi; Codex Vaticanus Sob, Codex Alexandrinus Sophar; Lucian, Sapphei ( 1 Chronicles 1:40 ); or Shepho, shepho; Codex Alexandrinus Soph; Lucian, Sophan ( Genesis 36:23 )): A Horite chief.
TIRES|"To tire" the head is to adorn it ( 2 Kings 9:30 ). As a noun the word is derived from "tiara," and is the rendering of the Hebrews p'er, a "turban" or an ornament for the head ( Ezek. 24:17 ; R.V.,  "headtire; 24:23 ). In Isaiah 3:18 the word saharonim is rendered "round tires like the moon," and in  Judges 8:21 , 26 "ornaments," but in both cases "crescents" in the Revised Version. 
JABBOK|A pouring out, or a wrestling, one of the streams on the east of Jordan, into which it falls about midway between the Sea of Galilee and the Dead Sea, or about 45 miles below the Sea of Galilee. It rises on the eastern side of the mountains of Gilead, and runs a course of about 65 miles in a wild and deep ravine. It was the boundary between the territory of the Ammonites and that of Og, king of Bashan ( Joshua 12:1 -5;  Numbers 21:24 ); also between the tribe of Reuben and the half tribe of Manasseh ( 21:24 ;  Deuteronomy 3:16 ). In its course westward across the plains it passes more than once underground. "The scenery along its banks is probably the most picturesque in Palestine; and the ruins of town and village and fortress which stud the surrounding mountain-side render the country as interesting as it is beautiful." This river is now called the Zerka, or blue river.
MICHAEL|Who is like God?  (1.) The title given to one of the chief angels ( Dan. 10:13 ,  21;  12:1 ). He had special charge of Israel as a nation. He disputed with Satan ( Jude 1:9 ) about the body of Moses. He is also represented as warning against "that old serpent, called the Devil, and Satan, which deceiveth the whole world" ( Revelation 12:7 -9). (2.) The father of Sethur, the spy selected to represent Asher ( Numbers 13:13 ). (3.)  1 Chronicles 7:3 , a chief of the tribe of Issachar. (4.)  1 Chronicles 8:16 , a Benjamite. (5.) A chief Gadite in Bashan ( 1 Chronicles 5:13 ). (6.) A Manassite, "a captain of thousands" who joined David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:20 ). (7.) A Gershonite Levite ( 1 Chronicles 6:40 ). (8.) The father of Omri ( 1 Chronicles 27:18 ). (9.) One of the sons of king Jehoshaphat ( 2 Chronicles 21:2 ,  4). He was murdered by his brother Jehoram. 
HAMMUEL|     ham'-u-el (chammu'el, "wrath of God"): A son of Mishma, a Simeonite, of the family of Shaul ( 1 Chronicles 4:26 ).
ENTAPPUAH|   EN-TAPPUAH  en-tap'-u-a, en-ta-pu'-a (`en tappuach; pege Thaphthoth, "apple spring"):  Probably in the land of Tappuah which belonged to Manasseh, although Tappuah, on the border of Manasseh, belonged to Ephraim ( Joshua 17:7 f ). It lay on the border of Ephraim which ran southward East of Shechem, and is probably to be identified with the spring at Yasuf, about 3 miles North of Lebonah.
IYIM|     i'-yim (iyim, "heaps"-the form of which, `iye, is the construct):  (1) A short form of the name Iye-abarim ( Numbers 33:45 ).  (2) A town in the territory of Judah ( Joshua 15:29 ; English Versions of the Bible wrongly "Iim"). It lay in the extreme South, "toward the border of Edom." It is not identified.
BETHPHAGE|House of the unripe fig, a village on the Mount of Olives, on the road from Jerusalem to Jericho ( Matthew 21:1 ;  Mark 11:1 ;  Luke 19:29 ), and very close to Bethany. It was the limit of a Sabbath-day's journey from Jerusalem, i.e., 2,000 cubits. It has been identified with the modern Kefr-et-Tur. 
VOWS|Voluntary promises which, when once made, were to be kept if the thing vowed was right. They were made under a great variety of circumstances ( Genesis 28: 18 -22;  Leviticus 7:16 ;  Numbers 30:2 -13;  Deuteronomy 23:18 ;  Judges 11:30 ,  39;  1 Samuel 1:11 ;  Jonah 1:16 ;  Acts 18:18 ;  21:23 ). 
BETHHORON|House of the hollow, or of the cavern, the name of two towns or villages ( 2 Chronicles 8:5 ;  1 Chronicles 7:24 ) in the territory of Ephraim, on the way from Jerusalem to Joppa. They are distinguished as Beth-horon "the upper" and Beth-horon "the nether." They are about 2 miles apart, the former being about 10 miles north-west of Jerusalem. Between the two places was the ascent and descent of Beth-horon, leading from Gibeon down to the western plain ( Joshua 10:10 ,  11;  18:13 ,  14), down which the five kings of the Amorites were driven by Joshua in that great battle, the most important in which the Hebrews had been as yet engaged, being their first conflict with their enemies in the open field. Jehovah interposed in behalf of Israel by a terrific hailstorm, which caused more deaths among the Canaanites than did the swords of the Israelites. Beth-horon is mentioned as having been taken by Shishak, B.C. 945, in the list of his conquests, and the pass was the scene of a victory of Judas Maccabeus. (Comp.  Exodus 9:19 ,  25;  Job 38:22 ,  23;  Psalm 18:12 -14;  Isaiah 30:30. ) The modern name of these places is Beit-ur, distinguished by el-Foka, "the upper," and el-Tahta, "the nether." The lower was at the foot of the pass, and the upper, 500 feet higher, at the top, west of Gibeon. (see  GIBEON .) 
PERSIANS|     pur'-shanz, -zhanz (parac, also equals PERSIA, PERSIS (which see); adjective parci Hebrew, and parcay, Aramaic.; Persai, adjective only in  Nehemiah 12:22   Daniel 6:28 ; Achaem. Persian Parsa, name of both country and people; does not occur in Avesta):  I. AFFINITY  1. Three Classes  2. Tribal and Clan Divisions  3. Achemenian Dynasty  II. CIVILIZATION  1. Writing  2. Institutions and Customs  III. HISTORY  1. Cyrus  2. Capture of Babylon  3. Cambyses  4. Pseudo-Smerdis  5. Darius I  6. Darius' Suez Canal  7. Xerxes I  8. Artaxerxes II  9. Xerxes II  10. Later Persian Kings  IV. FIRST MENTION IN INSCRIPTIONS  LITERATURE  The Persians are not mentioned in the Bible until the exilic books ( 2 Chronicles 36:20, 22, 23   Ezra 1:1, 2, 8 ;  Ezra 3:7   Esther 1:19 , etc.;  Daniel 5:28 ;  Daniel 6:8, 12, 15, 28 ), being previously included under the Medes ( Genesis 10:2 ), as they were by Thucydides, and even by Xenophon often.  Archaemenes (Hakhamanish)  Teispes (Chaishpish, Sispis)  Cyrus Ariaramnes (Ariyaramna)  Cambyses Arsames (Arshama)  Cyrus the Great Hystaspes (Vishtaspa)  Cambyses Darius I  Xerxes I (Ahasuerus)  Artaxerxes I (Longimanus)  Xerxes II Sogdianus Darius II  (Nothos, Ochos)  Artaxerxes III (Ochos) (Sisygambis, a daughter)  Arses  Darius III (Codomannus)  (Neh. 12:22; 1 Macc. 1:1)  I. Affinity.  Being of the same stock as the Medes they shared the name Aryans (Achaem. ariya; Av. airya; Sanskrit, arya, "noble"); compare the Naqsh i Rustam Inscription, where Darius I calls himself "a Persian, son of a Persian, an Aryan, of Aryan descent" (II. 13, 14). Tradition assigns as their earliest known habitat the so-called Airyanem Vaejo ("Aryan germ"), a district between the Jaxartes and the Oxus (Vendidad I), whence they migrated gradually to what was afterward known as Persis (modern Fars), including probably part of Elam.  1. Three Classes:  The Avesta shows that the Medo-Pers community was divided into 3 classes (zantu): the Athravans or fire-priests, the Rathaestars or charioteers, and the Vastryafshuyans or cattle-rearers (compare the three original Hindu castes, the Brahmans, the Kshattriyas and the Vaisyas). A fourth class, the artisans or Hutis, came later. But these were classes, not castes.  2. Tribal and Clan Divisions:  They were also divided into tribes, clans (Achaem. vith; Av. vis; compare vicus) and families or households (Achaem. tauma; Av. nmana). Herodotus (i.125) mentions ten Persian tribes, the chief being the Pasargadae, to which belonged the Achemenian clan (phretre) which included the royal family. This dynasty traced its origin to Achaemenes (Chakhamanish) according to Darius and Herodotus.Oxus (Vendidad I), whence they migrated gradually to what was afterward known as Persis (modern Fars), including probably part of Elam.  3. Achemenian Dynasty:  The following scheme will serve to show the descent of the line of Persian kings mentioned in the Bible and in secular history up to the time of the fall of the dynasty in 331 B.C.  II. Civilization.  1. Writing:  The Persians had indulged less in luxury than the Medes, until their conquest of Media and other lands under Cyrus the Great gave them the opportunity, which they were not slow to embrace, being famed for their readiness to adopt foreign customs. Writing was introduced from Babylonia through Elam.  2. Institutions and Customs:  This cuneiform character was afterward superseded by one derived from Syria, from which came the Avestic writing, which, in its corrupt Pahlavi form, lasted until the Arabian conquest imposed the Arabic character on the people. The Achemenian kings probably borrowed from Babylon and further developed their system of royal posts ( Esther 8:14 ) or messengers (and even the words aggaroi, and astandai, used to denote them, are almost certainly Babylonian). Of these men's pace it was said, "No mortal thing is quicker." The custom of showing special honor to the "Benefactors of the King" (Herodotos viii.85: orosaggai equals Av. uru plus sanh, "widely renowned") is referred to in  Esther 6:1, 2, 3 , and that of covering the (head and) face of a criminal condemned to death (with a large black cap) ( Esther 7:8, 9 ) occurs in the Shahnamah also.  (1) The King.  The king was an arbitrary ruler with unlimited power, the council of seven princes who stood nearest to the throne ( Esther 1:14 ; compare Herodotos iii. 70-84) having no share in the government.  (2) The Army.  As soldiers, the Persians were famous as archers and javelin-throwers; they were also skilled in the use of the sling, and above all in riding. Boys were taken from the women's into the men's part of the house at the age of 5, and were there trained in "riding, archery and speaking the truth" until 20 years old. In Darius' inscriptions, as well as in the Avesta, lying is regarded as a great crime.  (3) Marriage.  The Persians practiced polygamy, and marriages between those next of kin were approved of. Pride and garrulity are mentioned as distinctive of the Persian character.  III. History.  1. Cyrus:  Persian history, as known to us, begins with Cyrus the Great. His ancestors, for at least some generations, seem to have been chiefs or "kings" of Anshan, a district in Persia or Elam. Cyrus himself (Western Asiatic Inscriptions, V, plate 35) gives his genealogy up to and including Teispes, entitling all his ancestors whom he mentions, kings of Anshan. Phraortes, king of the Medes, is said to have first subjugated the Persians to that kingdom about 97 years before Cyrus (Herodotus i.102). Cyrus himself headed his countrymen's revolt against Astyages, who advanced to attack Pasargadae (549 B.C.). His army mutinied and surrendered him to Cyrus, whom the Greeks held to be his grandson on the mother's side. Cyrus, becoming supreme ruler of both Medes and Persians, advanced to the conquest of Lydia. He defeated and captured Croesus, overran Lydia, and compelled the Greek colonies in Asia Minor to pay tribute (547 B.C.).  2. Capture of Babylon:  He overthrew the Sute (Bedouin) across the Tigris the following year, and was then invited by a large party in Babylonia to come to their help against the usurper Nabunahid, whose religious zeal had led him to collect as many as possible of the idols from other parts of Babylonia and remove them to Babylon, thereby increasing the sacredness and magnificence of that city but inflicting injury on neighboring and more ancient sanctuaries. Defeating Nabunahid's army and capturing the king, Cyrus sent his own forces under Gobryas (Gubaru, Gaubaruva)to take possession of Babylon. This he did in June, 538, "without opposition and without a battle." The citadel, however, where Belshazzar "the king's son" was in command, held out for some months, and was then taken in a night attack in which "the king's son" was slain. Cyrus made Gobryas viceroy of Chaldea, and he "appointed governors in Babylonia (Cyrus' "Annalistic Tablet"). When Gobryas died within the year, Cyrus' son Cambyses was made viceroy of the country, now become a province of the Persian empire. Cyrus restored the gods to their sanctuaries, and this doubtless led to permission being given to the Jews to return to Jerusalem, taking with them their sacred vessels, and to rebuild their temple. Cyrus was killed in battle against some frontier tribe (accounts differ where) in 529 B.C. His tomb at Murghab, near the ruins of Pasargadae, is still standing.  3. Cambyses:  Cyrus' son and successor, Cambyses, invaded Egypt and conquered it after a great battle near Pelusium (525 B.C.). During his absence, a Magian, Gaumata, who pretended to be Smerdis (Bardiya), Cambyses' murdered brother, seized the throne. Marching against him, Cambyses committed suicide.  4. Pseudo-Smerdis:  After a reign of 7 months, the usurper was overthrown and slain by Darius and his 6 brother-nobles (their names in Herodotus iii.70 are confirmed with one exception in Darius' Besitun Inscription, column iv, 80-86). Darius became king as the heir of Cambyses (521 B.C.). But in nearly every part of the empire rebellions broke out, in most cases headed by real or pretended descendants of the ancient kings of each country.  5. Darius I:  After at least 3 years' struggle Darius' authority was firmly established everywhere. He then divided the empire into satrapies, or provinces (dahyava), of which there were at first 23 (Beh. Inscription, column i, 13-17), and ultimately at least 29 (Naqsh i Rustam Inscription, 22-30). Over these he placed satraps of noble Persian or Median descent, instead of representatives of their ancient kings. His empire extended from the Indus to the Black Sea, from the Jaxartes to beyond the Nile.  6. Darius' Suez Canal:  Darius united the latter river with the Red Sea by a canal, the partly obliterated inscription commemorating which may perhaps be thus restored and rendered: "I am a Persian; with Persia I seized Egypt. I commanded to dig this canal from the river named the Nile (Pirava), which flows through Egypt, to this sea which comes from Persia. Then this canal was dug, according as I commanded. And I said, `Come ye from the Nile through this canal to Persia.' " Darius' expedition into Scythia, his success in subduing the rebellion among the Asiatic Greeks, his attempts to conquer Greece itself and his overthrow at Marathon (499-490 B.C.) are part of the history of Greece. A rebellion in Egypt had not been repressed when Darius died in 485 B.C.  7. Xerxes I:  Xerxes I, who succeeded his father, regained Egypt, but his failure in his attempts to conquer Greece largely exhausted his empire. In 464 B.C. he was murdered. His son Artaxerxes I, surnamed "the longarmed," succeeded him, being himself succeeded in 424 B.C. by his son Xerxes II, who was murdered the following year. This ended the legitimate Achemenian line, the next king, Darius II (styled Nothos, or "bastard," as well as Ochos), being one of Artaxerxes' illegitimate sons (we pass over Sogdianus' brief reign).  8. Artaxerxes II:  Artaxerxes II, Mnemon, succeeded his father and left the throne to his son Artaxerxes III, Ochos. The latter was murdered with all his sons but the youngest, Arses, by an Egyptian eunuch Bagoas, probably in revenge for Artaxerxes' conduct in Egypt (338 B.C.).  9. Xerxes II:  Arses was murdered by Bagoas 3 years later, when Darius III, Codomannus, the son of Sisygambis, daughter of Artaxerxes II, and her husband, a Persian noble, ascended the throne.  10. Later Persian Kings:  Darius was completely overthrown by Alexander the Great in the battle of Gaugamela or Arbela, 331 B.C., and shortly after fell by an assassin's hand. This ended the Persian empire of the Achaemenides, the whole of the lands composing it becoming part of the empire of Macedon.  IV. First Mention in Inscriptions.  Persia (Parsua) is first mentioned as a country in an inscription of Rammanu Nirari III (WAI, I, plate 35, number 1, l. 8), who boasts of having conquered it and other lands (he reigned from 812 to 783 or from 810 to 781 B.C.).  LITERATURE.  Besides the main authorities mentioned in the text, we learn much from Spiegel, Die Altper-sischen Keilinschriften, Arrian, Thucydides, Polybius, Strabo, Curtius.  W. St. Clair Tisdall
NEPHTOAH|Opened, a fountain and a stream issuing from it on the border between Judah and Benjamin ( Joshua 15:8 ,  9;  18:15 ). It has been identified with `Ain Lifta, a spring about 2 1/2 miles north-west of Jerusalem. Others, however, have identified it with `Ain' Atan, on the south-west of Bethlehem, whence water is conveyed through "Pilate's aqueduct" to the Haram area at Jerusalem. 
SARAH|Princess, the wife and at the same time the half-sister of Abraham ( Genesis 11:29 ;  20:12 ). This name was given to her at the time that it was announced to Abraham that she should be the mother of the promised child. Her story is from her marriage identified with that of the patriarch till the time of her death. Her death, at the age of one hundred and twenty-seven years (the only instance in Scripture where the age of a woman is recorded), was the occasion of Abraham's purchasing the cave of Machpelah as a family burying-place. In the allegory of  Galatians 4:22 -31 she is the type of the "Jerusalem which is above." She is also mentioned as Sara in  Hebrews 11:11  among the Old Testament worthies, who "all died in faith." (see  ABRAHAM .) 
JEPHTHAH|Whom God sets free, or the breaker through, a "mighty man of valour" who delivered Israel from the oppression of the Ammonites ( Judges 11:1 -33), and judged Israel six years ( 12:7 ). He has been described as "a wild, daring, Gilead mountaineer, a sort of warrior Elijah." After forty-five years of comparative quiet Israel again apostatized, and in "process of time the children of Ammon made war against Israel" ( 11:5 ). In their distress the elders of Gilead went to fetch Jephthah out of the land of Tob, to which he had fled when driven out wrongfully by his brothers from his father's inheritance (2), and the people made him their head and captain. The "elders of Gilead" in their extremity summoned him to their aid, and he at once undertook the conduct of the war against Ammon. Twice he sent an embassy to the king of Ammon, but in vain. War was inevitable. The people obeyed his summons, and "the spirit of the Lord came upon him." Before engaging in war he vowed that if successful he would offer as a "burnt-offering" whatever would come out of the door of his house first to meet him on his return. The defeat of the Ammonites was complete. "He smote them from Aroer, even till thou come to Minnith, even twenty cities, and unto the plain of the vineyards [Hebrews `Abel Keramim], with a very great slaughter" ( Judges 11:33 ). The men of Ephraim regarded themselves as insulted in not having been called by Jephthah to go with him to war against Ammon. This led to a war between the men of Gilead and Ephraim ( 12:4 ), in which many of the Ephraimites perished. (see  SHIBBOLETH .) "Then died Jephthah the Gileadite, and was buried in one of the cities of Gilead" (7). 
BULWARKS|Mural towers, bastions, were introduced by king Uzziah ( 2 Chronicles 26:15 ;  Zephaniah 1:16 ;  Psalm 48:13 ;  Isaiah 26:1 ). There are five Hebrew words so rendered in the Authorized Version, but the same word is also variously rendered. 
ZOPHAH|Spreading out, a son of Helem ( 1 Chronicles 7:35 ), a chief of Asher. 
GEBAL|A line (or natural boundary,  as a mountain range).  (1.) A tract in the land of Edom south of the Dead Sea ( Psalm 83:7 ); now called Djebal. (2.) A Phoenician city, not far from the sea coast, to the north of Beyrout ( Ezek. 27:9 ); called by the Greeks Byblos. Now Jibeil. Mentioned in the Amarna tablets. An important Phoenician text, referring to the temple of Baalath, on a monument of Yehu-melek, its king (probably B.C. 600), has been discovered. 
GARMENTS|   RENDING OF   ren'-ding.  See  BURIAL, IV ;  DRESS .  PRISON GARMENTS  See preceding article.
GILEADITES|     gil'-e-ad-its:  (1) A branch of the tribe of Manasseh ( Numbers 26:29 ).  (2) Natives of the district of Gilead ( Judges 10:3 ;  Judges 11:1 , etc.).
BATHSHEBA|Daughter of the oath, or of seven, called also Bath-shu'a ( 1 Chronicles 3:5 ), was the daughter of Eliam ( 2 Samuel 11:3 ) or Ammiel ( 1 Chronicles 3:5 ), and wife of Uriah the Hittite. David committed adultery with her ( 2 Samuel 11:4 ,  5;  Psalm 51:1 ). The child born in adultery died ( 2 Samuel 12:15 -19). After her husband was slain ( 11:15 ) she was married to David ( 11:27 ), and became the mother of Solomon ( 12:24 ;  1 Kings 1:11 ;  2:13 ). She took a prominent part in securing the succession of Solomon to the throne ( 1 Kings 1:11 ,  16-21). 
NAHBI|Hidden, one of the twelve spies sent out to explore the land of Canaan ( Numbers 13:14 ). 
TARTAK|Prince of darkness, one of the gods of the Arvites, who colonized part of Samaria after the deportation of Israel by Shalmaneser ( 2 Kings 17:31 ). 
LIBERTINES|     lib'-er-tinz, li-bur'-tinz (Libertinoi): These were among Stephen's opponents: "There arose certain of them that were of the synagogue called (the synagogue) of the Libertines, and of the Cyrenians, and of the Alexandrians, and of them of Cilicia and Asia, disputing with Stephen" ( Acts 6:9 ).have a deeper and nobler meaning than is generally conveyed by the English word. In  Proverbs 11:25 , the liberal soul (nephesh berakhah) means a soul that carries a blessing. In  Isaiah 32:5 , the American Standard Revised Version has "bountiful" where the King James Version has "liberal," and in  Isaiah 32:8  "noble" takes the place of "liberal" (nadhibh). The principal Greek words are haplotes literally, "simplicity," "sincerity," and charis, "grace," "favor." In  1 Corinthians 16:3 , "bounty" substitutes "liberality." It is well to bear in mind that a Biblical liberality can spring only out of a noble soul, and is Godlike in its genesis and spirit.  1. "Synagogue of the Libertines":  How many synagogues are denoted? The answer may aid in the interpretation of "Libertines":  (1) The words may be read as denoting one synagogue (Calvin). However  (a) the number of worshippers would be extremely large,  (b) the bond of union is not obvious,  (c) rabbinic tradition speaks of 480 synagogues in Jerusalem.  (2) The double ton ("of them") seems to denote two parties, the one consisting "of them that were of the synagogue called (the synagogue) of Libertines and Cyrenians and Alexandrians," the other "of them of Cilicia and Asia", (Winer, Wendt, Holtzmann). But the second ton is dependent on synagogue. "As Cyrenians and Alexandrians both belong to towns.... a change of designation would be necessary when the Jews of whole provinces came to be mentioned: this being the case, the article could not but be repeated, without any reference to the ton before" (Alford).  (3) There were three synagogues:  (a) that of the Libertines,  (b) that of the Cyrenians and Alexandrians and  (c) that "of them of Cilicia and Asia" (Alford). There is no grammatical reason for this division, but it is based on an interpretation of "Libertines." There were "Libertines," Africans and Asiatics.  (4) Each party had a separate synagogue (Schurer, Hausrath). The number of worshippers, their different origin and connections, and the number of synagogues in Jerusalem give weight to this view.  2. Interpretation of "Libertines":  (1) They are "freedmen," liberated slaves or their descendants. Against this it is held that the Greek equivalent (apeleutheroi) would have been used in this case. However, the Roman designation would be common all over the empire. In what sense were they "freedmen"? Various answers are given:  (a) they were freedmen from Jewish servitude (Lightfoot);  (b) they were Italian freedmen who had become proselytes;  (c) they were "the freedmen of the Romans" (Chrysostom), the descendants of Jewish freedmen at Rome who had been expelled by Tiberius. In 63 B.C. Pompey had taken prisoners of war to Rome. These, being liberated by those who had acquired them as slaves, formed a colony on the banks of the Tiber (Philo, Legat. ad Caium). Tacitus relates that the senate decreed (19 A.D.) that a number of Jewish Libertines should be transported to Sardinia, and that the rest should leave Italy, unless they renounced, before a certain day, their profane customs (Ann. ii, 85; see also Josephus, Ant, XVIII, iii, 5). Many would naturally seek refuge in Jerusalem and build there a synagogue.  (2) They are an African community. There were two synagogues, one of which was Asiatic. In the other were men from two African towns (Cyrene and Alexandria), therefore the Libertines must have been African also, all forming an African synagogue. Various explanations are given:  (a) They were inhabitants of Libertum, a town in Africa proper: an "Episcopus Ecclesiae Catholicae Libertinensis" sat in the Synod of Carthage (411 A.D.).  (b) Some emend the text; Wetstein and Blass, following the Armenian VS, conjecture Libustinon, "of the Libystines." Schulthess reads for "Libertines and Cyrenians" (Libertinon kai Kurenaion) "Libyans, those about Cyrene" (Libuon ton kata Kurenen) (compare  Acts 2:10 ).  These emendations are conjectural; the manuscripts read "Libertines." It seems, therefore, that 2, (1) (c) above is the correct interpretation.  S. F. Hunter  SYNAGOGUE OF LIBERTINES  See  LIBERTINES .
KALLAI|     kal'-a-i, kal'-i (qallay, qal, "swift"): A priest among those who returned with Zerubbabel ( Nehemiah 12:1 ). He represented the family of Sallai ( Nehemiah 12:20 ).
SHIMRITH|     shim'-rith (shimrith, "guard," feminine): A Moabitess, the mother of Jehozabad, one of those that conspired against King Joash ( 2 Chronicles 24:26 ). Elsewhere ( 2 Kings 12:21 ) Jehozabad is described as the son of SHOMER (which see), the same name without the feminine ending.
ISMACHIAH|     is-ma-ki'-a (yicmakhyahu, "Yah will sustain"): One of the "overseers under the hand of Conaniah and Shimei his brother, by the appointment of Hezekiah the king, and Azariah the ruler of the house of God" ( 2 Chronicles 31:13 ).
BAVAI|     bav'-a-i.  See  BAVVAI .
JESHUA| (1.) Head of the ninth priestly order ( Ezra 2:36 ); called also Jeshuah ( 1 Chronicles 24:11 ). (2.) A Levite appointed by Hezekiah to distribute offerings in the priestly cities ( 2 Chronicles 31:15 ). (3.)  Ezra 2:6 ;  Nehemiah 7:11 . (4.)  Ezra 2:40 ;  Nehemiah 7:43 . (5.) The son of Jozadak, and high priest of the Jews under Zerubbabel ( Nehemiah 7:7 ;  12:1 ,  7,  10,  26); called Joshua ( Haggai 1:1 ,  12;  2:2 ,  4;  Zechariah 3:1 ,  3,  6,  8,  9). (6.) A Levite ( Ezra 8:33 ). (7.)  Nehemiah 3:19 . (8.) A Levite who assisted in the reformation under Nehemiah ( 8:7 ;  9:4 ,  5). (9.) Son of Kadmiel ( Nehemiah 12:24 ). (10.) A city of Judah ( Nehemiah 11:26 ). (11.)  Nehemiah 8:17 ; Joshua, the son of Nun. 
ZEBADIAH|Gift of Jehovah.  (1.) A son of Asahel, Joab's brother ( 1 Chronicles 27:7 ). (2.) A Levite who took part as one of the teachers in the system of national education instituted by Jehoshaphat ( 2 Chronicles 17:7 ,  8). (3.) The son of Ishmael, "the ruler of the house of Judah in all the king's matters" ( 2 Chronicles 19:8 -11). (4.) A son of Beriah ( 1 Chronicles 8:15 ). (5.) A Korhite porter of the Lord's house ( 1 Chronicles 26:2 ). Three or four others of this name are also mentioned. 
SHALIM|Shalim, Land of Land of foxes, a place apparently to the north-west of Jerusalem ( 1 Samuel 9:4 ), perhaps in the neighbourhood of Shaalabbin in Dan ( Joshua 19:42 ). 
MIZZAH|Despair, one of the four sons of Reuel, the son of Esau ( Genesis 36:13 ,  17). 
OMRI|Servant of Jehovah. When Elah was murdered by Zimri at Tirzah ( 1 Kings 16:15 -27), Omri, his captain, was made king (B.C. 931). For four years there was continued opposition to his reign, Tibni, another claimant to the throne, leading the opposing party; but at the close of that period all his rivals were defeated, and he became king of Israel, "Tibni died and Omri reigned" (B.C. 927). By his vigour and power he gained great eminence and consolidated the kingdom. He fixed his dynasty on the throne so firmly that it continued during four succeeding reigns. Tirza was for six years the seat of his government. He then removed the capital to Samaria (q.v.), where he died, and was succeeded by his son Ahab. "He wrought evil in the eyes of the Lord, and did worse than all that were before him." Beth-omri, "the house" or "city of Omri," is the name usually found on Assyrian inscriptions for Samaria. In the stele of Mesha (the "Moabite stone"), which was erected in Moab about twenty or thirty years after Omri's death, it is recorded that Omri oppressed Moab till Mesha delivered the land: "Omri, king of Israel, oppressed Moab many days, for Chemosh was angry with his land. His son succeeded him, and he also said, I will oppress Moab" (Comp.  2 Kings 1:1 ;  3:4 ,  5). The "Moabite stone" also records that "Omri took the land of Medeba, and occupied it in his day and in the days of his son forty years." 
HIZKI|     hiz'-ki (chizqi; Septuagint Azaki; the King James Version Hezeki): A son of Elpaal, a descendant of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:17 ).
SOPATER|The father who saves, probably the same as Sosipater, a kinsman of Paul ( Romans 16:21 ), a Christian of the city of Berea who accompanied Paul into Asia ( Acts 20:4 -6). 
JEZERITES|   , THE  je'-zer-its, (ha-yitsri (collective with article)): Descendants of "Jezer" ( Numbers 26:49 ).
CLASPS|     klasps (qerec): The word occurs nine times in Exodus 26; 36, 39; which record the specifications for the erection of the tabernacle and their subsequent carrying out. In each of these passages the King James Version renders "taches"-an early English word of French origin now embodied in our "attachment." 50 clasps or taches of gold were ordered to be used in connecting together the two sets of inner tapestry curtains (10 in number) of the tabernacle ( Exodus 26:6 ), and 50 clasps of brass (bronze) were similarly to be used in joining the two sets of goats' hair curtains (11 in number) which formed the outer covering ( Exodus 26:11 ). See  TABERNACLE . As to the nature of the clasp itself, it seems to have belonged to a double set of loops, opposite to each other, to one of which in each set, required to be of blue cord, a gold or brass button or pin was attached, which, being inserted into the loop opposite, kept the curtain in position ( Exodus 26:4-6 ).  A difficulty arises from the direction in  Exodus 26:33  that the veil which divided the "dwelling" into two parts-the holy place and the most holy-was to be suspended "under the clasps." If the clasps are supposed to be midway in the total length of the tabernacle, this would make the two holy places to be of equal size, contrary to the usual assumption that the outer was twice the length of the inner. The term "under" must therefore be used with some latitude, or the ordinary conception of the arrangement of the curtains, or of the size of the holy places will have to be revised (the dimensions are not actually given in the description).  W. Shaw Caldecott
SWADDLINGBAND|   SWADDLE; SWADDLING-BAND  swod'-'-l, swod'-ling-band (verb chathal, "enwrap," "swaddle" ( Ezekiel 16:4 ), noun chathullah, "swaddling-band" ( Job 38:9 ); verb sparganoo, "to wrap in swaddling clothes" ( Luke 2:7, 12 ), noun spargana (pl.), "swaddling clothes" (The Wisdom of Solomon 7:4). the King James Version also has "swaddle" ( Lamentations 2:22 ) for Taphach, literally, "to extend." But the word means "to carry on the outstretched palms of the hands" (compare Tippuchim, "dandled in the hands,"  Lamentations 2:20 ), whence RV's "to dandle"): "To swaddle" and "to swathe" are really the same word, both forms going back to an AS form swethel, "a bandage," but "swaddle" has become the technical term for the wrapping of an infant in the Orient or elsewhere. The oriental swaddling-clothes consist of a square of cloth and two or more bandages. The child is laid on the cloth diagonally and the corners are folded over the feet and body and under the head, the bandages then being tied so as to hold the cloth in position. This device forms the clothing of the child until it is about a year old, and its omission ( Ezekiel 16:4 ) would be a token that the child had been abandoned. The mention of darkness as a "swaddling-band" at the birth of the sea ( Job 38:9 ) is only a poetic way of saying that the sea, at its creation, was covered with clouds and darkness, and to find any idea of restraint involved is fanciful.  Burton Scott Easton
SHUTHELAHITES|   SHUTHELAH;   shoo-the'-la, shoo'-the-la, shoo-the'-la-hits, shoo'-the-la-hits (shuthalchi): A son of Ephraim ( Numbers 26:35, 36 ; compare  1 Chronicles 7:20, 21 ), and his descendants.  See  GENEALOGY .
PELATIAH|Deliverance of the Lord.  (1.) A son of Hananiah and grandson of Zerubbabel ( 1 Chronicles 3:21 ). (2.) A captain of "the sons of Simeon" ( 4:42 ). (3.)  Nehemiah 10:22 . (4.) One of the twenty-five princes of the people against whom Ezekiel prophesied on account of their wicked counsel ( Ezek. 11:1 -13). 
GIMZO|A place fertile in sycamores, a city in the plain of Judah, the villages of which were seized by the Philistines ( 2 Chronicles 28:18 ). It is now called Jimzu, about 3 miles south-east of Ludd, i.e., Lydda. 
SALOME|Perfect.  (1.) The wife of Zebedee and mother of James and John ( Matthew 27:56 ), and probably the sister of Mary, the mother of our Lord ( John 19:25 ). She sought for her sons places of honour in Christ's kingdom ( Matthew 20:20 ,  21; Comp.  19:28 ). She witnessed the crucifixion ( Mark 15:40 ), and was present with the other women at the sepulchre ( Matthew 27:56 ). (2.) "The daughter of Herodias," not named in the New Testament. On the occasion of the birthday festival held by Herod Antipas, who had married her mother Herodias, in the fortress of Machaerus, she "came in and danced, and pleased Herod" ( Mark 6:14 -29). John the Baptist, at that time a prisoner in the dungeons underneath the castle, was at her request beheaded by order of Herod, and his head given to the damsel in a charger, "and the damsel gave it to her mother," whose revengeful spirit was thus gratified. "A luxurious feast of the period" (says Farrar,  Life of Christ) "was not regarded as complete unless it closed with some gross pantomimic representation; and doubtless Herod had adopted the evil fashion of his day. But he had not anticipated for his guests the rare luxury of seeing a princess, his own niece, a grand-daughter of Herod the Great and of Mariamne, a descendant, therefore, of Simon the high priest and the great line of Maccabean princes, a princess who afterwards became the wife of a tetrarch [Philip, tetrarch of Trachonitis] and the mother of a king, honouring them by degrading herself into a scenic dancer." 
IRNAHASH|   IR-NAHASH  ur-na'-hash, ir-na'-hash (`ir nachash): A town of Judah of which Tehinnah is called the "father," probably meaning "founder" ( 1 Chronicles 4:12 ). English Versions of the Bible margin suggests the translation "city of Nahash."
TIBHATH|     tib'-hath (tibhchath; Metabechas, Codex Alexandrinus Matebeth; Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) Thebath; Peshitta Tebhach): A city of Hadadezer, king of Zobah, from which David took much of the brass used later by Solomon in the construction of the temple-furnishings ( 1 Chronicles 18:8 ). In  2 Samuel 8:8  we must for the beTach of the Massoretic Text read with the Syriac Tebhach. It may be the same as the Tubihi of the Tell el-Amarna Letters; the Dibhu of the Karnak lists; and the Tubihi mentioned with Kadesh on the Orontes in the "Travels of an Egyptian" in the reign of Rameses II. The site is unknown, but it must have been on the eastern slopes of Anti-Lebanon, between which and the Euphrates we must locate Hadadezer's kingdom of Zobah. "Tebah" occurs also as an Aramaic personal or tribal name in  Genesis 22:24 .  W. M. Christie
CHLOE|Verdure, a female Christian ( 1 Corinthians 1:11 ), some of whose household had informed Paul of the divided state of the Corinthian church. Nothing is known of her. 
WATERSPOUTS|( Psalm 42:7 ; marg. R.V.,  "cataracts"). If we regard this psalm as descriptive of David's feelings when banished from Jerusalem by the revolt of Absalom, this word may denote "waterfalls," inasmuch as Mahanaim, where he abode, was near the Jabbok, and the region abounded with rapids and falls. 
INSTRUMENTS|    OF MUSIC  (shalishim): Thus, the Revised Version (British and American) and the King James Version ( 1 Samuel 18:6 ), the Revised Version margin "triangles" or "three-stringed instruments."  See  MUSIC .  MUSICAL INSTRUMENTS  mu'-zi-kal in'-stroo-ments (shiddah we-shiddoth): "I gat me.... musical instruments, and that of all sorts" ( Ecclesiastes 2:8 ). Thus the King James Version and the American Standard Revised Version; the English Revised Version and the American Revised Version margin "concubines very many." The word occurs only here; the meaning is not certain, but it has nothing to do with music.  STRINGED, INSTRUMENTS  stringd.  See  MUSIC .
FOREFRONT|     for'-frunt (panim):  For "forefront," "front" is now generally used, since "back-front" has gone out of use. "Forefront" is the translation of panim, "face" ( 2 Kings 16:14   Ezekiel 40:19 ;  Ezekiel 47:1 ); of mul panim, "over against the face" ( Exodus 26:9   Leviticus 8:9 , "And he put the mitre upon his head; also upon the mitre even upon his forefront, did he put the golden plate"; for "upon his forefront" the Revised Version (British and American) has "in front;  2 Samuel 11:15 , "in the forefront of the hottest battle"); of ro'sh, "head" ( 2 Chronicles 20:27 ); of shen, "tooth" ( 1 Samuel 14:5 , "The forefront (The King James Version, margin "Hebrew tooth") of the one was situated northward over against Michmash," the Revised Version (British and American) "The one crag rose up on the north in front of Michmash"); in APC 1Macc 4:57 margin it is the translation of prosopon, "face": "They decked the forefront of the temple with crowns of gold."  The Revised Version (British and American) has "forefront" for "face" ( Ezekiel 40:15 ), "in the forefront of" for "over against" ( Joshua 22:11 ).  W. L. Walker
MISHEAL|( Joshua 19:26 ), a town of Asher, probably the same as Mishal. 
JATHNIEL|     jath'-ni-el (yathni'el, "God lives"): Fourth "son" of Meshelemiah, a Korahite ( 1 Chronicles 26:2 ).
BAZLITH|   ; BAZLUTH  baz'-lith, baz'-luth (batslith,  Nehemiah 7:54 ; batsluth,  Ezra 2:52 ; Basaloth, 1 Esdras 5:31, "asking"): The descendants of Bazlith (temple-servants) returned with Zerubbabel to Jerusalem.
OTHNIEL|Lion of God, the first of the judges. His wife Achsah was the daughter of Caleb ( Joshua 15:16 ,  17;  Judges 1:13 ). He gained her hand as a reward for his bravery in leading a successful expedition against Debir (q.v.). Some thirty years after the death of Joshua, the Israelites fell under the subjection of Chushan-rishathaim (q.v.), the king of Mesopotamia. He oppressed them for full eight years, when they "cried" unto Jehovah, and Othniel was raised up to be their deliverer. He was the younger brother of Caleb ( Judges 3:8 ,  9-11). He is the only judge mentioned connected with the tribe of Judah. Under him the land had rest forty years. 
LASEA|     la-se'-a (Lasaia): A town on the South coast of Crete, 5 miles East of Fair Havens ( Acts 27:8 ). The ruins were examined in 1856 by G. Brown (see Code of Hammurabi (St. P), chapter xxiii, 640). If Paul's ship was detained long at this anchorage, it would be necessary to purchase stores from Lasea; and this in addition to the inconvenience of the roadstead (see FAIR HAVENS) would probably explain the captain's reluctance to winter there.
DORCAS|A female antelope, or gazelle, a pious Christian widow at Joppa whom Peter restored to life ( Acts 9:36 -41). She was a Hellenistic Jewess, called Tabitha by the Jews and Dorcas by the Greeks. 
BAARA|     ba'-a-ra ba`ara', ("the burning one"): A wife of the Benjamite Shaharaim ( 1 Chronicles 8:8 ).
ULAM|     u'-lam ('ulam, "preceding"):  (1) A "son"of Peresh; a Manassite clan ( 1 Chronicles 7:16, 17 ). Lucian reads Elam.  (2) A descendant of Benjamin who had sons, "mighty men of valor" ( 1 Chronicles 8:39, 40 ). The Septuagint's Codex Vaticanus has Ailam in  1 Chronicles 8:39  and Aileim in 8:40; Codex Alexandrinus has Oulam in both verses, and so Lucian.
CYRUS|(Hebrews Ko'resh), the celebrated "King of Persia" (Elam) who was conqueror of Babylon, and issued the decree of liberation to the Jews ( Ezra 1:1 ,  2). He was the son of Cambyses, the prince of Persia, and was born about B.C. 599. In the year B.C. 559 he became king of Persia, the kingdom of Media being added to it partly by conquest. Cyrus was a great military leader, bent on universal conquest. Babylon fell before his army (B.C. 538) on the night of Belshazzar's feast ( Dan. 5:30 ), and then the ancient dominion of Assyria was also added to his empire (cf.,  "Go up,  O Elam",   Isaiah 21:2 ). Hitherto the great kings of the earth had only oppressed the Jews. Cyrus was to them as a "shepherd" ( Isaiah 44:28 ;  45:1 ). God employed him in doing service to his ancient people. He may posibly have gained, through contact with the Jews, some knowledge of their religion. The "first year of Cyrus" ( Ezra 1:1 ) is not the year of his elevation to power over the Medes, nor over the Persians, nor the year of the fall of Babylon, but the year succeeding the two years during which "Darius the Mede" was viceroy in Babylon after its fall. At this time only (B.C. 536) Cyrus became actual king over Palestine, which became a part of his Babylonian empire. The edict of Cyrus for the rebuilding of Jerusalem Marked a great epoch in the history of the Jewish people ( 2 Chronicles 36:22 ,  23;  Ezra 1:1 -4;  4:3 ;  5:13 -17;  6:3 -5). This decree was discovered "at Achmetha [R.V. marg., "Ecbatana"], in the palace that is in the province of the Medes" ( Ezra 6:2 ). A chronicle drawn up just after the conquest of Babylonia by Cyrus, gives the history of the reign of Nabonidus (Nabunahid), the last king of Babylon, and of the fall of the Babylonian empire. In B.C. 538 there was a revolt in Southern Babylonia, while the army of Cyrus entered the country from the north. In June the Babylonian army was completely defeated at Opis, and immediately afterwards Sippara opened its gates to the conqueror. Gobryas (Ugbaru), the governor of Kurdistan, was then sent to Babylon, which surrendered "without fighting," and the daily services in the temples continued without a break. In October, Cyrus himself arrived, and proclaimed a general amnesty, which was communicated by Gobryas to "all the province of Babylon," of which he had been made governor. Meanwhile, Nabonidus, who had concealed himself, was captured, but treated honourably; and when his wife died, Cambyses, the son of Cyrus, conducted the funeral. Cyrus now assumed the title of "king of Babylon," claimed to be the descendant of the ancient kings, and made rich offerings to the temples. At the same time he allowed the foreign populations who had been deported to Babylonia to return to their old homes, carrying with them the images of their gods. Among these populations were the Jews, who, as they had no images, took with them the sacred vessels of the temple. 
HELBAH|Fatness, a town of the tribe of Asher ( Judges 1:31 ), in the plain of Phoenicia. 
THEBES|     thebz.  See  NO-AMON .
MARKETPLACE|   MARKET; ; MART  mar'-ket, mar'-ketplas, mart (ma`arabh, cachar; agora):  (1) Ma`arabh, from a root meaning "trading" and hence, goods exchanged, and so "merchandise" in the Revised Version (British and American), "market" in the King James Version, occurs only in  Ezekiel 27:13, 17, 19, 25 , and is translated correctly "merchandise" in both the English Revised Version and the American Standard Revised Version.  (2) Cachar means a "trading emporium," hence, mart, and merchandise. It occurs only in  Isaiah 23:3  (see MERCHANDISE).  (3) Agora, from root meaning "to collect," means a "town meeting-place," "resort of the people," so a place where the public generally met to exchange views and wares. No doubt, the central place soon filling up, the people thronged the adjoining streets, and so in time each street thus used came to be called agora, "marketplace"; translated "marketplace(s)" in 1 Esdras 2:18; Tobit 2:3;  Matthew 11:16 ;  Matthew 20:3 ;  Matthew 23:7   Mark 6:56 ;  Mark 7:4 ;  Mark 12:38   Luke 7:32 ;  Luke 11:43 ;  Luke 20:46   Acts 16:19 ;  Acts 17:17 ; "Market of Appius" in  Acts 28:15  means, probably, "street" (see APPII FORUM).  The marketplace in New Testament times was the public open space, either simple or ornate, in town, city or country, where ( Mark 6:56 ) the people congregated, not only for exchange of merchandise, but for one or more of the following purposes:  (1) a place where the children came together to sing, dance and play, a "back-to-date" municipal recreation center ( Matthew 11:16, 17   Luke 7:32 );  (2) a place for loafers, a sort of ancient, irresponsible labor bureau where the out-of-work idler waited the coming of an employer with whom he might bargain for his services, usually by the day ( Matthew 20:1-16 );  (3) a place where the proud pretender could parade in long robes and get public recognition, "salutations in the market-places," e.g. the scribes and Pharisees against whom Jesus emphatically warns His disciples ( Matthew 23:3-7   Mark 12:38   Luke 11:43 ;  Luke 20:46 );  (4) a place where the sick were brought for treatment, the poor man's sanatorium, a municipal hospital; Jesus "who went about doing good" often found His opportunity there ( Mark 6:56 );  (5) a place of preliminary hearing in trials, where the accused might be brought before rulers who were present at the time, e.g. Paul and Silas at Philippi ( Acts 16:19 );  (6) a place for religious and probably political or philosophical discussion (gossip also), a forum, a free-speech throne; no doubt often used by the early apostles not only as a place of proclaiming some truth of the new religion but also a place of advertisement for a coming synagogue service, e.g. Paul in Athens ( Acts 17:17 ).  The Wisdom of Solomon 15:12 (the King James Version) has "They counted... our time here a market for gain," the Revised Version (British and American) "a gainful fair," margin "a keeping of festival," Greek panegurismos, "an assembly of all." Such assemblies offered particular opportunities for business dealings.  William Edward Raffety
SAPHIR|Beautiful, a town of Judah ( Micah 1:11 ), identified with es-Suafir, 5 miles south-east of Ashdod. 
BEZALEL|     bez'-a-lel (betsal'el, "in the shadow (protection) of 'El (God)"; Beseleel; the King James Version Bezaleel):  (1) A master workman under Moses; son of Uri, son of Hur, of the tribe of Judah. Yahweh gave him especial wisdom and skill for his task, which was, with the aid of Oholiab of the tribe of Dan, to superintend the making of the tabernacle and its furniture ( Exodus 31:2 ;  Exodus 35:30 ;  Exodus 36:1, 2, 8 ;  Exodus 37:1 ;  Exodus 38:22 ;  1 Chronicles 2:20   2 Chronicles 1:5 ).  (2) An Israelite of the time of Ezra who put away a foreign wife ( Ezra 10:30 ).  F. K. Farr
SHEBAH|     she'-ba.  See  SHIBAH .
RUFUS|Red, the son of Simon the Cyrenian ( Mark 15:21 ), whom the Roman soldiers compelled to carry the cross on which our Lord was crucified. Probably it is the same person who is again mentioned in  Romans 16:13  as a disciple at Rome, whose mother also was a Christian held in esteem by the apostle. Mark mentions him along with his brother Alexander as persons well known to his readers ( Mark 15:21 ). 
JOZADAK|     joz'-a-dak.  See  JEHOZADAK .
KEROS|     ke'-ros (qeroc, "fortress"(?)): One of the Nethinim ( Ezra 2:44   Nehemiah 7:47 ), an order appointed to the liturgical offices of the temple.  See  NETHINIM .
EXACTORS|     eg-zak'-ters (noghesayikh ( Isaiah 60:17 , the Revised Version, margin "taskmasters"; compare  Exodus 1:11 ;  Exodus 3:7 )):  Righteousness personified is in Zion to take the place of the officials who oppress the people. In  Isaiah 14:4  the American Revised Version, margin, Babylon is called an "exactress of gold."
BANDS|(1) of love ( Hosea 11:4 ); (2) of Christ ( Psalm 2:3 ); (3) uniting together Christ's body the church ( Colossians 2:19 ;  3:14 ;  Ephesians 4:3 ); (4) the emblem of the captivity of Israel ( Ezek. 34:27 ;  Isaiah 28:22 ;  52:2 ); (5) of brotherhood ( Ezek. 37:15 -28); (6) no bands to the wicked in their death ( Psalm 73:4 ;  Job 21:7 ;  Psalm 10:6 ). Also denotes chains ( Luke 8:29 ); companies of soldiers ( Acts 21:31 ); a shepherd's staff, indicating the union between Judah and Israel ( Zechariah 11:7 ). 
DIOTREPHES|Jove-nourished, rebuked by John for his pride (3  John 1:9 ). He was a Judaizer, prating against John and his fellow-labourers "with malicious words" (7). 
ELEAD|     el'-e-ad ('el`adh, "God has testified"):  An Ephraimite, slain while making a raid, by the men of Gath ( 1 Chronicles 7:21 ).
BOZCATH|     boz'-kath (botsqath).  See  BOZKATH .
IPHEDEIAH|Set free by Jehovah, a chief of the tribe of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:25 ). 
HORONAIM|Two caverns, a city of Moab to the south of the Arnon, built, apparently, upon an eminence, and a place of some importance ( Isaiah 15:5 ;  Jeremiah 48:3 ,  5,  34). 
CHINNEROTH|   CHINNERETH;   kin'-e-reth, kin'-e-roth (kinnereth ( Deuteronomy 3:17   Joshua 19:35 , etc.)), (kinaroth; Codex Vaticanus, Kenereth, Codex Alexandrinus, Cheneroth ( Joshua 11:2 )): Taking the order in which the towns are mentioned, this city seems to have lain North of Rakkath (?Tiberias). It may have occupied the site of el-Mejdel, at the Southwest corner of the plain of Gennesaret. From this city the sea took its Old Testament name ( Numbers 34:11 , etc.).
ZALMUNNA|One of the two kings of Midian whom the "Lord delivered" into the hands of Gideon. He was slain afterwards with Zebah ( Judges 8:5 -21). (see  ZEBAH .) 
BERITES|     be'-rits (berim; according to Klostermann and others, bikhrim): The word is found only once in the Old Testament ( 2 Samuel 20:14 ). The passage seems to be doubtful. The suggestion of Klostermann does not improve matters any; the other proposed reading, bachrim (Vulgate, viri electi), "choice young men," is to be preferred.
ZOREAH|     zo'-re-a (tsor`ah): the King James Version of  Joshua 15:33  for ZORAH (which see).
HERODIANS|A Jewish political party who sympathized with ( Mark 3:6 ;  12:13 ; Matt,   22:16 ;  Luke 20:20 ) the Herodian rulers in their general policy of government, and in the social customs which they introduced from Rome. They were at one with the Sadducees in holding the duty of submission to Rome, and of supporting the Herods on the throne. (Comp.  Mark 8:15 ;  Matthew 16:6. ) 
CHARGES|     char'-jiz (dapanao, "to spend"): "Be at charges for them" ( Acts 21:24 , the King James Version "with them"), i.e. pay the sacrificial expenses of these poorer Nazirites (compare Josephus, Ant, XIX, xvi, 1).
SHERESH|Root, a descendant of Manasseh ( 1 Chronicles 7:16 ). 
SEARCHINGS|     sur'-chingz (chiqre (lebh), from chaqar, to "search," "explore," "examine thoroughly"): In the song of Deborah the Reubenites are taunted because their great resolves of heart, chiqeqe lebh, led to nothing but great "searchings" of heart, chiqre lebh, and no activity other than to remain among their flocks ( Judges 5:15 f ). The first of the two Hebrew expressions so emphatically contrasted (though questioned by commentators on the authority of 5 manuscripts as a corruption of the second) can with reasonable certainty be interpreted "acts prescribed by one's understanding" (compare the expressions chakham lebh, nebhon lebh, in which the heart is looked upon as the seat of the understanding). The second expression may mean either irresolution or hesitation based on selfish motives, as the heart was also considered the seat of the feelings, or answerability to God (compare  Jeremiah 17:10   Proverbs 25:3 ); this rendering would explain the form liphelaghoth in  Judges 5:16 , literally, `for the water courses of Reuben, great the searchings of heart!'  Nathan Isaacs
BEEROTHITE|   ; BEROTHITE  be-e'-roth-it, be'-er-oth-it (be'erothi;  2 Samuel 4:5, 9   2 Samuel 23:37 ; shortened form,  1 Chronicles 11:39 ).  See  BEEROTH .
RESHEPH|     re'-shef (resheph, "flame" or "fire-bolt"): Personal name found in Phoenician as a divine name. In the Old Testament the name of a descendant of Ephraim, the eponym of an Ephraimite family or clan ( 1 Chronicles 7:25 ).
DISCIPLES|   SEVENTY   The account of the designation and mission of these is found only in Luke 10. Some have therefore sought to maintain that we have here only a confused variant of the appointment of the Twelve; but this is impossible in the light of Luke's account of the Twelve in chapter 9.  The documents vary as between the numbers seventy and seventy-two, so that it is impossible to determine which is the correct reading; and internal evidence does not help at all in this case. There is nothing in the function or circumstances to indicate any reason for the specific number.  Commentators have sought parallels in the seventy elders chosen to assist Moses ( Numbers 11 ) and suppose that Jesus was incidentally indicating Himself as the "prophet like unto Moses" whom God would raise up.  Again, the Jews popularly reckoned the "number of the nations of the earth" at seventy (compare  Genesis 10 ), and some have supposed Jesus to be thus indicating that His gospel is universal. Attention is called to the fact that the Seventy are not forbidden to go to Gentiles and that their commission probably included Peraea, where many Gentiles were to be found. Some, again, have supposed that Jesus had in mind the Jewish Sanhedrin, composed of seventy (or seventy-two), and that the appointment of a like number to extend the work of His kingdom was a parabolic recognition that as the Jews were officially rejecting Him, so He was rejecting them as agents for the work of the kingdom. It is impossible to speak with any certainty as to any of these suggestions. It is to be noted that there is the same confusion between the numbers seventy and seventy-two in all four instances, as also in the tradition as to the number of translators of the Septuagint.  Inasmuch as no further mention is made of these workers, it is to be understood that they were appointed for a temporary ministry. Tradition names several of them and identifies them with disciples active after Pentecost. While it is probable that some of these were witnesses later, the tradition is worthless in details. The mission of these and the reason assigned for their appointment are essentially the same as in the case of the Twelve. Jesus is now completing His last popular campaign in preaching and introducing the kingdom of heaven. The employing of these in this service is in line with the permanent ideal of Christianity, which makes no distinction between the "laymen" and the "clergy" in responsibility and service. Jesus was perhaps employing all whose experience and sympathy made them fit for work in the harvest that was so plenteous while the laborers were few. He found seventy such now as He would find a hundred and twenty such after His ascension ( Acts 1:15 ).  William Owen Carver
HUSHAH|     hu'-sha (chushah, "haste"): Mentioned in  1 Chronicles 4:4  as probably an individual, a Judahite, or a family name; but may possibly be a place.
ENGEDI|Fountain of the kid, place in the wilderness of Judah ( Joshua 15:62 ), on the western shore of the Dead Sea ( Ezek. 47:10 ), and nearly equidistant from both extremities. To the wilderness near this town David fled for fear of Saul ( Joshua 15:62 ;  1 Samuel 23:29 ). It was at first called Hazezon-tamar ( Genesis 14:7 ), a city of the Amorites. The vineyards of Engedi were celebrated in Solomon's time (Cant. 1:4). It is the modern `Ain Jidy. The "fountain" from which it derives its name rises on the mountain side about 600 feet above the sea, and in its rapid descent spreads luxuriance all around it. Along its banks the osher grows abundantly. That shrub is thus described by Porter: "The stem is stout, measuring sometimes nearly a foot in diameter, and the plant grows to the height of 15 feet or more. It has a grayish bark and long oval leaves, which when broken off discharge a milky fluid. The fruit resembles an apple, and hangs in clusters of two or three. When ripe it is of a rich yellow colour, but on being pressed it explodes like a puff-ball. It is chiefly filled with air...This is the so-called `apple of Sodom.'" Through Samaria, etc. (see  APPLE .) 
BASHAN|Bashan, Hill of: ( Psalm 68:15 ), probably another name for Hermon, which lies to the north of Bashan.  Light soil, first mentioned in  Genesis 14:5 , where it is said that Chedorlaomer and his confederates "smote the Rephaim in Ashteroth," where Og the king of Bashan had his residence. At the time of Israel's entrance into the Promised Land, Og came out against them, but was utterly routed ( Numbers 21:33 -35;  Deuteronomy 3:1 -7). This country extended from Gilead in the south to Hermon in the north, and from the Jordan on the west to Salcah on the east. Along with the half of Gilead it was given to the half-tribe of Manasseh ( Joshua 13:29 -31). Golan, one of its cities, became a "city of refuge" ( Joshua 21:27 ). Argob, in Bashan, was one of Solomon's commissariat districts ( 1 Kings 4:13 ). The cities of Bashan were taken by Hazael ( 2 Kings 10:33 ), but were soon after reconquered by Jehoash ( 2 Kings 13:25 ), who overcame the Syrians in three battles, according to the word of Elisha (19). From this time Bashan almost disappears from history, although we read of the wild cattle of its rich pastures ( Ezek. 39:18 ;  Psalm 22:12 ), the oaks of its forests ( Isaiah 2:13 ;  Ezek. 27:6 ;  Zechariah 11:2 ), and the beauty of its extensive plains ( Amos 4:1 ;  Jeremiah 50:19 ). Soon after the conquest, the name "Gilead" was given to the whole country beyond Jordan. After the Exile, Bashan was divided into four districts,  (1.) Gaulonitis, or Jaulan, the most western;  (2.) Auranitis, the Hauran ( Ezek. 47:16 );  (3.) Argob or Trachonitis, now the Lejah; and  (4.) Batanaea, now Ard-el-Bathanyeh, on the east of the Lejah, with many deserted towns almost as perfect as when they were inhabited. (see  HAURAN .) 
GEDERATHITE|An epithet applied to Josabad, one of David's warriors at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:4 ), a native of Gederah. 
GASHMU|     gash'-mu, gash'-moo (gashmu):  A form of the name GESHEM (which see), found in  Nehemiah 6:6  (compare  Nehemiah 6:1 ), "And Gashmu saith it." According to BDB the same termination -u is found in Nabatean proper names.
PILLARS|   EARTH,  OF THE  See  ASTRONOMY, sec . III, 2.  PILLARS OF THE EARTH  See  ASTRONOMY, sec . III, 2.
BEDEIAH|     be-de'-ya (bedheydh, "servant of Yah"): A son of Bani who had married a "strange wife" ( Ezra 10:35 ).
JOASH|Whom Jehovah bestowed.  (1.) A contracted form of Jehoash, the father of Gideon ( Judges 6:11 ,  29;  8:13 ,  29,  32). (2.) One of the Benjamite archers who joined David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:3 ). (3.) One of King Ahab's sons ( 1 Kings 22:26 ). (4.) King of Judah ( 2 Kings 11:2 ;  12:19 ,  20). (see  JEHOASH  .) (5.) King of Israel ( 2 Kings 13:9 ,  12,  13,  25). (see  JEHOASH  .) (6.)  1 Chronicles 7:8 . (7.) One who had charge of the royal stores of oil under David and Solomon ( 1 Chronicles 27:28 ). 
WEEDS|     wedz (cuph, "a weed" ( Jonah 2:5 )).  See  FLAG ;  COCKLE ; RED SEA.
JANIM|     ja'-nim (yanim; the King James Version Janum): A place in the Hebron uplands named with Eshan and Beth-tappuah ( Joshua 15:53 ); unidentified.
JAMINITES|     ja'-min-its (ha-yamini, coll. with article): In  Numbers 26:12 , descendants of Jamin ((1) above).
HULDAH|Weasel, a prophetess; the wife of Shallum. She was consulted regarding the "book of the law" discovered by the high priest Hilkiah ( 2 Kings 22:14 -20;  2 Chronicles 34:22 -28). She resided in that part of Jerusalem called the Mishneh (A.V.,  "the college;" R.V.,  "the second quarter"), supposed by some to be the suburb between the inner and the outer wall, the second or lower city, Akra. Miriam ( Exodus 15:20 ) and Deborah ( Judges 4:4 ) are the only others who bear the title of "prophetess," for the word in  Isaiah 8:3  means only the prophet's wife. 
JAAKAN|He twists, one of the sons of Ezer, the son of Seir the Horite ( 1 Chronicles 1:42 ). 
TILON|     ti'-lon (tilon; Kethibh, Qere; Codex Vaticanus Inon; Codex Alexandrinus Thilan; Lucian Tholeim: A son of Shimon ( 1 Chronicles 4:20 ).
PINS|   CRISPING   kris'-ping: Pins for crisping, or curling, the hair. Thus the King James Version renders Hebrew chariTim ( Isaiah 3:22 ; compare Vulgate). the Revised Version (British and American) substitutes more correctly "satchels" (so Qimchi (compare  2 Kings 5:23 ); compare Arabic). Others think of girdles; still others of veils or head-bands.
PHILISTIA|=Palestine (q.v.), "the land of the Philistines" ( Psalm 60:8 ;  87:4 ;  108:9 ). The word is supposed to mean "the land o
ELKANAH|God-created.  (1.) The second son of Korah ( Exodus 6:24 ), or, according to  1 Chronicles 6:22 , 23, more correctly his grandson. (2.) Another Levite of the line of Heman the singer, although he does not seem to have performed any of the usual Levitical offices. He was father of Samuel the prophet ( 1 Chronicles 6:27 ,  34). He was "an Ephrathite" ( 1 Samuel 1:1 ,  4,  8), but lived at Ramah, a man of wealth and high position. He had two wives, Hannah, who was the mother of Samuel, and Peninnah. 
ELASAH|God made.  (1.) One of the descendants of Judah, of the family of Hezron ( 1 Chronicles 2:39 ,  "Eleasah"). (2.) A descendant of king Saul ( 1 Chronicles 8:37 ;  9:43 ). (3.) The son of Shaphan, one of the two who were sent by Zedekiah to Nebuchadnezzar, and also took charge of Jeremiah's letter to the captives in Babylon ( Jeremiah 29:3 ). 
REELAIAH|     re-el-a'-ya, re-el-i'-a (re`elyah): One of the 12 chiefs who returned with Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:2  parallel  Nehemiah 7:7 ). In the passage in Ne the name is Raamiah" (ra`amyah), and in 1 Esdras 5:8 "Resaias." Which is the original, it is almost impossible to decide; "Reelaiah" seems preferable.
PUNITES|     pu'-nits (puni, probably "dark"): Descendants of Puvah, of the tribe of Issachar ( Numbers 26:23 ; compare  Genesis 46:13   Judges 10:1   1 Chronicles 7:1 ).
DISHON|   DISHAN;   di'-shan, di'-shon (dishan, dishon, "antelope," "pygarg"): A Horite clan, mentioned as the youngest "son" and elsewhere as the "grandson" of Seir. The form Dishon occurs several times in the list of Horite clans, together with many other totem names ( Genesis 36  passim;  1 Chronicles 1:38, 41 ). See  Gray, HPN, 89 .
HANAN|Merciful.  (1.) A Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 8:23 ).  (2.) One of David's heroes ( 1 Chronicles 11:43 ).  (3.)  Jeremiah 35:4 .  (4.) A descendant of Saul ( 1 Chronicles 8:38 ).  (5.) One of the Nethinim ( Ezra 2:46 ).  (6.) One of the Levites who assisted Ezra ( Nehemiah 8:7 ).  (7.) One of the chiefs who subscribed the covenant ( Nehemiah 10:22 ). 
FEEBLEMINDED|   FEEBLE-MINDED  fe'-b'-l-min'-ded (oligopsuchos): Only in  1 Thessalonians 5:14  the King James Version, in the sense of "fainthearted," as in the Revised Version (British and American). In Septuagint it is used as the equivalent of koshel, the tottering or feeble-kneed in  Isaiah 35:3 ;  Isaiah 54:6 ; oligopsuchia occurs in Septuagint twice ( Exodus 6:9   Psalm 54:7 ), for "anguish of spirit" and "trouble." The term refers to weakness of will and vacillation of purpose rather than to idiocy or morbid imbecility.
PHILISTIM|     fi-lis'-tim, fil'-is-tim (pelishtim ( Genesis 10:14 , the King James Version)).  See  PHILISTINES .
MIDDIN|Measures, one of the six cities "in the wilderness," on the west of the Dead Sea, mentioned along with En-gedi ( Joshua 15:61 ). 
BARUCH|Blessed.  (1.) The secretary of the prophet Jeremiah ( 32:12 ;  36:4 ). He was of the tribe of Judah ( 51:59 ). To him Jeremiah dictated his prophecies regarding the invasion of the Babylonians and the Captivity. These he read to the people from a window in the temple in the fourth year of the reign of Jehoiakim, king of Judah ( Jeremiah 36 ). He afterwards read them before the counsellors of the king at a private interview; and then to the king himself, who, after hearing a part of the roll, cut it with a penknife, and threw it into the fire of his winter parlour, where he was sitting. During the siege of Jerusalem by Nebuchadnezzar, he was the keeper of the deed of purchase Jeremiah had made of the territory of Hanameel ( Jeremiah 32:12 ). Being accused by his enemies of favouring the Chaldeans, he was cast, with Jeremiah, into prison, where he remained till the capture of Jerusalem (B.C. 586). He probably died in Babylon. (2.)  Nehemiah 3:20 ;  10:6 ;  11:5 . 
ISHMAEL|God hears.  (1.) Abraham's eldest son, by Hagar the concubine ( Genesis 16:15 ;  17:23 ). He was born at Mamre, when Abraham was eighty-six years of age, eleven years after his arrival in Canaan ( 16:3 ;  21:5 ). At the age of thirteen he was circumcised ( 17:25 ). He grew up a true child of the desert, wild and wayward. On the occasion of the weaning of Isaac his rude and wayward spirit broke out in expressions of insult and mockery ( 21:9 ,  10); and Sarah, discovering this, said to Abraham, "Expel this slave and her son." Influenced by a divine admonition, Abraham dismissed Hagar and her son with no more than a skin of water and some bread. The narrative describing this act is one of the most beautiful and touching incidents of patriarchal life ( Genesis 21:14 -16). (see  HAGAR .) Ishmael settled in the land of Paran, a region lying between Canaan and the mountains of Sinai; and "God was with him, and he became a great archer" ( Genesis 21:9 -21). He became a great desert chief, but of his history little is recorded. He was about ninety years of age when his father Abraham died, in connection with whose burial he once more for a moment reappears. On this occasion the two brothers met after being long separated. "Isaac with his hundreds of household slaves, Ishmael with his troops of wild retainers and half-savage allies, in all the state of a Bedouin prince, gathered before the cave of Machpelah, in the midst of the men of Heth, to pay the last duties to the `father of the faithful,' would make a notable subject for an artist" ( Genesis 25:9 ). Of the after events of his life but little is known. He died at the age of one hundred and thirty-seven years, but where and when are unknown ( 25:17 ). He had twelve sons, who became the founders of so many Arab tribes or colonies, the Ishmaelites, who spread over the wide desert spaces of Northern Arabia from the Red Sea to the Euphrates ( Genesis 37:25 ,  27,  28;  39:1 ), "their hand against every man, and every man's hand against them." (2.) The son of Nethaniah, "of the seed royal" ( Jeremiah 40:8 ,  15). He plotted against Gedaliah, and treacherously put him and others to death. He carried off many captives, "and departed to go over to the Ammonites." 
EUPHRATES|Hebrew, Perath; Assyrian, Purat; Persian cuneiform, Ufratush, whence Greek Euphrates, meaning "sweet water." The Assyrian name means "the stream," or "the great stream." It is generally called in the Bible simply "the river" ( Exodus 23:31 ), or "the great river" ( Deuteronomy 1:7 ). The Euphrates is first mentioned in  Genesis 2:14  as one of the rivers of Paradise. It is next mentioned in connection with the covenant which God entered into with Abraham ( 15:18 ), when he promised to his descendants the land from the river of Egypt to the river Euphrates (Comp.  Deuteronomy 11:24 ;  Joshua 1:4 ), a covenant promise afterwards fulfilled in the extended conquests of David ( 2 Samuel 8:2 -14;  1 Chronicles 18:3 ;  1 Kings 4:24 ). It was then the boundary of the kingdom to the north-east. In the ancient history of Assyria, and Babylon, and Egypt many events are recorded in which mention is made of the "great river." Just as the Nile represented in prophecy the power of Egypt, so the Euphrates represented the Assyrian power ( Isaiah 8:7 ;  Jeremiah 2:18 ). It is by far the largest and most important of all the rivers of Western Asia. From its source in the Armenian mountains to the Persian Gulf, into which it empties itself, it has a course of about 1,700 miles. It has two sources, (1) the Frat or Kara-su (i.e.,  "the black river"), which rises 25 miles north-east of Erzeroum; and (2) the Muradchai (i.e.,  "the river of desire"), which rises near Ararat, on the northern slope of Ala-tagh. At Kebban Maden, 400 miles from the source of the former, and 270 from that of the latter, they meet and form the majestic stream, which is at length joined by the Tigris at Koornah, after which it is called Shat-el-Arab, which runs in a deep and broad stream for above 140 miles to the sea. It is estimated that the alluvium brought down by these rivers encroaches on the sea at the rate of about one mile in thirty years. 
GIBEON|Hill-city, "one of the royal cities, greater than Ai, and all the men thereof were mighty" ( Joshua 10:2 ). Its inhabitants were Hivites ( 11:19 ). It lay within the territory of Benjamin, and became a priest-city ( 18:25 ;  21:17 ). Here the tabernacle was set up after the destruction of Nob, and here it remained many years till the temple was built by Solomon. It is represented by the modern el-Jib, to the south-west of Ai, and about 5 1/2 miles north-north-west of Jerusalem. A deputation of the Gibeonites, with their allies from three other cities ( Joshua 9 ;17), visited the camp at Gilgal, and by false representations induced Joshua to enter into a league with them, although the Israelites had been specially warned against any league with the inhabitants of Canaan ( Exodus 23:32 ;  34:12 ;  Numbers 33:55 ;  Deuteronomy 7:2 ). The deception practised on Joshua was detected three days later; but the oath rashly sworn "by Jehovah God of Israel" was kept, and the lives of the Gibeonites were spared. They were, however, made "bondmen" to the sanctuary ( Joshua 9:23 ). The most remarkable incident connected with this city was the victory Joshua gained over the kings of Palestine ( Joshua 10:16 -27). The battle here fought has been regarded as "one of the most important in the history of the world." The kings of southern Canaan entered into a confederacy against Gibeon (because it had entered into a league with Joshua) under the leadership of Adoni-zedec, king of Jerusalem, and marched upon Gibeon with the view of taking possession of it. The Gibeonites entreated Joshua to come to their aid with the utmost speed. His army came suddenly upon that of the Amorite kings as it lay encamped before the city. It was completely routed, and only broken remnants of their great host found refuge in the fenced cities. The five confederate kings who led the army were taken prisoners, and put to death at Makkedah (q.v.). This eventful battle of Beth-horon sealed the fate of all the cities of Southern Palestine. Among the Amarna tablets is a letter from Adoni-zedec (q.v.) to the king of Egypt, written probably at Makkedah after the defeat, showing that the kings contemplated flight into Egypt. This place is again brought into notice as the scene of a battle between the army of Ish-bosheth under Abner and that of David led by Joab. At the suggestion of Abner, to spare the effusion of blood twelve men on either side were chosen to decide the battle. The issue was unexpected; for each of the men slew his fellow, and thus they all perished. The two armies then engaged in battle, in which Abner and his host were routed and put to flight ( 2 Samuel 2:12 -17). This battle led to a virtual truce between Judah and Israel, Judah, under David, increasing in power; and Israel, under Ish-bosheth, continually losing ground. Soon after the death of Absalom and David's restoration to his throne his kingdom was visited by a grievous famine, which was found to be a punishment for Saul's violation ( 2 Samuel 21:2 ,  5) of the covenant with the Gibeonites ( Joshua 9:3 -27). The Gibeonites demanded blood for the wrong that had been done to them, and accordingly David gave up to them the two sons of Rizpah (q.v.) and the five sons of Michal, and these the Gibeonites took and hanged or crucified "in the hill before the Lord" ( 2 Samuel 21:9 ); and there the bodies hung for six months ( 21:10 ), and all the while Rizpah watched over the blackening corpses and "suffered neither the birds of the air to rest on them by day, nor the beasts of the field by night." David afterwards removed the bones of Saul and Jonathan at Jabeshgilead ( 21:12 ,  13). Here, "at the great stone," Amasa was put to death by Joab ( 2 Samuel 20:5 -10). To the altar of burnt-offering which was at Gibeon, Joab ( 1 Kings 2:28 -34), who had taken the side of Adonijah, fled for sanctuary in the beginning of Solomon's reign, and was there also slain by the hand of Benaiah. Soon after he came to the throne, Solomon paid a visit of state to Gibeon, there to offer sacrifices ( 1 Kings 3:4 ;  2 Chronicles 1:3 ). On this occasion the Lord appeared to him in a memorable dream, recorded in  1 Kings 3:5 -15;  2 Chronicles 1:7 -12. When the temple was built "all the men of Israel assembled themselves" to king Solomon, and brought up from Gibeon the tabernacle and "all the holy vessels that were in the tabernacle" to Jerusalem, where they remained till they were carried away by Nebuchadnezzar ( 2 Kings 24:13 ). 
MAHALI|     ma'-ha-li.  See  MAHLI .
EUNICE|Happily conquering, the mother of Timothy, a believing Jewess, but married to a Greek ( Acts 16:1 ). She trained her son from his childhood in the knowledge of the Scriptures ( 2 Timothy 3:15 ). She was distinguished by her "unfeigned faith." 
JANAI|     ja'-na-i, ja'-ni (ya`nay, "he answers"; as to whether final "y" is the third radical (letter), or may be taken as equivalent to the Divine name Yah, see HPN, 149-51): A chief of a family descended from Gad ( 1 Chronicles 5:12 , the King James Version "Jaanai").
ZAPHON|     za'-fon (tsaphon; Codex Vaticanus Saphan; Codex Alexandrinus Saphon): A city on the East of the Jordan in the territory of Gad ( Joshua 13:27 ). It is named again in  Judges 12:1  as the place where the elders of Gilead gathered to meet with Jephthah (tsaphonah should be translated "to Zaphon," not "northward"). It must have lain well to the North of Gad. According to the Talmud Amathus represented Zaphon (Neubauer, Geog. du Talmud, 249). Here sat one of the Synedria created by Gabinius (Ant., XIV, v, 4). It was a position of great strength (B J, I, iv, 2). Eusebius, Onomasticon places it 21 Roman miles S. of Pella. This is the modern Tell 'Amateh, on the south bank of Wady er-Rujeib, 15 miles South of Pella, and nearly 5 miles North of the Jabbok. Buhl (GAP, 259) objects to the identification that Tell 'Amateh corresponds to the Asophon of Josephus (Ant., XIII, xii, 5). But this objection does not seem well founded.  W. Ewing
MOSEROTH|Bonds, one of the stations in the wilderness ( Numbers 33:30 ,  31), probably the same as Mosera. 
MIRMAH|     mur'-ma (mirmah, "deceit"): A Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 8:10 ).
ZAVAN|     za'-van.  See  ZAAVAN .
MICAH|A shortened form of Micaiah, who is like Jehovah?  (1.) A man of Mount Ephraim, whose history so far is introduced in  Judges 17 , apparently for the purpose of leading to an account of the settlement of the tribe of Dan in Northern Palestine, and for the purpose also of illustrating the lawlessness of the times in which he lived ( Judges 18 ;  19:1 -29;  21:25 ). (2.) The son of Merib-baal (Mephibosheth),  1 Chronicles 8:34 , 35. (3.) The first in rank of the priests of the family of Kohathites ( 1 Chronicles 23:20 ). (4.) A descendant of Joel the Reubenite ( 1 Chronicles 5:5 ). (5.) "The Morasthite," so called to distinguish him from Micaiah, the son of Imlah ( 1 Kings 22:8 ). He was a prophet of Judah, a contemporary of Isaiah ( Micah 1:1 ), a native of Moresheth of Gath ( 1:14 ,  15). Very little is known of the circumstances of his life (Comp.  Jeremiah 26:18 ,  19).   Micah, Book of The sixth in order of the so-called minor prophets. The superscription to this book states that the prophet exercised his office in the reigns of Jotham, Ahaz, and Hezekiah. If we reckon from the beginning of Jotham's reign to the end of Hezekiah's (B.C. 759-698), then he ministered for about fifty-nine years; but if we reckon from the death of Jotham to the accession of Hezekiah (B.C. 743-726), his ministry lasted only sixteen years. It has been noticed as remarkable that this book commences with the last words of another prophet, "Micaiah the son of Imlah" ( 1 Kings 22:28 ): "Hearken, O people, every one of you." The book consists of three sections, each commencing with a rebuke, "Hear ye," etc., and closing with a promise, (1) ch. 1; 2; (2) ch. 3-5, especially addressed to the princes and heads of the people; (3) ch. 6-7, in which Jehovah is represented as holding a controversy with his people: the whole concluding with a song of triumph at the great deliverance which the Lord will achieve for his people. The closing verse is quoted in the song of Zacharias ( Luke 1:72 ,  73). The prediction regarding the place "where Christ should be born," one of the most remarkable Messianic prophecies ( Micah 5:2 ), is quoted in  Matthew 2:6 . There are the following references to this book in the New Testament: 5:2, with  Matthew 2:6 ;  John 7:42 . 7:6, with  Matthew 10:21 ,35,36. 7:20, with  Luke 1:72 ,73. 
JEUZ|     je'-uz ye`-uts "he counsels"): The eponym of a Benjamite family ( 1 Chronicles 8:10 ).
HOLIES|   HOLY OF   ho'-liz (qodhesh ha-qodhashim,  Exodus 26:33 , debhir,  1 Kings 6:16 , etc.; in the New Testament, hagia hagion,  Hebrews 9:3 ): The name given to the innermost shrine, or adytum of the sanctuary of Yahweh.  1. In the Tabernacle:  The most holy place of the tabernacle in the wilderness ( Exodus 26:31-33 ) was a small cube of 10 cubits (15 ft.) every way. It was divided from the holy Ceiled by curtains which bore cherubic figures embroidered in blue and purple and scarlet ( Exodus 26:1 ), it contained no furniture but the Ark of the Covenant, covered by a slab of gold called the MERCY-SEAT (which see), and having within it only the two stone tables of the Law (see TABERNACLE; ARK OF THE COVENANT). Only the high priest, and he but once a year, on the great clothed in penitential garments, amid a cloud of incense, and with blood of sacrifice ( Leviticus 16 ; compare  Hebrews 9:7 ).  2. In the Temple of Solomon:  The proportions of the most holy place in the first temple were the same as in the tabernacle, but the dimensions were doubled. The sacred chamber was enlarged to 20 cubits (30 ft.) each way. We now meet with the word debhir, "oracle" ( 1 Kings 6:16 , etc.), which with the exception of  Psalm 28:2 , belonging perhaps to the same age, is met with in Scripture only in the period of Solomon's reign. This sanctum, like its predecessor, contained but one piece of furniture-the Ark of the Covenant. It had, however, one new conspicuous feature in the two large figures of cherubim of olive wood, covered with gold, with wings stretching from wall to wall, beneath which the ark was now placed ( 1 Kings 6:23-28   2 Chronicles 3:10-13 ; see TEMPLE).  3. In Later Times:  In Ezekiel's temple plans, which in many things may have been those of the temple of Zerubbabel, the prophet gives 20 cubits as the length and breadth of the most holy place, showing that these figures were regarded as too sacred to undergo change ( Ezekiel 41:4 ). There was then no Ark of the Covenant, but Jewish tradition relates that the blood of the great Day of Atonement was sprinkled on an unhewn stone that stood in its place. In Herod's temple, the dimensions of the two holy chambers remained the same-at least in length and breadth (see TEMPLE, HEROD'S). The holiest place continued empty. In the spoils of the temple depicted on the Arch of Titus there is no representation of the Ark of the Covenant; only of the furniture of the outer chamber or holy place.  4. Figurative:  In the Epistle to the Hebrews we are taught that the true holy of holies is the heaven into which Jesus has now entered to appear in virtue of His own sacrifice in the presence of God for us ( Hebrews 9:11 ). Restriction is now removed, and the way into the holiest is made open for all His people ( Hebrews 10:19, 20 ).  W. Shaw Caldecott
LOAMMI|Not my people, a symbolical name given by God's command to Hosea's second son in token of Jehovah's rejection of his people ( Hosea 1:9 ,  10), his treatment of them as a foreign people. This Hebrew word is rendered by "not my people" in ver. 10; 2:23. 
HUPHAM|     hu'-fam (chupham, "coast-inhabitant"): One of Benjamin's sons and head of the Huphamite family ( Numbers 26:39 ).  See  HUPPIM .
GRAPES|   , WILD  (be'ushim,  Isaiah 5:2, 4 ): A word closely allied to bo'shah,  Job 31:40 , translated "cockle" (which see). It implies something noisome or worthless, but no particular fruit.  GRAPES  graps.  See  VINE .
JOANNA|Whom Jehovah has graciously given.  (1.) The grandson of Zerubbabel, in the lineage of Christ ( Luke 3:27 ); the same as Hananiah ( 1 Chronicles 3:19 ). (2.) The wife of Chuza, the steward of Herod Antipas, tetrarch of Galilee ( Luke 8:3 ). She was one of the women who ministered to our Lord, and to whom he appeared after his resurrection ( Luke 8:3 ;  24:10 ). 
ENROLMENT|     en-rol'-ment.  See  QUIRINIUS ;  TAX .
PERGAMUM|   PERGAMOS;   pur'-ga-mos, or pur'-ga-mum (he Pergamos, or to Pergamon):  1. History:  Pergamos, to which the ancient writers also gave the neuter form of the name, was a city of Mysia of the ancient Roman province of Asia, in the Caicus valley, 3 miles from the river, and about 15 miles from the sea. The Caicus was navigable for small native craft. Two of the tributaries of the Caicus were the Selinus and the Kteios. The former of these rivers flowed through the city; the latter ran along its walls. On the hill between these two streams the first city stood, and there also stood the acropolis, the chief temples, and theaters of the later city. The early people of the town were descendants of Greek colonists, and as early as 420 B.C. they struck coins of their own. Lysimachus, who possessed the town, deposited there 9,000 talents of gold. Upon his death, Philetaerus (283-263 B.C.) used this wealth to found the independent Greek dynasty of the Attalid kings. The first of this dynasty to bear the title of king was Attalus I (241-197 B.C.), a nephew of Philetaerus, and not only did he adorn the city with beautiful buildings until it became the most wonderful city of the East, but he added to his kingdom the countries of Mysia, Lydia, Caria, Pamphylia and Phrygia. Eumenes II (197-159 B.C.) was the most illustrious king of the dynasty, and during his reign the city reached its greatest height. Art and literature were encouraged, and in the city was a library of 200,000 volumes which later Antony gave to Cleopatra. The books were of parchment which was here first used; hence, the word "parchment," which is derived from the name of the town Pergamos. Of the structures which adorned the city, the most renowned was the altar of Zeus, which was 40 ft. in height, and also one of the wonders of the ancient world. When in 133 B.C. Attalus III, the last king of the dynasty, died, he gave his kingdom to the Roman government. His son, Aristonicus, however, attempted to seize it for himself, but in 129 he was defeated, and the Roman province of Asia was formed, and Pergamos was made its capital. The term Asia, as here employed, should not be confused with the continent of Asia, nor with Asia Minor. It applied simply to that part of Asia Minor which was then in the possession of the Romans, and formed into the province of which Pergamos was the capital. Upon the establishment of the province of Asia there began a new series of coins struck at Pergamos, which continued into the 3rd century A.D. The magnificence of the city continued.  2. Religions:  There were beautiful temples to the four great gods Zeus, Dionysus, Athena and Asklepios. To the temple of the latter, invalids from all parts of Asia flocked, and there, while they were sleeping in the court, the god revealed to the priests and physicians by means of dreams the remedies which were necessary to heal their maladies. Thus opportunities of deception were numerous. There was a school of medicine in connection with the temple. Pergamos was chiefly a religious center of the province. A title which it bore was "Thrice Neokoros," meaning that in the city 3 temples had been built to the Roman emperors, in which the emperors were worshipped as gods. Smyrna, a rival city, was a commercial center, and as it increased in wealth, it gradually became the political center. Later, when it became the capital, Pergamos remained the religious center. As in many of the towns of Asia Minor, there were at Pergamos many Jews, and in 130 B.C. the people of the city passed a decree in their favor. Many of the Jews were more or less assimilated with the Greeks, even to the extent of bearing Greek names.  3. Christianity:  Christianity reached Pergamos early, for there one of the Seven Churches of the Book of Re stood, and there, according to  Revelation 2:13 , Antipas was marryred; he was the first Christian to be put to death by the Roman state. The same passage speaks of Pergamos as the place "where Satan's throne is," probably referring to the temples in which the Roman emperors were worshipped. During the Byzantine times Pergamos still continued as a religious center, for there a bishop lived. However, the town fell into the hands of the Seljuks in 1304, and in 1336 it was taken by Suleiman, the son of Orkhan, and became Turkish.  The modern name of the town, which is of considerable size, possessing 15 mosques, is Bergama, the Turkish corruption of the ancient name. One of its mosques is the early Byzantine church of Sophia. The modern town is built among the ruins of the ancient city, but is far less in extent. From 1879 to 1886 excavations among the ruins were conducted by Herr Humann at the expense of the German government. Among them are still to be seen the base of the altar of Zeus, the friezes of which are now in the Pergamon Museum, Berlin; theater, the agora, the gymnasium and several temples. In ancient times the city was noted for its ointments, pottery and parchment; at present the chief articles of trade are cotton, wool, opium, valonia, and leather.  E. J. Banks
JABIN|Discerner; the wise.  (1.) A king of Hazor, at the time of the entrance of Israel into Canaan ( Joshua 11:1 -14), whose overthrow and that of the northern chief with whom he had entered into a confederacy against Joshua was the crowning act in the conquest of the land ( 11:21 -23; Comp.  14:6 -15). This great battle, fought at Lake Merom, was the last of Joshua's battles of which we have any record. Here for the first time the Israelites encountered the iron chariots and horses of the Canaanites. (2.) Another king of Hazor, called "the king of Canaan," who overpowered the Israelites of the north one hundred and sixty years after Joshua's death, and for twenty years held them in painful subjection. The whole population were paralyzed with fear, and gave way to hopeless despondency ( Judges 5:6 -11), till Deborah and Barak aroused the national spirit, and gathering together ten thousand men, gained a great and decisive victory over Jabin in the plain of Esdraelon ( Judges 4:10 -16; Comp.  Psalm 83:9 ). This was the first great victory Israel had gained since the days of Joshua. They never needed to fight another battle with the Canaanites ( Judges 5:31 ). 
DEGREES|Degrees, Song of Song of steps, a title given to each of these fifteen psalms, 120-134 inclusive. The probable origin of this name is the circumstance that these psalms came to be sung by the people on the ascents or goings up to Jerusalem to attend the three great festivals ( Deuteronomy 16:16 ). They were well fitted for being sung by the way from their peculiar form, and from the sentiments they express. "They are characterized by brevity, by a key-word, by epanaphora [i.e, repetition], and by their epigrammatic style...More than half of them are cheerful, and all of them hopeful." They are sometimes called "Pilgrim Songs." Four of them were written by David, one (127) by Solomon, and the rest are anonymous. 
JEBUS|Trodden hard, or fastness, or "the waterless hill", the name of the Canaanitish city which stood on Mount Zion ( Joshua 15:8 ;  18:16 ,  28). It is identified with Jerusalem (q.v.) in  Judges 19:10 , and with the castle or city of David ( 1 Chronicles 11:4 , 5). It was a place of great natural strength, and its capture was one of David's most brilliant achievements ( 2 Samuel 5:8 ). 
PAINFULNESS|     pan'-fool-nes (mochthos): In the summary of his missionary labors in  2 Corinthians 11:27  the King James Version, Paul uses this word. The Revised Version (British and American) renders it "travail," which probably now expresses its meaning more closely, as in modern usage "painfulness" is usually restricted to the condition of actual soreness or suffering, although we still use "painstaking" in the sense of careful labor. The Greek word is used for toil or excessive anxiety, as in Euripides (Medea, 126), where it refers to that care for her children which she had lost in her madness. Tyndale uses "painfulness" in 1  John 4:18  as the translation of kolasis, which the King James Version renders "torment" and the Revised Version (British and American) "punishment."  Alexander Macalister
OBOTH|Bottles, an encampment of the Israelites during the wanderings in the wilderness ( Numbers 33:43 ), the first after the setting up of the brazen serpent. 
HOZAI|     ho'-za-i (chozay, or as it stands at the close of the verse in question,  2 Chronicles 33:19 , chozay; Septuagint ton horonton; Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) "Hozai"; the King James Version the seers; the King James Version margin "Hosai"; the American Standard Revised Version "Hozia," the American Revised Version margin "the seers." Septuagint not improbably reads ha-chozim, as in  2 Chronicles 33:18 ; an easy error, since there we find we-dhibhere ha-chozim, "the words of the seers," and here dibhere chozay, "the words of Hozai." Kittel, following Budde, conjectures as the original reading chozayw, "his (Manasseh's) seers"): A historiographer of Manasseh, king of Judah. Thought by many of the Jews, incorrectly, to be the prophet Isaiah, who, as we learn from  2 Chronicles 26:22 , was historiographer of a preceding king, Uzziah. This "History of Hozai" has not come down to us. The prayer of Manasseh, mentioned in 33:12, 18 and included in this history, suggested the apocryphal book, "The Prayer of Manasses," written, probably, in the 1st century B.C.  See  APOCRYPHA .  J. Gray McAllister
EPHRAIN|     e'-fra-in ( 2 Chronicles 13:19 ), the Revised Version (British and American)  EPHRON, which see.
SECU|     se'-ku (sekhu; Codex Vaticanus en Sephei; Codex Alexandrinus en Sokcho; the King James Version Sechu): This name occurs only in the account of David's visit to Samuel ( 1 Samuel 19:22 ). Saul, we are told, went to "Ramah, and came to the great well that is in Secu," where he inquired after Samuel and David. It evidently lay between the residence of Saul at Gibeah and Ramah. It is impossible to come to any sure conclusion regarding it. Conder suggested its identification with Khirbet Suweikeh, which lies to the South of Bireh. This is possible, but perhaps we should read with the Septuagint's Codex Vaticanus, "He came to the cistern of the threshing-floor that is on the bare hill" (en to Sephei). The threshing-floors in the East are naturally on high exposed ground where this is possible, and often form part of the area whence water in the rainy season is conducted to cisterns. This might have been a place actually within the city of Ramah.  W. Ewing
OMENS|     o'-menz.  See  AUGURY ;  DIVINATION .
TOU|     to'-oo (to`u; Codex Vaticanus Thoa; Codex Alexandrinus Thoou): King of Hamath. As an enemy of Hadarezer, after David's victory over the latter, he sent David a message of congratulation ( 1 Chronicles 18:9 f ). In  2 Samuel 8:9  spelled "Toi."
RABMAG|Assyrian Rab-mugi, "chief physician," "who was attached to the king ( Jeremiah 39:3 ,  13), the title of one of Sennacherib's officers sent with messages to Hezekiah and the people of Jerusalem ( 2 Kings 18:17 - 19:13 ;  Isaiah 36:12 - 37:13 ) demanding the surrender of the city. He was accompanied by a "great army;" but his mission was unsuccessful. 
KENAZ|Hunter.  (1.) One of the sons of Eliphaz, the son of Esau. He became the chief of an Edomitish tribe ( Genesis 36:11 ,  15,  42). (2.) Caleb's younger brother, and father of Othniel ( Joshua 15:17 ), whose family was of importance in Israel down to the time of David ( 1 Chronicles 27:15 ). Some think that Othniel ( Judges 1:13 ), and not Kenaz, was Caleb's brother. (3.) Caleb's grandson ( 1 Chronicles 4:15 ). 
HEPHZIBAH|My delight is in her.  (1.) The wife of Hezekiah and mother of king Manasseh ( 2 Kings 21:1 ). (2.) A symbolical name of Zion, as representing the Lord's favour toward her ( Isaiah 62:4 ). 
BEZAI|     be'-za-i (betsay, "shining"(?)):  (1) A chief who with Nehemiah sealed the covenant ( Nehemiah 10:18 ).  (2) The descendants of Bezai returned with Zerubbabel to Jerusalem (323,  Ezra 2:17 ; 324,  Nehemiah 7:23  = Bassai, 1 Esdras 5:16).
BETHAVEN|House of nothingness; i.e., "of idols", a place in the mountains of Benjamin, east of Bethel ( Joshua 7:2 ;  18:12 ;  1 Samuel 13:5 ). In  Hosea 4:15 ;  5:8 ;  10:5  it stands for "Bethel" (q.v.), and it is so called because it was no longer the "house of God," but "the house of idols," referring to the calves there worshipped. 
PARCHMENTS|     parch'-ments (membranai, "membranes," "parchments," "vellum"): The skins, chiefly of sheep, lambs, goats and calves, prepared so as to be used for writing on ( 2 Timothy 4:13 ).  In Greek and Roman times parchment was much employed as a writing material. "At Rome, in the 1st century B.C., and the 1st and 2d centuries A.D., there is evidence of the use of vellum, but only for notebooks and for rough drafts or inferior copies of literary works..... A fragment of a vellum MS, which may belong to this period, is preserved in British Museum Add. manuscript 34, 473, consisting of two leaves of Demosthenes, De Fals. Leg., in a small hand, which pears to be of the 2nd cent." (F. G. Kenyon in HDB, IV, 947).  Paul directs Timothy that, when he comes from Ephesus to Rome, he is to bring "the books, especially the parchments." These, as well as the "cloak," which is also mentioned, had evidently been "left at Troas with Carpus." What were these parchments? They are distinguished from "the books," which were probably a few choice volumes or rolls, some portions of the Scriptures of the Old Testament, some volumes of the Law of Moses or of the Prophets or of the Psalms. Among "the books" there might also be Jewish exegetical works, or heathen writings, with which, as is made evident by references in his Epistles, Paul was well acquainted.  The parchments were different from these, and were perhaps notebooks, in which the apostle had, from time to time, written what he had observed and wished to preserve as specially worthy of remembrance, facts which he had gathered in his study of the Old Testament or of other books. These notes may have been the result of many years' reading and study, and he wished Timothy to bring them to him.  Various conjectures have been made in regard to the contents of "the parchments." It has been suggested by Kenyon (HDB, III, 673) that they contained the Old Testament in Greek; by Farrar, that the parchments were a diploma of Paul's Roman citizenship; by Bull, that they were his commonplace books; by Latham, that the parchments were a copy of the Grundschrift of the Gospels, a volume containing the all-important narrative of the Saviour's life and cross and resurrection. Workman (Persecution in the Early Church, 39) writes: "By tas membranas I understand the proofs of his citizenship."  Whatever their contents may have been, they were of such value that Paul wished to have them with him in his prison at Rome, so that, if life were spared for even a few weeks or months, the books and parchments might be at hand for reference. Perhaps in the fact that the books and the parchments and the cloak had been left at Troas with Carpus, there may be a hint that his final arrest by the Roman authorities took place at that city, and that was the suddenness of his arrest that caused him to be unable to carry his books and parchments and the cloak with him. "The police had not even allowed him time to find his overcoat or necessary documents" (Workman, op. cit., 39; see p. 1886, 14).  Be this as it may, he desired to have them now. His well-disciplined mind, even in the near prospect of death by public execution, could find the most joyous labor in the work of the gospel, wherever his influence reached, and could also find relaxation among "the books, especially the parchments."  John Rutherfurd
LAEL|     la'-el (la'el, "belonging to God"): Father of Eliasaph, the prince of the father's house of the Gershonites ( Numbers 3:24 ).
URBANUS|     ur-ba'-nus (Ourbanos; the King James Version Urbane): A common slave name. Gifford says that it is found "as here, in juxtaposition with Ampliatus, in a list of imperial freedmen, on an inscription, 115 A.D." He was a member of the Christian community at Rome to whom Paul sent greetings. Paul calls him "our fellow-worker in Christ" ( Romans 16:9 ). "The `our' (as opposed to `my,'  Romans 16:3 ) seems to suggest that all Christian workers had a common helper in Urbanus" (Denney).
TAPHATH|     ta'-fath (taphath): Daughter of Solomon and wife of Ben-abinadab ( 1 Kings 4:11 ).
NAHSHON|Sorcerer, the son of Aminadab, and prince of the children of Judah at the time of the first numbering of the tribes in the wilderness ( Exodus 6:23 ). His sister Elisheba was the wife of Aaron. He died in the wilderness ( Numbers 26:64 ,  65). His name occurs in the Greek form Naasson in the genealogy of Christ (Matt,   1:4 ;  Luke 3:32 ). 
HILKIAH|Portion of Jehovah.  (1.)  1 Chronicles 6:54 .  (2.)  1 Chronicles 26:11 .  (3.) The father of Eliakim ( 2 Kings 18:18 ,  26,  37).  (4.) The father of Gemariah ( Jeremiah 29:3 ).  (5.) The father of the prophet Jeremiah ( 1:1 ). (6.) The high priest in the reign of Josiah ( 1 Chronicles 6:13 ;  Ezra 7:1 ). To him and his deputy ( 2 Kings 23:5 ), along with the ordinary priests and the Levites who had charge of the gates, was entrusted the purification of the temple in Jerusalem. While this was in progress, he discovered in some hidden corner of the building a book called the "book of the law" ( 2 Kings 22:8 ) and the "book of the covenant" ( 23:2 ). Some have supposed that this "book" was nothing else than the original autograph copy of the Pentateuch written by Moses ( Deuteronomy 31:9 -26). This remarkable discovery occurred in the eighteenth year of Josiah's reign (B.C. 624), a discovery which permanently affected the whole subsequent history of Israel. (see  JOSIAH ; SHAPHAN.) (7.)  Nehemiah 12:7 .  (8.)  Nehemiah 8:4 . 
EGLAIM|Two ponds, ( Isaiah 15:8 ), probably En-eglaim of  Ezek. 47:10 . 
PENINNAH|     pe-nin'-a (peninnah, "coral," "pearl"): Second wife of Elkanah, father of Samuel ( 1 Samuel 1:2, 4 ).
HIDDAI|Rejoicing of Jehovah, one of David's thirty-seven guards ( 2 Samuel 23:30 ). 
REPHAN|     re'-fan: A name for Chiun, the planet Saturn.  See  ASTROLOGY, 7 ;  CHIUN .
MAGBISH|     mag'-bish (maghbish; Septuagint: Codex Vaticanus Magebos; Codex Alexandrinus Maabeis): A town in Benjamin, 156 of the inhabitants of which are said to have returned from exile with Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:30 ). It does not appear in Nehemiah's list ( Nehemiah 7:33 ). Septuagint (Codex Vaticanus), however, has Magebos. The name is probably identical with Magpiash, "one who sealed the covenant" ( Nehemiah 10:20 ).
JAROAH|     ja-ro'-a (yaroach, meaning unknown): A Gadite chief ( 1 Chronicles 5:14 ). But the text is doubtful; see Curtis, Chronicles, 124.
ORNAN|1 Chronicles 21:15. (see  ARAUNAH .) 
ELIM|Trees, ( Exodus 15:27 ;  Numbers 33:9 ), the name of the second station where the Israelites encamped after crossing the Red Sea. It had "twelve wells of water and threescore and ten palm trees." It has been identified with the Wady Ghurundel, the most noted of the four wadies which descend from the range of et-Tih towards the sea. Here they probably remained some considerable time. The form of expression in  Exodus 16:1  seems to imply that the people proceeded in detachments or companies from Elim, and only for the first time were assembled as a complete host when they reached the wilderness of Sin (q.v.). 
SHELESH|     she'-lesh (shelesh; Codex Vaticanus Seme; Codex Alexandrinus Selles, Lucian, Selem): An Asherite, son of Helem ( 1 Chronicles 7:35 ).
TOI|A king of Hamath, who sent "Joram his son unto King David to salute him," when he "heard that David had smitten all the host of Hadadezer" ( 2 Samuel 8:9 ,  10). Called Tou ( 1 Chronicles 18:9 ,  10). 
ISHPAN|     ish'-pan (yishpan, literally, "he will hide"): Descendant of Benjamin, son of Shashak, one of "the chief men, heads of fathers' houses"; lived at Jerusalem ( 1 Chronicles 8:22 ).
ZELA|   , ZELAH  ze'-la (tsela` ( 2 Samuel 21:14 )): A city in the territory of Benjamin ( Joshua 18:28 ; the Septuagint here omits). Here was the burying-place of the family of Saul, whither the bones of the king and of Jonathan were brought for burial ( 2 Samuel 21:14 ; the Septuagint here reads en te pleura, translating tsela`, "side"). The place is not identified. It may be the Zilu of the Tell el-Amarna Letters.
SHALMAN|An Assyrian king ( Hosea 10:14 ), identified with Shalmaneser II. (Sayce) or IV. (Lenormant), the successor of Pul on the throne of Assyria (B.C. 728). He made war against Hoshea, the king of Israel, whom he subdued and compelled to pay an annual tribute. Hoshea, however, soon after rebelled against his Assyrian conquerer. Shalmaneser again marched against Samaria, which, after a siege of three years, was taken ( 2 Kings 17:3 -5;  18:9 ) by Sargon (q.v.). A revolution meantime had broken out in Assyria, and Shalmaneser was deposed. Sargon usurped the vacant throne. Schrader thinks that this is probably the name of a king of Moab mentioned on an inscription of Tiglath-pileser as Salamanu. 
HAMUL|Spared, one of the sons of Pharez, son of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:5 ). His descendants are called Hamulites ( Numbers 26:21 ). 
HYMENAEUS|     hi-men-e'-us (Humenaios, so named from Hymen, the god of marriage,  1 Timothy 1:20   2 Timothy 2:17 ): A heretical teacher in Ephesus, an opponent of the apostle Paul, who in the former reference associates him with Alexander (see ALEXANDER), and in the latter, with Philetus (see PHILETUS).  1. His Career:  It is worthy of notice that in both passages where these persons are mentioned, the name of Hymeneus occurs first, showing, perhaps, that he was the leader. In the passage in 1Ti Hymeneus is included in the "some" who had put away faith and a good conscience and who had made shipwreck concerning faith. The apostle adds that he had delivered Hymeneus and Alexander unto Satan, that they might learn not to blaspheme.  2. His Denial of the Resurrection:  In the passage in 2 Tim, Hymeneus and Philetus are included among persons whose profane and vain babblings will increase unto more ungodliness, and whose word "will eat as doth a gangrene." The apostle declares that Hymeneus and Philetus rection are of the number of such people as those just described, and he adds that those two persons "concerning the truth have erred, saying that the resurrection is past already, and overthrow the faith of some." Then, for the guidance of Timothy, he goes on to say the seal upon the foundation of God is, "The Lord knoweth them that are his: and, Let every one that nameth the name of the Lord depart from unrighteousness." The inference intended is, that though Hymeneus and Philetus had named the name of Christ, they did not depart from iniquity. There is no doubt in regard to the identity of this Hymeneus with the person of the same name in 1 Tim. Accordingly, the facts mentioned in the two epistles must be placed together, namely, that though he had made a Christian profession by naming the name of Christ, yet he had not departed from iniquity, but by his profane teaching he proceeded unto more ungodliness, and that he had put away faith and a good conscience and had made shipwreck of faith.  The error, therefore, of Hymeneus and his two companions would amount to this: They taught that "the resurrection is past already," that there shall be no bodily resurrection at all, but that all that resurrection means is that the soul awakes from sin. This awakening from sin had already taken place with themselves, so they held, and therefore there could be no day in the future when the dead shall hear the voice of the Son of God and shall come forth from the grave ( John 5:28 ).  3. Incipient Gnosticism:  This teaching of Hymeneus had been so far successful: it had "overthrown the faith of some" ( 2 Timothy 2:18 ). It is impossible to define exactly the full nature of this heresy, but what Paul says regarding it makes evident that it was a form of incipient Gnosticism. This spiritualizing of the resurrection sprang from the idea of the necessarily evil nature of all material substance. This idea immediately led to the conclusion of the essentially evil nature of the human body, and that if man is to rise to his true nature, he must rid himself of the thralldom, not of sin, but of the body. This contempt for the body led to the denial of the resurrection in its literal sense; and all that Christ had taught on the subject was explained only, in an allegorical sense, of the resurrection of the soul from sin.  4. Overthrows Faith:  Teaching of this kind is described by Paul as having effects similar to the "eating" caused by a gangrene. It is deadly; it overthrows Christian faith. If not destroyed, it would corrupt the community, for if there is no literal resurrection of the dead, then, as Paul shows in  1 Corinthians 15 , Christ is not raised; and if the literal resurrection of Christ is denied, Christian believers are yet in their sins, and the Christian religion is false.  5. Delivered unto Satan:  The way in which the apostle dealt with these teachers, Hymeneus and his companions, was not merely in the renewed assertion of the truth which they denied, but also by passing sentence upon these teachers-"whom I delivered unto Satan, that they might be taught not to blaspheme." In regard to the meaning of this sentence much difficulty of interpretation exists. Some understand it to mean simple excommunication from the church. But this seems quite inadequate to exhaust the meaning of the words employed by Paul. Others take it to signify the infliction of some bodily suffering or disease. This also is quite insufficient as an explanation. It seems that a person who was delivered unto Satan was cut off from all Christian privileges, he was "put away" from the body of Christian believers, and handed over to "the Satan," the Evil One in his most distinct personality ( 1 Corinthians 5:2, 5, 13 ). Compare the cases of Ananias and Sapphira ( Acts 5 ), and of Elymas ( Acts 13:11 ).  It is important that the purpose of this terrible sentence should not be overlooked. The intention of the punishment was distinctly remedial. Both in the case of Hymenacus and Alexander, and in that of the person dealt with in  1 Corinthians 5 , the intention was the attaining of an ultimate good. In 1 Corinthians it is "for the destruction of the flesh, that the spirit may be saved in the day of the Lord Jesus." Similarly, Hymeneus and Alexander are delivered unto Satan, not for their final perdition, but that they may be taught, through this terrible discipline-for such is the signification of the word which is translated "taught"-not to blaspheme. The purpose of this discipline, that they might learn not to blaspheme, shows the dreadful length of impiety and of railing at Christian truth to which Hymeneus had gone.  6. The "Perverse Things" at Ephesus:  In the history of Hymeneus and his companions, and in their bold and anti-Christian teaching which had overthrown the faith of some, we cannot fail to see the fulfillment of what Paul had said many years previously, in his farewell address to the elders of the church in Ephesus: "I know that after my departing grievous wolves shall enter in among you, not sparing the flock; and from among your own selves shall men arise, speaking perverse things, to draw away the disciples after them" ( Acts 20:29 f ). It was in the Ephesian church that Hymeneus and Alexander and Philetus had arisen. The gangrene-like nature of their teaching has already been described.  John Rutherfurd
GAASH|A shaking, a hill, on the north side of which Joshua was buried ( Joshua 24:30 ;  Judges 2:9 ), in the territory of Ephraim. (see  TIMNATH -SERAH.) 
JEHOAHAZ|Jehovah his sustainer, or he whom Jehovah holdeth.  (1.) The youngest son of Jehoram, king of Judah ( 2 Chronicles 21:17 ;  22:1 ,  6,  8,  9); usually Ahaziah (q.v.). (2.) The son and successor of Jehu, king of Israel ( 2 Kings 10:35 ). He reigned seventeen years, and followed the evil ways of the house of Jeroboam. The Syrians, under Hazael and Benhadad, prevailed over him, but were at length driven out of the land by his son Jehoash ( 13:1 -9,  25). (3.) Josiah's third son, usually called Shallum ( 1 Chronicles 3:15 ). He succeeded his father on the throne, and reigned over Judah for three months ( 2 Kings 23:31 ,  34). He fell into the idolatrous ways of his predecessors ( 23:32 ), was deposed by Pharaoh-Necho from the throne, and carried away prisoner into Egypt, where he died in captivity ( 23:33 ,  34;  Jeremiah 22:10 -12;  2 Chronicles 36:1 -4). 
OHOLIBAMAH|     o-hol-i-ba'-ma, o-hol-i-ba'-ma ('oholibhamah, "tent of the high place"):  (1) One of Esau's wives, and a daughter of Anah the Hivite ( Genesis 36:2, 5 ). It is strange that she is not named along with Esau's other wives in either  Genesis 28:9  or 26:30. Various explanations have been given, but none of them is satisfactory. There is probably some error in the text.  (2) An Edomite chief ( Genesis 36:41   1 Chronicles 1:52 ).
ENHAZOR|   EN-HAZOR  en-ha'-zor (`en chatsor; pege Asor):  A city in the territory of Naphtali mentioned along with Kedesh, Edrei and Iron ( Joshua 19:37 ). The ancient name probably survives in that of Hazireh, on the slopes West of Kedesh. "En" however points to a fountain. and no fountain has been found here.
SHEBAT|     she-bat' (shebhat): The 11th month of the Jewish year ( Zechariah 1:7 ), corresponding to February.  See  CALENDAR .
HODIAH|   ; HODIJAH  ho-di'-a, ho-di'-ja (hodhiyah, "splendor of Yah"):  (1) A brother-in-law of Naham ( 1 Chronicles 4:19 ), and possibly for that reason reckoned a member of the tribe of Judah. the King James Version translate "his wife" is wrong.  (2) One of the Levites who explained to the people the Law as read by Ezra ( Nehemiah 8:7 ) and led their prayers ( Nehemiah 9:5 ). He is doubtless one of the two Levites of this name who sealed the covenant of Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 10:10, 13 ).  (3) One of the chiefs of the people who sealed the covenant of Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 10:18 ). J. Gray Mcallister
PADON|     pa'-don (padhon, "redemption"): One of the Nethinim (see NETHINIM) who returned with Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:44   Nehemiah 7:47 ); the "Phaleas" of 1 Esdras 5:29 (margin "Padon").
PAGIEL|God allots, a prince of the tribe of Asher ( Numbers 1:13 ), in the wilderness. 
ELNAAM|     el-na'-am ('elna`am, "God is delightfulness"; compare Phoenician "Gadnaam"):  According to Massoretic Text the father of two of David's warriors ( 1 Chronicles 11:46 ); according to Septuagint himself one of the warriors.
JEHUEL|     je-hu'-el (Kethibh yechu'el; but Qere yechi'-el, i.e. "Jehiel" the King James Version, in  2 Chronicles 29:14 ): A Levite.  See  JEHIEL, (5) .
TROPHIMUS|A foster-child, an Ephesian who accompanied Paul during a part of his third missionary journey ( Acts 20:4 ;  21:29 ). He was with Paul in Jerusalem, and the Jews, supposing that the apostle had brought him with him into the temple, raised a tumult which resulted in Paul's imprisonment. (see  TEMPLE ,  HEROD'S.) In writing to Timothy, the apostle says, "Trophimus have I left at Miletum sick" ( 2 Timothy 4:20 ). This must refer to some event not noticed in the Acts. 
HELIOPOLIS|     he-li-op'-o-lis.  See  ON .
SIPHMOTH|Fruitful places, some unknown place in the south, where David found friends when he fled from Saul ( 1 Samuel 30:28 ). 
MESHILLEMITH|     me-shil'-e-mith (meshillemith, "retribution"): A priest, son of Immer, ancestor, according to  1 Chronicles 9:12 , of Adaiah and Pashhur, and according to  Nehemiah 11:13 , of Amashai. In the latter passage this name is spelled MESHILLEMOTH (which see).
SALEM|Peace, commonly supposed to be another name of Jerusalem ( Genesis 14:18 ;  Psalm 76:2 ;  Hebrews 7:1 ,  2). 
PEKAHIAH|The Lord opened his eyes, the son and successor of Menahem on the throne of Israel. He was murdered in the royal palace of Samaria by Pekah, one of the captains of his army ( 2 Kings 15:23 -26), after a reign of two years (B.C. 761-759). He "did that which was evil in the sight of the Lord." 
PANNAG|( Ezek. 27:17 ; marg. R.V.,  "perhaps a kind of confection") the Jews explain as the name of a kind of sweet pastry. Others take it as the name of some place, identifying it with Pingi, on the road between Damascus and Baalbec. "Pannaga" is the Sanscrit name of an aromatic plant (Comp.  Genesis 43:11 ). 
HADAR|Adod, brave (?).  (1.) A son of Ishmael ( Genesis 25:15 ); in  1 Chronicles 1:30  written Hadad. (2.) One of the Edomitish kings ( Genesis 36:39 ) about the time of Saul. Called also Hadad ( 1 Chronicles 1:50 ,  51). It is probable that in these cases Hadar may be an error simply of transcription for Hadad. 
PHAREZ|Breach, the elder of the twin sons of Judah ( Genesis 38:29 ). From him the royal line of David sprang ( Ruth 4:18 -22). "The chief of all the captains of the host" was of the children of Perez ( 1 Chronicles 27:3 ;  Matthew 1:3 ). 
HAURAN|Cave-land, mentioned only in  Ezek. 47:16 , 18. It was one of the ancient divisions of Bashan (q.v.), and lay on the south-east of Gaulanitis or the Jaulan, and on the south of Lejah, extending from the Arnon to the Hieromax. It was the most fertile region in Syria, and to this day abounds in the ruins of towns, many of which have stone doors and massive walls. It retains its ancient name. It was known by the Greeks and Romans as "Auranitis." 
WATERS|   MEROM,  OF  me'-rom (me-merom; hudor Marron or hudor Merron): The place which was the scene of Joshua's victory over Jabin and his confederates ( Joshua 11:7 ), commonly identified with Lake Huleh in the upper part of the Jordan valley, but with doubtful propriety. Josephus says (Ant., V, i, 18) that the camp of the allies was at Beroth in upper Galilee, and that Beroth was not far from Kadesh, which is upon the summit of the Galilean hills. According to the Scriptural account, the pursuit was to Sidon and Hazor on the West of the mountains (see HAZOR), while the names of the confederates are those of places in lower Galilee and the maritime plain. It seems improbable that a force of chariots should be brought over to be hemmed in by the rugged mountains which border the narrow plain of Huleh on both sides, plains that are made still narrower by the swamps surrounding the lake (see JORDAN VALLEY) in Joshua's time, when they were much larger than they are now after having been filled with the accumulation of sediment brought down by mountain streams for 3,000 years. Conder, with much reason, supposes the "waters of Merom" to be the perennial stream Wady el-Melek, near Shimrom-Merom (Semunieh), 5 miles West of Nazareth. Were Lake Huleh referred to, the proper phrase would be Sea (yam) of Merom, rather than waters (mayim).  George Frederick Wright  WATERS  wo'-terz (mayim, plural of may, "water"; in the New Testament hudor, "water"; kindunois potamon ( 2 Corinthians 11:26 ), the King James Version "perils of waters," is in the Revised Version (British and American) "perils of rivers"): In the New Testament there is frequent reference to the water of baptism. Pilate washes his hands with water to signify his guiltlessness. Jesus tells the Samaritan woman of the living water. The Lamb shall guide the redeemed unto fountains of waters of life.  The uses of mayim are well classified in BDB, especially the figurative references, as follows: a symbol of distress, "when thou passest through the waters" ( Isaiah 43:2 ); of force, "like the breach of waters" ( 2 Samuel 5:20 ); of that which is overwhelming, "a tempest of mighty waters overflowing" ( Isaiah 28:2 ); of fear, "The hearts of the people.... became as water" ( Joshua 7:5 ); of transitoriness, "Thou shalt remember it as waters that are passed away" ( Job 11:16 ); of refreshment, "as streams of water in a dry place" ( Isaiah 32:2 ); of peace, "He leadeth me beside still waters" ( Psalm 23:2 ); of legitimate pleasures, "waters out of thine own cistern" ( Proverbs 5:15 ); of illegitimate pleasures, "Stolen waters are sweet" ( Proverbs 9:17 ); of that which is poured out abundantly, blood ( Psalm 79:3 ), wrath ( Hosea 5:10 ), justice ( Amos 5:24 ), groanings ( Job 3:24 ).  Alfred Ely Day  CITY OF WATERS  See  RABBAH .
BETHESDA|House of mercy, a reservoir (Gr. kolumbethra,  "a swimming bath") with five porches, close to the sheep-gate or Market ( Nehemiah 3:1 ;  John 5:2 ). Eusebius the historian (A.D. 330) calls it "the sheep-pool." It is also called "Bethsaida" and "Beth-zatha" ( John 5:2 ,  R.V. marg.). Under these "porches" or colonnades were usually a large number of infirm people waiting for the "troubling of the water." It is usually identified with the modern so-called Fountain of the Virgin, in the valley of the Kidron, and not far from the Pool of Siloam (q.v.); and also with the Birket Israel, a pool near the mouth of the valley which runs into the Kidron south of "St. Stephen's Gate." Others again identify it with the twin pools called the "Souterrains," under the convent of the Sisters of Zion, situated in what must have been the rock-hewn ditch between Bezetha and the fortress of Antonia. But quite recently Schick has discovered a large tank, as sketched here, situated about 100 feet north-west of St. Anne's Church, which is, as he contends, very probably the Pool of Bethesda. No certainty as to its identification, however, has as yet been arrived at. (see  FOUNTAIN ; GIHON.)
ISHBOSHETH|Man of shame or humiliation, the youngest of Saul's four sons, and the only one who survived him ( 2 Samuel 2 -4). His name was originally Eshbaal ( 1 Chronicles 8:33 ;  9:39 ). He was about forty years of age when his father and three brothers fell at the battle of Gilboa. Through the influence of Abner, Saul's cousin, he was acknowledged as successor to the throne of Saul, and ruled over all Israel, except the tribe of Judah (over whom David was king), for two years, having Mahanaim, on the east of Jordan, as his capital ( 2 Samuel 2:9 ). After a troubled and uncertain reign he was murdered by his guard, who stabbed him while he was asleep on his couch at mid-day ( 2 Samuel 4:5 -7); and having cut off his head, presented it to David, who sternly rebuked them for this cold-blooded murder, and ordered them to be immediately executed (9-12). 
PEREZUZZA|   PEREZ-UZZA  pe-rez-uz'-za.  See  UZZA .
NOADIAH|Meeting with the Lord.  (1.) A Levite who returned from Babylon ( Ezra 8:33 ). (2.) A false prophetess who assisted Tobiah and Sanballat against the Jews ( Nehemiah 6:14 ). Being bribed by them, she tried to stir up discontent among the inhabitants of Jerusalem, and so to embarrass Nehemiah in his great work of rebuilding the ruined walls of the city. 
NAHALIEL|Possession, or valley of God, one of the encampments of the Israelites in the wilderness ( Numbers 21:19 ), on the confines of Moab. This is identified with the ravine of the Zerka M'ain, the ancient Callirhoe, the hot springs on the east of the Jordan, not far from the Dead Sea. 
SHENIR|=Senir, ( Deuteronomy 3:9 ; Cant. 4:8), the name given to Mount Hermon (q.v.) by the Sidonians. 
RIZPAH|Coal; hot stone, the daughter of Aiah, and one of Saul's concubines. She was the mother of Armoni and Mephibosheth ( 2 Samuel 3:7 ;  21:8 ,  10,  11). It happened that a grievous famine, which lasted for three years, fell upon the land during the earlier half of David's reign at Jerusalem. This calamity was sent "for Saul and for his bloody house, because he slew the Gibeonites." David inquired of the Gibeonites what satisfaction they demanded, and was answered that nothing would compensate for the wrong Saul had done to them but the death of seven of Saul's sons. David accordingly delivered up to them the two sons of Rizpah and five of the sons of Merab (q.v.), Saul's eldest daughter, whom she bore to Adriel. These the Gibeonites put to death, and hung up their bodies before the Lord at the sanctuary at Gibeah. Rizpah thereupon took her place on the rock of Gibeah (q.v.), and for five months watched the suspended bodies of her children, to prevent them from being devoured by the beasts and birds of prey, till they were at length taken down and buried by David. Her marriage to Abner was the occasion of a quarrel between him and Ishbosheth, which led to Abner's going over to the side of David ( 2 Samuel 3:17 -21). 
KATTATH|( Joshua 19:15 ), a town of Asher, has been identified with Kana el Jelil. (see  CANA .) 
IJON|A ruin, a city of Naphtali, captured by Ben-hadad of Syria at the instance of Asa ( 1 Kings 15:20 ), and afterwards by Tiglath-pileser of Assyria ( 2 Kings 15:29 ) in the reign of Pekah; now el-Khiam. 
JAASU|   ; JASSAI; JAASAU  ja'-a-su (the Revised Version (British and American) and Kethibh, ya`asu, meaning uncertain); (the Revised Version margin and Qere, ya`asay), (the King James Version): In  Ezra 10:37 , one of those who had married foreign wives. Septuagint translates the consonantal text as a verb, kai epoiesan, "and they did." 1 Esdras 9:34 has "Eliasis."
TABRIMMON|     tab-rim'-on, tab'-ri-mon (Tabhrimmon, "Rimmon is good"; Codex Vaticanus Taberema; Codex Alexandrinus Tabenraema): The son of Hezion and father of BENHADAD (which see) ( 1 Kings 15:18 , the King James Version, "Tabrimon").
GUESTCHAMBER|The spare room on the upper floor of an Eastern dwelling ( Mark 14:14 ;  Luke 22:11 ). In  Luke 2:7  the word is translated "inn" (q.v.). 
BETHSHEMITE|   BETH-SHEMITE  beth-she'-mit beth-shimshi ( 1 Samuel 6:14, 20 ): An inhabitant of Beth-shemesh in Judah (compare BETH-SHEMESH 1).
MIKNEIAH|     mik-ne'-ya, mik-ni'-a (miqneydhu): A Levite doorkeeper ( 1 Chronicles 15:18 ).
RADDAI|     rad'-a-i, ra-da'-i (radday, "beating down"(?)): The 5th of the 7 sons of Jesse, father of David, according to  1 Chronicles 2:14  Septuagint, Codex Alexdrinus, "Rhaddai"; Lucian, "Rhedai"; others, "Zaddai".epulchral monument, has long disappeared, the spot is marked until this day, and Christians, Jews and Mohammedans unite in honoring it. The present tomb, which, apparently, is not older than the 15th century, is built in the style of the small-domed buildings raised by Moslems in honor of their saints. It is a rough structure of four square walls, each about 23 ft. long and 20 ft. high; the dome rising 10 ft. higher is used by Mohammedans for prayer, while on Fridays the Jews make supplication before the empty tomb within. It is doubtful, but probable, that it marks the exact spot where Rachel was buried. There are, apparently, two traditions as to the location of the place. The oldest tradition, based upon  Genesis 35:16-20 ;  Genesis 48:7 , points to a place one mile North of Bethlehem and 4 miles from Jerusalem.  Matthew 2:18  speaks for this place, since the evangelist, reporting the slaughter of the innocents of Bethlehem, represents Rachel as weeping for her children from her neighboring grave. But according to  1 Samuel 10:2 ;, which apparently represents another tradition, the place of Rachel's grave was on the "border of Benjamin," near Beth-el, about 10 miles North of Jerusalem, at another unknown Ephrath. This location, some believe, is corroborated by  Jeremiah 31:15 , where the prophet, in relating the leading away of the people of Ramah, which was in Benjamin, into captivity, introduces Rachel the mother of that tribe as bewailing the fate of her descendants. Those that believe this northern location to be the place of Rachel's grave take the words, "the same is Beth-lehem," in  Genesis 35:19 ;  Genesis 48:7 , to be an incorrect gloss; but that is a mere assumption lacking sufficient proof.o, following J. P. Peters, rearranges the text by transferring the clause "and whosoever shall say to his brother, Raca, shall be in danger of the council" to the end of the preceding verse (Encyclopaedia Biblica, IV, cols. 4001). There certainly does not seem to be trustworthy external evidence to prove that the terms "the judgment," "the council," "the Gehenna of fire" stand to each other in a relation of gradation, as lower and higher legal courts, or would be so understood by Christ's hearers. What is beyond dispute is that Christ condemns the use of disparaging and insulting epithets as a supreme offense against the law of humanity, which belongs to the same category as murder itself. It should be added, however, that it is the underlying feeling and not the verbal expression as such that constitutes the sin. Hence, our Lord can, without any real inconsistency, address two of His followers as "foolish men" ( Luke 24:25 , anoetoi, practically equivalent to Raca, as is also James's expression, "O vain man,"  James 2:20 ).
HODIJAH|Majesty of Jehovah.  (1.) One of the Levites who assisted Ezra in expounding the law ( Nehemiah 8:7 ;  9:5 ).  (2.)  Nehemiah 10:18 , a Levite who sealed the covenant. 
ESLI|     es'-li (Eslei, Esli; probably for Hebrew 'atsalyahu):  An ancestor of Jesus in Luke's genealogy, the 10th before Joseph, the husband of Mary ( Luke 3:25 ).
PEREZ|=Pharez, (q.v.), breach, the son of Judah ( Nehemiah 11:4 ). "The chief of all the captains of the host for the first month" in the reign of David was taken from his family (<a href="http://bible.cc/1_chronicl
REUEL|Friend of God.  (1.) A son of Esau and Bashemath ( Genesis 36:4 ,  10;  1 Chronicles 1:35 ).  (2.) "The priest of Midian," Moses' father-in-law ( Exodus 2:18 )=Raguel ( Numbers 10:29 ). If he be identified with Jethro (q.v.), then this may be regarded as his proper name, and Jether or Jethro (i.e.,  "excellency") as his official title.  (3.)  Numbers 2:14 , called also Deuel ( 1:14 ;  7:42 ). 
LAADAH|     la'-a-da (la`dah): A descendant of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:21 ).
MISPERETH|     mis'-pe-reth (micpereth).  See  MISPAR .
ZOBAH|=Aram-Zobah, ( Psalm 60 ,  title), a Syrian province or kingdom to the south of Coele-Syria, and extending from the eastern slopes of Lebanon north and east toward the Euphrates. Saul and David had war with 
HAMONGOG|Multitude of Gog, the name of the valley in which the slaughtered forces of Gog are to be buried ( Ezek. 39:11 , 15), "the valley of the passengers on the east of the sea." 
MUPPIM|     mup'-im (muppim): A son of Benjamin ( Genesis 46:21 ), elsewhere called "Shuppim" ( 1 Chronicles 7:12, 15 ;  1 Chronicles 26:16 ), "Shephupham" ( Numbers 26:39 ), and "Shephuphan". ( 1 Chronicles 8:5 ); compare separate articles on these names.
HERBS|   BITTER   hurbs, or urbs (merorim): Originally in the primitive Passover ( Exodus 12:8   Numbers 9:11 ) these were probably merely salads, the simplest and quickest prepared form of vegetable accompaniment to the roasted lamb. Such salads have always been favorites in the Orient. Cucumbers, lettuce, water-cress, parsley and endive are some of those commonly used. Later on the Passover ritual (as it does today) laid emphasis on the idea of "bitterness" as symbolical of Israel's lot in Egypt. In modern Palestine the Jews use chiefly lettuce and endive for the "bitter herbs" of their Passover. In  Lamentations 3:15  the same word is used: "He hath filled me with bitterness merorim, he hath sated me with wormwood." Here the parallelism with "wormwood" suggests some plant more distinctly bitter than the mild salads mentioned above, such, for example, as the colocynth (Citrullus colocynthus) or the violently irritating squirting cucumber (Ecballium elaterium).  E. W. G. Masterman
HOBAIAH|   HABAIAH;   ha-ba'-ya, (cha-bhayah, chobhayah): A post-exilic priestly family which was unable to establish its pedigree. "Habaiah" is the form in  Ezra 2:61 ; in the parallel passage ( Nehemiah 7:63 ), the King James Version has "Habaiah," and the Revised Version (British and American) "Hobaiah"; in the parallel passage in 1 Esdras 5:38, the form is Obdia, Codex Vaticanus, Obbeia.  HOBAIAH  ho-ba'-ya (chobhayah, "whom Yahweh hides," i.e. "protects"): The head of a priestly family that returned from Babylon with Zerubbabel. Because they could not trace their genealogy, they were not permitted to serve in the priestly office ( Nehemiah 7:63 f ). In the Qere of this passage and in the parallel list of  Ezra 2:61 , this name appears in the form "Habaiah" (chabhayyah). "Obdia" is the form of the word in 1 Esdras 5:38.
WINEPRESS|Consisted of two vats or receptacles, (1) a trough (Hebrews gath,  Gr. lenos) into which the grapes were thrown and where they were trodden upon and bruised ( Isaiah 16:10 ;  Lamentations 1:15 ;  Joel 3:13 ); and (2) a trough or vat (Hebrews yekebh,  Gr. hypolenion) into which the juice ran from the trough above, the gath ( Nehemiah 13:15 ;  Job 24:11 ;  Isaiah 63:2 ,  3;  Haggai 2:16 ;  Joel 2:24 ). Wine-presses are found in almost every part of Palestine. They are "the only sure relics we have of the old days of Israel before the Captivity. Between Hebron and Beersheba they are found on all the hill slopes; they abound in southern Judea; they are no less common in the many valleys of Carmel; and they are numerous in Galilee." The "treading of the wine-press" is emblematic of divine judgment ( Isaiah 63:2 ;  Lamentations 1:15 ;  Revelation 14:19 ,  20). 
PROPHESYINGS|   , FALSE  prof'-e-si-ingz: The distinction between the true and the false prophecy and prophets is very difficult to state. Broadly speaking, the false prophesying related itself to the national ideal independently of any spiritual quality, while the true prophesying ever kept uppermost the spiritual conception of the national life. Among those given to false prophesying were the ones who spoke after "the deceit of their own heart" ( Jeremiah 14:13, 14 ); those who without real prophetic gift borrowed a message and assumed the speech of prophecy ( Jeremiah 23:28, 31 ); and those who sought the prophet's role in order to gain the material gifts which came from the people to their prophets ( Micah 3:5 ). These, when discovered, were counted worthy of punishment and even death. There were, however, false prophesyings from men who honestly believed themselves to have a message from Yahweh. These prophecies from self-deceived prophets often led the people astray. The dream of national greatness was substituted for the voice of Yahweh. It was against such prophesying that the true prophets had to contend. The only test here was the spiritual character of the utterance, and this test demanded a certain moral or spiritual sense which the people did not always possess. Consequently, in times of moral darkness the false prophets, predicting smooth things for the nation, independent of repentance, consecration and the pursuit of spiritual ideals, were honored above the true prophets who emphasized the moral greatness of Yahweh and the necessity of righteousness for the nation. In New Testament times false prophesying did much injury in the church.  See  PROPHECY .  C. E. Schenk
ZAMZUMMIMS|A race of giants; "a people great, and many, and tall, as the Anakims" ( Deuteronomy 2:20 ,  21). They were overcome by the Ammonites, "who called them Zamzummims." They belonged to the Rephaim, and inhabited the country afterwards occupied by the Ammonites. It has been conjectured that they might be Ham-zuzims, i.e., Zuzims dwelling in Ham, a place apparently to the south of Ashteroth ( Genesis 14:5 ), the ancient Rabbath-ammon. 
REHOB|Street; broad place.  (1.) The father of Hadadezer, king of Tobah ( 2 Samuel 8:3 ,  12). (2.)  Nehemiah 10:11 . (3.) The same, probably, as Beth-rehob ( 2 Samuel 10:6 ,  8;  Judges 18:28 ), a place in the north of Palestine ( Numbers 13:21 ). It is now supposed to be represented by the castle of Hunin, south-west of Dan, on the road from Hamath into Coele-Syria. (4.) A town of Asher ( Joshua 19:28 ), to the east of Zidon. (5.) Another town of Asher ( Joshua 19:30 ), kept possession of by the Canaanites ( Judges 1:31 ). 
ISHPAH|     ish'-pa (yishpah, "firm," "strong"): A man of the tribe of Benjamin, of the house of Beriah ( 1 Chronicles 8:16 ).
GILOH|Exile, a city in the south-west part of the hill-country of Judah ( Joshua 15:51 ). It was the native place or residence of the traitor Ahithophel "the Gilonite" ( Joshua 15:51 ;  2 Samuel 15:12 ), and where he committed suicide ( 17:23 ). It has been identified with Kurbet Jala, about 7 miles north of Hebron. 
SAMOTHRACE|     sam'-o-thras (Samothrake, "the Thracian Samos"; the King James Version Samothracia, sam-o-thra'sha; the island was formerly Dardania; for change of name see Pausanias vii.4, 3; Strabo x.457, and for a full discussion Conze, Hauser and Benndorf, Neue Untersuchungen auf South, 1880): An island in the Aegean Sea, South of Thrace opposite the mouth of the Hebrus River, and Northwest of Troas. The island is mountainous, as the name indicates (see SAMOS), and towers above Imbros when viewed from the Trojan coast. The summit is about a mile high. It is mentioned in the Iliad (xiii.12) as the seat of Poseidon and referred to by Virgil Aeneid vii0.208.  The island was always famous for sanctity, and the seat of a cult of the Cabeiri, which Herodotus (ii.51) says was derived from the Pelasgian inhabitants (see also Aristophanes, Pax 277). The mysteries connected with the worship of these gods later rivaled the famous mysteries of Eleusis, and both Philip of Macedon and Olympias his wife were initiated here (Plut. Alex. 3).  Probably because of its sacred character the island did not figure to any extent in history, but in the expedition of Xerxes in 480 B.C., one ship at least of the Samothracian contingent is mentioned as conspicuous in the battle of Salamis.  The famous "Victory of Samothrace" (now in the Louvre) was set up here by Demetrius Poliorcetes circa 300 B.C., and was discovered in 1863. Since that time (1873-75), the Austrian government carried on extensive excavations (see Conze, Hauser and Benndorf, op. cit.).  In the New Testament the island is mentioned in  Acts 16:11 . From Troas, Paul made a straight run to Samothrace, and the next day sailed to NEAPOLIS (which see) on the Thracian coast, the port of PHILIPPI (which see). At the northern end of Samothrace was a town where the ship could anchor for the night, and on the return journey ( Acts 20:6 ) a landing may have been made, but no details are given. Pliny characterizes the island as being most difficult for anchorage, but because of the hazards of sailing by night, the ancient navigators always anchored somewhere if possible.  LITERATURE.  See under SAMOS.  Arthur J. Kinsella
PAHATHMOAB|Governor of Moab, a person whose descendants returned from the Captivity and assisted in rebuilding Jerusalem ( Ezra 2:6 ;  8:4 ;  10:30 ). 
REGEMMELECH|Friend of the king, one of the two messengers sent by the exiled Jews to Jerusalem in the time of Darius ( Zechariah 7:2 ) to make inquiries at the temple. 
MEATS|   DAINTIES; DAINTY ()  dan'-tis (maT`ammoth, "things full of taste," man`ammim, ma`adhan; liparos, "fat," "shining"): Jacob is represented as predicting of Asher, "He shall yield royal dainties" ( Genesis 49:20 ; compare parallel clause, "His bread shall be fat," and  Deuteronomy 33:24 , "Let him dip his foot in oil"). David, praying to be delivered from the ways of "men that work inquiry," cries, "Let me not eat of their dainties" ( Psalm 141:4 ). The man who sitteth "to eat with a ruler" ( Proverbs 23:1-3 ) is counseled, "If thou be a man given to appetite, be not desirous of his dainties; seeing they are deceitful food" (compare John's words in the woes upon Babylon ( Revelation 18:14 ), "All things that were dainties and sumptuous are perished from thee," and Homer's Iliad (Pope). xviii.456). "Dainties," then, are luxuries, costly, delicate and rare. This idea is common to all the words thus rendered; naturally associated with kings' tables, and with the lives of those who are lovers of pleasure and luxury. By their associations and their softening effects they are to be abstained from or indulged in moderately as "deceitful food" by those who would live the simple and righteous life which wisdom sanctions. They are also "offered not from genuine hospitality, but with some by-ends." He should also shun the dainties of the niggard ( Proverbs 23:6 ), who counts the cost ( Proverbs 23:7  the Revised Version, margin) of every morsel that his guest eats.  See  DELICATE ;  FOOD, etc .  George B. Eager
SANDALS|Mentioned only in  Mark 6:9  and  Acts 12:8 . The sandal was simply a sole, made of wood or palm-bark, fastened to the foot by leathern straps. Sandals were also made of seal-skin ( Ezek. 16:10 ; lit. tahash,  "leather;" A.V.,  "badger's skin;" R.V.,  "sealskin, " or marg.,  "porpoise-skin"). (see  SHOE .) 
LYCAONIA|An inland province of Asia Minor, on the west of Cappadocia and the south of Galatia. It was a Roman province, and its chief towns were Iconium, Lystra, and Derbe. The "speech of Lycaonia" ( Acts 14:11 ) was probably the ancient Assyrian language, or perhaps, as others think, a corrupt Greek intermingled with Syriac words. Paul preached in this region, and revisited it ( Acts 16:1 -6;  18:23 ;  19:1 ). 
ZELAH|Slope; side, a town in Benjamin, where Saul and his son Jonathan were buried ( 2 Samuel 21:14 ). It was probably Saul's birthplace. 
SHEMER|     she'-mer (shemer; Semer, Lucian, Semmer):  (1) The owner of the hill which Omri bought and which became the site of Samaria ( 1 Kings 16:24 , shomeron). Shemer may be an ancient clan name. The fact, however, that the mountain was called Shomeron when Omri bought it makes one doubt that the city of Samaria was named after Shemer; the passage is questionable. The real etymology of Samaria roots it in "watch mountain" (see Stade, Zeitschrift, 165).  (2) A Merarite ( 1 Chronicles 6:46  (31), Semmer).  (3) An Asherite ( 1 Chronicles 7:34 , A and Lucian, Somer), called "Shomer" in  1 Chronicles 7:32 .  (4) A Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 8:12 , Codex Vaticanus Semer; Codex Alexandrinus Semmer; Lucian, Samaiel); the Revised Version (British and American) "Shemed," the King James Version "Shamed."  The Hebrew manuscripts differ; some read "Shemer," others "Shemedh."  Horace J. Wolf
RECHAB|Horseman, or chariot.  (1.) One of Ishbosheth's "captains of bands" or leaders of predatory troops ( 2 Samuel 4:2 ). (2.) The father of Jehonadab, who was the father of the Rechabites ( 2 Kings 10:15 ,  23;  Jeremiah 35:6 -19). 
DOPHKAH|Knocking, an encampment of the Israelites in the wilderness ( Numbers 33:12 ). It was in the desert of Sin, on the eastern shore of the western arm of the Red Sea, somewhere in the Wady Feiran. 
SHALISHAH|   , LAND OF  sha-li'-sha, shal'-i-sha ('erets shalishah; Codex Vaticanus he ge Selcha; Codex Alexandrinus he ge Salissa): If the general indication of the route followed by Saul, given under SHAALIM, is correct, the land of Shalishah ( 1 Samuel 9:4 ) will lie to the Northeast of Lydda on the western slope of the range. Baal-shalishah would most likely be in the district, and may indeed have given its name to it. If Conder is right in identifying this city with Khirbet Kefr Thilth, about 19 miles Northeast of Jaffa, it meets well enough the general indication given above. Eusebius, Onomasticon knows the name, but gives no guidance as to where the district is. Baal-shalishah it places in the Thamnite region, 15 miles North of Diospolis (Lydda). No boundaries can be laid down, but probability points to this neighborhood.  W. Ewing
BEALIAH|Whose Lord is Jehovah, a Benjamite, one of David's thirty heroes of the sling and bow ( 1 Chronicles 12:5 ). 
ZABDIEL|Gift of God.  (1.) The father of Jashobeam, who was one of David's officers ( 1 Chronicles 27:2 ). (2.) An overseer of the priests after the Captivity ( Nehemiah 11:14 ). 
MIBHAR|Choice, a Hagarene, one of David's warriors ( 1 Chronicles 11:38 ); called also Bani the Gadite ( 2 Samuel 23:36 ). 
TAANACH|A sandy place, an ancient royal city of the Canaanites, on the south-western border of the plain of Esdraelon, 4 miles south of Megiddo. Its king was conquered by Joshua ( 12:21 ). It was assigned to the Levites of the family of Kohath ( 17:11 -18;  21:25 ). It is mentioned in the song of Deborah ( Judges 5:19 ). It is identified with the small modern village of Ta'annuk. 
HOPHNI|Pugilist or client, one of the two sons of Eli, the high priest ( 1 Samuel 1:3 ;  2:34 ), who, because he was "very old," resigned to them the active duties of his office. By their scandalous conduct they brought down a curse on their father's house ( 2:22 ,  12-27,  27-36;  3:11 -14). For their wickedness they were called "sons of Belial," i.e., worthless men ( 2:12 ). They both perished in the disastrous battle with the Philistines at Aphek ( 4:11 ). (see  PHINEHAS .) 
SHUPHAMITES|   SHUPHAM;   shoo'-fam, shoo'-fam-its.  See  SHEPHUPHAM .
MESHILLEMOTH|Requitals.  (1.) The father of Berechiah ( 2 Chronicles 28:12 ). (2.) A priest, the son of Immer ( Nehemiah 11:13 ). 
ISHVAH|     ish'-va (yishwah, "even," "level"; the King James Version Ishuah and Isuah): Second son of Asher ( Genesis 46:17   1 Chronicles 7:30 ). As only the families of his brothers Ishvi, etc., are mentioned in  Numbers 26:44 , the supposition is that he left no issue.
CAIN|A possession; a spear.  (1.) The first-born son of Adam and Eve ( Genesis 4 ). He became a tiller of the ground, as his brother Abel followed the pursuits of pastoral life. He was "a sullen, self-willed, haughty, vindictive man; wanting the religious element in his character, and defiant even in his attitude towards God." It came to pass "in process of time" (marg. "at the end of days"), i.e., probably on the Sabbath, that the two brothers presented their offerings to the Lord. Abel's offering was of the "firstlings of his flock and of the fat," while Cain's was "of the fruit of the ground." Abel's sacrifice was "more excellent" ( Hebrews 11:4 ) than Cain's, and was accepted by God. On this account Cain was "very wroth," and cherished feelings of murderous hatred against his brother, and was at length guilty of the desperate outrage of putting him to death (1  John 3:12 ). For this crime he was expelled from Eden, and henceforth led the life of an exile, bearing upon him some Mark which God had set upon him in answer to his own cry for mercy, so that thereby he might be protected from the wrath of his fellow-men; or it may be that God only gave him some sign to assure him that he would not be slain ( Genesis 4:15 ). Doomed to be a wanderer and a fugitive in the earth, he went forth into the "land of Nod", i.e., the land of "exile", which is said to have been in the "east of Eden," and there he built a city, the first we read of, and called it after his son's name, Enoch. His descendants are enumerated to the sixth generation. They gradually degenerated in their moral and spiritual condition till they became wholly corrupt before God. This corruption prevailed, and at length the Deluge was sent by God to prevent the final triumph of evil. (see  ABEL .) (2.) A town of the Kenites, a branch of the Midianites ( Joshua 15:57 ), on the east edge of the mountain above Engedi; probably the "nest in a rock" mentioned by Balaam ( Numbers 24:21 ). It is identified with the modern Yekin, 3 miles south-east of Hebron. 
BETHSHITTAH|   BETH-SHITTAH  beth-shit'-a (beth ha-shiTTah, "house of the acacia"): A place on the route followed by the Midianites in their flight before Gideon ( Judges 7:22 ). It is probably identical with the modern ShuTTa, a village in the Vale of Jezreel, about 6 miles Northwest of Beisan.
HAGGITES|     hag'-its.  See  HAGGI .
SHECANIAH|One intimate with Jehovah.  (1.) A priest to whom the tenth lot came forth when David divided the priests ( 1 Chronicles 24:11 ). (2.) One of the priests who were set "to give to their brethren by courses" of the daily portion ( 2 Chronicles 31:15 ). Shechani'ah, id.  (1.) A priest whose sons are mentioned in  1 Chronicles 3:21 , 22. (2.)  Ezra 8:5 . (3.)  Ezra 10:2 -4. (4.) The father of Shemaiah, who repaired the wall of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 3:29 ). (5.) The father-in-law of Tobiah ( Nehemiah 6:18 ). (6.) A priest who returned from the Captivity with Zerubbabel ( Nehemiah 12:3 ; marg.,  or Shebaniah). 
JOEL|Joel, Book of Joel was probably a resident in Judah, as his commission was to that people. He makes frequent mention of Judah and Jerusalem ( 1:14 ;  2:1 ,  15,  32;  3:1 ,  12,  17,  20,  21). He probably flourished in the reign of Uzziah (about B.C. 800), and was contemporary with Amos and Isaiah. The contents of this book are,  (1.) A prophecy of a great public calamity then impending over the land, consisting of a want of water and an extraordinary plague of locusts ( 1:1 - 2:11 ).  (2.) The prophet then calls on his countrymen to repent and to turn to God, assuring them of his readiness to forgive ( 2:12 -17), and foretelling the restoration of the land to its accustomed fruitfulness (18-26).  (3.) Then follows a Messianic prophecy, quoted by Peter ( Acts 2:39 ).  (4.) Finally, the prophet foretells portents and judgments as destined to fall on the enemies of God (ch. 3,  but in the Hebrew text 4).  Jehovah is his God.  (1.) The oldest of Samuel's two sons appointed by him as judges in Beersheba ( 1 Samuel 8:2 ). (see  VASHNI .)  (2.) A descendant of Reuben ( 1 Chronicles 5:4 , 8).  (3.) One of David's famous warriors ( 1 Chronicles 11:38 ).  (4.) A Levite of the family of Gershom ( 1 Chronicles 15:7 ,  11).  (5.)  1 Chronicles 7:3 .  (6.)  1 Chronicles 27:20 .  (7.) The second of the twelve minor prophets. He was the son of Pethuel. His personal history is only known from his book. 
EPHRATH|   ; EPHRATHAH  ef'-rath, e'-frath, ef'-ra-tha, ef-ra'-tha ('ephrath; Ephratha;  Genesis 35:16 ;  Genesis 48:7 ); ('ephrathah, in the other references:  Joshua 15:59  (in added verse of Septuagint only);  Ruth 4:11   1 Chronicles 2:19, 24, 50 ;  Psalm 132:6   Micah 5:2 , the King James Version "Ephratah"):  The name either of Bethlehem itself or of a district in which Bethlehem was situated. A man of this place was called an Ephrathite ( Ruth 1:2   1 Samuel 17:12 ). It is held by many authorities that the Ephrath where Rachel was buried ( Genesis 35:16 ;  Genesis 48:7 ) was a different place, the words "the same is Bethlehem" being a gloss. The reading in  Psalm 132:6  is doubtful; the Revised Version, margin has "Ephraim."  E. W. G. Masterman
KEEPERS|   KEEPER;   kep'-er, (mostly from shamar; phulax): The word is used of keepers of sheep, vineyards, doors, prisons (in  Genesis 39:21 ;, car; compare  Acts 5:23 ), etc. In  Ecclesiastes 12:3 , "The keepers of the house shall tremble," the allusion is to the decay of bodily powers, the "keepers" being specially the arms, which had become feeble through age.  TEMPLE KEEPERS (SERVANTS)  After the conquest of Midian, "Moses took one drawn out of every fifty, both of man and of beast, and gave them unto the Levites, that kept the charge of the tabernacle of Yahweh" ( Numbers 31:47 ; compare 31:30). Similarly, after the deception of Joshua by the Gibeonites, "Joshua made them that day hewers of wood and drawers of water for the congregation, and for the altar of Yahweh, unto this day" ( Joshua 9:27 ). The object of these notices, evidently, is to explain how a non-Israelitish class of sanctuary servants had taken their origin. Their existence at the time of Ezekiel, however, is the object of one of the latter's severest denunciations: "Ye have brought in foreigners, uncircumcised in heart and uncircumcised in flesh, to be in my sanctuary, to profane it..... And ye have not kept the charge of my holy things; but ye have set keepers of my charge in my sanctuary for yourselves" ( Ezekiel 44:7 f ). In place of these servants or "keepers" Ezekiel directs that such Levites are to be employed as have been degraded from priestly privileges for participating in idolatrous worship. On them shall devolve all the various duties of the temple except the actual offering of sacrifices, which is reserved for "the priests the Levites, the sons of Zadok" (44:10-15). For the use of this deposed class, "the priests, the keepers of the charge of the house," is reserved a special room in the inner court of the temple (40:44).  See , further, NETHINIM.  Burton Scott Easton
HILLEL|Praising, a Pirathonite, father of the judge Abdon ( Judges 12:13 ,  15). 
NATHANMELECH|   NATHAN-MELECH  na'-than-mel'-ek (nethan-melekh, "king's gift"): A Judean official, to whose chamber King Josiah removed "the horses of the sun" ( 2 Kings 23:11 ). The Septuagint calls him "Nathan, the king's eunuch" (Nathan basileos tou eunouchou).
BAALPERAZIM|Baal having rents, bursts, or destructions, the scene of a victory gained by David over the Philistines ( 2 Samuel 5:20 ;  1 Chronicles 14:11 ). Called Mount Perazim ( Isaiah 28:21 ). It was near the valley of Rephaim, west of Jerusalem. Identified with the modern Jebel Aly. 
PELETHITES|Mentioned always along with the Cherethites, and only in the time of David. The word probably means "runners" or "couriers," and may denote that while forming part of David's bodyguard, they were also sometimes employed as couriers ( 2 Samuel 8:18 ;  20:7 ,  23; 1 Kings 1:38 ,  44;  1 Chronicles 18:17 ). Some, however, think that these are the names simply of two Philistine tribes from which David selected his body-guard. They are mentioned along with the Gittites ( 2 Samuel 15:18 ), another body of foreign troops whom David gathered round him. 
BENHAIL|   BEN-HAIL  ben-ha'-il (ben-chayil, "son of strength"; compare HPN, 65, 231): One of the princes who was sent by Jehoshaphat "to teach in the cities of Judah" ( 2 Chronicles 17:7 ).
BERITH|     be'-rith (berith, "covenant").  See  BAAL-BERITH .
PAARAI|Opening of the Lord, "the Arbite," one of David's heroes ( 2 Samuel 23:35 ); called also Naarai,  1 Chronicles 11:37 . 
THOUSANDS|( Micah 5:2 ), another name for "families" or "clans" (see  Numbers 1:16 ;  10:4 ;  Joshua 22:14 ,  21). Several "thousands" or "families" made up a "tribe." 
JABNEEL|Built by God.  (1.) A town in the north boundary of Judah ( Joshua 15:11 ), called afterwards by the Greeks Jamnia, the modern Yebna, 11 miles south of Jaffa. After the fall of Jerusalem (A.D. 70), it became one of the most populous cities of Judea, and the seat of a celebrated school. (2.) A town on the border of Naphtali ( Joshua 19:33 ). Its later name was Kefr Yemmah, "the village by the sea," on the south shore of Lake Merom. 
BAALATHBEER|Baalah of the well, ( Joshua 19:8 ,  probably the same as Baal,  mentioned in  1 Chronicles 4:33 ,  a city of Simeon. 
GOAH|   ; GOATH  go'-a, go'-ath (go`ah; the King James Version; Septuagint reads ex eklekton lithon): A place named in describing the boundaries of Jerusalem as restored in the "days to come" ( Jeremiah 31:39 ). If Gareb is the Northeast hill, then probably Goah is to be identified with the Northwest hill, which is called by Josephus "the camp of the Assyrians" (BJ, V, vii, 3; xii, 2).  See  JERUSALEM .
ENEGLAIM|Fountain of two calves, a place mentioned only in  Ezek. 47:10 . Somewhere near the Dead Sea. 
BERECHIAH|4 (q.v.), whom Jehovah hath blessed, father of the prophet Zechariah ( Zechariah 1:1 , 7;  Matthew 23:35 ).  Blessed by Jehovah.  (1.) Son of Shimea, and father of Asaph the musician ( 1 Chronicles 6:39 ;  15:17 ). (2.) One of the seven Ephraimite chieftains, son of Meshillemoth ( 2 Chronicles 28:12 ). (3.) The fourth of the five sons of Zerubbabel, of the royal family of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 3:20 ). (4.) The father of the prophet Zechariah ( 1:1 , 7). 
WINESKINS|   WINE-SKINS  (chemeth ( Genesis 21:14  margin), n'odh ( Judges 4:19  "bottle") nebhel, nebhel ( 1 Samuel 10:3  margin), ('obh) ( Job 32:19 ); askos ( Matthew 9:17   Mark 2:22   Luke 5:37 ; compare askoputine, Judith 10:5, the Revised Version (British and American) "leathern bottle")): These words are all used to designate skins for the containing of liquids, nebhel, however, being the most common in the case of wine. The Israelite, like the modern Arabic and Syrian, used mainly the skin of the goat and the sheep, but the skins of the ox and the camel have also been put to this purpose. The skin is removed from the animal by drawing it over the body from the neck downward, half the skin on each of the limbs being also retained. It is then tanned, the hair cut close, turned inside out, and has all the openings save one closed with cords, when it is ready for use. The reference to "a wineskin in the smoke" in  Psalm 119:83  is generally explained on the supposition of its being hung there for mellowing purposes, but this can scarcely be accepted, for wine is never left for any length of time in the skin on account of its imparting a disagreeable flavor to the contents. The explanation of the New Testament passages is that the new wine, still liable to continue fermenting to a small extent at least, was put into new, still expansible skins, a condition that had ceased in the older ones.  See  WINE .  W. M. Christie
IMNA|     im'-na (yimna`): A descendant of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 7:35 ).
OUCHES|An Old English word denoting cavities or sockets in which gems were set ( Exodus 28:11 ). 
TAHTIMHODSHI|The land of the newly inhabited, ( 2 Samuel 24:6 ). It is conjectured that, instead of this word, the reading should be, "the Hittites of Kadesh," the Hittite capital, on the Orontes. It was apparently some region east of the Jordan and north of Gilead. 
RIZIA|     riz'-i-a (ritsya'): An Asherite ( 1 Chronicles 7:39 ).
SHULAMMITE|     shoo'-la-mit ( Songs 6:13 , the King James Version "Shulamite").  See  SHUNAMMITE .
SITHRI|     sith'-ri (cithri): A grandson of Kohath ( Exodus 6:22 ).
SHAALABBIN|Or Shaal'bim, a place of foxes, a town of the tribe of Dan ( Joshua 19:42 ;  Judges 1:35 ). It was one of the chief towns from which Solomon drew his supplies ( 1 Kings 4:9 ). It is probably the modern village of Selbit, 3 miles north of Ajalon. 
HARA|Mountainous land, a province of Assyria ( 1 Chronicles 5:26 ), between the Tigris and the Euphrates, along the banks of the Khabur, to which some of the Israelite captives were carried. It has not been identified. Some think the word a variation of Haran. 
SABTAH|Rest, the third son of Cush ( Genesis 10:7 ;  1 Chronicles 1:9 ). 
BERAIAH|     be-ri'-a (bera'yah, "Yah hath created"): A son of Shimei of the house of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:21 ).
BETHEMEK|   BETH-EMEK  beth-e'-mek (beth ha-'emeq; Bethaemek, "house of the valley"): A town in the territory of Zebulun ( Joshua 19:27 ). It has not been identified, but must be sought somewhere East of Acre, not far from Kabul, the ancient Cabul.
BUL|Rainy, the eighth ecclesiastical month of the year ( 1 Kings 6:38 ), and the second month of the civil year; later called Marchesvan (q.v.). (see  MONTH .) 
SHEEPGATE|One of the gates of Jerusalem mentioned by Nehemiah ( 3:1 ,  32;  12:39 ). It was in the eastern wall of the city. 
GUNITES|   GUNI;   gu'-ni, gu'-nits (guni):  (1) The name of a Naphtalite clan ( Genesis 46:24   Numbers 26:48   1 Chronicles 7:13 ). In  Numbers 26:48  the gentilic "Gunites" is also found, having in Hebrew the same form, with the article.  (2) The head of a Gadite family ( 1 Chronicles 5:15 ).
GATHRIMMON|Press of the pomegranate.  (1.) A Levitical city in the tribe of Dan ( Joshua 19:45 ;  21:24 ;  1 Chronicles 6:69 ). (2.) Another city of the same name in Manasseh, west of the Jordan ( Joshua 21:25 ), called also Bileam ( 1 Chronicles 6:70 ). 
BOSOR|The Chaldee or Aramaic form of the name Beor, the father of Balaam ( 2 Peter 2:15 ). 
JEHONADAB|Jehovah is liberal; or, whom Jehovah impels.  (1.) A son of Shimeah, and nephew of David. It was he who gave the fatal wicked advice to Amnon, the heir to the throne ( 2 Samuel 13:3 -6). He was very "subtil," but unprincipled. (2.) A son of Rechab, the founder of a tribe who bound themselves by a vow to abstain from wine ( Jeremiah 35:6 -19). There were different settlements of Rechabites ( Judges 1:16 ;  4:11 ;  1 Chronicles 2:55 ). (see  RECHABITE .) His interview and alliance with Jehu are mentioned in  2 Kings 10:15 -23. He went with Jehu in his chariot to Samaria. 
UZAL|A wanderer, a descendant of Joktan ( Genesis 10:27 ;  1 Chronicles 1:21 ), the founder apparently of one of the Arab tribes; the name also probably of the province they occupied and of their chief city. 
REPHAEL|Healed of God, one of Shemaiah's sons. He and his brethren, on account of their "strength for service," formed one of the divisions of the temple porters ( 1 Chronicles 26:7 ,  8). 
JESHARELAH|Upright towards God, the head of the seventh division of Levitical musicians ( 1 Chronicles 25:14 ). 
IBRI|     ib'-ri (ibhri, "a Hebrew"): A Merarite Levitt, son of Jaaziah ( 1 Chronicles 24:27 ).
MAAZIAH|Strength or consolation of Jehovah.  (1.) The head of the twenty-fourth priestly course ( 1 Chronicles 24:18 ) in David's reign. (2.) A priest ( Nehemiah 10:8 ). 
MACHIRITE|   MACHIR;   ma'-kir (makhir; Macheir), ma'-kir-it:  (1) The eldest son of Manasseh ( Genesis 50:23 ). In  Numbers 26:29  it is recorded that Machir begat Gilead, but another narrative informs us that the children of Machir "went to Gilead, and took it, and dispossessed the Amorites that were therein. And Moses gave Gilead unto Machir the son of Manasseh; and he dwelt therein" ( Numbers 32:39, 40   Joshua 17:1, 3 ; compare also  1 Chronicles 2:21, 25 ;  1 Chronicles 7:14-17   Deuteronomy 3:15   Joshua 13:31 ). In the song of Deborah, Machir is used as equivalent to Manasseh ( Judges 5:14 ).  (2) Son of Ammiel, dwelling in Lo-debar ( 2 Samuel 9:4, 5 ), a wealthy landowner who protected Mephibosheth (Meribbaal), son of Jonathan, until assured of the friendly intentions of David (compare Ant, VII, ix, 8). Afterward, during the rebellion of Absalom, Machir with others came to David's assistance at Mahanaim, bringing supplies for the king and his men ( 2 Samuel 17:27 ).  John A. Lees
CAPERNAUM|Nahum's town, a Galilean city frequently mentioned in the history of our Lord. It is not mentioned in the Old Testament. After our Lord's expulsion from Nazareth ( Matthew 4:13 -16;  Luke 4:16 -31), Capernaum became his "own city." It was the scene of many Acts and incidents of his life ( Matthew 8:5 ,  14,  15;  9:2 -6,  10-17;  15:1 -20;  Mark 1:32 -34,  etc.). The impenitence and unbelief of its inhabitants after the many evidences our Lord gave among them of the truth of his mission, brought down upon them a heavy denunciation of judgement ( Matthew 11:23 ). It stood on the western shore of the Sea of Galilee. The "land of Gennesaret," near, if not in, which it was situated, was one of the most prosperous and crowded districts of Palestine. This city lay on the great highway from Damascus to Acco and Tyre. It has been identified with Tell Hum, about two miles south-west of where the Jordan flows into the lake. Here are extensive ruins of walls and foundations, and also the remains of what must have been a beautiful synagogue, which it is conjectured may have been the one built by the centurion ( Luke 7:5 ), in which our Lord frequently taught ( John 6:59 ;  Mark 1:21 ;  Luke 4:33 ). Others have conjectured that the ruins of the city are to be found at Khan Minyeh, some three miles further to the south on the shore of the lake. "If Tell Hum be Capernaum, the remains spoken of are without doubt the ruins of the synagogue built by the Roman centurion, and one of the most sacred places on earth. It was in this building that our Lord gave the well-known discourse in  John 6 ; and it was not without a certain strange feeling that on turning over a large block we found the pot of manna engraved on its face, and remembered the words, `I am that bread of life: your fathers did eat manna in the wilderness, and are dead.'", (The Recovery of Jerusalem.) 
ETHKAZIN|   ETH-KAZIN  eth-ka'-zin (`ittah qatsin; the King James Version Ittah Kazin):  A town on the eastern border of Zebulun, mentioned between Gath-hepher and Rimmon ( Joshua 19:13 ). The site is not identified. "Ittah" of the King James Version is due to misunderstanding of the Hebrew letter "he" locale.
TEHINNAH|     te-hin'-a (techinnah, "supplication"; Codex Vaticanus Thaiman; Codex Alexandrinus Thana; Lucian, Theenna): "The father of the city Nahash" ( 1 Chronicles 4:12 ). The verse seems to refer to some post-exilic Jewish settlement, but is utterly obscure.
NAMES|   GOD,  OF  " I. INTRODUCTORY  1. The Phrase "His Name"  2. Classification.  II. PERSONAL NAMES OF GOD IN THE OLD TESTAMENT  1. 'Elohim  2. 'El  3. 'Eloah  4. 'Adhon, 'Adhonay  5. Yahweh (Yahweh)  6. Tsur (Rock)  7. Ka`dhosh  8. Shadday  III. DESCRIPTIVE NAMES OF GOD IN THE OLD TESTAMENT  1. 'Abhir  2. 'El-'Elohe-Yisra'el  3. `Elyon  4. Gibbor  5. 'El-ro'i  6. Tsaddiq  7. Qanna'  8. Yahweh Tsebha'oth  9. "I Am That I Am"  IV. New Testament NAMES OF GOD  1. God  2. Lord  3. Descriptive and Figurative Names  LITERATURE  I. Introduction:  To an extent beyond the appreciation of modern and western minds the people of Biblical times and lands valued the name of the person. They always gave to it symbolical or character meaning.  While our modern names are almost exclusively designatory, and intended merely for identification, the Biblical names were also descriptive, and often prophetic. Religious significance nearly always inhered in the name, a parent relating his child to the Deity, or declaring its consecration to the Deity, by joining the name of the Deity with the service which the child should render, or perhaps commemorating in a name the favor of God in the gracious gift of the child, e.g. Nathaniel ("gift of God"); Samuel ("heard of God"); Adonijah ("Yahweh is my Lord"), etc. It seems to us strange that at its birth, the life and character of a child should be forecast by its parents in a name; and this unique custom has been regarded by an unsympathetic criticism as evidence of the origin of such names and their attendant narratives long subsequent to the completed life itself; such names, for example, as Abraham, Sarah, etc. But that this was actually done, and that it was regarded as a matter of course, is proved by the name given to Our Lord at His birth: "Thou shalt call his name Jesus; for it is he that shall save his people" ( Matthew 1:21 ). It is not unlikely that the giving of a character name represented the parents' purpose and fidelity in the child's training, resulting necessarily in giving to the child's life that very direction, which the name indicated. A child's name, therefore, became both a prayer and a consecration, and its realization in character became often a necessary psychological effect. Great honor or dishonor was attached to a name. The Old Testament writings contain many and varied instances of this. Sometimes contempt for certain reprobate men would be most expressively indicated by a change of name, e.g. the change of Esh-baal, "man of Baal," to Ish-bosheth, "man of shame" ( 2 Samuel 2:8 ), and the omission of Yahweh from the name of the apostate king, Ahaz ( 2 Kings 15:38 , etc.). The name of the last king of Judah was most expressively changed by Nebuchadnezzar from Mattaniah to Zedekiah, to assure his fidelity to his overlord who made him king ( 2 Kings 24:17 ).  See  NAMES, PROPER .  1. The Phrase "His Name":  Since the Scriptures of the Old Testament and New Testament are essentially for purposes of revelation, and since the Hebrews laid such store by names, we should confidently expect them to make the Divine name a medium of revelation of the first importance. People accustomed by long usage to significant character indications in their own names, necessarily would regard the names of the Deity as expressive of His nature. The very phrase "name of Yahweh," or "His name," as applied to the Deity in Biblical usage, is most interesting and suggestive, sometimes expressing comprehensively His revelation in Nature ( Psalm 8:1 ; compare 138:2); or marking the place of His worship, where men will call upon His name ( Deuteronomy 12:5 ); or used as a synonym of His various attributes, e.g. faithfulness ( Isaiah 48:9 ), grace ( Psalm 23:3 ), His honor ( Psalm 79:9 ), etc. "Accordingly, since the name of God denotes this God Himself as He is revealed, and as He desires to be known by His creatures, when it is said that God will make a name for Himself by His mighty deeds, or that the new world of the future shall be unto Him for a name, we can easily understand that the name of God is often synonymous with the glory of God, and that the expressions for both are combined in the utmost variety of ways, or used alternately" (Schultz, Old Testament Theology, English translation, I, 124-25; compare  Psalm 72:19   Isaiah 63:14 ; also Davidson, Old Testament Theol., 37-38).  2. Classification:  From the important place which the Divine name occupies in revelation, we would expect frequency of occurrence and diversity of form; and this is just that which we find to be true. The many forms or varieties of the name will be considered under the following heads:  (1) Absolute or Personal Names,  (2) Attributive, or Qualifying Names, and  (3) Names of God in the New Testament. Naturally and in course of time attributive names tend to crystallize through frequent use and devotional regard into personal names; e.g. the attributive adjective qadhosh, "holy," becomes the personal, transcendental name for Deity in Job and Isaiah. For fuller details of each name reference may be made to separate articles.  II. Absolute or Personal Names of God in the Old Testament:  1. 'Elohim:  The first form of the Divine name in the Bible is 'Elohim, ordinarily translated "God" ( Genesis 1:1 ). This is the most frequently used name in the Old Testament, as its equivalent theos, is in the New Testament, occurring in Genesis alone approximately 200 t. It is one of a group of kindred words, to which belong also 'El and 'Eloah. (1) Its form is plural, but the construction is uniformly singular, i.e. it governs a singular verb or adjective, unless used of heathen divinities ( Psalm 96:5 ;  Psalm 97:7 ). It is characteristic of Hebrew that extension, magnitude and dignity, as well as actual multiplicity, are expressed by the plural. It is not reasonable, therefore, to assume that plurality of form indicates primitive Semitic polytheism. On the contrary, historic Hebrew is unquestionably and uniformly monotheistic.  (2) The derivation is quite uncertain. Gesenius, Ewald and others find its origin in 'ul, "to be strong," from which also are derived 'ayil, "ram," and 'elah, "terebinth"; it is then an expanded plural form of 'el; others trace it to 'alah, "to terrify," and the singular form is found in the infrequent 'eloah, which occurs chiefly in poetical books; BDB inclines to the derivation from 'alah, "to be strong," as the root of the three forms, 'El, `Eloah and 'Elohim, although admitting that the whole question is involved in uncertainty (for full statement see BDB, under the word.); a somewhat fanciful suggestion is the Arabic root 'ul, "to be in front," from which comes the meaning "leader"; and still more fanciful is the suggested connection with the preposition 'el, signifying God as the "goal" of man's life and aspiration. The origin must always lie in doubt, since the derivation is prehistoric, and the name, with its kindred words 'El and 'Eloah, is common to Semitic languages and religions and beyond the range of Hebrew records.  (3) It is the reasonable conclusion that the meaning is "might" or "power"; that it is common to Semitic language; that the form is plural to express majesty or "all-mightiness," and that it is a generic, rather than a specific personal, name for Deity, as is indicated by its application to those who represent the Deity ( Judges 5:8   Psalm 82:1 ) or who are in His presence ( 1 Samuel 28:13 ).  2. 'Eloah:  The singular form of the preceding name, 'Eloah, is confined in its use almost exclusively to poetry, or to poetic expression, being characteristic of the Book of Job, occurring oftener in that book than in all other parts of the Old Testament. It is, in fact, found in Job oftener than the elsewhere more ordinary plural 'Elohim. For derivation and meaning see above under 1 (2). Compare also the Aramaic form, 'elah, found frequently in Ezra and Daniel.  3. 'El:  In the group of Semitic languages, the most common word for Deity is El ('el), represented by the Babylonian ilu and the Arabic 'Allah. It is found throughout the Old Testament, but oftener in Job and Psalms than in all the other books. It occurs seldom in the historical books, and not at all in Lev. The same variety of derivations is attributed to it as to ELOHIM (which see), most probable of which is 'ul, "to be strong." BDB interprets 'ul as meaning "to be in front," from which came 'ayil, "ram" the one in front of the flock, and 'elah, the prominent "terebinth," deriving ['El] from 'alah, "to be strong." It occurs in many of the more ancient names; and, like ['Elohim], it is used of pagan gods. It is frequently combined with nouns or adjectives to express the Divine name with reference to particular attributes or phases of His being, as 'El `Elyon, 'El-Ro'i, etc. (see below under III, "Attributive Names").  4. 'Adhon, 'Adhonay:  An attributive name, which in prehistoric Hebrew had already passed over into a generic name of God, is 'Adhon, 'Adhonay, the latter formed from the former, being the construct plural, 'adhone, with the 1st person ending -ay, which has been lengthened to ay and so retained as characteristic of the proper name and distinguishing it from the possessive "my Lord." the King James Version does not distinguish, but renders both as possessive, "my Lord" ( Judges 6:15 ;  Judges 13:8 ), and as personal name ( Psalm 2:4 ); the Revised Version (British and American) also, in  Psalm 16:2 , is in doubt, giving "my Lord," possessive, in text and "the Lord" in the margin. 'Adhonay, as a name of Deity, emphasizes His sovereignty ( Psalm 2:4   Isaiah 7:7 ), and corresponds closely to Kurios of the New Testament. It is frequently combined with Yahweh ( Genesis 15:8   Isaiah 7:7 , etc.) and with 'Elohim ( Psalm 86:12 ). Its most significant service in Massoretic Text is the use of its vowels to point the unpronounceable tetragrammaton YHWH, indicating that the word " 'Adhonay" should be spoken aloud instead of "Yah-weh." This combination of vowels and consonants gives the transliteration "Yahweh," adopted by the American Standard Revised Version, while the other English Versions of the Bible, since Coverdale, represents the combination by the capitals LORD. Septuagint represents it by Kurios.  5. Yahweh (Yahweh):  The name most distinctive of God as the God of Israel is (Yahweh, a combination of the tetragrammaton (YHWH) with the vowels of 'Adhonay, transliterated as Yehowah, but read aloud by the Hebrews 'adhonay). While both derivation and meaning are lost to us in the uncertainties of its ante-Biblical origin, the following inferences seem to be justified by the facts:  (1) This name was common to religions other than Israel's, according to Friedr. Delitzsch, Hommel, Winckler, and Guthe (EB, under the word), having been found in Babylonian inscriptions. Ammonite, Arabic and Egyptian names appear also to contain it (compare Davidson, Old Testament Theol., 52); but while, like 'Elohim, it was common to primitive Semitic religion, it became Israel's distinctive name for the Deity.  (2) It was, therefore, not first made known at the call of Moses ( Exodus 3:13-16 ;  Exodus 6:2-8 ), but, being already known, was at that time given a larger revelation and interpretation: God, to be known to Israel henceforth under the name "Yahweh" and in its fuller significance, was the One sending Moses to deliver Israel; "when I shall say unto them, The God of your fathers hath sent me unto you; and they shall say to me, What is his name? what shall I say unto them? And God said. I WILL BE THAT I WILL BE. say. I WILL BE hath sent me" ( Exodus 3:13, 14  margin). The name is assumed as known in the narrative of Genesis; it also occurs in pre-Mosaic names ( Exodus 6:20   1 Chronicles 2:25 ;  1 Chronicles 7:8 ).  (3) The derivation is from the archaic chawah, "to be," better "to become," in Biblical Hebrew hayah; this archaic use of w for y appears also in derivatives of the similar chayah, "to live," e.g. chawwah in  Genesis 3:20 .  (4) It is evident from the interpretative passages ( Exodus 3 ;  Exodus 6 ) that the form is the fut. of the simple stem (Qal) and not future of the causative (Hiph`il) stem in the sense "giver of life"-an idea not borne out by any of the occurrences of the word. The fanciful theory that the word is a combination of the future, present and perfect tenses of the verb, signifying "the One who will be, is, and was," is not to be taken seriously (Stier, etc., in Oehler's Old Testament Theology, in the place cited.).  (5) The meaning may with some confidence be inferred from Origen's transliteration, Iao, the form in Samaritan, Iabe, the form as combined in Old Testament names, and the evident signification in  Exodus 3  and other passages, to be that of the simple future, yahweh, "he will be." It does not express causation, nor existence in a metaphysical sense, but the covenant promise of the Divine presence, both at the immediate time and in the Messianic age of the future. And thus it became bound up with the Messianic hope, as in the phrase, "the Day of Yahweh," and consequently both it and the Septuagint translation Kurios were applied by the New Testament as titles of Christ.  (6) It is the personal name of God, as distinguished from such generic or essential names as 'El, 'Elohim, Shadday, etc. Characteristic of the Old Testament is its insistence on the possible knowledge of God as a person; and Yahweh is His name as a person. It is illogical, certainly, that the later Hebrews should have shrunk from its pronunciation, in view of the appropriateness of the name and of the Old Testament insistence on the personality of God, who as a person has this name. the American Standard Revised Version quite correctly adopts the transliteration "Yahweh" to emphasize its significance and purpose as a personal name of God revealed.  6. Tsur (Rock):  Five times in the "Song" of Moses ( Deuteronomy 32:4, 15, 18, 30, 31 ) the word tsur, "Rock," is used as a title of God. It occurs also in the Psalms, Isaiah and poetical passages of other books, and also in proper names, Elizur, Zuriel, etc. Once in the King James Version ( Isaiah 44:8 ) it is translated "God," but "Rock" in the American Standard Revised Version and the American Revised Version, margin. The effort to interpret this title as indicating the animistic origin of Old Testament religion is unnecessary and a pure product of the imagination. It is customary for both Old Testament and New Testament writers to use descriptive names of God: "rock," "fortress," "shield," "light," "bread," etc., and is in harmony with all the rich figurativeness of the Scriptures; the use of the article in many of the cases cited further corroborates the view that the word is intended to be a descriptive title, not the name of a Nature-deity. It presents the idea of God as steadfast: "The appellation of God as tsur, `rock,' `safe retreat,' in Deuteronomy refers to this" (Oehler, Old Testament Theology). It often occurs, in a most striking figure, with the pers. suffix as "my rock," "their rock," to express confidence ( Psalm 28:1 ).  7. Kadhosh:  The name (qadhosh, "holy") is found frequently in Isaiah and Psalms, and occasionally in the other prophets. It is characteristic of Isaiah, being found 32 times in that book. It occurs often in the phrase qedhosh yisra'el, "Holy One of Israel." The derivation and meaning remain in doubt, but the customary and most probable derivation is from qadhash, "to be separate," which best explains its use both of man and of the Deity. When used of God it signifies: (1) His transcendence, His separateness above all other beings, His aloneness as compared to other gods; (2) His peculiar relation to His people Israel unto whom He separated Himself, as He did not unto other nations. In the former sense Isaiah used it of His sole deity (40:25), in the latter of His peculiar and unchanging covenant-relation to Israel (43:3; 48:17), strikingly, expressed in the phrase "Holy One of Israel." Qadhosh was rather attributive than personal, but became personal in the use of such absolute theists as Job and Isaiah. It expresses essential Deity, rather than personal revelation.  8. Shadday:  In the patriarchal literature, and in Job particularly, where it is put into the mouths of the patriarchs, this name appears sometimes in the compound 'el shadday, sometimes alone. While its root meaning also is uncertain, the suggested derivation from shadhadh, "to destroy," "to terrify," seems most probable, signifying the God who is manifested by the terribleness of His mighty acts. "The Storm God," from shadha', "to pour out," has been suggested, but is improbable; and even more so the fanciful she, and day, meaning "who is sufficient." Its use in patriarchal days marks an advance over looser Semitic conceptions to the stricter monotheistic idea of almightiness, and is in accord with the early consciousness of Deity in race or individual as a God of awe, or even terror. Its monotheistic character is in harmony with its use in the Abrahamic times, and is further corroborated by its parallel in Septuagint and New Testament, pantokrator, "all-powerful."  III. Descriptive Names of God in the Old Testament:  It is often difficult to distinguish between the personal and the attributive names of God, the two divisions necessarily shading into each other. Some of the preceding are really attributive, made personal by usage. The following are the most prominent descriptive or attributive names.  1. 'Abhir:  This name ('abhir), translated in English Versions of the Bible "Mighty One," is always combined with Israel or Jacob; its root is 'abhar, "to be strong" from which is derived the word 'ebher, "pinion," used of the strong wing of the eagle ( Isaiah 40:31 ), figuratively of God in  Deuteronomy 32:11 . It occurs in Jacob's blessing ( Genesis 49:24 ), in a prayer for the sanctuary ( Psalm 132:2, 5 ), and in Isaiah (1:24; 49:26:00; 60:16), to express the assurance of the Divine strength in behalf of the oppressed in Israel ( Isaiah 1:24 ), or in behalf of Israel against his oppressors; it is interesting to note that this name was first used by Jacob himself.  2. 'El-'Elohe-Israel:  The name 'El is combined with a number of descriptive adjectives to represent God in His various attributes; and these by usage have become names or titles of God. For the remarkable phrase 'EL-'ELOHE-ISRAEL ( Genesis 33:20 ), see separate article  3. `Elyon:  This name (`elyon, "highest") is a derivative of `alah, "to go up." It is used of persons or things to indicate their elevation or exaltation: of Israel, favored above other nations ( Deuteronomy 26:19 ), of the aqueduct of "the upper pool" ( Isaiah 7:3 ), etc. This indicates that its meaning when applied to God is the "Exalted One," who is lifted far above all gods and men. It occurs alone ( Deuteronomy 32:8   Psalm 18:13 ), or in combination with other names of God, most frequently with El ( Genesis 14:18   Psalm 78:35 ), but also with Yahweh ( Psalm 7:17 ;  Psalm 97:9 ), or with Elohim ( Psalm 56:2  the King James Version;  Psalm 78:56 ). Its early use ( Genesis 14:18 f ) points to a high conception of Deity, an unquestioned monotheism in the beginnings of Hebrew history.  4. Gibbor:  The ancient Hebrews were in constant struggle for their land and their liberties, a struggle most intense and patriotic in the heroic days of Saul and David, and in which there was developed a band of men whose great deeds entitled them to the honorable title "mighty men" of valor (gibborim). These were the knights of David's "Round Table." In like manner the Hebrew thought of his God as fighting for him, and easily then this title was applied to God as the Mighty Man of war, occurring in David's psalm of the Ark's Triumphant Entry ( Psalm 24:8 ), in the allegory of the Messiah-King ( Psalm 45:3 ), either alone or combined with El ( Isaiah 9:6   Jeremiah 32:18 ), and sometimes with Yahweh ( Isaiah 42:13 ).  5. 'El-Ro'i:  When Hagar was fleeing from Sarah's persecutions, Yahweh spoke to her in the wilderness of Shur, words of promise and cheer. Whereupon "she called the name of Yahweh that spake unto her, Thou art El roi" ( Genesis 16:13  margin). In the text the word ro'i, deriv. of ra'ah, "to see," is translated "that seeth," literally, "of sight." This is the only occurrence of this title in the Old Testament.  6. Tsaddiq:  One of the covenant attributes of God, His righteousness, is spoken of so often that it passes from adjective to substantive, from attribute to name, and He is called "Righteous" (tsaddiq), or "the Righteous One." The word is never transliterated but always translated in English Versions of the Bible, although it might just as properly be considered a Divine name as `Elyon or Qadhosh. The root tsadhaq, "to be straight" or "right," signifies fidelity to a standard, and is used of God's fidelity to His own nature and to His covenant-promise ( Isaiah 41:10 ;  Isaiah 42:6 ; compare  Hosea 2:19 ); it occurs alone ( Psalm 34:17 ), with El ( Deuteronomy 32:4 ), with Elohim ( Ezra 9:15   Psalm 7:9 ;  Psalm 116:5 ), but most frequently with Yahweh ( Psalm 129:4 , etc.). In  Exodus 9:27  Pharaoh, in acknowledging his sin against Yahweh, calls Him `Yahweh the Righteous,' using the article. The suggestive combination, "Yahweh our Righteousness," is the name given to David's "righteous Branch" ( Jeremiah 23:6 ) and properly should be taken as a proper noun-the name of the Messiah-King.  7. Kanna:  Frequently in the Pentateuch, most often in the 3 versions of the Commandments ( Exodus 20:5 ;  Exodus 34:14   Deuteronomy 5:9 ), God is given the title "Jealous" (qanna'), most specifically in the phrase "Yahweh, whose name is Jealous" ( Exodus 34:14 ). This word, however, did not bear the evil meaning now associated with it in our usage, but rather signified "righteous zeal," Yahweh's zeal for His own name or glory (compare  Isaiah 9:7 , "the zeal of Yahweh," qin'ah; also  Zechariah 1:14 ;  Zechariah 8:2 ).  8. Yahweh Tsebha'-oth:  Connected with the personal and covenant name Yahweh, there is found frequently the word Sabaoth (tsebha'oth, "hosts"). Invariably in the Old Testament it is translated "hosts" ( Isaiah 1:9   Psalm 46:7, 11 , etc.), but in the New Testament it is transliterated twice, both in the Greek and English ( Romans 9:29   James 5:4 ). The passage in Roman is a quotation from  Isaiah 1:9  through Septuagint, which does not translate, but transliterates the Hebrew. Origin and meaning are uncertain. It is used of heavenly bodies and earthly forces ( Genesis 2:1 ); of the army of Israel ( 2 Samuel 8:16 ); of the Heavenly beings ( Psalm 103:21 ;  Psalm 148:2   Daniel 4:35 ). It is probable that the title is intended to include all created agencies and beings, of which Yahweh is maker and leader.  9. "I Am That I Am":  When God appeared to Moses at Sinai, commissioning him to deliver Israel; Moses, being well aware of the difficulty of impressing the people, asked by what name of God he should speak to them: "They shall say to me, What is his name?" Then "God said unto Moses, I AM THAT I AM. say. I AM hath sent me unto you" ( Exodus 3:14 ). The name of the Deity given here is similar to Yahweh except that the form is not 3rd person future, as in the usual form, but the 1st person ('ehyeh), since God is here speaking of Himself. The optional reading in the American Revised Version, margin is much to be preferred: "I WILL BE THAT I WILL BE," indicating His covenant pledge to be with and for Israel in all the ages to follow. For further explanation see above, II, 5.  IV. New Testament Names of God.  The variety of names which characterizes the Old Testament is lacking in the New Testament, where we are all but limited to two names, each of which corresponds to several in the Old Testament. The most frequent is the name "God" (Theos) occurring over 1,000 t, and corresponding to El, Elohim, etc., of the Old Testament.  1. God:  It may, as ['Elohim], be used by accommodation of heathen gods; but in its true sense it expresses essential Deity, and as expressive of such it is applied to Christ as to the Father ( John 20:28   Romans 9:5 ).  2. Lord:  Five times "Lord" is a translation of despotes ( Luke 2:29   Acts 4:24   2 Peter 2:1  the King James Version;  Jude 1:4   Revelation 6:10  the King James Version). In each case there is evident emphasis on sovereignty and correspondence to the 'Adhon of the Old Testament. The most common Greek word for Lord is Kurios, representing both Yahweh and 'Adhonai of the Old Testament, and occurring upwards of 600 times. Its use for Yahweh was in the spirit of both the Hebrew scribes, who pointed the consonants of the covenant name with the vowels of Adhonay, the title of dominion, and of the Septuagint, which rendered this combination as Kurios. Consequently quotations from the Old Testament in which Yahweh occurs are rendered by Kurios. It is applied to Christ equally with the Father and the Spirit, showing that the Messianic hopes conveyed by the name Yahweh were for New Testament writers fulfilled in Jesus Christ; and that in Him the long hoped for appearance of Yahweh was realized.  3. Descriptive and Figurative Names:  As in the Old Testament, so in the New Testament various attributive, descriptive or figurative names are found, often corresponding to those in the Old Testament. Some of these are: The "Highest" or "Most High" hupsistos), found in this sense only in Luke (1:32, 35, 76; 2:14, etc.), and Equivalent to 'Elyon (see III, 3, above); "Almighty," Pantokrator ( 2 Corinthians 6:18   Revelation 1:8 , etc.), corresponding to Shadday (see II, 8 above; see also ALMIGHTY); "Father," as in the Lord's Prayer, and elsewhere ( Matthew 6:9 ;  Matthew 11:25   John 17:25   2 Corinthians 6:18 ); "King" ( 1 Timothy 1:17 ); "King of kings" ( 1 Timothy 6:15 ); "King of kings," "Lord of lords" ( Revelation 17:14 ;  Revelation 19:16 ); "Potentate" ( 1 Timothy 6:15 ); "Master" (Kurios,  Ephesians 6:9   2 Peter 2:1 ;  Revelation 6:10 ); "Shepherd," "Bishop" ( 1 Peter 2:25 ).  LITERATURE.  Theology of Old Testament by various authors: Oehler, Schultz, Davidson; Delitzsch, Psychology of the Old Testament; H.P. Smith, "Theophorous Names of OT" in Old Testament and Semitic Studies; Gray, HPN; "God" in HDB and EB.  Edward Mack  NAMES, PROPER  I. THE FORM OF HEBREW NAMES  1. Various Types  2. Vocalization  3. Transposition of Parts  4. Methods of Abbreviation  II. THE RANGE OF PROPER NAMES  1. Personal Names  (1) Not Exclusively Descriptive  (2) Drawn from a Wide Field  (3) Influences Leading to Choice  (4) Popularity of Names: Hard to Determine  2. Geographical Names  III. CHARACTERISTICS OF BIBLICAL REFERENCES  1. Derivation of Names Manifest  2. The Narrator's Only Concern  3. Allusions Linked with Names  I. The Form of Hebrew Names.  1. Various Types:  The Hebrew proper name consists of a single word, a phrase, or a sentence.  (1) Where the name is a single word, other than a verb, it may be  (a) a common noun, concrete, as Barak, "lightning," Tola, "crimson worm," Elon, "oak," Achsah, "anklet," Deborah, "bee" or abstract, as Uzzah, "strength," Manoah, "rest," Hannah, "grace"; or either abstract or concrete, as Zebul, "habitation";  (b) a participle, as Saul, "asked," Zeruiah, "cleft";  (c) an adjective, as Ikkesh, "perverse," Maharai, "impetuous," Shimei, "famous"; or  (d) a word that may be either an adjective or an abstract noun according to circumstances. Such are formations after the norm of qaTTul, as shammua`, which are generally adjectives; and formations by means of the ending -am or -on, as Adullam, Zalmon, Gideon, or, with the rejection of the final -n, Shilo(h) and Solomo(n).  (2) The name may be a phrase, consisting of  (a) two nouns, as Penuel, "face of God," Samuel, "name of God," Ish-bosheth, "man of shame"; or  (b) an adjective and a noun, as Jedidiah, "beloved of Yahweh"; or  (c) a preposition and one or more nouns, as Besodeiah, "in the intimacy of Yahweh" ( Nehemiah 3:6 ).  When the name is a sentence, the predicate may be  (a) a noun, the copula being implied, as Abijah, "Yah is a father," Eliab, "God is a father," Elimelech, "God is king"; or  (b) an adjective, as Tobijah, "Yah is good" ( Zechariah 6:10 ); or  (c) a participle, as Obed-edom, "Edom is serving"; or  (d) a finite verb. This last type exhibits five or six varieties: the subject stands before a perfect, as Jonathan, "Yahweh hath given," Jehoshaphat, "Yahweh hath judged," Eleazar, "God hath helped," Elkanah, "God hath formed"; or before an imperfect, as Eliahba, "God hideth Himself"; or the subject comes after a perfect, as Benaiah, "Yahweh hath built," Shephatiah, "Yahweh hath judged," Asahel, "God hath made; or after an imperfect, as Jezreel, "God doth sow." Very often the subject is the pronoun included or implied in the verbal form, as Nathan, "he hath given," Hillel, "he hath praised," Jair, "he enlighteneth," Jephthah, "he openeth." Occasionally the predicate contains an object of the verb, as Shealtiel, "I have asked God" ( Ezra 3:2 ), or a prepositional phrase, as Hephzibah, "my delight is in her" ( 2 Kings 21:1 ). The sentence-name is usually a declaration, but it may be an exhortation or a prayer, as Jerub-baal, "let Baal strive," and Hoshea, "save!" ( Numbers 13:16 ), or it may be a question, as Micaiah, "who is like Yahweh?" All of the foregoing illustrations have been taken from the Books of Judges and Samuel, unless otherwise noted.  2. Vocalization:  The proper name is treated as one word, whether on analysis it consists of a single word, a phrase, or a sentence; and as such it is subject to the laws of accent and quantity which govern the Hebrew word.  (1) A common noun used as a name undergoes the variations of pronunciation due to the custom of lengthening a short vowel in pause and to the laws which control the aspiration of certain labials, linguals, and palatals. Thus, the name Perez, "breach," which appears also as Pharez in the King James Version of the Old Testament, occurs in the Hebrew text in the four forms perets, parets, pherets and pharets ( Ruth 4:18   Nehemiah 11:4, 6 ).  (2) In a name consisting of a phrase the normal advance of the accent as usual causes the loss of a pretonic vowel, as is indicated by the suspended letter in Jedidiah, "beloved of Yahweh"; requires a short vowel in a closed unaccented syllable, as in Mahalal'el, "praise of God"; allows contraction, as in Beth-el, "house of God"; and occasions the return of a segholate noun to its primitive form, as in Abdiel, "servant of God," where the vowel i is an archaism which has lingered in compound names, but has generally disappeared elsewhere in speech.  (3) Names which consist of a sentence are also accented as one word, and the pronunciation is modified accordingly. The synonyms Eliam and Ammiel, "God is a kinsman," not only exhibit the common archaism in the retention of the vowel i, but the name Eliam also shows the characteristic lengthening of the vowel in the final accented syllable, so common in nouns. The four forms Eliphelet, Eliphalet, Elpelet and Elpalet, meaning "God is deliverance," represent the variations of the Hebrew due to the causes already mentioned ( 1 Chronicles 3:8 ;  1 Chronicles 14:5, 7 ; see the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American)). The requirements regarding the ellsion and the quantity and quality of vowels, on the shifting of the accent, are also regularly met by the various types of sentence-names in which the predicate is a verb Thus, the personal names 'elishama` and 'elnathan (subject followed by verb in the perfect); 'elyaqim, 'elyahba', and yehoyakhin (subject and imperfect); gedhalyah, yekholyahu, barakh'el, in which the first vowel is protected by the implied reduplication of the Piel species, benayah, `asah'el, and `asah-'el, `asi'el, chazah'el and chaza'-el and pedhah'el (perfect and subject); yigdalyahu, yibhneyah, ya`asi'el, yachdi'el, yehallel'el, yesimi'el (imperfect and subject); yerubba`al and yashobh`am (jussive and subject; u in sharpened, and o in closed, syllable; in Jashobeam the first long vowel is retained by a secondary accent, marked by metheg); nathan and yiphtach, i.e. Jephthah. Ibneiah shows the customary apocopation of the imperfect of Lamedh-he verbs; and the names Benaiah to Pedahel show the methods of combining the perfect of such verbs with a following element. The short vowel of the final closed syllable of the imperfect is elided, if the final consonant is permitted to begin the syllable of the next element of the name, as in Jezreel, Jekabzeel, Jerahmeel, Ezekiel, Jehizkiah (see the Hebrew form of these names); but it is not elided in Ishmael, although the consonant is attached to the following syllable; and elision is avoided, as in Jiphthah-el, by keeping the ultimate and penultimate syllables distinct. Jehucal, a Hophal imperfect, is peculiar in not lengthening the vowel in the accented final syllable, when the verb is used as a personal name.  3. Transposition of Parts:  When the name was a sentence in Hebrew, its constituent parts could be transposed without changing the meaning. Thus the father of Bathsheba was called Ammiel, "a kinsman is God," and Eliam, "God is a kinsman" ( 2 Samuel 11:3   1 Chronicles 3:5 ); and similarly, in letters written from Palestine to the king of Egypt in the 14th century B.C., Ilimilki is also called Milkili, the name in either form signifying "God is king." Ahaziah, king of Judah, is called Jehoahaz (compare  2 Chronicles 21:17  with 22:1), a legitimate transposition of the verb and subject, and meaning in each case, "Yahweh hath laid hold."  Not only did transposition take place, but the substitution of a cognate root and even the use of a different part of the verb also occurred. Thus King Jehoiachin ( 2 Kings 24:6   Jeremiah 52:31 ) was known also as Jeconiah ( Jeremiah 24:1 ;  Jeremiah 28:4 ) and Coniah ( Jeremiah 22:24, 28 ;  Jeremiah 37:1 ). The two names Jehoiachin and Jeconiah have exactly the same meaning, "Yahweh doth establish"; and Coniah is a synonym, "the establishing of Yahweh." The Divine name which begins Jehoiachin is transferred to the end in Jeconiah and Coniah; and the Hiphil imperfect of the verb kun, which is seen in Jehoiachin, has been replaced by the Qal imperfect of the verb kanan in Jeconiah, and by the construct infinitive of the same species in Coniah. Parallel cases occur in Assyrian and Babylonian literature, among which the two forms of the king's name, Zamama-shum-iddina and Zamama-nadin-shum, exhibit both the transposition of constituent parts and an interchange of preterite and participle.  4. Methods of Abbreviation:  Twin forms like Abiner and Abner, Abishalom and Absalom, Elizaphan and Elzaphan, are not the full name and its abbreviation by syncopation, but are merely two variant, equally legitimate, modes of combining the constituent parts. The common methods of shortening were:  (1) contraction by the rejection of a weak consonant or the apocopation of a final unaccented vowel, notably illustrated by the divine name yeho- at the beginning and -yahu at the end of proper names: hence, Jehoash became Joash ( 2 Kings 12:1, 19 ), and Amaziahu became Amaziah ( 2 Kings 14:1, 8  Hebrew text, and 8);  (2) abbreviation of composite geographical names by the omission of the generic noun or its equivalent: Jerusalem, which to the Hebrews meant "foundation of peace," was shortened to Salem, "peace" ( Psalm 76:2 ); Kiriath-baal, "city of Baal" ( Joshua 15:60 ), to Baal or Baalah ( Joshua 15:9, 10 ; compare  2 Samuel 6:2 ); Beeshterah, "house or temple of Astarte," to Ashtaroth; Beth-lebaoth, "house of lionesses," to Lebaoth; Beth-azmaveth to Azmaveth; Beth-rehob to Rehob; Beth-bamoth to Bamoth (M S, l. 27, with  Numbers 21:19 ); Beth-baal-meon to Baal-meon ( Numbers 32:38   Joshua 13:17 ); the same custom existed among the Moabites who spoke of this town indifferently as Beth-baal-meon and Baal-meon (M S, ll.9, 30);  (3) abbreviation by the omission of the divine name: thus the name of the idolater Micaiah, which means, "who is like Yahweh?" ( Judges 17:1, 4  (Hebrew)), was shortened to Micah, "who is like?" ( Judges 17:5, 8 ); and similarly in the case of three other men, namely the prophet (Micaiah,  Jeremiah 26:18  the English Revised Version, and Micah,  Micah 1:1 ), the Levite musician ( Nehemiah 12:35  with  Nehemiah 11:17, 22 ), and the father of Abdon ( 2 Kings 22:12  with  2 Chronicles 34:20 ).  The king of Judah, Yauhazi, as he was known to the Assyrians, i.e. Jehoahaz, "Yahweh hath laid hold," is called simply Ahaz, "he hath laid hold," in the Hebrew records. The town of Jabneel, "God doth cause to be built," was shortened to Jabneh, "he doth cause to be built" ( Joshua 15:11   2 Chronicles 26:6 ; compare  1Ma 4:15 ); Paltiel, "deliverance of God," was curtailed to Palti, "deliverance" ( 1 Samuel 25:44   2 Samuel 3:15 ); Abijah, "Yahweh is father," to Abi ( 2 Chronicles 29:1  with  2 Kings 18:2 ); and Bamoth-baal, "high places of Baal," to Bamoth ( Joshua 13:17  with  Numbers 21:19 ). Abdi, Othni, Uzzi, and not a few other similar names, probably represent curtailment of this sort. The omission of the Divine title has parallels in Assyrian and Babylonian literature: thus Nabu-nadin-ziri and Nabu-shum-ukin were called Nadinu and Shum-ukin respectively (Dynastic Tablet number 2, col. iv, 4, 5, with Babylonian Chron., col. i, 13, 16).  (4) Abbreviation by the elision of the initial consonant, yet so that the remainder is a synonymous name of complete grammatical form. The name of King Hezekiah was written by the Hebrews both yechizchiyah, "Yahweh doth strengthen," and chizchiyah, "Yahweh is strength." The two forms interchange many times in  2 Chronicles 29, 30, 31, 32, 33 . Similarly, Jeconiah was shortened to Coniah, as has already been noticed; the name of the town Jekabzeel, "God bringeth together," to Kabzeel, "God's bringing together" ( Nehemiah 11:25  with  Joshua 15:21   2 Samuel 23:20 ); Meshelemiah, "Yahweh is recompensing," to Shelemiah, "Yahweh's recompensing" ( 1 Chronicles 26:1, 2  with  1 Chronicles 26:14 ); Meshullam, "recompensed," to Shallum, "recompensed" ( 1 Chronicles 9:11   Nehemiah 11:11  with  1 Chronicles 6:12   Ezra 7:2 ).  II. The Range of Proper Names.  1. Personal Names:  (1) Not Exclusively Descriptive.  Simonis in his Onomasticum, published in 1741, and Gesenius in his Thesaurus, issued during the years from 1835 to 1853, endeavored to interpret the proper names as though they were ordinarily intended to characterize the person who bore them. Embarrassed by theory, Gesenius translated Malchiel by "rex Dei, h. e. a Deo constitutus"; and Simonis translated Malchi-shua by "regis auxilium, i.e. auxilium s. salus regi patri praestita"; Ammizabad was rendered by Gesenius "famulus largitoris, h.e. Jehovae," and by Simonis "populum (i.e. copiosissimam liberorum turbam) donavit"; Gesenius translated Gedaliah "quem Jehova educavit vel roboravit," Zerahiah "cui Jehova ortum dedit," Jehozadak "quem Jehova justum fecit," and Joel "cui Jehova est deus, i.e. cultor Jehovae"; but Simonis rendered Joel by "Jehoua (eat) Deus.... vel (cui) Jehoua Deus (eat)." Now Malchiel means "God is king," Malchi-shua "the king, i.e. God, is salvation" (compare Joshua), Ammizabad "the Kinsman hath endowed," Gedaliah "Yah is great," Zerahiah "Yahweh hath risen in splendor," Jehozadak "Yahweh is righteous," and Joel, if a compound name, "Yah is God." A moment's reflection makes clear that these names do not describe the persons who bear them, but in every case speak of God. They emphasize the important facts that personal names might be, and often were, memorial and doctrinal, and that personal names were a part of the ordinary speech of the people, full of meaning and intelligible to all, subject to the phonetic laws of the Hebrews, and obedient to the rules of grammar.  (2) Drawn from a Wide Field.  Parents named their children, and contemporaries dubbed people, from physical and spiritual traits, whether a beauty or a blemish; thus Hophni, "pertaining to the fist," Japhia, "gleaming," Ikkesh, "perverse," Ira, "watchful," Gareb, "rough-skinned," and Hiddai, "joyful." Children were called by the names of natural objects, as Peninnah, "coral," Rimmon, "pomegranate," Tamar, "palm tree," Nahash, "serpent," Eglah, "heifer," Aiah, "bird of prey," and Laish, "lion"; or after kinsfolk or remoter members of the clan, as Absalom's daughter Tamar bore the name of her father's beautiful sister, and as the priest Phinehas took his strange name from the noted Phinehas, who belonged to the same father's house in earlier days. Or the name given to the child furnished a memorial of events in the national history, like Ichabod, "the glory is not" ( 1 Samuel 4:21 ), and probably Obed-edom, "Edom is serving" (compare  1 Samuel 14:47 ;  1 Samuel 21:7 ); or it told of circumstances attending the child's birth, as Saul, "asked," and Elishama, "God hath heard"; or it embodied an article of the parent's creed, as Joab and Abijah, "Yah is a father," Joel, "Yah is God"; or it expressed a hope concerning the child or bore witness to a prophecy, as Jedidiah, "beloved of Yahweh," and Solomon, "peaceable" ( 2 Samuel 12:25   1 Chronicles 22:9 ). Sometimes the name of the tribe or race to which a man belonged became his popular designation, as Cushi, "Cushite." All of these examples have been cited from the records of one period of Israel's history, the times of Samuel and David.  (3) Influences Leading to Choice.  The people in general gathered names for their children freely from all parts of this wide field, but in certain circles influences were at work which tended to restrict the choice to a smaller area. These influences were religious:  (a) In homes of piety conscious nearness to God on the part of the parents naturally prompted them to bestow religious names upon their children. The name may be without distinct religious mark in its form and meaning, as Ephraim, "double fruitfulness," Manasseh, "making to forget," and yet have been given in acknowledgment of God's grace and be a constant reminder of His goodness ( Genesis 41:51, 52 ); or the name may be religious in form, as Shemaiah, "Yah hath heard," and publicly testify to the parents' gratitude to God.  (b) The covenant relation, which Yahweh entered into with Israel, made the name Yahweh, and that aspect of God's character which is denoted by this name, peculiarly precious to the people of God, and thenceforth the word Yahweh became a favorite element in the personal names of the Israelites, though not, of course, to the exclusion of the great name El, "God."  (c) Among the kings in the line of David, the consciousness of their formal adoption by Yahweh to be His vicegerents on the throne of Israel ( 2 Samuel 7   Psalm 2 ) found expression in the royal names. Yahweh, the God of Israel, was acknowledged in the personal name Abijah, borne by the son and successor of Rehoboam. But his was an isolated case, unless the name Asa is an abbreviated form. But with Jehoshaphat, Abijah's grandson, early in the 9th century, the custom became established. Henceforth it was conventional for the king of Judah to have for his name a sentence with Yahweh as its subject. The only exceptions among the 16 successors of Asa on the throne were Manasseh and his son Amon, both of whom were notoriously apostate from Yahweh. The full name of Ahaz was Jehoahaz. Josiah's son Shallum as king was known as Jehoahaz; and his brother Eliakim, when placed on the throne by Pharaoh-necoh, was given the name Jehoiakim.  (d) Akin to the influence exerted by the relation of the kings to the God of Israel, and manifesting almost equal power contemporaneously with it, was the influence of official connection with the sanctuary, either as priests or as subordinate ministers, and it frequently led to the choice of an ecclesiastical name containing the word God or Yahweh. During the five centuries and a half, beginning near the close of Solomon's reign and extending to the end of Nehemiah's administration, 22 high priests held office, so far as their names have been preserved in the records. Of these pontiffs 17 bear names which are sentences with Yahweh as subject, and another is a sentence with El as subject. The materials for investigation along this line are not complete, as they are in the case of the kings, and ratios derived from them are apt to be erroneous; but evidently the priests of Yahweh's temple at Jerusalem not only recognized the appropriateness for themselves and their families of names possessing a general religious character, but came to favor such as expressly mentioned God, especially those which mentioned God by His name of Yahweh.  (4) Popularity of Names: Hard to Determine.  Until abundant data come to light for all periods of the history, it is precarious to attempt to determine the relative popularity of the various kinds and types of names in any one generation, or to compare period with period with respect to the use or neglect of a particular class of names. For, first, in no period are the names which have been transmitted by the Hebrew records many as compared with the thousands in use at the time; and, secondly, the records deal with the historical event which was conspicuous at the moment, and rarely mention persons other than the actors in this event.  At one time men and women from the middle class of society are asserting themselves in the national life, and the personal names current in the families of farmers, shopkeepers and soldiers obtain place in the annals; at another time, when the activities of the court are of paramount importance, it is mainly names that were current in official circles which are chronicled; at yet another period, when matters of the national worship engaged the attention of the state, ecclesiastics and laymen from pious families, whose names were quite likely to have a religious meaning, receive mention. Very few names outside of the particular circle concerned are preserved in the records. It is unwarranted, therefore, to draw inferences regarding the relative use of particular names, secular names, for instance, at different periods of the history of Israel, by comparing the number of these names found in a record of political uprisings in the army with the number of similar names in the narrative of an episode which occurred at a later date and in which only priests took part. It is comparing things that differ. It is comparing the number of certain names current in military circles with the number of the same names among ecclesiastics, in order to learn whether these names were more common among the people as a whole in the one period than in the other.  2. Geographical Names:  The brine of its waters led the ancient Hebrews to call the Dead Sea the Salt Sea. Bethesda, "house of mercy," received its name from the belief in the healing virtue of its waters; Lebanon, "white," from the snows that cover its crest; Sidon on the Mediterranean Sea and Bethsaida on the Sea of Galilee, from their fisheries; Tyre, from the great rock in the sea on which it was built; the valley of Elah, from the terebinth tree; Luz, from the almond tree; Shittim, from the acacia groves on the eastern terrace of the Jordan valley; and Jericho, from the fragrance of its palms and balsams. The "crags of the wild goats" and En-gedi, "kid spring" ( 1 Samuel 24:1, 2 ), were in a desolate, rocky region where the wild goats had their home; Aijalon signifies "place of harts," and Etam denotes a "place of beasts and birds of prey." The hopes of a people and pride in their town were expressed in names like Joppa, "beauty," Tirzah, "pleasantness," Janoah, "rest," Shiloh, "tranquillity," and Salem, "peace." The resemblance of the Sea of Galilee in shape to a harp secured for it its ancient name of Chinnereth. Poetic imagination saw in majestic Mt. Hermon likeness to a soldier's breastplate, and forthwith the mountain was called Serion and Senir. The sanctuary of a deity might give name to a town, hence, Beth-dagon, Beth-anath, and Ashtaroth. Sometimes the name of a place commemorated a victory, as rock Oreb, rock Zeeb, and Eben-ezer ( Judges 7:25   1 Samuel 7:12 ); or enshrined a religious transaction or experience, Beth-el and Beracah ( Genesis 28:17-19   2 Chronicles 20:26 ); or told of a migration, as when colonists gave the name of their native town to their new settlement ( Judges 1:23-26 ). Often the name of the founder or other famous inhabitant became attached to a town, and that for various reasons. It was often necessary to distinguish places of the same name from each other by this method; thus certain of the towns called Gibeah became Gibeath-saul and Gibeath-phinehas. The Jebusite stronghold captured by David was named by him the city of David, and was known by this name, as a quarter of Jerusalem, for many generations ( 2 Samuel 5:9   2 Kings 16:20 ). The practice was common among the Semitic contemporaries of Israel, as is illustrated by Dur-sharruken, "Sargonsburg," and Kar-shalmanasharidu, "Shalmaneser's fortress." A town might also be named after the tribe which inhabited it or after the ancestor of the tribe, as Dan ( Judges 18:29 ), and possibly under not a few geographical designations a tribal name is hidden, even when the fact has escaped record and is not revealed by the form of the name. In an inquiry after the origin of a geographical designation the first consideration is due to the causes known to be ordinarily at work in giving rise to names of the same aspect as the one under scrutiny; and only when they fail to yield a suitable explanation are less obvious causes worthy of serious attention.  III. Characteristics of Biblical References.  1. Derivation of Names Manifest:  As a rule, Semitic words clearly reveal their origin and structure. The Semite might, indeed, err with respect to the particular meaning intended, where a word was current in several significations. Thus, the vale of bakha', mentioned in  Psalm 84:7  (Eng. 6), is open to two interpretations: namely, "valley of Baca," so called from the balsam trees in it, and "valley of weeping," as the versions render the unusual form, regarding it as equivalent to a similar word meaning "weeping." The plural bekha'im, "mulberry or balsam trees" ( 2 Samuel 5:23, 14 ), was understood by Josephus to denote a grove known by the name Weepers (Ant., VII, iv, 1; compare Septuagint). In those rare cases where several derivations were possible, the Israelite may not always have known which thought was intended to be embodied in the name which he heard. But he discerned the alternative possibilities; and a parent, in bestowing a name ambiguous in its derivation, might be deliberately taking advantage of its power to be the vehicle for the suggestion and expression of two thoughts ( Genesis 30:23, 24 ; Joseph being derivable from both yacaph and 'acaph).  2. The Narrator's Only Concern:  That the object of the Biblical writer was not to make known the derivation of the proper names is clear from cases like Esek, Rehoboth and Ishmael ( Genesis 16:11 ;  Genesis 26:20, 22 ): Isaac called the name of the well, Contention, because the herdsmen of Gerar "contended" with him; another well he called Broad Places (roomy places), because Yahweh had "made room" for him; and Hagar was directed to name the son that she was about to bear "God doth hear," because Yahweh had "heard" her affliction. The narrator's purpose was not to declare that the Hebrew word for contention, 'eceq, is derived from the Hebrew verb for "contend," 'acaq, and that the name "God doth hear," yishma`'el, signifies God doth hear, yishma` 'el. These derivations and meanings were plain. The purpose was to state the circumstances which led to the choice of the name. There are instances also where no part of the name reappears in the words that state the reason for the use of the name. For example, the name Maher-shalal-hash-baz is not explained by citing the words which compose it. One noun of the composite name appears, indeed, in the exposition of the meaning, but accidentally as it were, and without prominence or significance of position ( Isaiah 8:3, 4 ). Samuel is a notable example of this method. Hannah called his name Samuel, saying, `Because of Yahweh, I asked him' ( 1 Samuel 1:20 ). Simonis, Ewald and Nestle derive the name from shemua`'el, "heard of God." This etymology would fully satisfy the reason given for the mother's choice of the name; but the suggested derivation is far-fetched, for it is not customary for a Hebrew word to lose the strong guttural `ayin (`). The guttural was not lost, but was distinctly heard, in Ishmael, where there is the same concurrence of sounds as in shemua`'el. Qimchi, on the other hand, suggested that Samuel is a contraction of sha'ul me'el, "asked of God"; and Ewald asserts that this origin is theory of the narrator (Lehrbuch der hebraischen Sprache, 275, note 3). This is incredible. Such a contraction is "alien to the genius of the Hebrew language'' (Driver, Text of Samuel, 13), and the absence of the two Hebrew consonants 'aleph (') and lamedh (l) before the letter "m" in the midst of the name Samuel would of itself prevent the Semite from imagining such an etymology. The derivation and meaning of Samuel were not obscure. The type was common, and was especially familiar by reason of the name Peniel, "face of God" ( Genesis 32:30 f ). Samuel means "name of God" (Gesenius). As Jacob, upon his return from Paddan-aram, in fulfillment of his vow erected an altar at Beth-el as a memorial of God's bestowal of the promised blessings and named the place thus consecrated "The God of Beth-el" ( Genesis 35:1, 3, 7 ), so Hannah having by vow dedicated to Yahweh the son for whose birth she was praying, now that her prayer has been answered and the son given, calls him "The name of God" in commemoration of the Giver. The Biblical narrator states the motive which led the mother to choose the name Samuel for her child. In this explanation no part of the name is used. Moreover, the slight assonance between shemu'el and she'iltiw in  1 Samuel 1:20  was unsought, for these words are separated in the Hebrew text, and the emphasis is placed on the gift's being "from Yahweh." The history of the discussion concerning this name shows how far astray criticism has been led by the false theory that the purpose of the narrator was to analyze the name and declare its derivation.  Reuben affords evidence to the same effect. The name was known to the early Hebrews in this form exclusively.  Read Complete Article...    DIVINE NAMES  See  GOD, NAMES OF .
ENRIMMON|   EN-RIMMON  en-rim'-on (`en-rimmon, "the fountain of Rimmon" (see RIMMON), or perhaps "the spring of the pomegranate"; Eromoth, Rhemmon):  A city of Judah ( Joshua 15:32 ), "Ain and Rimmon"; ascribed to Simeon ( Joshua 19:7   1 Chronicles 4:32 , "Ain, Rimmon"). In  Nehemiah 11:29  mentioned as reinhabited after the Captivity.  Zechariah 14:10 , runs: "All the land shall be made like the Arabah, from Geba to Rimmon, south of Jerusalem." It must have been a very southerly place. In the Eusebius, Onomasticon, ("Erimmon") it is described as a "very large village 16 miles South of Eleutheropolis." Kh. Umm er Rumamin, 9 miles North of Beersheba is the usually accepted site. See  PEF, 398 ; Sh XXIV.  E. W. G. Masterman
SEIR|Rough; hairy.  (1.) A Horite; one of the "dukes" of Edom ( Genesis 36:20 -30). (2.) The name of a mountainous region occupied by the Edomites, extending along the eastern side of the Arabah from the south-eastern extremity of the Dead Sea to near the Akabah, or the eastern branch of the Red Sea. It was originally occupied by the Horites ( Genesis 14:6 ), who were afterwards driven out by the Edomites ( Genesis 32:3 ;  33:14 ,  16). It was allotted to the descendants of Esau ( Deuteronomy 2:4 ,  22;  Joshua 24:4 ;  2 Chronicles 20:10 ;  Isaiah 21:11 ;  Ezek. 25:8 ). (3.) A mountain range (not the Edomite range,   Genesis 32:3 ) lying between the Wady Aly and the Wady Ghurab ( Joshua 15:10 ). 
HERODIAS|( Matthew 14:3 -11;  Mark 6:17 -28;  Luke 3:19 ), the daughter of Aristobulus and Bernice. While residing at Rome with her husband Herod Philip I. and her daughter, Herod Antipas fell in with her during one of his journeys to that city. She consented to leave her husband and become his wife. Some time after, Herod met John the Baptist, who boldly declared the marriage to be unlawful. For this he was "cast into prison," in the castle probably of Machaerus (q.v.), and was there subsequently beheaded. 
SIMON|The abbreviated form of Simeon.  (1.) One of the twelve apostles, called the Canaanite ( Matthew 10:4 ;  Mark 3:18 ). This word "Canaanite" does not mean a native of Canaan, but is derived from the Syriac word Kanean or Kaneniah, which was the name of a Jewish sect. The Revised Version has "Cananaean;" marg., "or Zealot" He is also called "Zelotes" ( Luke 6:15 ;  Acts 1:13 ; R.V.,  "the Zealot"), because previous to his call to the apostleship he had been a member of the fanatical sect of the Zealots. There is no record regarding him. (2.) The father of Judas Iscariot ( John 6:71 ;  13:2 ,  26). (3.) One of the brothers of our Lord ( Matthew 13:55 ;  Mark 6:3 ). (4.) A Pharisee in whose house "a woman of the city which was a sinner" anointed our Lord's feet with ointment ( Luke 7:36 -38). (5.) A leper of Bethany, in whose house Mary anointed our Lord's head with ointment "as he sat at meat" ( Matthew 26:6 -13;  Mark 14:3 -9). (6.) A Jew of Cyrene, in North Africa, then a province of Libya. A hundred thousand Jews from Palestine had been settled in this province by Ptolemy Soter (B.C. 323-285), where by this time they had greatly increased in number. They had a synagogue in Jerusalem for such of their number as went thither to the annual feasts. Simon was seized by the soldiers as the procession wended its way to the place of crucifixion as he was passing by, and the heavy cross which Christ from failing strength could no longer bear was laid on his shoulders. Perhaps they seized him because he showed sympathy with Jesus. He was the "father of Alexander and Rufus" ( Matthew 27:32 ). Possibly this Simon may have been one of the "men of Cyrene" who preached the word to the Greeks ( Acts 11:20 ). (7.) A sorcerer of great repute for his magical arts among the Samaritans ( Acts 8:9 -11). He afterwards became a professed convert to the faith under the preaching of Philip the deacon and evangelist (12,  13). His profession was, however, soon found to be hollow. His conduct called forth from Peter a stern rebuke ( 8:18 -23). From this moment he disappears from the Church's history. The term "Simony," as denoting the purchase for money of spiritual offices, is derived from him. (8.) A Christian at Joppa, a tanner by trade, with whom Peter on one occasion lodged ( Acts 9:43 ). (9.) Simon Peter ( Matthew 4:18 ). See PETER. 
TACHES|Hooks or clasps by which the tabernacle curtains were connected ( Exodus 26:6 ,  11,  33;  35:11 ). 
MESOBAITE|     me-so'-ba-it.  See  MEZOBAITE .
MERIBAH|Quarrel or strife.  (1.) One of the names given by Moses to the fountain in the desert of Sin, near Rephidim, which issued from the rock in Horeb, which he smote by the divine command, "because of the chiding of the children of Israel" ( Exodus 17:1 -7). It was also called Massah (q.v.). It was probably in Wady Feiran, near Mount Serbal. (2.) Another fountain having a similar origin in the desert of Zin, near to Kadesh ( Numbers 27:14 ). The two places are mentioned together in  Deuteronomy 33:8 . Some think the one place is called by the two names ( Psalm 81:7 ). In smiting the rock at this place Moses showed the same impatience as the people ( Numbers 20:10 -12). This took place near the close of the wanderings in the desert ( Numbers 20:1 -24;  Deuteronomy 32:51 ). 
IVAH|Overturning, a city of the Assyrians, whence colonists were brought to Samaria ( 2 Kings 18:34 ;  19:13 ). It lay on the Euphrates, between Sepharvaim and Henah, and is supposed by some to have been the Ahava of Ezra ( 8:15 ). 
GALLIO|The elder brother of Seneca the philosopher, who was tutor and for some time minister of the emperor Nero. He was "deputy", i.e., proconsul, as in Revised Version, of Achaia, under the emperor Claudius, when Paul visited Corinth ( Acts 18:12 ). The word used here by Luke in describing the rank of Gallio shows his accuracy. Achaia was a senatorial province under Claudius, and the governor of such a province was called a "proconsul." He is spoken of by his contemporaries as "sweet Gallio," and is described as a most popular and affectionate man. When the Jews brought Paul before his tribunal on the charge of persuading "men to worship God contrary to the law" ( 18:13 ), he refused to listen to them, and "drave them from the judgment seat" ( 18:16 ). 
NEZIB|A town in the "plain" of Judah. It has been identified with Beit Nuzib, about 14 miles south-west of Jerusalem, in the Wady Sur ( Joshua 15:43 ). 
MAHALALEEL|Praise of God.  (1.) The son of Cainan, of the line of Seth ( Genesis 5:12 -17); called Maleleel ( Luke 3:37 ). (2.)  Nehemiah 11:4 , a descendant of Perez. 
TOWERS|Of Babel ( Genesis 11:4 ), Edar ( Genesis 35:21 ), Penuel ( Judges 8:9 ,  17), Shechem ( 9:46 ), David (Cant. 4:4), Lebanon ( 7:4 ), Syene ( Ezek. 29:10 ), Hananeel ( Zechariah 14:10 ), Siloam ( Luke 13:4 ). There were several towers in Jerusalem ( 2 Chronicles 26:9 ;  Psalm 48:12 ). They were erected for various purposes, as watch-towers in vineyard ( Isaiah 5:2 ;  Matthew 21:33 ) and towers for defence. 
HODAIAH|     ho-da'-ya.  See  HODAVIAH .
SALMA|   SALMON;   sal'-mon, (salmon, "investiture" ( Ruth 4:21 ), salmah, "clothing" ( Ruth 4:20 ), salma' ( 1 Chronicles 2:11, 51, 54 ); Salmon):  (1) The father of Boaz, the husband of Ruth, and thus the grandfather of Jesse, David's father ( Ruth 4:20, 21 ). He is mentioned in both the genealogies of Jesus ( Matthew 1:4, 5   Luke 3:32 ). From  Matthew 1:5  we learn that he married Rahab, by whom he begat Boaz.  (2) In  1 Chronicles 2:51 ;, we read of a Salma, "the father of Beth-lehem," a son of Caleb, the son of Hur. He is also said to be the father of "the Netophathites, Atroth-beth-joab, and half of the Manahathites, the Zorites," and several "families of scribes."  See also  ZALMON .  S. F. Hunter  SALMA  sal'-ma.  See  SALMON .
JULIA|A Christian woman at Rome to whom Paul sent his salutations ( Romans 16:15 ), supposed to be the wife of Philologus. 
JEHOHANAN|Jehovah-granted, Jeroboam II.  (1.) A Korhite, the head of one of the divisions of the temple porters ( 1 Chronicles 26:3 ). (2.) One of Jehoshaphat's "captains" ( 2 Chronicles 17:15 ). (3.) The father of Azariah ( 2 Chronicles 28:12 ). (4.) The son of Tobiah, an enemy of the Jews ( Nehemiah 6:18 ). (5.)  Nehemiah 12:42 . (6.)  Nehemiah 12:13 . 
GEMALLI|     ge-mal'-i (gemalli, "camel owner"): Father of the spy Ammiel from the tribe of Dan ( Numbers 13:12 ), who was one of those sent by Moses to spy out the land of Canaan.
TOB|Tob, The land of A district on the east of Jodan, about 13 miles south-east of the Sea of Galilee, to which Jephthah fled from his brethren ( Judges 11:3 ,  5). It was on the northern boundary of Perea, between Syria and the land of Ammon ( 2 Samuel 10:6 ,  8). Its modern name is Taiyibeh. 
MENUHOTH|     men-u'-hoth (menuchoth, "dwellings"; the King James Version manachti Manahethites): The first form is the Revised Version (British and American) transliterated in the name; the second form is the King James Version retained by the Revised Version (British and American) in the passages where the word occurs ( 1 Chronicles 2:52 ; compare 2:54). The people here spoken of by the King James Version as "half of the Manahethites" are mentioned as descendants of Salma ( 1 Chronicles 2:54 ), while those mentioned as Menuhoth are mentioned as descendants of Judah through Shobal, father of Kiriath-jearim. Both words are from the same root. the King James Version keeps the same designation for both passages, while the Revised Version (British and American) has marked the difference in spelling by changing the first passage and following the King James Version in the second. Both sections of the family belong to the Caleb clan, and it would seem that they became the dominant people in the otherwise unknown town of Manahath, so that it came to be regarded as belonging to Judah. It may be connected with the Menuchah (the Revised Version (British and American) "Menuhah") suggested as a place-name in  Judges 20:43  margin. In the Septuagint, between Joshua 15:59 and 60, the names of 11 cities are inserted, among them being a Manocho whose Hebrew equivalent gives the word. It is difficult to identify, and the Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) cuts the knot by translating "dimidium requietionum"!  See  MANAHATH .  Henry Wallace
MEDAN|Contention, the third son of Abraham by Keturah ( Genesis 25:2 ). 
HACHMONITE|   HACHMONI;   hak-mo'-ni, hak'-mo-ni, or probably (chakhmoni, "wise"): The same word is rendered "Hachmoni," a proper name, in  1 Chronicles 27:32  and "a Hachmonite" in  1 Chronicles 11:11 . The form of the Hebrew word suggests that the latter translation should be adopted in both passages, and that it describes the warrior in one case, and the companion or tutor of David's sons in the other, as a member of a certain family-a Hachmonite of which nothing further is known.  2 Samuel 23:8 , "Josheb-basshebeth a Tahchemonite," bears the marks of a corrupt text, and should be parallel with  1 Chronicles 11:11  so far as the name goes, reading "Jashobeam the Hachmonite." So Klostermann, Driver, Wellhausen, Budde, etc.  George Rice Hovey
DIMON|   ; DIMONAH  di'-mon, di-mo'-na. See  DIBON .
SANBALLAT|Held some place of authority in Samaria when Nehemiah went up to Jerusalem to rebuild its ruined walls. He vainly attempted to hinder this work ( Nehemiah 2:10 ,  19;  4:1 -12; 6). His daughter became the wife of one of the sons of Joiada, a son of the high priest, much to the grief of Nehemiah ( 13:28 ). 
HIZKIJAH|( Nehemiah 10:17 ), one who sealed the covenant. 
HARSHA|Worker or enchanter, one of the Nethinim ( Ezra 2:52 ;  Nehemiah 7:54 ). 
OHAD|United, or power, the third son of Simeon ( Genesis 46:10 ). 
PERSIA|An ancient empire, extending from the Indus to Thrace, and from the Caspian Sea to the Red Sea and the Persian Gulf. The Persians were originally a Medic tribe which settled in Persia, on the eastern side of the Persian Gulf. They were Aryans, their language belonging to the eastern division of the Indo-European group. One of their chiefs, Teispes, conquered Elam in the time of the decay of the Assyrian Empire, and established himself in the district of Anzan. His descendants branched off into two lines, one line ruling in Anzan, while the other remained in Persia. Cyrus II., king of Anzan, finally united the divided power, conquered Media, Lydia, and Babylonia, and carried his arms into the far East. His son, Cambyses, added Egypt to the empire, which, however, fell to pieces after his death. It was reconquered and thoroughly organized by Darius, the son of Hystaspes, whose dominions extended from India to the Danube.
JEHUCAL|Able, the son of Shelemiah. He is also called Jucal ( Jeremiah 38:1 ). He was one of the two persons whom Zedekiah sent to request the prophet Jeremiah to pray for the kingdom ( Jeremiah 37:3 ) during the time of its final siege by Nebuchadnezzar. He was accompanied by Zephaniah (q.v.). 
RHODES|A rose, an island to the south of the western extremity of Asia Minor, between Coos and Patara, about 46 miles long and 18 miles broad. Here the apostle probably landed on his way from Greece to Syria ( Acts 21:1 ), on returning from his third missionary journey. 
CONFECTIONARIES|Only in  1 Samuel 8:13 , those who make confections, i.e., perfumers, who compound species and perfumes. 
JEHDEIAH|Rejoicer in Jehovah.  (1.) One of the Levitical attendants at the temple, a descendant of Shubael ( 1 Chronicles 24:20 ). (2.) A Meronothite, herdsman of the asses under David and Solomon ( 1 Chronicles 27:30 ). 
IEZER|   ; IEZERITES  i-e'-zer, i-e'-zer-its ('i`ezer,  Numbers 26:30 ): Contracted from ABIEZER ( Joshua 17:2 , etc.) (which see).
JETHLAH|Suspended; high, a city on the borders of Dan ( Joshua 19:42 ). 
GIZONITE|A name given to Hashem, an inhabitant of Gizoh, a place somewhere in the mountains of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 11:34 ;  2 Samuel 23:32 ,  34). 
SHEPHELAH|     shef-e'-la (ha-shephelah; sephela, saphela):  1. Name and References:  The word denotes "lowland," and is variously rendered in the King James Version. It is "vale" in  Deuteronomy 1:7   Joshua 10:40   1 Kings 10:27 ;  2 Chronicles 1:15   Jeremiah 33:13 ; "valley" in  Joshua 9:1 ;  Joshua 11:2, 16 ; 12:08; 15:33  Judges 1:9   Jeremiah 32:44 ; "low plain" in  1 Chronicles 27:28   2 Chronicles 9:27 ; "plain" in  Jeremiah 17:26   Obadiah 1:19   Zechariah 7:7 ; and "low country" in  2 Chronicles 28:18 . the Revised Version (British and American) renders uniformly "lowland." As the word always occurs with the definite article, indicating a distinct district, it might have been well to retain it without translation. The boundaries of the district are clearly marked and include much broken country; the hills being low compared with the mountains to the East, but much higher than the plain that runs to the shore. If a translation was to be made, perhaps "lowlands" would have been the best, as applied to the "Lowlands" of Scotland, "which likewise are not entirely plain, but have their groups and ranges of hills" (HGHL, 203). In the wide sense the Shephelah included the territory originally given to the tribe of Dan, and also a considerable part of Western and Southwestern Judea. At an early day the tribes of Dan and Simeon were practically absorbed by Judah, and hence, we find in  Joshua 15  many cities in the Shephelah which belonged to that tribe (LB, I, 211).  2. Districts and Features:  (1) The sites of many ancient cities named in the Shephelah have been identified. They all lie within the strip of hill country that runs along the western base of the mountains of Judah, terminating in the North at the Valley of Aijalon. Once indeed the name appears to apply to the low hills North of this ( Joshua 11:16 , `the mount of Israel and its Shephelah'). Every other reference applies only to the South.  Principal G. A. Smith has pointed out the difference between the district to the N. and that to the S. of Aijalon (HGHL, 203;). "North of Ajalon the low hills which run out on Sharon are connected with the high mountains behind them. You ascend to the latter from Sharon either by long sloping ridges, such as that which today carries the telegraph wire and the high road from Jaffa to Nablus; or else you climb up terraces, such as the succession of ranges closely built upon one another by which the country rises from Lydda to Bethel. That is, the low hills west of Samaria are (to use the Hebrew phrase) 'ashedhoth, or slopes of the central range, and not a separate group. But South of Ajalon the low hills do not so hang upon the Central Range, but are separated from the mountains of Judah by a series of valleys, both wide and narrow, which run all the way from Ajalon to near Beersheba; and it is only when the low hills are thus flung off the Central Range into an independent group, separating Judea from Philistia, that the name Shephelah seems to be applied to them."  (2) On the East of the Shephelah, then, taking the name in this more limited sense, rises the steep wall of the mountain, into which access is gained only by narrow and difficult defiles. The hills of the Shephelah are from 500 to 800 ft. high, with nothing over 1,500. The formation is soft limestone. In the valleys and upland plains there is much excellent land which supports a fairly good population still. Wheat, barley and olives are the chief products. But ancient wine presses cut in the rocks testify to the culture of the vine in old times. The district is almost entirely dependent on the rain for its water-supply. This is collected in great cisterns, partly natural. The rocks are in many places honeycombed with caves.  The western boundary is not so definite as that on the East. Some have held that it included the Philistine plain. This contention draws support from the mention of the Philistine cities immediately after those of Judah, which are said to be in the Shephelah ( Joshua 15:45 ; these verses can hardly be ruled out as of a later date). On the other hand the Philistines are said to have invaded the cities of the Shephelah ( 2 Chronicles 28:18 ), which implies that it was outside their country. In later times the Talmud (Jerusalem, Shebhi`ith 9 2) distinguishes the Mountain, the Shephelah, and the Plain. See , however, discussion in Buhl (GAP, 104, n.; and G. A. Smith, The Expositor, 1896, 404;).  3. The Five Valleys:  The Shephelah is crossed by five wide valleys which furnish easy access from the plain. These are of importance chiefly because from each of them a way, crossing the "foss," enters one of the defiles by which alone armies could approach the uplands of Judea. The hills of Judea are much steeper on the east than on the west, where they fall toward Philistia in long-rolling hills, forming the Shephelah.  (1) Vale of Aijalon:  The most noteworthy of these is the Vale of Aijalon. It winds its way first in a northeasterly direction, past the Beth-horons, then, turning to the Southeast, it reaches the plateau at el-Jib, the ancient Gibeon, fully 5 miles Northwest of Jerusalem. This is the easiest of all the avenues leading from the plain to the heights, and it is the one along which the tides of battle most frequently rolled from the days of Joshua ( Joshua 10:12 ) to those of the Maccabees (1 Maccabees 3:16;, etc.). It occupies also a prominent place in the records of the Crusades.  (2) Wady ec-Surar:  Wady ec-Surar, the Valley of Sorek, crosses the Shephelah South of Gezer, and pursues a tortuous course past Beth-shemesh and Kiriath-jearim to the plateau Southwest of Jerusalem. This is the line followed by the Jaffa-Jerus Railway.  (3) Wady ec-Sunt:  Wady ec-Sunt runs eastward from the North of Tell ec-Safieh (Gath) up the Vale of Elah to its confluence with Wady ec-Sur which comes in from the South near Khirbet Shuweikeh (Socoh); and from that point, as Wady el-Jindy, pursues its way South of Timnah to the uplands West of Bethlehem.  (4) Wady el-`Afranj:  Wady el-`Afranj crosses the plain from Ashdod (Esdud), passes Beit Jibrin (Eleutheropolis), and winds up through the mountains toward Hebron.  (5) Wady el-Chesy:  Wady el-Chesy, from the sea about 7 miles North of Gaza, runs eastward with many windings, passes to the North of Lachish, and finds its way to the plateau some 6 miles Southwest of Hebron.  From the Shephelah thus opened the gateways by which Judea and Jerusalem might be assailed: and the course of these avenues determined the course of much of the history. It is evident that the shephelah lay open to attack from both sides, and for centuries it was the debatable land between Israel and the Philistines. The ark for a time sojourned in this region ( 1 Samuel 5:6 f ). In this district is laid the scene of Samson's exploits ( Judges 14-16 ). The scene of David's memorable victory over the giant was in the Wady ec-Sunt, between Socoh and Azekah ( 1 Samuel 17:1 ). David found refuge here in the cave of Adullam ( 1 Samuel 22:1 ). For picturesque and vivid accounts of the Shephelah and of the part it played in history see Smith, HGHL, 201;; A. Henderson, Palestine, Its Historical Geography, 1894.  W. Ewing
BASEMATH|   ; BASHEMATH; BASMATH  bas'-e-math, bash'-e-math, bas'-math (basemath, "fragrant"):  (1) Basemath, one of the wives of Esau, a daughter of Elon, the Hittite ( Genesis 26:34 ; the King James Version Bashemath), probably identical with or a sister of Adah whom he also married ( Genesis 36:2 ). Compare ADAH.  (2) Basemath (the King James Version Bashemath), another wife of Esau, a daughter of Ishmael and a sister of Nebaioth ( Genesis 36:3, 4, 10, 13, 17 ). This wife is also called Mahalath ( Genesis 28:9 ), and is of the house of Abraham. Esau married her because his father was not pleased with his other wives who were daughters of Canaan. Compare MAHALATH.  (3) Basemath (the King James Version Basmath), the daughter of Solomon, and wife of Ahimaaz, a commissariat-officer in the service of Solomon ( 1 Kings 4:15 ).  A. L. Breslich
JEPHUNNEH|Nimble, or a beholder.  (1.) The father of Caleb, who was Joshua's companion in exploring Canaan ( Numbers 13:6 ), a Kenezite ( Joshua 14:14 ).  (2.) One of the descendants of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 7:38 ). 
GERZITES|     gur'-zits ( 1 Samuel 27:8  King James Version margin).  See  GIRZITES .
ERAN|     e'-ran (`eran, "watcher," "watchful"; Eden):  The son of Ephraim's oldest son Shuthelah ( Numbers 26:36 ).  Eranites, the descendants of Eran (same place).
ELIPHAL|     e-li'-fal, el'-i-fal ('eliphal, "God has judged"):  Son of Ur, one of the mighty men of David's armies ( 1 Chronicles 11:35 ). the Revised Version (British and American) in a footnote identifies him with Eliphelet, son of Ahasbai, the son of the Maachathite ( 2 Samuel 23:34 ; ef Davis, Dict. of the Bible, under the word "Ur"). See also  1 Chronicles 14:5, 7 .
PHLEGON|Burning, a Roman Christian to whom Paul sent salutations ( Romans 16:14 ). 
ZALMON|Shady.  (1.) One of David's warriors, called the Ahohite ( 2 Samuel 23:28 ); called also Ilai ( 1 Chronicles 11:29 ). (2.) A wood near Shechem, from which Abimelech and his party brought boughs and "put them to the hold" of Shechem, "and set the hold on fire" ( Judges 9:48 ). Probably the southern peak of Gerizim, now called Jebel Sulman. (see  SALMON .) 
CLAUDIUS|Lame.  (1.) The fourth Roman emperor. He succeeded Caligula (A.D. 41). Though in general he treated the Jews, especially those in Asia and Egypt, with great indulgence, yet about the middle of his reign (A.D. 49) he banished them all from Rome ( Acts 18:2 ). In this edict the Christians were included, as being, as was supposed, a sect of Jews. The Jews, however soon again returned to Rome. During the reign of this emperor, several persecutions of the Christians by the Jews took place in the dominions of Herod Agrippa, in one of which the apostle James was "killed" ( 12:2 ). He died A.D. 54. (2.) Claudius Lysias, a Greek who, having obtained by purchase the privilege of Roman citizenship, took the name of Claudius ( Acts 21:31 -40;  22:28 ;  23:26 ).  Lysias, Claudius The chief captain (chiliarch) who commanded the Roman troops in Jerusalem, and sent Paul under guard to the procurator Felix at Caesarea ( Acts 21:31 -38;  22:24 -30). His letter to his superior officer is an interesting specimen of Roman military correspondence ( 23:26 -30). He obtained his Roman citizenship by purchase, and was therefore probably a Greek. (see   .) 
CHARCHEMISH|     kar'-ke-mish.  See  CARCHEMISH .
HASHABNEIAH|     hash-ab-ne-i'-a (chashabhneyah; the King James Version Hashabniah, hash-ab-ni'a).  (1) Father of one of the builders of the wall ( Nehemiah 3:10 ).  (2) A Levite mentioned in connection with the prayer preceding the signing of the covenant ( Nehemiah 9:5 ); possibly identical with the Hashabiah (chashabhyah) of  Ezra 8:19, 24   Nehemiah 10:11 ;  Nehemiah 11:22 ;  Nehemiah 12:24 , or one of these.
LEVI|Adhesion.  (1.) The third son of Jacob by Leah. The origin of the name is found in Leah's words ( Genesis 29:34 ), "This time will my husband be joined [Hebrews yillaveh] unto me." He is mentioned as taking a prominent part in avenging his sister Dinah ( Genesis 34:25 -31). He and his three sons went down with Jacob ( 46:11 ) into Egypt, where he died at the age of one hundred and thirty-seven years ( Exodus 6:16 ). (2.) The father of Matthat, and son of Simeon, of the ancestors of Christ ( Luke 3:29 ). (3.)  Luke 3:24 . (4.) One of the apostles, the son of Alphaeus ( Mark 2:14 ;  Luke 5:27 ,  29), called also Matthew ( Matthew 9:9 ). 
UZZA|Strengh, a garden in which Manasseh and Amon were buried ( 2 Kings 21:18 ,  26). It was probably near the king's palace in Jerusalem, or may have formed part of the palace grounds. Manasseh may probably have acquired it from some one of this name. 
HADADEZER|Hadad is help; called also Hadarezer, Adod is his help, the king of Zobah. Hanun, the king of the Ammonites, hired among others the army of Hadadezer to assist him in his war against David. Joab, who was sent against this confederate host, found them in double battle array, the Ammonities toward their capital of Rabbah, and the Syrian mercenaries near Medeba. In the battle which was fought the Syrians were scattered, and the Ammonites in alarm fled into their capital. After this Hadadezer went north "to recover his border" ( 2 Samuel 8:3 ,  A.V.); but rather, as the Revised Version renders, "to recover his dominion", i.e., to recruit his forces. Then followed another battle with the Syrian army thus recruited, which resulted in its being totally routed at Helam ( 2 Samuel 10:17 ). Shobach, the leader of the Syrian army, died on the field of battle. The Syrians of Damascus, who had come to help Hadadezer, were also routed, and Damascus was made tributary to David. All the spoils taken in this war, "shields of gold" and "very much brass," from which afterwards the "brasen sea, and the pillars, and the vessels of brass" for the temple were made ( 1 Chronicles 18:8 ), were brought to Jerusalem and dedicated to Jehovah. Thus the power of the Ammonites and the Syrians was finally broken, and David's empire extended to the Euphrates ( 2 Samuel 10:15 -19;  1 Chronicles 19:15 -19). 
HIEL|Life of (i.e.,  from) God, a native of Bethel, who built (i.e.,  fortified) Jericho some seven hundred years after its destruction by the Israelites. There fell on him for such an act the imprecation of Joshua ( 6:26 ). He laid the foundation in his first-born, and set up the gates in his youngest son ( 1 Kings 16:34 ), i.e., during the progress of the work all his children died. 
MAHERSHALALHASHBAZ|Plunder speedeth; spoil hasteth, ( Isaiah 8:1 -3; Comp.  Zephaniah 1:14 ), a name Isaiah was commanded first to write in large characters on a tablet, and afterwards to give as a symbolical name to a son that was to be born to him ( Isaiah 8:1 ,  3), as denoting the sudden attack on Damascus and Syria by the Assyrian army. 
PLANTS|   PLANT,   See  BOTANY .
BUKKIAH|     buk-i'-a (buqqiyahu, "proved of God"): A Levite, son of Heman ( 1 Chronicles 25:4, 13 ).  See  BAKBUKIAH .
MELCHIAH|     mel-ki'-a (malkhiyah, "Yah's king"): A priest and father of Pashur ( Jeremiah 21:1  the King James Version); elsewhere and in the Revised Version (British and American) called MALCHIAH and MALCHIJAH (which see).
BATHSHUA|     bath'-shu-a (bath-shua`, "the daughter of opulence" or "the daughter of Shua"; compare BATH-SHEBA; for derivation see HPN, 67, 69, note 3):  (1) In  Genesis 38:2  and  1 Chronicles 2:3 , where the name is translated "Shua's daughter," the wife of Judah.  (2) In  1 Chronicles 3:5 , the daughter of Ammiel and wife of David.  See  BATH-SHEBA .
CHEEKBONE|   CHEEK;   chek, chek'-bon:  (1) lechi; siagon, "the jaw," "jaw-bone," "side of the face." The Hebrew word denotes originally freshness and rounded softness of the cheek, a sign of beauty in youth and maiden ( Songs 1:10 ;  Songs 5:13 ). The oriental guards with jealous care his cheek from touch or defilement, therefore a stroke on the cheek was, and is to this day, regarded as an act of extreme rudeness of behavior, a deadly affront. Our Saviour, however, teaches us in  Matthew 5:39  and  Luke 6:29  that even this insult is to be ignored and pardoned.  Jawbones of animals have been frequently used as tools and weapons among primitive people. We see this sufficiently proven from cave deposits in many parts of the world, and from recent ethnological researches, especially in Australia. In the light of this evidence it is interesting to note that Samson used a jawbone of an ass with success against his enemies the Philistines ( Judges 15:15 ).  (2) malqoach ( Psalm 22:15 ), is a dual form indicative of the two jaws, to which a parched tongue seems to cleave.  (3) methalle`ah ( Job 29:17 ), better "cheek teeth" (which see).  H. L. E. Luering
KOR|     kor.  See  COR .
ZECHER|     ze'-ker (zakher, pausal form for zekher, "memorial"; the King James Version Zacher): In  1 Chronicles 8:31  = "Zechariah" of  1 Chronicles 9:37 .  See  ZECHARIAH, (5) .
NAARATH|Girl, a town on the boundary between Ephraim and Benjamin ( Joshua 16:7 ), not far probably from Jericho, to the north ( 1 Chronicles 7:28 ). 
JAIRITE|     ja'-er-it (ya'iri, "of Jair"): In  2 Samuel 20:26 , Ira the Jairite is "chief minister unto David." He was a descendant of Jair who was a Manassite ( Numbers 32:41 , etc.) and whose territory was in Gilead. Septuagint, Lucian, and Syriac suggest yattiri, "Jattirite," i.e. a native of Jattir mentioned in  1 Samuel 30:27  as one of the towns friendly to David when he was in Ziklag. It is not improbable that a native of Jattir would be given such a post by David.  See IRA, and compare  2 Samuel 23:38 .
HASENUAH|Bristling or hated, a Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 9:7 ). 
CAESAREA|(Palestinae), a city on the shore of the Mediterranean, on the great road from Tyre to Egypt, about 70 miles northwest of Jerusalem, at the northern extremity of the plain of Sharon. It was built by Herod the Great (B.C. 10), who named it after Caesar Augustus, hence called Caesarea Sebaste (Gr. Sebastos = "Augustus"), on the site of an old town called "Strato's Tower." It was the capital of the Roman province of Judaea, the seat of the governors or procurators, and the headquarters of the Roman troops. It was the great Gentile city of Palestine, with a spacious artificial harbour. It was adorned with many buildings of great splendour, after the manner of the Roman cities of the West. Here Cornelius the centurion was converted through the instrumentality of Peter ( Acts 10:1 ,  24), and thus for the first time the door of faith was opened to the Gentiles. Philip the evangelist resided here with his four daughters ( 21:8 ). From this place Saul sailed for his native Tarsus when forced to flee from Jerusalem ( 9:30 ), and here he landed when returning from his second missionary journey ( 18:22 ). He remained as a prisoner here for two years before his voyage to Rome ( Acts 24:27 ;  25:1 ,  4,  6,  13). Here on a "set day," when games were celebrated in the theatre in honour of the emperor Claudius, Herod Agrippa I. appeared among the people in great pomp, and in the midst of the idolatrous homage paid to him was suddenly smitten by an angel, and carried out a dying man. He was "eaten of worms" ( 12:19 -23), thus perishing by the same loathsome disease as his granfather, Herod the Great. It still retains its ancient name Kaiseriyeh, but is now desolate. "The present inhabitants of the ruins are snakes, scorpions, lizards, wild boars, and jackals." It is described as the most desolate city of all Palestine. 
KIMAH|     ki'-ma (Pleiades).  See  ASTRONOMY .
LAMECH|The strikerdown; the wild man.  (1.) The fifth in descent from Cain. He was the first to violate the primeval ordinance of marriage ( Genesis 4:18 -24). His address to his two wives, Adah and Zillah ( 4:23 ,  24), is the only extant example of antediluvian poetry. It has been called "Lamech's sword-song." He was "rude and ruffianly," fearing neither God nor man. With him the curtain falls on the race of Cain. We know nothing of his descendants. (2.) The seventh in descent from Seth, being the only son of Methuselah. Noah was the oldest of his several sons ( Genesis 5:25 -31;  Luke 3:36 ). 
JEHALELEEL|Praiser of God.  (1.) A descendant of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:16 ). (2.) A Levite of the family of Merari ( 2 Chronicles 29:12 ). 
SATRAPS|     sa'-traps, sat'-raps ('achashdarpenim,  Ezra 8:36   Esther 3:12 ;  Esther 8:9 ;  Esther 9:3 , the King James Version "lieutenants";  Daniel 3:2, 3, 27 ;  Daniel 6:1 ;, the King James Version "princes"): The viceroys or vassal rulers to whom was entrusted the government of the provinces in the Persian empire. The word answers to the Old Persian khshathrapavan, "protectors of the realm."
MELATIAH|     mel-a-ti'-a (melatyah, "Yah's deliverance"): A Gibeonite who assisted in building the wall of Jerusalem under Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 3:7 ).
FRONTLETS|Occurs only in  Exodus 13:16 ;  Deuteronomy 6:8 , and 11:18. The meaning of the injunction to the Israelites, with regard to the statues and precepts given them, that they should "bind them for a sign upon their hand, and have them as frontlets between their eyes," was that they should keep them distinctly in view and carefully attend to them. But soon after their return from Babylon they began to interpret this injunction literally, and had accordingly portions of the law written out and worn about their person. These they called tephillin, i.e., "prayers." The passages so written out on strips of parchment were these,  Exodus 12:2 -10;  13:11 -21;  Deuteronomy 6:4 -9;  11:18 -21. They were then "rolled up in a case of black calfskin, which was attached to a stiffer piece of leather, having a thong one finger broad and one cubit and a half long. Those worn on the forehead were written on four strips of parchment, and put into four little cells within a square case, which had on it the Hebrew letter called shin, the three points of which were regarded as an emblem of God." This case tied around the forehead in a particular way was called "the tephillah on the head." (see  PHYLACTERY .)
ZEBINA|     ze-bi'-na (zebhina', "bought"): One of those who had married foreign wives ( Ezra 10:43 ); the name is not in 1 Esdras 9:35, and is omitted by the Septuagint's Codex Alexandrinus in Ezra.
PALESTINE|Originally denoted only the sea-coast of the land of Canaan inhabited by the Philistines ( Exodus 15:14 ;  Isaiah 14:29 ,  31;  Joel 3:4 ), and in this sense exclusively the Hebrew name Pelesheth (rendered "Philistia" in  Psalm 60:8 ;  83:7 ;  87:4 ;  108:9 ) occurs in the Old Testament. Not till a late period in Jewish history was this name used to denote "the land of the Hebrews" in general ( Genesis 40:15 ). It is also called "the holy land" ( Zechariah 2:12 ), the "land of Jehovah" ( Hosea 9:3 ;  Psalm 85:1 ), the "land of promise" ( Hebrews 11:9 ), because promised to Abraham ( Genesis 12:7 ;  24:7 ), the "land of Canaan" ( Genesis 12:5 ), the "land of Israel" ( 1 Samuel 13:19 ), and the "land of Judah" ( Isaiah 19:17 ). The territory promised as an inheritance to the seed of Abraham ( Genesis 15:18 -21;  Numbers 34:1 -12) was bounded on the east by the river Euphrates, on the west by the Mediterranean, on the north by the "entrance of Hamath," and on the south by the "river of Egypt." This extent of territory, about 60,000 square miles, was at length conquered by David, and was ruled over also by his son Solomon ( 2 Samuel 8 ;  1 Chronicles 18 ;  1 Kings 4:1 ,  21). This vast empire was the Promised Land; but Palestine was only a part of it, terminating in the north at the southern extremity of the Lebanon range, and in the south in the wilderness of Paran, thus extending in all to about 144 miles in length. Its average breadth was about 60 miles from the Mediterranean on the west to beyond the Jordan. It has fittingly been designated "the least of all lands." Western Palestine, on the south of Gaza, is only about 40 miles in breadth from the Mediterranean to the Dead Sea, narrowing gradually toward the north, where it is only 20 miles from the sea-coast to the Jordan. Palestine, "set in the midst" ( Ezek. 5:5 ) of all other lands, is the most remarkable country on the face of the earth. No single country of such an extent has so great a variety of climate, and hence also of plant and animal life. Moses describes it as "a good land, a land of brooks of water, of fountains and depths that spring out of valleys and hills; a land of wheat, and barley, and vines, and fig trees, and pomegranates; a land of oil olive, and honey; a land wherein thou shalt not eat bread without scarceness, thou shalt not lack any thing in it; a land whose stones are iron, and out of whose hills thou mayest dig brass" ( Deuteronomy 8:7 -9). "In the time of Christ the country looked, in all probability, much as now. The whole land consists of rounded limestone hills, fretted into countless stony valleys, offering but rarely level tracts, of which Esdraelon alone, below Nazareth, is large enough to be seen on the map. The original woods had for ages disappeared, though the slopes were dotted, as now, with figs, olives, and other fruit-trees where there was any soil. Permanent streams were even then unknown, the passing rush of winter torrents being all that was seen among the hills. The autumn and spring rains, caught in deep cisterns hewn out like huge underground jars in the soft limestone, with artificial mud-banked ponds still found near all villages, furnished water. Hills now bare, or at best rough with stunted growth, were then terraced, so as to grow vines, olives, and grain. To-day almost desolate, the country then teemed with population. Wine-presses cut in the rocks, endless terraces, and the ruins of old vineyard towers are now found amidst solitudes overgrown for ages with thorns and thistles, or with wild shrubs and poor gnarled scrub" (Geikie's Life of Christ). From an early period the land was inhabited by the descendants of Canaan, who retained possession of the whole land "from Sidon to Gaza" till the time of the conquest by Joshua, when it was occupied by the twelve tribes. Two tribes and a half had their allotments given them by Moses on the east of the Jordan ( Deuteronomy 3:12 -20; Comp.  Numbers 1:17 -46;  Joshua 4:12 -13). The remaining tribes had their portion on the west of Jordan. From the conquest till the time of Saul, about four hundred years, the people were governed by judges. For a period of one hundred and twenty years the kingdom retained its unity while it was ruled by Saul and David and Solomon. On the death of Solomon, his son Rehoboam ascended the throne; but his conduct was such that ten of the tribes revolted, and formed an independent monarchy, called the kingdom of Israel, or the northern kingdom, the capital of which was first Shechem and afterwards Samaria. This kingdom was destroyed. The Israelites were carried captive by Shalmanezer, king of Assyria, B.C. 722, after an independent existence of two hundred and fifty-three years. The place of the captives carried away was supplied by tribes brought from the east, and thus was formed the Samaritan nation ( 2 Kings 17:24 -29). Nebuchadnezzar came up against the kingdom of the two tribes, the kingdom of Judah, the capital of which was Jerusalem, one hundred and thirty-four years after the overthrow of the kingdom of Israel. He overthrew the city, plundered the temple, and carried the people into captivity to Babylon (B.C. 587), where they remained seventy years. At the close of the period of the Captivity, they returned to their own land, under the edict of Cyrus ( Ezra 1:1 -4). They rebuilt the city and temple, and restored the old Jewish commonwealth. For a while after the Restoration the Jews were ruled by Zerubbabel, Ezra, and Nehemiah, and afterwards by the high priests, assisted by the Sanhedrin. After the death of Alexander the Great at Babylon (B.C. 323), his vast empire was divided between his four generals. Egypt, Arabia, Palestine, and Coele-Syria fell to the lot of Ptolemy Lagus. Ptolemy took possession of Palestine in B.C. 320, and carried nearly one hundred thousand of the inhabitants of Jerusalem into Egypt. He made Alexandria the capital of his kingdom, and treated the Jews with consideration, confirming them in the enjoyment of many privileges. After suffering persecution at the hands of Ptolemy's successors, the Jews threw off the Egyptian yoke, and became subject to Antiochus the Great, the king of Syria. The cruelty and opression of the successors of Antiochus at length led to the revolt under the Maccabees (B.C. 163), when they threw off the Syrian yoke. In the year B.C. 68, Palestine was reduced by Pompey the Great to a Roman province. He laid the walls of the city in ruins, and massacred some twelve thousand of the inhabitants. He left the temple, however, unijured. About twenty-five years after this the Jews revolted and cast off the Roman yoke. They were however, subdued by Herod the Great (q.v.). The city and the temple were destroyed, and many of the inhabitants were put to death. About B.C. 20, Herod proceeded to rebuild the city and restore the ruined temple, which in about nine years and a half was so far completed that the sacred services could be resumed in it (Comp.  John 2:20 ). He was succeeded by his son Archelaus, who was deprived of his power, however, by Augustus, A.D. 6, when Palestine became a Roman province, ruled by Roman governors or procurators. Pontius Pilate was the fifth of these procurators. He was appointed to his office A.D. 25. Exclusive of Idumea, the kingdom of Herod the Great comprehended the whole of the country originally divided among the twelve tribes, which he divided into four provinces or districts. This division was recognized so long as Palestine was under the Roman dominion. These four provinces were, (1) Judea, the southern portion of the country; (2) Samaria, the middle province, the northern boundary of which ran along the hills to the south of the plain of Esdraelon; (3) Galilee, the northern province; and (4) Peraea (a Greek name meaning the "opposite country"), the country lying east of the Jordan and the Dead Sea. This province was subdivided into these districts, (1) Peraea proper, lying between the rivers Arnon and Jabbok; (2) Galaaditis (Gilead); (3) Batanaea; (4) Gaulonitis (Jaulan); (5) Ituraea or Auranitis, the ancient Bashan; (6) Trachonitis; (7) Abilene; (8) Decapolis, i.e., the region of the ten cities. The whole territory of Palestine, including the portions alloted to the trans-Jordan tribes, extended to about eleven thousand square miles. Recent exploration has shown the territory on the west of Jordan alone to be six thousand square miles in extent, the size of the principality of Wales. 
JOSHAPHAT|     josh'-a-fat (yoshaphaT, "Yahweh has judged"; compare JEHOSHAPHAT):  (1) One of David's mighty men ( 1 Chronicles 11:43 ), a "Mithnite," but not included in the list of  2 Samuel 23 .  (2) A priest and trumpeter of David's time ( 1 Chronicles 15:24 ), the King James Version "Jehoshaphat."
PELET|Deliverance.  (1.) A descendant of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:47 ). (2.) A Benjamite who joined David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:3 ). 
MAROTH|Bitterness; i.e., "perfect grief", a place not far from Jerusalem; mentioned in connection with the invasion of the Assyrian army ( Micah 1:12 ). 
IDUMEA|   IDUMAEA; IDUMAEANS  id-u-me'-a, id-u-me'-anz.  See  EDOM .
FALLOWDEER|Deuteronomy 14:5 (R.V.,  "Wild goat");  1 Kings 4:23  (R.V.,  "roebucks"). This animal, called in Hebrew yahmur, from a word meaning "to be red," is regarded by some as the common fallow-deer, the Cervus dama, which is said to be found very generally over Western and Southern Asia. It is called "fallow" from its pale-red or yellow colour. Some interpreters, however, regard the name as designating the bubale, Antelope bubale, the "wild cow" of North Africa, which is about the size of a stag, like the hartebeest of South Africa. A species of deer has been found at Mount Carmel which is called yahmur by the Arabs. It is said to be similar to the European roebuck. 
NAHAM|     na'-ham (nacham, "comfort"): A Judahite chieftain, father of Keilah the Garmite ( 1 Chronicles 4:19 ); the passage is obscure.
EZEM|     e'-zem (`etsem, "bone"; Boosal, Boasom):  A city in the extreme South of Judah, assigned to Simeon.  Some identify it with Azmon ( Joshua 15:29 ;  Joshua 19:3   1 Chronicles 4:29 ).
GERSHOM|Expulsion.  (1.) The eldest son of Levi ( 1 Chronicles 6:16 ,  17,  20,  43,  62,  71;  15:7 )=GERSHON (q.v.). (2.) The elder of the two sons of Moses born to him in Midian ( Exodus 2:22 ;  18:3 ). On his way to Egypt with his family, in obedience to the command of the Lord, Moses was attacked by a sudden and dangerous illness ( 4:24 -26), which Zipporah his wife believed to have been sent because he had neglected to circumcise his son. She accordingly took a "sharp stone" and circumcised her son Gershom, saying, "Surely a bloody husband art thou to me", i.e., by the blood of her child she had, as it were, purchased her husband, had won him back again. (3.) A descendant of Phinehas who returned with Ezra from Babylon ( Ezra 8:2 ). (4.) The son of Manasseh ( Judges 18:30 ), in R.V. "of Moses." 
TEBALIAH|     teb-a-li'-a, te-bal'-ya (Tebhalyahu, "Yahweh hath dipped," i.e. "purified"; Codex Vaticanus Tablai; Codex Alexandrinus Tabelias; Lucian, Tabeel): A Merarite gatekeeper. ( 1 Chronicles 26:11 ). The name should perhaps read Tobhiyahu, "Yahweh is good" (possibly from t-w-b-y-h-w misread Tebhalyahu).  See  TOBIJAH .
SHETHARBOZENAI|   SHETHAR-BOZENAI, SHETHAR-BOZNAI  she'-thar-boz'-e-ni, she'-thar-boz'-ni, -boz'-na-i, (shethar boznay, meaning uncertain): The name of a Persian (?) official mentioned with Tattenai in connection with the correspondence with Darius relative to the rebuilding of the Temple ( Ezra 5:3, 6 ;  Ezra 6:6, 12 ; Codex Vaticanus Satharbouzan; Codex Alexandrinus Satharbouzanai, in  Ezra 5:3 ;  Ezra 6:13 ; Satharbouzanes, in  Ezra 5:6 ; Satharbouzane, in  Ezra 6:6 ; Lucian, throughout, Tharbouzanaios), called in 1 Esdras 6:3, 7, 27; 7:1 "Shathrabuzanes."  Among the conjectures as to the meaning and derivation of the name, the following may be mentioned:  (1) Shethar-boznai may be a corruption of metharboznay = Mithrobouzanes, Old Persian Mithrobauzana-i.e. "Mithra is deliverer."  (2) shathar is identical with the Old Persian Tsithra ("seed," "brilliance"); names have been found that are confounded with this word.  (3) shethar bowzenay may be a title, but sethar, must then be read for shethar.  (4) shethar boznay is equivalent to the Old Persian Sethrabuzana, "empire-delivering"; compare Encyclopedia Biblica, article "Shethar-boznai," and Brown, Driver, and Briggs, Hebrew and English Lexicon of the Old Testament.  Horace J. Wolf
ZEBUDAH|Given, the wife of Josiah and mother of Jehoiakim ( 2 Kings 23:36 ). 
IBNIJAH|     ib-ni'-ja (yibniyah or yibhneyah, "Yah buildeth up"): A Benjamite, father of Reuel ( 1 Chronicles 9:8 ).
MESOPOTAMIA|The country between the two rivers (Hebrews Aram-naharaim; i.e.,  "Syria of the two rivers"), the name given by the Greeks and Romans to the region between the Euphrates and the Tigris ( Genesis 24:10 ;  Deuteronomy 23:4 ;  Judges 3:8 ,  10). In the Old Testament it is mentioned also under the name "Padan-aram;" i.e., the plain of Aram, or Syria ( Genesis 25:20 ). The northern portion of this fertile plateau was the original home of the ancestors of the Hebrews ( Genesis 11 ;  Acts 7:2 ). From this region Isaac obtained his wife Rebecca ( Genesis 24:10 ,  15), and here also Jacob sojourned ( 28:2 -7) and obtained his wives, and here most of his sons were born ( 35:26 ;  46:15 ). The petty, independent tribes of this region, each under its own prince, were warlike, and used chariots in battle. They maintained their independence till after the time of David, when they fell under the dominion of Assyria, and were absorbed into the empire ( 2 Kings 19:13 ). 
HASRAH|Poverty, "keeper of the wardrobe," i.e., of the sacerdotal vestments ( 2 Chronicles 34:22 ); called Harhas  2 Kings 22:14 . He was husband of the prophetess Huldah. 
ELIEHOENAI|     e-li-e-ho'-e-ni ('elyeho`enay, "to Yahweh are mine eyes"):  (1) (the King James Version Elioenai) a Korahite doorkeeper ( 1 Chronicles 26:3 ).  (2) (the King James Version Elihoenai) Head of a family in the Return ( Ezra 8:4 ).
TRYPHENA|Tryphena and Tryphosa Two female Christians, active workers, whom Paul salutes in his epistle to the Romans ( 16:12 ). 
IBZAN|Illustrious, the tenth judge of Israel ( Judges 12:8 -10). He ruled seven years. 
CHINNERETH|Lyre, the singular form of the word ( Deuteronomy 3:17 ;  Joshua 19:35 ), which is also used in the plural form, Chinneroth, the name of a fenced city which stood near the shore of the lake of Galilee, a little to the south of Tiberias. The town seems to have given its name to a district, as appears from  1 Kings 15:20 , where the plural form of the word is used. The Sea of Chinnereth ( Numbers 34:11 ;  Joshua 13:27 ), or of Chinneroth ( Joshua 12:3 ), was the "lake of Gennesaret" or "sea of Tiberias" ( Deuteronomy 3:17 ;  Joshua 11:2 ). Chinnereth was probably an ancient Canaanitish name adopted by the Israelites into their language. 
TABEAL|Goodness of God, the father of one whom the kings of Syria and Samaria in vain attempted to place on the throne of Ahaz ( Isaiah 7:6 ). 
CANANAEAN|   ; CANAANITE  ka-na-ne'-an, ka'-nan-it.  See  SIMON ;  CANANAEAN .  SIMON THE CANAANITE; SIMON THE CANANAEAN; SIMON THE ZEALOT  (Simon Kananaios; kanna'i, "the Jealous (or Zealous) One"): One of the Twelve Apostles. This Simon was also named "the Canaanite" ( Matthew 10:4   Mark 3:18  the King James Version) or "the Cananean" ( Matthew 10:4   Mark 3:18  the Revised Version (British and American)) or "Zelotes" ( Luke 6:15   Acts 1:13  the King James Version) or "the Zealot" ( Luke 6:15   Acts 1:13  the Revised Version (British and American)).  According to the "Gospel of the Ebionites" or" Gospel of the Twelve Apostles" (of the 2nd century and mentioned by Origen) Simon received his call to the apostleship along with Andrew and Peter, the sons of Zebedee, Thaddaeus and Judas Iscariot at the Sea of Tiberias (compare  Matthew 4:18-22 ; see also Hennecke, Neutestamentliche Apokryphen, 24-27).  Although Simon, like the majority of the apostles, was probably a Galilean, the designation "Cananaean" is regarded as of political rather than of geographical significance (compare Luke's rendering). The Zealots were a faction, headed by Judas of Galilee, who "in the days of the enrollment" (compare  Acts 5:37   Luke 2:1, 2 ) bitterly opposed the threatened increase of taxation at the census of Quirinius, and would have hastened by the sword the fulfillment of Messianic prophecy.  Simon has been identified with Simon the brother of Jesus ( Mark 6:3   Matthew 13:55 ), but there also are reasons in favor of identifying him with Nathanael.  Thus (1) all the arguments adduced in favor of the Bartholomew-Nathanael identification (see NATHANAEL) can equally be applied to that of Simon-Nathanael, except the second. But the second is of no account, since the Philip-Bartholomew connection in the Synoptists occurs merely in the apostolic lists, while in John it is narrative. Further, in the Synoptists, Philip is connected in the narrative, not with Bartholomew but with Andrew.  (2) The identity is definitely stated in the Genealogies of the Twelve Apostles (see NATHANAEL). Further, the "Preaching of Simon, son of Cleopas" (compare Budge, II, 70;) has the heading "The preaching of the blessed Simon, the son of Cleopas, who was surnamed Judas, which is interpreted Nathanael, who became bishop of Jerusalem after James the brother of our Lord." Eusebius (Historia Ecclesiastica, III, xi, 32; IV, xxii) also refers to a Simon who succeeded James as bishop of Jerusalem and suffered martyrdom under Trajan; and Hegesippus, whom Eusebius professes to quote, calls this Simon a son of Cleopas.  (3) The invitation of Philip to Nathanael (compare  John 1:45 ) was one which would naturally be addressed to a follower of the Zealots, who based their cause on the fulfillment of Messianic prophecy.  (4) As Alpheus, the father of James, is generally regarded as the same as Clopas or Cleopas (see JAMES), this identification of the above Simon Nathanael, son of Cleopas, with Simon Zelotes would shed light on the reason of the juxtaposition of James son of Alpheus and Simon Zelotes in the apostolic lists of Luke and Acts, i.e. they were brothers.  C. M. Kerr
SHRINES|Shrines, Silver Little models and medallions of the temple and image of Diana of Ephesus ( Acts 19:24 ). The manufacture of these was a very large and profitable business. 
PONTUS|A province of Asia Minor, stretching along the southern coast of the Euxine Sea, corresponding nearly to the modern province of Trebizond. In the time of the apostles it was a Roman province. Strangers from this province were at Jerusalem at Pentecost ( Acts 2:9 ), and to "strangers scattered throughout Pontus," among others, Peter addresses his first epistle ( 1 Peter 1:1 ). It was evidently the resort of many Jews of the Dispersion. Aquila was a native of Pontus ( Acts 18:2 ). 
MEDES|     medz (madhi; Assyrian Amada, Mada; Achaem. Persian Mada; Medoi ( Genesis 10:2   2 Kings 17:6 ;  2 Kings 18:11   1 Chronicles 1:5   Ezra 6:2   Esther 1:3, 14, 18, 19 ;  Esther 10:2   Isaiah 13:17 ;  Isaiah 21:2   Jeremiah 25:25 ;  Jeremiah 51:11, 28   Daniel 5:28 ;  Daniel 6:1, 9, 13, 16 ; 8:20; 9:01; 11:1)): Mentioned as Japhethites in  Genesis 10:2 , i.e. Aryans, and accordingly they first called themselves Arioi (Herod. vii.62), in Avestic Airya = Skt. Arya, "noble." They were closely allied in descent, language and religion with the Persians, and in secular history preceded their appearance by some centuries. Like most Aryan nations they were at first divided into small village communities each governed by its own chiefs (called in Assyrian chazanati by Assur-bani-pal: compare Herod. i.96). Shalmaneser II mentions them (Nimrod Obelisk, i.121) about 840 B.C. They then inhabited the modern A'zarbaijan (Media Atropatene). Rammanu-nirari III of Assyria (Rawlinson, Western Asiatic Inscriptions, I, 35) declares that he (810-781 B.C.) had conquered "the land of the Medes and the land of Parsua" (Persis), as well as other countries. This probably meant only a plundering expedition, as far as Media was concerned. So also Assur-nirari II (Western Asiastic Inscriptions, II, 52) in 749-748 B.C. overran Namri in Southwest Media. Tiglath-pileser IV (in Babylonian called Pulu, the "Pul" of  2 Kings 15:19 ) and Sargon also overran parts of Media. Sargon in 716 B.C. conquered Kisheshin, Kharkhar and other parts of the country. Some of the Israelites were by him transplanted to "the cities of the Medes" ( 2 Kings 17:6 ;  2 Kings 18:11 ; the Septuagint reading Ore, cannot be rendered "mountains" of the Medes here) after the fall of Samaria in 722 B.C. It was perhaps owing to the need of being able to resist Assyria that about 720 B.C. the Medes (in part at least) united into a kingdom under Deiokes, according to Herodotus (i.98). Sargon mentions him by the name Dayaukku, and says that he himself captured this prince (715 B.C.) and conquered his territory two years later. After his release, probably, Deiokes fortified Ecbatana (formerly Ellippi) and made it his capital. It has been held by some that Herodotus confounds the Medes here with the Manda (or Umman-Manda, "hosts of the Manda") of the inscriptions; but these were probably Aryan tribes, possibly of Scythian origin, and the names Mada and Manda may be, after all, identical. Esar-haddon in his 2nd year (679-678 B.C.) and Assurbani-pal warred with certain Median tribes, whose power was now growing formidable. They (or the Manda) had conquered Persis and formed a great confederacy. Under Kyaxares (Uvakh-shatara-Deiokes' grandson, according to Herodotus), they besieged Nineveh, but Assur-bani-pal, with the assistance of the Ashguza (? the Ashkenaz of  Genesis 10:3 ), another Aryan tribe, repelled them. The end of the Assyrian empire came, however, in 606 B.C., when the Manda under their king Iriba-tukte, Mamiti-arsu "lord of the city of the Medes," Kastarit of the Armenian district of Kar-kassi, the Kimmerians (Gimirra = Gomer) under Teushpa (Teispes, Chaishpish), the Minni (Manna; compare  Jeremiah 51:27 ), and the Babylonians under Nabu-pal-ucsur, stormed and destroyed Nineveh, as Nabu-nahid informs us. The last king of Assyria, Sin-sar-iskun (Sarakos), perished with his people.  Herodotus says that Deiokes was succeeded by Phraortes (Fravartish) his son, Phraortes by his son Kyaxares; and the latter in turn left his kingdom to his son Astyages whose daughter Mandane married Cambyses, father of the great Cyrus. Yet there was no Median empire (such as he describes) then, or at least it did not embrace all the Aryan tribes of Western Asia, as we see from the inscriptions that in 606 B.C., and even later, many of them were under kings and princes of their own (compare  Jeremiah 25:25 ;  Jeremiah 51:11 ). Herodotus tells us they were divided into six tribes, of whom the Magi were one (Herod. i.101). Kyaxares warred for 5 years (590-585 B.C.) with the Lydians, the struggle being ended in May, 585, by the total eclipse of the sun foretold by Thales (Herodotus i.74).  The alliance between the Medes and the Babylonians ended with Nebuchadnezzar's reign. His successor Nabu-nahid (555 B.C.) says that in that year the Medes under Astyages (Ishtuwegu) entered Mesopotamia and besieged Haran. Soon after, however, that dynasty was overthrown; for Cyrus the Persian, whom Nabu-nahid the first time he mentions him styles Astyages' "youthful slave" (ardusu cachru), but who was even then king of Anshan (Anzan), attacked and in 549 B.C. captured Astyages, plundered Ecbatana, and became king of the Medes. Though of Persian descent, Cyrus did not, apparently, begin to reign in Persia till 546 B.C. Henceforth there was no Median empire distinguished from the Persian (nor is any such mentioned in Daniel, in spite of modern fancies). As the Medes were further advanced in civilization and preceded the Persians in sovereignty, the Greek historians generally called the whole nation "the Medes" long after Cyrus' time. Only much later are the Persians spoken of as the predominant partners. Hence, it is a sign of early date that Daniel (8:20) speaks of "Media and Persia," whereas later the Book of Esther reverses the order ("Persia and Media,"  Esther 1:3, 14, 18, 19 ;  Esther 10:2 ), as in the inscriptions of Darius at Behistun. Under Darius I, Phraortes (Fravartish) rebelled, claiming the throne of Media as a descendant of Kyaxares. His cause was so powerfully supported among the Medes that the rebellion was not suppressed till after a fierce struggle. He was finally taken prisoner at Raga (Rai, near Tehran), brutally mutilated, and finally impaled st Ecbatana. After that Median history merges into that of Persia. The history of the Jews in Media is referred to in Daniel and Esther. 1 Maccabees tells something of Media under the Syrian (6:56) and Parthian dominion (14:1-3; compare Josephus, Ant, XX, iii). Medes are last mentioned in  Acts 2:9 . They are remarkable as the first leaders of the Aryan race in its struggle with the Semites for freedom and supremacy.  W. St. Clair Tisdall
BECHORATH|     be-kor'-ath.  See  BECORATH .
MESHULLEMETH|Friend, the wife of Manasseh, and the mother of Amon ( 2 Kings 21:19 ), Kings of Judah. 
EPHESIANS|Ephesians, Epistle to Was written by Paul at Rome about the same time as that to the Colossians, which in many points it resembles. Contents of. The Epistle to the Colossians is mainly polemical, designed to refute certain theosophic errors that had crept into the church there. That to the Ephesians does not seem to have originated in any special circumstances, but is simply a letter springing from Paul's love to the church there, and indicative of his earnest desire that they should be fully instructed in the profound doctrines of the gospel. It contains (1) the salutation ( 1:1 ,  2); (2) a general description of the blessings the gospel reveals, as to their source, means by which they are attained, purpose for which they are bestowed, and their final result, with a fervent prayer for the further spiritual enrichment of the Ephesians ( 1:3 - 2:10 ); (3) "a record of that Marked change in spiritual position which the Gentile believers now possessed, ending with an account of the writer's selection to and qualification for the apostolate of heathendom, a fact so considered as to keep them from being dispirited, and to lead him to pray for enlarged spiritual benefactions on his absent sympathizers" ( 2:12 - 3:21 ); (4) a chapter on unity as undisturbed by diversity of gifts ( 4:1 -16); (5) special injunctions bearing on ordinary life ( 4:17 - 6:10 ); (6) the imagery of a spiritual warfare, mission of Tychicus, and valedictory blessing ( 6:11 -24). Planting of the church at Ephesus. Paul's first and hurried visit for the space of three months to Ephesus is recorded in  Acts 18:19 -21. The work he began on this occasion was carried forward by Apollos (24-26) and Aquila and Priscilla. On his second visit, early in the following year, he remained at Ephesus "three years," for he found it was the key to the western provinces of Asia Minor. Here "a great door and effectual" was opened to him ( 1 Corinthians 16:9 ), and the church was established and strengthened by his assiduous labours there ( Acts 20:20 ,  31). From Ephesus as a centre the gospel spread abroad "almost throughout all Asia" ( 19:26 ). The word "mightily grew and prevailed" despite all the opposition and persecution he encountered. On his last journey to Jerusalem the apostle landed at Miletus, and summoning together the elders of the church from Ephesus, delivered to them his remarkable farewell charge ( Acts 20:18 -35), expecting to see them no more. The following parallels between this epistle and the Milesian charge may be traced: (1.)  Acts 20:19  =  Ephesians 4:2 . The phrase "lowliness of mind" occurs nowhere else. (2.)  Acts 20:27  =  Ephesians 1:11 . The word "counsel," as denoting the divine plan, occurs only here and  Hebrews 6:17 . (3.)  Acts 20:32  =  Ephesians 3:20 . The divine ability. (4.)  Acts 20:32  =  Ephesians 2:20 . The building upon the foundation. (5.)  Acts 20:32  =  Ephesians 1:14 , 18. "The inheritance of the saints." Place and date of the writing of the letter. It was evidently written from Rome during Paul's first imprisonment ( 3:1 ;  4:1 ;  6:20 ), and probably soon after his arrival there, about the year 62, four years after he had parted with the Ephesian elders at Miletus. The subscription of this epistle is correct. There seems to have been no special occasion for the writing of this letter, as already noted. Paul's object was plainly not polemical. No errors had sprung up in the church which he sought to point out and refute. The object of the apostle is "to set forth the ground, the cause, and the aim and end of the church of the faithful in Christ. He speaks to the Ephesians as a type or sample of the church universal." The church's foundations, its course, and its end, are his theme. "Everywhere the foundation of the church is the will of the Father; the course of the church is by the satisfaction of the Son; the end of the church is the life in the Holy Spirit." In the Epistle to the Romans, Paul writes from the point of view of justification by the imputed righteousness of Christ; here he writes from the point of view specially of union to the Redeemer, and hence of the oneness of the true church of Christ. "This is perhaps the profoundest book in existence." It is a book "which sounds the lowest depths of Christian doctrine, and scales the loftiest heights of Christian experience;" and the fact that the apostle evidently expected the Ephesians to understand it is an evidence of the "proficiency which Paul's converts had attained under his preaching at Ephesus." Relation between this epistle and that to the Colossians (q.v.). "The letters of the apostle are the fervent outburst of pastoral zeal and attachment, written without reserve and in unaffected simplicity; sentiments come warm from the heart, without the shaping out, pruning, and punctilious arrangement of a formal discourse. There is such a fresh and familiar transcription of feeling, so frequent an introduction of coloquial idiom, and so much of conversational frankness and vivacity, that the reader associates the image of the writer with every paragraph, and the ear seems to catch and recognize the very tones of living address." "Is it then any matter of amazement that one letter should resemble another, or that two written about the same time should have so much in common and so much that is peculiar? The close relation as to style and subject between the epistles to Colosse and Ephesus must strike every reader. Their precise relation to each other has given rise to much discussion. The great probability is that the epistle to Colosse was first written; the parallel passages in Ephesians, which amount to about forty-two in number, having the appearance of being expansions from the epistle to Colosse. Compare: Eph 1:7; Col 1:14 Eph 1:10; Col 1:20 Eph 3:2; Col 1:25 Eph 5:19; Col 3:16 Eph 6:22; Col 4:8 Eph 1:19-2:5; Col 2:12,13 Eph 4:2-4; Col 3:12-15 Eph 4:16; Col 2:19 Eph 4:32; Col 3:13 Eph 4:22-24; Col 3:9,10 Eph 5:6-8; Col 3:6-8 Eph 5:15,16; Col 4:5 Eph 6:19,20; Col 4:3,4 Eph 5:22-6:9; Col 3:18-4:1 "The style of this epistle is exceedingly animated, and corresponds with the state of the apostle's mind at the time of writing. Overjoyed with the account which their messenger had brought him of their faith and holiness ( Ephesians 1:15 ), and transported with the consideration of the unsearchable wisdom of God displayed in the work of man's redemption, and of his astonishing love towards the Gentiles in making them partakers through faith of all the benefits of Christ's death, he soars high in his sentiments on those grand subjects, and gives his thoughts utterance in sublime and copious expression." 
JEHIEL|God's living one.  (1.) The father of Gibeon ( 1 Chronicles 9:35 ). (2.) One of David's guard ( 1 Chronicles 11:44 ). (3.) One of the Levites "of the second degree," appointed to conduct the music on the occasion of the ark's being removed to Jerusalem ( 1 Chronicles 15:18 ,  20). (4.) A Hachmonite, a tutor in the family of David toward the close of his reign ( 1 Chronicles 27:32 ). (5.) The second of Jehoshaphat's six sons ( 2 Chronicles 21:2 ). (6.) One of the Levites of the family of Heman who assisted Hezekiah in his work of reformation ( 2 Chronicles 29:14 ). (7.) A "prince" and "ruler of the house of God" who contributed liberally to the renewal of the temple sacrifices under Josiah ( 2 Chronicles 35:8 ). (8.) The father of Obadiah ( Ezra 8:9 ). (9.) One of the "sons" of Elam ( Ezra 10:26 ). (10.)  Ezra 10:21 . 
BLAINS|Occurs only in connection with the sixth plague of Egypt ( Exodus 9:9 ,  10). In  Deuteronomy 28:27 , 35, it is called "the botch of Egypt." It seems to have been the fearful disease of black leprosy, a kind of elephantiasis, producing burning ulcers. 
LAHMAS|     la'-mas.  See  LAHMAM .
JEKAMIAH|     jek-am-mi'-a (yeqamyah, "may Yahweh establish"):  (1) A Judahite, son of Shallum ( 1 Chronicles 2:41 ).  (2) A son of King Jeconiah (Jehoiachin); in the King James Version "Jecamiah" ( 1 Chronicles 3:18 ).
BETHNIMRAH|   BETH-NIMRAH  beth-nim'-ra (beth nimrah, "house of leopard,"  Numbers 32:36 , but in verse  Numbers 32:3  it is simply Nimrah): In  Joshua 13:27  the full name appears. In  Isaiah 15:6  the name appears as Nimrim, identified as Tell Nimrim, between Jericho and the mountains on the east, where there is a fountain of large size. The city was assigned to Gad. In the 4th century A.D. it was located as five Roman miles North of Livias. Eusebius calls it Bethamnaram (SEP, I, Tell Nimrin).  NIMRAH; BETH-NIMRAH  nim'-ra (nimrah; Codex Vaticanus Nambra; Codex Alexandrinus Ambram), or (beth nimrah; Codex Vaticanus Namram; Codex Alexandria Ambran ( Numbers 32:36 ); Codex Vaticanus Baithanabra; Codex Alexandrinus Bethamna ( Joshua 13:27 )): These two names evidently refer to the same place; but there is no reason to think, as some have done, from the similarity of the names, that it is identical with NIMRIM (which see). On the contrary, the indications of the passages cited point to a site East of the Jordan valley and Nimrah of the Dead Sea. About 11 miles Northeast of the mouth of the Jordan, where Wady Nimrin, coming down from the eastern up-lands, enters the plain, stands a hill called Tell Nimrin, with tombs and certain traces of ancient building. This may be certainly identified with Nimrah and Beth-nimrah; and it corresponds to Bethnambris of Eusebius, Onomasticon, which lay 5 Roman miles Nimrah of Livias.  W. Ewing
RABSARIS|Chief of the Heads, one of the three officers whom Sennacherib sent from Lachish with a threatening message to Jerusalem ( 2 Kings 18:17 ;  Jeremiah 39:3 ,  13). 
JECOLIAH|Able through Jehovah, the wife of King Amaziah, and mother of King Uzziah ( 2 Chronicles 26:3 ). 
JEBUSITES|The name of the original inhabitants of Jebus, mentioned frequently among the seven nations doomed to destruction ( Genesis 10:16 ;  15:21 ;  Exodus 3:8 ,  17;  13:5 ,  etc.). At the time of the arrival of the Israelites in Palestine they were ruled by Adonizedek ( Joshua 10:1 ,  23). They were defeated by Joshua, and their king was slain; but they were not entirely driven out of Jebus till the time of David, who made it the capital of his kingdom instead of Hebron. The site on which the temple was afterwards built belonged to Araunah, a Jebusite, from whom it was purchased by David, who refused to accept it as a free gift ( 2 Samuel 24:16 -25;  1 Chronicles 21:24 ,  25). 
JAIR|Enlightener.  (1.) The son of Segub. He was brought up with his mother in Gilead, where he had possessions ( 1 Chronicles 2:22 ). He distinguished himself in an expedition against Bashan, and settled in the part of Argob on the borders of Gilead. The small towns taken by him there are called Havoth-jair, i.e., "Jair's villages" ( Numbers 32:41 ;  Deuteronomy 3:14 ;  Joshua 13:30 ). (2.) The eighth judge of Israel, which he ruled for twenty-two years. His opulence is described in  Judges 10:3 -5. He had thirty sons, each riding on "ass colts." They had possession of thirty of the sixty cities ( 1 Kings 4:13 ;  1 Chronicles 2:23 ) which formed the ancient Havoth-jair. (3.) A Benjamite, the father of Mordecai, Esther's uncle ( Esther 2:5 ). (4.) The father of Elhanan, who slew Lahmi, the brother of Goliath ( 1 Chronicles 20:5 ). 
LIKHI|     lik'-hi (liqchi): A descendant of Manasseh ( 1 Chronicles 7:19 ).
JAALA|A wild she-goat, one of the Nethinim, whose descendants returned from the Captivity ( Nehemiah 7:58 ). 
HAZAIAH|     ha-za'-ya (chazayah, "Jah sees"): Among the inhabitants of Jerusalem mentioned in the list of Judahites in  Nehemiah 11:5 .
BAKEMEATS|Baked provisions ( Genesis 40:17 ), literally "works of the baker," such as biscuits and cakes. 
ROHGAH|     ro'-ga (Kethibh rohaghah, Qere rohgah): A name in the genealogy of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 7:34 ).
SHAMGAR|The Philistines from the maritime plain had made incursions into the Hebrew upland for the purposes of plunder, when one of this name, the son of Anath, otherwise unknown, headed a rising for the purpose of freeing the land from this oppression. He repelled the invasion, slaying 600 men with an "ox goad" (q.v.). The goad was a formidable sharpointed instrument, sometimes ten feet long. He was probably contemporary for a time with Deborah and Barak ( Judges 3:31 ;  5:6 ). 
PIRATHONITE| (1.) Abdon, the son of Hillel, so called,  Judges 12:13 , 15. (2.) Benaiah the Ephraimite ( 2 Samuel 23:30 ), one of David's thirty heroes. 
COGITATIONS|(or "thoughts, " as the Chaldee word in  Dan. 7:28  literally means), earnest meditation. 
SHEPHAM|A treeless place,  Numbers 34:10 , 11: "The coast shall go down from Shepham to Riblah." 
ULLA|     ul'-a (`ulla' meaning unknown): An Asherite ( 1 Chronicles 7:39 ).
HIGHMINDED|     hi'-mind-ed: In modern usage denotes elevation of mind in a good sense, but formerly it was used to denote upliftedness in a bad sense, pride, arrogance. It is the translation of hupselophroneo, "to be highminded," "proud," "haughty" ( Romans 11:20 , "Be not highminded, but fear";  1 Timothy 6:17 , "Charge them that are rich. that they be not highminded"); of tuphoo "to wrap in mist or smoke," trop., to wrap in conceit, to make proud, etc. ( 2 Timothy 3:4 , "Traitors, heady, highminded," the Revised Version (British and American) "puffed up"; compare  1 Timothy 3:6 ;  1 Timothy 6:4 ). "No one can be highminded without thinking better of himself, and worse of others, than he ought to think" (Crabb, English Synonyms).  W. L. Walker
HELBON|Fat; i.e., "fertile", ( Ezek. 27:18  only), a place whence wine was brought to the great Market of Tyre. It has been usually identified with the modern Aleppo, called Haleb by the native Arabs, but is more probably to be found in one of the villages in the Wady Helbon, which is celebrated for its grapes, on the east slope of Anti-Lebanon, north of the river Barada (Abana). 
MOSERAH|     mo-se'-ra, mo'-se-ra (mocerah, "bond"): Perhaps Moser with the "he" of locale (direction), "to Moser" ( Deuteronomy 10:6 ).  See  MOSEROTH .
BIDKAR|     bid'-kar (bidhqar; "son of Deker" (?); compare HPN, 69): A captain in the service of Jehu, formerly his fellow-officer ( 2 Kings 9:25 ).
FRINGES|     frin'-jis (tsitsith, "tassel, lock" ( Numbers 15:38, 39 ), gedhilim, "twisted threads," "festoons" ( Deuteronomy 22:12 )): Tassels worn by the Israelites on the four corners of their garments as reminders of "all the commandments of Yahweh," in accordance with the law set out in  Numbers 15:37-41  and  Deuteronomy 22:12 . These tassels originally contained a thread of tekheleth, "violet." Jewish tradition, however, has failed to retain the tekheleth, because of doubt as to the exact meaning of the term, and instead dark blue lines were dyed on the borders of the Tallith or garment in which the fringes were placed. According to tradition any garment having four corners required the mnemonic fringes, the importance of which was weighed against "all the commandments of the Lord." In New Testament times such garments were still worn (compare  Matthew 9:20 ;  Matthew 14:36 ;  Matthew 23:5 ). The later Jews, after adopting the garments of the Diaspora, in order to observe the tsitsith commandment began to use two extra four-cornered fringed garments: the large Tallith while at prayer, and the small Tallith, or 'arba` kanephoth, as an undergarment during the day. Their tradition prescribes the exact manner in which each tassel shall be made, and gives a symbolic meaning to the numbers of windings and knots, somewhat after the manner of the string-writing of several early civilizations (compare the Peruvian quipus). Thus in the tsitsith a long cord is wrapped around seven shorter cords first seven times, then eight, then eleven, and finally thirteen, each series being separated from the others by two knots. The numbers seven and eight constituting fifteen together suggest YH, and the number eleven, WH. Together they make up the holy name YaHWeH. The number thirteen stands for echadh, the letters of which taken as numerals equal thirteen. The sentence Yahweh 'echadh means "Yahweh is one." Many other suggestions, more or less fanciful, have been worked out, all tending to associate the fringes with the Law in the mind of the wearer.  See  DRESS .  Ella Davis Isaacs
CYPRIANS|     sip'-ri-ans (Kuprioi): Occurs in 2 Maccabees 4:29. Menelaus who was high priest at Jerusalem, and Sostratus who was governor of the citadel, were summoned by King Antiochus to appear before him. "Menelaus left his own brother Lysimachus for his deputy in the high-priesthood; and Sostratus left Crates, who was over the Cyprians." The Cyprians were the inhabitants of the island of Cyprus. Barnabas, who was Paul's associate on his first missionary journey, was a Cyprian (Kuprios; see  Acts 4:36 ). the Revised Version (British and American) designates him as a man of Cyprus. The governor of the island was called a Cypriarch (see 2 Maccabees 12:2, and compare ASIARCH).  A. W. Fortune
FESTIVALS|Festivals, Religious There were daily ( Leviticus 23 ), weekly, monthly, and yearly festivals, and great stress was laid on the regular observance of them in every particular ( Numbers 28:1 -8;  Exodus 29:38 -42;  Leviticus 6:8 -23;  Exodus 30:7 -9;  27:20 ). (1.) The septenary festivals were, (a) The weekly Sabbath ( Leviticus 23:1 -3;  Exodus 19:3 -30;  20:8 -11;  31:12 ,  etc.). (b) The seventh new moon, or the feast of Trumpets ( Numbers 28:11 -15;  29:1 -6). (c) The Sabbatical year ( Exodus 23:10 ,  11;  Leviticus 25:2 -7). (d) The year of jubilee ( Leviticus 23 -35;  25:8 -16;  27:16 -25). (2.) The great feasts were, (a) The Passover. (b) The feast of Pentecost, or of weeks. (c) The feast of Tabernacles, or of ingathering. On each of these occasions every male Israelite was commanded "to appear before the Lord" ( Deuteronomy 27:7 ;  Nehemiah 8:9 -12). The attendance of women was voluntary. (Comp.  Luke 2:41 ;  1 Samuel 1:7 ;  2:19 .) The promise that God would protect their homes ( Exodus 34:23 ,  24) while all the males were absent in Jerusalem at these feasts was always fulfilled. "During the whole period between Moses and Christ we never read of an enemy invading the land at the time of the three festivals. The first instance on record is thirty-three years after they had withdrawn from themselves the divine protection by imbruing their hands in the Saviour's blood, when Cestius, the Roman general, slew fifty of the people of Lydda while all the rest had gone up to the feast of Tabernacles, A.D. 66." These festivals, besides their religious purpose, had an important bearing on the maintenance among the people of the feeling of a national unity. The times fixed for their observance were arranged so as to interfere as little as possible with the industry of the people. The Passover was kept just before the harvest commenced, Pentecost at the conclusion of the corn harvest and before the vintage, the feast of Tabernacles after all the fruits of the ground had been gathered in. (3.) The Day of Atonement, the tenth day of the seventh month ( Leviticus 16:1 ,  34;  23:26 -32;  Numbers 29:7 -11). (see  ATONEMENT ,  DAY OF.) Of the post-Exilian festivals reference is made to the feast of Dedication ( John 10:22 ). This feast was appointed by Judas Maccabaeus in commemoration of the purification of the temple after it had been polluted by Antiochus Epiphanes. The "feast of Purim" (q.v.),  Esther 9:24 -32, was also instituted after the Exile. (Cf.  John 5:1. ) 
TAHANITES|   TAHAN;   ta'-han, ta'-han-its (tachan, tachani): The name of two Ephraimites who lived toward the end of the exodus of the Israelites (circa 1415 B.C.).  (1) The head of one of the families of the tribe of Ephraim ( Numbers 26:35 ).  (2) The son of Telah and father of Ladan, also of the tribe of Ephraim ( 1 Chronicles 7:25 f ).
SHIPS|Early used in foreign commerce by the Phoenicians ( Genesis 49:13 ). Moses ( Deuteronomy 28:68 ) and Job ( 9:26 ) make reference to them, and Balaam speaks of the "ships of Chittim" ( Numbers 24:24 ). Solomon constructed a navy at Ezion-geber by the assistance of Hiram's sailors ( 1 Kings 9:26 -28;  2 Chronicles 8:18 ). Afterwards, Jehoshaphat sought to provide himself with a navy at the same port, but his ships appear to have been wrecked before they set sail ( 1 Kings 22:48 ,  49;  2 Chronicles 20:35 -37). In our Lord's time fishermen's boats on the Sea of Galilee were called "ships." Much may be learned regarding the construction of ancient merchant ships and navigation from the record in  Acts 27 , 28. 
UZZIA|     u-zi'-a (`uzziya', "my strength is Yah"; see UZZIAH): An Ashterathite and one of David's mighty men ( 1 Chronicles 11:44 ).
SIAHA|   SIA;   si'-a, si'-a-ha (ci'a'): One of the remnant which returned from captivity ( Nehemiah 7:47   Ezra 2:44 ).T+>shuthalchi): A son of Ephraim ( Numbers 26:35, 36 ; compare  1 Chronicles 7:20, 21 ), and his descendants.
ORPAH|Forelock or fawn, a Moabitess, the wife of Chilion ( Ruth 1:4 ;  4:10 ). On the death of her husband she accompanied Naomi, her mother-in-law, part of the way to Bethlehem, and then returned to Moab. 
MATTATHAH|     mat'-a-tha: the Revised Version (British and American).  See  MATTATTAH .
MIDIANITISH|   , WOMAN  mid'-i-an-it-ish, (ha-midhyanith, "the Midianitess"): The designation given to the daughter of Zur, Cozbi, whom Zimri the son of Salu brought into the camp of Israel ( Numbers 25:6-18 ). Both were of noble parentage ( Numbers 25:14, 15 ). The majority of the people strongly resented this act of profanation ( Numbers 25:6 ). A pestilence was raging in the camp, and Phinehas, the son of Eleazar, in an outburst of zeal pursued the two delinquents and slew them by a spear-thrust through their bodies ( Numbers 25:8 ). He obtained as a reward the immediate staying of the plague and the promise of perpetual priesthood to his family ( Numbers 25:8, 13 ).  John A. Lees
CENCHREA|Millet, the eastern harbour of Corinth, from which it was distant about 9 miles east, and the outlet for its trade with the Asiatic shores of the Mediterranean. When Paul returned from his second missionary journey to Syria, he sailed from this port ( Acts 18:18 ). In  Romans 16:1  he speaks as if there were at the time of his writing that epistle an organized church there. The western harbour of Corinth was Lechaeum, about a mile and a half from the city. It was the channel of its trade with Italy and the west. 
STEPHANAS|Crown, a member of the church at Corinth, whose family were among those the apostle had baptized ( 1 Corinthians 1:16 ;  16:15 ,  17). He has been supposed by some to have been the "jailer of Philippi" (Comp.  Acts 16:33 ). The First Epistle to the Corinthians was written from Philippi some six years after the jailer's conversion, and he was with the apostle there at that time. 
SHEBUEL|Captive of God.  (1.) One of the descendants of Gershom, who had charge of the temple treasures in the time of David ( 1 Chronicles 23:16 ;  26:24 ). (2.) One of the sons of Heman; one of those whose duty it was to "lift up the horn" in the temple service ( 1 Chronicles 25:4 ,  5); called also Shubael (ver. 20). 
NECO|     ne'-ko (nekho ( 2 Chronicles 35:22 ;  2 Chronicles 36:4 ))., "chain"): A neck-chain ornament, worn either separately ( Ezekiel 16:11 ), or with pendants ( Isaiah 3:19 ), such as crescents ( Isaiah 3:18 ) or rings ( Genesis 38:25 ); sometimes made of gold ( Genesis 41:42   Daniel 5:29 ), or of strings of jewels ( Songs 1:10 ). Even beasts of burden were sometimes so adorned by royalty ( Judges 8:26 ). It was considered suggestive of pride ( Psalm 73:6 ) or of filial loyalty ( Proverbs 1:9 ). The word does not occur in the King James Version, but such adornments have always been popular in all the Bible lands.  See  PHARAOH-NECOH .
HAMMEDATHA|Father of Haman, designated usually "the Agagite" ( Esther 3:1 ,  10;  8:5 ). 
PILEHA|     pil'-e-ha, pi'-le-ha.  See  PILHA .
SEPHAR|Numbering, ( Genesis 10:30 ), supposed by some to be the ancient Himyaritic capital, "Shaphar," Zaphar, on the Indian Ocean, between the Persian Gulf and the Red Sea. 
DEVILS|   COMMUNION WITH DEMONS;   de'-monz, (dev'-'-lz):   I. Use of Term:  The actual expression "communion with demons" (koinonoi ton daimonion) occurs but once in Scripture ( 1 Corinthians 10:20 ) where its figurative meaning is evident, but it is implied in the English version of a number of passages by the terms "one who has" or "those who have" "familiar spirits" ( Leviticus 19:31 ;  Leviticus 20:6, 27   Deuteronomy 18:11   1 Samuel 28:3, 7, 8, 9 ;  2 Kings 21:6 ;  2 Kings 23:24   1 Chronicles 10:13   2 Chronicles 33:6   Isaiah 8:19 ;  Isaiah 19:3 ;  Isaiah 29:4 ). These passages seem to be somewhat incongruous with Paul's statement, but are in reality so intimately related to it as to give and receive light through the connection.   II. Teaching of Scripture.  To begin with, we may safely say, in general, that there is no ground for asserting that the Bible admits the possibility of conscious and voluntary communion with spirits. This is an essential element of popular demonology in all ages, but it is absent from Scripture. Even in the passages mentioned above which refer to necromancers and wizards, while, as we shall see, the words indicate that such practitioners professed to rely upon spirits in their divinations, the Scriptures carefully refrain from sanctioning these claims, and a number of features in the various passages serve to indicate that the true scriptural view is quite the opposite. As this is not a prevalent opinion, we should do well to examine the passages with some little care.  1. The New Testament:  (1) We may first deal with the New Testament. In the Gospels the demoniacs are consistently looked upon and treated as unconscious and helpless victims (see DEMON, DEMONOLOGY). The frequent use of this term "demonized" (daimonizomenoi) together with all that is told us of the methods of treating these eases adopted by our Lord and His apostles (see EXORCISM) indicates the belief of the New Testament writers that the control of demons over men is obtained outside of or below the region of conscious volition and that the condition of the sufferers is pathological.  (2) The same must be said of the Lydian maiden whose cure by Paul is recorded in  Acts 16:16 . This is the one instance in the New Testament where divination is connected with spirits. The account emphasizes the excitable neurosis of the patient; and the belief on the part of the apostles and of the writer of Acts that the girl was not the conscious accomplice of her masters, but their unfortunate victim through her mysterious malady, is clear. She was treated, as the other eases recorded in the New Testament, not as a conscious wrongdoer, but as a sick person to be healed.  2. The Old Testament:  (1) Turning now to the Old Testament, the instance which requires the most careful treatment, because it holds the key to all the rest, is the narrative of Saul's visit to the Witch of Endor in  1 Samuel 28:3-25 . The Hebrew word 'obh which is usually translated "one who has a familiar spirit" (see list of passages at beginning of article) occurs in this narrative four times (verses 3, 7 twice, 8). According to the ordinary interpretation it is used in three different senses, two of which occur here. These three senses are  (a) a person who controls a spirit,  (b) the spirit controlled,  (c) the power to control such a spirit.  This meaning appears to be altogether too broad. Omitting to translate the word we have: (verse 3) "Saul had put away 'obhoth, and yidh`onim"; (verse 7), a woman, a mistress of an 'obh; (verse 8) "Divine unto me. by the 'obh." It is extremely unlikely that the same word should be used in two senses so far apart as "person who has a spirit" and the "spirit itself" in the same context. In the last passage mentioned (verse 8) there is a double indication that the word 'obh cannot have either signification mentioned. Saul says: "Divine unto me by the 'obh and bring me up whomsoever I shall name unto thee." The expression "divine by" clearly points to some magical object used in divination. Control of a spirit through some magical object is familiar enough. The rest of Saul's statement confirms this view. The result of the divination is the calling up of a spirit. A spirit would hardly be used to call up another spirit. This conclusion is confirmed by the etymology. The word 'obh is supposed to mean "one who has a familiar spirit," from its root-significance of hollow and its primary meaning of wineskin. According to this derivation the word is applied to a necromancer on the supposition that the spirit inhabits his body and speaks from within. The transference to spirit is extremely unlikely and the explanation is not consistent with primitive ideas on spirit manifestation (see Brown, Driver, and Briggs, Hebrew and English Lexicon of the Old Testament, 'owb end).  (2) We, therefore, hold with H. P. Smith (International Critical Commentary, "Samuel" in the place cited.), though partly on different grounds, that the word 'obh has the same meaning in all the passages where it occurs, and that it refers to a sacred object or fetish by which spiritistic divination was carried on.  The significance of this conclusion is that the misleading expression "familiar spirit" disappears from the text, for Dr. Driver's interpretation of the companion word yidh`onim (see International Critical Commentary, Commentary on Deuteronomy in the place cited.) will scarcely be maintained in the face of this new meaning for 'obh. The prohibition contained in the law ( Leviticus 20:27 ) against 'ohboth, and those using them, places them in the same catalogue of offense and futility with idol-worship in general.  (3) This opinion is confirmed by two separate items of evidence.  (a) In the Witch of Endor story Samuel's appearance, according to the idea of the narrator, was due to a miracle, not to the magic power of the feeble and cheating old woman to whom Saul had resorted. God speaks through the apparition a stern message of doom. No one was more startled than the woman herself, who for once had a real vision ( 1 Samuel 28:12 ). She not only gave a loud cry of astonishment and alarm but she described the figure which she saw as "a god coming up out of the each." The story is told with fidelity and clearly indicates the opinion that the actual appearance of a spirit is so violently exceptional as to indicate the immediate power and presence of God.  (b) In  Isaiah 8:19  the 'obhoth and yidh`onim are spoken of as those who "chirp and mutter." These terms refer to the necromancers themselves (Septuagint translates 'obhoth by eggastromuthoi = ventriloquists) who practiced ventriloquism in connection with their magical rites. In  Isaiah 29:4  it is said "Thy voice shall be as an 'obh, out of the ground." Here 'obh is usually interpreted as "ghost," but it is far more probable (see Brown, Driver, and Briggs, Hebrew and English Lexicon of the Old Testament sub loc.) that it refers as in 8:19 to the ventriloqustic tricks of those who utter their oracles in voices intended to represent the spirits which they have evoked. They are stamped in these passages, as in the Witch of Endor narrative, as deceivers practicing a fraudulent article. By implication their power to evoke spirits with whom they were in familiar intercourse is denied.  3. The Meaning of Idol-Worship:  This leaves the way clear for a brief consideration of the words of Paul in  1 Corinthians 10:20  in connection with cognate passages in the Old Testament.  (1) He argues that since idol-worship is really demon-worship, the partaking of heathen sacrifice is a communion with demons and a separation from Christ. It is usually taken for granted that this characterization of heathen worship was simply a part of the Jewish-Christian polemic against idolatry. Our fuller knowledge of the spiritism which conditions the use of images enables us to recognize the fact that from the viewpoint of heathenism itself Paul's idea was strictly correct. The image is venerated because it is supposed to represent or contain an invisible being or spirit, not necessarily a deity in the absolute sense, but a super-human living being capable of working good or ill to men.  (2) In the King James Version the term devils is used in four Old Testament passages ( Leviticus 17:7   Deuteronomy 32:17   2 Chronicles 11:15   Psalm 106:37 ). In the Revised Version (British and American) "devils" has disappeared from the text-the word he-goats appears in  Leviticus 17:7  and  2 Chronicles 11:15 , while "demons" appears in  Deuteronomy 32:17  and  Psalm 106:37 . The translation of se`irim as "he-goats" is literally correct, but conveys an erroneous conception of the meaning. The practice reprobated is the worship of Satyrs (see SATYR) or wood-demons supposed to be like goats in appearance and to inhabit lonely places. The same word is used in  Isaiah 13:21 ;  Isaiah 34:14 . The word translated "demons" in the Revised Version (British and American) is shedhim, a term used only twice and both times in connection with the rites and abominations of heathen worship. It is interesting to note that the word shidu is applied to the beings represented by the bull-colossi of Assyria (Driver, Deuteronomy in the place cited.). Brown, Driver, and Briggs, Hebrew and English Lexicon of the Old Testament holds that the word shedhim is an Assyrian loan-word, while Briggs (ICC,  Psalm 106:37 ) holds that shedhim were ancient gods of Canaan. In either case the word belongs to heathenism and is used in Scripture to describe heathen worship in its own terminology. The interpretation of these beings as evil is characteristic of Biblical demonism in general (see DEMON, etc.). The worship of idols was the worship of personal beings more than man and less than God, according to Jewish and Christian ideas (see Driver op. cit., 363). Septuagint translates both the above words by daimonia.  4. Conclusion:  The term "communion with demons" does not imply any power on the part of men to enter into voluntary relationship with beings of another world, but that, by sinful compliance in wrongdoing, such as idol-worship and magical rites, men may enter into a moral identification with evil powers against which it is their duty to fight.  LITERATURE.  The Dictionaries and Commentaries dealing with the passages quoted above contain discussions of the various aspects of the subject. Jewish superstitions are ably treated by Edersheim, Edersheim, Life and Times of Jesus the Messiah (8th edition), II, 771, 773.  Louis Matthews Sweet
REVELLINGS|     rev'-el-ingz (komos): The word is found both in the King James Version and in the Revised Version (British and American) in The Wisdom of Solomon 14:23 (the Revised Version (British and American) "revels," orgiastic heathen worship is in point); 2 Maccabees 6:4;  Galatians 5:21   1 Peter 4:3 . In  Galatians 5:21  it is classed with fornication, uncleanness, lasciviousness, etc., as one of the works of the flesh. In  1 Peter 4:3  it is spoken of the Gentiles and is classcd with drunkenness and carousings and such like. In  Romans 13:13  the Revised Version has "revelling" instead of the King James Version "rioting," and in  2 Peter 2:13 , "revel" replaces "riot." Similarly in  Amos 6:7 , "revelry" replaces "banquet." The obvious meaning of the word is excessive and boisterous intemperance and lustful indulgence.  G. H. Gerberding
GOATH|A lowing, a place near Jerusalem, mentioned only in  Jeremiah 31:39 . 
JAMIN|     ja'-min (yamin, "right hand"):  (1) In  Genesis 46:10   Exodus 6:15   Numbers 26:12   1 Chronicles 4:24 , a "son" (clan) of Simeon.  (2) In  1 Chronicles 2:27 , a Judahite, "son" of Ram and grandson of Jerahmeel.  (3) In  Nehemiah 8:7 , a Levite (?), one of those who "caused the people to understand" the Torah when Ezra enforced it = "Iadinus" in 1 Esdras 9:48.
IEZERITES|   IEZER;   i-e'-zer, i-e'-zer-its ('i`ezer,  Numbers 26:30 ): Contracted from ABIEZER ( Joshua 17:2 , etc.) (which see).
SHOPHAN|Hidden, or hollow, a town east of Jordan ( Numbers 32:35 ), built by the children of Gad. This word should probably be joined with the word preceding it in this passage, Atroth-Shophan, as in the Revised Version. 
VAHEB|     va'-heb (wahebh; Zoob): The name occurs in a quotation from the book of the Wars of Yahweh in  Numbers 21:14 . See  SUPHAH . It was apparently in Amorite territory. It is not identified.
HIGHEST|     hi'-est (`elyon; hupsistos): The translation of `elyon, used frequently of God and commonly translated "Most High" ( Psalm 18:13 , "The Highest gave his voice," the Revised Version (British and American) "Most High";  Psalm 87:5 , "the highest himself," the Revised Version (British and American) "Most High";  Ezekiel 41:7 , "the lowest (chamber) to the highest"); of tsammereth, the foliage of a tree (as if the wool or hair of trees), "the highest branch" ( Ezekiel 17:3, 12 , the Revised Version (British and American) "top," "lofty top"); of ro'sh, "head," "top" ( Proverbs 8:26 , "the highest part of the dust of the world," the King James Version margin "the chief part," the Revised Version (British and American) "the beginning of," margin "sum"); gappe marom, "on the ridges of the heights" ( Proverbs 9:3 , "the highest places of the city"); ghabhoah me`al gabhoah, literally, "one high (powerful) who is above the high (oppressor)," is translated "he that is higher than the highest" ( Ecclesiastes 5:8 ), the Revised Version (British and American) "one higher than the high (regardeth)." In the New Testament, hupsistos (like `elyon) is used of God ( Luke 1:32 , "the Son of the Highest,"  Luke 1:35 , "the power of the Highest,"  Luke 1:76 , "the prophet of the Highest";  Luke 6:35 , "the children of the Highest," in these places the Revised Version (British and American) has "Most High"); we have also "Hosanna in the highest" ( Matthew 21:9   Mark 11:10 ; see HOSANNA), "Glory to God in the highest" ( Luke 2:14 ), "Glory in the highest" ( Luke 19:38 ); protoklisia, "the first reclining-place" (at table), the chief place at meals, the middle place in each couch of the triclinium (Robinson), is rendered ( Luke 14:8 ), "the highest room," the Revised Version (British and American) "chief seat"; "room" was introduced by Tyndale; Wycliff had "the first place"; protokathedria (protos, "first," kathedra, "seat"), "the first or chief seat," is rendered ( Luke 20:46 ) "the highest seats," the Revised Version (British and American) "chief seats" Wycliff "the first chairs."  "The Highest" as a term for God appears (2 Esdras 4:11, 34, the Revised Version (British and American) "Most High"; The Wisdom of Solomon 6:3, hupsistos; Ecclesiasticus 28:7, the Revised Version (British and American) "Most High").  See also  GOD, NAMES OF .  W. L. Walker
SAMOS|An island in the AEgean Sea, which Paul passed on his voyage from Assos to Miletus ( Acts 20:15 ), on his third missionary journey. It is about 27 miles long and 20 broad, and lies about 42 miles south-west of Smyrna. 
MALCHIEL|     mal'-ki-el (malki'el, "God is king"): Grandson of Asher ( Genesis 46:17   Numbers 26:45   1 Chronicles 7:31 ).
DILEAN|     dil'-e-an (dil`an, "cucumber"): A town in the Shephelah of Judah named with Migdal-gad and Mizpeh ( Joshua 15:38 , the English Revised Version "Dilan"), which lay probably on the North of Lachish and Eglon. It has not been identified.
HADLAI|Resting, an Ephraimite; the father of Amasa, mentioned in  2 Chronicles 28:12 . 
ZEEB|The wolf, one of the two leaders of the great Midianite host which invaded Israel and was utterly routed by Gideon. The division of that host, which attempted to escape across the Jordan, under Oreb and Zeeb, was overtaken by the Ephraimites, who, in a great battle, completely vanquished them, their leaders being taken and slain ( Judges 7:25 ;  Psalm 83:11 ;  Isaiah 10:26 ). 
NAIOTH|Dwellings, the name given to the prophetical college established by Samuel near Ramah. It consisted of a cluster of separate dwellings, and hence its name. David took refuge here when he fled from Saul ( 1 Samuel 19:18 ,  19,  22,  23), and here he passed a few weeks in peace (Comp.  Psalm 11 ). It was probably the common residence of the "sons of the prophets." 
DIPHATH|     di'-fath (diphath): A son of Gomer, son of Japheth, son of Noah ( 1 Chronicles 1:6 ), called RIPHATH (which see) in the corresponding genealogy in  Genesis 10:3 .
TRACHONITIS|A rugged region, corresponds to the Hebrews Argob (q.v.), the Greek name of a region on the east of Jordan ( Luke 3:1 ); one of the five Roman provinces into which that district was divided. It was in the tetrarchy of Philip, and is now called the Lejah. 
EDAR|Tower of the flock, a tower between Bethlehem and Hebron, near which Jacob first halted after leaving Bethlehem ( Genesis 35:21 ). In  Micah 4:8  the word is rendered "tower of the flock" (marg.,  "Edar"), and is used as a designation of Bethlehem, which figuratively represents the royal line of David as sprung from Bethlehem. 
BISHOPRICK|     bish'-up-rik (episkope;  Acts 1:20  the King James Version, quoted from  Psalm 109:8 ): the Revised Version (British and American) "office," margin, "overseership."  See  BISHOP .
HORITES|Cave-men, a race of Troglodytes who dwelt in the limestone caves which abounded in Edom. Their ancestor was "Seir," who probably gave his name to the district where he lived. They were a branch of the Hivites ( Genesis 14:6 ;  36:20 -30;  1 Chronicles 1:38 ,  39). They were dispossessed by the descendants of Esau, and as a people gradually became extinct ( Deuteronomy 2:12 -22). 
BETHPEOR|House of Peor; i.e., "temple of Baal-peor", a place in Moab, on the east of Jordan, opposite Jericho. It was in the tribe of Reuben ( Joshua 13:20 ;  Deuteronomy 3:29 ;  4:46 ). In the "ravine" or valley over against Beth-peor Moses was probably buried ( Deuteronomy 34:6 ). 
MEPHIBOSHETH|Exterminator of shame; i.e., of idols.  (1.) The name of Saul's son by the concubine Rizpah (q.v.), the daughter of Aiah. He and his brother Armoni were with five others "hanged on a hill before the Lord" by the Gibeonites, and their bodies exposed in the sun for five months ( 2 Samuel 21:8 -10).  (2.) The son of Jonathan, and grandson of Saul ( 2 Samuel 4:4 ). He was but five years old when his father and grandfather fell on Mount Gilboa. The child's nurse hearing of this calamity, fled with him from Gibeah, the royal residence, and stumbling in her haste, the child was thrown to the ground and maimed in both his feet, and ever after was unable to walk ( 19:26 ). He was carried to the land of Gilead, where he found a refuge in the house of Machir, the son of Ammiel, at Lo-debar, by whom he was brought up. Some years after this, when David had subdued all the adversaries of Israel, he began to think of the family of Jonathan, and discovered that Mephibosheth was residing in the house of Machir. Thither he sent royal messengers, and brought him and his infant son to Jerusalem, where he ever afterwards resided ( 2 Samuel 9 ). When David was a fugitive, according to the story of Ziba ( 2 Samuel 16:1 -4) Mephibosheth proved unfaithful to him, and was consequently deprived of half of his estates; but according to his own story, however ( 19:24 -30), he had remained loyal to his friend. After this incident he is only mentioned as having been protected by David against the vengeance the Gibeonites were permitted to execute on the house of Saul ( 21:7 ). He is also called Merib-baal ( 1 Chronicles 8:34 ;  9:40 ). (see  ZIBA .) 
FORTUNATUS|Fortunate, a disciple of Corinth who visited Paul at Ephesus, and returned with Stephanas and Achaicus, the bearers of the apostle's first letter to the Corinthians ( 1 Corinthians 16:17 ). 
CONSTELLATIONS|     kon-ste-la'-shuns (kecilim, literally, "Orions").  See  ASTRONOMY, sec . II, 11.  CHERUBIC, FORMS IN THE CONSTELLATIONS  che-roo'-bik.  See  ASTRONOMY .
BAALBERITH|Covenant lord, the name of the god worshipped in Shechem after the death of Gideon ( Judges 8:33 ;  9:4 ). In 9:46 he is called simply "the god Berith." The name denotes the god of the covenant into which the Israelites entered with the Canaanites, contrary to the command of Jehovah ( Exodus 34:12 ), when they began to fall away to the worship of idols. 
SHARUHEN|     sha-roo'-hen (sharuchen; hoi agroi auton): One of the cities in the territory of Judah assigned to Simeon ( Joshua 19:6 ). In  Joshua 15:32  it is called "Shilhim," and in  1 Chronicles 4:31 , "Shaaraim" (which see).
JOSIAH|Healed by Jehovah, or Jehovah will support. The son of Amon, and his successor on the throne of Judah ( 2 Kings 22:1 ;  2 Chronicles 34:1 ). His history is contained in  2 Kings 22 , 23. He stands foremost among all the kings of the line of David for unswerving loyalty to Jehovah ( 23:25 ). He "did that which was right in the sight of the Lord, and walked in all the way of David his father." He ascended the throne at the early age of eight years, and it appears that not till eight years afterwards did he begin "to seek after the God of David his father." At that age he devoted himself to God. He distinguished himself by beginning a war of extermination against the prevailing idolatry, which had practically been the state religion for some seventy years ( 2 Chronicles 34:3 ; Comp.  Jeremiah 25:3 ,  11,  29). In the eighteenth year of his reign he proceeded to repair and beautify the temple, which by time and violence had become sorely dilapidated ( 2 Kings 22:3 ,  5,  6;  23:23 ;  2 Chronicles 34:11 ). While this work was being carried on, Hilkiah, the high priest, discovered a roll, which was probably the original copy of the law, the entire Pentateuch, written by Moses. When this book was read to him, the king was alarmed by the things it contained, and sent for Huldah, the "prophetess," for her counsel. She spoke to him words of encouragement, telling him that he would be gathered to his fathers in peace before the threatened days of judgment came. Josiah immediately gathered the people together, and engaged them in a renewal of their ancient national covenant with God. The Passover was then celebrated, as in the days of his great predecessor, Hezekiah, with unusual magnificence. Nevertheless, "the Lord turned not from the fierceness of his great wrath wherewith his anger was kindled against Judah" ( 2 Kings 22:3 -20;  23:21 -27;  2 Chronicles 35:1 -19). During the progress of this great religious revolution Jeremiah helped it on by his earnest exhortations. Soon after this, Pharaoh-Necho II. (q.v.), king of Egypt, in an expedition against the king of Assyria, with the view of gaining possession of Carchemish, sought a passage through the territory of Judah for his army. This Josiah refused to permit. He had probably entered into some new alliance with the king of Assyria, and faithful to his word he sought to oppose the progress of Necho. The army of Judah went out and encountered that of Egypt at Megiddo, on the verge of the plain of Esdraelon. Josiah went into the field in disguise, and was fatally wounded by a random arrow. His attendants conveyed him toward Jerusalem, but had only reached Hadadrimmon, a few miles south of Megiddo, when he died ( 2 Kings 23:28 ,  30; Comp.  2 Chronicles 35:20 -27), after a reign of thirty-one years. He was buried with the greatest honours in fulfilment of Huldah's prophecy ( 2 Kings 22:20 ; Comp.  Jeremiah 34:5 ). Jeremiah composed a funeral elegy on this the best of the kings of Israel ( Lamentations 4:20 ;  2 Chronicles 35:25 ). The outburst of national grief on account of his death became proverbial ( Zechariah 12:11 ; Comp.  Revelation 16:16 ).
ZACHER|Memorial, a son of Jehiel ( 1 Chronicles 8:31 ;  9:35 ); called Zechariah ( 9:37 ). 
EZRI|Help of Jehovah, the son of Chelub. He superintended, under David, those who "did the work of the field for tillage" ( 1 Chronicles 27:26 ). 
ISHUAI|   , ISHUI  ish'-u-i, ish'-u-i (yishwi "level").  See  ISHVI .
LOTAN|Coverer, one of the sons of Seir, the Horite ( Genesis 36:20 ,  29). 
KORAHITES|That portion of the Kohathites that descended from Korah.  (1.) They were an important branch of the singers of the Kohathite division ( 2 Chronicles 20:19 ). There are eleven psalms (42-49; 84; 85; 87; 88) dedicated to the sons of Korah. (2.) Some of the sons of Korah also were "porters" of the temple ( 1 Chronicles 9:17 -19); one of them was over "things that were made in the pans" (31), i.e., the baking in pans for the meat-offering ( Leviticus 2:5 ). 
ELIZAPHAN|     el-i-za'-fan, e-liz'-a-fan ('elitsaphan; Septuagint Eleisaphan, Elisaphan, Elisapa, Elisaphat, "God has protected; compare tsephanyah, Zephaniah, "Yah has protected," and the Phoenician, tsephanba`al, Baal has protected"):  (1) The son of Uzziel, the son of Kohath, and so a prince of the Levitical class of the Kohathites ( Numbers 3:30   1 Chronicles 15:8   2 Chronicles 29:13 ). But in  1 Chronicles 15:8   2 Chronicles 29:13  his class seems to be coordinate with that of the Kohathites. He is called Elzaphan in  Exodus 6:22   Leviticus 10:4 .  (2) A "prince" or chief of Zebulun, who represented that tribe in the division of the land ( Numbers 34:25 ). Walter R. Betteridge
TIKVAH|   ; TIKVATH  tik'-va, tik'-vath (tiqwah, "hope"):->/cS, the Greek equivalent of the Hebrew CS:HebrewIT+chiddeqelIT-/cS): One of the rivers of Eden going "eastward to Assyria" ( Genesis 2:14  margin), called the Great River ( Daniel 10:4 ), elsewhere mentioned in the apocryphal books, as in Tob 6:1; Judith 1:6; Ecclesiasticus 24:25, called Diglath in Josephus, and Diglit in Pliny, now called in Mesopotamia Dijleh, generally supposed to be a Semitic corruption of Tigra, meaning originally an arrow, which from its rapidity of motion is symbolized. The Tigris rises in the mountains of Armenia, latitude 38 degrees 10 minutes, longitude 39 degrees 20 minutes, only a few miles from the main branch of the Euphrates. After pursuing a tortuous southeasterly course for 150 miles, it is joined by the east branch at Osman Kieui, some distance below Diarbekr. Here the stream is 450 ft. wide and 3 or 4 ft. deep. Passing through numerous mountain gorges for another 150 miles, it emerges into the region of low hills about Nineveh, and a little below into the great alluvial plain of Mesopotamia. Thence in its course to Bagdad it is joined by the Great Zab, the Lesser Zab, the Adhem, and the Diyaleh rivers, bringing a large amount of water from the Zagros Mountains. At Bagdad the overflows from the Euphrates in high water often increase the inundations. The flood season begins early in the month of March, reaching its climax about May 1, declining to its natural level by midsummer. In October and November, the volume of water increases considerably, but not so much as to overflow its banks. Below Bagdad, throughout the region of Babylonia proper, the Tigris joins with the Euphrates in furnishing the water for irrigation so successfully used in ancient times. English engineers are at present with great promise of success aiming to restore the irrigating systems of the region and the prosperity of ancient times. The total length of the river is 1,146 miles. It now joins the Euphrates about 40 miles Northwest of the Persian Gulf, the two streams there forming the Shat el Arab, but in early historical times they entered the Persian Gulf by separate mouths, the Gulf then extending a considerable distance above the present junction of the rivers, the sediment of the streams having silted up the head of the Gulf to that distance.  (1) The father-in-law of Huldah the prophetess ( 2 Kings 22:14 ) (Codex Vaticanus Thekkouau; Codex Alexandrinus Thekkoue; Lucian Thekoue), called in  2 Chronicles 34:22  "Tokhath" (Qere Kethibh Codex Vaticanus Kathoual; Codex Alexandrinus Thakouath, Lucian Thekoe). The reading of 2 Kings is to be preferred.  (2) The father of Jahzeiah ( Ezra 10:15 ) (Codex Vaticanus Helkeia; Codex Alexandrinus Thekoue, called "Theocanus," Revised Version "Thocanus" in 1 Esdras 9:14).
HADORAM|Is exalted.  (1.) The son of Tou, king of Hamath, sent by his father to congratulate David on his victory over Hadarezer, king of Syria ( 1 Chronicles 18:10 ; called Joram  2 Samuel 8:10 ). (2.) The fifth son of Joktan, the founder of an Arab tribe ( Genesis 10:27 ;  1 Chronicles 1:21 ). (3.) One who was "over the tribute;" i.e., "over the levy." He was stoned by the Israelites after they had revolted from Rehoboam ( 2 Chronicles 10:18 ). Called also Adoram ( 2 Samuel 20:24 ) and Adoniram ( 1 Kings 4:6 ). 
TOOLS|     toolz: In the Bible, references to the handicrafts are almost entirely incidental, and not many tools are named. The following article aims to give a list of those mentioned, together with those that must have existed also. For detailed description and the Hebrew and Greek terms employed, see the separate articles.  (1) The percussion tool was the hammer, used for splitting or trimming stone, beating metals, and in wood-carving, as well as for driving nails, tent pins, etc. Several words are translated "hammer," but the distinction between them is very vague and in some cases the propriety of the translation is dubious. Certainly no such distinction is made as that between "hammer" and "mallet," nor were separate names given to the different hammers used in the various crafts (compare, e.g.,  Judges 4:21   1 Kings 6:7 ;  Isaiah 44:12   Jeremiah 10:4  -all for maqqabhah).  See  HAMMER .  (2) Of cutting tools, the simplest was of course the knife. In  Exodus 20:25 , however, the knife ("sword," English Versions of the Bible "tool") appears as a stone-cutter's implement and is without doubt a chisel. But the hatchet of  Psalm 74:6  may be a knife.  See  HATCHET ;  KNIFE .  For ax, again, various words are employed in a way that is quite obscure to us and apparently with meanings that are not fixed. So garzen in  Deuteronomy 20:19  is certainly an ax, but in the Siloam Inscription (ll 2, 4) it is a pickax (see MATTOCK). The various words translated "ax" (the Revised Version (British and American) "axe") must also somewhere include the word for adz, but the specific term, if there were any such (ma'atsadh(?)), is unknown. But the adz is a very ancient tool and must certainly have existed in Palestine.  See  AX (AXE), AX-HEAD .  The saw was used both for wood and for stone ( 1 Kings 7:9 ), in the latter case being employed in connection with water and sand. But sawing stone was a very laborious process, and this was one reason why the ancients preferred stone in large blocks. These were quarried by the use of heavy hammers and wedges.  See  SAW .  The plane (maqtso`ah) of  Isaiah 44:13  should be translated chisel. Chisels, of course, are almost as old as humanity, and were used on both wood and stone and doubtless also on metals. In particular, with a broad chisel and an adz the surface of wood may be finished very smoothly, and these two implements took the place of the plane. For wood-carving the concave chisel (gouge) may have been invented.  The pencil of  Isaiah 44:13  is probably a stylus, for engraving as well as for marking out lines. For engraving on gems ( Exodus 28:9 , etc.) particularly delicate instruments of this kind must have been used.  See  LINE ;  PENCIL .  (3) Among the boring tools, only the awl appears ( Exodus 21:6   Deuteronomy 15:17 ), an instrument primarily for the use of workers in leather. Holes in wood or stone were made by a drill, often worked with the aid of a drawn bow, through the string of which the drill was passed.  See  AWL .  (4) Blunted tools were of course sharpened on stones, as everywhere. In  1 Samuel 13:21  English Versions of the Bible speaks of sharpening with a file, but the text of the verse is hopelessly corrupt and the translation mere guesswork. But files of some sort (stone?) must of course have been used by metal-workers.  See  FILE .  (5) Measuring tools were the line and the rod (see REED), and the latter must also have been used as a straight-edge. The compasses of  Isaiah 44:13  were for drawing circles, but doubtless served for measuring also. See  COMPASSES . Plumb-line ('anakh in  Amos 7:7 , a symbol of the searching moral investigation which would be followed by a precise and exact judgment; compare mishkoleth, "plummet,"  2 Kings 21:13   Isaiah 28:17 ) and plummet ('ebhen bedhil, "a stone of tin,"  Zechariah 4:10 , used by Zerubbabel in testing the completed walls) were likewise necessities and had existed from a very early period. Tools of some sort must have been used in addition by builders in drawing plans, but their nature is unknown.  See  LINE .  (6) The tools for holding and handling work (vises, tongs, pincers, etc.) are never alluded to (the King James Version in  Isaiah 44:12  is wrong; see TONGS). For moving larger objects no use was made of cranes, and lifting was done by the aid of inclined planes and rollers; but blocks of stone weighing hundreds of tons could be handled in this way.  The material of the Hebrew tools was either iron or bronze. The former was introduced at least by the time of David ( 2 Samuel 12:31 ), but the mention of iron as a material is often made in such a way ( Amos 1:3 , etc.) as to show that it was not to be taken for granted. In fact, iron was hard to work and expensive, and bronze probably persisted for a while as a cheaper material. Stone tools would be used only by the very poor or as occasional makeshifts or for sacred purposes ( Joshua 5:2 ).  For the agricultural tools see AGRICULTURE.  See also  CARPENTER ;  CRAFTS ; POTTER; SMITH, etc.  Burton Scott Easton
BETHRAPHA|   BETH-RAPHA  beth-ra'-fa (beth rapha'; B, ho Bathraia, Bathrepha): The name occurs only in the genealogical list in  1 Chronicles 4:12 . It does not seem possible now to associate it with any particular place or clan.
GAHAR|Lurking-place, one of the chief of the Nethinim, whose descendants returned to Jerusalem under Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:47 ). 
CABUL|How little! as nothing.  (1.) A town on the eastern border of Asher ( Joshua 19:27 ), probably one of the towns given by Solomon to Hiram; the modern Kabul, some 8 miles east of Accho, on the very borders of Galilee. (2.) A district in the north-west of Galilee, near to Tyre, containing twenty cities given to Hiram by Solomon as a reward for various services rendered to him in building the temple ( 1 Kings 9:13 ), and as payment of the six score talents of gold he had borrowed from him. Hiram gave the cities this name because he was not pleased with the gift, the name signifying "good for nothing." Hiram seems afterwards to have restored these cities to Solomon ( 2 Chronicles 8:2 ). 
SEBA| (1.) One of the sons of Cush ( Genesis 10:7 ). (2.) The name of a country and nation ( Isaiah 43:3 ;  45:14 ) mentioned along with Egypt and Ethiopia, and therefore probably in north-eastern Africa. The ancient name of Meroe. The kings of Sheba and Seba are mentioned together in  Psalm 72:10 . 
JUTAH|   JUTTAH;   jut'-a, joo'-ta (yuTTah,  Joshua 21:16 ; Septuagint Tanu; and in  Joshua 15:55  the King James Version, Septuagint Itan, A, Ietta); ju'-ta (yaTah),  Joshua 15:55 ): A town in the hill country of Judah, mentioned with Maon, Carmel and Ziph; a Levitical city ( Joshua 21:16 ). In some versions of Septuagint it occurs (Iota) in  1 Chronicles 6:57 . In the Eusebius, Onomasticon (266 49; 133 10) a large village called "Juttah" is described as 18 Roman miles from Eleutheropolis. This agrees with the position of YuTTa, a large and prosperous Moslem village, 3,740 ft. above sea-level, 5 1/3 miles South of Hebron and 15 1/2 miles from Beit Jebrin (Eleutheropolis). There are many rock-cut tombs and ancient winepresses all around the village.  Reland (Pal, 870) suggested (and many others have followed him) that the... polis Iouda, translated "city of Judah," in  Luke 1:39 , should be polis Iouta, "the city Yuta." The translation "city of Judah" is suspicious, because Iouda is without the article, which is usually put before the name of a district; the interchange of "t" and "d" is a very common one. Dr. Paterson, resident many years in Hebron, states that there is a local Moslem tradition in the district that Yutta was the home of John the Baptist. For YuTTa see PEF, III, 310, Sh XXI.  E. W. G. Masterman
MANCHILD|   MAN-CHILD  man'-child (American Standard Revised Version; "man child," the English Revised Version; not in the King James Version; mashtin beqir): The expression is used with the meaning of "male," but is found only in the description of the extermination of a whole family, where it is employed to express every male descendant of any age. It occurs in  1 Samuel 25:22, 34   1 Kings 14:10 ;  1 Kings 16:11 ;  1 Kings 21:21 ;  2 Kings 9:8 .
JECONIAH|     jek-o-ni'-a.  See  JEHOIACHIN .
IMLA|Replenisher, the father of Micaiah the prophet ( 2 Chronicles 18:7 , 8). 
OHOLIAB|     o-ho'-li-ab ('oholi'abh, "father's tent"; the King James Version Aholiab): A Danite artificer, who assisted Bezalel in the construction of the tabernacle and its furniture ( Exodus 31:6 ;  Exodus 35:34 ;  Exodus 36:1 ; 38:23).
JOATHAM|     jo'-a-tham (Ioatham): the King James Version for the Revised Version (British and American) "Jotham" ( Matthew 1:9 ).  See  JOTHAM (the king) .
RAAMAH|Thunder.  (1.) One of the sons of Cush ( Genesis 10:7 ).  (2.) A country which traded with Tyre ( Ezek. 27:22 ). 
REHOKIM|   JONATH ELEM   jo'-nath e'-lem re-ho'-kim (yonath 'elem rechoqim) (Psalm 56, title): "The silent dove of the far ones" (i.e. either of far-off lands, or among aliens), or "The dove of the distant terebinths," in either case indicating the tune to the melody of which the psalm was to be sung.  See  PSALMS ;  SONG .
REMALIAH|Adorned by the Lord, the father of Pekah, who conspired successfully against Pekahiah ( 2 Kings 15:25 ,  27,  30,  32,  37;  Isaiah 7:1 ,  4,  5,  9;  8:6 ). 
NICOPOLIS|City of victory, where Paul intended to winter ( Titus 3:12 ). There were several cities of this name. The one here referred to was most probably that in Epirus, which was built by Augustus Caesar to commemorate his victory at the battle of Actium (B.C. 31). It is the modern Paleoprevesa, i.e., "Old Prevesa." The subscription to the epistle to Titus calls it "Nicopolis of Macedonia", i.e., of Thrace. This is, however, probably incorrect. 
DABAREH|     dab'-a-re.  See  DABERATH .
DIBONGAD|   DIBON; DIBON-GAD  di'-bon (dibhon, "washing"; Daibon):  (1) A city of Moab captured by the Amorites ( Numbers 21:30 ), and held by them at the invasion by Israel. It was taken and given to the tribe of Gad, whence it is called Dibon-gad ( Numbers 32:34 ;  Numbers 33:45 ). In  Joshua 13:17  it is reckoned to Reuben. Along with other cities in the territory North of the Arnon, Dibon changed hands several times between Moab and Israel. Mesha claims it (MS), and in  Jeremiah 48:18, 22  it is named among the cities of Moab. The form of the name, Dimon, in  Isaiah 15:9 , may have been given to make it resemble the Hebrew dam, "blood," to support the play upon words in the verse (HDB, under the word). It is represented by the modern Dhiban, about 4 miles North of Aroer (`Ara`ir), on the line of the old Roman road. The ruins that spread over two adjacent knolls are of no importance: walls, a tower, cistern, etc. Near Dibon the famous Moabite Stone was found.  (2) A town in Judah, occupied after the exile ( Nehemiah 11:25 ). It may be the same as Dimonah ( Joshua 15:22 ); unidentified.  W. Ewing
LYCIA|A wolf, a province in the south-west of Asia Minor, opposite the island of Rhodes. It forms part of the region now called Tekeh. It was a province of the Roman empire when visited by Paul ( Acts 21:1 ;  27:5 ). Two of its towns are mentioned, Patara ( 21:1 ,  2) and Myra ( 27:5 ). 
DODAI|Loving, one of David's captains ( 1 Chronicles 27:4 ). (see  DODO  .) 
SHAREZER|(god) protect the king!, a son of Sennacherib, king of Assyria. He and his brother Adrammelech murdered their father, and then fled into the land of Armenia ( 2 Kings 19:37 ). 
BETHARBEL|House of God's court, a place alluded to by Hosea ( 10:14 ) as the scene of some great military exploit, but not otherwise mentioned in Scripture. The Shalman here named was probably Shalmaneser, the king of Assyria ( 2 Kings 17:3 ). 
MATRITES|     ma'-trits (ha-maTri): The Revised Version (British and American) translation of maTri with the definite article, "the Matrites" ( 1 Samuel 10:21 ).
HUSKS|     husks (keratia, i.e. "little horns,"  Luke 15:16 ): These are the pods of the carob tree (Revised Version, margin), also called the locust tree (Ceratonia siliqua). This tree flourishes all over Palestine, especially on the western mountain slopes toward the sea; by the Arabs it is called kharrub. It is dioecious, has dense, dark, evergreen foliage, glossy leaves and long, curved pods, like small horns (hence, the name). These pods which are from 4 to 9 inches in length, have a leathery case containing a pulpy substance in which the beans are imbedded; this pulp is of a pleasant, sweetish flavor and has a characteristic odor, and is much loved by children. The pods are sold in the markets, both as cattle food and for the poor, who extract by boiling them a sweetish substance like molasses. The tradition that the "locusts" of  Matthew 3:4   Mark 1:6  were carob pods is preserved in the name given to them, "St. John's bread," but it has little to be said for it.  E. W. G. Masterman
RAMAH|     ra'-ma (ha-ramah, without the definite article only in  Nehemiah 11:33   Jeremiah 31:15 ): The name denotes height, from root rum, "to be high," and the towns to which it applied seem all to have stood on elevated sites.  (1) Codex Vaticanus Arael; Codex Alexandrinus Rhama: A fenced city in the lot assigned to Naphtali ( Joshua 19:36 ). Only in this passage is the place referred to. It is probably identical with the modern er-Rameh, a large Christian village on the highway from Cafed to the coast, about 8 miles West-Southwest of that city. To the North rises the mountain range which forms the southern boundary of Upper Galilee. In the valley to the South there is much rich land cultivated by the villagers. The olives grown here are very fine, and fruitful vineyards cover many of the surrounding slopes. No remains of antiquity are to be seen above ground; but the site is one likely to have been occupied in ancient times.  (2) Rhama: A city that is mentioned only once, on the boundary of Asher ( Joshua 19:29 ). The line of the boundary cannot be followed with certainty; but perhaps we may identify Ramah with the modern Ramiyeh, a village situated on a hill which rises in the midst of a hollow, some 13 miles Southeast of Tyre, and 12 miles East of the Ladder of Tyre. To the Southwest is a marshy lake which dries up in summer. Traces of antiquity are found in the cisterns, a large reservoir and many sarcophagi. To the West is the high hill Belat, with ancient ruins, and remains of a temple of which several columns are still in situ.  (3) Codex Vaticanus Rhama; Codex Alexandrinus Iama, and other forms: A city in the territory of Benjamin named between Gibeon and Beeroth ( Joshua 18:25 ). The Levite thought of it as a possible resting-place for himself and his concubine on their northward journey ( Judges 19:13 ). The palm tree of Deborah was between this and Bethel ( Judges 4:5 ). Baasha, king of Samaria, sought to fortify Ramah against Asa, king of Judah. The latter frustrated the attempt, and carried off the materials which Bassha had collected, and with them fortified against him Geba of Benjamin and Mizpah ( 1 Kings 15:17   2 Chronicles 16:5 ). Here the captain of Nebuchadnezzar's guard released Jeremiah after he had been carried in bonds from Jerusalem ( Jeremiah 40:1 ). It figures in Isaiah's picture of the Assyrians' approach ( Isaiah 10:29 ). It is named by Hosea in connection with Gibeah (5:8), and is mentioned as being reoccupied after the exile ( Ezra 2:26   Nehemiah 7:30 ). It was near the traditional tomb of Rachel ( Jeremiah 31:15 ; compare  1 Samuel 10:2   Matthew 2:18 , the King James Version "Rama").  From the passages cited we gather that Ramah lay some distance to the North of Gibeah, and not far from Gibeon and Beeroth. The first is identified with Tell el-Ful, about 3 miles North of Jerusalem. Two miles farther North is er-Ram. Gibeon (el-Jib) is about 3 miles West of er-Ram, and Beeroth (el-Bireh) is about 4 miles to the North Eusebius, Onomasticon places Ramah 6 Roman miles North of Jerusalem; while Josephus (Ant., VIII, xii, 3) says it lay 40 furlongs from the city. All this points definitely to identification with er-Ram. The modern village crowns a high limestone hill to the South of the road, a position of great strength. West of the village is an ancient reservoir. In the hill are cisterns, and a good well to the South.  (4) Aramathaim: The home of Elkanah and Hannah, and the birthplace of Samuel ( 1 Samuel 1:19 ;  1 Samuel 2:11 , etc.). In  1 Samuel 1:1  it is called "Ramathaim-zophim" (ha-ramathayim-tsophim). The phrase as it stands is grammatically incorrect, and suggests tampering with the text. It might possibly be translated "Ramathaim of the Zuphites." It was in Mt. Ephraim, within accessible distance of Shiloh, whither Samuel's parents went up from year to year to worship and to sacrifice (1:3). From Ramah as a center Samuel went on circuit annually, to judge Israel, to Bethel, Gilgal and Mizpah (7:16). It is very probable that this is the city in which, guided by his servant, Saul first made the acquaintance of Samuel (9:6, 10), where there was a high place (9:12). Hither at all events came the elders of Israel with their demand that a king should be set over them (8:4). After his final break with Saul, Samuel retired in sorrow to Ramah (15:34). Here, in Naioth, David found asylum with Samuel from the mad king (19:18, etc.), and hence, he fled on his ill-starred visit to Nob (20:1). In his native city the dust of the dead Samuel was laid (25:1; 28:3). In 1 Maccabees 11:34 it is named as one of the three toparchies along with Aphaerema and Lydda, which were added to Judea from the country of Samaria in 145 B.C. Eusebius, Onomasticon places it near Diospolis (Euseb.) in the district of Timnah (Jerome).  There are two serious rivals for the honor of representing the ancient Ramah.  (a) Beit Rima, a village occupying a height 13 miles East-Northeast of Lydda (Diospolis), 12 miles West of Shiloh, and about the same distance Northwest of Bethel. This identification has the support of G. A. Smith (Historical Geography of the Holy Land, 254), and Buhl (Geographic des Alten Palestina, 170).  (b) Ramallah, a large and prosperous village occupying a lofty position with ancient remains. It commands a wide prospect, especially to the West. It lies about 8 miles North of Jerusalem, 3 West of Bethel, and 12 Southwest of Shiloh. The name meaning "the height" or "high place of God" may be reminiscent of the high place in the city where Saul found Samuel. In other respects it agrees very well with the Biblical data.  Claims have also been advanced on behalf of Ramleh, a village 2 miles Southwest of Lydda, in the plain of Sharon. This, however, is out of the question, as the place did not exist before Arab times. Others support identification with Neby Samwil, which more probably represents the ancient MIZPAH (which see).  (5) Ramah of the South, the King James Version "Ramath of the South": Ramath is the construct form of Ramah ( Joshua 19:8 ) (ra'math neghebh; Bameth kata liba). A city in that part of the territory of Judah which was allotted to Simeon. It stands here in apposition to Baalath-beer, and is probably a second name for the same place. It seems to correspond also with "Ramoth (plural) of the South" ( 1 Samuel 30:27 ), a place to which David sent a share of the spoil taken from the Amalekites. In this passage Septuagint retains the singular form, Rhama notou. Identification has been suggested with Qubbet el-Baul, about 37 miles South of Hebron; and with Kurnub a little farther South. There is no substantial ground for either identification.  (6) Codex Vaticanus Rhemmoth; Codex Alexandrinus Rhamoth: Ramah in  2 Kings 8:29   2 Chronicles 22:6 , is a contraction of Ramoth-gilead.  W. Ewing
MEALS|Are at the present day "eaten from a round table little higher than a stool, guests sitting cross-legged on mats or small carpets in a circle, and dipping their fingers into one large dish heaped with a mixture of boiled rice and other grain and meat. But in the time of our Lord, and perhaps even from the days of Amos ( 6:4 ,  7), the foreign custom had been largely introduced of having broad couches, forming three sides of a small square, the guests reclining at ease on their elbows during meals, with their faces to the space within, up and down which servants passed offering various dishes, or in the absence of servants, helping themselves from dishes laid on a table set between the couches." Geikie's Life of Christ. (Comp.  Luke 7:36 -50.) (see  ABRAHAM'S BOSOM ; BANQUET; FEAST.) 
MASCHIL|Instructing, occurs in the title of thirteen Psalms (32,  42,  44,  etc.). It denotes a song enforcing some lesson of wisdom or piety, a didactic song. In  Psalm 47:7  it is rendered, Authorized Version, "with understanding;" Revised Version, marg., "in a skilful psalm." 
PEULTHAI|Wages of the Lord, one of the sons of Obed-edom, a Levite porter ( 1 Chronicles 26:5 ). 
ODED|Restoring, or setting up.  (1.) Father of the prophet Azariah ( 2 Chronicles 15:1 ,  8). (2.) A prophet in the time of Ahaz and Pekah ( 2 Chronicles 28:9 -15). 
JUDE|= Judas. Among the apostles there were two who bore this name, (1) Judas ( Jude 1:1 ;  Matthew 13:55 ;  John 14:22 ; <a href=
ELIAHBA|     e-li'-a-ba, e-li-a'-ba ('elyach-ba', "God hides"):  One of David's 30 mighty men ( 2 Samuel 23:32   1 Chronicles 11:33 ).
BEROEA|     be-re'-a (Beroia or Berroia):  (1) A town of southwestern Macedonia, in the district of Emathia. It lay at the foot of Mt. Bermius, on a tributary of the Haliacmon, and seems to have been an ancient town, though the date of its foundation is uncertain. A passage in Thucydides (i.61) relating to the year 432 B.C. probably refers to another place of the same name, but an inscription (Inscr Graec, II, 5, 296i) proves its existence at the end of the 4th century B.C., and it is twice mentioned by Polybius (xxvii0.8; xxviii.8). After the battle of Pydba in 168 B.C. Berea was the first city to surrender to Rome and fell in the third of the four regions into which Macedonia was divided (Livy xliv0.45; xlv.29). Paul and Silas came to Berea from Thessalonica which they had been forced by an uproar to leave, and preached in the synagogue to the Jews, many of whom believed after a candid examination of the apostolic message in the light of their Scriptures ( Acts 17:10, 11 ). A number of "Gr women of honorable estate and of men" also believed, but the advent of a body of hostile Jews from Thessalonica created a disturbance in consequence of which Paul had to leave the city, though Silas and Timothy stayed there for a few days longer ( Acts 17:12-15 ). Perhaps the Sopater of Berea who accompanied Paul to Asia on his last journey to Jerusalem was one of his converts on this visit ( Acts 20:4 ). Berea, which was one of the most populous cities of Macedonia early became a bishopric under the metropolitan of Thessalonica and was itself made a metropolis by Andronicus II (1283-1328): there is a tradition that the first bishop of the church was Onesimus. It played a prominent part in the struggles between the Greeks and the Bulgarians and Serbs, and was finally conquered by the Turks in 1373-74. The town, which still bears among the Greeks its ancient name (pronounced Verria) though called by the Turks Karaferia, possesses but few remains of antiquity with the exception of numerous inscriptions (Leake, Travels in Northern Greece, III, 290 if; Cousinery, Voyage dans la Macedoine, I, 57; Dimitsas, Makedonia in Greek, 57).  Marcus N. Tod  (2) The place where Menelaus the ex-high priest was executed by order of Antiochus Eupator, the victim, according to local custom, being cast from a tower 50 cubits high into a bed of ashes (2 Maccabees 13:3). It was the ancient city of Chalab, lying about midway between Antioch and Hierapolis. Seleucus Nicator gave it the name Berea. It was a city of importance under the Moslems in the Middle Ages, when the old name again asserted itself, and remains to the present time.  The name "Aleppo" came to us through the Venetian traders in the days before the great overland route to India via Aleppo lost its importance through the discovery of the passage round the Cape. Aleppo is now a city of nearly 130,000 inhabitants. The governor exercises authority over a wide district extending from the Euphrates to the Mediterranean.  (3) (Berea); A place mentioned in 1 Maccabees 9:4. It may be identical with BEEROTH (which see) in Benjamin, a Hivite town, 8 miles North of Jerusalem, or with the modern Birez-Zait, 1 1/2 miles Northwest of Jifneh.  W. Ewing
COLOSSAE|Or Colosse, a city of Phrygia, on the Lycus, which is a tributary of the Maeander. It was about 12 miles above Laodicea, and near the great road from Ephesus to the Euphrates, and was consequently of some mercantile importance. It does not appear that Paul had visited this city when he wrote his letter to the church there ( Colossians 1:2 ). He expresses in his letter to Philemon (ver. 1:22) his hope to visit it on being delivered from his imprisonment. From  Colossians 1:7 ;  4:12  it has been concluded that Epaphras was the founder of the Colossian church. This town afterwards fell into decay, and the modern town of Chonas or Chonum occupies a site near its ruins. 
TIGLATH|Tiglath-Pileser I. (not mentioned in Scripture) was the most famous of the monarchs of the first Assyrian empire (about B.C. 1110). After his death, for two hundred years the empire fell into decay. The history of David and Solomon falls within this period. He was succeeded by his son, Shalmaneser II.  Tiglath-Pileser III. Or Tilgath-Pil-neser, the Assyrian throne-name of Pul (q.v.). He appears in the Assyrian records as gaining, in the fifth year of his reign (about B.C. 741), a victory over Azariah (= Uzziah in  2 Chronicles 26:1 ), king of Judah, whose achievements are described in  2 Chronicles 26:6 -15. He is first mentioned in Scripture, however, as gaining a victory over Pekah, king of Israel, and Rezin of Damascus, who were confederates. He put Rezin to death, and punished Pekah by taking a considerable portion of his kingdom, and carrying off (B.C. 734) a vast number of its inhabitants into captivity ( 2 Kings 15:29 ;  16:5 -9;  1 Chronicles 5:6 ,  26), the Reubenites, the Gadites, and half the tribe of Manasseh whom he settled in Gozan. In the Assyrian annals it is further related that, before he returned from Syria, he held a court at Damascus, and received submission and tribute from the neighbouring kings, among whom were Pekah of Samaria and "Yahu-khazi [i.e., Ahaz], king of Judah" (Comp.  2 Kings 16:10 -16). He was the founder of what is called "the second Assyrian empire," an empire meant to embrace the whole world, the centre of which should be Nineveh. He died B.C. 728, and was succeeded by a general of his army, Ulula, who assumed the name Shalmaneser IV. 
ITHMAH|     ith'-ma (yithmah, "purity"): A citizen of the country of the Moabites, David's deadly enemies, yet mentioned as one of the king's heroes ( 1 Chronicles 11:46 ).
SEGUB|Elevated.  (1.) The youngest son of Hiel the Bethelite. His death is recorded in  1 Kings 16:34  (Comp.  Joshua 6:26 ). (2.) A descendant of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:21 ,  22). 
REPHAH|     re'-fa (rephach (the form is corrupt); Rhaphe): The eponym of an Ephraimite family ( 1 Chronicles 7:25 ).
EGLON|The bullock; place of heifers.  (1.) Chieftain or king of one of the Moabite tribes ( Judges 3:12 -14). Having entered into an alliance with Ammon and Amalek, he overran the trans-Jordanic region, and then crossing the Jordan, seized on Jericho, the "city of palm trees," which had been by this time rebuilt, but not as a fortress. He made this city his capital, and kept Israel in subjection for eighteen years. The people at length "cried unto the Lord" in their distress, and he "raised them up a deliverer" in Ehud (q.v.), the son of Gera, a Benjamite. (2.) A city in Judah, near Lachish ( Joshua 15:39 ). It was destroyed by Joshua ( 10:5 ,  6). It has been identified with Tell Nejileh, 6 miles south of Tell Hesy or Ajlan, north-west of Lachish. (see  LACHISH .) 
IMNAH|     im'-na (yimnah):  (1) Eldest son of Asher ( Genesis 46:17 , the King James Version "Jimnah";  Numbers 26:44 , the King James Version "Jimna";  1 Chronicles 7:30 ).  (2) A Levite of Hezekiah's time ( 2 Chronicles 31:14 ).
ELAH|Terebinth or oak.  (1.) Valley of, where the Israelites were encamped when David killed Goliath ( 1 Samuel 17:2 ,  19). It was near Shochoh of Judah and Azekah ( 17:1 ). It is the modern Wady es-Sunt, i.e., "valley of the acacia." "The terebinths from which the valley of Elah takes its name still cling to their ancient soil. On the west side of the valley, near Shochoh, there is a very large and ancient tree of this kind known as the 'terebinth of Wady Sur,' 55 feet in height, its trunk 17 feet in circumference, and the breadth of its shade no less than 75 feet. It Marks the upper end of the Elah valley, and forms a noted object, being one of the largest terebinths in Palestine." Geikie's, The Holy Land, etc. (2.) One of the Edomite chiefs or "dukes" of Mount Seir ( Genesis 36:41 ). (3.) The second of the three sons of Caleb, the son of Jephunneh ( 1 Chronicles 4:15 ). (4.) The son and successor of Baasha, king of Israel ( 1 Kings 16:8 -10). He was killed while drunk by Zimri, one of the captains of his chariots, and was the last king of the line of Baasha. Thus was fullfilled the prophecy of Jehu (6,  7,  11-14). (5.) The father of Hoshea, the last king of Israel ( 2 Kings 15:30 ;  17:1 ).
MALLUCH|Reigned over, or reigning.  (1.) A Levite of the family of Merari ( 1 Chronicles 6:44 ). (2.) A priest who returned from Babylon ( Nehemiah 12:2 ). (3.)  Ezra 10:29 .  (4.)  Ezra 10:32  
NEREUS|A Christian at Rome to whom Paul sent his salutation ( Romans 16:15 ). 
JOSIAS|     jo-si'-as (Textus Receptus, Iosias; Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek Ioseias):  (1) Greek form in the King James Version of Josiah ( Matthew 1:10, 11 ; compare 1 Esdras 1; Baruch 1:8), king of Judah.  (2) In 1 Esdras 8:33 the King James Version for JESIAS (which see).
GALLIM|Heaps, ( 1 Samuel 25:44 ;  Isaiah 10:30 ). The native place of Phalti, to whom Michal was given by Saul. It was probably in Benjamin, to the north of Jerusalem. 
BEROTHAH|     be-ro'-tha ( Ezekiel 47:16 : berothah; Septuagint Codex Vaticanus, Abthera; or BEROTHAH 2Sa 8:8; berothai, where for mibberothai Septuagint reads ek ton eklekton poleon, "from the select cities"): Probably two forms of the same name.  Ezekiel 47:16  places it on the ideal northern frontier of Israel, between Damascus and Hamath. According to  2 Samuel 8:8  it was a city of Hadadezer, king of Zobah. In the parallel passage ( 1 Chronicles 18:8 ) Cun is given in place of Berothai. Its site is unknown. Ewald connected it with Beirut (so also apparently H. P. Smith, ICC, "Samuel," 307), but Ezekiel's description excludes this view. Others have sought it in the Wady Brissa, in the East slope of Lebanon, North of Baalbec. A more plausible conjecture identifies it with Bereitan (Brithen), a village somewhat South of Baalbec (Baedeker, Pal3, 369). Possibly, however, the ideal northern frontier line should be drawn farther south. See  HETHLON ;  ZEDAD ; ZOBAH.  C. H. Thomson
ZAYIN|     za'-yin "z": The 7th letter of the Hebrew alphabet; transliterated in this Encyclopedia as "z". It came also to be used for the number 7. For name, etc., see ALPHABET.
HAMMOTHDOR|Warm springs, a Levitical city of Naphtali ( Joshua 21:32 ); probably Hammath in 19:35. 
BEOR|A torch.  (1.) The father of Bela, one of the kings of Edom ( Genesis 36:32 ). (2.) The father of Balaam ( Numbers 22:5 ;  24:3 ,  15;  31:8 ). In  2 Peter 2:15  he is called Bosor. 
CHARRAN|Another form ( Acts 7:2 ,  4) of Haran (q.v.). 
SHEM|A name; renown, the first mentioned of the sons of Noah ( Genesis 5:32 ;  6:10 ). He was probably the eldest of Noah's sons. The words "brother of Japheth the elder" in  Genesis 10:21  are more correctly rendered "the elder brother of Japheth," as in the Revised Version. Shem's name is generally mentioned first in the list of Noah's sons. He and his wife were saved in the ark ( 7:13 ). Noah foretold his preeminence over Canaan ( 9:23 -27). He died at the age of six hundred years, having been for many years contemporary with Abraham, according to the usual chronology. The Israelitish nation sprang from him ( Genesis 11:10 -26;  1 Chronicles 1:24 -27). 
PRESIDENTS|Three presidents are mentioned, of whom Daniel was the first ( Dan. 6:2 -7). The name in the original is sarkhin, probably a Persian word meaning perfects or ministers. 
PELALIAH|     pel-a-li'-a (pelalyah, "Yahweh judges"): A priest, father of Jeroham, one of the "workers" in the Lord's house ( Nehemiah 11:12 ).
JERIEL|     je'-ri-el, jer'-i-el (yeri'el, "founded of God"; compare JERIAH): A chief of Issachar ( 1 Chronicles 7:2 ).
YAHWEH|   DAY OF THE LORD ()  On the other hand the New Testament idea is pervaded with the elements of hope and joy and victory. In the New Testament it is eminently the day of Christ, the day of His coming in the glory of His father. The very conception of Him as the "Son of Man" points to this day (E. Kuehl, Das Selbstbewusstsein Jesu, 68).  John 5:27 : "And he gave him authority to execute judgment, because he is a son of man" (compare  Matthew 24:27, 30   Luke 12:8 ). It is true in the New Testament there is a dark background to the bright picture, for it still remains a "day of wrath". ( Romans 2:5, 6 ), a "great day" ( Revelation 6:17   Jude 1:6 ), a "day of God" ( 2 Peter 3:12 ), a "day of judgment" ( Matthew 10:15   2 Peter 3:7   Romans 2:16 ).  Sometimes it is called "that day" ( Matthew 7:22   1 Thessalonians 5:4   2 Timothy 4:8 ), and again it is called "the day" without any qualification whatever, as if it were the only day worth counting in all the history of the world and of the race ( 1 Corinthians 3:13 ). To the unbeliever, the New Testament depicts it as a day of terror; to the believer, as a day of joy. For on that day Christ will raise the dead, especially His own dead, the bodies of those that believed in Him-"that of all that which he hath given me I should lose nothing, but should raise it up at the last day" ( John 6:39 ). In that day He comes to His own ( Matthew 16:27 ), and therefore it is called "the day of our Lord Jesus" ( 2 Corinthians 1:14 ),"the day of Jesus Christ" or "of Christ" ( Philippians 1:6, 10 ), the day when there "shall appear the sign of the Son of man in heaven" ( Matthew 24:30 ). All Paulinic literature is especially suffused with this longing for the "parousia," the day of Christ's glorious manifestation. The entire conception of that day centers therefore in Christ and points to the everlasting establishment of the kingdom of heaven, from which sin will be forever eliminated, and in which the antithesis between Nature and grace will be changed into an everlasting synthesis. See also  ESCHATOLOGY (OF THE OLD TESTAMENT AND NEW TESTAMENT) .  Henry E. Dosker  SERVANT OF JEHOVAH; SERVANT OF THE LORD; SERVANT OF YAHWEH  " 1. Historical Situation  2. The Authorship of Isaiah, Chapters 40-66  3. The Prophet of the Exile  4. The Unity of Isaiah 40-66  5. Principal Ideas of Isaiah 40-66  6. The Servant-Passages  (1) Date of the Servant-Passages  (2) Discussion of the Passages  (3) Whom Did the Prophet Mean by the Servant?  (4) The Psychology of the Prophecy  7. Place of the Servant-Passages in Old Testament Prophecy  8. Large Messianic Significance of the Servant-Passages  1. Historical Situation:  A century and a half had passed since the great days of Isaiah in Jerusalem. The world had vastly changed during those long decades when politicians had planned, armies surged back and forth, and tribes and nations had lost or won in the struggle for existence, place and power. The center of the world had changed-for Assyria had gone to its long home, and the city claiming preeminence was not Nineveh but Babylon.  Nowhere perhaps had time laid a heavier hand than on the city of Jerusalem and the country of Judah. For city and land had come to desolation, and the inhabitants of the country had become familiar with the strange sights and sounds of Babylonia, whither they had been carried by their conquerors. Many had found graves in the land of the exile, and new generations had arisen who had no memory of the hill country of their fathers. It is the situation of these captive Jews in Babylonia which is reflected and they who are addressed at the waning of the long night of captivity by the stirring message recorded in Isaiah 40-66 (leaving out of account here disputed passages in Isaiah 40-66).  2. The Authorship of Isaiah, Chapters 40-66:  The more one studies the problem of the authorship of these chapters, the more unlikely does it seem that their author penned them 150 years before the time with which they are vitally connected. It is obviously impossible to treat that problem in a detailed way here, but one may sum up the arguments by saying that in theological ideas, in style, and use of words they show such differences from the assured productions of Isaiah's pen as to point to a different authorship. And the great argument, the argument which carries the most weight to the author of this article, is that these late chapters are written from the standpoint of the exile. The exile is assumed in what is said. These chapters do not prophesy the exile, do not say it is to come; they all the time speak as though it had come. The message is not that an exile is to be, but beginning with the fact that the exile already is, it foretells deliverance. Now of course it is conceivable that God might inspire a man to put himself forward 150 years, and with a message to people who were to live then, assuming their circumstances as a background of what he said, but it is improbable to the last degree. To put it in plain, almost gruff, English, it is not the way God did things. The prophet's message was always primarily a message to his own age. Then there is no claim in the chapters themselves that Isaiah was their author. And having once been placed so that it was supposed they were by Isaiah-placed so through causes we do not know-the fact that in speaking of passages from these chapters New Testament authors referred to them by a name the people would recognize, is not a valid argument that they meant to teach anything as to their authorship. The problem had not arisen in New Testament times. Isaiah 40-66, as Professor Davidson has suggested, has a parallel in the Book of Job, each the production of a great mind, each from an author we do not know.  Compare ISAIAH.  3. The Prophet of the Exile:  Out of the deep gloom of the exile-when the Jew was a man without a country, when it seemed as if the nation's sins had murdered hope-out of this time comes the voice most full of gladness and abounding hope of all the voices from the Old Testament life. In the midst of the proud, confident civilization of Babylonia, with its teeming wealth and exhaustless splendor, came a man who dared to speak for Yahweh-a man of such power to see reality that to him Babylonia was already doomed, and he could summon the people to prepare for God's deliverance.  4. The Unity of Isaiah 40-66:  In recent criticism, especially in Germany, there has been a strong tendency to assign the last chapters of this section to a different author from the first. The background it is claimed is not Babylonian; the sins rebuked are the sins of the people when at home in Judea, and in at least one passage the temple at Jerusalem seems to be standing. That these chapters present difficulties need not be disputed, but it seems to me that again and again in them one can find the hand of Second Isaiah. Then undoubtedly the author quotes from previous prophecies which we can recognize, and the suggestion that some of the difficult passages may be quotations from other older prophecies which are not preserved to us, I think an exceedingly good one. The quotation of such passages in view of the prospect of return, and the prophet's feeling of the need of the people, would seem to me not at all unnatural. If a later hand is responsible for some utterances in the latter part of the section, it seems to me fairly clear that most of it is from the hand of the great unknown prophet of the exile.  The questions regarding the Servant-passages as affecting the unity of the book will be treated later.  5. Principal Ideas of Isaiah 40-66:  The first part of this section vividly contrasts Yahweh and the idols worshipped with such splendor and ceremony. All the resources of irony and satire are used to give point and effect to the contrast. Cyrus the Median conqueror is already on the horizon, and he is declared to be God's instrument in the deliverance. The idols are described in process of manufacture; they are addressed in scornful apostrophe, they are seen carried away helpless. On the other side Yahweh, with illimitable foresight and indomitable strength, knows and reveals the future. They know and reveal nothing. He brings to pass what He has planned. They do nothing. Not only the idols but Babylonia itself is made the victim of satire-and the prophet hurls a taunt song at the proud but impotent city.  Israel-the people of Yahweh-the elect of God-is given the prophet's message. The past is called up as a witness to Yahweh's dealings. His righteousness-His faithfulness to His people-shall not fail. They are unworthy, but out of His own bounty salvation is provided. And with joy of this salvation from exile and from sin the book rings and rings. The Zion of the restored Israel is pictured with all the play of color and richness of imagery at the prophet's command. And this restored Israel is to have a world-mission. Its light is to fall upon all lands. It is to minister salvation to all races of men.  But back of and under these pictures of great hope is the prophet's sense of his people's sin and their struggle with it. In the latter part of the book, especially Isaiah 59 and 64 this comes out clearly. And the mood of these chapters expresses the feeling out of which some of the deep things of the Servant-passages came. There is no need to insist that the chapters as they stand are in the order in which they were written. We know from other prophecies that this was not always true. But even if a man were convinced that the chapters now occurring after the Servant-passages were all written after them, he could still hold, and I think would be justified in holding, that in places in those chapters the reader finds the record of a state of the prophet's mind before the writing of those passages. The former view would be, I think, the preferable one. At any rate the point of view is logically that out of which some of the deep things in the Servant-passages came.  In profoundness of meaning the climax of the book is reached in these passages where the deliverance from exile and the deliverance from sin are connected with one great figure-the Servant of Yahweh.  6. The Servant-Passages:  The word "servant," as applied to servants of God, is not an unfamiliar one to readers of the Old Testament. It is applied to different individuals and by Jeremiah to the nation (compare  Jeremiah 30:10 ;  Jeremiah 46:27 ); but its message is on the whole so distinct and complete in Second Isaiah that we can study it without any further reference to previous usage.  The "servant" first appears in  Isaiah 41:8 . Here the reference is undoubtedly to Israel, chosen and called of God and to be upheld by Him. Here Israel is promised victory over its enemies. In vivid picture their destruction and Isracl's future trust and glory in God are portrayed.  There are several incidental references to Israel as Yahweh's servant: created by Yahweh and not to be forgotten ( Isaiah 41:8 ); Cyrus is said to be called for the sake of His servant Jacob ( Isaiah 45:4 ); Yahweh is said to have redeemed His servant Jacob ( Isaiah 48:20 ).  In  Isaiah 44:26  "servant" seems to be used with the meaning of prophet. It is said of Yahweh that He "confirmeth the word of his servant, and performeth the counsel of his messengers."  In  Isaiah 42:19  we find the failure and inadequacy of Israel presented in the words, "Who is blind, but my servant? or deaf, as my messenger that I send?" This passage is an explanation of the exile. Israel proved unworthy and sinned, hence, its punishment, but even in the exile the lesson had not been taken to heart.  In  Isaiah 43:8  ff; Yahweh summons Israel the servant, who in spite of blindness and deafness yet is His witness. It has at least seen enough to be able to witness for Him in the presence of the heathen.  In  Isaiah 44:1-5 , leaving the unworthiness of the actual Israel, there comes what seems to me a summons in the name of the possible, the ideal. The underlying thought is a call to the high future which God has ready to give.  This covers the reference to the servant outside the great Servant-passages to which we now come. There are four of these:  Isaiah 42:1-9 ;  Isaiah 49:1-9  a; 50:4-11; 52:13-53:12; 61:1-4 perhaps represents words of the Servant, but may refer to words of the prophet, and, as at any rate it adds no new features to the picture of the Servant already given in the passages undoubtedly referring to him, we will not discuss it.  (1) Date of the Servant-Passages.  Ewald long ago suggested that the last of the Servant-passages must have been borrowed from an earlier composition, which he assigned to the age of Manasseh. "If we find in the study of the passage reason for its vividness, we shall not need to seek its origin in the description of some past martyrdom."  Duhm quoted by Cheyne thinks the Servant-passages post-exilic. The gentleness and quiet activity of the Servant for one thing, according to Duhm, suggest the age of the scribes, rather than that of the exile. But might not an age of suffering be a time to learn the lesson of gentleness? According to Skinner, Duhm thinks the passages were inserted almost haphazard, but Skinner also refers to Kosters, showing that the passages cannot be lifted without carrying some of the succeeding verses with them. This is particularly significant in view of the recent popularity of other theories which deny the Servant-passages to the hand and time of Second Isaiah. The theory that these passages form by themselves a poem or a set of poems which have been inserted here can boast of distinguished names.  There does not seem much to commend it, however. As to the argument from difference as to rhythm, there is disagreement, and the data are probably not of a sort to warrant much significance being applied to it either way. The fact that the passages are not always a part of connected movement of thought would play great havoc if made a universal principle of discrimination as to authorship in the prophecies of the Old Testament. If we succeed in giving the fundamental ideas of the passages a place in relation to the thought of Deutero-Isaiah, an argument for which cogency might be claimed will be dissipated. But even at its best this argument would not be conclusive. To deny certain ideas to an author simply because he has not expressed them in a certain bit of writing acknowledged to him is perilous business. A message of hope surely does not preclude an appreciation of the dark things.  The truth of the matter is that even by great scholars the temptation to a criticism of knight-errantry is not always resisted. And I think we shall not make any mistake in believing that this is the case with the attempt to throw doubt upon the Deutero-Isaianic authorship of the Servant-passages.  (2) Discussion of the Passages.    Isaiah 42:1-9 : In these verses Yahweh Himself is the speaker, describing the Servant as His chosen, in whom His soul delights, upon whom He has put His spirit. He is to bring justice to the Gentiles. His methods are to be quiet and gentle, and the very forlorn hope of goodness He will not quench. He is to set justice in the earth, and remote countries are described as waiting for His law. Then comes a declaration by the prophet that Yahweh, the Creator of all, is the speaker of words declaring the Servant's call in righteousness to be a covenant for the people, a light to the Gentiles, a helper to those in need-the blind and imprisoned. Yahweh's glory is not to be given to other, nor His praise to graven images. Former prophecies have come to pass. New things He now declares. One's attention needs to be called to the distinction of the Servant from Israel in this passage. He is to be a covenant of the people: according to Delitzsch, "he in whom and through whom Yahweh makes a new covenant with His people in place of the old one that has been broken."    Isaiah 49:1-9  a; Here the Servant himself spoaks, telling of his calling from the beginning of his life, of the might of his word, of his shelter in God, of a time of discouragement in which he thought his labor in vain, followed by insistence on his trust in God. Then Yahweh promises him a larger mission than the restoration of Israel, namely, to be a light to the Gentiles. Yahweh speaks of the Servant as one despised, yet to be triumphant so that he will be honored by kings and princes. He is to lead his people forth at their restoration, "to make them inherit the desolate heritages; saying to them that are bound, Go forth; to them that are in darkness, Show yourselves."  Clearly the Servant is distinct from the people Israel in this passage. Yet in  Isaiah 49:3  he is addressed as Israel. The word Israel here may be a gloss, which would solve the difficulty, or the Servant may be addressed as Israel because he gathers up in himself the meaning of the ideal Israel. If it is true that the prophet gradually passed from the conception of Israel as a nation to a person through whom its true destiny would be realized, this last suggestion would gain in probability.  One notices here the emphasis on the might of the Servant, and in this passage we come to understand that he is to pass through a time of ignominy. The phrase "a servant of rulers" is a difficult one, which would be clear if the prophet conceived of him as one of the exiles, and typically representing them. The Servant's mission in this passage seems quite bound up with the restoration.    Isaiah 50:4-11 : In the first part of this passage the Servant is not mentioned directly, but it seems clear that he is speaking. He is taught of God continually, that he may bring a message to the weary. He has opened his ear so that he may fully understand Yahweh's message. The Servant now describes his sufferings as coming to him because of his obedience. He was not rebellious and did not turn back from his mission. Flint-like he set his face and with confidence in God met the shame which came upon him. After language vivid with a sense of ignominy his assured consciousness of victory and faith in God are expressed,.  In  Isaiah 50:10-11 , according to Delitzsch, Yahweh speaks, first encouraging those who listen to the Servant, then addressing those who despise his word. Cheyne thinks the Servant mentioned in 50:10 may be the prophet, but I prefer Delitzsch's view.    Isaiah 52:13-53:12 : The present division of 52:13-53:12 is unfortunate, for obviously it is all of a piece and ought to stand together in one chapter.  In  Isaiah 52:13-15  Yahweh speaks of the humiliation and later of the exaltation of the Servant. He shall deal wisely-the idea here including the success resulting from wisdom-and shall be exalted. Words are piled upon each other here to express his exaltation. But the appearance of the Servant is such as to suggest the very opposite of his dignity, which will astonish nations and kings when they come, to understand it.  Entering upon Isaiah 53 we find the people of Israel speaking confessing their former unbelief, and giving as a reason the repulsive aspect of the Servant-despised, sad, sick with a visage to make men turn from him. He is described as though he had been a leper. They thought all this had come upon him as a stroke from God, but they now see how he went even to death, not for his own transgression but for theirs. Their peace and healing came through his suffering and death. They have been sinful and erring; the result of it all God has caused to light upon him.  They look back in wonder at the way he bore his sufferings-like a lamb led to the slaughter; with a false judicial procedure he was led away, no one considering his death, or its relation to them. His grave even was an evidence of ignominy.  Beginning at  Isaiah 53:10  the people cease speaking, according to Delitzsch, and the prophecy becomes the organ of God who acknowledges His Servant. The reference to a trespass offering in 53:10 is remarkable. Nowhere else is prophecy so connected with the sacrificial system (A. B. Davidson). It pleased God to bruise the Servant-his soul having been made a trespass offering; the time of humiliation over, the time of exaltation will come.  By his knowledge we are told-here a momentary reversion to the time of humiliation taking place-by his knowledge he shall justify many and bear their iniquities. Then comes the exaltation-dividing of spoils and greatness-the phrases suggesting kingly glory: all this is to be his because of his suffering. The great fact of Isaiah 53 is vicarious suffering.  (3) Whom Did the Prophet Mean by the Servant?  (a) Obviously not all of Israel always, for the Servant is distinguished from Israel. (b) Not the godly remnant, for he is distinguished from them. Then the godly remnant does not attain to any such proportions as to fit the description of Isaiah 53. (c) And one cannot accept theory that the prophetic order is intended. The whole order is not great enough to exhaust the meaning of one of a half-dozen of the greatest lines in chapter 53.  Professor A. B. Davidson's Old Testament Prophecy contains a brilliant and exceedingly able discussion of the question which he approaches from the stand-point of Biblical rather than simply exegetical theology. His fundamental position is that in the prophet's outlook the restoration is the consummation. In his mind the Servant and his work cannot come after the restoration. The Servant, if a real person, must be one whose work lies in the past or the present, as there is not room in the future for him, for the restoration which is at the door brings felicity, and after that no sufferings of the Servant are conceivable. But there is no actual person in the past and none in the present who could be the Servant. Hence, the Servant cannot be to the prophet's mind a real person.  See CONIAH .  Of course Davidson relates the result to his larger conception of prophecy in such a way as to secure the Messianic significance of the passages in relation to their fulfillment in our Lord. The ideas they contain are realized in Him.  But coming back to the prophet's mind-if the Servant was not a person to him, what significance did he have? The answer according to Davidson is, He is a great personification of the ideal Israel. "He is Israel according to its idea." To quote more fully, "The prophet has created out of the divine determinations imposed on Israel, election, creation and forming, endowment with the word or spirit of Yahweh, and the divine purpose in these operations, an ideal Being, an inner Israel in the heart of the phenomenal or actual Israel, an indestructible Being having these divine attributes or endowments, present in the outward Israel in all ages, powerful and effectual because really composed, if I can say so, of divine forces, who cannot fail in God's purpose, and who as an inner power within Israel by his operation causes all Israel to become a true servant" (compare Davidson, Old Testament Prophecy, 435-36).  Now it seems to me that Davidson is more effective in his destructive than in his constructive work. One must confess that he presents real difficulties in the way of holding to a personal Servant as the prophet's conception. But on the other hand when he tries to replace that by a more adequate conception, I do not think he conspicuously succeeds.  The greatest of the Servant-passages (it seems to me) presents more than can be successfully dealt with under the conception of the Servant as the ideal Israel. The very great emphasis on vicarious suffering in Isaiah 53 simply is not answered by theory. Words would not leap with such a flame of reality in describing the suffering of a personification. The sense of sin back of the passage is not a thing whose problem could be solved by a glittering figure of speech. There it surges-the movement of an aroused conscience-and the answer to it could never be anything less than a real deed by a real person. My own feeling is that if language can express anything it expresses the fact that the prophet had a real personal Servant in view.  But what of the difficulties Davidson suggests? Even if the answer were not easy to find, one could rest on the total impression the passages make. One cannot vaporize a passage for the sake of placing it in an environment in which one believes it belongs. As Cheyne in other days said, "In the sublimest descriptions of the Servant I am unable to resist the impression that we have the presentment of an individual, and venture to think that our general view of the Servant ought to be ruled by those passages in which the enthusiasm of the author is at its height."  The first thing we need to remember in dealing with the difficulties Davidson has brought forth is the timelessness of prophecy, and the resulting fact that every prophet saw the future as if lying just on the horizon of his own time. As prophets saw the day of Yahweh as if at hand, so it seems to me Deutero-Isaiah saw the Servant: each really afar off, yet each really seen in the colors of the present. Then we must remember that the prophets did not relate all their conceptions. They stated truths whose meaning and articulation they did not understand. They were not philosophers with a Hegelian hunger for a total view of life, and when we try to read them from this standpoint we misjudge them. Then we must remember that the prophet may here have been lifted to a height of prophetic receptivehess where he received and uttered what went beyond the limits of his own understanding. To be sure there was a point of contact, but I see no objection to the thought that in a place of unique significance and importance like this, God might use a man to utter words which reached far beyond the limits of his own understanding. In this connection some words of Professor Hermann Schultz are worth quoting: "If it is true anywhere in the history of poetry and prophecy, it is true here that the writer being full of the spirit has said more than he himself meant to say and more than he himself understood."  (4) The Psychology of the Prophecy.  This does not mean that something may. not be said about the connection of the Servant-passages with the prophet's own thought. Using Delitzsch's illustration, we can see how from regarding all Israel as the servant the prophet could narrow down to the godly part of Israel as experience taught him the faithlessness of many, and it ought not to be impossible for us to see how all that Israel really meant at its best could have focused itself in his thought upon one person. Despite Davidson's objection, I can see nothing artificial about this movement in the prophet's mind. There was probably more progression in his thought than Professor Davidson is willing to allow. If it is asked, Where was the person to whom the prophet could ascribe such greatness, conceiving as he did that he was to come at once? surely a similar question would be fair in relation to Isaiah's Messiah. The truth is that even on the threshold of the restoration there was time for a great one suddenly to arise. As John the Baptist on the Jordan watched for the coming One whom he knew not, yet who was alive, so the great prophet of the exile may have watched even day by day for the coming Servant whose work had been revealed to him.  But deep in the psychology of the prophecy is the sense of sin out of which these passages came and indications of which I think are found in the latter part of the book. The great guilt-laden past lay terribly behind the prophet, and as he mused over the sufferings of the righteous, perhaps especially drawn to tim heart-rent Jeremiah, the thought of redemptive suffering may have dawned upon him. And if in its light, and with a personal sense of sin drawn from what experiences we know not, he grapples with the problem, can we not understand, can we not see that God might flash upon him the great conception of a sin-bearer?  7. Place of the Servant-Passages in Old Testament Prophecy:  At last the idea of vicarious suffering had been connected with the deep things of the nation's life, and henceforward was a part of its heritage. To the profoundest souls it would be a part of the nation's forward look. The priestly idea had been deepened and filled with new moral meaning. The Servant was a prophet too-so priest and prophet met in one. And I think Cheyne was right when he suggested that in the Servant's exaltation in Isaiah 53, the idea of the Servant is brought nearer to that of king than we sometimes think. So in suggestion, at least, prophet, priest and king meet in the great figure of the suffering Servant.  A new rich stream had entered into prophecy, full of power to fertilize whatever shores of thought it touched. In the thoughts of these passages prophecy seemed pressing with impatient eagerness to its goal, and though centuries were to pass before that goal was reached, its promise is seen here, full of assurance and of knowledge of the kind of goal it is to be.  8. Larger Messianic Significance of the Servant-Passages:  But whatever our view of the meaning of the prophet, we must agree (compare  Matthew 8:17 ;  Matthew 12:18-21 ; 26:67  John 12:41 , et al.) that the conception he so boldly and powerfully put upon his canvas had its realization, its fulfillment in the One who spoke to the world from the cross on Calvary. And in its darkly glorious shadow the Christian, with all the sadness and joy and wonder of it, with a sense of its solving all his problems and meeting the deepest needs and outreaches of his life, can feel a strange companionship with the exilic prophet whose yearning for a sin-bearer and belief in His coming call across the long and slowly moving years. In the light and penetration of that hour he may be trusted to know what the prophet meant. Professor Delitzsch well said of that passage, "Every word is as it were written under the cross at Golgotha."  Lynn Harold Hough  ANGEL OF YAHWEH  See  ANGEL (II, 3) .
LEBBAEUS|Courageous, a surname of Judas (Jude), one of the twelve ( Matthew 10:3 ), called also Thaddaeus, not to be confounded with the Judas who was the brother of our Lord. 
HASADIAH|Favoured by Jehovah, one of the sons of Pedaiah ( 1 Chronicles 3:20 ), of the royal line of David. 
FORMS|   CHERUBIC,  IN THE CONSTELLATIONS  che-roo'-bik.  See  ASTRONOMY .
CALKERS|Workmen skilled in stopping the seams of the deck or sides of vessels. The inhabitants of Gebel were employed in such work on Tyrian vessels ( Ezek. 27:9 ,  27; marg.,  "strengtheners" or "stoppers of chinks"). 
JAKEH|Pious, the father of Agur ( Proverbs 30:1 ). Nothing is known of him. 
RHEGIUM|Breach, a town in the south of Italy, on the Strait of Messina, at which Paul touched on his way to Rome ( Acts 28:13 ). It is now called Rheggio. 
BETHUEL|Man of God, or virgin of God, or house of God.  (1.) The son of Nahor by Milcah; nephew of Abraham, and father of Rebekah ( Genesis 22:22 ,  23;  24:15 ,  24,  47). He appears in person only once ( 24:50 ). (2.) A southern city of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:30 ); called also Bethul ( Joshua 19:4 ) and Bethel ( 12:16 ;  1 Samuel 30:27 ). 
ZELOTES|( Luke 6:15 ). See SIMON; ZEALOTS. 
SHAMHUTH|     sham'-huth.  See  SHAMMUAH, IV .
STRAKES|     straks: An older form for "streaks" (so the American Standard Revised Version) in the King James Version, the English Revised Version  Genesis 30:37  (pitslah, "peeled spot");  Leviticus 14:37  (sheqa`aruroth, "hollow places"). For "strake," Tobit 11:11; the King James Version  Acts 27:17 .  See  STRIKE .
SPAIN|Paul expresses his intention ( Romans 15:24 ,  28) to visit Spain. There is, however, no evidence that he ever carried it into effect, although some think that he probably did so between his first and second imprisonment. (see  TARSHISH .) 
EZNITE|     ez-'nit (`etsni or `etsno).  See  ADINO .
ELEM|   JONATH  REHOKIM  jo'-nath e'-lem re-ho'-kim (yonath 'elem rechoqim) (Psalm 56, title): "The silent dove of the far ones" (i.e. either of far-off lands, or among aliens), or "The dove of the distant terebinths," in either case indicating the tune to the melody of which the psalm was to be sung.  See  PSALMS ;  SONG .
SALMAI|     sal'-mi, sal'-ma-i (salmay; the King James Version, Shalmai (the King James Version in  Nehemiah 7:48  is "Shalmai" =  Ezra 2:46 ); the Revised Version (British and American) "Salmai"): The eponym of a family of Nethinim, called "Shamlai" in  Ezra 2:46  (Qere, shamlay, Kethibh, shalmay, followed by the King James Version text, "Shalmai"; Codex Vaticanus Samaan; Codex Alexandrinus Selami;  Nehemiah 7:48 , Codex Vaticanus Salemei; Codex Alexandrinus Selmei; Codex Sinaiticus Samaei). The name suggests a foreign reign. In 1 Esdras 5:30 the corresponding name is "Subai."
KIRJATHBAAL|   KIRJATH-BAAL  kur-jath-ba'-al, kir-jath-ba'-al.  See  KIRIATH-JEARIM .
JERUBBAAL|Contender with Baal; or, let Baal plead, a surname of Gideon; a name given to him because he destroyed the altar of Baal ( Judges 6:32 ;  7:1 ;  8:29 ;  1 Samuel 12:11 ). 
HARUZ|Eager, the father of Meshullemeth, the wife of king Manasseh ( 2 Kings 21:19 ) and mother of king Amon. 
PEULLETHAI|   PEULTHAI;   pe-ul'-thi, pe-ul'-e-thi (pe`ullethay, "Yah's seed"): One of the "porters," 8th son of Obed-edom ( 1 Chronicles 26:5 ).
BARSABBAS|   BARSABAS;   bar'-sa-bas, bar-sab'-as.  See  JOSEPH BARSABBAS ;  JUDAS BARSABBAS .  JOSEPH BARSABBAS  bar-sab'-as Barsabbas, or Barsabas; the King James Version Barsabas, bar'-sa-bas; for etymology, etc., of Joseph, see general article on JOSEPH): Joseph Barsabbas was surnamed Justus ( Acts 1:23 ). Barsabbas was probably a patronymic, i.e. son of Sabba or Seba. Other interpretations given are "son of an oath," "son of an old man," "son of conversion," "son of quiet." It is likely that the "Judas called Barsabbas" of  Acts 15:22  was his brother. Ewald considers that both names refer to the same person, but this is improbable.  Joseph was one of those who accompanied the apostles "all the time that the Lord Jesus went in and went out among us, beginning from the baptism of John, unto the day that he was received up from us" ( Acts 1:21, 22 ). At the meeting of the brethren under the presidency of Peter in Jerusalem shortly after the crucifixion, he was, therefore, proposed along with Matthias as a suitable candidate for the place in the apostleship left vacant by the treachery and death of Judas Iscariot; but was unsuccessful ( Acts 1:15-26 ).  According to Eusebius (Historia Ecclesiastica, I, 12), Joseph was one of the 70 ( Luke 10:1 ), and Papias records the oral tradition that he drank a cup of poison without harm (compare  Mark 16:18 ). The Acts of Paul, a work belonging to the 2nd century and first mentioned by Origen, relates that Barsabbas, Justus the Flatfoot and others were imprisoned by Nero for protesting their faith in Christ, but that upon a vision of the newly martyred Paul appearing to the emperor, he ordered their immediate release.  C. M. Kerr  JUDAS BARSABBAS  bar-sab-'as (Ioudas Barsabbas): Judas was, with Silas, a delegate from the church in Jerusalem to the GentileChristians of Antioch, Syria and Cilicia. They were appointed to convey the letter containing the decision of "the apostles and the elders, with the whole church" regarding the attitude to be taken by GentileChristians toward the Mosaic law, and also to explain "the same things by word of mouth." They accompanied Paul and Barnabas to Antioch, and, "being themselves also prophets," i.e. preachers, they not only handed over the epistle but stayed some time in the city preaching and teaching. They seem to have gone no farther than Antioch, for "they were dismissed in peace from the brethren unto those that had sent them forth," and it was Paul and Silas who some time afterward strengthened the churches in Syria and Cilicia ( Acts 15:40, 41 ).  According to  Acts 15:34  the King James Version, Judas returned to Jerusalem without Silas, who remained at Antioch and afterward became Paul's companion ( Acts 15:40 ). The oldest manuscripts, however, omit  Acts 15:34 , and it is therefore omitted from the Revised Version (British and American). It was probably a marginal note to explain  Acts 15:40 , and in time it crept into the text. Judas and Silas are called "chief men among the brethren" (15:22), probably elders, and "prophets" (15:32).  Barsabbas being a patronymic, Judas was probably the brother of Joseph Barsabbas. He cannot be identified with any other Judas, e.g. "Judas not Iscariot" ( John 14:22 ). We hear no more of Judas after his return to Jerusalem ( Acts 15:22 ).  S. F. Hunter
ZARTANAH|     zar-ta'-na, zar'-ta-na (tsarethanah): the King James Version in  1 Kings 4:12  for "Zarethan." The form is Zarethan with Hebrew locale.
NEKODA|     ne-ko'-da (neqodha'):  (1) Head of a family of Nethinim ( Ezra 2:48   Nehemiah 7:50 ; compare 1Es 5:31).  (2) Head of a family which failed to prove its Israelite descent ( Ezra 2:60   Nehemiah 7:62 ; compare 1Es 5:31, 37). In the parallel verses of 1 Esdras the names are given thus: NOEBA and NEKODAN (which see).
HENOCH|see  ENOCH . 
HERMOGENES|Mercury-born, at one time Paul's fellow-labourer in Asia Minor, who, however, afterwards abandoned him, along with one Phygellus, probably on account of the perils by which they were beset ( 2 Timothy 1:15 ). 
BETHGADER|   BETH-GADER  beth-ga'-der (bethgadher; Baithgedor, or (Codex Vaticanus) Baithgaidon): The name occurs between those of Bethlehem and Kiriath-jearim in  1 Chronicles 2:51 . It is possibly identical with Geder of  Joshua 12:13 .
UTHAI|     u'-thi, u'-tha-i (`uthay, meaning uncertain):  (1) A descendant of Judah, of the clan of Perez ( 1 Chronicles 9:4 ) = "Athaiah" of  Nehemiah 11:4 .  (2) Son of Bigvai ( Ezra 8:14 ); called "Uthi" in 1 Esdras 8:40.
PUTIEL|     pu'-ti-el (puTi'el, "contemned by El"): Father of the wife of Eleazar, Aaron's son, and thus grandfather of Phinehas, Eleazar's son ( Exodus 6:25 ).  See  PHINEHAS, (3) .
JUBAL|Jubilee, music, Lamech's second son by Adah, of the line of Cain. He was the inventor of "the harp" (Hebrews kinnor,  properly "lyre") and "the organ" (Hebrews `ugab,  properly "mouth-organ" or Pan's pipe),  Genesis 4:21 . 
PHUT| (1.) One of the sons of Ham ( Genesis 10:6 ). (2.) A land or people from among whom came a portion of the mercenary troops of Egypt,  Jeremiah 46:9  (A.V.,  "Libyans, " but correctly,  R.V.,  "Put");  Ezek. 27:10 ;  30:5  (A.V.,  "Libya;" R.V.,  "Put"); 38:5;  Nahum 3:9 .  Phut is placed between Egypt and Canaan in  Genesis 10:6 , and elsewhere we find the people of Phut described as mercenaries in the armies of Egypt and Tyre ( Jeremiah 46:9 ;  Ezek. 30:5 ;  27:10 ). In a fragment of the annuals of Nebuchadrezzar which records his invasion of Egypt, reference is made to "Phut of the Ionians." 
MEREMOTH|Exaltations, heights, a priest who returned from Babylon with Zerubbabel ( Nehemiah 12:3 ), to whom were sent the sacred vessels ( Ezra 8:33 ) belonging to the temple. He took part in rebuilding the walls of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 3:4 ). 
GILALAI|     gil'-a-li, gi-la'-li (gilalay): A musician in the procession at the dedication of the wall, son of a priest ( Nehemiah 12:36 ).
ZOPHIM|Zophim, Field of  Field of watchers, a place in Moab on the range of Pisgah ( Numbers 23:14 ). To this place Balak brought Balaam, that he might from thence curse the children of Israel. Balaam could only speak the word of the Lord, and that was blessing. It is the modern Tal'at-es-Safa. (see  PISGAH .) 
PASSIONS|   PASSION,   pash'-un, pash'-unz: "Passion" is derived from Latin passio, which in turn is derived from the verb patior, with the root, pat-. The Latin words are connected with the Greek root, path-, which appears in a large number of derivatives. And in Greek, Latin, and English (with other languages in addition) words connected with this root, pat-, path-, are often susceptible of a great variety of meanings, for which the dictionaries must be consulted. For "passion," however, as it appears in English Versions of the Bible, only three of these meanings need be considered.  (1) Close to what seems to be the primary force of the root is the meaning "suffer," and in this sense "passion" is used in  Acts 1:3 , "to whom he also showed himself alive after his passion." This translation is a paraphrase (Greek: "after he had suffered"), due to the Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) (post passionem suam), and in English is as old as Wycliff, whom the subsequent English Versions of the Bible has followed. This is the only case in the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American) where "passion" has this meaning, and it can be so used in modern English only when referring (as here) to the sufferings of Christ (compare "Passion play").  (2) "Suffering," when applied to the mind, came to denote the state that is controlled by some emotion, and so "passion" was applied to the emotion itself. This is the meaning of the word in  Acts 14:15 , "men of like passions," and  James 5:17 , "a man of like passions," Greek homoiopathes; the Revised Version margin "of like nature" gives the meaning exactly: "men with the same emotions as we."  (3) From "emotion" a transition took place to "strong emotion," and this is the normal force of "passion" in modern English the King James Version does not use this meaning, but in the Revised Version (British and American) "passion" in this sense is the translation of pathos, in its three occurrences:  Romans 1:26  (the King James Version "affection");  Colossians 3:5  (the King James Version "inordinate affection");  1 Thessalonians 4:5  (the King James Version "lust").  It is used also for two occurrences of pathema (closely allied to pathos) in  Romans 7:5  (the King James Version "motions," the King James Version margin "passions") and in  Galatians 5:24  (the King James Version "affection"). The fixing of the exact force in any of these cases is a delicate problem fully discussed in the commentaries. In  Colossians 3:5  only does "passion" stand as an isolated term. The context here perhaps gives the word a slight sexual reference, but this must not be overstressed; the warning probably includes any violent over-emotion that robs a man of his self-control.  See  AFFECTION ;  MOTION .  Burton Scott Easton
TOPHEL|Lime, a place in the wilderness of Sinai ( Deuteronomy 1:1 ), now identified with Tafyleh or Tufileh, on the west side of the Edomitish mountains. 
CANNEH|Mentioned only in  Ezek. 27:23 . (see  CALNEH .) 
MICHAH|   MICHA;   mi'-ka, mi'-ka.  See  MICA ;  MICAH .  MICHAH  mi'-ka.  See  MICAH .
RAMATHAIM|   ; RAMATHEM  ra-ma-tha'-im, ram'-a-them (1 Maccabees 11:34; the King James Version).  See  RAMAH, (4) .
MICHMETHATH|   MICHMETHAH  mik'-me-tha (ha-mikhmethah; Codex Vaticanus Hikasmon; Codex Alexandrinus Machthoth): A place named in defining the territory of Ephraim and Manasseh ( Joshua 16:6 ;  Joshua 17:7 ). It is said to lie "before," i.e. to the East of Shechem. In the name itself, the meaning of which is obscure, there is nothing to guide us. The presence of the article, however ("the Michmethah"), suggests that it may not be a proper name, but an appellative, applying to some feature of the landscape. Condor suggests the plain of Makhneh, which lies to the East of Nablus (Shechem), in which there may possibly be an echo of the ancient name.
BONDSERVANT|     bond'-sur-vant: Appears only once in the King James Version ( Leviticus 25:39 ) where it translates `ebhedh, "a slave": "Thou shalt not cause him to render the service of a bondservant" or slave. the Revised Version (British and American) frequently uses bondservant (doulos) instead of the word "servant" of the King James Version ( John 8:34, 35   1 Corinthians 7:21   Galatians 4:7 ).  See  SLAVERY .
IMPRISONMENT|     im-priz'-'-n-ment.  See  PUNISHMENTS ;  PRISON .
HODAVIAH|     hod-a-vi'-a (hodhawyah, or hodhawyahu; the Septuagint's Codex Alexandrinus, Hodouia):  (1) One of the heads of the half-tribe of Manasseh on the East of the Jordan ( 1 Chronicles 5:24 ).  (2) A Benjamite, the son of Hassenuah ( 1 Chronicles 9:7 ).  (3) A Levite, who seems to have been the head of an important family in that tribe ( Ezra 2:40 ). In  Nehemiah 7:43  the name is Hodevah (hodhewah; Qere hodheyah). Compare  Ezra 3:9 .  (4) A son of Elioenai, and a descendant of David ( 1 Chronicles 3:24 ; hodhaywahu; Qere hodhawyahu, the King James Version "Hodaiah").
RABBAH|Or Rab'bath, great.  (1.) "Rabbath of the children of Ammon," the chief city of the Ammonites, among the eastern hills, some 20 miles east of the Jordan, on the southern of the two streams which united with the Jabbok. Here the bedstead of Og was preserved ( Deuteronomy 3:11 ), perhaps as a trophy of some victory gained by the Ammonites over the king of Bashan. After David had subdued all their allies in a great war, he sent Joab with a strong force to take their city. For two years it held out against its assailants. It was while his army was engaged in this protracted siege that David was guilty of that deed of shame which left a blot on his character and cast a gloom over the rest of his life. At length, having taken the "royal city" (or the "city of waters, "  2 Samuel 12:27 ,  i.e.,  the lower city on the river,  as distinguished from the citadel), Joab sent for David to direct the final assault ( 11:1 ;  12:26 -31). The city was given up to plunder, and the people were Ruthlessly put to death, and "thus did he with all the cities of the children of Ammon." The destruction of Rabbath was the last of David's conquests. His kingdom now reached its farthest limits ( 2 Samuel 8:1 -15;  1 Chronicles 18:1 -15). The capture of this city is referred to by Amos ( 1:14 ), Jeremiah ( 49:2 ,  3), and Ezekiel ( 21:20 ;  25:5 ). (2.) A city in the hill country of Judah ( Joshua 15:60 ), possibly the ruin Rubba, six miles north-east of Beit-Jibrin.
ECBATANA|( Ezra 6:2  marg.). (see  ACHMETHA .) 
CHERETHIM|( Ezek. 25:16 ), more frequently Cherethites, the inhabitants of Southern Philistia, the Philistines ( Zephaniah 2:5 ). The Cherethites and the Pelethites were David's life-guards ( 1 Samuel 30:14 ;  2 Samuel 8:18 ;  20:7 ,  23;  23:23 ). This name is by some interpreted as meaning "Cretans," and by others "executioners," who were ready to execute the king's sentence of death ( Genesis 37:36 ,  marg.;  1 Kings 2:25 ). 
MASSAH|Trial, temptation, a name given to the place where the Israelites, by their murmuring for want of water, provoked Jehovah to anger against them. It is also called Meribah ( Exodus 17:7 ;  Deuteronomy 6:16 ;  Psalm 95:8 ,  9;  Hebrews 3:8 ). 
BORDERS|   BORDER;   bor'-der: Indicating in both singular and plural the outlines or territory of a country. In the sense of "limits," "boundaries" or "territory," it occurs as a translation of gebhul (and its feminine gebhulah, in  Psalm 74:17 ) in numerous passages in Old Testament, especially in Joshua. yerekhdh = "the flank," "the side," "the coast," hence, "the border" occurs in  Genesis 49:13 ; qatseh = "an extremity" "brim," "brink," "edge" ( Exodus 16:35 ;  Exodus 19:12   Joshua 4:19 ); micgereth = something enclosing, i.e. "a margin" ( Exodus 37:12, 14   1 Kings 7:28, 31, 35 f  the King James Version;  2 Kings 16:17  the King James Version); saphah or sepheth = "the lip" (as a natural boundary) hence, "a margin" "brim," "brink," "edge" ( Exodus 28:26 ;  Exodus 39:19  the King James Version); qets = "an extremity" "end" ( 2 Kings 19:23  the King James Version); totsa'ah = "exit," hence, "boundary" ( 1 Chronicles 5:16 ); tor = "a succession" "a string" "row," hence, "border" ( Songs 1:11  the King James Version); yadh = "hand," used in a great variety of applications, both literally and figuratively, proximate and remote; but how it should be translated with "border" in  1 Chronicles 7:29  is not clear; better would be: "in the hands of the children of Manasseh." Three Greek words occur for the idea: kraspedon = "a margin," "fringe" ( Matthew 23:5   Mark 6:56   Luke 8:44 ); horion = "a limit," "a boundary line" ( Matthew 4:13 ); methorios = "contiguous" (neuter plural as noun, "frontier," "border" in  Mark 7:24 ).  Frank E. Hirsch
HANNATHON|     han'-a-thon (channathon): A city on the northern boundary of Zebulun ( Joshua 19:14 ). It is probably identical with Kefar Hananyah, which the Mishna gives as marking the northern limit of lower Galilee (Neubauer, Geog. du Talmud, 179). It is represented by the modern Kefr 'Anan, about 3 miles Southeast of er-Rameh.
SHIMRATH|Guardian, a Benjamite, one of Shimhi's sons (id.). 
REKEM|Embroidered; variegated.  (1.) One of the five Midianite kings whom the Israelites destroyed ( Numbers 31:8 ). (2.) One of the sons of Hebron ( 1 Chronicles 2:43 ,  44). (3.) A town of Benjamin ( Joshua 18:27 ). 
HORSELEACH|     hors'-lech (`aluqah; compare Arabic `aluqah, "ghoul," and `alaqah, "leech," from root `aliq, "to cling"; Septuagint bdella, "leech"): The word occurs only once, in  Proverbs 30:15 , the Revised Version margin "vampire." In Arabic `alaqah is a leech of any kind, not only a horse-leech. The Arabic `aluqah, which, it may be noted, is almost identical with the Hebrew form, is a ghoul (Arabic ghul), an evil spirit which seeks to injure men and which preys upon the dead. The mythical vampire is similar to the ghoul. In zoology the name "vampire" is applied to a family of bats inhabiting tropical America, some, but not all, of which suck blood. In the passage cited the Arabic Bible has `aluqah, "ghoul." If leech is meant, there can be no good reason for specifying "horseleach." At least six species of leech are known in Palestine and Syria, and doubtless others exist. They are common in streams, pools, and fountains where animals drink. They enter the mouth, attach themselves to the interior of the mouth or pharynx, and are removed only with difficulty.  Alfred Ely Day
HAGABA|     ha-ga'-ba, hag'-a-ba (chaghabha'): Same as the following ( Nehemiah 7:48 ).
SERAIAH|Soldier of Jehovah.  (1.) The father of Joab ( 1 Chronicles 4:13 ,  14). (2.) The grandfather of Jehu ( 1 Chronicles 4:35 ). (3.) One of David's scribes or secretaries ( 2 Samuel 8:17 ). (4.) A Netophathite ( Jeremiah 40:8 ), a chief priest of the time of Zedekiah. He was carried captive by Nebuchadnezzar to Babylon, and there put to death ( 2 Kings 25:18 ,  23). (5.)  Ezra 2:2 . (6.) Father of Ezra the scribe ( 7:1 ). (7.) A ruler of the temple ( Nehemiah 11:11 ). (8.) A priest of the days of Jehoiakim ( Nehemiah 12:1 ,  12). (9.) The son of Neriah. When Zedekiah made a journey to Babylon to do homage to Nebuchadnezzar, Seraiah had charge of the royal gifts to be presented on that occasion. Jeremiah took advantage of the occasion, and sent with Seraiah a word of cheer to the exiles in Babylon, and an announcement of the doom in store for that guilty city. The roll containing this message ( Jeremiah 50:1 -8) Seraiah was to read to the exiles, and then, after fixing a stone to it, was to throw it into the Euphrates, uttering, as it sank, the prayer recorded in  Jeremiah 51:59 -64. Babylon was at this time in the height of its glory, the greatest and most powerful monarchy in the world. Scarcely seventy years elapsed when the words of the prophet were all fulfilled.  Jeremiah 51:59  is rendered in the Revised Version, "Now Seraiah was chief chamberlain," instead of "was a quiet prince," as in the Authorized Version. 
REUMAH|     roo'-ma (re'umah): The concubine of Nahor ( Genesis 22:24 ).
PETHUEL|Vision of God, the father of Joel the prophet ( Joel 1:1 ). 
MALLUCHI|     mal'-u-ki (mallukhi, "my counselor"): A family of priests that came over with Zerubbabel ( Nehemiah 10:4 ;  Nehemiah 12:14 ). May be the patronymic MALLUCH, (4) (which see).
EPHRATAH|Fruitful.  (1.) The second wife of Caleb, the son of Hezron, mother of Hur, and grandmother of Caleb, who was one of those that were sent to spy the land ( 1 Chronicles 2:19 ,  50). (2.) The ancient name of Bethlehem in Judah ( Genesis 35:16 ,  19;  48:7 ). In  Ruth 1:2  it is called "Bethlehem-Judah," but the inhabitants are called "Ephrathites;" in  Micah 5:2 , "Bethlehem-Ephratah;" in  Matthew 2:6 , "Bethlehem in the land of Judah." In  Psalm 132:6  it is mentioned as the place where David spent his youth, and where he heard much of the ark, although he never saw it till he found it long afterwards at Kirjath-jearim; i.e., the "city of the wood," or the "forest-town" ( 1 Samuel 7:1 ; Comp.  2 Samuel 6:3 ,  4). 
ELTEKON|     el'-te-kon ('elteqon, "founded by God"):  A city in the hill country of Judah ( Joshua 15:59 ) near BETH-ANOTH (which see) to be looked for, therefore, a little North of Hebron. Site unknown.
BETHARABAH|House of the desert, one of the six cities of Judah, situated in the sunk valley of the Jordan and Dead Sea ( Joshua 18:22 ). In  Joshua 15:61  it is said to have been "in the wilderness." It was afterwards included in the towns of Benjamin. It is called Arabah ( Joshua 18:18 ). 
RAHAB|Insolence; pride, a poetical name applied to Egypt in  Psalm 87:4 ;  89:10 ;  Isaiah 51:9 , as "the proud one." Rahab, (Hebrews Rahab; i.e.,  "broad, " "large"). When the Hebrews were encamped at Shittim, in the "Arabah" or Jordan valley opposite Jericho, ready to cross the river, Joshua, as a final preparation, sent out two spies to "spy the land." After five days they returned, having swum across the river, which at this season, the month Abib, overflowed its banks from the melting of the snow on Lebanon. The spies reported how it had fared with them ( Joshua 2:1 -7). They had been exposed to danger in Jericho, and had been saved by the fidelity of Rahab the harlot, to whose house they had gone for protection. When the city of Jericho fell ( 6:17 -25), Rahab and her whole family were preserved according to the promise of the spies, and were incorporated among the Jewish people. She afterwards became the wife of Salmon, a prince of the tribe of Judah ( Ruth 4:21 ;  1 Chronicles 2:11 ;  Matthew 1:5 ). "Rahab's being asked to bring out the spies to the soldiers ( Joshua 2:3 ) sent for them, is in strict keeping with Eastern manners, which would not permit any man to enter a woman's house without her permission. The fact of her covering the spies with bundles of flax which lay on her house-roof ( 2:6 ) is an `undesigned coincidence' which strictly corroborates the narrative. It was the time of the barley harvest, and flax and barley are ripe at the same time in the Jordan valley, so that the bundles of flax stalks might have been expected to be drying just then" (Geikie's Hours,  etc.,  ii.,  390). 
MATTANIAH|Gift of Jehovah.  (1.) A Levite, son of Heman, the chief of the ninth class of temple singers ( 1 Chronicles 25:4 ,  16). (2.) A Levite who assisted in purifying the temple at the reformation under Hezekiah ( 2 Chronicles 29:13 ). (3.) The original name of Zedekiah (q.v.), the last of the kings of Judah ( 2 Kings 24:17 ). He was the third son of Josiah, who fell at Megiddo. He succeeded his nephew Jehoiakin. 
HOREM|Consecrated, one of the fenced cities of Naphtali ( Joshua 19:38 ). 
HORONITE|The designation of Sanballat ( Nehemiah 2:10 ,  19), a native of Horonaim, or of one of the two Beth-horons, the "upper" or the "nether," mentioned in  Joshua 16:3 ,5. 
PELEG|Division, one of the sons of Eber; so called because "in his days was the earth divided" ( Genesis 10:25 ). Possibly he may have lived at the time of the dispersion from Babel. But more probably the reference is to the dispersion of the two races which sprang from Eber, the one spreading towards Mesopotamia and Syria, and the other southward into Arabia. 
SICHEM|=She'chem, (q.v.),  Genesis 12:6 . 
MESHELEMIAH|Friendship of Jehovah, a Levite of the family of the Korhites, called also Shelemiah ( 1 Chronicles 9:21 ;  26:1 ,  2,  9,  14). He was a temple gate-keeper in the time of David. 
HAMMOLECHETH|     ha-mol'-e-keth (hamolekheth, "the queen"; Septuagint Malecheth; the King James Version Hammoleketh): The daughter of Machir and sister of Gilead ( 1 Chronicles 7:18 ).
NACHOR|     na'-kor (Nachor) the King James Version; Greek form of "Nahor" (thus the Revised Version (British and American)). Grandfather of Abraham ( Luke 3:34 ).
RAPHU|Healed, a Benjamite, whose son Palti was one of the twelve spies ( Numbers 13:9 ). 
ISSHIJAH|     is-shi'-ja (yishshiyah, "Yah lends"; the King James Version Ishijah): A man of the household of Harim, named among those who, at Ezra's command, were induced to put away their "strange wives" ( Ezra 10:31 ). Also called "Aseas" (1 Esdras 9:32).
PROVERBS|Proverbs, Book of A collection of moral and philosophical maxims of a wide range of subjects presented in a poetic form. This book sets forth the "philosophy of practical life. It is the sign to us that the Bible does not despise common sense and discretion. It impresses upon us in the most forcible manner the value of intelligence and prudence and of a good education. The whole strength of the Hebrew language and of the sacred authority of the book is thrown upon these homely truths. It deals, too, in that refined, discriminating, careful view of the finer shades of human character so often overlooked by theologians, but so necessary to any true estimate of human life" (Stanley's Jewish Church). As to the origin of this book, "it is probable that Solomon gathered and recast many proverbs which sprang from human experience in preceeding ages and were floating past him on the tide of time, and that he also elaborated many new ones from the material of his own experience. Towards the close of the book, indeed, are preserved some of Solomon's own sayings that seem to have fallen from his lips in later life and been gathered by other hands' (Arnot's Laws from Heaven,  etc.) This book is usually divided into three parts:  (1.) Consisting of ch. 1-9, which contain an exhibition of wisdom as the highest good. (2.) Consisting of ch. 10-24. (3.) Containing proverbs of Solomon "which the men of Hezekiah, the king of Judah, collected" (ch. 25-29). These are followed by two supplements, (1) "The words of Agur" (ch. 30); and (2) "The words of king Lemuel" (ch. 31). Solomon is said to have written three thousand proverbs, and those contained in this book may be a selection from these ( 1 Kings 4:32 ). In the New Testament there are thirty-five direct quotations from this book or allusions to it. 
RAAMIAH|Thunder of the Lord, one of the princes who returned from the Exile ( Nehemiah 7:7 ); called also Reelaiah ( Ezra 2:2 ). 
VAIZATHA|   ; VAJEZATHA  vi'-za-tha, va-iz'-a-tha, va-jez'-a-tha, vaj-e-za'-tha (wayzatha'): One of the sons of Haman ( Esther 9:9 ). The form has been held to be corrupt, the Hebrew letter waw (w) being exceptionally tall, and the Hebrew letter zayin (z) exceptionally short (Benfey, Die persischen Keilinschriften (1847), XVIII, 93), and points to Vahyazdata, "Given of the Best-One" (OHL, 255).
FELIX|Happy, the Roman procurator of Judea before whom Paul "reasoned" ( Acts 24:25 ). He appears to have expected a bribe from Paul, and therefore had several interviews with him. The "worthy deeds" referred to in 24:2 was his clearing the country of banditti and impostors. At the end of a two years' term, Porcius Festus was appointed in the room of Felix (A.D. 60), who proceeded to Rome, and was there accused of cruelty and malversation of office by the Jews of Caesarea. The accusation was rendered nugatory by the influence of his brother Pallas with Nero. (see  Josephus ,  Ant. xx. 8,  9.) Drusilla, the daughter of Herod Agrippa, having been induced by Felix to desert her husband, the king of Emesa, became his adulterous companion. She was seated beside him when Paul "reasoned" before the judge. When Felix gave place to Festus, being "willing to do the Jews a pleasure," he left Paul bound. 
EARRINGS|Rings properly for the ear ( Genesis 35:4 ;  Numbers 31:50 ;  Ezek. 16:12 ). In  Genesis 24:47  the word means a nose-jewel, and is so rendered in the Revised Version. In Isaiah 3:20 the Authorized Version has "ear-rings," and the Revised Version "amulets," which more correctly represents the original word (lehashim), which means incantations; charms, thus remedies against enchantment, worn either suspended from the neck or in the ears of females. Ear-rings were ornaments used by both sexes ( Exodus 32:2 ). 
PHILEMON|An inhabitant of Colosse, and apparently a person of some note among the citizens ( Colossians 4:9 ;  Philemon 1:2 ). He was brought to a knowledge of the gospel through the instrumentality of Paul (19), and held a prominent place in the Christian community for his piety and beneficence (4-7). He is called in the epistle a "fellow-labourer," and therefore probably held some office in the church at Colosse; at all events, the title denotes that he took part in the work of spreading a knowledge of the gospel.  Philemon, Epistle to Was written from Rome at the same time as the epistles to the Colossians and Ephesians, and was sent also by Onesimus. It was addressed to Philemon and the members of his family. It was written for the purpose of interceding for Onesimus (q.v.), who had deserted his master Philemon and been "unprofitable" to him. Paul had found Onesimus at Rome, and had there been instrumental in his conversion, and now he sends him back to his master with this letter. This epistle has the character of a strictly private letter, and is the only one of such epistles preserved to us. "It exhibits the apostle in a new light. He throws off as far as possible his apostolic dignity and his fatherly authority over his converts. He speaks simply as Christian to Christian. He speaks, therefore, with that peculiar grace of humility and courtesy which has, under the reign of Christianity, developed the spirit of chivalry and what is called `the character of a gentleman,' certainly very little known in the old Greek and Roman civilization" (Dr. Barry). (see  SLAVE .) 
MESECH|   MESHECH;   me'-shek, me'-sek (meshekh, "long," "tall"; Mosoch): Son of Japheth ( Genesis 10:2   1 Chronicles 1:5 ;  1 Chronicles 1:17  is a scribal error for "Mash"; compare  Genesis 10:22, 23 ). His descendants and their dwelling-place (probably somewhere in the neighborhood of armenia (Herodotus iii.94)) seem to be regarded in Scripture as synonyms for the barbaric and remote ( Psalm 120:5 ; compare  Isaiah 66:19 , where Meshech should be read instead of "that draw the bow"). It is thought that the "Tibareni and Moschi" of the classical writers refer to the same people. Doubtless they appear in the annals of Assyria as enemies of that country under the names Tabali and Mushki-the latter the descendants of Meshech and the former those of Tubal to whom the term "Tibareni" may refer in the clause above. This juxtaposition of names is in harmony with practically every appearance of the word in Scripture. It is seldom named without some one of the others-Tubal, Javan, Gog and Magog. It is this which forms a good justification for making the suggested change in  Isaiah 66:19 , where Meshech would be in the usual company of Tubal and Javan. Ezekiel mentions them several times, first, as engaged in contributing to the trade of Tyre (Tiras of  Genesis 10:2  ?), in "vessels of brass" and-very significantly-slaves; again there is the association of Javan and Tubal with them ( Ezekiel 27:13 ); second, they are included in his weird picture of the under-world: "them that go down into the pit" ( Ezekiel 32:18, 26 ). They are mentioned again with Gog and Magog twice as those against whom the prophet is to "set his face" ( Ezekiel 38:2, 3 ;  Ezekiel 39:1 ).  Henry Wallace  MESECH  me'-sek.  See  MESHECH .
RULERS|   CITY,  OF  rool'-erz: The English Versions of the Bible rendering of the politarchai, of Thessalonica, before whom Jason and the other Christians were dragged by the mob ( Acts 17:6, 8 ). The term distinguishes the magistrates of a free Greek city from the ordinary Roman officials. It primarily denotes "rulers of the citizens," and hence, was used only of magistrates of free cities. The term seems to have been confined largely to Macedonia, although there have been found a few inscriptions elsewhere in which it is used. The use of this term well illustrates the accuracy of the author of the Book of Acts, for while politarchai is not used by classical authors, this form is attested by a number of Macedonian inscriptions. Much work has been done in this field in recent years and the results throw light on the reference in Acts. Of the inscriptions that have been found at least five belong to Thessalonica (see article by Professor Burton, in the American Journal of Theology of 1898, "The Politarchs").  "The rulers" of Philippi, before whom Paul and Silas were brought is the English Versions of the Bible rendering of archonies, which is commonly used in the New Testament ( Acts 16:19 ). This is the ordinary term for "rulers" and is not the same as "rulers of the city."  A. W. Fortune  RULERS OF THE CITY  See  RULER, 1, (8), 2, (2), 3, (5) .
GOINGS|   GOING;   go'-ing, go'-ingz: Besides, occasionally, forms of the common words for "go" (see Go), for "going" and "goings," the Hebrew has 'ashshur ('ashur, 'ashur), "step," motsa', totsa'oth, "goings out," "outgoings." The word "goings" is sometimes used literally, as in  Numbers 33:2 , "Moses wrote their goings out" (Hebrew motsa'). "Going up," ma`aleh, is in many passages rendered in the Revised Version (British and American) (as in  Numbers 34:4   2 Samuel 15:30  the King James Version) "ascent," as e.g.  Joshua 15:7   Judges 1:36   Nehemiah 12:37  (the American Standard Revised Version only). In  Ezekiel 44:5 , the American Standard Revised Version substitutes "egress" (way out or place of exit) for "going forth." "The goings out (place of exit; hence, boundary) of it" ( Numbers 34:4, 5, 9, 12  the King James Version) occurs frequently. The verbal forms bo', mabho', also me`al ( Daniel 6:14 ), are used of the sunset, "the going down of the sun." Thus  Joshua 8:29  the Revised Version (British and American), the King James Version "as soon as the sun was down."  In the New Testament, the Revised Version (British and American) substitutes "going out" for "gone out" (sbennumi) ( Matthew 25:8 ); "going up" for "ascending" ( Luke 19:28 ); "going in" for "coming in" ( Acts 9:28 ); "going about" for "wandering" ( 1 Timothy 5:13 ); "seeking" for "going about" ( Romans 10:3 ).  Metaphorically: "Goings" is used for a man's ways or conduct ( Psalm 17:5 , the Revised Version (British and American) "steps";  Psalm 40:2   Proverbs 14:15 , etc.). In  Psalm 17:5  "Hold up my goings in thy paths, that my footsteps slip not" becomes in the Revised Version (British and American) "My steps have held fast to thy paths, my feet have not slipped";  Proverbs 5:21 , "He pondereth all his goings," is in the Revised Version (British and American) "He maketh level all his paths," in "weigheth carefully"; conversely, in  Psalm 37:23 , the Revised Version (British and American) has "goings" for "steps"; in  James 1:11  "goings" for "ways." In the important prophetic passage,  Micah 5:2 , it is said of the Ruler from Bethlehem, "whose goings forth have been from of old, from everlasting," the Revised Version (British and American) "are from of old, from everlasting," margin "from ancient days." Of God it is said in  Habakkuk 3:6  "His ways are everlasting," the Revised Version (British and American) "His goings were as of old," margin "His ways are everlasting."  W. L. Walker
CUCUMBERS|(Hebrews plur. kishshuim; i.e.,  "hard, " "difficult" of digestion,  only in  Numbers 11:5 ). This vegetable is extensively cultivated in the East at the present day, as it appears to have been in earlier times among the Hebrews. It belongs to the gourd family of plants. In the East its cooling pulp and juice are most refreshing. "We need not altogether wonder that the Israelites, wearily marching through the arid solitudes of the Sinaitic peninsula, thought more of the cucumbers and watermelons of which they had had no lack in Egypt, rather than of the cruel bondage which was the price of these luxuries." Groser's Scripture Natural History. Isaiah speaks of a "lodge" ( 1:8 ; Hebrews sukkah), i.e., a shed or edifice more solid than a booth, for the protection throughout the season from spring to autumn of the watchers in a "garden of cucumbers." 
TOMBS|Of the Hebrews were generally excavated in the solid rock, or were natural caves. Mention is made of such tombs in  Judges 8:32 ;  2 Samuel 2:32 ;  2 Kings 9:28 ;  23:30 . They were sometimes made in gardens ( 2 Kings 21:26 ;  23:16 ;  Matthew 27:60 ). They are found in great numbers in and around Jerusalem and all over the land. They were sometimes whitewashed ( Matthew 23:27 ,  29). The body of Jesus was laid in Joseph's new rock-hewn tomb, in a garden near to Calvary. All evidence is in favour of the opinion that this tomb was somewhere near the Damascus gate, and outside the city, and cannot be identified with the so-called "holy sepulchre." The mouth of such rocky tombs was usually closed by a large stone (Hebrews golal), which could only be removed by the united efforts of several men ( Matthew 28:2 ; Comp.  John 11:39 ). (see  GOLGOTHA .) 
NACON|   , THE THRESHING FLOOR OF  na'-kon, (nakhon; the King James Version Nachon): The place where Uzzah was smitten for putting forth his hand to steady the ark, hence, called afterward "Perezuzzah" ( 2 Samuel 6:8 ); in the parallel passage ( 1 Chronicles 13:9 ) we have kidhon, and in Josephus (Ant., VII, iv, 2) Cheidon. In  1 Samuel 23:23  the word nakhon occurs, and is translated "of a certainty," margin "with the certainty" or "to a set place"; also in  1 Samuel 26:4  it is translated "of a certainty," margin "to a set place." It is uncertain whether in  1 Samuel 6:6  it is a place-name at all; and no successful attempt has been made to identify either Nacon or Chidon; possibly they are both personal names.  E. W. G. Masterman
THESSALONICA|A large and populous city on the Thermaic bay. It was the capital of one of the four Roman districts of Macedonia, and was ruled by a praetor. It was named after Thessalonica, the wife of Cassander, who built the city. She was so called by her father, Philip, because he first heard of her birth on the day of his gaining a victory over the Thessalians. On his second missionary journey, Paul preached in the synagogue here, the chief synagogue of the Jews in that part of Macedonia, and laid the foundations of a church ( Acts 17:1 -4;  1 Thessalonians 1:9 ). The violence of the Jews drove him from the city, when he fled to Berea ( Acts 17:5 -10). The "rulers of the city" before whom the Jews "drew Jason," with whom Paul and Silas lodged, are in the original called politarchai, an unusual word, which was found, however, inscribed on an arch in Thessalonica. This discovery confirms the accuracy of the historian. Paul visited the church here on a subsequent occasion ( 20:1 -3). This city long retained its importance. It is the most important town of European Turkey, under the name of Saloniki, with a mixed population of about 85,000. 
BAALTAMAR|Lord of palm trees, a place in the tribe of Benjamin near Gibeah of Saul ( Judges 20:33 ). It was one of the sanctuaries or groves of Baal. Probably the palm tree of Deborah ( Judges 4:5 ) is alluded to in the name. 
COS|     kos (Kos, "summit"; the King James Version Coos): An island off the coast of Caria, Asia Minor, one of the Sporades, mountainous in the southern half, with ridges extending to a height of 2,500 ft.; identified with the modern Stanchio. It was famous in antiquity for excellent wine, amphorae, wheat, ointments, silk and other clothing (Coae vestes). The capital was also called Cos. It possessed a famous hospital and medical school, and was the birthplace of Hippocrates (the father of medicine), of Ptolemy Philadelphus, and of the celebrated painter Apelles. The large plane tree in the center of the town (over 2,000 years old) is called "the tree of Hippocrates" to this day. The older capital, Astypalaea, was in the western part of the island, the later (since 366 B.C.) in the eastern part. From almost every point can be seen beautiful landscapes and picturesque views of sea and land and mountain.  Cos was one of the six Dorian colonies. It soon became a flourishing place of commerce and industry; later, like Corinth, it was one of the Jewish centers of the Aegean, as well as one of the financial centers of the commercial world in the eastern Mediterranean. Among the benefactors of the people of Cos was Herod the Great. It is mentioned in connection with Paul's third missionary journey in  Acts 21:1 , and in its relations with the Jews in 1 Maccabees 15:23; Ant, XIV, vii, 2; x, 15; BJ, I, xxi. 11. For a list of works on the island see Paton-Hicks, Inscriptions of Cos, ix.  J. E. Harry
ONAN|Strong, the second son of Judah ( Genesis 38:4 -10; Comp.  Deuteronomy 25:5 ;  Matthew 22:24 ). He died before the going down of Jacob and his family into Egypt. 
BERI|     be'-ri (beri, "wisdom"): A descendant of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 7:36 ).
BROKENHEARTED|     bro'-k'-n-har-ted (shabhar lebh; suntetrimmenoi ten kardian;  Psalm 69:20, 21   Isaiah 61:1   Luke 4:18  the King James Version; "of a broken heart,"  Psalm 34:18 ; "broken in heart,"  Psalm 147:3 ): People who feel their spiritual bankruptcy and helplessness, and who long for the help and salvation of God. Such people are in the right condition to be met and blessed by God. Compare "of contrite spirit" ( Psalm 31:18   Isaiah 66:2 ).
JAGUR|Place of sojourn, a city on the southern border of Judah ( Joshua 15:21 ). 
PATRIARCHS|   ANTEDILUVIAN   an-te-di-lu'-vi-an pa'-tri-arks.  1. The Ten Antediluvian Patriarchs:  Ten patriarchs who lived before the Flood are listed in the genealogical table of  Genesis 5 , together with a statement of the age of each at the birth of his son, the number of years that remained to him till death, and the sum of both periods or the entire length of his life. The first half of the list, from Adam to Mahalalel inclusive, together with Enoch and Noah is the same in the three texts, except that the Septuagint has 100 years more in the first column in each case save that of Noah, and 100 years less in the second column. See  CHRONOLOGY OF THE OLD TESTAMENT .  2. Divergences between the Three Texts:  Divergence exists in the case of Jared, Methuselah and Lamech only. Even here the longevity of Jared and Methuselah is given similarly in the Hebrew and the Septuagint; and probably represents the reading of the source, especially since the different data in the Samaritan text bear evidence of adjustment to a theory. The customary excess of 100 years in the Septuagint over the other texts for the age of the patriarch at the birth of the son, and the variously divergent data for the total age of Jared, Methuselah and Lamech are, therefore, the matters that await explanation.  The general superiority of the Hebrew text of the Pentateuch as a whole to the Samaritan text and the Septuagint is no longer questioned by Biblical scholars. But whether the superiority obtains in this particular passage has given rise to long and earnest discussion. Keil and Delitzsch in their commentaries on Genesis, Preuss (Zeitrechnung der Septuaginta, 1859, 30), Noldeke (Untersuchung zur Kritik des Altes Testament, 1869, 112), and Eduard Konig (ZKW, 1883, 281), hold to the originality of the Hebrew data. Bertheau (Jahrbucher fur deutsche Theologie, XXIII, 657) and Dillmann ascribe prior authority to the Samaritan numbers in  Genesis 5 , but to the Hebrew numbers in  Genesis 11 . Klostermann argues for the originality of the Septuagint (Pentateuch, Neue Folge, 1907, 37-39).  3. Divergences not Accidental:  It is agreed by all that the divergences between the texts are mainly due, not to accidental corruption, but to systematic alteration. Accordingly, two tasks devolve upon the investigator, namely  (1) the removal of accidental corruptions from the numerical data in the several texts and  (2) the discovery of a principle that underlies and explains the peculiarities in each one or in two of the three sets of data.  4. Different Explanations:  On the interpretation that the names denote individuals and that no links have been omitted in the genealogy, readers of the Septuagint noticed that according to its data Methuselah survived the flood, and in order to avoid this incongruity a scribe changed the 167 years, ascribed to his age at the birth of his son, to 187 years. This reading was early in existence, and was followed by Josephus. Holding the same theory regarding the genealogy, the Samaritans noticed that by their data three men, Jared, Methuselah, and Lamech, survived the Flood. To correct the apparent mistake, without tampering with the age of these three men at parenthood, their longevity was reduced sufficiently to enable them to die in the year of the Deluge.  If the Hebrew text in its present form is not original, and is to be emended from the Samaritan and Septuagint, the same difficulty inhered in it. To overcome this difficulty, perhaps, 100 years were borrowed from the years that elapsed between parenthood and death and were added to the age of the three men at the time of begetting a son. This relieved the matter as far as Jared was concerned and perhaps in the case of Lamech also, and the borrowing of an additional 20 years set Methuselah right also. If the original number for Lamech was 53 in the Hebrew, as in the Samaritan, then it was necessary to increase the time between Methuselah's birth and the Flood not 20, but 49 years. These 49 years could not be added directly to either Methuselah's or Lamech's age at begetting a son without making this age exceed 200 years, and thus be out of proportion; and accordingly the 49 years were distributed.  The difference of a century in the age assigned to the patriarchs at the son's birth which distinguishes the data of the Hebrew in most cases from the Septuagint, and likewise from the Samaritan in several instances, in  Genesis 5  and regularly until Nahor in  Genesis 11:10-26 , is commonly explained in the following manner or in a similar way: namely, when any of these long-lived patriarchs was found recorded as having begotten a son at a more youthful age than 150 years, the translators of the Septuagint added 100 years; on the other hand the Samaritan struck off 100 years when necessary in order that no one save Noah might be recorded as reaching 150 years of age before entering upon parenthood, and added 100 years when the record made a patriarch become father of a son before attaining even 50 years. A different explanation is, however, attempted, and the reason for the constant variant is sought in the purpose to construct an artificial chronology; for on interpreting the names as denoting individual persons and the genealogy as proceeding from father to son without break, a method employed as early as the 1st century of the Christian era (Ant., I, iii, 3), the time that elapsed between the creation of man and the Deluge was 1,656 years according to the Hebrew text, 1,307 according to the Samaritan text, and 2,242 according to the Septuagint; and numerous attempts have been made to bring one or other of these totals into arithmetical relation with some conceivable larger chronological scheme. A conspectus of these studies is furnished by Delitzsch (Neuer Commentar uber die Genesis, 136-39), Dillmann (Genesis, 6te Aufl, 111-13), and most recently by Skinner (Critical and Exegetical Commentary on Genesis, 135, 136, 234). The different explanations that are offered naturally vary in plausibility; but all possess the common fault of lacking cogency at critical points and somewhere doing violence to the data.  5. The Relation of the Cainite and Sethite Genealogies:  In  Genesis 4  there are two distinct genealogies, one proceeding through Cain and the other through Seth. Since Hupfeld, the representative critics who partition Genesis have generally reached the conclusion that both of these genealogies were found in the primary document of J or in an ancient recension of it (Wellhausen, Composition des Hexateuchs 3, 8-14; Delitzsch, Neuer Commentar, etc., 126; Kautzsch und Socin; Dillmann, Genesis 6, 104, 116; Budde, Urgeschichte, 182, 527-31; Driver, Introduction 10, 14, 21; Strack, Genesis 2, 23; Gunkel, Genesis, 49; Skinner, Genesis, 2, 14, 99 (4); Stade on the other hand regards  Genesis 4:25, 26 ;  Genesis 5:29  as the compilation of a redactor, ZATW, XIV, 281). In  Genesis 5  there is also a genealogy through Seth to Noah.  6. Resemblances and Differences in the Two Lists:  By removing  Genesis 4:25, 26  from their present position and placing them before 4:1 or, as Guthe does, before 4:17; and by exscinding the word "Eve" from 4:1 and understanding "the man" (ha-'adham) to be Enosh; and by exscinding from 4:25 the words "again," "another," and "instead of Abel, for Cain slew him"; and by introducing the words "and Lamech begat" before "a son" in  Genesis 5:28, 29  and inserting this material in between  Genesis 4:18  and 4:19 or after 4:24: then the two genealogies of chapter 4 are reduced to one and, so far as the names are concerned, have become almost identical with the Sethite genealogy contained in Genesis 5. In fact the resemblances between the six names in 4:17, 18 with six in chapter 5 have from the first been the basis of every attempt to identify the two genealogies (Buttmann, Mythologus, 170-72). The procedure is violent (see strictures, Skinner, Genesis, 99). It is a serious objection also that the work of reconstruction has been conducted without thought of the possible bearing of the tribal theory of the genealogies on this problem.  It is important to note that the number of links in the two genealogies may indicate that Jabal, Jubal, and Tubal-Cain, who mark stages of developing culture, lived several generations before Noah. It was ancient Semitic belief that civilization was far advanced before the Flood, and was continued in its various forms by the survivors (Berosus; and inscription 13, col. i. 18 in Lehmann's Shamash-shumukin). However, for the sake of comparison, the six links in the genealogical chain of the Cainites are placed side by side with those of the Sethites so as the better to reveal the resemblances and differences  Of these names two, Enoch and Lamech, occur in each genealogy, though Enoch does not occupy the same place in both lists. Kenan is readily derived from the same root as Kain. Instead of `Irad the original Hebrew text may have been `Idad, as was read by the Septuagint, Codex Alexandrinus and Lucian. But, accepting `Irad as original, `Irad and Jared may conceivably have been distorted in the oral tradition; yet as they stand they are radically different, and one might as well compare Prussia and Russia, Swede and Swiss, Austria and Australia. Methushael is written in the Septuagint exactly as is Methuselah; but both names are fully established by textual evidence and are fine Semitic names. Methushael particularly is of good Babylonian form, meaning "man of God"; archaic in Hebrew or smacking of the northern dialect, but quite intelligible to the Israelite.  7. The Need of Caution:  The resemblance between the six consecutive names in the two lists is indeed striking, but the differences are also great; and the wisdom of caution in pronouncing judgment is suggested and emphasized by a comparison of two lists from the later history of the people of Israel. The twelve kings of Judah compared with their nineteen contemporaries in northern Israel show almost as many resemblances as the ten Cainites to the twelve Sethites, Adam as the common ancestor not being reckoned. The two series begin with Rehoboam and Jeroboam, names as similar externally as `Irad and Jared. Ahaziah of Israel was almost contemporary with Ahaziah of Judah; Jehoram was on the throne of Judah while Jehoram ruled over Israel, the reign of Jehoash of Judah overlapped that of Jehoash of Israel, and Jehoahaz of Israel preceded about half a century Ahaz, or, as his name appears In Assyrian inscriptions, Jehoahaz of Judah. If there can be two contemporary dynasties with these coincidences, surely there could be two antediluvian races with an equal similarity in the names. Then, too, the material differences between the Cainite and Sethite lines are great. Cain is the son of Adam; whereas Kenan is the third remove, being descended through Seth and Enosh. The two Enochs seem to have nothing in common save the name ( Genesis 4:17, 18 ;  Genesis 5:22, 23 ). The character of the two Lamechs is quite different, as appears from their speeches ( Genesis 4:19, 23 ;  Genesis 5:28, 29 ). The line of Cain terminated in Lamech and his four children, of whom the three sons became of note in the annals of civilization; whereas the line of Seth continued through Noah, the hero of the Flood, and his three sons who were known only as the ancestors of peoples. Moreover, even excluding the section of Genesis assigned to the Priestly Code (P), the two lines were distinguished from each other, and most of the characteristic differences between them were clearly set forth, in the most ancient form of the Hebrew tradition, as it is actually known (Green, Unity of Genesis, 43-49; Delitzsch, Neuer Commentar, etc., 126, 127, 132, 140; Strack, Genesis 2, 22, 23, section III).  The order of narration in the Book of Genesis is also significant. It indicates the writer's perception of a profound difference between the two races. The narrative regarding Cain and his descendants is completed, according to invariable custom in the Book of Genesis, before the line of Seth, in which eventually Abraham appeared, is taken up and its history recorded (Green, Unity of Genesis, 49; Delitzsch, Neuer Commentar, etc., 126). Thus at each stage of the history the story of the branch line is told before the fortunes are recited of the direct line of promise.  8. The Register of  Genesis 5  and Berosus' List of Antediluvian Kings:  Berosus, a priest of Marduk's temple at Babylon about 300 B.C., in the second book of his history tells of the ten kings of the Chaldeans who reigned before the Deluge. He says that the first king was ALOROS of (the city) Babylon, a Chaldean. (He gave out a report about himself that God had appointed him to be shepherd of the people.) He reigned ten sars. (A sar is thirty-six hundred years.)  And afterward ALAPAROS (his son reigned three sars).  And (after him) AMELON (a Chaldean), who was of (the city of) Pautibibla (reigned thirteen sars).  Then AMMENON the Chaldean (of Pautibibla reigned twelve sars).  Then MEGALAROS of the city of Pautibibla, and he reigned eighteen sars.  And after him DAONOS the shepherd of Pautibibla reigned ten sars.  Then EUEDORACHOS of Pautibibla reigned eighteen sars.  Then AMEMPSINOS, a Chaldean of Laraucha, reigned; and he, the eighth, was king ten sars.  Next OTIARTES a Chaldean of Laraucha, reigned; and he (the ninth) was king eight sars.  And (last of all), upon the death of Otiartes, his son Xisouthros reigned eighteen sars. In his time the great deluge occurred. Thus, when summed up, the kings are ten; and the sars are one hundred and twenty (or four hundred and thirty-two thousand years, reaching to the Flood1).  (NOTE: 1Syncellus quoting Alexander Polyhistor. 2Syncellus quoting Apollodorus. 3Syncellus quoting Abydenus. 4Syncellus quoting Abydenus concerning the deluge. 5Eusebius, Armenian Chronicle, quoting Alexander Polyhistor. 6Eusebius, Armenian Chronicle, quoting Abydenus. The royal names have been transmitted with substantial uniformity, except the third, fifth, seventh and ninth. Amelon (2) is given as Amillaros (3) and Almelon (5, 6); Megalaros (2, 3) appears also as Amegalarus (5, 6); Euedorachos (2) as Eudoreschos (3), Edoranchus (5), and Edoreschus (6); and Ardates (1) as Otiartes (2, 5). For texts and readings see Richter, Berosi Chaldaeorum Historiae, 52-56; Migne, Patrologia Graeca, XIX, "Eusebii Chronicorum," Lib. I, cap. i et vi, pp. 106, 121; Schoene, Eusebii Chronicorum, Lib. I, pp. 7, 31.)  The original Babylonian form of seven of these ten names has been determined with a fair degree of certainty. Alaparos is in all probability a misreading by a copyist of the Greek Adaparos (Hommel, PSBA, XV, 243; Zimmern, KAT3, 530), and accordingly represents Adapa, followed perhaps by another element beginning with the letter "r"; Amelon and Ammenon are equivalent to the Babylonian nouns amelu (Delitzsch Wo lag das Paradies? S 149; Hommel, PSBA, XV, 243; Zimmern, KAT3, 530), man, and ummanu (Hommel, PSBA, XV, 243; Zimmern, KAT3, 530), workman; Euedorachos is Enmeduranki (pronounced Evveduranki) (Zimmern, KAT3, 530); Amempsinos is probably Amelu-Sin (Delitzsch, Wo lag das Paradies? 149; Hommel, PSBA, XV, 243; Zimmern, KAT3, 530), servant of the moon-god; Otiartes, a misreading of the Greek Opartes, is Ubara-Tutu (Delitzsch, Wo lag das Paradues? 149; Hommel, PSBA, XV, 243; Zimmern, KAT3, 530), meaning servant of Marduk; and Xisouthros is Chasis-atra (Haupt, KAT2, 503; Zimmern, KAT3, 530), equivalent to Atra-chasis, an epithet given to the hero of the Flood.  Several of these names are well known in Babylonian literature: Adapa was a human being, a wise man, a wizard, who failed to obtain immortality. He was an attendant at the temple of Ea in the town of Eridu, prepared bread and water for the sanctuary and provided it with fish. Perhaps it was his connection with the temple that led to his being called son of Ea, and described as created or built by Ea (Schrader, Keilinschriftliche Bibliothek, VI, 91-101). Similarly King Esarhaddon calls himself the faithful son, child of Beltis; and Ashurbanipal claims to have been created or built by the gods Ashur and Sin in the womb of his mother (compare Adam, the son of God,  Luke 3:38 ). Enmeduranki, whose name has been interpreted as possibly meaning chief priest of Duranki, the meeting place of sky and earth, was a king of Sippar, a city whose patron deity was the sun-god Shamash. He was a notable wise man who, it seems, was reputed to have been taken by the gods Shamash and Ramman into their fellowship and made acquainted with the secrets of heaven and earth (KAT3, 530). As among the Hebrews the priests were descended from Aaron, so among the Babylonians Enmeduranki was regarded as the ancestor of the wizards and sooth-sayers or the founder of their guild. Amel-Sin is elsewhere mentioned as the wise one of Ur (KAT3, 537). In the Babylonian account of the Flood the hero is addressed as son of Ubara-Tutu. It is worth mention that legends grew up about the hero of the Flood, as they have about other historical personages since; and he even appears like some ancient kings, with the determinative for god before his name. Adapa also, who was classed with the wizards, early came to have a place in story.  9. Correspondences:  The first name in the list of Berosus is Aloros. Professor Hommel would understand the original Babylonian form to have been Aruru, a goddess. The identification is precarious, to say the least; and evidently it was not the conception of the Babylonian priest, for it makes his line of kings begin with a goddess. He should have called Aloros a queen. Professor Hommel regards Adapa also as a deity, contrary to the statements of the tale itself; thus holding that the second Babylonian king like the first was a Divine being. On such an interpretation the Babylonian and Hebrew lists are not identical, for the Hebrew genealogy commences in Adam, human being. With the third name, however, certain remarkable correspondences begin to appear. The third Babylonian king is Amelu, man, and the third patriarch is Enosh, also meaning man; the fourth king is Ummanu, artificer, and the fourth patriarch is Kenan, a name derived from a root meaning to form or fabricate. The seventh king is Enmeduranki, who apparently was reputed to have been summoned by the gods Shamash and Ramman into their fellowship and made acquainted with the secrets of heaven and earth; and the seventh patriarch was Enoch who walked with God (like Noah,  Genesis 6:9 ; see KAT3, 540). The tenth king, like the tenth patriarch, was the hero of the Flood. These facts are capable of two interpretations: either the two catalogues are fundamentally different, having been constructed for different purposes, yet as they deal with prominent persons belonging to the same period of history and to the same country, cross each other at various points and culminate in the same individual (as do the genealogies of  Matthew 1 and Luke 3 ); or else when the unexplained names of both lists shall have been finally interpreted, the two catalogues will be found to represent the same tradition.  10. Differences:  Differences between the catalogues exist, which in some instances may be more apparent than real.  (1) In the Babylonian hat the descent of the government from father to son is asserted in two instances only, namely, from the first king to the second and from the ninth to the tenth. The Hebrew asserts kinship, however remote, between the successive links. Yet the two records are quite compatible with each other in this respect on theory (see below) that the Hebrew genealogy was shortened by omissions in order to name but ten generations.  (2) Each of the ten patriarchs is assigned a long life; each of the ten kings has a greatly longer reign. The contrast is twofold: between the number of years in corresponding cases, and between length of life and length of reign. But instead of this difference indicating non-identity of the two lines, it may be found, when the Semitic tradition is fully known, to afford the explanation for the duration of life which is assigned to the patriarchs.  (3) There is no arithmetical ratio between the years connected with the corresponding names of the two lists. And the symmetry of the numbers in the Bah transmission is open to the suspicion of being artificial. The number of kings is ten; the sum of their united reigns is one hundred and twenty sars, a multiple of ten and of the basal number of the Babylonian duodecimal system. There are three reigns of ten sars each, and three successive reigns which taken together, 3 plus 13 plus 12, make ten and eighteen sars. Taking the reigns in the order in which they occur, we have as their duration the series 10, 18 plus 10, 18, 10, 18, 10, 8, and 18 (Davis, Genesis and Semitic Tradition, 96-100; Strack, Genesis 2, 24).  11. The Interpretation of the Genealogy in  Genesis 5 :  Three explanations of the genealogy in  Genesis 5  may be mentioned.  (1) An interpretation, current at the time of Josephus (Ant., I, iii, 4) and adopted by Archbishop Usher in 1650 in his attempt to fix the dates of the events recorded in the Scriptures, assumes an unbroken descent from father to son, during ten generations, from Adam to Noah. On this theory the time from the creation of man to the Flood is measured by the sum of the years assigned to the patriarchs at the birth of the son and successor, together with Noah's age when he entered the Ark; so that all the years from the creation of Adam to the Flood were 1,656 years.  The extraordinary longevity of these patriarchs is accounted for by the known physical effects of sin. Sin works disease and death. Man was not as yet far removed from his state of sinlessness. The physical balance between man sinless and man the sinner had not been attained (compare Delitzsch, Genesis 3, 139; see Ant, I, iii, 9). But after all are we really justified in supposing that the Hebrew author of these genealogies designed to construct a chronology of the period? He never puts them to such a use himself. He nowhere sums these numbers. No chronological statement is deduced from them. There is no computation anywhere in Scripture of the time that elapsed from the Creation or from the Deluge, as there is from the descent into Egypt to the Exodus ( Exodus 12:40 ), or from the Exodus to the building of the temple ( 1 Kings 6:1 ; Green, Bibliotheca Sacra, 1890, 296).  (2) A second method of interpretation assumes that links of the genealogy have been intentionally omitted in order that exactly ten may be named. It is based on the phenomena presented by other Hebrew genealogical registers. Matthew, for example, has outlined the lineage of Christ from Abraham.  The history naturally divides into three sections, and to give the tabulation symmetry Matthew names twice seven generations in each division, in one instance omitting three famous kings of Judah and saying "Joram begat Uzziah." As Joram is said to have begotten Uzziah, his grandson's grandson, so Enoch may be said to have begotten Methuselah, although the latter may have been Enoch's great-grandson or remoter descendant.  The book of Genesis is divided by its author into ten sections, each introduced by the same formula ( Genesis 2:4 ;  Genesis 5:1 ;  Genesis 6:9 , etc.). In the period from the creation of man to the birth of Abraham the crisis of the history was the Flood. Twice ten generations are named in the symmetrical register, ten before the Flood, Adam to Noah, and ten after the Flood, Shem to Abraham; and the latter period in its turn is divided into two equal parts, and five generations are named for the time to, and five for the time after, the birth of Peleg, in whose days `the earth was divided' ( Genesis 11:10-26 ;  Genesis 10:25 ; compare perhaps  Genesis 11:1-9 ).  On this conception of the tables, which is fully justified, there is no basis in the genealogy from Adam to Noah for the calculation of chronology. The table was constructed for a different purpose, and the years are noted for another reason than chronology (Green, Bibliotheca Sacra, 1890, 285-303; Warfield, Princeton Theological Review, 1911, 2-11; compare Dillmann, Genesis 6, 106 "dritte Absicht"). The longevity is explained as it is on Usher's interpretation of the data (see above).  (3) A third method of interpretation understands the patriarchal name to denote the individual and his family spoken of collectively. The person and tribe form one conception. This method also agrees with the phenomena presented by Hebrew genealogical registers. Thus, Keturah bears to Abraham Jokshan, and Jokshan begat Sheba and Dedan, tribes and the countries they inhabited ( Genesis 25:1-5 ). Mizraim, as Egypt was called by the Hebrews, begat the Lydians and other ancient peoples ( Genesis 10:13 ); and Canaan begat the town of Sidon and such famous tribes as the Jebusite and the Amorite ( Genesis 10:15-18 ). Similarly, countries like Media, Ionia (Javan), Tubal and Meshech, and peoples named by Gentileadjectives in the plural number, like Kittim and Dodanim, are hated as sons of Japheth; and Ethiopia, Egypt, Punt and Canaan, and districts in Arabia like Sheba and Havilah are recorded as descendants of Ham ( Genesis 10:2-7 ). Moreover, outside of genealogies, in common parlance Israel denotes a man and the tribe that sprang from him; David, the king of that name and the dynasty he founded ( 1 Kings 12:16 ; compare  Jeremiah 30:9 ); Nebaioth, a people and its prince ( Genesis 25:13, 16 ;  Genesis 28:9 ).  Sometimes the family takes its name from its progenitor or later leading member; sometimes the name of the tribe or of the country it inhabits is given to its chief representative, as today men are constantly addressed by their family name, and nobles are called by the name of their duchy or county. It is quite in accordance with usage, therefore, that Noah, for example, should denote the hero of the Flood and the family to which he belonged. The longevity is the period during which the family had prominence and leadership; the age at the son's birth is the date in the family history at which a new family originated that ultimately succeeded to the dominant position. If no links have been omitted in constructing the register, the period from the creation of man to the Flood is measured by the sum of the ages of Adam and his successors to Noah and 600 years of the life of Noah, amounting to 8,225 years. Thus, the family of Seth originated when Adam was 130 years old ( Genesis 5:3 ). Adam and his direct line were at the head of affairs for 930 years  (5), when they were superseded by the family of Seth. In Seth, 105 years after it attained headship, the family of Enosh took Its rise  (6). Seth, after being at the head of affairs for 912 years  (8) was succeeded by the family of Enosh, in the year of the world 1842. And so on.  John D. Davis  PATRIARCHS, TESTAMENTS OF THE TWELVE  See APOCALYPTIC LITERATURE, sec. IV, 1.  TESTAMENTS OF THE TWELVE PATRIARCHS  See  APOCALYPTIC LITERATURE, sec . IV, 1.
LOIS|The maternal grandmother of Timothy. She is commended by Paul for her faith ( 2 Timothy 1:5 ). 
RIBLAH|Fruitful, an ancient town on the northern frontier of Palestine, 35 miles north-east of Baalbec, and 10 or 12 south of Lake Homs, on the eastern bank of the Orontes, in a wide and fertile plain. Here Nebuchadnezzar had his head-quarters in his campaign against Jerusalem, and here also Necho fixed his camp after he had routed Josiah's army at Megiddo ( 2 Kings 23:29 -35;  25:6 ,  20,  21;  Jeremiah 39:5 ;  52:10 ). It was on the great caravan road from Palestine to Carchemish, on the Euphrates. It is described ( Numbers 34:11 ) as "on the eastern side of Ain." A place still called el Ain, i.e., "the fountain", is found in such a position about 10 miles distant. (see  JERUSALEM .) 
MISHAM|Their cleansing or their beholding, a Benjamite, one of the sons of Elpaal ( 1 Chronicles 8:12 ). 
MACHBENA|     mak-be'-na (makhbenah; Septuagint: Codex Vaticanus Machabena; Codex Alexandrinus Machamena; the King James Version, Machbenah): A name which occurs in the genealogical list of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:49 ), apparently the name of a place, which may be the same as "Cabbon" ( Joshua 15:40 ), probably to be identified with el-Kubeibeh, about 3 miles South of Beit Jibrin.
HELAM|Place of abundance, a place on the east of Jordan and west of the Euphrates where David gained a great victory over the Syrian army ( 2 Samuel 10:16 ), which was under the command of Shobach. Some would identify it with Alamatta, near Nicephorium. 
TABBATH|Famous, a town in the tribe of Ephraim ( Judges 7:22 ), to the south of Bethshean, near the Jordan. 
SLEEVES|     slevz ( Genesis 37:3  margin).  See  DRESS ;
BAALI|My lord, a title the prophet ( Hosea 2:16 ) reproaches the Jewish church for applying to Jehovah, instead of the more endearing title Ishi, meaning "my husband." 
ZOROBABEL|     zo-rob'-a-bel, zo-ro'-ba-bel (Zerobabel): In the King James Version; Greek form of "Zerubbabel," thus the Revised Version (British and American) ( Matthew 1:12, 13   Luke 3:27 ).
GEBER|A valiant man, ( 1 Kings 4:19 ), one of Solomon's purveyors, having jurisdiction over a part of Gilead, comprising all the kingdom of Sihon and part of the kingdom of Og ( Deuteronomy 2 ; 31). 
PERUDA|One whose descendants returned with Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:55 ); called also Perida ( Nehemiah 7:57 ). 
HUMPS|     humps: Appears in  Isaiah 30:6  in the American Standard Revised Version for "bunches" in the King James Version.
ELZABAD|     el-za'-bad ('elzabhadh, "God has given"; Compare ZABDIEL and ZEBADIAH):  (1) The ninth of David's Gadite heroes ( 1 Chronicles 12:12 ).  (2) A Korahite doorkeeper ( 1 Chronicles 26:7 ).
KIRIATHAIM|     kir-i-aitha'-im (qiryathaym, "two cities"; the King James Version, Kirjathaim):  (1) A city in the uplands of Moab formerly held by Sihon, and given by Moses to Reuben, who is said to have fortified it ( Numbers 32:37   Joshua 13:19 ). It is named along with Elealeh and Nebo in the former passage, and with Sibmah in the latter. It was in the hands of Moab in Mesha's time, and he claims to have fortified it (M S, l.10). For Jeremiah (48:1, 23) and Ezekiel (25:9) it is a Moabite town. Eusebius, Onomasticon, identifies it with Coraitha, a Christian village 10 Roman miles West of Madeba. This is the modern Qaraiyat, about 11 miles West of Madeba, and 5 miles East of Macherus. This, however, may represent Kerioth, while the towns with which it is named would lead us to look for Kiriathaim to the North of Wady Zerqa Ma`in. From this city was named Shaveh-kiriathaim, "the plain of Kiriathaim" ( Genesis 14:5 ).  (2) A city in the territory of Naphtali, assigned to the Gershonite Levites ( 1 Chronicles 6:76 ), corresponding to "Kartan" in  Joshua 21:32 .  W. Ewing
CORNELIUS|A centurion whose history is narrated in  Acts 10 . He was a "devout man," and like the centurion of Capernaum, believed in the God of Israel. His residence at Caesrea probably brought him into contact with Jews who communicated to him their expectations regarding the Messiah; and thus he was prepared to welcome the message Peter brought him. He became the first fruit of the Gentile world to Christ. He and his family were baptized and admitted into the Christian church ( Acts 10:1 ,  44-48). (see  CENTURION .) 
GENTILES|(Hebrews,  usually in plural,  goyim), meaning in general all nations except the Jews. In course of time, as the Jews began more and more to pride themselves on their peculiar privileges, it acquired unpleasant associations, and was used as a term of contempt. In the New Testament the Greek word Hellenes, meaning literally Greek (as in  Acts 16:1 ,  3;  18:17 ;  Romans 1:14 ), generally denotes any non-Jewish nation. 
JEIEL|Snatched away by God.  (1.) A descendant of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 9:35 ;  8:29 ). (2.) One of the Levites who took part in praising God on the removal of the ark to Jerusalem ( 1 Chronicles 16:5 ). (3.)  2 Chronicles 29:13 . A Levite of the sons of Asaph. (4.)  2 Chronicles 26:11 . A scribe. (5.)  1 Chronicles 5:7 . A Reubenite chief. (6.) One of the chief Levites, who made an offering for the restoration of the Passover by Josiah ( 2 Chronicles 35:9 ). (7.)  Ezra 8:13 . (8.)  Ezra 10:43 . 
SILLA|A highway; a twig, only in  2 Kings 12:20 . If taken as a proper name (as in the LXX. and other versions), the locality is unknown. 
GIRZITES|     gur'-zits.  See  GIZRITES .
HAZAZONTAMAR|   HAZAZON-TAMAR  haz'-a-zan-ta'-mar (chatsatson tamar; the King James Version Hazezon Tamar): "Hazazon of the palm trees," mentioned ( Genesis 14:7 ) as a place of the Amorites, conquered, together with En-mishpat and the country of the Amalekites, by Chedorlaomer; in  2 Chronicles 20:2  it is identified with EN-GEDI (which see); and if so, it must have been its older name. If this identification be accepted, then Hazazon may survive in the name Wady Husasah, Northwest of `Ain Jidy. Another suggestion, which certainly meets the needs of the narrative better, is that Hazazon-tamar is the Thamara of Eusebius, Onomasticon (85 3; 210 86), the Thamaro, of Ptol. xvi0.3. The ruin Kurnub, 20 miles West-Southwest of the South end of the Dead Sea-on the road from Hebron to Elath-is supposed to mark this site.  E. W. G. Masterman
JOIAKIM|(whom Jehovah has set up) = Jehoiakim, a high priest, the son and successor of Jeshua ( Nehemiah 12:10 ,  12,  26). 
ENGANNIM|Fountain of gardens.  (1.) A town in the plains of Judah ( Joshua 15:34 ), north-west of Jerusalem, between Zanoah and Tappuah. It is the modern Umm Jina. (2.) A city on the border of Machar ( Joshua 19:21 ), allotted to the Gershonite Levites ( 21:29 ). It is identified with the modern Jenin, a large and prosperous town of about 4,000 inhabitants, situated 15 miles south of Mount Tabor, through which the road from Jezreel to Samaria and Jerusalem passes. When Ahaziah, king of Judah, attempted to escape from Jehu, he "fled by the way of the garden house" i.e., by way of En-gannim. Here he was overtaken by Jehu and wounded in his chariot, and turned aside and fled to Megiddo, a distance of about 20 miles, to die there. 
SHAAPH|     shy'-af (sha`aph):  (1) A son of Jahdai ( 1 Chronicles 2:47 ).  (2) The son of Maachah, a concubine of Caleb, the brother of Jerahmeel. Shaaph is called the "father," or founder, of the city Madmannah ( 1 Chronicles 2:48 f ).
KIRHARASETH|Built fortress, a city and fortress of Moab, the modern Kerak, a small town on the brow of a steep hill about 6 miles from Rabbath-Moab and 10 miles from the Dead Sea; called also Kir-haresh, Kir-hareseth, Kir-heres ( Isaiah 16:7 ,  11;  Jeremiah 48:31 ,  36). After the death of Ahab, Mesha, king of Moab (see  MOABITE STONE ), threw off allegiance to the king of Israel, and fought successfully for the independence of his kingdom. After this Jehoram, king of Israel, in seeking to regain his supremacy over Moab, entered into an alliance with Jehoshaphat, king of Judah, and with the king of Edom. The three kings led their armies against Mesha, who was driven back to seek refuge in Kir-haraseth. The Moabites were driven to despair. Mesha then took his eldest son, who would have reigned in his stead, and offered him as a burnt-offering on the wall of the fortress in the sight of the allied armies. "There was great indignation against Israel: and they departed from him, and returned to their own land." The invaders evacuated the land of Moab, and Mesha achieved the independence of his country ( 2 Kings 3:20 -27). 
JEHEZEKEL|   JEHEZKEL;   je-hez'-kel (Revised Version (British and American)), je-hez'-e-kel (the King James Version) (yechezqe'l "God strengthens"):  (1) A priest of David's time ( 1 Chronicles 24:16 ).  (2) Jehezkel in  Ezekiel 1:3  King James Version margin, for EZEKIEL (which see).
JEDIDIAH|Beloved by Jehovah, the name which, by the mouth of Nathan, the Lord gave to Solomon at his birth as a token of the divine favour ( 2 Samuel 12:25 ). 
SHAVEH|Shaveh, Valley of Valley of the plain the ancient name of the "king's dale" (q.v.), or Kidron, on the north side of Jerusalem ( Genesis 14:17 ). 
BETHSAIDA|House of fish.  (1.) A town in Galilee, on the west side of the sea of Tiberias, in the "land of Gennesaret." It was the native place of Peter, Andrew, and Philip, and was frequently resorted to by Jesus ( Mark 6:45 ;  John 1:44 ;  12:21 ). It is supposed to have been at the modern `Ain Tabighah, a bay to the north of Gennesaret. (2.) A city near which Christ fed 5,000 ( Luke 9:10 ; Comp.  John 6:17 ;  Matthew 14:15 -21), and where the blind man had his sight restored ( Mark 8:22 ), on the east side of the lake, two miles up the Jordan. It stood within the region of Gaulonitis, and was enlarged by Philip the tetrarch, who called it "Julias," after the emperor's daughter. Or, as some have supposed, there may have been but one Bethsaida built on both sides of the lake, near where the Jordan enters it. Now the ruins et-Tel. 
HOSHAIAH|     ho-sha'-ya (hosha`yah, "whom Yahweh helpeth"):  (1) Father of Jezaniah (probably = Azariah, so the Septuagint; compare  Jeremiah 42:1  and 43:2 with  2 Kings 25:23  and note similar letters in names in Hebrew), who with other leaders antagonized the policy and counsel of Jeremiah after the fall of Jerusalem ( Jeremiah 42:1-43:7 ).  (2) A man, probably of Judah, who led half of the princes of Judah in procession at the dedication of the wall of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 12:32 ).
PITS|   SLIME; SLIME   slim, slim'-pits (chemar; Septuagint asphaltos; Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) bitumen; the Revised Version margin "bitumen"; compare Arabic chummar, "bitumen"; and compare chomer, "clay," "mortar"): In the account of the ark in  Genesis 6:14 , kopher Septuagint asphaltos; Vulgate: bitumen; compare Arabic kufr, "pitch") does not necessarily denote vegetable pitch, but may well mean bitumen. The same may be said of zepheth, "pitch" (compare Arabic zift, "pitch"), in  Exodus 2:3  and  Isaiah 34:9 . The word "slime" occurs in the following passages: "And they had brick for stone, and slime had they for mortar" ( Genesis 11:3 ); "Now the vale of Siddim was full of slime pits" ( Genesis 14:10 , margin "bitumen pits"); "She took for him an ark of bulrushes, and daubed it with slime and with pitch" ( Exodus 2:3 ).  Bitumen is a hydrocarbon allied to petroleum and natural gas. It is a lustrous black solid, breaking with a conchoidal fracture, burning with a yellow flame, and melting when ignited. It is probably derived from natural gas and petroleum by a process of oxidation and evaporation, and its occurrence may be taken as a sign that other hydrocarbons are or have been present in the strata. It is found in small lumps and larger masses in the cretaceous limestone on the west side of the Dead Sea, and there is reason to believe that considerable quantities of it rise to the surface of the Dead Sea during earthquakes. In ancient times it was exported to Egypt to be used in embalming mummies. Important mines of it exist at Chasbeiya near Mt. Hermon and in North Syria. Springs of liquid bituminous matter exist in Mesopotamia, where according to Herodotus and other classical writers it was used as mortar with sun-dried bricks. Various conjectures have been made as to the part played by bitumen in the destruction of Sodom and Gomorrah. Diodorus Siculus calls the Dead Sea limne asphalstitis, "lake of asphalt."  See  SIDDIM ;  CITIES OF THE PLAIN .  Alfred Ely Day
JASIEL|     ja'-si-el, jas'-i-el (ya`asi'el, "God is maker,"  1 Chronicles 11:47  the King James Version).  See  JAASIEL .
ELIAH|     e-li'-a.  See  ELIJAH .
XERXES|     zerks'-ez: The name is an attempt to transliterate into Greek (Xerxes) the Persian Khshayarsha. The same word in unpointed Hebrew took the form 'chshwrsh, probably pronounced 'achshawarash, but at a later time it was wrongly vocalized so as to produce 'achashwerosh, from whence "Ahasuerus" in English versions of the Bible comes.  Xerxes was king of Persia in 485-465 B.C. The first part of his reign was marked by the famous campaign into Greece, beginning in 483. After the defeat at Salamis in 480 Xerxes himself withdrew from the expedition and it was finally discontinued in the next year. During the remainder of his reign, Xerxes seems to have spent a listless existence, absorbed in intrigues of the harem, and leaving the government to be carried on by his ministers and favorites (often slaves). He was finally murdered by his vizier and left an unenviable reputation for caprice and cruelty. For the various Biblical references see AHASUERUS.  Burton Scott Easton
HASHUBAH|Ibid., a descendant of David ( 1 Chronicles 3:20 ). 
JEMIMAH|     je-mi'-ma (yemimah, perhaps a diminutive meaning "little dove"): The first daughter of Job (42:14), born after his restoration from affliction.
ELIAB|To whom God is father.  (1.) A Reubenite, son of Pallu ( Numbers 16:1 ,  12;  26:8 ,  9;  Deuteronomy 11:6 ). (2.) A son of Helon, and chief of the tribe of Zebulun at the time of the census in the wilderness ( Numbers 1:9 ;  2:7 ). (3.) The son of Jesse, and brother of David ( 1 Samuel 16:6 ). It was he who spoke contemptuously to David when he proposed to fight Goliath ( 1 Samuel 17:28 ). (4.) One of the Gadite heroes who joined David in his stronghold in the wilderness ( 1 Chronicles 12:9 ). 
TEKOA|Pitching of tents; fastening down, a town of Judah, about 12 miles south of Jerusalem, and visible from the city. From this place Joab procured a "wise woman," who pretended to be in great affliction, and skilfully made her case known to David. Her address to the king was in the form of an apologue, similar to that of Nathan ( 2 Samuel 12:1 -6). The object of Joab was, by the intervention of this woman, to induce David to bring back Absalom to Jerusalem ( 2 Samuel 14:2 ,  4,  9). This was also the birth-place of the prophet Amos ( 1:1 ). It is now the village of Teku'a, on the top of a hill among ruins, 5 miles south of Bethlehem, and close to Beth-haccerem ("Herod's mountain"). 
GARLANDS|( Acts 14:13 ). In heathen sacrifices the victims were adorned with fillets and garlands made of wool, with leaves and flowers interwoven. The altar and the priests and attendants were also in like manner adorned. 
BEERELIM|Well of heroes, probably the name given to Beer, the place where the chiefs of Israel dug a well ( Numbers 21:16 ;  Isaiah 15:8 ). 
PHOENICIA|( Acts 21:2 ). (see  PHENICIA .) 
HAGERITE|     ha'-ger-it (haghri).  See  HAGRITES .
MATTHEW|Gift of God, a common Jewish name after the Exile. He was the son of Alphaeus, and was a publican or tax-gatherer at Capernaum. On one occasion Jesus, coming up from the side of the lake, passed the custom-house where Matthew was seated, and said to him, "Follow me." Matthew arose and followed him, and became his disciple ( Matthew 9:9 ). Formerly the name by which he was known was Levi ( Mark 2:14 ;  Luke 5:27 ); he now changed it, possibly in grateful memory of his call, to Matthew. The same day on which Jesus called him he made a "great feast" ( Luke 5:29 ), a farewell feast, to which he invited Jesus and his disciples, and probably also many of old associates. He was afterwards selected as one of the twelve ( 6:15 ). His name does not occur again in the Gospel history except in the lists of the apostles. The last notice of him is in  Acts 1:13 . The time and manner of his death are unknown.  Matthew, Gospel according to The author of this book was beyond a doubt the Matthew, an apostle of our Lord, whose name it bears. He wrote the Gospel of Christ according to his own plans and aims, and from his own point of view, as did also the other "evangelists." As to the time of its composition, there is little in the Gospel itself to indicate. It was evidently written before the destruction of Jerusalem ( Matthew 24 ), and some time after the events it records. The probability is that it was written between the years A.D. 60 and 65. The cast of thought and the forms of expression employed by the writer show that this Gospel was written for Jewish Christians of Palestine. His great object is to prove that Jesus of Nazareth was the promised Messiah, and that in him the ancient prophecies had their fulfilment. The Gospel is full of allusions to those passages of the Old Testament in which Christ is predicted and foreshadowed. The one aim prevading the whole book is to show that Jesus is he "of whom Moses in the law and the prophets did write." This Gospel contains no fewer than sixty-five references to the Old Testament, forty-three of these being direct verbal citations, thus greatly outnumbering those found in the other Gospels. The main feature of this Gospel may be expressed in the motto, "I am not come to destroy, but to fulfil." As to the language in which this Gospel was written there is much controversy. Many hold, in accordance with old tradition, that it was originally written in Hebrew (i.e.,  the Aramaic or Syro-Chaldee dialect,  then the vernacular of the inhabitants of Palestine), and afterwards translated into Greek, either by Matthew himself or by some person unknown. This theory, though earnestly maintained by able critics, we cannot see any ground for adopting. From the first this Gospel in Greek was received as of authority in the Church. There is nothing in it to show that it is a translation. Though Matthew wrote mainly for the Jews, yet they were everywhere familiar with the Greek language. The same reasons which would have suggested the necessity of a translation into Greek would have led the evangelist to write in Greek at first. It is confessed that this Gospel has never been found in any other form than that in which we now possess it. The leading characteristic of this Gospel is that it sets forth the kingly glory of Christ, and shows him to be the true heir to David's throne. It is the Gospel of the kingdom. Matthew uses the expression "kingdom of heaven" (thirty-two times), while Luke uses the expression "kingdom of God" (thirty-three times). Some Latinized forms occur in this Gospel, as kodrantes ( Matthew 5:26 ), for the Latin quadrans, and phragello ( 27:26 ), for the Latin flagello. It must be remembered that Matthew was a tax-gatherer for the Roman government, and hence in contact with those using the Latin language. As to the relation of the Gospels to each other, we must maintain that each writer of the synoptics (the first three) wrote independently of the other two, Matthew being probably first in point of time. "Out of a total of 1071 verses, Matthew has 387 in common with Mark and Luke, 130 with Mark, 184 with Luke; only 387 being peculiar to itself." (See Mark; LUKE; GOSPELS.) The book is fitly divided into these four parts:  (1.) Containing the genealogy, the birth, and the infancy of Jesus (1; 2). (2.) The discourses and actions of John the Baptist preparatory to Christ's public ministry (3;  4:11 ). (3.) The discourses and actions of Christ in Galilee ( 4:12 - 20:16 ). (4.) The sufferings, death and resurrection of our Lord ( 20:17 -28).
HAGABAH|     ha-ga'-ba, hag'-a-ba (chaghabhah, "locust"): Like Hagab, an ancestor of some of the Nethinim who returned from Babylon with Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:45 ); spelled Hagaba in the parallel passage ( Nehemiah 7:48 ).
TERTULLUS|A modification of "Tertius;" a Roman advocate, whom the Jews employed to state their case against Paul in the presence of Felix ( Acts 24:1 -9). The charges he adduced against the apostle were, "First, that he created disturbances among the Romans throughout the empire, an offence against the Roman government (crimen majestatis). Secondly, that he was a ringleader of the sect of the Nazarenes; disturbed the Jews in the exercise of their religion, guaranteed by the state; introduced new gods, a thing prohibited by the Romans. And thirdly, that he attempted to profane the temple, a crime which the Jews were permitted to punish." 
HARSITH|     har'-sith (charcith): One of the gates of Jerusalem ( Jeremiah 19:2  the Revised Version (British and American)); margin suggests "gate of the potsherds"; the King James Version has "east gate" and the King James Version margin "sun gate," both deriving the name from cherec, "sun." The gate opened into the valley of Hinnom.  See  JERUSALEM ;  POTSHERD .
MATRED|     ma'-tred (maTredh, "expulsion"): The mother of Mehetabel, wife of Hadar, one of the kings of Edom ( Genesis 36:39   1 Chronicles 1:50 , "Hadad"). The Septuagint and Peshitta designate Matred as male, i.e. as son of Mezahab instead of daughter.
MIGRON|Precipice or landslip, a place between Aiath and Michmash ( Isaiah 10:28 ). The town of the same name mentioned in  1 Samuel 14:2  was to the south of this. 
KORAH|Ice, hail.  (1.) The third son of Esau, by Aholibamah ( Genesis 36:14 ;  1 Chronicles 1:35 ). (2.) A Levite, the son of Izhar, the brother of Amram, the father of Moses and Aaron ( Exodus 6:21 ). The institution of the Aaronic priesthood and the Levitical service at Sinai was a great religious revolution. The old priesthood of the heads of families passed away. This gave rise to murmurings and discontent, while the Israelites were encamped at Kadesh for the first time, which came to a head in a rebellion against Moses and Aaron, headed by Korah, Dathan, and Abiram. Two hundred and fifty princes, "men of renown" i.e., well-known men from among the other tribes, joined this conspiracy. The whole company demanded of Moses and Aaron that the old state of things should be restored, alleging that "they took too much upon them" ( Numbers 16:1 -3). On the morning after the outbreak, Korah and his associates presented themselves at the door of the tabernacle, and "took every man his censer, and put fire in them, and laid incense thereon." But immediately "fire from the Lord" burst forth and destroyed them all ( Numbers 16:35 ). Dathan and Abiram "came out and stood in the door of their tents, and their wives, and their sons, and their little children," and it came to pass "that the ground clave asunder that was under them; and the earth opened her mouth and swallowed them up." A plague thereafter began among the people who sympathized in the rebellion, and was only stayed by Aaron's appearing between the living and the dead, and making "an atonement for the people" ( 16:47 ). The descendants of the sons of Korah who did not participate in the rebellion afterwards rose to eminence in the Levitical service. 
PARTS|   BACK, BACK   (1) 'achar, ("back side" as in the King James Version): "He led the flock to the back of the wilderness" ( Exodus 3:1 ), i.e. "to the pasture-lands on the other side of the desert from the Midianite encampments."  (2) 'achor, ("hinder part," "the West"): Used of God in an anthropomorphic sense ("Thou shalt see my back,"  Exodus 33:23 ) to signify "the after-glow of the Divine radiance," the faint reflection of God's essential glory. See also  Isaiah 38:17  and compare  1 Kings 14:9  and  Nehemiah 9:26 .  (3) opisthen, ("back side"): "A book written within and on the back" ( Revelation 5:1 ), "but the back of a book is not the same as the reverse side of a roll. John was struck, not only with the fact that the roll was sealed, but also with the amount of writing it contained" (HDB, I, 231). Compare  Ezekiel 2:10 .  M. O. Evans
LABAN|White.  (1.) The son of Bethuel, who was the son of Nahor, Abraham's brother. He lived at Haran in Mesopotamia. His sister Rebekah was Isaac's wife ( Genesis 24 ). Jacob, one of the sons of this marriage, fled to the house of Laban, whose daughters Leah and Rachel (ch. 29) he eventually married. (see  JACOB .) (2.) A city in the Arabian desert in the route of the Israelites ( Deuteronomy 1:1 ), probably identical with Libnah ( Numbers 33:20 ). 
SHAMMAI|     (1) A Jerahmeelite ( 1 Chronicles 2:28, 32 ).  (2) The son of Rekem and father of Maon ( 1 Chronicles 2:44 ).  (3) A Judahite ( 1 Chronicles 4:17 ).
LETTERS|     let'-erz.  See  ALPHABET ;  WRITING .
UNDEFILED|     un-de-fild': In the Old Testament tam, "perfect," presents the positive side. Hence,  Psalm 119:1  is translated in the Revised Version: "Blessed are they that are perfect in the way." In the New Testament amiantos, presents the negative side, "unstained" "unsullied" "without taint." Used to describe the sinlessness of Christ ( Hebrews 7:26 ), to declare the marriage act free from all guilt, disgrace or shame ( Hebrews 13:4 ), to contrast the heavenly inheritance with earthly possessions ( 1 Peter 1:4 ).
SODERING|     sod'-er-ing (debheq): the King James Version in  Isaiah 41:7 , the Revised Version (British and American) "soldering," of smith work.
PRINCIPLES|     prin'-si-p'-lz: Found twice ( Hebrews 5:12 ;  Hebrews 6:1 ). The Greek word (stoicheion) is also translated in the King James Version as "elements" and "rudiments." As rendered in He, its meaning is clearly related to the elementary knowledge of Christian truth or doctrine.  See  ELEMENTS ;  RUDIMENTS .
HETHLON|Wrapped up, a place on the north border of Palestine. The "way of Hethlon" ( Ezek. 47:15 ;  48:1 ) is probably the pass at the end of Lebanon from the Mediterranean to the great plain of Hamath (q.v.), or the "entrance of Hamath." 
SHABBETHAI|Sabbath-born, a Levite who assisted in expounding the law and investigating into the illegal marriages of the Jews ( Ezra 10:15 ;  Nehemiah 8:7 ;  11:16 ). 
NEHUM|     ne'-hum (nechum): One of the twelve heads of the people who returned with Zerubbabel ( Nehemiah 7:7 ). In the parallel passage ( Ezra 2:2 ), the name appears as REHUM (which see), and in 1 Esdras 5:8 as "Roimus."
HAROD|Palpitation, a fountain near which Gideon and his army encamped on the morning of the day when they encountered and routed the Midianites ( Judges 7 ). It was south of the hill Moreh. The present `Ain Jalud ("Goliath's Fountain"), south of Jezreel and nearly opposite Shunem, is probably the fountain here referred to ( 7:4 ,  5). 
TALMAI|Abounding in furrows.  (1.) One of the Anakim of Hebron, who were slain by the men of Judah under Caleb ( Numbers 13:22 ;  Joshua 15:14 ;  Judges 1:10 ). (2.) A king of Geshur, to whom Absalom fled after he had put Amnon to death ( 2 Samuel 3:3 ;  13:37 ). His daughter, Maachah, was one of David's wives, and the mother of Absalom ( 1 Chronicles 3:2 ). 
URIAS|    (1)  u-ri'-as (Oureias; Codex Vaticanus (b) Ouria; Codex Alexandrinus Ouri; the King James Version Iri):  (1) The father of Marmoth (1 Esdras 8:62) = "Uriah" of  Ezra 8:33 , and perhaps identical with (2).  (2) Codex Vaticanus (b) and Codex Alexandrinus, Oureias, Ourias = one of those who stood on Ezra's right hand as he read the Law (1 Esdras 9:43) = "Uriah" of  Nehemiah 8:4 .  URIAS (2)  (Ourias): the King James Version; Greek form of "Uriah" (thus the Revised Version (British and American)). The husband of Bath-sheba ( Matthew 1:6 ).
SUBTIL|   ; SUBTLE; SUBTLETY; SUBTILTY  sub'-til, sut'-'-l, sut'-'-l-ti (chakham, nakhal, mirmah; dolos): These words are used  (1) in a good sense:  2 Samuel 13:3 , chakham, "wise," "Jonadab was a very subtle (the American Standard Revised Version "subtle") man" (discreet);  Proverbs 1:4 , `ormah, "prudence," "to give subtlety to the simple," the American Standard Revised Version and the English Revised Version margin "prudence"; The Wisdom of Solomon 7:22, leptos, "thin," said of the spirit in Wisdom (very fine or refined); 8:8, strophe, "winding," "subtilties of speeches"; Ecclesiasticus 39:2, "subtil parables," the Revised Version (British and American) "the subtleties of parables";  (2) in a bad sense:  Genesis 3:1 , `arum, "crafty," "Now the serpent was more subtle than any beast of the field," the American Standard Revised Version "subtle."    Genesis 27:35 , mirmah, "deceit," "fraud," "Thy brother came with subtlety," the Revised Version (British and American) "with guile";  Psalm 105:25 , nakhal, "to deceive," the King James Version "deal subtlely," the American Standard Revised Version "subtly";  Proverbs 7:10 , natsar, "to watch," "guard," "to be hidden or subtle of heart," the Revised Version (British and American) "wily," margin " `close,' Hebrew `guarded' ";  2 Kings 10:19 , `oqebhah, "deceit" or "treachery" (here only); Judith 5:11, katasophizo, "to use subtlety"; Ecclesiasticus 19:25, panourgia, "cunning," "unscrupulousness," "There is an exquisite subtlety, and the same is unjust";  2 Corinthians 11:3 , "The serpent beguiled Eve through his subtlety," the Revised Version (British and American) "in his craftiness";  Matthew 26:4 , dolos, "deceit," "that they might take Jesus by subtlety, and kill him";  Acts 13:10 , "O full of all subtlety and all mischief," the Revised Version (British and American) "all guile and all villany."  English Revised Version has "subtilty" for "wisdom" ( Proverbs 8:5, 12 ), margin and the American Standard Revised Version, "prudence"; for "with subtlety" (the English Revised Version  Mark 14:1 , the King James Version "by craft") the American Standard Revised Version has "with subtlety."  W. L. Walker
BEON|     be'-on ( Numbers 32:3 ).  See  BAAL-MEON .
BAASHA|Bravery, the third king of the separate kingdom of Israel, and founder of its second dynasty ( 1 Kings 15 ; 16;  2 Chronicles 16:1 -6). He was the son of Ahijah of the tribe of Issachar. The city of Tirzah he made the capital of his kingdom, and there he was buried, after an eventful reign of twenty-four years ( 1 Kings 15:33 ). On account of his idolatries his family was exterminated, according to the word of the prophet Jehu ( 1 Kings 16:3 ,  4,  10-13). 
MANDRAKES|Hebrew dudaim; i.e., "love-plants", occurs only in  Genesis 30:14 -16 and Cant. 7:13. Many interpretations have been given of this word dudaim. It has been rendered "violets," "Lilies," "jasmines," "truffles or mushrooms," "flowers," the "citron," etc. The weight of authority is in favour of its being regarded as the Mandragora officinalis of botanists, "a near relative of the night-shades, the `apple of Sodom' and the potato plant." It possesses stimulating and narcotic properties ( Genesis 30:14 -16). The fruit of this plant resembles the potato-apple in size, and is of a pale orange colour. It has been called the "love-apple." The Arabs call it "Satan's apple." It still grows near Jerusalem, and in other parts of Palestine. 
GARDENS|Mentioned in Scripture, of Eden ( Genesis 2:8 ,  9); Ahab's garden of herbs ( 1 Kings 21:2 ); the royal garden ( 2 Kings 21:18 ); the royal garden at Susa ( Esther 1:5 ); the garden of Joseph of Arimathea ( John 19:41 ); of Gethsemane ( John 18:1 ). The "king's garden" mentioned  2 Kings 25:4 ,  Nehemiah 3:15 , was near the Pool of Siloam. Gardens were surrounded by hedges of thorns ( Isaiah 5:5 ) or by walls of stone ( Proverbs 24:31 ). "Watch-towers" or "lodges" were also built in them ( Isaiah 1:8 ;  Mark 12:1 ), in which their keepers sat. On account of their retirement they were frequently used as places for secret prayer and communion with God ( Genesis 24:63 ;  Matthew 26:30 -36;  John 1:48 ;  18:1 ,  2). The dead were sometimes buried in gardens ( Genesis 23:19 ,  20;  2 Kings 21:18 ,  26;  1 Samuel 25:1 ;  Mark 15:46 ;  John 19:41 ). (see  PARADISE .) 
ZAHAM|     za'-ham (zaham, meaning uncertain; Septuagint Codex Alexandrinus Zalam, Codex Vaticanus Rhoollam): A son of King Rehoboam ( 2 Chronicles 11:19 ).
SHAPHAM|     sha'-fam (shapham; Sapham, Sabat): Name of a Gadite chief, who had the second place in command of his tribe ( 1 Chronicles 5:12 ). So far as the fragmentary genealogies are intelligible, they seem to indicate that Shapham and his chief, Joel, lived in the time of Saul and shared in the war against the Hagrites ( 1 Chronicles 5:7-10, 18-22 ), but it is to be noted that these lists were first recorded between the years 750 and 740 B.C., just before the eastern tribes were carried into captivity.
MISHMA|Hearing.  (1.) One of the sons of Ishmael ( Genesis 25:14 ), and founder of an Arab tribe. (2.) A Simeonite ( 1 Chronicles 4:25 ,  26). 
HASHMONAH|Fatness, the thirtieth halting-place of the Israelites during their wanderings in the wilderness, not far from Mount Hor ( Numbers 33:29 ,  30). 
TERESH|Severe, a eunuch or chamberlain in the palace of Ahasuerus, who conspired with another to murder him. The plot was detected by Mordecai, and the conspirators were put to death ( Esther 2:21 ;  6:2 ). 
ELIASAPH|     e-li'-a-saf ('elyacaph, "God has added"):  (1) Son of Deuel; prince of the tribe of Gad in the Exodus ( Numbers 1:14 ;  Numbers 2:14 ;  Numbers 7:42, 47 ; 10:20).  (2) Son of Lael; prince of the Gershonites ( Numbers 3:24 ).
SHEARJASHUB|A remnant shall escape or return (i.e.,  to God), a symbolical name which the prophet Isaiah gave to his son ( Isaiah 7:3 ), perhaps his eldest son. 
JERUBBESHETH|Contender with the shame; i.e., idol, a surname also of Gideon ( 2 Samuel 11:21 ). 
DISHAN|Antelope, the youngest son of Seir the Horite, head of one of the tribes of Idumaea ( Genesis 36:21 ,  28,  30). 
TOBIAH|Pleasing to Jehovah, the "servant," the "Ammonite," who joined with those who opposed the rebuilding of Jerusalem after the Exile ( Nehemiah 2:10 ). He was a man of great influence, which he exerted in opposition to the Jews, and "sent letters" to Nehemiah "to put him in fear" ( Nehemiah 6:17 -19). "Eliashib the priest" prepared for him during Nehemiah's absence "a chamber in the courts of the house of God," which on his return grieved Nehemiah sore, and therefore he "cast forth all the household stuff of Tobiah out of the chamber" ( 13:7 ,  8). 
SERGEANTS|Acts 16:35, 38 (R.V.,  "lictors"), officers who attended the magistrates and assisted them in the execution of justice. 
TORCHES|On the night of his betrayal, when our Lord was in the garden of Gethsemane, Judas, "having received a band of men and officers from the chief priests and Pharisees, cometh thither with lanterns and torches and weapons" ( John 18:1 -3). Although it was the time of full moon, yet in the valley of the Kidron "there fell great, deep shadows from the declivity of the mountain and projecting rocks; there were there caverns and grottos, into which a fugitive might retreat; finally, there were probably a garden-house and tower, into whose gloom it might be necessary for a searcher to throw light around." Lange's Commentary. ( Nahum 2:3 ,  "torches, " Revised Version,  "steel, " probably should be "scythes" for war-chariots.) 
OBEDEDOM|Servant of Edom.  (1.) "The Gittite" (probably so called because he was a native of Gath-rimmon), a Levite of the family of the Korhites ( 1 Chronicles 26:1 ,  4-8), to whom was specially intrusted the custody of the ark ( 1 Chronicles 15:18 ). When David was bringing up the ark "from the house of Abinadab, that was in Gibeah" (probably some hill or eminence near Kirjath-jearim), and had reached Nachon's threshing-floor, he became afraid because of the "breach upon Uzzah," and carried it aside into the house of Obededom ( 2 Samuel 6:1 -12). There it remained for six months, and was to him and his house the occasion of great blessing. David then removed it with great rejoicing to Jerusalem, and set it in the midst of the tabernacle he had pitched for it. (2.) A Merarite Levite, a temple porter, who with his eight sons guarded the southern gate ( 1 Chronicles 15:18 ,  21;  26:4 ,  8,  15). (3.) One who had charge of the temple treasures ( 2 Chronicles 25:24 ). 
MELECH|King, the second of Micah's four sons ( 1 Chronicles 8:35 ), and thus grandson of Mephibosheth. 
ZACHARIAS| (1.) A priest of the course of Abia, the eighth of the twenty-four courses into which the priests had been originally divided by David ( 1 Chronicles 23:1 -19). Only four of these courses or "families" of the priests returned from the Exile ( Ezra 2:36 -39); but they were then re-distributed under the old designations. The priests served at the temple twice each year, and only for a week each time. Zacharias's time had come for this service. During this period his home would be one of the chambers set apart for the priests on the sides of the temple ground. The offering of incense was one of the most solemn parts of the daily worship of the temple, and lots were drawn each day to determine who should have this great honour, an honour which no priest could enjoy more than once during his lifetime. While Zacharias ministered at the golden altar of incense in the holy place, it was announced to him by the angel Gabriel that his wife Elisabeth, who was also of a priestly family, now stricken in years, would give birth to a son who was to be called John, and that he would be the forerunner of the long-expected Messiah ( Luke 1:12 -17). As a punishment for his refusing to believe this message, he was struck dumb and "not able to speak until the day that these things should be performed" (20). Nine months passed away, and Elisabeth's child was born, and when in answer to their inquiry Zacharias wrote on a "writing tablet," "His name is John," his mouth was opened, and he praised God (60-79). The child (John the Baptist), thus "born out of due time," "waxed strong in spirit" ( 1:80 ). (2.) The "son of Barachias," mentioned as having been slain between the temple and the altar ( Matthew 23:35 ;  Luke 11:51 ). "Barachias" here may be another name for Jehoiada, as some think. (see  ZECHARIAH .) 
NICOLAITANES|The church at Ephesus ( Revelation 2:6 ) is commended for hating the "deeds" of the Nicolaitanes, and the church of Pergamos is blamed for having them who hold their "doctrines" (15). They were seemingly a class of professing Christians, who sought to introduce into the church a false freedom or licentiousness, thus abusing Paul's doctrine of grace (Comp.  2 Peter 2:15 ,  16,  19), and were probably identical with those who held the doctrine of Baalam (q.v.),  Revelation 2:14 . 
ENSHEMESH|Fountain of the sun a spring which formed one of the landmarks on the boundary between Judah and Benjamin ( Joshua 15:7 ;  18:17 ). It was between the "ascent of Adummim" and the spring of En-rogel, and hence was on the east of Jerusalem and of the Mount of Olives. It is the modern `Ain-Haud i.e., the "well of the apostles" about a mile east of Bethany, the only spring on the road to Jericho. The sun shines on it the whole day long. 
SIA|   ; SIAHA  si'-a, si'-a-ha (ci'a'): One of the remnant which returned from captivity ( Nehemiah 7:47   Ezra 2:44 ).T+>shuthalchi): A son of Ephraim ( Numbers 26:35, 36 ; compare  1 Chronicles 7:20, 21 ), and his descendants.
TABLETS|   TELL EL-AMARNA;   tel-el-a-mar'-na,  I. INTRODUCTION  1. Name  2. Discovery  3. Physical Character  II. EPIGRAPHICAL VALUE  1. Peculiar Cuneiform Script  2. Method of Writing Proper Names  III. PHILOLOGICAL VALUE  1. Knowledge of Amorite, Hittite and Mitannian Tongues  2. Persistence of Canaanite Names to the Present Time  3. Verification of Biblical Statements concerning "the Language of Canaan"  IV. GEOGRAPHICAL VALUE  1. Political and Ethnological Lines and Locations  2. Verification of Biblical and Egyptian Geographical Notices  3. Confirmation of General Evidential Value of Ancient Geographical Notes of Bible Lands  V. HISTORICAL VALUE  1. Revolutionary Change of Opinion concerning Canaanite Civilization in Patriarchal Times  2. Anomalous Historical Situation Revealed by Use of Cuneiform Script  3. Extensive Diplomatic Correspondence of the Age  4. Unsolved Problem of the Habiri  LITERATURE  A collection of about 350 inscribed clay tablets from Egypt, but written in the cuneiform writing, being part of the royal archives of Amenophis III and Amenophis IV; kings of the XVIIIth Egyptian Dynasty about 1480 to 1460 B.C. Some of the tablets are broken and there is a little uncertainty concerning the exact number of separate letters. 81 are in the British Museum = BM; 160 in the New Babylonian and Assyrian Museum, Berlin= B; 60 in the Cairo Museum = C; 20 at Oxford = O; the remainder, 20 or more, are in other museums or in private collections.  I. Introduction.  1. Name:  The name, Tell el-Armarna, "the hill Amarna," is the modern name of ancient ruins about midway between Memphis and Luxor in Egypt. The ruins mark the site of the ancient city Khut Aten, which Amenophis IV built in order to escape the predominant influence of the old religion of Egypt represented by the priesthood at Thebes, and to establish a new cult, the worship of Aten, the sun's disk.  2. Discovery:  In 1887 a peasant woman, digging in the ruins of Tell el-Amarna for the dust of ancient buildings with which to fertilize her garden, found tablets, a portion of the royal archives. She filled her basket with tablets and went home. How many she had already pulverized and grown into leeks and cucumbers and melons will never be known. This time someone's curiosity was aroused, and a native dealer secured the tablets. Knowledge of the "find" reached Chauncey Murch, D.D., an American missionary stationed at Luxor, who, suspecting the importance of the tablets, called the attention of cuneiform scholars to them. Then began a short but intense and bitter contest between representatives of various museums on the one hand, eager for scientific material, and native dealers, on the other hand, rapacious at the prospect of the fabulous price the curious tablets might bring. The contest resulted in the destruction of some of the tablets by ignorant natives and the final distribution of the remainder and of the broken fragments, as noted at the beginning of this article. (see also Budge, History of Egypt, IV, 186). After the discovery of the tablets the site of the ancient city was excavated by Professor Petrie in 1891-92 (Tell el-Amarna; compare also Baedeker, Egypt).  3. Physical Character:  The physical character of the tablets is worthy of some notice. They are clay tablets. Nearly all are brick tablets, i.e. rectangular, flat tablets varying in size from 2 X 2 1/2 in. to 3 1/2 X 9 inches, inscribed on both sides and sometimes upon the edges. One tablet is of a convex form (B 1601). The clay used in the tablets also varies much. The tablets of the royal correspondence from Babylonia and one tablet from Mitanni (B 153) are of fine Babylonian clay. The Syrian and Palestinian correspondence is in one or two instances of clay which was probably imported from Babylonia for correspondence, but for the most part these tablets are upon the clay of the country and they show decided differences among themselves in color and texture: in some instances the clay is sandy and decidedly inferior. A number of tablets have red points, a kind of punctuation for marking the separation into words, probably inserted by the Egyptian translator of the letters at the court of the Pharaoh. These points were for the purpose of assisting in the reading. They do now assist the reading very much. Some tablets also show the hieroglyphic marks which the Egyptian scribe put on them when filing them among the archives. The writing also is varied. Some of the tablets from Palestine (B 328, 330, 331) are crudely written. Others of the letters, as in the royal correspondence from Babylonia, are beautifully written. These latter (B 149-52) seem to have been written in a totally different way from the others; those from Western Asia appear to have been written with the stylus held as we commonly hold a pen, but the royal letters from Babylonia were written by turning the point of the stylus to the left and the other end to the right over the second joint of the first finger.  The results of the discovery of the Tell el-Amarna Letters have been far-reaching, and there are indications of still other benefits which may yet accrue from them. The discovery of them shares with the discovery of the Code of Hammurabi the distinction of the first place among Biblical discoveries of the past half-century.  II. Epigraphical Value  1.Peculiar Cuneiform Script:  The peculiar use of the cuneiform method of writing in these tablets in order to adapt it to the requirements of a strange land having a native tongue, and the demands made upon it for the representation of proper names of a foreign tongue, have already furnished the basis for the opinion that the same cuneiform method of writing was employed originally in other documents, especially some portions of the Bible and much material for Egyptian governmental reports. It is not improbable that by means of such data furnished by the tablets definite clues may be obtained to the method of writing, and by that also approximately the time of the composition, of the literary sources that were drawn upon in the composition of the Pentateuch, and even of the Pentateuch itself (compare especially Naville, Archaeology of the Bible).  2. Method of Writing Proper Names:  Most of the letters were probably written by Egyptian officers or, more frequently, by scribes in the employ of native appointees of the Egyptian government. The writing of so many proper names by these scribes in the cuneiform script has thrown a flood of light upon the spelling of Canaanite names by Egyptian scribes in the hieroglyphic inscriptions of Egypt. It is evident now that certainly some, perhaps most, of these scribes worked from cuneiform lists (Muller, Egyptological Researches, 1906, 40). As the system of representation of Palestinian names by Egyptian scribes becomes thus better understood, the identification of more and more of the places in Palestine named in the Egyptian inscriptions becomes possible. Every such identification makes more nearly perfect the identification of Biblical places, the first and most important item in historical evidence.  III. Philologlcal Value.  1. Knowledge of Amorite, Hittite and Mitannian Tongues:  No other literary discovery, indeed, not all the others together, have afforded so much light upon philological problems in patriarchal Palestine as the Tell el-Amarna Letters. Something is now really definitely known of "the language of Canaan," the speech of the people of patriarchal days in Palestine. The remarkable persistence of old Canaanite words and names and forms of speech of these tablets down to the present time makes it plain that the peasant speech of today is the lineal descendant of that of Abraham's day. The letters are in the Babylonian tongue modified by contact with the speech of the country, a kind of early Aramaic (Conder, The Tell Amarna Tablets, X; Dhorme, "La langue de Canaan," Revue Biblique, Juillet, 1913, 369). There are also frequent Canaanite words inserted as glosses to explain the Babylonian words (Dhorme, op. cit.).  2. Persistence of Canaanite Names to the Present Time: The facts evinced by the persistence of the early Canaanite speech (compare 1, above) down through all the centuries to the peasant speech of Palestine of today furnishes a verification of the Biblical reference to the "language of Canaan" (lsa 19:18). That peasant speech is, as it manifestly has always been since patriarchal times, a Semitic tongue. Now, even so adventurous a work as a grammar of the ancient Canaanite language has been attempted, based almost entirely upon the material furnished by the Tell el-Amarna Letters (Dhorme, op. cit.), in which the speech of Palestine in patriarchal days is described as "ancient Canaanite or Hebrew."  3. Verification of Biblical Statements concerning "the Language of Canaan":  Some more specific knowledge is also supplied by the Tell el-Amarna Letters concerning the Amorite language through the many Amorite names and the occasional explanations given in Amorite words (compare especially the 50 letters of Ribadda), and some knowledge of Hittite (Letter of Tarkhundara; Conder, The Tell Amarna Tablets, 225), concerning the Mitannian tongue (B 153, 190, 191, 233). One other tablet (B 342) is in an unknown tongue.  IV. Geographical Value.  1. Political and Ethnological Lines and Locations  There was a very wide international horizon in the days of the correspondence contained in the Tell el-Amarna Letters, a horizon that enclosed Egypt, Babylonia, Canaan, Mitanni and the land of the Hittites; but the more definite geographical information supplied by the tablets is limited almost entirely to the great Syrian and Canaanite coast land. There is difference of opinion concerning the identification of a few of the places mentioned, but about 90 have been identified with reasonable certainty.  2. Verification of Biblical and Egyptian Geographical Notices  It is possible now to trace the course of the military operations mentioned in the Tell el-Amarna Letters with almost as much satisfaction as the course of a modern military campaign, and there is much verification also of Biblical and Egyptian geographical notices.  3. Confirmation of General Evidential Value of Ancient Geographical Notes of Bible Lands  The identification of such a large number of places and the ability thus given to trace the course of historical movements in that remote age are a remarkable testimony to the historical value of ancient records of that part of the world, for accuracy concerning place is of first importance in historical records.  V. Historical Value.  The Tell el-Amarna Letters furnish an amount of historical material about equal in bulk to one-half of the Pentateuch. While much of this bears more particularly upon general history of the ancient Orient, there is scarcely any part of it which does not directly or indirectly supply information which parallels some phase of Biblical history. It is not certain that any individual mentioned in the Bible is mentioned in these tablets, yet it is possible, many think it well established, that many of the persons and events of the conquest period are mentioned (compare 4 (1), below). There is also much that reflects the civilization of times still imperfectly understood, reveals historical events hitherto unknown, or but little known, and gives many sidelights upon the movements of nations and peoples of whom there is something said in the Bible.  1. Revolutionary Change of Opinion concerning Canaanite Civilization in Patriarchal Times  A revolutionary change of opinion concerning the civilization of patriarchal Palestine has taken place. It was formerly the view of all classes of scholars, from the most conservative, on the one hand, to the most radical, on the other, that there was a very crude state of civilization in Palestine in the patriarchal age, and this entirely independent of, and indeed prior to, any demand made by the evolutionary theory of Israel's history. Abraham was pictured as a pioneer from a land of culture to a distant dark place in the world, and his descendants down to the descent into Egypt were thought to have battled with semi-barbarous conditions, and to have returned to conquer such a land and bring civilization into it. All this opinion is now changed, primarily by the information contained in the Tell el-Amarna Letters and secondarily by incidental hints from Egyptian and Babylonian inscriptions now seen to support the high stage of civilization revealed in the Tell el-Amarna Letters (see ARCHAEOLOGY AND CRITICISM). The tablets make mention of " `capital cities,' `provincial cities,' `fortresses,' `towns,' and `villages' with `camps' and Hazors (or enclosures); while irrigation of gardens is also noticed, and the papyrus grown at Gebal, as well as copper, tin, gold, silver, agate, money (not, of course, coins) and precious objects of many kinds, mulberries, olives, corn, ships and chariots" (Conder, op. cit., 4).  The account of a bride's marriage portion from Mitanni reveals conditions farther north: "Two horses, and a chariot plated with gold and silver, and adorned with precious stones. The harness of the horses was adorned in like manner. Two camel litters appear to be next noticed, and apparently variegated garments worked with gold, and embroidered zones and shawls. These are followed by lists of precious stones, and a horse's saddle adorned with gold eagles. A necklace of solid gold and gems, a bracelet of iron gilt, an anklet of solid gold, and other gold objects follow; and apparently cloths, and silver objects, and vases of copper or bronze. An object of jade or jasper and leaves of gold..... Five gems of `stone of the great light' (probably diamonds) follow, with ornaments for the head and feet, and a number of bronze objects and harness for chariots" (ibid., 188-89). The record of Thothmes III concerning booty brought from Palestine fully confirms this representation of the tablets (Birch, Records of the Past, 1st ser., II, 35-52; compare Sayce, Archaeology of the Cuneiform Inscriptions, 156-57).  The Babylonian inscriptions show that Abraham was a part of an emigration movement from the homeland to a frontier province, having the same laws and much of the same culture (Lyon, American Oriental Society Journal, XXV, 254; Barton, American Philosophical Proceedings, LII, number 209, April, 1913, 197; Kyle, Deciding Voice of the Monuments in Biblical Criticism, chapter xv). The Egyptian sculptured pictures make clear that the civilization of Palestine in patriarchal times was fully equal to that of Egypt (compare Petrie, Deshasheh, plural IV).  That these things of elegance and skill are not merely the trappings of "barbaric splendor" is manifest from the revelation which the Tell el-Amarna Letters make of ethnic movements and of influences at work from the great nations on either side of Canaan, making it impossible that the land could have been, at that period, other than a place of advanced civilization. Nearly all the tablets furnish most unequivocal evidence that Egypt had imperial rule over the land through a provincial government which was at the time falling into decay, while the cuneiform method of writing used in the tablets by such a variety of persons, in such high and low estate, implying thus long-established literary culture and a general diffusion of the knowledge of a most difficult system of writing, makes it clear that the civilization of Babylonia had been well established before the political power of Egypt came to displace that of Babylonia.  2. Anomalous Historical Situation Revealed by Use of Cuneiform Script  The displacement of Babylonian political power in Palestine just mentioned (1, above) points at once to a most remarkable historical situation revealed by the Tell el-Amarna Letters, i.e. official Egyptian correspondence between the out-lying province of Canaan and the imperial government at home, carried on, not in the language and script of Egypt, but in the script of Babylonia and in a language that is a modified Babylonian. This marks one step in the great, age-long conflict between the East and the West, between Babylonia and Egypt, with Canaan as the football of empires. It reveals-what the Babylonian inscriptions confirm-the long-preceding occupation of Canaan by Babylonia, continuing down to the beginning of patriarchal times, which had so given Canaan a Babylonian stamp that the subsequent political occupation of the land by Egypt under Thothmes III had not yet been able to efface the old stamp or give a new impression.  3. Extensive Diplomatic Correspondence of the Age  The extensive diplomatic correspondence between nations so widely separated as Egypt on the West, and Babylonia on the East, Mitanni on the North, and the Hittite country on the Northwest, is also shown by the Tell el-Amarna Letters. In addition to the large number of letters between Canaan and Egypt, there are quite a number of these royal tablets: letters from Kadashman Bell, or Kallima-Sin (BM 29784), and Burna-burias of Babylonia (B 149-52), Assur-uballidh of Assyria and Dusratta of Mitanni (B 150, 191-92, 233), etc. There seems at first sight a little pettiness about this international correspondence that is almost childish, since so much of it is occupied with the marriage of princesses and the payment of dowers, and the exchange of international gifts and privileges (Budge, History of Egypt, IV, 189-90). But one might be surprised at the amount of such things in the private correspondence of kings of the present day, if access to it could be gained. The grasping selfishness also revealed in these tablets by the constant cry for gold is, after all, but a less diplomatic and more frank expression of the commercial haggling between nations of today for advantages and concessions.  4. Unsolved Problem of the Habiri  The subject of greatest historical interest in Biblical matters presented by the Tell el-Amarna Letters is the great, unsolved problem of the Habiri. Unsolved it is, for while every writer on the subject has a very decided opinion of his own, all must admit that a problem is not solved upon which there is such wide and radical difference of opinion among capable scholars, and that not running along easy lines of cleavage, but dividing indiscriminately all classes of scholars.  (1) One view very early advanced and still strongly held by some (Conder, op. cit., 138-44) is that Habiri is to be read `Abiri, and means the Hebrews. It is pointed out that the letters referring to these people are from Central and Southern Palestine, that the Habiri had some relation with Mt. Seir, that they are represented as contemporaneous with Japhia king of Gezer, Jabin king of Hazor, and probably Adonizedek king of Jerusalem, contemporaries of Joshua, and that certain incidental movements of Israel and of the people of Palestine mentioned in the Bible are also mentioned or assumed in the tablets (Conder, op. cit., 139-51). In reply to these arguments for the identification of the Habiri with the Hebrews under Joshua, it may be noted that, although the letters which speak of the Habiri are all from Central or Southern Palestine, they belong to very nearly the same time as the very numerous letters concerning the extensive wars in the North. The distinct separation of the one set of letters from the other is rather arbitrary and so creates an appearance which has little or no existence in fact. Probably these southern letters refer to the same disturbances spreading from the North toward the South, which is fatal to theory that the Habiri are the Hebrews under Joshua, for these latter came in from the Southeast. The reference to Seir is obscure and seems rather to locate that place in the direction of Carmel (Conder, op. cit., 145). The mention of Japhia king of Gezer, and Jabin king of Hazor, does not signify much, for these names may be titles, or there may have been many kings, in sequence, of the same name. Concerning Adonizedek, it is diffcult to believe that this reading of the name of the king of Jerusalem would ever have been thought of, except for the desire to identify the Habiri with the Hebrews under Joshua. This name Adonizedek is only made out, with much uncertainty, by the unusual method of translating the king's name instead of transliterating it. If the name was Adonizedek, why did not the scribe write it so, instead of translating it for the Pharaoh into an entirely different name because of its meaning? The seeming correspondences between the letters and the account of the conquest in the Bible lose much of their significance when the greater probabilities raised in the names and the course of the wars are taken away.  (2) Against the view that the Habiri were the Hebrews of the Bible may be cited not only these discrepancies in the evidence presented for that view (compare (1), above), but also the very strong evidence from Egypt that the Exodus took place in the Ramesside dynasties, thus not earlier than the XIXth Dynasty and probably under Merenptah, the successor of Rameses II. The name Rameses for one of the store cities could hardly have occurred before the Ramesside kings. The positive declaration of Rameses II: "I built Pithom," against which there is no evidence whatever, and the coincidence between the Israel tablet of Merenptah (Petrie, Six Temples at Thebes, 28, pls. XIII-XIV) and the Biblical record of the Exodus, which makes the 5th year under Merenptah to be the 5th year of Moses' leadership (see MOSES), make it very difficult, indeed seemingly impossible, to accept the Habiri as the Hebrews of the conquest.  (3) Another view concerning the Habiri, strongly urged by some (Sayce, The Higher Criticism and the Verdict of the Monuments, 175;), is that they are Habiri, not `Abiri, and that the name means "confederates," and was not a personal or tribal name at all. The certainty that there was, just a little before this time, an alliance in conspiracy among the Amorites and others, as revealed in the tablets for the region farther north, gives much color to this view. This opinion also relieves the chronological difficulties which beset the view that the Habiri were the Biblical Hebrews (compare (2), above), but it is contended that this reading does violence to the text.  (4) Another most ingenious view is advanced by Jeremias (The Old Testament in the Light of the Ancient East, 341), that the name is Habiri, that "the name answers to the sounds of `Hebrews,' and that the names are identical," but that this name in the Tell el-Amarna Letters is not a proper name at all, but a descriptive word, as when we read of "Abraham the Hebrew," i.e. the "stranger" or "immigrant." Thus Habiri would be "Hebrews," i.e. "strangers" or "immigrants" (see HEBERITES; HEBREW), but the later question of the identification of these with the Hebrews of the Bible is still an open question.  (5) It may be that the final solution of the problem presented by the Habiri will be found in the direction indicated by combining the view that sees in them only "strangers" with the view that sees them to be "confederates." There were undoubtedly "confederates" in conspiracy against Egypt in the time of the Tell el-Amarna Letters. The government of Egypt did not come successfully to the relief of the beleaguered province, but weakly yielded. During the time between the writing of the tablets and the days of Merenptah and the building of Pithom no great strong government from either Egypt or Babylonia or the North was established in Palestine. At the time of the conquest there is constant reference made to "the Hittites and the Amorites and the Perizzites," etc. Why are they so constantly mentioned as a group, unless they were in some sense "confederates"? It is not impossible, indeed it is probable, that these Hittites and Amorites and Perizzites, etc., Palestinian tribes having some kind of loose confederacy in the days of the conquest, represent the last state of the confederates," the conspirators, who began operations in the Amorite war against the imperial Egyptian government recorded in the Tell el-Amarna Letters, and, in the correspondence from the South, were called in those days Habiri, i.e. "strangers" or "immigrants." For the final decision on the problem of the Habiri and the full elucidation of many things in the Tell el-Amarna Letters we must await further study of the tablets by expert cuneiform scholars, and especially further discovery in contemporary history.  The Jerusalem letters of the southern correspondence present something of much importance which does not bear at all upon the problem of the Habiri. The frequently recurring title of the king of Jerusalem, "It was not my father, it was not my mother, who established me in this position" (Budge, History of Egypt, IV, 231-35), seems to throw light upon the strange description given of MELCHIZEDEK (which see), the king of Jerusalem in the days of Abraham. The meaning here clearly is that the crown was not hereditary, but went by appointment, the Pharaoh of Egypt having the appointing power. Thus the king as such had no ancestor and no descendant, thus furnishing the peculiar characteristics made use of to describe the character of the Messiah's priesthood in the Epistle to the Hebrews (7:3).  LITERATURE.  Conder, The Tell Amarna Tablets; Knudtzon, Die El-Amarna-Tafeln, in Heinrich's Vorderasiatische Bibliothek, II; Petrie, Tell el Amarna Tablets; idem, Syria and Egypt from the Tell el Amarna Letters; idem, Hist of Egypt; Jeremias, The Old Testament in the Light of the Ancient East.  M. G. Kyle
SHOBEK|     sho'-bek (shobheq; Sobek): One of those who sealed the covenant under Nehemiah after the Babylonian captivity ( Nehemiah 10:24 ).
ROMAMTIEZER|Elevation of help, one of the sons of Heman, "the king's seer in the words of God, to lift up the horn." He was head of the "four-and-twentieth" course of singers ( 1 Chronicles 25:4 ,  31). 
MIZPEH|   MIZPAH;   miz'-pa, miz'-pe: This name is pointed both ways in the Hebrew, and is found usually with the article. The meaning seems to be "outlook" or "watchtower." It is natural, therefore, to look for the places so named in high positions commanding wide prospects.  (1) (ha-mitspah ( Genesis 31:49   Judges 11:11, 34 ), mitspah ( Hosea 5:1 ), mitspeh ghil`adh ( Judges 11:29 ); Massepha, ten skopian, and other forms): It seems probable that the same place is intended in all these passages, and that it is identical with Ramath-mizpeh of  Joshua 13:26 . It is the place where Jacob and Laban parted in Mt. Gilead; consequently it lay to the North of Mahanaim. Here was the home of Jephthah, to which he returned after the defeat of the Aremonites, only to realize how his rash vow had brought desolation to his house. It was taken by Judas Maccabeus, who destroyed the inhabitants and burned the city (1 Maccabees 5:35). Jerash, and Kal`at er-Rabad; but these seem all to lie South of any possible site for Mahanaim. A ruined site was discovered by Dr. Schumacher (M und NPDV, 1897, 86), with the name Macfa, which is just the Arabic equivalent of the Hebrew Mitspah. It lies some distance to the Northwest of Jerash and claims consideration in any attempt to fix the site of Mizpah.  (2) ('erets ha-mitspah ( Joshua 11:3 ), biq`ath mitspeh (verse 8); Masseuman, Massephath, and other forms): The "land of Mizpah" and the "valley of Mizpah" may be taken as applying to the same district. It lay on the southwest slopes of Hermon Northeast of the Waters of Merom. The site must be looked for on one of the heights in the region indicated, from which a wide view is obtained. MuTallah, a Druze village standing on a hill to the North of `Abil and East of Nahr el-Chasbany, was suggested by Robinson. The present writer agrees with Buhl (GAP, 240) that the ancient castle above Banias, Kal`at ec-Cubeibeh, occupies a more likely position.  (3) (mitspeh; Maspha): A town in the Shephelah of Judah named with Dilan, Joktheel and Lachish (Tell el-Hesy). Eusebius, Onomasticon mentions a Macfa in the neighborhood of Eleutheropolis, to the North. The identification proposed by Van de Velde and Guerin would suit this description. They would locate Mizeph at Tell ec-Cafiyeh, about 7 1/2 miles Northwest of Beit Jibrin, "a conspicuous hill with a glittering white cliff rising like an isolated block above the adjacent country" (PEFS, 1903, 276). Many identify this site with Gath, but the name and character of the place point rather to identification with Mizpeh, the Blanche Guarde or Alba Specula of the Middle Ages.  (4) (ha-mitspah; Massema, Maspha): A town in the territory of Benjamin ( Joshua 18:26 ). Hither came the men of Israel to deal with the Benjamites after the outrage on the Levite's concubine ( Judges 20:1, 3 ;  Judges 21:1, 5, 8 ). At Mizpah, Samuel gathered his countrymen. While there crying to God in their distress, they were attacked by the Philistines, whom they defeated with great slaughter ( 1 Samuel 7:5 , etc.). Here also Saul, the son of Kish, was chosen king, after which Samuel told the people the "manner of the kingdom" (10:17, etc.). Mizpah was fortified by Asa, king of Judah, with materials which Baasha, king of Israel, had used to fortify Ramah ( 1 Kings 15:22   2 Chronicles 16:6 ). When Nebuchadnezzar captured Jerusalem and made Gedaliah, the son of Ahikam, governor of the remnant of the people left in the land of Judah, the governor's residence was fixed at Mizpah ( 2 Kings 25:23 ). Here he was joined by Jeremiah, whom Nebuzaradan, captain of the Babylonian guard, had set free. At Mizpah, Ishmael, son of Nathaiah, treacherously slew Gedaliah and many who were with him. Two days later he murdered a company of pilgrims, throwing their dead bodies into the great cistern which Asa had made when strengthening the place against possible attack by Baasha of Samaria. He then made prisoners of the people, including the king's daughters, and attempted to convey them away to the Ammonites, an attempt that was frustrated by Johanan, son of Kareah ( Jeremiah 40 ;  Jeremiah 41 ). Mizpah was the scene of memorable assembly in a day of sore anxiety for Judah, when Judas Maccabeus called the warriors of Judah together for counsel and prayer (1 Maccabees 3:46). From this passage we also learn that the place was an ancient sanctuary-"for in Mizpah there was a place of prayer aforetime for Israel."  It has been proposed to identify Mizpah with Tell Nasbeh, a site on the watershed South of Bireh. The Abbe Raboisson established the fact that Jerusalem can be seen from this point. In this respect it agrees with Maundeville's description. "It is a very fair and delicious place, and it is called Mt. Joy because it gives joy to pilgrims' hearts, for from that place men first see Jerusalem." But  Jeremiah 41:10  may be taken as decisive against this identification. Ishmael departed to go east. From Tell Nasbeh this would never have brought him to the great waters that are in Gibeon (PEFS, 1898, 169, 251; 1903, 267). A more probable identification is with Neby Samwil, a village on high ground 4 1/2 miles Northwest of Jerusalem, the traditional burying-place of Samuel. It is 2,935 ft. above sea-level, and 500 ft. higher than the surrounding land. Here the pilgrims coming up by way of Beth-heron from Jaffa, the ancient route, first saw the Holy City. The mosque of the village was formerly a church, dating from Crusading times; and here the tomb of Samuel is shown. If this is the ancient Mizpah, a very slight detour to the North would bring Ishmael to the great waters that are in Gibeon, el-Jib (Gibeon) being only a mile and a quarter distant.  (5) (mitspeh mo'abh "Mizpeh of Moab"; Masepha): A town in Moab to which David took his parents for safety during Saul's pursuit of him ( 1 Samuel 22:3 ). It is possibly to be identified with Kir-moab, the modern Kerak, whither David would naturally go to interview the king. But there is no certainty. Possibly we should read "Mizpah" instead of "the hold" in  1 Samuel 22:5 .  (6) In  2 Chronicles 20:24 , probably we should read "Mizpah" instead of "watch-tower": ha-mitspeh la-midhbar would then point to a Mizpeh of the Wilderness to be sought in the district of Tekoa (20:20).  W. Ewing
JEZOAR|     je-zo'-ar.  See  IZHAR .
MOLADAH|Birth, a city in the south of Judah which fell to Simeon ( Joshua 15:21 -26;  19:2 ). It has been identified with the modern el-Milh, 10 miles east of Beersheba. 
SINITES|     si'-nits (cini): A Canaanite people mentioned in  Genesis 10:17   1 Chronicles 1:15 . The identification is uncertain. Jerome mentions a ruined city, Sin, near Arka, at the foot of Lebanon.
SHESHBAZZAR|O sun-god, defend the lord! ( Ezra 1:8 ,  11), probably another name for Zerubbabel (q.v.),  Ezra 2:2 ;  Haggai 1:12 , 14;  Zechariah 4:6 , 10
RESEN|Head of the stream; bridle, one of Nimrod's cities ( Genesis 10:12 ), "between Nineveh and Calah." It has been supposed that the four cities named in this verse were afterwards combined into one under the name of Nineveh (q.v.). Resen was on the east side of the Tigris. It is probably identified with the mound of ruins called Karamless. 
HABAZINIAH|     (chabhatstsinyah. Thus in the King James Version, but more correctly as in the Revised Version (British and American) HABAZZINIAH, hab-a-zi-ni'-a ( Jeremiah 35, 3 )): The grandfather of Jaazaniah, who was the leader of the Rechabites who were tested by Jeremiah as to their obedience to their ancestor's command with reference to wine. Their loyalty to the commands of Jonadab was effectively used by Jeremiah in an appeal to the people of Judah to obey the words of Yahweh.
MACHBANNAI|     mak'-ba-ni, -ba-na'-i (makhbannay; the King James Version Machbanai): A Gadite who attached himself to David in Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:13 ).
HAZARSHUAL|Village or enclosure of the jackal, a city on the south border of Judah ( Joshua 15:28 ;  Nehemiah 11:27 ). It has been identified with the ruins of Saweh, half-way between Beersheba and Moladah. 
HARHAIAH|Zeal of Jehovah, ( Nehemiah 3:8 ) "of the goldsmiths," one whose son helped to repair the wall of Jerusalem. 
GITTITE|A native of the Philistine city of Gath ( Joshua 13:3 ). Obed-edom, in whose house the ark was placed, is so designated ( 2 Samuel 6:10 ). Six hundred Gittites came with David from Gath into Israel ( 15:18 ,  19). 
TEMAN|Id.  (1.) A grandson of Esau, one of the "dukes of Edom" ( Genesis 36:11 ,  15,  42). (2.) A place in Southern Idumea, the land of "the sons of the east," frequently mentioned in the Old Testament. It was noted for the wisdom of its inhabitants ( Amos 1:12 ;  Obadiah 1:8 ;  Jeremiah 49:7 ;  Ezek. 25:13 ). It was divided from the hills of Paran by the low plain of Arabah ( Habakkuk 3:3 ). 
HAVILAH|The sand region.  (1.) A land mentioned in  Genesis 2:11  rich in gold and bdellium and onyx stone. The question as to the locality of this region has given rise to a great diversity of opinion. It may perhaps be identified with the sandy tract which skirts Babylonia along the whole of its western border, stretching from the lower Euphrates to the mountains of Edom. (2.) A district in Arabia-Felix. It is uncertain whether the tribe gave its name to this region or derived its name from it, and whether it was originally a Cushite ( Genesis 10:7 ) or a Joktanite tribe ( 10:29 ; Comp.  25:18 ), or whether there were both a Cushite and a Joktanite Havilah. It is the opinion of Kalisch, however, that Havilah "in both instances designates the same country, extending at least from the Persian to the Arabian Gulf, and on account of its vast extent easily divided into two distinct parts." This opinion may be well vindicated. (3.) One of the sons of Cush ( Genesis 10:7 ). (4.) A son of Joktan ( Genesis 10:29 ;  1 Chronicles 1:23 ). 
JEROHAM|Cherished; who finds mercy.  (1.) Father of Elkanah, and grandfather of the prophet Samuel ( 1 Samuel 1:1 ). (2.) The father of Azareel, the "captain" of the tribe of Dan ( 1 Chronicles 27:22 ). (3.)  1 Chronicles 12:7 ; a Benjamite. (4.)  2 Chronicles 23:1 ; one whose son assisted in placing Joash on the throne. (5.)  1 Chronicles 9:8 ; a Benjamite. (6.)  1 Chronicles 9:12 ; a priest, perhaps the same as in  Nehemiah 11:12 . 
GILONITE|     gi'-lo-nit. See preceding article.
ELIADAH|   ELIADA;   e-li'-a-da, ('elyadha`, "God is knowing." Compare HPN, 219, 266, 301; Epidae, or Elidae):  (1) One of the sons of David ( 2 Samuel 5:16   1 Chronicles 3:8 ; called BEELIADA, 1 Chronicles 14:7 (which see)).  (2) A descendant of Benjamin and a captain in the army of Jehoshaphat, commander of 200,000 men ( 2 Chronicles 17:17 ).  (3) Father of Rezon, an "adversary" of Solomon ( 1 Kings 11:23 , the King James Version "Eliadah").
PUTEOLI|A city on the coast of Campania, on the north shore of a bay running north from the Bay of Naples, at which Paul landed on his way to Rome, from which it was distant 170 miles. Here he tarried for seven days ( Acts 28:13 ,  14). This was the great emporium for the Alexandrian corn ships. Here Paul and his companions began their journey, by the "Appian Way," to Rome. It is now called Pozzuoli. The remains of a huge amphitheatre, and of the quay at which Paul landed, may still be seen here. 
KEZIAH|     ke-zi'-a (qetsi`ah, "cassia"; Kasia, Codex Alexandrinus, Kassia): The 2nd daughter of Job ( Job 42:14 ), born after his restoration from affliction. The word "cassia" became a feminine name from the fragrance of the flower.
EUODIAS|A good journey, a female member of the church at Philippi. She was one who laboured much with Paul in the gospel. He exhorts her to be of one mind with Syntyche ( Philippians 4:2 ). From this it seems they had been at variance with each other. 
JERAH|     je'-ra (yerach): A son of Joktan ( Genesis 10:26  parallel  1 Chronicles 1:20 ). No district Jerah has been discovered. However, Yurakh in Yemen and Yarach in Hijaz are places named by the Arabic geographers. The fact that the word in Hebrew means "moon" has led to the following suggestions: the Banu Hilal ("sons of the new moon") in the North of Yemen; Ghubb el-Qamar ("the bay of the moon"), Jebel el-Qamar ("the mountains of the moon") in Eastern Chadramant. But in Southern Arabia worship of the moon has caused the word to bulk largely in place-names.
SIHOR|(correctly Shi'hor) black; dark the name given to the river Nile in  Isaiah 23:3 ;  Jeremiah 2:18 . In  Joshua 13:3  it is probably "the river of Egypt", i.e., the Wady el-Arish ( 1 Chronicles 13:5 ), which flows "before Egypt", i.e., in a north-easterly direction from Egypt, and enters the sea about 50 miles south-west of Gaza. 
RABBONI|(id.) occurs only twice in the New Testament ( Mark 10:51 ,  A.V.,  "Lord, " R.V.,  "Rabboni;"  John 20:16 ). It was the most honourable of all the titles. 
JECHONIAS|     jek-o-ni'-as (Iechonias, the King James Version; Greek form of "Jechoniah," the Revised Version (British and American)):  (1) The altered form of Jehoiachin (Additions to Esther 11:4; Baruch 1:3, 9;  Matthew 1:11, 12 ). The last but one of the kings of Judah.  (2) The son of Zeelus (1 Esdras 8:92), called "Shecaniah" in  Ezra 10:2 .
ZEDAD|Side; sloping place, a town in the north of Palestine, near Hamath ( Numbers 34:8 ;  Ezek. 47:15 ). It has been identified with the ruins of Sudud, between Emesa (Hums) and Baalbec, but that is uncertain. 
HAROEH|     ha-ro'-e (ha-ro'eh, "the seer"): A Judahite ( 1 Chronicles 2:52 ).
RAGES|   ; RAGAU  ra'-jez, ra'-go  1. Location:  ("Rages," Tobit 1:14; 4:1, 20; 5:05; 6:9, 12; 9:02; "Ragau," Judith 1:5, 15; Rhagai, Rhaga, Rhage, Rhagau; in Darius' Behistun Inscriptions, II, 71, 72, Raga, a province; in Avesta, Vend. I, 15, Ragha, city and province; perhaps, "the excellent"): In Eastern Media, one forced march from Caspian Gates, 11 days' journey from Ecbatana, 5 1/2 miles South of present Tehran; the capital of the province of the same name, though by Ptolemy called Rhagiana.  2. History:  (1) Ancient.  A very ancient city, the traditional birthplace of Zoroaster (Zarathustra; Pahlavi Vendidad, Zad sparad XVI, 12, and Dabistan i Mazahib). In Yasna XIX, 18, of the Avesta, it is thus mentioned: "The Zoroastrian, four-chief-possessing Ragha, hers are the royal chiefs, both the house-chief, the village-chief, and the town-chief: Zoroaster is the fourth." In Vend. I, 15: "As the tenth, the best of both districts and cities, I, who am Ahura Mazda, did create Ragha, which possesses the three classes," i.e. fire-priests, charioteers, husbandmen. Later it was the religious center of magism. A large colony of captive Israelites settled there. Destroyed in Alexander's time, it was rebuilt by Seleucus Nicator (circa 300 B.C.), who named it Europos. Later, Arsaces restored it and named it Arsacia.  (2) Medieval.  In the early Middle Ages Ragha, then called Rai, was a great literary and often political center with a large population. It was the birthplace of Harun'al Rashid (763 A.D.). It was seized and plundered (1029 A.D.) by Sultan Machmud, but became Tughril's capital. In the Vis o Roman (circa 1048 A.D.) it is an important place, 10 days journey across the Kavir desert from Merv. It was a small provincial town in about 1220 A.D. It was sacked by Mongols in 1220 A.D. and entirely destroyed under Ghazan Khan circa 1295. A Zoroastrian community lived there in 1278 A.D., one of whom composed the Zardtusht-Namah. (3) Present Condition.  Near the ruins there now stands the village of Shah Abdu'l 'Acim, connected with Tehran by the only railway in Persia (opened in 1888).  LITERATURE  Ptolemy, Diodorus Siculus, Pliny, Strabo; Ibnu'l Athir, Jami'u t Tawarikh, Tarikh i Jahan-gusha Yaqut; Justi, Iranisches Namenbuch; E.G. Browne, Literary Hist of Persia; modern travelers.  W. St. Clair Tisdall
MISHRAITES|     mish'-ra-its (ha-mishra`i): One of the families of Kiriath-jearim ( 1 Chronicles 2:53 ).
CYRENIANS|   CYRENIAN;   si-re'-ni-an (Kurenaios, "a native or inhabitant of Cyrene"): Two Jews of Cyrene are mentioned in the New Testament, namely, Simon ( Mark 15:21  and  Luke 23:26  the King James Version) who was impressed to bear the Lord's cross ( Mark 15:21  the Revised Version, margin), and Lucius, a Christian teacher at Antioch ( Acts 13:1 ). See  CYRENE ;  LUCIUS ; SIMON. For Cyrenians see CYRENE.
VILLAGES|( Judges 5:7 ,  11). The Hebrew word thus rendered (perazon) means habitations in the open country, unwalled villages ( Deuteronomy 3:5 ;  1 Samuel 6:18 ). Others, however, following the LXX. and the Vulgate versions, render the word "rulers." 
CANALS|     ka-nalz' (ye'orim): The word "canals" occurs in several places in the Revised Version, margin ( Exodus 7:19 ;  Exodus 8:5   Isaiah 19:6   Nahum 3:8 ). ye'or is an Egyptian word, the designation of the Nile (Brugsch, Geogr, I, 8, 78). The proper name of the Nile as a god was Hapi. There were several common designations of the Nile, but the usual one was ye'or, Hebrew plural ye'orim. The primary meaning of ye'or in Egyptian is not certain, but its significance in use for the Nile is plain enough. All the waters in Egypt were of the Nile and this word ye'or was used to denote all of them, the Nile and all its ramifications through the whole irrigating system. Thus ye'orim, Niles, came to be used. As only the main channels of the Nile had much current, the ye'orim came naturally to convey the idea of sluggishness. In the account of the plagues ( Exodus 7:19 ), names are used descriptively to designate the different waters of Egypt: neharoth, "flowing streams," for the main channels of the river, and ye'orim for other streams, which by contrast must mean, as it should according to its use by the Egyptians, "the sluggish streams," i.e. "canals," as it is rendered by the Revisers. This meaning of the word being thus clearly established, it is appropriately used in the Revised Version, margin in the other instances of its occurrence in like circumstances.  M. G. Kyle
JIMNAH|   JIMNA,   jim'-na (yimnah, perhaps equals "good fortune"): A "son" of Asher ( Genesis 46:17 , the King James Version "Jimnah";  Numbers 26:44 , the King James Version "Jimna"), whereas the Revised Version (British and American) has IMNAH (which see).
LASSHARON|     la-sha'-ron, la-shar'-on (lashsharon or la-sharon, the King James Version Sharon): A royal city of the Canaanites taken by Joshua, named with Aphek ( Joshua 12:18 ). Possibly we should here follow the reading of Septuagint (Codex Vaticanus), "the king of Aphek in Sharon." Eusebius, Onomasticon (s.v. "Saron") mentions a region between Mt. Tabor and the Lake of Tiberias called Sarona. This is probably represented by the ancient site Sarona, on the plateau 6 1/2 miles Southwest 2 of Tiberias. If Massoretic Text is correct, this may be the place intended.
JUSTUS| (1.) Another name for Joseph, surnamed Barsabas. He and Matthias are mentioned only in  Acts 1:23 . "They must have been among the earliest disciples of Jesus, and must have been faithful to the end; they must have been well known and esteemed among the brethren. What became of them afterwards, and what work they did, are entirely unknown" (Lindsay's Acts of the Apostles). (2.) A Jewish proselyte at Corinth, in whose house, next door to the synagogue, Paul held meetings and preached after he left the synagogue ( Acts 18:7 ). (3.) A Jewish Christian, called Jesus, Paul's only fellow-labourer at Rome, where he wrote his Epistle to the Colossians ( Colossians 4:11 ). 
PAPHOS|The capital of the island of Cyprus, and therefore the residence of the Roman governor. It was visited by Paul and Barnabas on their first missionary tour ( Acts 13:6 ). It is new Paphos which is here meant. It lay on the west coast of the island, about 8 miles north of old Paphos. Its modern name is Baffa. 
SINITE|An inhabitant of Sin, near Arka ( Genesis 10:17 ;  1 Chronicles 1:15 ). (see  ARKITE .) 
NEPHEG|     ne'-feg (nephegh, "sprout," "shoot"):  (1) Son of Izhar, and brother of Korah of the famous trio, Korah, Dathan and Abiram ( Exodus 6:21 ).  (2) A son of David ( 2 Samuel 5:15   1 Chronicles 3:7 ;  1 Chronicles 14:6 ).
HASHABNIAH| (1.)  Nehemiah 3:10 .  (2.) One of the Levites whom Ezra appointed to interpret the law to the people ( Nehemiah 9:5 ). 
STEDFASTNESS|     sted'-fast-nes:  (1) stereoma, "firmness": "The steadfastness of your faith in Christ" ( Colossians 2:5 ). Some take this figuratively, in a military sense, of a "solid front" (see Thayer, Greek-English Lexicon of New Testament, under the word).  (2) sterigmos, "stability" ( 2 Peter 3:17 ; compare  1 Corinthians 15:58 ).
SHECHEM|Shoulder.  (1.) The son of Hamor the Hivite ( Genesis 33:19 ; 34). (2.) A descendant of Manasseh ( Numbers 26:31 ;  Joshua 17:2 ). (3.) A city in Samaria ( Genesis 33:18 ), called also Sichem ( 12:6 ), Sychem ( Acts 7:16 ). It stood in the narrow sheltered valley between Ebal on the north and Gerizim on the south, these mountains at their base being only some 500 yards apart. Here Abraham pitched his tent and built his first altar in the Promised Land, and received the first divine promise ( Genesis 12:6 ,  7). Here also Jacob "bought a parcel of a field at the hands of the children of Hamor" after his return from Mesopotamia, and settled with his household, which he purged from idolatry by burying the teraphim of his followers under an oak tree, which was afterwards called "the oak of the sorcerer" ( Genesis 33:19 ;  35:4 ;  Judges 9:37 ). (see  MEONENIM .) Here too, after a while, he dug a well, which bears his name to this day ( John 4:5 ,  39-42). To Shechem Joshua gathered all Israel "before God," and delivered to them his second parting address ( Joshua 24:1 -15). He "made a covenant with the people that day" at the very place where, on first entering the land, they had responded to the law from Ebal and Gerizim ( Joshua 24:25 ), the terms of which were recorded "in the book of the law of God", i.e., in the roll of the law of Moses; and in memory of this solemn transaction a great stone was set up "under an oak" (Comp.  Genesis 28:18 ;  31:44 -48;  Exodus 24:4 ;  Joshua 4:3 ,  8,  9), possibly the old "oak of Moreh," as a silent witness of the transaction to all coming time. Shechem became one of the cities of refuge, the central city of refuge for Western Palestine ( Joshua 20:7 ), and here the bones of Joseph were buried ( 24:32 ). Rehoboam was appointed king in Shechem ( 1 Kings 12:1 ,  19), but Jeroboam afterwards took up his residence here. This city is mentioned in connection with our Lord's conversation with the woman of Samaria ( John 4:5 ); and thus, remaining as it does to the present day, it is one of the oldest cities of the world. It is the modern Nablus, a contraction for Neapolis, the name given to it by Vespasian. It lies about a mile and a half up the valley on its southern slope, and on the north of Gerizim, which rises about 1,100 feet above it, and is about 34 miles north of Jerusalem. It contains about 10,000 inhabitants, of whom about 160 are Samaritans and 100 Jews, the rest being Christians and Mohammedans. The site of Shechem is said to be of unrivalled beauty. Stanley says it is "the most beautiful, perhaps the only very beautiful, spot in Central Palestine." Gaza, near Shechem, only mentioned  1 Chronicles 7:28 , has entirely disappeared. It was destroyed at the time of the Conquest, and its place was taken by Shechem. (see  SYCHAR .) 
OHOLAH|     o-ho'-la ('oholah; the King James Version Aholah): The exact meaning is a matter of dispute. As written, it seems to mean a tent-woman, or the woman living in a tent. With a mappik in the last consonant it could mean "her tent." The term is used symbolically by Ezekiel to designate Samaria or the kingdom of Israel ( Ezekiel 23:4, 5, 36, 44 ).  See  OHOLIBAH .
GURBAAL|Sojourn of Baal, a place in Arabia ( 2 Chronicles 26:7 ) where there was probably a temple of Baal. 
PERSONS|   RESPECT OF   re-spekt': The phrase nasa' phanim, means literally, "lift up the face," and, among other translations, is rendered indifferently "accept" or "respect the person" in the King James Version (contrast  Proverbs 18:5  and 24:23). As applied to a (prostrate) suppliant, the phrase means "receive him with favor," and is so used in  1 Samuel 25:35   Malachi 1:8, 9  (compare  Genesis 19:21 , etc.). By a shift in force the phrase came to mean "accept the person instead of the cause" or "show partiality" ( Job 13:8, 10  the American Standard Revised Version), and is so used commonly. A literal translation into Greek gave lambano prosopon (Sirach 35:13 (32:16);  Luke 20:21   Galatians 2:6 ), with the noun prosopolempsia, "face-taking" ( Romans 2:11   Ephesians 6:9   Colossians 3:25   James 2:1 ), rendered uniformly "respect of persons" in English Versions of the Bible. A noun prosopolemptes, "respecter of persons," and a verb prosopolempteo, are found  Acts 10:34   James 2:9 . God's judgment rests solely on the character of the man and will be influenced by no worldly ( Ephesians 6:9 ) or national ( Romans 2:11 ) considerations.  See also  ACCEPT .  Burton Scott Easton
ESHTAOL|Narrow pass or recess, a town ( Joshua 15:33 ) in the low country, the She-phelah of Judah. It was allotted to the tribe of Dan ( Joshua 19:41 ), and was one of their strongholds. Here Samson spent his boyhood, and first began to show his mighty strength; and here he was buried in the burying-place of Manoah his father ( Judges 13:25 ;  16:31 ;  18:2 ,  8,  11,  12). It is identified with the modern Yeshua, on a hill 2 miles east of Zorah. Others, however, identify it with Kustul, east of Kirjath-jearim. 
WINEFAT|( Mark 12:1 ). The original word (hypolenion) so rendered occurs only here in the New Testament. It properly denotes the trough or lake (lacus), as it was called by the Romans, into which the juice of the grapes ran from the trough above it. It is here used, however, of the whole apparatus. In the parallel passage in  Matthew 21:33  the Greek word lenos is used. This properly denotes the upper one of the two vats. (see  WINE -PRESS.) 
JEZIAH|     je-zi'-a.  See  IZZIAH .
ELBERITH|     el-be'-rith ( Judges 9:46 ).  See  BAAL-BERITH .
ZALMONAH|Shady, one of the stations of the Israelites in the wilderness ( Numbers 33:41 ,  42). 
SHELEMIAH|Whom Jehovah repays.  (1.)  Ezra 10:39 . (2.) The father of Hananiah ( Nehemiah 3:30 ). (3.) A priest in the time of Nehemiah ( 13:13 ). (4.) Father of one of those who accused Jeremiah to Zedekiah ( Jeremiah 37:3 ;  38:1 ). (5.) Father of a captain of the ward ( Jeremiah 37:13 ). (6.)  Jeremiah 36:14 . 
NABAL|Foolish, a descendant of Caleb who dwelt at Maon ( 1 Samuel 25 ), the modern Main, 7 miles south-east of Hebron. He was "very great, and he had 3,000 sheep and 1,000 goats...but the man was churlish and evil in his doings." During his wanderings David came into that district, and hearing that Nabal was about to shear his sheep, he sent ten of his young men to ask "whatsoever cometh unto thy hand for thy servants." Nabal insultingly resented the demand, saying, "Who is David, and who is the son of Jesse?" ( 1 Samuel 25:10 ,  11). One of the shepherds that stood by and saw the reception David's messengers had met with, informed Abigail, Nabal's wife, who at once realized the danger that threatened her household. She forthwith proceeded to the camp of David, bringing with her ample stores of provisions ( 25:18 ). She so courteously and persuasively pled her cause that David's anger was appeased, and he said to her, "Blessed be the Lord God of Israel which sent thee this day to meet me." On her return she found her husband incapable from drunkenness of understanding the state of matters, and not till the following day did she explain to him what had happened. He was stunned by a sense of the danger to which his conduct had exposed him. "His heart died within him, and he became as a stone." and about ten days after "the Lord smote Nabal that he died" ( 1 Samuel 25:37 ,  38). Not long after David married Abigail (q.v.). 
ZIZA|Splendour; abundance.  (1.) A Simeonite prince ( 1 Chronicles 4:37 -43). (2.) A son of Rehoboam ( 2 Chronicles 11:20 ). 
HEIGHTS|   HEIGHT;   hit, The English terms represent a large number of Hebrew words (gobhah, marom, qomah, rum, etc.). A chief thing to notice is that in the Revised Version (British and American) "height" and "heights" are frequently substituted for other words in the King James Version, as "coast" ( Joshua 12:23 ), "region" ( 1 Kings 4:11 ), "borders" ( Joshua 11:2 ), "countries" ( Joshua 17:11 ), "strength" ( Psalm 95:4 ), "high places" ( Isaiah 41:18   Jeremiah 3:2, 21 ;  Jeremiah 7:29 ;  Jeremiah 12:12 ;  Jeremiah 14:6 ), "high palaces" ( Psalm 78:69 ). On the other hand, for "height" in the King James Version, the Revised Version (British and American) has "stature" ( Ezekiel 31:5, 10 ), "raised basement" ( Ezekiel 41:8 ), etc. In the New Testament we have hupsoma, prop. of space ( Romans 8:39 ), and hupsos of measure ( Ephesians 3:18   Revelation 21:16 ).  James Orr
FROWARDNESS|     fro'-werd-nes:  The translation of tahpukhoth the plural of tahpukhah, perversity, foolishness (from haphakh, to turn about) in Proverbs 2:14, delight in the frowardness of the wicked, the American Standard Revised Version the perverseness of evil, margin the evil man (compare 2:12; some render deceit); 6:14 the American Standard Revised Version, perverseness; 10:32, the mouth of the wicked speaketh frowardness, the American Standard Revised Version speaketh perverseness, margin is. 
JAMBRES|One of those who opposed Moses in Egypt ( 2 Timothy 3:8 ). (see  JANNES .) 
EGYPTIANS|   , GOSPEL ACCORDING TO THE  See  APOCRYPHAL GOSPELS .
CUSHAN|Probably a poetic or prolonged name of the land of Cush, the Arabian Cush ( Habakkuk 3:7 ). Some have, however, supposed this to be the same as Chushan-rishathaim ( Judges 3:8 ,  10), i.e., taking the latter part of the name as a title or local appellation, Chushan "of the two iniquities" (= oppressing Israel,  and provoking them to idolatry), a Mesopotamian king, identified by Rawlinson with Asshur-ris-ilim (the father of Tiglathpileser I.); but incorrectly, for the empire of Assyria was not yet founded. He held Israel in bondage for eight years. 
SAYEST|     sa'-est: "Thou sayest" ( Matthew 27:11   Mark 15:2   Luke 22:70 , "Ye say";  John 18:37 ), i.e. rightly; "Thou hast said" ( Matthew 26:25, 64 ), = "Yes"; a rabbinical idiom never found in the Old Testament.  Mark 14:62  renders by "I am." All these passages WHm punctuate interrogatively (compare Kethubhoth, f. 103 b).
MOSERA|A bond, one of the stations of the Israelites in the wilderness ( Deuteronomy 10:6 ), at the foot of Mount Hor. (Comp.  Numbers 33:37 ,  38). It has been identified with el-Tayibeh, a small fountain at the bottom of the pass leading to the ascent of Mount Hor. 
SENSES|     sen'-siz: The translation of aistheterion ( Hebrews 5:14 , "those who by reason of use have their senses exercised to discern good and evil"). The word means, primarily, the seat of the senses, the region of feeling; in the Septuagint of  Jeremiah 4:19 , it represents the Hebrew qir, "the walls of the heart" (see the Revised Version (British and American)), and is used to denote the internal sense or faculty of perceiving and judging, which in  Hebrews 5:14  is regarded as becoming perfected by use or exercise (compare  Ephesians 4:12 ;  1 Timothy 4:7   2 Peter 3:18 ).  In 2 Esdras 10:36 we have "Or is my sense deceived, or my soul in a dream?" Latin sensus, here "mind" rather than "sense."  W. L. Walker
NEBALLAT|Wickedness in secret, ( Nehemiah 11:34 ), probably the village of Beit Nebala, about 4 miles north of Lydda. 
ESHEAN|A place in the mountains of Judah ( Joshua 15:52 ), supposed to be the ruin es-Simia, near Dumah, south of Hebron. 
GIZRITES|     giz'-rits (gizri (Kethibh); the King James Version Gezrites): Inhabitants of GEZER, (which see). The Qere reads girzi, Girzites ( 1 Samuel 27:8 ).
BAKBUK|     bak'-buk baqbuq, "bottle" perhaps onomatopoetical, referring to the clucking noise created by the pouring out of the contents of a bottle = Acub, (1 Esdras 5:31): The descendants of Bakbuk returned with Zerubbabel to Jerusalem ( Ezra 2:51   Nehemiah 7:53 ).
MEDEBA|Waters of quiet, an ancient Moabite town ( Numbers 21:30 ). It was assigned to the tribe of Reuben ( Joshua 13:16 ). Here was fought the great battle in which Joab defeated the Ammonites and their allies ( 1 Chronicles 19:7 -15; Comp.  2 Samuel 10:6 -14). In the time of Isaiah ( 15:2 ) the Moabites regained possession of it from the Ammonites. (see  HANUN .) The ruins of this important city, now Madeba or Madiyabah, are seen about 8 miles south-west of Heshbon, and 14 east of the Dead Sea. Among these are the ruins of what must have been a large temple, and of three cisterns of considerable extent, which are now dry. These cisterns may have originated the name Medeba, "waters of quiet." (see  OMRI .) 
THAHASH|A badger, a son of Nahor, Abraham's brother ( Genesis 22:24 ). 
LYSIAS|Lysias, Claudius The chief captain (chiliarch) who commanded the Roman troops in Jerusalem, and sent Paul under guard to the procurator Felix at Caesarea ( Acts 21:31 -38;  22:24 -30). His letter to his superior officer is an interesting specimen of Roman military correspondence ( 23:26 -30). He obtained his Roman citizenship by purchase, and was therefore probably a Greek. (see  CLAUDIUS .) 
KERENHAPPUCH|Horn of the face-paint = cosmetic-box, the name of Job's third daughter ( Job 42:14 ), born after prosperity had returned to him. 
GEZRITES|     gez'-rits.  See  GIRZITES .
EZEL|A separation, ( 1 Samuel 20:19 ), a stone, or heap of stones, in the neighbourhood of Saul's residence, the scene of the parting of David and Jonathan (42). The margin of the Authorized Version reads, "The stone that sheweth the way," in this rendering following the Targum. 
SHINAB|Cooling, the king of Adamah, in the valley of Siddim, who with his confederates was conquered by Chedorlaomer ( Genesis 14:2 ). 
REEDS|   PAPER   redz: In  Isaiah 19:7  the King James Version (the Revised Version (British and American) "meadows").
GAMALIEL|Reward of God.  (1.) A chief of the tribe of Manasseh at the census at Sinai ( Numbers 1:10 ;  2:20 ;  7:54 ,  59). (2.) The son of rabbi Simeon, and grandson of the famous rabbi Hillel. He was a Pharisse, and therefore the opponent of the party of the Sadducees. He was noted for his learning, and was president of the Sanhedrim during the regins of Tiberius, Caligula, and Claudius, and died, it is said, about eighteen years before the destruction of Jerusalem. When the apostles were brought before the council, charged with preaching the resurrection of Jesus, as a zealous Pharisee Gamaliel councelled moderation and calmness. By a reference to well-known events, he advised them to "refrain from these men." If their work or counsel was of man, it would come to nothing; but if it was of God, they could not destroy it, and therefore ought to be on their guard lest they should be "found fighting against God" ( Acts 5:34 -40). Paul was one of his disciples ( 22:3 ). 
SUSA|     su'-sa, soo'-sa (Additions to Esther 11:3).  See  SHUSHAN .
SYCOMORE|   , TREE  sik'-o-mor, (shiqmah, Aramaic shiqema' plural shiqmim; in Septuagint wrongly translated by sukaminos, "the mulberry"; see SYCAMINE ( 1 Kings 10:27   1 Chronicles 27:28   2 Chronicles 1:15 ;  2 Chronicles 9:27   Isaiah 9:10   Amos 7:14 ): shiqkmoth ( Psalm 78:47 ); sukomoraia ( Luke 19:4 )): The sycomore-fig, Ficus sycomorus (Natural Order, Urticaceae), known in Arabic as Jummeiz, is one of the finest of the lowland trees of Palestine, and attains still greater proportions in Lower Egypt. It is evident from  1 Kings 10:27   2 Chronicles 1:15  that it was once abundant, and at a later period it was so plentiful in the neighborhood of what is now Haifa as to give the name Sykaminon to the town which once stood near there. It is a tree which cannot flourish in the cooler mountain heights; it cannot stand frost ( Psalm 78:47 ). It was one of the distinguishing marks of Lower, as contrasted with Upper, Galilee that the sycomore could flourish there. It is highly improbable that sycomores could ever have flourished near Tekoa (compare  Amos 7:14 ), but it is quite possible that the town or individual inhabitants may have held lands in the Jordan valley or in the Shephelah on which these trees grew. Villages in Palestine today not infrequently possess estates at considerable distances; the village of Silwan (Siloam), for example, possesses and cultivates extensive fertile lands halfway to the Dead Sea. The sycomore produces small, rounded figs, about an inch long, which grow upon tortuous, leafless twigs springing from the trunk or the older branches; they are more or less tasteless. It would appear that in ancient times some treatment was adopted, such as piercing the apex of the fruit to hasten the ripening. Amos was a "nipper" (bolec) of sycomore figs ( Amos 7:14 ). The tree not uncommonly attains a height of 50 ft., with an enormous trunk; in many parts, especially where, as near the coast, the tree grows out of sandy soil, the branching roots stand out of the ground for some distance. The timber is of fair quality and was much valued in ancient times ( 1 Kings 10:27   2 Chronicles 1:15 ;  2 Chronicles 9:27   Isaiah 9:10 ). Mummy cases and many of the best preserved wooden utensils of ancient Egyptian life are made of it. This tree must be distinguished from the English sycamore, Acer pseudo-platanus (Natural Order, Spindaceae), the "false plane tree," a kind of maple.  E. W. G. Masterman
KAB|     kab (qabh, "something hollowed out,"  2 Kings 6:25 ; the King James Version Cab): A Hebrew dry measure and liquid measure equal to about 2 quarts.  See  WEIGHTS AND MEASURES .
GATAM|     ga'-tam (ga`tam):  An Edomite chief, grandson of Esau ( Genesis 36:11, 16   1 Chronicles 1:36 ).
NEBUCHADNEZZAR|In the Babylonian orthography Nabu-kudur-uzur, which means "Nebo, protect the crown!" or the "frontiers." In an inscription he styles himself "Nebo's favourite." He was the son and successor of Nabopolassar, who delivered Babylon from its dependence on Assyria and laid Nineveh in ruins. He was the greatest and most powerful of all the Babylonian kings. He married the daughter of Cyaxares, and thus the Median and Babylonian dynasties were united. Necho II., the king of Egypt, gained a victory over the Assyrians at Carchemish. (see  JOSIAH ; MEGIDDO.) This secured to Egypt the possession of the Syrian provinces of Assyria, including Palestine. The remaining provinces of the Assyrian empire were divided between Babylonia and Media. But Nabopolassar was ambitious of reconquering from Necho the western provinces of Syria, and for this purpose he sent his son with a powerful army westward ( Dan. 1:1 ). The Egyptians met him at Carchemish, where a furious battle was fought, resulting in the complete rout of the Egyptians, who were driven back ( Jeremiah 46:2 -12), and Syria and Phoenicia brought under the sway of Babylon (B.C. 606). From that time "the king of Egypt came not again any more out of his land" ( 2 Kings 24:7 ). Nebuchadnezzar also subdued the whole of Palestine, and took Jerusalem, carrying away captive a great multitude of the Jews, among whom were Daniel and his companions ( Dan. 1:1 ,  2;  Jeremiah 27:19 ;  40:1 ). Three years after this, Jehoiakim, who had reigned in Jerusalem as a Babylonian vassal, rebelled against the oppressor, trusting to help from Egypt ( 2 Kings 24:1 ). This led Nebuchadnezzar to march an army again to the conquest of Jerusalem, which at once yielded to him (B.C. 598). A third time he came against it, and deposed Jehoiachin, whom he carried into Babylon, with a large portion of the population of the city, and the sacred vessels of the temple, placing Zedekiah on the throne of Judah in his stead. He also, heedless of the warnings of the prophet, entered into an alliance with Egypt, and rebelled against Babylon. This brought about the final siege of the city, which was at length taken and utterly destroyed (B.C. 586). Zedekiah was taken captive, and had his eyes put out by order of the king of Babylon, who made him a prisoner for the remainder of his life. An onyx cameo, now in the museum of Florence, bears on it an arrow-headed inscription, which is certainly ancient and genuine. The helmeted profile is said (Schrader) to be genuine also, but it is more probable that it is the portrait of a usurper in the time of Darius (Hystaspes), called Nidinta-Bel, who took the name of "Nebuchadrezzar." The inscription has been thus translated:, "In honour of Merodach, his lord, Nebuchadnezzar, king of Babylon, in his lifetime had this made." A clay tablet, now in the British Museum, bears the following inscription, the only one as yet found which refers to his wars: "In the thirty-seventh year of Nebuchadnezzar, king of the country of Babylon, he went to Egypt [Misr] to make war. Amasis, king of Egypt, collected [his army], and marched and spread abroad." Thus were fulfilled the words of the prophet ( Jeremiah 46:13 -26;  Ezek. 29:2 -20). Having completed the subjugation of Phoenicia, and inflicted chastisement on Egypt, Nebuchadnezzar now set himself to rebuild and adorn the city of Babylon ( Dan. 4:30 ), and to add to the greatness and prosperity of his kingdom by constructing canals and aqueducts and reservoirs surpassing in grandeur and magnificence everything of the kind mentioned in history ( Dan. 2:37 ). He is represented as a "king of kings," ruling over a vast kingdom of many provinces, with a long list of officers and rulers under him, "princes, governors, captains," etc. ( 3:2 ,  3,  27). He may, indeed, be said to have created the mighty empire over which he ruled. "Modern research has shown that Nebuchadnezzar was the greatest monarch that Babylon, or perhaps the East generally, ever produced. He must have possessed an enormous command of human labour, nine-tenths of Babylon itself, and nineteen-twentieths of all the other ruins that in almost countless profusion cover the land, are composed of bricks stamped with his name. He appears to have built or restored almost every city and temple in the whole country. His inscriptions give an elaborate account of the immense works which he constructed in and about Babylon itself, abundantly illustrating the boast, `Is not this great Babylon which I have build?'" Rawlinson, Hist. Illustrations. After the incident of the "burning fiery furnace" ( Dan. 3 ) into which the three Hebrew confessors were cast, Nebuchadnezzar was afflicted with some peculiar mental aberration as a punishment for his pride and vanity, probably the form of madness known as lycanthropy (i.e,  "the change of a man into a wolf"). A remarkable confirmation of the Scripture narrative is afforded by the recent discovery of a bronze door-step, which bears an inscription to the effect that it was presented by Nebuchadnezzar to the great temple at Borsippa as a votive offering on account of his recovery from a terrible illness. (see  DANIEL .) He survived his recovery for some years, and died B.C. 562, in the eighty-third or eighty-fourth year of his age, after a reign of forty-three years, and was succeeded by his son Evil-merodach, who, after a reign of two years, was succeeded by Neriglissar (559-555), who was succeeded by Nabonadius (555-538), at the close of whose reign (less than a quarter of a century after the death of Nebuchadnezzar) Babylon fell under Cyrus at the head of the combined armies of Media and Persia. "I have examined," says Sir H. Rawlinson, "the bricks belonging perhaps to a hundred different towns and cities in the neighbourhood of Baghdad, and I never found any other legend than that of Nebuchadnezzar, son of Nabopolassar, king of Babylon." Nine-tenths of all the bricks amid the ruins of Babylon are stamped with his name. 
HANNIEL|Grace of God.  (1.) A chief of the tribe of Manasseh ( Numbers 34:23 ).  (2.) A chief of the tribe of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 7:39 ). 
BEEROTH|Beeroth Wells, one of the four cities of the Hivites which entered by fraud into a league with Joshua. It belonged to Benjamin ( Joshua 18:25 ). It has by some been identified with el-Bireh on the way to Nablus, 10 miles north of Jerusalem. Beeroth of the children of Jaakan ( Deuteronomy 10:6 ). The same as Bene-jaakan ( Numbers 33:31 ).
TABITHA|(in Greek called Dorcas), gazelle, a disciple at Joppa. She was distinguished for her alms-deeds and good works. Peter, who was sent for from Lydda on the occasion of her death, prayed over the dead body, and said, "Tabitha, arise." And she opened her eyes and sat up; and Peter "gave her his hand, and raised her up; and calling the saints and widows, he presented her alive" ( Acts 9:36 -43). 
BESOR|Cold, a ravine or brook in the extreme south-west of Judah, where 200 of David's men stayed behind because they were faint, while the other 400 pursued the Amalekites ( 1 Samuel 30:9 ,  10,  21). Probably the Wadyes Sheriah, south of Gaza. 
NAARAH|A girl, the second of Ashur's two wives, of the tribe of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:5 ,  6). 
RAMOTH|Heights. A Levitical city in the tribe of Issachar ( 1 Samuel 30:27 ;  1 Chronicles 6:73 ), the same as Jarmuth ( Joshua 21:29 ) and Remeth (q.v.), 19:21. 
REEDGRASS|   REED-GRASS  ( Genesis 41:2, 18   Job 8:11  margin).  See  FLAG, (2) ;  REED, (1) .
NAAM|Pleasantness, one of the three sons of Caleb, the son of Jephunneh ( 1 Chronicles 4:15 ). 
KETURAH|Incense, the wife of Abraham, whom he married probably after Sarah's death ( Genesis 25:1 -6), by whom he had six sons, whom he sent away into the east country. Her nationality is unknown. She is styled "Abraham's concubine" ( 1 Chronicles 1:32 ). Through the offshoots of the Keturah line Abraham became the "father of many nations." 
FURNACES|   , TOWER OF THE  ( Nehemiah 3:11 ).  See  JERUSALEM .  TOWER OF THE FURNACES  See  FURNACES, TOWER OF THE .
UEL|     u'-el, 'u'el, "will of God"): One of the sons of Bani who had taken foreign wives ( Ezra 10:34 ). The name in 1 Esdras 9:35 is "Juel" (Codex Vaticanus Ouel; Codex Alexandrinus Iouel).
JODA|     jo'-da (Westcott-Hort, Greek New Testament, Ioda; Textus Receptus of the New Testament, Iouda):  (1) A Levite, whose sons were "over the works of the Lord," corresponding to Sudias (1 Esdras 5:26), Hodaviah ( Ezra 2:40 ), Judah ( Ezra 3:9 ), Hodevah ( Nehemiah 7:43 ).  (2) An ancestor of Jesus in Luke's genealogy ( Luke 3:26 , the King James Version "Juda").
HAPPIZZEZ|     hap'-i-zez (ha-pitstsets; the King James Version, Aphses): A priest on whom fell the lot for the 18th of the 24 courses which David appointed for the temple service ( 1 Chronicles 24:15 ).
ENROGEL|Fountain of the treaders; i.e., "foot-fountain;" also called the "fullers' fountain," because fullers here trod the clothes in water. It has been identified with the "fountain of the virgin" (q.v.), the modern `Ain Ummel-Daraj. Others identify it, with perhaps some probability, with the Bir Eyub, to the south of the Pool of Siloam, and below the junction of the valleys of Kidron and Hinnom. (see  FOUNTAIN .) It was at this fountain that Jonathan and Ahimaaz lay hid after the flight of David ( 2 Samuel 17:17 ); and here also Adonijah held the feast when he aspired to the throne of his father ( 1 Kings 1:9 ). The Bir Eyub, or "Joab's well," "is a singular work of ancient enterprise. The shaft sunk through the solid rock in the bed of the Kidron is 125 feet deep...The water is pure and entirely sweet, quite different from that of Siloam; which proves that there is no connection between them." Thomson's Land and the Book. 
UNNO|     un'-o (`unno; the Septuagint omits the name, but in Codex Sinaiticus, a later hand has added Iana; the Qere of the Massoretic Text has `unni, as in  1 Chronicles 15:18 , whence the King James Version has "Unni"): A Levite who returned with Zerubbabel ( Nehemiah 12:9 ).
SYCHAR|Liar or drunkard (see Isaiah 28:1,  7), has been from the time of the Crusaders usually identified with Sychem or Shechem ( John 4:5 ). It has now, however, as the result of recent explorations, been identified with `Askar, a small Samaritan town on the southern base of Ebal, about a mile to the north of Jacob's well. 
BOUNTIFULNESS|   ; BOUNTY  boun'-ti-fool-nes, boun'-ti (haplotes, "singleness," "benevolence,"  2 Corinthians 9:11  the King James Version; Tobh, "to be good" ( Proverbs 22:9 ); eulogia, "good speech," "blessing" ( 2 Corinthians 9:6 ); gamal, "to treat well" ( Psalm 119:17 ); shoa`, "to be liberal" ( Isaiah 32:5 ); yadh, "hand," "power"): Paul speaks of the church at Corinth "being enriched in everything unto all liberality" (the King James Version "bountifulness,"  2 Corinthians 9:11 ). The offering of the church at Corinth for the Christians of Judea is termed a "bounty," a blessing, liberally given: "and not of extortion" (the King James Version "of covetousness,"  2 Corinthians 9:5, 6 ). The word occurs also in  1 Kings 10:13 : "Besides that which Solomon gave her of his royal bounty," literally "according to the hand of King Solomon."  L. Kaiser
KIRJATHSANNAH|City of the sannah; i.e., of the palm(?),  Joshua 15:49 ; the same as Kirjath-sepher ( 15:16 ;  Judges 1:11 ) and Debir (q.v.), a Canaanitish royal city included in Judah ( Joshua 10:38 ;  15:49 ), and probably the chief seat of learning among the Hittites. It was about 12 miles to the south-west of Hebron. 
JACHAN|Mourner, one of the chief Gadite "brothers" in Bashan ( 1 Chronicles 5:13 ). 
JONAN|     jo'-nan.  See  JONAM .
KEYS|   , POWER OF THE  kez  I. THE PROBLEMS INVOLVED  1. The Keys; and the Binding and Loosing  2. Meaning of the Statements  3. How Peter Is Related to These Powers  4. Is the Primary Idea that of Position and Authority?  II. VIEWS MAINTAINED  1. Agent of the Power  2. Nature of the Power  3. Scope of the Power  III. DATA FOR DECIDING THE QUESTIONS INVOLVED  1. Passages Employing the Terms "Key," "Binding and Loosing"  2. Related Passages  3. Examples of Exercise of This Power  IV. CONCLUSION  1. Nature of the Power  2. Agent of the Power  3. Scope of the Power  There is no more stubbornly contested conception in Christian terminology. The thought connects itself immediately with  Matthew 16:19 , but it is hardly correct to say that it originates there, for the controversy is one that grows out of the conflict of forces inherent in the institutional development of religion and of society. It must have arisen, in any event, if there had been no such word as that in  Matthew 16:19 , although not in the same terms as it is now found. Since the Reformation it has been recognized, by Catholic and Protestant, that on the interpretation of this passage depends the authority of the Church of Rome and its exclusive claims, so far as their foundation in Scripture is concerned; while on the other hand there is involved the "validity" of the "sacraments," "ordinances" and "orders" of Protestantism and the very hope of salvation of Protestants.  I. The Problems Involved.  1. The Keys; and the Binding and Loosing:  The crucial passage has two declarations, commonly spoken of as promises to Peter: to him Christ will give the keys of the kingdom of heaven; whatsoever he shall bind on earth shall be bound in heaven, while whatsoever he shall loose on earth shall be loosed in heaven. How are the facts of having committed to him the keys and the function of binding and loosing related? Are they two forms of one declaration? Is the first general, and the second a specific sphere of its application?  Both statements are made in figurative terms. That of the keys is supposed to be drawn from the duties of the chief steward of a house, or establishment. The idea of the keys of a city turned over to some distinguished person is advanced, but is hardly to be considered. We need, then, to know the functions of the chief steward and how they apply to the kingdom of heaven, and to Peter as its steward.  2. Meaning of the Statements:  What was Peter to bind and loose, men or things, persons or teachings? Numerous examples could be cited of the use of these terms to signify forbidding (binding) and permitting (loosing) conduct as legitimate under the law of the Old Testament (Lightfoot, McClintock and Strong, Schaff-Herzog, Hastings, etc.). The strict school of Shammai bound many things loosed by the laxer school of Hillel (Broadus, Matthew). Is this conclusive that Jesus is here giving Peter authority for "laying down the law for his fellow-disciples," "authority to say what the law of God allows, and what it forbids," "the power of legislation for the church"? (Compare Mason in Hastings, Dictionary of the Bible (five volumes), IV, 30.)  3. How Peter Is Related to These Powers:  Ecclesiastical contentions turn especially on Peter's relation to these words of Jesus. Do they signify powers and "privileges" conferred on Peter, exclusively or representatively? Are they official or personal? Do they belong to other apostles, and to other officers besides apostles? Can the powers be exercised by individuals or by the church alone? If any besides Peter have these powers, do they pass to them from Peter, and how?  4. Is the Primary Idea That of Position and Authority?:  What seems to the writer a fundamental question here is either passed over very lightly or entirely omitted in the discussions of this subject. Did Jesus mean by these words to confer on Peter, or on anyone to whom they may apply, authority, or obligation; privilege, or responsibility? Does He promise position, or does He impose duty? These alternatives are not necessarily exclusive, but the interpretation of the thought will be determined in no small measure by where the stress is laid.  II. Views Maintained.  1. Agent of the Power:  The possibilities have been exhausted in the interpretations and applications advocated. It is not possible to classify on lines of the creeds, except very generally, for there is little uniformity of view existing within the various communions.  (1) Generally speaking, the Roman Catholic church gives to Peter a unique position. Her theologians also agree that all the powers and privileges of Peter descend to his successors in the vicarate of Christ. When the question is raised of the extension of these prerogatives beyond Peter and the popes, all sorts of views are held, concerning both the fact and the method of that extension.  (2) Among Protestants there is general agreement that the church is the agent of this power, but there is not uniformity as to the nature of the authority or the manner of its exercise.  (3) Some think that Peter has no peculiar relation to the keys; that these words were spoken to him only as the first who gave expression to that conception and experience, on the basis of which Jesus commits the keys of the kingdom to any believer in Him as the Christ of God.  We may summarize the more important views as to Peter thus:  (a) the power committed to him alone and exercised,  (i) at Pentecost, or  (ii) at Pentecost, Caesarea and other places;  (b) the power committed to Peter and to the other apostles, including Paul, discharged by them, and descended to no others;  (c) the power conferred on Peter officially and on his official successors;  (d) the power conferred on Peter and the other apostles and to such as hold their place in the church;  (e) that the power belongs to Peter as representative of the church, and so to the church to be exercised  (i) by the officials of the church,  (ii) by the officials and those to whom they commit it,  (iii) by all priests and persons allowed to represent the church, de facto,  (iv) by the church in its councils, or other formal and official decisions,  (v) by the church in less formal way than (iv),  (vi) by all members the church as representing it without specific commission;  (f) that it belongs to the Christian as such, and so is imposed upon, or offered to, all Christians.  2. Nature of the Power:  There is general-not absolute-agreement that the holder of the keys is to admit men into the kingdom. It is not agreed that the holder of the keys may, or can, determine who are members of the kingdom. Both sides are-taken. Some think that the power is that of announcing authoritatively the conditions of entrance, while others insist that the holder of the keys also determines what individuals have accepted the conditions.  3. Scope of the Power:  (1) There is strong support for the view that the primary function of the keys lies in determining the teaching of the kingdom, maintaining purity of doctrine. Emphasis is laid on the use of the neuter, "whatsoever"-not "whomsoever"-with the binding and loosing. This would lead, however, to the secondary and implied function of declaring who had or had not accepted the teaching of the kingdom.  (2) In the Roman Catholic church we find insistence on distinguishing between the general authority of the keys in all affairs of the church and religion, and the binding and loosing which they specifically apply to absolution. Only on this last are Catholics in full agreement. That the church administers salvation is held by Roman and Greek Catholics and by not a few Protestants, although Protestants do not, as a rule, claim exclusive power in salvation as do the others. Absolution is held to be a general (derived) priestly function, while the authority of the keys resides in the pope alone.  (3) Eminent Catholic authorities admit that the Fathers generally understood the keys to signify the power of forgiving sins, and that they seldom make any reference to the supremacy of Peter. But they claim that rarely the Fathers do take "Christ's promise in the fuller meaning of the gift of authority over the church." Suarez was the first to develop the doctrine that it conferred on Peter and his successors authority in its widest sense, administrative and legislative.  (4) The extension of the authority of the keys to include civil matters is a contention of the Roman church, shared in modified form by some Protestants. Indeed the relation of ecclesiastical to civil authority must be said still to be awaiting clear definition in Protestantism. Macedo (De Clavibus Petri) claims theologians of the church for the civil authority of the keys. Joyce in the Catholic Encyclopedia affirms that he is unable to verify this claim, but, on the contrary, finds that the opponents of the extension of the authority of the church to civil matters use  Matthew 16:19  in support of their position on the ground that to Peter were committed the keys of the kingdom of heaven, not of the kingdoms of this world.  III. Data for Deciding the Questions Involved.  1. Passages Employing the Terms "Key," "Binding and Loosing":  We must first examine the Scriptures employing the terms we seek to define.  (1)  Matthew 16:19 , the crucial passage, is part of paragraph over which there is no end of controversy. The incident at Caesarea Philippi was understood then and afterward to mark an epoch in the life and teaching of Jesus. Having elicited Peter's confession, Jesus pronounces a benediction on him because his insight represented a Divinely mediated experience of fundamental significance in His own plan and mission. Jesus goes on to say: "And I also say unto thee, that thou art Peter ("a stone"), and upon this rock I will build my church; and the gates of Hades shall not prevail against it" ( Matthew 16:18 ). The controversy rages about "Peter" (petros) and the "rock" (petra), "gates of Hades," and "prevail against it." Are the church to be built on the rock and the kingdom whose keys are to be given to Peter the same? Such a shifting of figure is not conclusive against the thought. Perhaps the church is the organic form of the kingdom, its personal content and expression on earth at any given time. This church exists wherever men consciously accept and are included in the kingdom. The kingdom will always embrace influences, institutions, individuals, not be reckoned in any organized or visible church. The church has never had-in the nature of the case can never have-one complete organization including all the organized life of the kingdom, or even of the church. Any claims to this are contradicted by facts obvious at every moment of history. The change in figure from  Matthew 16:18  to 16:19 is not conclusive against supposing the church to be built in him. But it seems far better to understand that Peter is the first stone in the building, while the foundation is that vital experience in which Peter came to know Jesus as the Christ, the Son of God. On this is erected the church, out of those living stones (lithoi zontes,  1 Peter 2:4 ) that know and confess Jesus the Christ. The transition is thus easy to giving Peter the keys of the kingdom of heaven, and the reason for giving them to him rather than to any other may be found in the fact that he is now the first so to enter into the kingdom as to be fitted for church functions.  It is not needful to determine, for our purpose, the exact meaning of "gates of Hades" and their not prevailing against the church (compare various commentaries). It is clear that the church is to persist in the life of the world and so the kingdom will not lack organized and aggressive expression. Nor does the relation of binding and loosing depend at all upon the critical question of reading or omitting "and" between the two parts of the verse. The conviction could hardly be escaped that the latter function is intimately related to the former, and is either directly or indirectly involved within it.  (2) The plural "keys," occurs elsewhere only in  Revelation 1:18 , where the Christ represents Himself as holding the keys of death and of Hades. The word "Hades" might connect this with  Matthew 16:19 . The immediate occasion for the statement is that He who was dead, is alive; He has not only overcome death in His own person but has conquered it and its realm, so that they can no more have power except as subject to Him, since He holds their keys. Men on earth will either fall under the power of death and Hades or they must enter the kingdom of heaven. If the living Christ has the keys of the kingdom in the hands of Peter, or other friends, and holds the keys of its enemies in His own hands, the work will go on with success. It is not certain that the two passages can properly be so closely connected, but they thus afford just the assurance that is contained for the churches in Revelation.  (3) In  Revelation 3:7  Christ appears in the character, "he that is holy, he that is true, he that hath the key (singular) of David, he that openeth and none can shut, and that shutteth and none openeth." The idea is not restricted but indicates mastery over all things in the Messianic kingdom, its own operations and all forms of opposition. In the next verse, as a specific instance, He has set before the church at Philadelphia an open door (opportunity and progress) which none can shut. Compare as to this  Ephesians 1:22 .  (4) It seems to be taken for granted that Jesus, in  Matthew 16:19 , had direct reference to  Isaiah 22:22 , yet the passage is not Messianic except in a general sense and on the assumption that the power of Yahweh over the nations in the Old Testament is wielded by the Christ in the New Testament (see JEHOVAH; LORD). Eliakim is to have absolute power, holding the key of the house of David. The use of the words "open" and "shut," as well as the general conception, connects the passage rather with  Revelation 3:7 .  (5)  Revelation 9:1 ;  Revelation 20:1  are to be taken together. "The key of the pit of the abyss" in the hands of the angel or angels signifies, in these specific circumstances, the same power as that indicated in 1:18.  (6) In  Luke 11:52  Jesus pronounces a woe upon the "lawyers" who had "taken away the key of knowledge" from the people, neither entering in nor allowing those about to go in, to enter. The knowledge of God and Divine things was in the control, in great measure, of these scribes. This connects the figure directly with the idea of  Matthew 16:19 , and the connection is emphasized by comparing  Matthew 23:2  ff; and is made definite by the word of Jesus in  Matthew 13:52  with which is to be compared  Luke 12:42 , where it would not be allowable, to suppose that Jesus meant to limit the idea of "the faithful and wise steward" to Peter. This passage with the references seems to be highly important for our subject.  2. Related Passages:  Light is to be drawn from several passages that do not use the exact terms of  Matthew 16:19 , but that deal with the same general ideas.  (1)  Matthew 18:18  places the responsibility for binding and loosing on all disciples (18:1), and the reason is explained in the assured presence of the Christ Himself in any company of two or three who have come together in prayer touching any matter in His name, i.e. as His representatives. The immediate reference is to matters of discipline in the effort to rescue any "brother" from sin. The passage is to be taken of sin generally, for the reading "against thee" (18:15) is to be rejected, in spite of both revised versions The reference of binding and loosing here to the man is conclusive against limiting the idea in 16:19 to teaching (compare also  Luke 17:1  ff;). It is also to be noted that the responsibility is placed upon the individual Christian to cooperate with others when necessary.  (2)  Matthew 9:8  shows that the multitude recognized that God had given power on earth to pronounce forgiveness of sins, and apparently they do not limit this power to the Divine Person, for they do not yet know Him as such.  (3)  James 5:14  ff; recognizes the value of elders, and probably of others also, in securing the forgiveness of them that have sinned.  (4) What one must regard as the proper starting-point for studying this subject is  John 20:21  ff;. Appearing to ten of the apostles and to others on the first night after the resurrection, Jesus says: "As the Father sent me, even so send I you. And when he had said this, he breathed on them, and saith unto them, Whose soever sins ye forgive, they are forgiven unto them; whose soever ye retain, they are retained." By comparing this with the corresponding account in  Luke 24  we see that Jesus is directing that they shall carry on His work (see also  John 14:12-14 ;  John 15:15, 16 ), that He teaches them at length of the nature of His work as seen in the Old Testament, and that the method of their work is to be preaching repentance and remission of sins in His name among all nations. Significant for our purpose are the presence of others than the apostles, the gift of the Holy Spirit, His own self-projection in His messengers, and the solemn statement that the sins of men will be retained or forgiven as it is done through these followers.  3. Examples of Excercise of This Power:  (1) It is remarkable that there is no distinct reference to this authority of the keys in the records of the work of the apostles and others in the New Testament. Their consciousness seems most of all to have been dominated by the fact that they were witnesses of Jesus, and this corresponds exactly with the point of emphasis in all the various forms and occasions of the giving of the commission (see  Acts 2:32 ;  Acts 3:15 ;  Acts 4:33 ;  Acts 5:32 ;  Acts 10:39, 41 ; 13:31  1 Peter 5:1 ; compare Carver, Missions in the Plan of the Ages). It is said of Paul and Barnabas ( Acts 14:27 ) that after their first missionary journey they rehearsed to the church at Antioch "all things that God had done with them, and that he had opened a door of faith unto the Gentiles." At Pentecost and at other times Peter was the chief speaker, and so opened the door of the kingdom. Referring to his preaching to Cornelius and his friends, Peter reminds the saints in the conference at Jerusalem ( Acts 15 ) that God made choice among them, that by his mouth the Gentiles should hear the word of God and believe, but this was said by way of conciliating the Jewish party and not as claiming any priority in authority. It was Philip, the deacon-evangelist, who first preached to the Samaritans ( Acts 8 ), and some "men of Cyprus and Cyrene, who, when they were come to Antioch, spake unto the Greeks also, preaching the Lord Jesus" ( Acts 11:20 ), the first example of "opening a door of faith" to full heathen. Peter appears in the Jerusalem conference with no authority above that of other apostles and elders. By reference to  Galatians 2  we see that Paul was here only as a matter of prudence and fraternity, not recognizing any authority to legislate for his churches or his ministry. The decision there reached is promulgated as that of the brethren as a body, loosing all the law of Moses save four matters that were "necessary" on account of fundamental morals and of the universal presence of Jews in every city ( Acts 15:20, 28 f ). In the sense of teaching Christian conduct all Paul's letters are examples of binding and loosing.  (2) As to binding and loosing sins Peter speaks in the cases of Ananias and Sapphira ( Acts 5 ), Simon Magus ( Acts 8 ), and in deciding upon the baptism of Cornelius and his household ( Acts 10:48 ). Paul speaks with equal boldness in the judgment of Elymas ( Acts 13:10 ), where we are told that he was under the Spirit; passes upon the faith of a dozen men at Ephesus, and requires their new baptism after instruction ( Acts 19:3-7 ); commands the church at Corinth to turn over to Satan the incestuous man ( 1 Corinthians 5:5 ; compare  1 Timothy 1:20 ), and later urges the man's restoration to loving fellowship, declaring that he has been forgiven ( 2 Corinthians 2:5 ). Obscure men like Philip ( Acts 8 ) and Ananias of Damascus in the case of Paul himself ( Acts 9 ) exercised the same sort of judgment as to the forgiveness and reception of men into the fellowship.  IV. Conclusion.  1. Nature of the Power:  We sum up what seems to be the teaching of Scripture. We conclude that the power is not a special privilege and extraordinary authority, but a responsibility entrusted by Jesus Christ as the method of extending His work. There is in it nothing magical, mysterious, or arbitrary; not ecclesiastical or official, but spiritual and primarily personal. The keys of the kingdom of heaven are first of all the gospel of salvation through Jesus Christ. By this means men are admitted into the kingdom. The fully attested method of using the keys is that of witnessing personally to an experience of Jesus Christ. He was conferring power for saving and not for barring from salvation. Let it be borne in mind always that Jesus was offering Peter not power but duty, not privilege but responsibility. Neither of these terms, "power" and "privilege," that have come to be associated with the gift of the keys occurs with that gift in the words of the Master. The keys are primarily for admitting to the kingdom of heaven, not for barring from the church.  2. Agent of the Power:  The holder of the keys is any man with that experience that called forth from Jesus the assurance that Peter should have the keys. Such a man will be in fellowship and cooperation with like men, in a church, and the Spirit of Jesus will be present in them, so that their decisions and their testimony will be His as well as theirs. There is a corporate, or church, agency, therefore, and the man who would ignore that lacks the experience or the Spirit needful for the use of the keys. Yet the church is never to overshadow or exclude the individual responsibility and authority.  3. Scope of the Power:  It is to be understood that the keys of the kingdom of heaven confer no political authority or power, save that of holy and redemptive influence. The kingdom of Jesus is not of this world. Its power is spiritual and is to be exercised always primarily in the saving of men. Men do not need to be locked out of the kingdom. They are out, and too contented to remain so. It does happen that evil men seek to take possession of the kingdom for evil ends, and then it is that the authority rests in spiritual men to exclude. Men that are to be brought into the kingdom of heaven are now in sin, and where the duty of releasing them is not discharged by Christians, the sinners are left bound in their sins.  There is also involved of necessity the duty of declaring not only the conditions of entrance into the kingdom, but the courses of conduct appropriate to the kingdom. It is thus that binding and loosing in teaching devolve upon the holders of the keys. To that extent, and in that sense, alone, is there the power of "legislating" within the kingdom. This is only interpreting and applying the principles that are given us in the Scriptures.  Seefurther ABSOLUTION; IMPOSITION OF HANDS; PETER; ROCK.  William Owen Carver  POWER OF KEYS  See  KEYS, POWER OF THE .
UNCLEANNESS|     un-klen'-nes:  I. TERMS  1. In the Old Testament (Hebrew)  2. In the New Testament  3. In the Septuagint  II. POSSIBLE RELATION OF ISRAEL'S LAWS ON UNCLEANNESS WITH THE LAWS OF TABOO AMONG THE NATIONS  III. TEACHING AS TO UNCLEANNESS  1. In the Old Testament  2. In the Apocrypha  3. In the New Testament  LITERATURE  I. Terms.  1. In the Old Testament (Hebrew):  Tum'ah, "uncleanness," "defilement," occurs 26 times ( Leviticus 7:20, 21 ;  Leviticus 14:19 ;  Leviticus 15:3, 15, 26, 30, 31 , etc.). niddah, "separation," "impurity," occurs in  Leviticus 20:21   Ezra 9:11   Zechariah 13:1 . 'erwah, occurs in  Deuteronomy 23:14 . 'erwath dabhar, "unclean thing" ( Deuteronomy 24:1 ) is translated "uncleanness" in the King James Version. The adjective Tame', "defiled," "unclean," occurs 72 times (over half in Leviticus), but is never translated "uncleanness," but always "unclean." The verb Tame', "to make" or "declare unclean," occurs often. Other Hebrew verbs "to defile" are ga'al, chalal, chaneph, Tanaph, `alal, `anah.  2. In the New Testament:  The Greek word for "uncleanness" is akatharsia, which occurs 10 times ( Matthew 23:27   Romans 1:24 ;  Romans 6:19   2 Corinthians 12:21 , etc.). miasmos, "pollution," occurs only in  2 Peter 2:10 . The adjective akathartos, "unclean," occurs 31 times, 23 times in reference to unclean spirits (Luke once using the expression "unclean demon," 4:33), 4 times to ceremonial uncleanness (thee by Peter and one by John the revelator), and 4 times to moral uncleanness (three by Paul and one by John the revelator). Koinos, "common," "unclean," occurs 8 times in the sense of "unclean" ( Mark 7:2, 5   Acts 10:14, 28 ;  Acts 11:8   Romans 14:14   Revelation 21:27 ). The verb koinoo, "to defile," occurs 11 times ( Matthew 15:11, 18, 20   Mark 7:15 , etc.). miaino, "to defile," occurs 5 times ( John 18:28   Titus 1:15   Hebrews 12:15   Jude 1:8 ). moluno, "to make filthy," occurs 3 times ( 1 Corinthians 8:7   Revelation 3:4 ;  Revelation 14:4 ). spiloo, occurs twice ( James 3:6   Jude 1:23 ) and phtheiro, "to corrupt," occurs 7 times in Greek, once in English Versions of the Bible ( 1 Corinthians 3:17 ).  3. In the Septuagint:  Akatharsia, "uncleanness," occurs 59 times in Septuagint (including many instances in apocryphal books) (1 and 2 Esdras, Tobit, 1 and 2 Maccabees, etc.). Akathartos, "unclean," occurs 134 times in the Septuagint (including one example in 1 Maccabees). Koinos, "unclean," and koinoo, "to make unclean," occur in Esther, Proverbs, Wisdom, 1, 2, 3 and 4 Maccabees). Miaino, "to defile," occurs over 100 times. Moluno, "to make filthy," occurs 18 times (both in the Old Testament and in the Apocrypha).  II. Possible Relation of Israel's Laws on Uncleanness with the Laws of Taboo among the Nations:  W. R. Smith (Lectures on the Religion of the Semites, 152-55) thinks there is a kinship between Israel's laws of uncleanness and the heathen taboo. Frazer, in The Golden Bough, shows numerous examples of the taboo among various tribes and nations which present striking similarity to some of Israel's laws on uncleanness. But does this diminish our respect for the Old Testament laws on uncleanness? Might not Yahweh use this natural religious perception of men as to an intrinsic distinction between clean and unclean in training Israel to a realization of a higher conception-the real difference between sin and holiness, i.e. between moral defilement and moral purification? The hand of Yahweh is visible even in the development of Israel's rudimentary laws on ceremonial uncleanness. They are not explicable on purely naturalistic grounds, but Yahweh is training a people to be holy, and so He starts on the lower plane of ceremonial uncleanness and cleanness (see  Leviticus 11:44  as to the purpose of Yahweh in establishing these laws respecting clean and unclean animals).  III. Teaching as to Uncleanness.  1. In the Old Testament:  Each term above for uncleanness is used in two senses:  (a) to signify ceremonial uncleanness, which is the most usual significance of the term in the Old Testament;  (b) but, in the Prophets, to emphasize moral, rather than ceremonial, uncleanness. There are four principal spheres of uncleanness in the Old Testament:  (1) Uncleanness in the Matter of Food.  The law as to clean and unclean beasts is laid down in  Leviticus 11:1-23 . Notice that the law does not extend to vegetable foods, as does a similar law in the Egyptian religion. Four kinds of beasts are named as fit for food:  (a) among quadrupeds, those that both chew the cud and part the hoof;  (b) among fishes, only those having both fins and scales;  (c) most birds or fowls, except, in the main, birds of prey and those noted for uncleanness of habits, are permitted;  (d) of insects those that have legs above the feet to leap withal (e.g. the cricket, the grasshopper, etc.), but those that go on all four, or have many feet, or go upon the belly (e.g. worms, snakes, lizards, etc.), are forbidden.  See , further, FOOD.  (2) Uncleanness Connected with the Functions of Reproduction (Leviticus 12 and 15).  In  Leviticus 15:2-18 , we find the laws applied to issues of men; in 15:19;, to the issues of women. Not only is the man or woman unclean because of the issue, whether normal or abnormal, but the bed on which they lie, or whatever or whoever is touched by them while they are in this state, is unclean. The uncleanness lasts seven days from the cessation of the issue. To become clean men must wash their clothes and batheir bodies (though this requirement is not made of women), and both men and women must offer through the priest a pair of turtle-doves, or two young pigeons ( Leviticus 15 ). According to  Leviticus 13 , the woman who conceives and bears a child is unclean. This uncleanness lasts seven days if the child born is a male, but 14 days if the child is a female. However, there is a partial uncleanness of the mother that continues 40 days from the birth of a male, 80 days from the birth of a female, at the end of which period she is purified by offering a lamb and a young pigeon (or turtle-dove), or if too poor to offer a lamb she may substitute one of the birds for the lamb.  (3) Uncleanness Connected with Leprosy.  According to  Leviticus 14  and 15, the leper was regarded as under the stroke of God, and so was deemed unclean. The leper (so adjudged by the priest) must separate himself from others, with torn clothes, disheveled hair, and crying with covered lips, "Unclean! Unclean!" That is, he was regarded as a dead man, and therefore unclean and so must live secluded from others.  See , further, LEPER, LEPROSY.  (4) Uncleanness Associated with Death.  According to Leviticus 15:24-40, anyone who touched a dead beast, whether unclean or clean, was rendered unclean. According to  Numbers 19:11-22 , anyone touching the corpse of a human being is unclean. Likewise, everyone in the tent, or who enters the tent, where lies a dead man, is unclean seven days. Even the open vessels in the tent with a dead person are unclean seven days. Whoever, furthermore, touched a dead man's bone or grave was unclean seven days. Purification, in all these cases of uncleanness as related to death, was secured by sprinkling the ashes of a red heifer with living water upon the unclean person, or object, on the 3rd and 7th days.  See  PURIFICATION .  2. In the Apocrypha:  In Tobit 3:7-9; 6:13, 14; 7:11; 8:1-3; 1 Maccabees 1:41-53, and in other books, we find the same laws on uncleanness recognized by the descendants of Abraham. It was regarded as abominable to sacrifice other animals (swine for instance) than those prescribed by Yahweh. There is a growing sense in Israel during this period, that all customs and all conduct of the heathen are unclean. Witness the resistance of the loyal Jews to the demands of Antiochus Epiphanes (1 Maccabees 1; 2; 6; 7). The sense of ceremonial uncleanness was still a conspicuous element in the religious consciousness of the Jews in the inter-Biblical period. But the training of God in ceremonial purification and in the moral and spiritual teachings of the prophets had prepared the way for an advance in moral cleanness (both in thought and in practice).  3. In the New Testament:  By the days of Jesus the scribes and rabbis had wrought out a most cumbrous system of ceremonial uncleanness and purification. Nor did they claim that all their teachings on this subject were found in the Old Testament. See  TRADITION . This is fitly illustrated in the New Testament in the washing of hands. See  UNWASHEN . When the Mishna (the collection of rabbinic teachings) was produced, the largest book was devoted to the laws of purification, 30 chapters being used to describe the purification of vessels alone.  See  John 2:1-11 , and note how the Jews had six stone waterpots for purification at the wedding in Cana. See  John 3:25  as to the controversy on purification between John's disciples and the Jews. This question of cleanness and uncleanness was a tremendous issue with every Jew. He must keep himself ceremonially clean if he would be righteous and win the approval of God.  Jesus utterly disregarded for Himself these laws of purification, though He orders the cleansed leper to return to the priest and secure his certificate of cleansing. He did not wash His hands before eating, and His disciples followed His example. Therefore, the Pharisees challenged Him to give an account of His course and that of His disciples ( Matthew 15:3-20  =  Mark 7:6-23 ). Jesus then enunciated the great principle that there is no ceremonial, but only moral and spiritual, uncleanness. Not what goes into a man from hands that touch unclean things defiles the man, but the things that come out of his heart, evil thoughts, hatred, adultery, murder, etc., these defile the man.  Paul likewise regarded nothing as unclean of itself ( Romans 14:14, 20   Titus 1:15 ), yet no man should violate the scruples of his own conscience or that of his brother (and thus put a stumblingblock in his way). Love, not ceremonialism is the supreme law of the Christian. Paul, in submitting to the vow of purification in Jerusalem, set an example of this principle ( Acts 21:26 ).  See  also  CRIMES ;  PUNISHMENTS .  LITERATURE.  W. R. Smith, Lectures on the Religion of the Semites (especially pp. 152-55, on taboo, and pp. 455, 456, on the uncleanness of sexual intercourse); Frazer, The Golden Bough (examples of taboo and similar laws and customs among various nations); Frazer, article "Taboo" in Encyclopedia Britannica, 9th edition; Benzinger, Hebrew Archaeology; Nowack, Hebrew Archaeology; Kellogg, commentary on "Leviticus" (Expositor's Bible); Kalisch, Leviticus; Dillmann-Ryssel, Leviticus; Schultz, Dillmann, Smend, Marti, Davidson, in their Old Testament Theologies, give useful hints on this subject; article "Casuistry" (Hebrew) in ERE, III, is valuable.  Charles B. Williams  WATER OF SEPARATION (OR OF UNCLEANNESS)  See  DEFILEMENT ;  SEPARATION ; UNCLEANNESS.
CHALDEANS|   CHALDEA;   kal-de'-a, kal-de'-anz (kasdim, 'erets kasdim; Chaldaia, Chaldaioi):  1. Geographical Position  Seats of the Chaldeans  2. Originally Sumero-Akkadian  3. History of the Chaldean Tribes  4. Merodach-baladan and Sargon of Assyria  5. Suzubu  6. Musezib-Marduk  7. Merodach-baladan's Son  8. Na'id-Marduk  9. Palia  10. Nabu-bel-sumati and Others  His Tragic End  11. The Chaldeans Forge Ahead  12. Nabopolassar's Revolt against Assyria  13. The Chaldeans as Learned Men  "Kasdim," "land of Kasdim" or "the Chaldeans," is the usual designation, in the Old Testament, for the land and the people ( Jeremiah 50:10 ;  Jeremiah 51:24 ;  Jeremiah 24:5 ;  Jeremiah 25:12 ). The corresponding Greek form with l for s follows the Assyr-Bab Kaldu, mat Kaldi, "Chaldean, land of the Chaldeans." Kasdim is possibly connected with the name of Kesed (Kesedh), nephew of Abraham ( Genesis 22:22 ), and may be derived from the Assyr-Bab root kasadu, "to capture," suggesting that the Chaldeans were originally tribes of nomadic plunderers (compare  Job 1:17 ).  1. Geographical Position:  Seats of the Chaldeans:  In its widest acceptation, Chaldea is the name of the whole of Babylonia, owing to the fact that the Chaldeans had given more than one king to the country. In the strict sense, however, their domain was the tract at the Northwest end of the Persian Gulf, which was often called by the Assyro-Babylonians mat Tamtim, "the Land of the Sea," a province of unknown extent. When these tribes migrated into Babylonia is uncertain, as is also their original home; but as they are closely related to the Arameans, it is possible that their first settlements lay in the neighborhood of the Aramean states bordering on the Holy Land. Tiglath-pileser IV (742 B.C.) speaks of the ra'asani or chiefs of the Kaldu, and the mention of numerous Aramean tribes in Babylonia itself shows that their example of settling there soon found imitators, as did the Anglo-Saxons when they invaded Britain. Among the Chaldean tribes in Babylonia may be mentioned Bit Amukkani, whose capital was Sapia; Bit Yakin which furnished the dynasty to which Merodach-baladan II belonged; and probably also Bit Dakkuri, as all three lay near the Persian Gulf. Sargon of Assyria excludes Bit-Amukkani and Bit-Dakkuri, and speaks of "the whole of the land of Chaldea, as much as there is; the land of Bit-Yakini, on the shore of the Salt River (the Persian Gulf), to the border of Tilmun" (the island of Bahrein and the adjacent mainland) (Pavement Inscr., IV, ll. 82, 83, 85, 86). It was probably the influence of theBabylonians among whom they settled which changed these nomads into city-dwellers. Sennacherib refers to 75 (var. 89) strong cities and fortresses of Chaldea, and 420 (var. 800) smaller towns which were around them; and there were also Chaldeans (and Arameans) in Erech, Nippur (Calneh), Kis, Hursag-kalama, Cuthah, and probably Babylon.  2. Originally Sumero-Akkadian:  The "land of the sea" (mat Tamtim)is mentioned in the chronicle of the early Babylonian kings (rev. 14) as being governed by Ea-gamil, contemporary of Samsu-Titana (circa 1900 B.C.), but at that period it was apparently one of the original Sumero-Akkadian states of Babylonia. It is doubtful whether, at that early date, the Chaldeans had entered Babylonia and founded settlements there, though the record mentions Arameans somewhat later on.  3. History of the Chaldean Tribes:  One of the earliest references to the Chaldeans is that of Shalmaneser II of Assyria, who, on invading Babylonia in the eponymy of Belbunaya (851 B.C.), captured the city Baqani, which belonged to Adini of the Chaldean tribe of Dakuri. After plundering and destroying the place, Shalmaneser attacked Enzudi, the capital, whereupon Adini submitted and paid tribute. On this occasion Yakini of "the Land of the Sea," also paid tribute, as did Musallim-Marduk, son of Amukkani (the Bit-Amukkani mentioned above). The next Assyrian ruler to mention the country is Adadnirari III (810 B.C.), who speaks of all the kings of the Chaldeans, which evidently refers to the various states into which the Chaldean tribes were divided. Later on, Sargon of Assyria, in his 12th year, decided to break the power of Merodach-baladan, who had made himself master of Babylon. To effect this, he first defeated the Gambulians, who were the Chaldean king's supporters, and the Elamites, his allies over the border. The Chaldean, however, did not await the Assyrian king's attack, but escaped to Yatburu in Elam, leaving considerable spoil behind him.  4. Merodach-baladan and Sargon of Assyria:  Though extensive operations were carried out, and much booty taken, the end of the campaign seems only to have come two years later, when Dur-Yakin was destroyed by fire and reduced to ruins. In the "Annals of Hall XIV" Sargon claims to have taken Merodach-baladan prisoner, but this seems doubtful. Merodach-baladan fled, but returned and mounted the throne again on Sargon's death in 705 B.C. Six months later Sennacherib, in his turn, attacked him, and he again sought safety in flight.  5. Suzubu:  A Chaldean chief named Suzubu, however, now came forward, and proclaimed himself king of Babylon, but being defeated, he likewise fled. Later on, Sennacherib attacked the Chaldeans at Nagitu and other settlements in Elamite-territory which Merodach-baladan and his followers had founded.  6. Musezib-Marduk:  After the death of Merodach-baladan, yet another Chaldean, whom Sennacherib calls likewise Suzubu, but whose full name was Musezib-Marduk, mounted the Babylonian throne. This ruler applied for help against Sennacherib of Assyria to Umman-menanu, the king of Elam, who, taking the bribe which was offered, supported him with an armed force, and a battle was fought at Chalule on the Tigris, in which Sennacherib claims the victory-probably rightly. Musezib-Marduk reigned 4 years, and was taken prisoner by his whilom ally, Umman-menanu, who sent him to Assyria.  7. Merodach-baladan's Son:  In the reign of Esarhaddon, Nabu-zer-napistilisir, one of the sons of Merodach-baladan, gathered an army at Larsa, but was defeated by the Assyrians, and fled to Elam. The king of that country, however, wishing to be on friendly terms with Esarhaddon, captured him and put him to death.  8. Na'id-Marduk:  This prince had a brother named Na'id-Marduk, who, not feeling himself safe in the country which had acted treacherously toward his house, fled, and made submission to Esarhaddon, who received him favorably, and restored to him the dominion of the "Land of the Sea." This moderation secured the fidelity of the Chaldeans, and when the Elamite Urtaku sent inviting them to revolt against their suzerain, they answered to the effect that Na'id-Marduk was their lord, and they were the servants of the king of Assyria. This took place probably about 650 B.C., in the reign of Esarhaddon's son Assur-bani-apli (see OSNAPPAR).  9. Palia:  Hostility to Assyria, however, continued to exist in the tribe, Palia, grandson of Merodach-baladan, being one of the prisoners taken by Assur-bani-apli's troops in their operations against the Gambulians (a Babylonian, and perhaps a Chaldean tribe) later on. It was only during the struggle of Samas-sumukin (Saosduchimos), king of Babylon, Assur-banl-apli's brother, however, that they took sides against Assyria as a nationality. This change was due to the invitation of the Babylonian king-who may have been regarded, rather than Assur-bani-apli, as their overlord.  10. Nabu-bel-sumati:  The chief of the Chaldeans was at that time another grandson of Merodach-baladan, Nabu-bel-sumati, who seized the Assyrians in his domain, and placed them in bonds. The Chaldeans suffered, with the rest, in the great defeat of the Babylonian and allied forces, when Babylon and the chief cities of the land fell. Mannu-ki-Babili of the Dakkurians, Ea-sum-ikisa of Bit-Amukkani, with other Chaldean states, were punished for their complicity in Samas-sum-ukin's revolt, while Nabu-bel-sumati fled and found refuge at the court of Indabigas, king of Elam. Assur-bani-apli at once demanded his surrender, but civil war in Elam broke out, in which Indabigas was slain, and Ummanaldas mounted the throne.  His Tragic End:  This demand was now renewed, and Nabu-bel-sumati, fearing that he would be surrendered, decided to end his life. He therefore directed his armor-bearer to dispatch him, and each ran the other through with his sword. The prince's corpse, with the head of his armor-bearer, were then sent, with some of the Chaldean fugitives, to Assyria, and presented to the king. Thus ended, for a time, Chaldean ambition in Babylonia and in the domain of eastern politics.  11. The Chaldeans Forge Ahead:  With the death of Assur-bani-apli, which took place about 626 B.C., the power of Assyria fell, his successors being probably far less capable men than he. This gave occasion for many plots against the Assyrian empire, and the Chaldeans probably took part in the general movement. In the time of Saracus (Sin-sarra-iskun of Assyria, circa 620 B.C.) Busalossor would seem to have been appointed general of the forces in Babylonia in consequence of an apprehended invasion of barbarians from the sea (the Persian Gulf) (Eusebius, Chronicon, book i).  12. Nabopolassar's Revolt against Assyria:  The new general, however, revolted against the Assyrians, and made himself master of Babylonia. As, in other cases, the Assyrians seem to have been exceedingly faithful to their king, it has been thought possible that this general, who was none other than Nabopolassar, the father of Nebuchadpolassar's rezzar, was not really an Assyrian, but a Babylonian, and probably a Chaldean. This theory; if correct, would explain how Babylonia, in its fullest sense, obtained the name of Chaldea, and was no longer known as the land of Shinar ( Genesis 10:10 ). The reputation of Merodach-baladan, the contemporary of Hezekiah, may have been partly responsible for the change of name.  13. The Chaldeans as Learned Men:  It was not in the restricted sense, but as a synonym of Babylonian, that the name Chaldean obtained the signification of "wise man." That the Chaldeans in the restricted and correct sense were more learned than, or even as learned as, the Babylonians in general, is unlikely. Moreover, the native inscriptions give no indication that this was the case. The Babylonians in general, on the other hand, were enthusiastic students from very early times. From their inscriptions, it is certain that among their centers of learning may be classed Sippar and Larsa, the chief seats of sun-worship; Nippur, identified with the Calneh of  Genesis 10:10 ; Babylon, the capital; Borsippa in the neighborhood of Babylon; Ur of the Chaldees; and Erech. There is, also, every probability that this list could be extended, and will be extended, when we know more; for wherever an important temple existed, there was to be found also a priestly school. "The learning of the Chaldeans" ( Daniel 1:4 ;  Daniel 2:2 ;  Daniel 4:7 ;  Daniel 5:7, 11 ) comprised the old languages of Babylonia (the two dialects of Sumerian, with a certain knowledge of Kassite, which seems to have been allied to the Hittite; and other languages of the immediate neighborhood); some knowledge of astronomy and astrology; mathematics, which their sexagesimal system of numeration seems to have facilitated; and a certain amount of natural history. To this must be added a store of mythological learning, including legends of the Creation, the Flood (closely resembling in all its main points the account in the Bible), and apparently also the Temptation and the Fall. They had likewise a good knowledge of agriculture, and were no mean architects, as the many celebrated buildings of Babylonia show-compare not only the descriptions of the Temple of Belus (see BABEL, TOWER OF) and the Hanging Gardens, but also the remains of Gudea's great palace at Lagas (Tel-loh), where that ruler, who lived about 2500 B.C., is twice represented as an architect, with plan and with rule and measure. (These statues are now in the Louvre.) That their architecture never attained the elegance which characterized that of the West, is probably due to the absence of stone, necessitating the employment of brick as a substitute ( Genesis 11:3 ).  See BABYLONIA ;  SHINAR .  T. G. Pinches
CYRENIUS|The Grecized form of Quirinus. His full name was Publius Sulpicius Quirinus. Recent historical investigation has proved that Quirinus was governor of Cilicia, which was annexed to Syria at the time of our Lord's birth. Cilicia, which he ruled, being a province of Syria, he is called the governor, which he was de jure, of Syria. Some ten years afterwards he was appointed governor of Syria for the second time. During his tenure of office, at the time of our Lord's birth ( Luke 2:2 ), a "taxing" (R.V.,  "enrolment;" i.e.,  a registration) of the people was "first made;" i.e., was made for the first time under his government. (see  TAXING .) 
GISHPA|     gish'-pa (the King James Version Gispa; gishpa'): An officer of the Nethinim ( Nehemiah 11:21 ). A comparison with  Ezra 2:43  makes it probable that he is to be identified with Hasupha, and quite possible that this word is a corruption of Hasupha.
NAHALOL|   NAHALLAL;   na-hal'-al, na'-ha-lol.  See  NAHALAL .
OMAR|Eloquent, the son of Eliphaz, who was Esau's eldest son ( Genesis 36:11 -15). 
ILAI|An Ahohite, one of David's chief warriors ( 1 Chronicles 11:29 ); called also Zalmon ( 2 Samuel 23:28 ). 
DERBE|A small town on the eastern part of the upland plain of Lycaonia, about 20 miles from Lystra. Paul passed through Derbe on his route from Cilicia to Iconium, on his second missionary journey ( Acts 16:1 ), and probably also on his third journey ( 18:23 ;  19:1 ). On his first journey ( 14:20 ,  21) he came to Derbe from the other side; i.e., from Iconium. It was the native place of Gaius, one of Paul's companions ( 20:4 ). He did not here suffer persecution ( 2 Timothy 3:11 ). 
SERED|Fear, one of the sons of Zebulun ( Genesis 46:14 ). 
NAASHON|   ; NAASON; NAASSON  na'-a-shon, na-ash'-on, na'-a-son, na-as'-on (Naasson): the King James Version Greek form of "Nahshon" (thus, the Revised Version (British and American)) ( Matthew 1:4   Luke 3:32 ).
KIRJATHHUZOTH|City of streets,  Numbers 22:39 , a Moabite city, which some identify with Kirjathaim. Balak here received and entertained Balaam, whom he had invited from Pethor, among the "mountains of the east," beyond the Euphrates, to lay his ban upon the Israelites, whose progress he had no hope otherwise of arresting. It was probably from the summit of Attarus, the high place near the city, that the soothsayer first saw the encampments of Israel. 
SHIMEON|Hearkening.  Ezra 10:31 . 
MINIAMIN|     min'-ya-min, mi-ni'-a-min (minydmin):  (1) A Levite who assisted Kore, the son of Imnah, in the distribution of the freewill offerings ( 2 Chronicles 31:15 ).  (2) A priestly family of the time of the high priest Joiakim ( Nehemiah 12:17 ), probably equals MIJAMIN (2).  (3) A priestly participant in the ceremony of the dedication of the wall ( Nehemiah 12:41 ).
CURES|   CURE;   kur: Represents the words gahah, marpe', raphdh; therapeuo, iasis. Gahah in  Proverbs 17:22  translated "medicine" means properly the removal of a bandage from a healed wound, and, is used figuratively in  Hosea 5:13 ; marpe', "healing," is used in the sense of deliverance of the city in  Jeremiah 33:6 ; with a negative particle in  2 Chronicles 21:18  it is used to describe the bowel disease of Jehoram as incurable. The Greek words are used of physical cures (iasis in  Luke 13:32 ) as contradistinguished from the casting out of demons as  Matthew 17:16   Luke 7:21   John 5:10 . Cure is only used in the New Testament in the sense of physical healing; in the Old Testament usually in the sense of spiritual or national deliverance from danger.  Alex. Macalister
ROI|   EL   ( Genesis 16:13  margin).  See  GOD, NAMES OF .
MITHKAH|     mith'-ka (mithqah "sweetness"; the King James Version Mithcah): Name given owing to sweetness of pasture or water. A desert camp of the Israelites between Terah and Hashmonah ( Numbers 33:28 f ).  See  WANDERINGS OF ISRAEL .
ELTEKE|   ; ELTEKEH  el'-te-ke, ('elteqeh  Joshua 19:44 , 'elteqe' ( Joshua 21:23 ); Codex Vaticanus Alkatha; Codex Alexandrinus, Elketho):  A place in the territory of Dan named between Ekron and Gibbethon ( Joshua 19:44 ), and again between Beth-horon and Gibbethon, as given to the Kohathite Levites ( Joshua 21:23 ). It is probably identical with the Assyrian Altaqu, where Sennacherib (Hexagon prism inscrip.) claims to have defeated the allied armies of the Philistines and the Egyptians. It should probably be sought somewhere East of Ekron. Beit Likia, the place marked Eltekeh on the PEF map, seems a position for such an encounter.  It is about 2 1/2 miles Southwest of Beth-horon the Upper.  W. Ewing
JORIM|     jor'-rim (Ioreim from yehoram, yoram): An ancestor of Jesus in Luke's genealogy ( Luke 3:29 ).
PALLU|Separated, the second son of Reuben ( 1 Chronicles 5:3 ); called Phallu,  Genesis 46:9 . He was the father of the Phalluites ( Exodus 6:14 ;  Numbers 26:5 ,  8). 
EBED|Slave, the father of Gaal, in whom the men of Shechem "put confidence" in their conspiracy against Abimelech ( Judges 9:26 ,  26,  30,  31). 
HESED|   , SON OF  he'-sed.  See  BEN-HESED .
JAHZEIAH|     ja-ze'-ya, ja'-ze-ya (yachzeyah, "Yah sees"): In  Ezra 10:15 , son of Tikvah, and a contemporary of Ezra. It is disputed whether he and Jonathan opposed or supported Ezra in the matter of prosecuting those who had married foreign wives = Ezekias, 1 Esdras 9:14, or Ezias.  See  JONATHAN, 9 .  Two translations of the Hebrew phrase (`amadh `al-zo'th) are given:  (1) "stood over this matter," i.e. supported Ezra; so the King James Version ("were employed in this matter"), and so Septuagint, 1 Esdras 9:14, the Revised Version margin. This is supported by 9:4, "Let now our princes be appointed for all the assembly," where the same phrase is found.  (2) the Revised Version (British and American) "stood up against this matter," so BDB, Gesenius, Bertheau, Stade.  Both translations can be supported by parallels in Hebrew. The context is better suited by the former rendering.  David Francis Roberts
HANES|A place in Egypt mentioned only in Isaiah 30:4 in connection with a reproof given to the Jews for trusting in Egypt. It was considered the same as Tahpanhes, a fortified town on the eastern frontier, but has been also identified as Ahnas-el-Medeeneh, 70 miles from Cairo. 
MAHSEIAH|     ma-se'-ya, ma-si'-a (machceyah, "Yah a refuge"): Grandfather of Baruch ( Jeremiah 32:12 ) and of Seraiah ( Jeremiah 51:59 ). The name (not to be confused with MAASEIAH (which see) as the King James Version has done even in the above passages) is spelt "Maaseas" (which see) in Baruch 1:1.
FASTS|   FEASTS AND   fests (mo`edh, "an appointed day" or "an assembling," chagh, from chaghagh, "to dance" or possibly "to make a pilgrimage"; tsom, "fast," ta`anith, "a day of affliction"):  I. PRE-EXILIC  A) Annual  1. Passover, 15th-22d Nican  2. Pentecost, 6th Ciwan) Pilgrimage  3. Tabernacles, 15th-22d Tishri) Festivals  4. Shemini `Atsereth, 23d Tishri  5. New Year, Feast of Trumpets, 1st Tishri  6. Atonement, 10th Tishri  B) Periodic  1. Weekly Sabbath  2. New Moon  3. Sabbath Year  4. Jubilee Year  II. POST-EXILIC  1. Feast of Dedication, 25th Kiclew  2. Fast of Esther, 13th 'Adhar  3. Feast of Purim, 14th 'Adhar  4. Fast of the Fourth Month, 17th Tammuz  5. Fast of the Fifth Month, 9th 'Abh  6. Fast of the Seventh Month, 3rd Tishri  7. Fast of the Tenth Month, 10th Tebheth  8. Feast of Acra, 23d Iyar  9. Feast of Nicanor, 18th 'Adhar  10. Feast of Woodcarrying, Midsummer Day, 15th 'Abh  11. New Year for Trees, 15th ShebhaT  12. Bi-weekly Fasts, Mondays and Thursdays after Festivals  13. Second Days of Festivals Instituted  14. New Modes of Observing Old Festivals Instituted  The Nature of the Hebrew Festivals:  The Hebrews had an abundance of holidays, some based, according to their tradition, on agriculture and the natural changes of times and seasons, some on historical events connected with the national or religious life of Israel, and still others simply on immemorial custom. in most instances two or more of these bases coexist, and the emphasis on the natural, the agricultural, the national, or the religious phase will vary with different writers, different context, or different times. Any classification of these feasts and fasts on the basis of original significance must therefore be imperfect.  We should rather classify them as preexilic and post-exilic, because the period of the Babylonian captivity marks a complete change, not only in the kinds of festivals instituted from time to time, but also in the manner of celebrating the old.  I. Pre-exilic.  The pre-exilic list includes the three pilgrimage festivals, the Passover week, Pentecost, and the Feast of Tabernacles, together with the Eighth Day of Assembly at the conclusion of the last of these feasts, and New Year and Atonement Days, the weekly Sabbath and the New Moon.  1. Observances Common to All:  The preexilic festivals were "holy convocations" ( Leviticus 23   Numbers 28 ). Special sacrifices were offered on them in addition to the daily offerings. These sacrifices, however, varied according to the character of the festival ( Numbers 28 ;  Numbers 29 ). On all of them trumpets (chatsotseroth) were blown while the burnt offerings and the peace-offerings were being sacrificed ( Numbers 10:10 ). They were all likened to the weekly Sabbath as days of rest, on which there must be complete suspension of all ordinary work ( Leviticus 16:29 ;  Leviticus 23:7, 8, 21, 24, 25, 28, 35, 36 ).  2. Significance of the Festivals:  The three pilgrimage festivals were known by that name because on them the Israelites gathered at Jerusalem to give thanks for their doubly joyful character. They were of agricultural significance as well as commemorative of national events. Thus, the Passover is connected with the barley harvest; at the same time it is the zeman cheruth, recalling the Exodus from Egypt ( Exodus 12:6   Leviticus 23:5, 8   Numbers 28:16-25   Deuteronomy 16:1-8 ).  Pentecost has an agricultural phase as chagh habikkurim, the celebration of the wheat harvest; it has a religious phase as zeman mattan Thorah in the Jewish liturgy, based on the rabbinical calculation which makes it the day of the giving of the Law, and this religious side has so completely overshadowed the agricultural that among modern Jews the Pentecost has become "confirmation day" ( Exodus 34:26   Leviticus 23:10-14   Numbers 28:26-31 ).  The Feast of Tabernacles is at once the general harvest festival, chagh he-'aciph, and the anniversary of the beginnings of the wanderings in the wilderness ( Exodus 23:16   Leviticus 23:33   Deuteronomy 16:13-15 ). The Eighth Day of Assembly immediately following the last day of Tabernacles ( Leviticus 23:36   Numbers 29:35   John 7:37 ) and closing the long cycle of Tishri festivals seems to have been merely a final day of rejoicing before the pilgrims returned to their homes.  New Year ( Leviticus 23:23-25   Numbers 29:1-6 ) and the Day of Atonement ( Leviticus 16:1 ;  Leviticus 23:26-32   Numbers 29:7-11 ) marked the turning of the year; primarily, perhaps, in the natural phenomena of Palestine, but also in the inner life of the nation and the individual. Hence, the religious significance of these days as days of judgment, penitence and forgiveness soon overshadowed any other significance they may have had. The temple ritual for these days, which is minutely described in the Old Testament and in the Talmud, was the most elaborate and impressive of the year. At the same time Atonement Day was socially an important day of rejoicing.  In addition to these annual festivals the pre-exilic Hebrews celebrated the Sabbath ( Numbers 28:9, 10   Leviticus 23:1-3 ) and the New Moon ( Numbers 10:10 ;  Numbers 28:11-15 ). By analogy to the weekly Sabbath, every seventh year was a Sabbath Year ( Exodus 23:11   Leviticus 25:1-7   Deuteronomy 15:1 ), and every cycle of seven Sabbath years was closed with a Jubilee Year ( Leviticus 25:8-18 ) somewhat after the analogy of the seven weeks counted before Pentecost.  For further details of all of these preexilic festivals see the separate articles.  II. Post-exilic.  In post-exilic times important historical events were made the basis for the institution of new fasts and feasts. When the first temple was destroyed and the people were carried into captivity, "the sacrifice of the body and one's own fat and blood" were substituted for that of animals (see Talmud, Berakhoth 17a). With such a view of their importance, fasts of all sorts were as a matter of course rapidly multiplied. (Note that the Day of Atonement was the only pre-exilic fast.) Of these post-exilic fasts and feasts, the Feast of Dedication (1 Maccabees 4:52-59;  John 10:22 ; Mishna, Ta`anith 2 10; Mo`edh QaTon 3 9; Josephus, Ant, XII, vii; Apion, II, xxxix) and the Feast of Purim ( Esther 3:7 ;  Esther 9:24 ; 2 Maccabees 15:36); and the fasts of the fourth ( Zechariah 8:19 ; Jeremiah 39; 52; Mishna, Ta`anith 4 6), the fifth ( Zechariah 7:3, 1 ;  Zechariah 8:19 ; Ta`anith 4 6), the seventh ( Zechariah 7:5 ;  Zechariah 8:19   Jeremiah 41:1   2 Kings 25:25 ; Cedher `Olam Rabba' 26; Meghillath Ta`anith c. 12), the tenth months ( Zechariah 8:19   2 Kings 25 ), and the Fast of Esther ( Esther 4:16 ;  Esther 9:31 ) have been preserved by Jewish tradition to this day. (The Feast of Dedication, the Feast of Purim and the Fast of Esther are described in separate articles.)  Significance:  The fasts of the fourth, fifth, seventh and tenth months are based on historical incidents connected with one or more national calamities. In several instances the rabbis have by close figuring been able to connect with the dates of the fasts as well as the feasts other important national events than those for which the days were primarily instituted. Not less than four incidents are connected with the fasts of the fourth month (17th of Tammuz):  (a) on this day the Israelites made the golden calf;  (b) Moses broke the tables of law;  (c) the daily sacrifices ceased for want of cattle when the city was closely besieged prior to the destruction of Jerusalem; and  (d) on this day Jerusalem was stormed by Nebuchadnezzar.  The fast of the fifth month (9th day of 'Abh) receives its significance from the fact that the First Temple was destroyed upon this day by Nebuchadnezzar, and the Second Temple on the same day of the year by Titus. In addition it is said that on this day Yahweh decreed that those who left Egypt should not enter the land of promise; the day is also the anniversary of the capture of the city of Bether by the Emperor Hadrian. The fast of the seventh month (the 3rd day of Tishri) commemorates the murder of Gedaliah at Mizpah. That of the tenth month (10th day of Tebheth) commemorates the beginning of the siege of Jerusalem by Nebuchadnezzar.  Other fasts and feasts no doubt were instituted on similar occasions and received a local or temporary observance, for example, the Feast of Acra (1 Maccabees 13:50-52; compare 1:33), to celebrate the recapture of Acra ("the citadel") on the 23rd of 'Iyar 141 B.C., and the Feast of Nicanor, in celebration of the victory over Nicanor on the 13th day of 'Adhar 160 B.C. (1 Maccabees 7:49).  Several other festivals are mentioned in the Talmud and other post-Biblical writings which may have been of even greater antiquity. The Feast of Woodcarrying (Midsummer Day:  Nehemiah 10:34 ; Josephus, BJ, II, vii, 6; Meghillath Ta`anith c.v, p. 32, Mishna, Ta`anith 4 8a), for example, is referred to as the greatest day of rejoicing of the Hebrews, ranking with Atonement Day. It was principally a picnic day to which a religious touch was given by making it the woodgatherers' festival for the Temple. A New Year for trees is mentioned in the Talmud (Ro'sh ha-Shdnah 1 1). The pious, according both to the Jewish tradition and the New Testament, observed many private or semi-public fasts, such as the Mondays, Thursdays and following Monday after Nisan and Tishri (the festival months:  Luke 18:12   Matthew 9:14 ;  Matthew 6:16   Mark 2:18   Luke 5:33   Acts 10:30 ; Meghillah 31a; Ta`anith 12a; Bdbha' Qama' 8 2). The day before Passover was a fast day for the firstborn (Copherim 21 3).  In post-Biblical times the Jews outside of Palestine doubled each of the following days: the opening and closing day of Passover and Tabernacles and Pentecost, because of the capheq, or doubt as to the proper day to be observed, growing out of the delays in the transmission of the official decree of the Sanhedhrin in each season. Differences in hours of sunrise and sunset between Palestine and other countries may have had something to do at least with the perpetuation of the custom. New Year's Day seems to have been doubled from time immemorial, the forty-eight hours counting as one "long day."  Many new modes of observance appear in post-exilic times in connection with the old established festivals, especially in the high festival season of Tishri. Thus the cimchath beth ha-sho'ebhah, "water drawing festival," was celebrated during the week of Tabernacles with popular games and dances in which even the elders took part, and the streets were so brilliantly illuminated with torches that scarcely an eye was closed in Jerusalem during that week (Talmud, Chullin).  The last day of Tabernacles was known in Talmudic times as yom chibbuT `arabhoth, from the custom of beating willow branches, a custom clearly antedating the various symbolical explanations offered for it. Its festivities were connected with the dismantling of the booth. In later times the day was known as hosha`na' rabba', from the liturgical passages beginning with the word hosha`na', recited throughout the feast and "gathered" on that day. The day after Tabernacles has been made cimchath Torah, the Feast of the Law, from the custom of ending on that day the cycle of fifty-two weekly portions read in the synagogues.  In general it may be said that although the actual observance has changed from time to time to meet new conditions, the synagogal calendar of today is made up of the same festivals as those observed in New Testament times.  Ella Davis Isaacs  FASTS AND FEASTS  See  FEASTS AND FASTS .
CHIEFS|Chiefs of Asia: "Asiarchs," the title given to certain wealthy persons annually appointed to preside over the religious festivals and games in the various cities of proconsular Asia ( Acts 19:31 ). Some of these officials appear to have been Paul's friends. 
HASUPHA|Uncovered, one of the Nethinim ( Ezra 2:43 ;  Nehemiah 7:46 ). 
EMIM|     e'-mim ('emim; Ommaein, Ommein, or Ommiein):  Stated to have been the earlier inhabitants of Moab ( Deuteronomy 2:10, 11 ), and to have been of tall stature, and hence, "accounted Rephaim (or giants) as the Anakim" or the Zamzummim of Ammon ( Deuteronomy 2:20 ). As the name was given to them by the Moabites, it may not have been that by which they called themselves. A tall race, known to the Israelites as REPHAIM (which see), once existed in Southern Palestine as well as on the East side of the Jordan, but its exact relationship is unknown. In the time of Abraham the Emim were living in the Moabite district of Shaveh-kiriathaim, identified with the modern Kureiyat ( Genesis 14:5 ).  A. H. Sayce
GIBBETHON|A height, a city of the Philistines in the territory of Dan, given to the Kohathites ( Joshua 19:44 ;  21:23 ). Nadab the king of Israel, while besieging it, was slain under its walls by Baasha, one of his own officers ( 1 Kings 15:27 ). It was in the possession of the Philistines after the secession of the ten tribes ( 2 Chronicles 11:13 ,  14). 
NAHATH|Rest.  (1.) One of the four sons of Reuel, the son of Esau ( Genesis 36:13 ,  17).  (2.) A Kohathite Levite ( 1 Chronicles 6:26 ).  (3.) A Levite, one of the overseers of the sacred offerings of the temple ( 2 Chronicles 31:13 ). 
TABLES|( Mark 7:4 ) means banqueting-couches or benches, on which the Jews reclined when at meals. This custom, along with the use of raised tables like ours, was introduced among the Jews after the Captivity. Before this they had, properly speaking, no table. That which served the purpose was a skin or piece of leather spread out on the carpeted floor. Sometimes a stool was placed in the middle of this skin. (see  ABRAHAM'S BOSOM ; BANQUET; MEALS.) 
BARAK|Lightning, the son of Abinoam ( Judges 4:6 ). At the summons of Deborah he made war against Jabin. She accompanied him into the battle, and gave the signal for the little army to make the attack; in which the host of Jabin was completely routed. The battle was fought ( Judges 4:16 ) in the plain of Jezreel (q.v.). This deliverance of Israel is commemorated in  Judges 5 . Barak's faith is commended ( Hebrews 11:32 ). "The character of Barak, though pious, does not seem to have been heroic. Like Gideon, and in a sense Samson, he is an illustration of the words in  Hebrews 11:34 , 'Out of weakness were made strong.'" (see  DEBORAH .) 
WATERCOURSE|     wo'-ter-kors:  (1) 'aphiq ( Ezekiel 6:3 ;  Ezekiel 31:12 ;  Ezekiel 32:6 ;  Ezekiel 34:13 ;  Ezekiel 35:8 ; 36:4, 6), the King James Version "river," elsewhere "stream," "channel," or "brook."  (2) pelegh ( Proverbs 21:1 ). "The king's heart is in the hand of Yahweh as the watercourses," the King James Version "rivers," elsewhere "streams" or "rivers."  (3) yabhal, yibheley mayim, "watercourses" (English Versions of the Bible) ( Isaiah 44:4 ); in  Isaiah 30:25 , English Versions of the Bible has "streams of water"; compare yubhal, "rivers" ( Jeremiah 17:8 ); yubhal, "Jubal" ( Genesis 4:21 ); 'ubhal, "the river Ulai" ( Daniel 8:2, 3, 6 ).  (4) te`alah, "channel," the King James Version "watercourse" ( Job 38:25 ); elsewhere "conduit," "the conduit of the upper pool" ( 2 Kings 18:17   Isaiah 7:3 ;  Isaiah 36:2 ).  (5) tsinnor, "watercourse," the King James Version "gutter" ( 2 Samuel 5:8 ).  See  BROOK ;  RIVER ; STREAM; WATERFALL.  Alfred Ely Day
MAALEHACRABBIM|Ascent of the scorpions; i.e., "scorpion-hill", a pass on the south-eastern border of Palestine ( Numbers 34:4 ;  Joshua 15:3 ). It is identified with the pass of Sufah, entering Palestine from the great Wady el-Fikreh, south of the Dead Sea. (see  AKRABBIM .) 
ELIEL|To whom God is might.  (1.) A chief of Manasseh, on the east of Jordan ( 1 Chronicles 5:24 ). (2.) A Gadite who joined David in the hold at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:11 ). (3.) One of the overseers of the offerings in the reign of Hezekiah ( 2 Chronicles 31:13 ). 
HACHMONI|   ; HACHMONITE  hak-mo'-ni, hak'-mo-ni, or probably (chakhmoni, "wise"): The same word is rendered "Hachmoni," a proper name, in  1 Chronicles 27:32  and "a Hachmonite" in  1 Chronicles 11:11 . The form of the Hebrew word suggests that the latter translation should be adopted in both passages, and that it describes the warrior in one case, and the companion or tutor of David's sons in the other, as a member of a certain family-a Hachmonite of which nothing further is known.  2 Samuel 23:8 , "Josheb-basshebeth a Tahchemonite," bears the marks of a corrupt text, and should be parallel with  1 Chronicles 11:11  so far as the name goes, reading "Jashobeam the Hachmonite." So Klostermann, Driver, Wellhausen, Budde, etc.  George Rice Hovey
EPHAI|     e'-fi, e'-fa-i (`ephay, in Qere, `ophai, in Kethibh; Iophe, Ophe, "gloomy," "obscuring," in the Septuagint, Septuagint):  "The Netophathite," whose sons were numbered among "the captains of the forces" left in Judah after the carrying away to Babylon ( Jeremiah 40   Jeremiah 47 ). His sons assembled at Mizpah with Gedaliah, governor of the scattered Jews, and with him were slain by Ishmael, the son of Nethaniah (Jet 41:3).
TRADES|     tradz.  See  CRAFTS .
JAREB|     ja'-reb, jar'-eb (yarebh, "let him contend"; Septuagint Iareim):  1. Obscurity of the Name:  Is mentioned twice in Hosea (5:13; 10:6) as an Assyrian king who received tribute from Israel. We do not, however, know of an Assyrian king of that name, or of such a place as is indicated by "the king of Jareb" (5:13 King James Version, margin). Sayce (HCM, 417) thinks Jareb may possibly be the earlier name of Sargon who took Samaria in 722 B.C., as the passages in which it appears seem to relate to the last struggles of the Northern Kingdom. This conjecture he bases on the probability that the successor of Shalmaneser IV, following the example of other usurpers of the Assyrian throne before him, assumed the name of Sargon. Those who hold that Hosea's prophecies are probably not later than 734 B.C. reject this view.  2. Meaning of the Word:  If we take the Hebrew text in  Hosea 5:13  as it stands (melekh yarebh), Jareb cannot be regarded as the name of a person, owing to the absence of the article before melekh, "king," which is always inserted in such a case. It is probably an epithet or nickname applied to the Assyrian king, as is suggested by the Revised Version margin ("a king that should contend") and the King James Version margin ("the king that should plead"), being derived from the ribh, "to strive." The rendering would then be "King Combat," "King Contentious," indicating Assyria's general hostility to Israel and the futility of applying for help to that quarter against the will of Yahweh. Some suggest that for melekh yarebh we should read malki rabh (i being the old nominative termination), or melekh rabh, "Great King," a title frequently applied to Assyrian monarchs. Others, following the Septuagint, would read melekh ram, "High King."  3. Historical Reference:  The historical reference, if it be to any recorded incident, may be to the attempt of Menahem, king of Israel in 738 B.C., to gain over the Assyrians by a large subsidy to Pul, who assumed the name of Tiglath-pileser ( 2 Kings 15:19 ). In this case, as both Epraim and Judah are mentioned in the protasis, we should have to suppose that Ephraim made application on behalf of both kingdoms. If "Judah" be inserted before "sent" to complete the parallel, then the clause would be interpreted of Ahaz, king of Judah, who offered a heavy bribe to Tiglath-pileser to help him to withstand the combined attack of Rezin of Syria and Pekah of Israel ( 2 Kings 16:7 f ). But perhaps there may be no particular allusions in the two clauses of the apodosis, but only a reference to a general tendency on the part of both kingdoms to seek Assyrian aid.  4. Other Views:  Cheyne would make a violent change in the verse. He would substitute "Israel" for "Judah" as warranted by  Hosea 12:2 , insert "Israel" before "sent," change 'ashshur,"Assyria," into mitstsur, the North Arabian land of Mucri, "references to which underlie many passages in the Old Testament," and for melekh yarebh, he would read melekh `arabhi, "king of Arabia." For other views see ICC.  James Crichton
HURAM|     hu'-ram (churam, "noble-born"):  (1) Grandson of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:5 ).  (2) King of Tyre in alliance with David and Solomon. So named in  2 Chronicles 2:3, 11, 12 ;  2 Chronicles 8:2 ;  2 Chronicles 9:10, 21 , but elsewhere written HIRAM (which see).  (3) The Tyrian artisan who is so named in  2 Chronicles 2:13 ;  2 Chronicles 4:11, 16 , but elsewhere called "Hiram."
RACHAL|Traffic, a town in the tribe of Judah, to which David sent presents from the spoils of his enemies ( 1 Samuel 30:29 ). 
JETHETH|A peg, or a prince, one of the Edomitish kings of Mount Seir ( Genesis 36:40 ). 
NERGALSHAREZER|Nergal, protect the king!  (1.) One of the "princes of the king of Babylon who accompanied him in his last expedition against Jerusalem" ( Jeremiah 39:3 ,  13). (2.) Another of the "princes," who bore the title of "Rabmag." He was one of those who were sent to release Jeremiah from prison ( Jeremiah 39:13 ) by "the captain of the guard." He was a Babylonian grandee of high rank. From profane history and the inscriptions, we are led to conclude that he was the Neriglissar who murdered Evil-merodach, the son of Nebuchadnezzar, and succeeded him on the throne of Babylon (B.C. 559-556). He was married to a daughter of Nebuchadnezzar. The ruins of a palace, the only one on the right bank of the Euphrates, bear inscriptions denoting that it was built by this king. He was succeeded by his son, a mere boy, who was murdered after a reign of some nine months by a conspiracy of the nobles, one of whom, Nabonadius, ascended the vacant throne, and reigned for a period of seventeen years (B.C. 555-538), at the close of which period Babylon was taken by Cyrus. Belshazzar, who comes into notice in connection with the taking of Babylon, was by some supposed to have been the same as Nabonadius, who was called Nebuchadnezzar's son ( Dan. 5:11 ,  18,  22), because he had married his daughter. But it is known from the inscriptions that Nabonadius had a son called Belshazzar, who may have been his father's associate on the throne at the time of the fall of Babylon, and who therefore would be the grandson of Nebuchadnezzar. The Jews had only one word, usually rendered "father," to represent also such a relationship as that of "grandfather" or "great-grandfather." 
JESHEBEAB|Seat of his father, the head of the fourteenth division of priests ( 1 Chronicles 24:13 ). 
DELAIAH|Freed by Jehovah.  (1.) The head of the twenty-third division of the priestly order ( 1 Chronicles 24:18 ). (2.) A son of Shemaiah, and one of the courtiers to whom Jeremiah's first roll of prophecy was read ( Jeremiah 36:12 ). (3.) The head of one of the bands of exiles that returned under Zerubbabel to Jerusalem ( Ezra 2:60 ;  Nehemiah 7:62 ). 
EZBAI|     ez'-ba-i, ez'-bi ('ezbay, "shining," "blooming"; Azobai):  One of David's "mighty men" ( 1 Chronicles 11:37 ; compare  2 Samuel 23:35  margin).
PILESER|Tiglath-Pileser I. (not mentioned in Scripture) was the most famous of the monarchs of the first Assyrian empire (about B.C. 1110). After his death, for two hundred years the empire fell into decay. The history of David and Solomon falls within this period. He was succeeded by his son, Shalmaneser II.  Tiglath-Pileser III. Or Tilgath-Pil-neser, the Assyrian throne-name of Pul (q.v.). He appears in the Assyrian records as gaining, in the fifth year of his reign (about B.C. 741), a victory over Azariah (= Uzziah in  2 Chronicles 26:1 ), king of Judah, whose achievements are described in  2 Chronicles 26:6 -15. He is first mentioned in Scripture, however, as gaining a victory over Pekah, king of Israel, and Rezin of Damascus, who were confederates. He put Rezin to death, and punished Pekah by taking a considerable portion of his kingdom, and carrying off (B.C. 734) a vast number of its inhabitants into captivity ( 2 Kings 15:29 ;  16:5 -9;  1 Chronicles 5:6 ,  26), the Reubenites, the Gadites, and half the tribe of Manasseh whom he settled in Gozan. In the Assyrian annals it is further related that, before he returned from Syria, he held a court at Damascus, and received submission and tribute from the neighbouring kings, among whom were Pekah of Samaria and "Yahu-khazi [i.e., Ahaz], king of Judah" (Comp.  2 Kings 16:10 -16). He was the founder of what is called "the second Assyrian empire," an empire meant to embrace the whole world, the centre of which should be Nineveh. He died B.C. 728, and was succeeded by a general of his army, Ulula, who assumed the name Shalmaneser IV. 
ELIADA|Whom God cares for.  (1.) One of David's sons born after his establishment in Jerusalem ( 2 Samuel 5:16 ). (2.) A mighty man of war, a Benjamite ( 2 Chronicles 17:17 ). (3.) An Aramite of Zobah, captain of a marauding band that troubled Solomon ( 1 Kings 11:23 ). 
MELEA|Fulness, the son of Menan and father of Eliakim, in the genealogy of our Lord ( Luke 3:31 ). 
BAALPEOR|Lord of the opening, a god of the Moabites ( Numbers 25:3 ;  31:16 ;  Joshua 22:17 ), worshipped by obscene rites. So called from Mount Peor, where this worship was celebrated, the Baal of Peor. The Israelites fell into the worship of this idol ( Numbers 25:3 ,  5,  18;  Deuteronomy 4:3 ;  Psalm 106:28 ;  Hosea 9:10 ). 
LUNATICK|   LUNATIC(K)  lu'-na-tik:  I. Epilepsy.  1. Incorrect Translation:  The English word "lunatic," which in popular speech signifies a sufferer from any mental derangement, whether periodic or chronic, other than congenital idiocy, appears in the King James Version as a translation of the Greek word seleniazomai, in the two passages where it occurs. In the Revised Version (British and American) the word has very properly been displaced by the strictly accurate term "epileptic." This change is justified not only by the extra-Biblical usage (see Liddell and Scott, under the word), but clearly enough by  Matthew 17:15  (compare 4:24), where epilepsy is circumstantially described.  2. Original Meaning:  The original meaning of the term seleniazomai, "moon-struck," is connected with the popular belief, widespread and of strange persistency, that the moon, in certain of its phases, is injurious to human beings, especially in the case of diseases of a periodic or remittent character. There are no data by which to determine whether, in the New Testament times, this particular word represented a living and active belief or had passed into the state of usage in which the original metaphor disappears, and the word simply indicates the fact signified without reference to the idea embodied in the etymology. We still use the word "lunatic" to signify a person mentally diseased, although we have long since ceased to believe in the moon's influence in such cases.  II. Madness.  The Bible designates "madness," or alienation of mind, by various terms, all of which seem to be onomatopoetic. These various words seem to be derived from the strange and fierce or mournful cries uttered by the unfortunate victims of this dread malady. In  Deuteronomy 28:34  the word "maddened" is meshugga`, participle of shagha` (compare also  1 Samuel 21:15 ). With this corresponds the word mainomai, in the New Testament. In  1 Samuel 21:13  (Hebrew 14) the word is a form of the verb chalal, which is also a derivative from the sound indicated.  In certain cases, though by no means uniformly, madness is ascribed to demon-possession ( Luke 8:26 f ). One is struck by the fact that mental derangement occupies a very small place in Scripture.  Louis Matthews Sweet
SARAI|My princess, the name originally borne by Sarah ( Genesis 11:31 ;  17:15 ). 
ITHRAN|     ith'-ran (yithran, "excellent"):  (1) A descendant of Seir the Horite, son of Dishon ( Genesis 36:26   1 Chronicles 1:41 ).  (2) One of the sons of Zophah of the tribe of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 7:37 ).
PALAL|     pa'-lal (palal, "judge"): Son of Uzai, and one of the repairers of the wall ( Nehemiah 3:25 ).
NEBUSHAZBAN|     neb-u-shaz'-ban (nebhushazebhan equals Assyrian Nabusezib-anni, "Nebo delivers me"; the King James Version Nebushasban): An important officer (the Rab-saris, chief captain or "chief eunuch") of the Babylonian army, who with Nergal-sharezer and others was appointed to see to the safety of Jeremiah after the taking of Jerusalem ( Jeremiah 39:13 ).
TOHU|One of Samuel's ancestors ( 1 Samuel 1:1 ). 
JEZREELITE|     jez'-re-el-it, jez'-rel-it ha-yizre`e'li): applied to Naboth, a native of Jezreel (1) ( 1 Kings 21:1 , etc.).
RAGAU|     ra'-go (Rhagau (Westcott-Hort): the King James Version; Greek form of "Reu" (thus, the Revised Version (British and American)) ( Luke 3:35 ).  RAGES; RAGAU  ra'-jez, ra'-go  1. Location:  ("Rages," Tobit 1:14; 4:1, 20; 5:05; 6:9, 12; 9:02; "Ragau," Judith 1:5, 15; Rhagai, Rhaga, Rhage, Rhagau; in Darius' Behistun Inscriptions, II, 71, 72, Raga, a province; in Avesta, Vend. I, 15, Ragha, city and province; perhaps, "the excellent"): In Eastern Media, one forced march from Caspian Gates, 11 days' journey from Ecbatana, 5 1/2 miles South of present Tehran; the capital of the province of the same name, though by Ptolemy called Rhagiana.  2. History:  (1) Ancient.  A very ancient city, the traditional birthplace of Zoroaster (Zarathustra; Pahlavi Vendidad, Zad sparad XVI, 12, and Dabistan i Mazahib). In Yasna XIX, 18, of the Avesta, it is thus mentioned: "The Zoroastrian, four-chief-possessing Ragha, hers are the royal chiefs, both the house-chief, the village-chief, and the town-chief: Zoroaster is the fourth." In Vend. I, 15: "As the tenth, the best of both districts and cities, I, who am Ahura Mazda, did create Ragha, which possesses the three classes," i.e. fire-priests, charioteers, husbandmen. Later it was the religious center of magism. A large colony of captive Israelites settled there. Destroyed in Alexander's time, it was rebuilt by Seleucus Nicator (circa 300 B.C.), who named it Europos. Later, Arsaces restored it and named it Arsacia.  (2) Medieval.  In the early Middle Ages Ragha, then called Rai, was a great literary and often political center with a large population. It was the birthplace of Harun'al Rashid (763 A.D.). It was seized and plundered (1029 A.D.) by Sultan Machmud, but became Tughril's capital. In the Vis o Roman (circa 1048 A.D.) it is an important place, 10 days journey across the Kavir desert from Merv. It was a small provincial town in about 1220 A.D. It was sacked by Mongols in 1220 A.D. and entirely destroyed under Ghazan Khan circa 1295. A Zoroastrian community lived there in 1278 A.D., one of whom composed the Zardtusht-Namah. (3) Present Condition.  Near the ruins there now stands the village of Shah Abdu'l 'Acim, connected with Tehran by the only railway in Persia (opened in 1888).  LITERATURE  Ptolemy, Diodorus Siculus, Pliny, Strabo; Ibnu'l Athir, Jami'u t Tawarikh, Tarikh i Jahan-gusha Yaqut; Justi, Iranisches Namenbuch; E.G. Browne, Literary Hist of Persia; modern travelers.  W. St. Clair Tisdall
JAHLEELITES|   , THE  ja'-le-el-its (hayachle'eli, coll. with article): In  Numbers 26:26 , the descendants of the clan of Jahleel.
KNEES|   FEEBLE   fe'-b'-l nez: The expression. is found in three places (one being a free quotation of another):  Job 4:4 , "Thou hast made firm the feeble (kara`, "bending," "bowing") knees," and  Hebrews 12:12 , "Wherefore lift up the hands that hang down, and the palsied (the King James Version "feeble") knees." The Greek word used here (paralelumena, "paralyzed," "motionless") implies the loss of junction, interrupted articulation, the cutting off of vital strength; compare Greek cholos, "lame," and see Delitzsch in his Commentary on Heb, in the place cited  Such an affection of the knees may be due to different causes. It is, e.g., a very frequent symptom of the disease known in the Orient as beriberi, when the muscles of the lower leg shrink to such a degree as to render voluntary locomotion impossible. It always disables its victim, and is therefore often expressive of general debility, e.g. in  Psalm 109:24 , where such weakness is described as the outcome of protracted fasting in  Ezekiel 7:17  and 21:7, "All knees shall be weak as water," the expression indicates a complete relaxation of the muscles. Fear effected the same condition in Belshazzar's case, when he saw the writing on the wall ( Daniel 5:6 ), "The joints of his loins were loosed, and his knees smote one against another" (compare  Nahum 2:10 ).  The "sore boil. in the knees, and in the legs," a disease announced in  Deuteronomy 28:35  as a punishment upon Israel for disobedience, cannot now be fully determined. Driver (in his commentary on the passage) thinks of elephantiasis, which is possible but not probable on account of the additional statement, "whereof thou canst not be healed, from the sole of thy foot unto the crown of thy head" which would be unexplained, as elephantiasis rarely presents a form in which the whole body is sympathetically affected. I rather think of some form of bubonic plague, which causes very high fever all over the body. In  Deuteronomy 28:27  in the enumeration of plagues mention is made of the "boil of Egypt," and some commentators have explained this as "bubonic plague." There is, however, no doubt that the "boil or botch of Egypt" is identical with the disease known to modern medicine as bouton du Nil, Biskra button, Bagdad or Aleppo sore.  H. L. E. Luering
MOADIAH|     mo-a-di'-a.  See  MAADIAH .
GEDALIAH|Made great by Jehovah.  (1.) the son of Jeduthum ( 1 Chronicles 25:3 ,  9).  (2.) The grandfather of the prophet Zephaniah, and the father of Cushi ( Zephaniah 1:1 ).  (3.) One of the Jewish nobles who conspired against Jeremiah ( Jeremiah 38:1 ).  (4.) The son of Ahikam, and grandson of Shaphan, secretary of king Josiah ( Jeremiah 26:24 ). After the destruction of Jerusalem (see  ZEDEKIAH ), Nebuchadnezzar left him to govern the country as tributary to him ( 2 Kings 25:22 ;  Jeremiah 40:5 ;  52:16 ). Ishmael, however, at the head of a party of the royal family, "Jewish irreconcilables", rose against him, and slew him and "all the Jews that were with him" ( Jeremiah 41:2 ,  3) at Mizpah about three months after the destruction of Jerusalem. He and his band also plundered the town of Mizpah, and carried off many captives. He was, however, overtaken by Johanan and routed. He fled with such of his followers as escaped to the Ammonites ( 41:15 ). The little remnant of the Jews now fled to Egypt. 
SHALLECHETH|Shallecheth, The gate of I.e., "the gate of casting out," hence supposed to be the refuse gate; one of the gates of the house of the Lord, "by the causeway of the going up" i.e., the causeway rising up from the Tyropoeon valley = valley of the cheesemakers ( 1 Chronicles 26:16 ). 
DODANIM|Leaders, a race descended from Javan ( Genesis 10:4 ). They are known in profane history as the Dardani, originally inhabiting Illyricum. They were a semi-Pelasgic race, and in the ethnographical table ( Genesis 10 ) they are grouped with the Chittim (q.v.). In  1 Chronicles 1:7 , they are called Rodanim. The LXX. and the Samaritan Version also read Rhodii, whence some have concluded that the Rhodians, the inhabitants of the island of Rhodes, are meant. 
JEBUSITE|   JEBUS; JEBUSI;   je'-bus, jeb'-u-si, jeb'-u-zit (yebhuc, ha-yebhuci): "Jebus" is an old name for Jerusalem ( Judges 19:10, 11   1 Chronicles 4:5  parallel  2 Samuel 5:6-9 , "the same is Jerus"; see preceding article). "Jebusi" (literally, "Jebusite") is also used as a name for the city in the King James Version ( Joshua 18:16, 28 ; compare  Joshua 15:8 ); the Revised Version (British and American) correctly renders "Jebusite" (see JERUSALEM). "Jebusites," for the people (in the King James Version  Genesis 15:21   Exodus 3:8, 17 , etc.), does not occur in Hebrew in the plural; hence, in the Revised Version (British and American) is always rendered in the singular, "Jebusite." The "Jebusite" is said in  Genesis 10:16   1 Chronicles 1:14  to be the 3rd son of Canaan, i.e. of the country of Canaan. Elsewhere he represents a tribe separate from the Canaanites. He stands between Heth and the Amorite (compare  Numbers 13:29   Joshua 11:3   Ezekiel 16:3, 15 ). In the lists of the peoples inhabiting Palestine the "Jebusite" is always placed last, a fact indicative, probably, of their smaller number.  To what race the Jebusites belonged is doubtful. Their name does not seem Semitic, and they do not make their appearance till after the patriarchal period.  The original name of Jerusalem was Babylonian, Uru-Salim, "the city of Salim," shortened into Salem in  Genesis 14:18  and in the inscriptions of the Egyptian kings Ramses II and Ramses III. In the Tell el-Amarna Letters (1400 B.C.) Jerusalem is still known as Uru-Salim, and its king bears a Hittite name, implying that it was at the time in the possession of the Hittites. His enemies, however, were closing around him, and one of the tablets shows that the city was eventually captured and its king slain. These enemies would seem to have been the Jebusites, since it is after this period that the name "Jebus" makes its appearance for the first time in the Old Testament ( Judges 19:10, 11 ).  The Jebusite king at the time of the conquest was Adoni-zedek, who met his death at Beth-boron ( Joshua 10:1 ; in  Joshua 10:5  the word "Amorite" is used in its Babylonian sense to denote the inhabitants of Canaan generally). The Jebusites were a mountain tribe ( Numbers 13:29   Joshua 11:3 ). Their capital "Jebus" was taken by the men of Judah and burned with fire ( Judges 18 ), but they regained possession of, and held, the fortress till the time of David ( 2 Samuel 5:6 ).  When Jerusalem was taken by David, the lives and property of its Jebusite inhabitants were spared, and they continued to inhabit the temple-hill, David and his followers settling in the new City of David on Mt. Zion ( Joshua 15:8, 63   Judges 1:21 ;  Judges 19:11 ). And as Araunah is called "king" ( 2 Samuel 24:23 ), we may conclude that their last ruler also had been lowed to live. His name is non-Sem, and the various spellings of it (compare  1 Chronicles 21:15 , "Ornan") indicate that the Hebrew writers had some difficulty in pronouncing it. The Jebusites seem ultimately to have blended with the Israelite population.  James Orr
MESHECH|Drawing out, the sixth son of Japheth ( Genesis 10:2 ), the founder of a tribe ( 1 Chronicles 1:5 ;  Ezek. 27:13 ;  38:2 , 3). They were in all probability the Moschi, a people inhabiting the Moschian Mountains, between the Black and the Caspian Seas. In  Psalm 120:5  the name occurs as simply a synonym for foreigners or barbarians. "During the ascendency of the Babylonians and Persians in Western Asia, the Moschi were subdued; but it seems probable that a large number of them crossed the Caucasus range and spread over the northern steppes, mingling with the Scythians. There they became known as Muscovs, and gave that name to the Russian nation and its ancient capital by which they are still generally known throughout the East" 
BERACHAH|Blessing.  (1.) A valley not far from Engedi, where Jehoshaphat overthrew the Moabites and Ammonites ( 2 Chronicles 20:26 ). It has been identified with the valley of Bereikut. (R.V.,  "Beracah.") (2.) One of the Benjamite warriors, Saul's brethren, who joined David when at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:3 ). 
SALLU|Weighed.  (1.) A priest ( Nehemiah 12:7 ). (2.) A Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 9:7 ;  Nehemiah 11:7 ). 
BULLS|   , JEROBOAM'S  See  CALF (GOLDEN) .
NETHANEL|     ne-than'-el, neth'-a-nel (nethan'el, "God has given"; Nathanael; the King James Version Nethaneel, ne-than'-e-el):  (1) A chief or prince of Issachar ( Numbers 1:8 ;  Numbers 2:5 ;  Numbers 7:18, 23 ; 10:15).  (2) The 4th son of Jesse ( 1 Chronicles 2:14 ).  (3) One of the trumpet-blowers before the ark when it was brought up from the house of Obededom ( 1 Chronicles 15:24 ).  (4) A Levite scribe, the father of Shemaiah ( 1 Chronicles 24:6 ).  (5) The 5th son of Obed-edom ( 1 Chronicles 26:4 ).  (6) One of the princes whom Jehoshaphat sent to teach in the cities of Judah ( 2 Chronicles 17:7 ).  (7) A Levite who gave cattle for Josiah's Passover ( 2 Chronicles 35:9 ).  (8) One of the priests who had married foreign wives ( Ezra 10:22 ; compare 1Es 9:22).  (9) A priest registered under the high priest Joiakim ( Nehemiah 12:21 ).  (10) A Levite musician who assisted at the dedication of the walls ( Nehemiah 12:36 ).  John A. Lees
ESHTAOLITES|   ; ESHTAULITES  esh'-ta-ol-its, eshta-u'-lits (ha'eshta'uli, literally, "the Eshtaolite"; the King James Version):  Inhabitants of Eshtaol, named among the descendants of Shobal, the son of Caleb ( 1 Chronicles 2:53 ).
QOPH|     kof (qoph): The 19th letter of the Hebrew alphabet; transliterated in this Encyclopedia as q (intense k). It came also to be used for the number 100. For name, etc., see ALPHABET.
SAMLAH|     sam'-la (samlah; Salama): One of the kings of Edom, of the city of Masrekah. He reigned before the Israelites had kings ( Genesis 36:36, 37   1 Chronicles 1:47, 48 ). The fact that the city is mentioned in connection with the name of the king suggests that Edom was a confederacy at this time and the chief city was the metropolis of the whole country.
WEEKS|Weeks, Feast of see  PENTECOST . 
REUBENITES|     roo'-ben-its (ha-re'ubheni; demoi Rhouben): Members of the tribe of Reuben ( Numbers 26:7 , etc.). Adina, one of David's mighty men, was a Reubenite ( 1 Chronicles 11:42 ).
HAMOR|He-ass, a Hivite from whom Jacob purchased the plot of ground in which Joseph was afterwards buried ( Genesis 33:19 ). He is called "Emmor" in  Acts 7:16 . His son Shechem founded the city of that name which Simeon and Levi destroyed because of his crime in the matter of Dinah, Jacob's daughter ( Genesis 34:20 ). Hamor and Shechem were also slain (ver. 26). 
BAALGAD|Lord of fortune, or troop of Baal, a Canaanite city in the valley of Lebanon at the foot of Hermon, hence called Baal-hermon ( Judges 3:3 ;  1 Chronicles 5:23 ), near the source of the Jordan ( Joshua 13:5 ;  11:17 ;  12:7 ). It was the most northern point to which Joshua's conquests extended. It probably derived its name from the worship of Baal. Its modern representative is Banias. Some have supposed it to be the same as Baalbec. 
SPORTS|     sports.  See  GAMES .
MAHOL|Dance, the father of four sons ( 1 Kings 4:31 ) who were inferior in wisdom only to Solomon. 
SHEARIAH|     she-a-ri-a, she-ar'-ya (she`aryah; Saraia): A descendant of Saul ( 1 Chronicles 8:38 ;  1 Chronicles 9:44 ).
SAMGARNEBO|Be gracious, O Nebo! or a cup-bearer of Nebo, probably the title of Nergal-sharezer, one of the princes of Babylon ( Jeremiah 39:3 ). 
ISCAH|Spy, the daughter of Haran and sister of Milcah and Lot ( Genesis 11:29 ,  31). 
HELKATH|Smoothness, a town of Asher, on the east border ( Joshua 19:25 ;  21:31 ); called also Hukok ( 1 Chronicles 6:75 ). 
BAMAH|A height, a name used simply to denote a high place where the Jews worshipped idols ( Ezek. 20:29 ). The plural is translated "high places" in  Numbers 22:41  and  Ezek. 36:2 . 
MAHALALEL|     ma-ha'-la-lel (mahalal'el; the King James Version Mahalaleel, ma-ha'la-le-el, ma-hal'a-lel):  (1) Son of Cainan, the grandson of Seth ( Genesis 5:12   1 Chronicles 1:2 ).  (2) The ancestor of Athaiah, one of the children of Judah who dwelt in Jerusalem after the return from exile ( Nehemiah 11:4 ).
CHIOS|Mentioned in  Acts 20:15 , an island in the Aegean Sea, about 5 miles distant from the mainland, having a roadstead, in the shelter of which Paul and his companions anchored for a night when on his third missionary return journey. It is now called Scio. 
JOSIPHIAH|     jos-i-fi'-a (yociphyah, "Yah adds"): Found in  Ezra 8:10 , where Massoretic Text is "and of the sons of.... Shelomith the son of Josiphiah." With the help of Septuagint A and 1 Esdras 8:36, the name "Bani" (which is the same in the unpointed text as "the sons of" and was omitted through haplography) can be supplied above before "Shelomith." Josiphia is thus the father of Shelomith, one of Ezra's companions. 1 Esdras 8:36 has "Josaphias."
RAMATHMIZPEH|The height of Mizpeh or of the watch-tower ( Joshua 13:26 ), a place mentioned as one of the limits of Gad. There were two Mizpehs on the east of the Jordan. This was the Mizpeh where Jacob and Laban made a covenant, "Mizpeh of Gilead," called also Galeed and Jegar-sahadutha. It has been identified with the modern es-Salt, where the roads from Jericho and from Shechem to Damascus unite, about 25 miles east of the Jordan and 13 south of the Jabbok. 
ZURISHADDAI|Rock of the Almighty, the father of Shelumiel, who was chief of the tribe of Simeon when Israel was encamped at Sinai ( Numbers 1:6 ;  2:12 ). 
SAYINGS|   DARK   ( Proverbs 1:6   Psalm 78:2 ; singular,  Psalm 49:4, 5 ; chidhoth, singular chidhah, elsewhere rendered "riddle," "proverb"): In the heading to the canonical Book of Proverbs, the general term "proverbs" is made to include "a proverb mashal, and a figure (or, an interpretation, melitsah), the words (singular dabhar) of the wise, and their dark sayings (or, riddles)."  The "proverb" is either a saying current among the people (compare  1 Samuel 10:12 ; "the proverb of the ancients" 24:13 (14)), or a sentence of ethical wisdom composed by the order of wise men (chakhamim). Of the latter kind are the sententious maxims of the Wisdom literature (chiefly Proverbs, but also Job, Ecclesiastes, and among the uncanonical writings, Ecclesiasticus). They are characterized by a secular touch; wisdom, moreover, flourished among the neighbors of Israel as well; so in Edom and elsewhere.  Whatever the date of the collection known as the "Proverbs of Solomon," the wise men existed in Israel at a very early period; the prophets allude to them. But the Hebrew mashal is sometimes of a more elaborate character corresponding to our "parables"; frequently a vein of taunt runs through them, and they played an important part in compositions directed against other nations (compare  Numbers 21:27 ). The prophets are fond of employing this genre of literary production; in their hands the mashal becomes a figurative or allegorical discourse (compare  Ezekiel 21:5  (8)). The mashal in the sense of a didactic poem occurs also in the Psalms (Pss 49 and 78). Hence, it is that "proverb" and "figure," or "proverb" and "dark saying" are interchangeable terms. The "dark saying" is the popular "riddle" (compare  Judges 14 ) raised to the dignity of elaborate production.  It is in short an allegorical sentence requiring interpretation. Both prophets and psalmists avail themselves thereof. The word of God comes to the prophet in the form of a vision (compare the visions of Amos or Jeremiah), i.e. the truth presents itself to them in the form of a simile. To the perfect prophet of the type of Moses the revelation comes direct in the shape of the naked truth without the mediation of figures of speech or obscure utterances requiring elucidation (compare  Numbers 12 ). In the same way Paul ( 1 Corinthians 13 ) distinguishes between the childish manner of speaking of things spiritual and the manner of a man: "For now we see in a mirror, darkly (Greek "in a riddle"); but then face to face." The rabbis say that, whereas all the other prophets saw God and things Divine in a dim mirror, Moses saw them in a polished, clear mirror. Both Paul and the rabbis feel the difference between mediate and immediate vision, the revelation which requires dark figurative language as a vehicle and the clear perception which is the direct truth.  Max L. Margolis  FAITHFUL SAYINGS  sa'-inz (pistos ho logos): "This is a faithful saying and worthy of all acceptation" (the King James Version). These words form a striking formula which is found-with slight variations-only in the Pastoral Epistles, in  1 Timothy 1:15 ;  1 Timothy 3:1 ;  1 Timothy 4:9   2 Timothy 2:11 ;  Titus 3:8 . A similar expression occurs in  Revelation 21:5  and  Revelation 22:6  (the King James Version), "These sayings are faithful and true."  The Five "Sayings."  Paul's faithful sayings are thus five in number, and "were no doubt rehearsed constantly in the assemblies, till they became well-known watchwords in the various churches scattered over the Mediterranean-washed provinces of the Roman empire" (Ellicott, New Testament Commentary on  1 Timothy 1:15 ).  1. The First "Saying":  The first of the faithful sayings speaks of the pre-existence of Christ, of His coming into the world, and the purpose why He came is distinctly stated-to save the lost, irrespective of race or nationality, sinners who, apart from Christ, are without God and without hope.  2. The Second "Saying":  The second of the faithful sayings refers to the work of being a minister of the gospel, a work then so full of danger and always full of difficulty. The office in question is honorable and Christlike, and, in those early days, it meant stern and ceaseless work, grave and constant danger. This faithful saying would act as a call to young men to offer themselves for the work of proclaiming the gospel to the world, and of witnessing for Christ.  3. The Third "Saying":  The third saying is that godliness has an influence that is world-wide; it consists, not merely in holiness and in that fellowship and communion with God which is the very life of the soul; it is also an active force which springs from "the love of Christ constraining us," and manifests itself in love toward all our fellow-men, for they are God's creatures. Godliness transfigures every rank and condition of life. It has the promise of the life that now is: to those who seek the kingdom of God first, all other things will be added. And it has the promise of the life that is to come, the rich prospect of eternal blessedness with Christ. Compare with this saying the remarkable words in  Titus 1:2 , "in hope of eternal life, which God, who cannot lie, promised before times eternal." Godliness gives all gladness here, and future glory too. This is a faithful saying.  4. The Fourth "Saying":  The fourth of the faithful sayings speaks of the Christian believer's union with Christ, and of the blessedness of that union. The Christian is "dead with Christ," he "suffers with Christ." But the union with Christ is eternal, "We shall also live with him;. we shall also reign with him" in life that is fadeless, endless and full of glory. Surely then, no one will draw back, for "if we deny him," "if we believe not," "he also will deny us," for "he abideth faithful, he cannot deny himself."  5. The Fifth "Saying":  The fifth and last of the faithful sayings speaks of our former unconverted state, "for we also once were foolish, disobedient, deceived, serving divers lusts and pleasures. But. the kindness and love of God. toward man appeared, not by works which we did ourselves, but according to his mercy he saved us." Blessedness is now the Christian's lot, and this is the result not of our works: we owe it all to the tender love of God, to His Divine pity, to His redeeming grace. Yes, this is a faithful saying.  John Rutherfurd  HARD SAYINGS; HARD SENTENCES  sa'-ingz;, sen'-ten-siz: In  Daniel 5:12  the King James Version (Aramaic 'aqiahan), the Revised Version (British and American) "dark sentences," of enigmatic utterances which preternatural wisdom was needed to interpret; in  John 6:60  (skleros. ho logos), of sayings (Christ's words at Capernaum about eating His flesh and drinking His blood) difficult for the natural mind to understand (compare 6:52).
OHEL|A house; tent, the fourth son of Zerubbabel ( 1 Chronicles 3:20 ). 
TIRIA|     tir'-i-a, ti'-ri-a (tireya', Baer tirya'; Codex Vaticanus omits it; Codex Alexandrinus Theria; Lucian Ethria): A son of Jehallelel ( 1 Chronicles 4:16 ).
LACHISH|Impregnable, a royal Canaanitish city in the Shephelah, or maritime plain of Palestine ( Joshua 10:3 ,  5;  12:11 ). It was taken and destroyed by the Israelites ( Joshua 10:31 -33). It afterwards became, under Rehoboam, one of the strongest fortresses of Judah ( 2 Chronicles 10:9 ). It was assaulted and probably taken by Sennacherib ( 2 Kings 18:14 ,  17;  19:8 ;  Isaiah 36:2 ). An account of this siege is given on some slabs found in the chambers of the palace of Koyunjik, and now in the British Museum. The inscription has been deciphered as follows:, "Sennacherib, the mighty king, king of the country of Assyria, sitting on the throne of judgment before the city of Lachish: I gave permission for its slaughter." (see  NINEVEH .) Lachish has been identified with Tell-el-Hesy, where a cuneiform tablet has been found, containing a letter supposed to be from Amenophis at Amarna in reply to one of the Amarna tablets sent by Zimrida from Lachish. This letter is from the chief of Atim (=Etam,   1 Chronicles 4:32 ) to the chief of Lachish, in which the writer expresses great alarm at the approach of marauders from the Hebron hills. "They have entered the land," he says, "to lay waste...strong is he who has come down. He lays waste." This letter shows that "the communication by tablets in cuneiform script was not only usual in writing to Egypt, but in the internal correspondence of the country. The letter, though not so important in some ways as the Moabite stone and the Siloam text, is one of the most valuable discoveries ever made in Palestine" (Conder's Tell Amarna Tablets,  p. 134). Excavations at Lachish are still going on, and among other discoveries is that of an iron blast-furnace, with slag and ashes, which is supposed to have existed B.C. 1500. If the theories of experts are correct, the use of the hot-air blast instead of cold air (an improvement in iron manufacture patented by Neilson in 1828) was known fifteen hundred years before Christ. (see  FURNACE .) 
BINEA|     bin'-e-a (bin`ah): A name in the genealogy of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:37 : =  1 Chronicles 9:43 ).
LIBNAH|Transparency; whiteness.  (1.) One of the stations of the Israelites in the wilderness ( Numbers 33:20 ,  21). (2.) One of the royal cities of the Canaanites taken by Joshua ( Joshua 10:29 -32;  12:15 ). It became one of the Levitical towns in the tribe of Judah ( 21:13 ), and was strongly fortified. Sennacherib laid siege to it ( 2 Kings 19:8 ;  Isaiah 37:8 ). It was the native place of Hamutal, the queen of Josiah ( 2 Kings 23:31 ). It stood near Lachish, and has been identified with the modern Arak el-Menshiyeh. 
PERIZZITE|     per'-i-zit, pe-riz'-it (perizzi; Pherezaios): Signifies "a villager," and so corresponds with the Egyptian fellah. Hence, the Perizzite is not included among the sons of Canaan in  Genesis 10 , and is also coupled with the Canaanite ( Genesis 13:7 ;  Genesis 34:30   Judges 1:4 ). We hear, accordingly, of Canaanites and Perizzites at Shechem ( Genesis 34:30 ), at Bezek in Judah ( Judges 1:4 ) and, according to the reading of the Septuagint, at Gezer ( Joshua 16:10 ). In  Deuteronomy 3:5  and  1 Samuel 6:18 , where the King James Version has "unwalled towns" and "country villages," the Septuagint has "Perizzite," the literal translation of the Hebrew being "cities of the Perizzite" or "villager" and "village of the Perizzite." The same expression occurs in  Esther 9:19 , where it is used of the Jews in Elam. In  Joshua 17:15, 18 , where the Manassites are instructed to take possession of the forest land of Carmel, "Perizzites and Rephaim" are given as the equivalent of "Canaanite."  A. H. Sayce
NEBAT|Sight; aspect, the father of Jeroboam, the king of Israel ( 1 Kings 11:26 ,  etc.). 
ZEBULUNITES|     zeb'-u-lun-its (hazebhuloni; Zaboulon): Members of the tribe of Zebulun ( Numbers 26:27   Judges 12:11 f ).
NECHOH|   NECHO;   ne'-ko.  See  PHARAOH-NECOH .
BETHPHELET|   BETH-PHELET  beth-fe'-let.  See  BETH-PELET .
KEDESH|Sanctuary.  (1.) A place in the extreme south of Judah ( Joshua 15:23 ). Probably the same as Kadesh-barnea (q.v.). (2.) A city of Issachar ( 1 Chronicles 6:72 ). Possibly Tell Abu Kadeis, near Lejjun. (3.) A "fenced city" of Naphtali, one of the cities of refuge ( Joshua 19:37 ;  Judges 4:6 ). It was assigned to the Gershonite Levites ( Joshua 21:32 ). It was originally a Canaanite royal city ( Joshua 12:22 ), and was the residence of Barak ( Judges 4:6 ); and here he and Deborah assembled the tribes of Zebulun and Naphtali before the commencement of the conflict with Sisera in the plain of Esdraelon, "for Jehovah among the mighty" (9,  10). In the reign of Pekah it was taken by Tiglath-Pileser ( 2 Kings 15:29 ). It was situated near the "plain" (rather "the oak") of Zaanaim, and has been identified with the modern Kedes, on the hills fully four miles north-west of Lake El Huleh. It has been supposed by some that the Kedesh of the narrative, where Barak assembled his troops, was not the place in Upper Galilee so named, which was 30 miles distant from the plain of Esdraelon, but Kedish, on the shore of the Sea of Galilee, 12 miles from Tabor. 
SEVENEH|     se-ven'-e, se-ve'-ne (ceweneh): For the King James Version "the tower of Syene," in  Ezekiel 29:10 ;  Ezekiel 30:6 , the Revised Version (British and American) reads, "the tower of Seveneh," with a marginal note, "or, from Migdol to Syene." Seveneh is the town at the First Cataract in Egypt, now known as Assuan. Fresh interest has recently been given to it by the Elephantine discoveries bearing on the ancient Jewish colony and temple of Yahweh in that place in the 5th century B.C.  See  ARAMAIC ;  EGYPT ; PAPYRUS; SANCTUARY, 4, etc.
MILETUS|(Miletum,   2 Timothy 4:20 ), a seaport town and the ancient capital of Ionia, about 36 miles south of Ephesus. On his voyage from Greece to Syria, Paul touched at this port, and delivered that noble and pathetic address to the elders ("presbyters, " ver. 28) of Ephesus recorded in  Acts 20:15 -35. The site of Miletus is now some 10 miles from the coast. (see  EPHESIANS ,  EPISTLE TO.) 
LEEKS|     leks (chatsir; ta prasa): This word, elsewhere translated "grass," is in  Numbers 11:5  rendered "leeks" in all the ancient VSS, on account of its association with garlic and onions; such a use of the word occurs in the Talmud The leek (Allium porrum) is much grown today in Palestine, while in ancient Egypt this vegetable was renowned.
JEHOIAKIM|He whom Jehovah has set up, the second son of Josiah, and eighteenth king of Judah, which he ruled over for eleven years (B.C. 610-599). His original name was Eliakim (q.v.). On the death of his father his younger brother Jehoahaz (=Shallum,   Jeremiah 22:11 ), who favoured the Chaldeans against the Egyptians, was made king by the people; but the king of Egypt, Pharaoh-necho, invaded the land and deposed Jehoahaz ( 2 Kings 23:33 ,  34;  Jeremiah 22:10 -12), setting Eliakim on the throne in his stead, and changing his name to Jehoiakim. After this the king of Egypt took no part in Jewish politics, having been defeated by the Chaldeans at Carchemish ( 2 Kings 24:7 ;  Jeremiah 46:2 ). Palestine was now invaded and conquered by Nebuchadnezzar. Jehoiakim was taken prisoner and carried captive to Babylon ( 2 Chronicles 36:6 ,  7). It was at this time that Daniel also and his three companions were taken captive to Babylon ( Dan. 1:1 ,  2). Nebuchadnezzar reinstated Jehoiakim on his throne, but treated him as a vassal king. In the year after this, Jeremiah caused his prophecies to be read by Baruch in the court of the temple. Jehoiakim, hearing of this, had them also read in the royal palace before himself. The words displeased him, and taking the roll from the hands of Baruch he cut it in pieces and threw it into the fire ( Jeremiah 36:23 ). During his disastrous reign there was a return to the old idolatry and corruption of the days of Manasseh. After three years of subjection to Babylon, Jehoiakim withheld his tribute and threw off the yoke ( 2 Kings 24:1 ), hoping to make himself independent. Nebuchadnezzar sent bands of Chaldeans, Syrians, and Ammonites ( 2 Kings 24:2 ) to chastise his rebellious vassal. They cruelly harassed the whole country (Comp.  Jeremiah 49:1 -6). The king came to a violent death, and his body having been thrown over the wall of Jerusalem, to convince the beseieging army that he was dead, after having been dragged away, was buried beyond the gates of Jerusalem "with the burial of an ass," B.C. 599 ( Jeremiah 22:18 ,  19;  36:30 ). Nebuchadnezzar placed his son Jehoiachin on the throne, wishing still to retain the kingdom of Judah as tributary to him. 
HAMUTAL|Kinsman of the dew, the daughter of Jeremiah of Libnah, wife of king Josiah, and mother of king Jehoahaz ( 2 Kings 23:31 ), also of king Zedekiah ( 2 Kings 24:18 ). 
PARMENAS|Constant, one of the seven "deacons" ( Acts 6:5 ). 
SHAALIM|   , LAND OF  sha'-a-lim ('erets sha`alim; Codex Vaticanus tes ges Easakem; Codex Alexandrinus tes ges Saaleim; the King James Version Shalim): Saul in search of his father's asses passed through Mt. Ephraim and the land of Shalishah, then through the land of Shaalim and the land of yemini. This last name English Versions of the Bible renders "Benjamin" ( 1 Samuel 9:4 ). The whole passage is so obscure that no certain conclusions can be reached. The search party may have proceeded northward from Gibeah, through the uplands of Ephraim, turning then westward, then southward, and finally eastward. We should thus look for the land of Shalishah and the land of Shaalim on the west side of the mountain range: and the latter may have been on the slopes to the East of Lydda. Possibly we ought here to read "Shaalbim," instead of "Shaalim."  W. Ewing
NAHUM|Consolation, the seventh of the so-called minor prophets, an Elkoshite. All we know of him is recorded in the book of his prophecies. He was probably a native of Galilee, and after the deportation of the ten tribes took up his residence in Jerusalem. Others think that Elkosh was the name of a place on the east bank of the Tigris, and that Nahum dwelt there.  Nahum, Book of  Nahum prophesied, according to some, in the beginning of the reign of Ahaz (B.C. 743). Others, however, think that his prophecies are to be referred to the latter half of the reign of Hezekiah (about B.C. 709). This is the more probable opinion, internal evidences leading to that conclusion. Probably the book was written in Jerusalem (soon after B.C. 709), where he witnessed the invasion of Sennacherib and the destruction of his host ( 2 Kings 19:35 ). The subject of this prophecy is the approaching complete and final destruction of Nineveh, the capital of the great and at that time flourishing Assyrian empire. Assur-bani-pal was at the height of his glory. Nineveh was a city of vast extent, and was then the centre of the civilzation and commerce of the world, a "bloody city all full of lies and robbery" ( Nahum 3:1 ), for it had robbed and plundered all the neighbouring nations. It was strongly fortified on every side, bidding defiance to every enemy; yet it was to be utterly destroyed as a punishment for the great wickedness of its inhabitants. Jonah had already uttered his message of warning, and Nahum was followed by Zephaniah, who also predicted ( Zephaniah 2:4 -15) the destruction of the city, predictions which were remarkably fulfilled (B.C. 625) when Nineveh was destroyed apparently by fire, and the Assyrian empire came to an end, an event which changed the face of Asia. (see  NINEVEH .) 
UZZI|The Lord is my strength.  (1.) The son of Bukki, and a descendant of Aaron ( 1 Chronicles 6:5 ,  51;  Ezra 7:4 ). (2.) A grandson of Issachar ( 1 Chronicles 7:2 ,  3). (3.) A son of Bela, and grandson of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 7:7 ). (4.) A Benjamite, a chief in the tribe ( 1 Chronicles 9:8 ). (5.) A son of Bani. He had the oversight of the Levites after the return from captivity ( Nehemiah 11:22 ). (6.) The head of the house of Jedaiah, one of "the chief of the priests" ( Nehemiah 12:19 ). (7.) A priest who assisted in the dedication of the walls of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 12:42 ). 
REBEKAH|A noose, the daughter of Bethuel, and the wife of Isaac ( Genesis 22:23 ;  24:67 ). The circumstances under which Abraham's "steward" found her at the "city of Nahor," in Padan-aram, are narrated in  Genesis 24 -27. "She can hardly be regarded as an amiable woman. When we first see her she is ready to leave her father's house for ever at an hour's notice; and her future life showed not only a full share of her brother Laban's duplicity, but the grave fault of partiality in her relations to her children, and a strong will, which soon controlled the gentler nature of her husband." The time and circumstances of her death are not recorded, but it is said that she was buried in the cave of Machpelah ( Genesis 49:31 ). 
TEMA|South; desert, one of the sons of Ishmael, and father of a tribe so called ( Genesis 25:15 ;  1 Chronicles 1:30 ;  Job 6:19 ;  Isaiah 21:14 ;  Jeremiah 25:23 ) which settled at a place to which he gave his name, some 250 miles south-east of Edom, on the route between Damascus and Mecca, in the northern part of the Arabian peninsula, toward the Syrian desert; the modern Teyma'. 
MIZPAR|Number, one of the Jews who accompanied Zerubbabel from Babylon ( Ezra 2:2 ); called also Mispereth ( Nehemiah 7:7 ). 
MERONOTHITE|A name given to Jehdeiah, the herdsman of the royal asses in the time of David and Solomon ( 1 Chronicles 27:30 ), probably as one being a native of some unknown town called Meronoth. 
ULAI|The Eulaus of the Greeks; a river of Susiana. It was probably the eastern branch of the Choasper (Kerkhan), which divided into two branches some 20 miles above the city of Susa. Hence Daniel ( 8:2 , 16) speaks of standing "between the banks of Ulai", i.e., between the two streams of the divided river. 
HELEB|Fatness, one of David's warriors ( 2 Samuel 23:29 ). 
DECAPOLIS|Ten cities=deka, ten, and polis, a city, a district on the east and south-east of the Sea of Galilee containing "ten cities," which were chiefly inhabited by Greeks. It included a portion of Bashan and Gilead, and is mentioned three times in the New Testament ( Matthew 4:25 ;  Mark 5:20 ;  7:31 ). These cities were Scythopolis, i.e., "city of the Scythians", (ancient Bethshean,  the only one of the ten cities on the west of Jordan), Hippos, Gadara, Pella (to which the Christians fled just before the destruction of Jerusalem), Philadelphia (ancient Rabbath-ammon), Gerasa, Dion, Canatha, Raphana, and Damascus. When the Romans conquered Syria (B.C. 65) they rebuilt, and endowed with certain privileges, these "ten cities," and the province connected with them they called "Decapolis." 
FIRES|     firz:  In  Isaiah 24:15  the King James Version translates 'urim ("lights," especially Urim in the phrase "Urim and Thummim") "fires." The Revised Version (British and American), understanding the word to mean the region of light, translates "east," which satisfies the context far better, and is adopted by many modern scholars. In  Ezekiel 39:9, 10  the Revised Version (British and American) has "fires"; in 39:9 "make fires" is a translation of a verb of different root; in  Ezekiel 39:10  "fires" translates the common singular noun for fire.
TOBIJAH|Id., a Levite sent out through Judah by Jehoshaphat to teach the people ( 2 Chronicles 17:8 ). 
MALCHIRAM|     mal-ki'-ram (malkiram, "uplifted king"): Son of Jeconiah, descendant of David ( 1 Chronicles 3:18 ).
SHEMIDAITES|   SHEMIDA; SHEMIDAH;   she-mi'-da, she-mi'-da-its (shemidha): A Gileadite clan belonging to Manasseh ( Numbers 26:32   Joshua 17:2 , Codex Vaticanus Sumareim; Codex Alexandrinus Semirae; Lucian, Samidae;  1 Chronicles 7:19 , the King James Version "Shemidah," after whom the Shemidaites ( Numbers 26:32 ) were called).
JEREMIAH|Raised up or appointed by Jehovah.  (1.) A Gadite who joined David in the wilderness ( 1 Chronicles 12:10 ). (2.) A Gadite warrior ( 1 Chronicles 12:13 ). (3.) A Benjamite slinger who joined David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:4 ). (4.) One of the chiefs of the tribe of Manasseh on the east of Jordan ( 1 Chronicles 5:24 ). (5.) The father of Hamutal ( 2 Kings 23:31 ), the wife of Josiah. (6.) One of the "greater prophets" of the Old Testament, son of Hilkiah (q.v.), a priest of Anathoth ( Jeremiah 1:1 ;  32:6 ). He was called to the prophetical office when still young ( 1:6 ), in the thirteenth year of Josiah (B.C. 628). He left his native place, and went to reside in Jerusalem, where he greatly assisted Josiah in his work of reformation ( 2 Kings 23:1 -25). The death of this pious king was bewailed by the prophet as a national calamity ( 2 Chronicles 35:25 ). During the three years of the reign of Jehoahaz we find no reference to Jeremiah, but in the beginning of the reign of Jehoiakim the enmity of the people against him broke out in bitter persecution, and he was placed apparently under restraint ( Jeremiah 36:5 ). In the fourth year of Jehoiakim he was commanded to write the predictions given to him, and to read them to the people on the fast-day. This was done by Baruch his servant in his stead, and produced much public excitement. The roll was read to the king. In his recklessness he seized the roll, and cut it to pieces, and cast it into the fire, and ordered both Baruch and Jeremiah to be apprehended. Jeremiah procured another roll, and wrote in it the words of the roll the king had destroyed, and "many like words" besides ( Jeremiah 36:32 ). He remained in Jerusalem, uttering from time to time his words of warning, but without effect. He was there when Nebuchadnezzar besieged the city ( Jeremiah 37:4 ,  5), B.C. 589. The rumour of the approach of the Egyptians to aid the Jews in this crisis induced the Chaldeans to withdraw and return to their own land. This, however, was only for a time. The prophet, in answer to his prayer, received a message from God announcing that the Chaldeans would come again and take the city, and burn it with fire ( 37:7 ,  8). The princes, in their anger at such a message by Jeremiah, cast him into prison ( 37:15 - 38:13 ). He was still in confinement when the city was taken (B.C. 588). The Chaldeans released him, and showed him great kindness, allowing him to choose the place of his residence. He accordingly went to Mizpah with Gedaliah, who had been made governor of Judea. Johanan succeeded Gedaliah, and refusing to listen to Jeremiah's counsels, went down into Egypt, taking Jeremiah and Baruch with him ( Jeremiah 43:6 ). There probably the prophet spent the remainder of his life, in vain seeking still to turn the people to the Lord, from whom they had so long revolted (44). He lived till the reign of Evil-Merodach, son of Nebuchadnezzar, and must have been about ninety years of age at his death. We have no authentic record of his death. He may have died at Tahpanhes, or, according to a tradition, may have gone to Babylon with the army of Nebuchadnezzar; but of this there is nothing certain.  Jeremiah, Book of Consists of twenty-three separate and independent sections, arranged in five books. I. The introduction, ch. 1. II. Reproofs of the sins of the Jews, consisting of seven sections,  (1.) ch. 2;  (2.) ch. 3-6;  (3.) ch. 7-10;  (4.) ch. 11-13;  (5.) ch. 14-17:18;  (6.) ch. 17:19-ch. 20;  (7.) ch. 21-24. III. A general review of all nations, in two sections,  (1.) ch. 46-49;  (2.) ch. 25; with an historical appendix of three sections,  (1.) ch. 26;  (2.) ch. 27;  (3.) ch. 28, 29. IV. Two sections picturing the hopes of better times,  (1.) ch. 30, 31;  (2.) ch. 32,33; to which is added an historical appendix in three sections,  (1.) ch. 34:1-7;  (2.) ch. 34:8-22;  (3.) ch. 35. V. The conclusion, in two sections,  (1.) ch. 36;  (2.) ch. 45. In Egypt, after an interval, Jeremiah is supposed to have added three sections, viz., ch. 37-39; 40-43; and 44. The principal Messianic prophecies are found in 23:1-8; 31:31-40; and 33:14-26. Jeremiah's prophecies are noted for the frequent repetitions found in them of the same words and phrases and imagery. They cover the period of about 30 years. They are not recorded in the order of time. When and under what circumstances this book assumed its present form we know not. The LXX. Version of this book is, in its arrangement and in other particulars, singularly at variance with the original. The LXX. omits 10:6-8; 27:19-22; 29:16-20; 33:14-26; 39:4-13; 52:2, 3, 15, 28-30, etc. About 2,700 words in all of the original are omitted. These omissions, etc., are capricious and arbitrary, and render the version unreliable. 
HARBONAH|   HARBONA;   har-bo'-na (charebhona' charebhonah): One of the seven eunuchs who served Ahasuerus and to whom was given the command to bring Queen Esther before the king ( Esther 1:10 ). It was he who suggested that Haman be hanged upon the self-same gallows that he had erected for Mordecai ( Esther 7:9 ). Jewish tradition has it that Harbona had originally been a confederate of Haman, but, upon noting the failure of the latter's plans, abandoned him. The Persian equivalent of the name means "donkey-driver."
MALCHISHUA|King of help, one of the four sons of Saul ( 1 Chronicles 8:33 ). He perished along with his father in the battle of Gilboa ( 1 Samuel 31:2 ). 
GELILOTH|Circles; regions, a place in the border of Benjamin ( Joshua 18:17 ); called Gilgal in 15:7. 
TEMPLES|   ROBBERS OF   (hierosuloi, "guilty of sacrilege"): A term used by the town clerk of Ephesus ( Acts 19:37 , the King James Version "robbers of churches"). As the temple of Diana (Artemas) had a great treasure-chamber, the offense might not be unknown among them; compare  Romans 2:22 .  In 2 Maccabees 4:42 the King James Version the epithet "church-robber" (the Revised Version (British and American) "author of the sacrilege") is applied to LYSIMACHUS (which see).  TEMPLES  tem'-p'lz (raqqah, "thinness," "upper cheeks"): The original signifies the thinnest part of the skull ( Judges 4:21, 22 ;  Judges 5:26 ). In  Songs 4:3 ;  Songs 6:7 , the bride's cheeks are likened to pomegranates because of the rich coloring of a slice of this fruit.  TEMPLES, ROBBERS OF  (hierosuloi; the King James Version "robbers of churches,"  Acts 19:37 ): To explain this as "sacrilegious persons" is irreconcilable with the contrast in  Romans 2:22 . In  Deuteronomy 7:25 , the Jews were commanded entirely to destroy the gold and silver idols, ornaments of the heathen temples. The sin reproved is that of making that a matter of gain which, without regard to its value, they should have destroyed. "Dost thou, who regardest the mere touch of an idol as a horrible defilement, presume to rob their temples?" There is abundant evidence to show that this crime was not unusual. When the town-clerk of Ephesus declares the companions of Paul innocent of such charge, his words imply that the fact that they were Jews rendered them liable to such suspicion. So Josephus goes out of his way (Ant., IV, viii, 10) to deny that Jews ever committed the crime.  H. E. Jacobs
HOTHAN|   HOTHAM;   ho'-tham, ho'-than (chotham, "seal"):  (1) An Asherite, son of Heber, family of Beriah ( 1 Chronicles 7:32 ).  (2) An Aroerite, father of two of the mighty men of David ( 1 Chronicles 11:44 ). the King James Version, following Septuagint Chothan, has, incorrectly, Hothan.
ORNAMENTS|Tinkling ornaments ( Isaiah 3:18 ), anklets of silver or gold, etc., such as are still used by women in Syria and the East. 
UNWALLED|     un-wold'.  See  VILLAGE ;  WALL .
MAATH|Small, a person named in our Lord's ancestry ( Luke 3:26 ). 
JUDAH|Praise, the fourth son of Jacob by Leah. The name originated in Leah's words of praise to the Lord on account of his birth: "Now will I praise [Hebrews odeh] Jehovah, and she called his name Yehudah" ( Genesis 29:35 ). It was Judah that interposed in behalf of Joseph, so that his life was spared ( Genesis 37:26 ,  27). He took a lead in the affairs of the family, and "prevailed above his brethren" ( Genesis 43:3 -10;  44:14 ,  16-34;  46:28 ;  1 Chronicles 5:2 ). Soon after the sale of Joseph to the Ishmaelites, Judah went to reside at Adullam, where he married a woman of Canaan. (see  ONAN ; TAMAR.) After the death of his wife Shuah, he returned to his father's house, and there exercised much influence over the patriarch, taking a principal part in the events which led to the whole family at length going down into Egypt. We hear nothing more of him till he received his father's blessing ( Genesis 49:8 -12).  Judah, Kingdom of When the disruption took place at Shechem, at first only the tribe of Judah followed the house of David. But very soon after the tribe of Benjamin joined the tribe of Judah, and Jerusalem became the capital of the new kingdom ( Joshua 18:28 ), which was called the kingdom of Judah. It was very small in extent, being only about the size of the Scottish county of Perth. For the first sixty years the kings of Judah aimed at re-establishing their authority over the kingdom of the other ten tribes, so that there was a state of perpetual war between them. For the next eighty years there was no open war between them. For the most part they were in friendly alliance, co-operating against their common enemies, especially against Damascus. For about another century and a half Judah had a somewhat checkered existence after the termination of the kingdom of Israel till its final overthrow in the destruction of the temple (B.C. 588) by Nebuzar-adan, who was captain of Nebuchadnezzar's body-guard ( 2 Kings 25:8 -21). The kingdom maintained a separate existence for three hundred and eighty-nine years. It occupied an area of 3,435 square miles. (see  ISRAEL ,  KINGDOM OF.)  Judah, Tribe of Judah and his three surviving sons went down with Jacob into Egypt ( Genesis 46:12 ;  Exodus 1:2 ). At the time of the Exodus, when we meet with the family of Judah again, they have increased to the number of 74,000 males ( Numbers 1:26 ,  27). Its number increased in the wilderness ( 26:22 ). Caleb, the son of Jephunneh, represented the tribe as one of the spies ( 13:6 ;  34:19 ). This tribe marched at the van on the east of the tabernacle ( Numbers 2:3 -9;  10:14 ), its standard, as is supposed, being a lion's whelp. Under Caleb, during the wars of conquest, they conquered that portion of the country which was afterwards assigned to them as their inheritance. This was the only case in which any tribe had its inheritance thus determined ( Joshua 14:6 -15;  15:13 -19). The inheritance of the tribe of Judah was at first fully one-third of the whole country west of Jordan, in all about 2,300 square miles ( Joshua 15 ). But there was a second distribution, when Simeon received an allotment, about 1,000 square miles, out of the portion of Judah ( Joshua 19:9 ). That which remained to Judah was still very large in proportion to the inheritance of the other tribes. The boundaries of the territory are described in  Joshua 15:20 -63. This territory given to Judah was divided into four sections.  (1.) The south (Hebrews negeb), the undulating pasture-ground between the hills and the desert to the south ( Joshua 15:21. ) This extent of pasture-land became famous as the favourite camping-ground of the old patriarchs.  (2.) The "valley" ( 15:33 ) or lowland (Hebrews shephelah), a broad strip lying between the central highlands and the Mediterranean. This tract was the garden as well as the granary of the tribe.  (3.) The "hill-country," or the mountains of Judah, an elevated plateau stretching from below Hebron northward to Jerusalem. "The towns and villages were generally perched on the tops of hills or on rocky slopes. The resources of the soil were great. The country was rich in corn, wine, oil, and fruit; and the daring shepherds were able to lead their flocks far out over the neighbouring plains and through the mountains." The number of towns in this district was thirty-eight ( Joshua 15:48 -60).  (4.) The "wilderness," the sunken district next the Dead Sea ( Joshua 15:61 ), "averaging 10 miles in breadth, a wild, barren, uninhabitable region, fit only to afford scanty pasturage for sheep and goats, and a secure home for leopards, bears, wild goats, and outlaws" ( 1 Samuel 17:34 ;  22:1 ;  Mark 1:13 ). It was divided into the "wilderness of En-gedi" ( 1 Samuel 24:1 ), the "wilderness of Judah" ( Judges 1:16 ;  Matthew 3:1 ), between the Hebron mountain range and the Dead Sea, the "wilderness of Maon" ( 1 Samuel 23:24 ). It contained only six cities. Nine of the cities of Judah were assigned to the priests ( Joshua 21:9 -19).  Judah upon Jordan The Authorized Version, following the Vulgate, has this rendering in  Joshua 19:34 . It has been suggested that, following the Masoretic punctuation, the expression should read thus, "and Judah; the Jordan was toward the sun-rising." The sixty cities (Havoth-jair,   Numbers 32:41 ) on the east of Jordan were reckoned as belonging to Judah, because Jair, their founder, was a Manassite only on his mother's side, but on his father's side of the tribe of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:5 ,  21-23). 
BILHAH|Faltering; bashful, Rachel's handmaid, whom she gave to Jacob ( Genesis 29:29 ). She was the mother of Dan and Naphtali ( Genesis 30:3 -8). Reuben was cursed by his father for committing adultry with her ( 35:22 ;  49:4 ). He was deprived of the birth-right, which was given to the sons of Joseph. 
HEAVENS|   CHAMBERS IN THE   See  ASTRONOMY ;  DIAL OF AHAZ .  HEAVENS  hev'-'nz (shamayim; ouranoi): On the physical heavens see ASTRONOMY; WORLD. Above these, in popular conception, were the celestial heavens, the abode of God and of the hosts of angels ( Psalm 11:4 ;  Psalm 103:19-21   Isaiah 66:1   Revelation 4:2 ;  Revelation 5:11 ; compare  Daniel 7:10 ), though it was recognized that Yahweh's presence was not confined to any region ( 1 Kings 8:27 ). Later Judaism reckoned seven heavens. The apostle Paul speaks of himself as caught up into "the third heaven," which he evidently identifies with Paradise ( 2 Corinthians 12:2 ).  See  HEAVENLY .  HEAVENS, NEW (AND EARTH, NEW)  " 1. Eschatological Idea  2. Earliest Conceptions: Cosmic verses National Type  3. Different from Mythological Theory  4. Antiquity of Cosmical Conception  5. The Cosmical Dependent on the Ethico-Religious  6. The End Correspondent to the Beginning  7. The Cosmical Heavens: Hebrews 12:26-29  8. Palingenesis: Matthew 19:28  9. A Purified Universe  1. Eschatological Idea:  The formal conception of new heavens and a new earth occurs in  Isaiah 65:17 ;  Isaiah 66:22   2 Peter 3:13 ;  Revelation 21:1  (where "heaven," singular). The idea in substance is also found in  Isaiah 51:16   Matthew 19:28   2 Corinthians 5:17 ;  Hebrews 12:26-28 . In each case the reference is eschatological, indeed the adjective "new" seems to have acquired in this and other connections a semi-technical eschatological sense. It must be remembered that the Old Testament has no single word for "universe," and that the phrase "heaven and earth" serves to supply the deficiency. The promise of a new heavens and a new earth is therefore equivalent to a promise of world renewal.  2. Earliest Conceptions: Cosmic verses National Type:  It is a debated question how old in the history of revelation this promise is. Isaiah is the prophet with whom the idea first occurs in explicit form, and that in passages which many critics would assign to the post-exilic period (the so-called Trito-Isaiah). In general, until recently, the trend of criticism has been to represent the universalistic-cosmic type of eschatology as developed out of the particularistic-national type by a gradual process of widening of the horizon of prophecy, a view which would put the emergence of the former at a comparatively late date. More recently, however, Gressmann (Der Ursprung der israelitisch-judischen Eschatologie, 1905) and others have endeavored to show that often even prophecies belonging to the latter type embody material and employ means of expression which presuppose acquaintance with the idea of a world-catastrophe at the end. On this view the world-eschatology would have, from ancient times, existed alongside of the more narrowly confined outlook, and would be even older than the latter. These writers further assume that the cosmic eschatology was not indigenous among the Hebrews, but of oriental (Babylonian) origin, a theory which they apply not only to the more developed system of the later apocalyptic writings, but also to its preformations in the Old Testament. The cosmic eschatology is not believed to have been the distinctive property of the great ethical prophets, but rather a commonly current mythological belief to which the prophets refer without formally endorsing it.  3. Different from Mythological Theory:  Its central thought is said to have been the belief that the end of the world-process must correspond to the beginning, that consequently the original condition of things, when heaven and earth were new, must repeat itself at some future point, and the state of paradise with its concomitants return, a belief supposed to have rested on certain astronomical observations.  4. Antiquity of Cosmical Conception  While this theory in the form presented is unproven and unacceptable, it deserves credit for having focused attention on certain phenomena in the Old Testament which clearly show that Messianic prophecy, and particularly the world-embracing scope which it assumes in some predictions, is far older than modern criticism had been willing to concede. The Old Testament from the beginning has an eschatology and puts the eschatological promise on the broadest racial basis ( Genesis 3 ). It does not first ascend from Israel to the new humanity, but at the very outset takes its point of departure in the race and from this descends to the election of Israel, always keeping the Universalistic goal in clear view. Also in the earliest accounts, already elements of a cosmical universalism find their place side by side with those of a racial kind, as when Nature is represented as sharing in the consequences of the fall of man.  5. The Cosmical Dependent on the Ethico-Religious:  As regards the antiquity of the universalistic and cosmical eschatology, therefore, the conclusions of these writers may be registered as a gain, while on the two other points of the pagan origin and the unethical character of the expectation involved, dissent from them should be expressed. According to the Old Testament, the whole idea of world-renewal is of strictly super-natural origin, and in it the cosmical follows the ethical hope. The cosmical eschatology is simply the correlate of the fundamental Biblical principle that the issues of the world-process depend on the ethico-religious developments in the history of man (compare  2 Peter 3:13 ).  6. The End Correspondent to the Beginning:  But the end correspondent to the beginning is likewise a true Scriptural principle, which theory in question has helped to reemphasize, although there is this difference that Scripture does not look forward to a repetition of the same process, but to a restoration of the primeval harmony on a higher plane such as precludes all further disturbance. In the passages above cited, there are clear reminiscences of the account of creation ( Isaiah 51:16 , "that I may plant the heavens, and lay the foundations of the earth";  Isaiah 65:17 , "I create new heavens and a new earth";  2 Peter 3:13  compared with  2 Peter 3:4-6   Revelation 21:1  compared with the imagery of paradise throughout the chapter). Besides this, where the thought of the renewal of earth is met with in older prophecy, this is depicted in colors of the state of paradise ( Isaiah 11:6-9   Hosea 2:18-21 ). The "regeneration" (palingenesia) of  Matthew 19:28  also points back to the first genesis of the world. The `inhabited earth to come' (oikoumene mellousa) of  Hebrews 2:5  occurs at the opening of a context throughout which the account of  Genesis 1-3  evidently stood before the writer's mind.  7. The Cosmical Heavens: Hebrews 12:26-29:  In the combination "new heavens and a new earth," the term "heavens" must therefore be taken in the sense imposed upon it by the story of creation, where "heavens" designates not the celestial habitation of God, but the cosmical heavens, the region of the supernal waters, sun moon and stars. The Bible nowhere suggests that there is anything abnormal or requiring renewal in God's dwelling-place ( Hebrews 9:23  is of a different import). In  Revelation 21 , where "the new heaven and the new earth" appear, it is at the same time stated that the new Jerusalem comes down from God out of heaven (compare 21:1, 2, 10). In  Hebrews 12:26-28  also the implication is that only the lower heavens are subject to renewal. The "shaking" that accompanies the new covenant and corresponds to the shaking of the law-giving at Sinai, is a shaking of "not the earth only, but also the heaven." This shaking, in its reference to heaven as well as to earth, signifies a removal of the things shaken. But from the things thus shaken and removed (including heaven), the writer distinguishes "those things which are not shaken," which are destined to remain, and these are identified with the kingdom of God. The kingdom of God, however, according to the general trend of the teaching of the epistle, has its center in the heavenly world. The words "that have been made," in 12:27, do not assign their created character as the reason why heaven and earth can be shaken, an exegesis which would involve us in the difficulty that among that which remains there is something uncreated besides God; the true construction and correct paraphrase are: "as of things that were made with the thought in the mind of God that those things which cannot be shaken may remain," i.e. already at creation God contemplated an unchangeable universe as the ultimate, higher state of things.  8. Palingenesis: Matthew 19:28:  In  Matthew 19:28  the term palingenesia marks the world-renewing as the renewal of an abnormal state of things. The Scripture teaching, therefore, is that around the center of God's heaven, which is not subject to deterioration or renewal, a new cosmical heaven and a new earth will be established to be the dwelling-place of the eschatological humanity. The light in which the promise thus appears reminds us that the renewed kosmos, earth as well as cosmical heavens, is destined to play a permanent (not merely provisional, on the principle of chiliasm) part in the future life of the people of God. This is in entire harmony with the prevailing Biblical representation, not only in the Old Testament but likewise in the New Testament (compare  Matthew 5:5   Hebrews 2:5 ), although in the Fourth Gospel and in the Pauline Epistles the emphasis is to such an extent thrown on the heaven-centered character of the future life that the role to be played in it by the renewed earth recedes into the background. Revelation, on the other hand, recognizes this element in its imagery of "the new Jerus" coming down from God out of heaven upon earth.  9. A Purified Universe:  That the new heavens and the new earth are represented as the result of a "creation" does not necessarily involve a production ex nihilo. The terms employed in  2 Peter 3:6-13  seem rather to imply that the renewal will out of the old produce a purified universe, whence also the catastrophe is compared to that of the Deluge. As then the old world perished by water and the present world arose out of the flood, so in the end-crisis "the heavens shall be dissolved by fire and the elements melt with fervent heat," to give rise to the new heaven and the new earth in which righteousness dwells. The term palingenesia ( Matthew 19:28 ) points to renewal, not to creation de novo. The Talmud also teaches that the world will pass through a process of purification, although at the same time it seems to break up the continuity between this and the coming world by the fantastic assumption that the new heavens and the new earth of  Isaiah 65:17  were created at the close of the Hexemeron of Genesis 1. This was inferred from the occurrence of the article in  Isaiah 66:22 , "the new heavens and the new earth."  Geerhardus Vos
ZEBAIM|( Ezra 2:57 ;  Nehemiah 7:59 ). "Pochereth of Zebaim" should be read as in the Revised Version, "Pochereth-hazzebaim" ("snaring the antelopes"), probably the name of some hunter. 
REU|     re'-u, roo (re`u, Rhagau): A son of Peleg, a descendant of Shem ( Genesis 11:18   1 Chronicles 1:25   Luke 3:35 ).
JOBAB|Dweller in the desert.  (1.) One of the sons of Joktan, and founder of an Arabian tribe ( Genesis 10:29 ).  (2.) King of Edom, succeeded Bela ( Genesis 36:33 ,  34).  (3.) A Canaanitish king ( Joshua 11:1 ) who joined the confederacy against Joshua. 
JOKDEAM|A city in the mountains of Judah ( Joshua 15:56 ). 
RIBAI|     ri'-ba-i, ri'-bi (ribhay; Septuagint Rheiba, with variants): A Benjamite, the father of ITTAI (which see), one of David's "mighty men" ( 2 Samuel 23:29  parallel  1 Chronicles 11:31 ).
ZATTHU|A sprout,  Nehemiah 10:14 . 
ZELZAH|     zel'-za (tseltsach; hallomenous megala): A place where Samuel told Saul he would meet two men with news that the asses were found. Its position is defined as "by Rachel's sepulchre, in the border of Benjamin" ( 1 Samuel 10:2 ). It has been thought that the place of meeting was sufficiently indicated without the word betseltsach, which is translated "at Zelzah," and that this cannot therefore be a place-name. The Septuagint has "leaping mightily" or "in great haste" (Ewald) points to a different text. Whether the Greek can be so translated is also a question, as megala does not elsewhere occur as an adverb. Some corruption of the text is probable. The border of Benjamin may be roughly determined, but the tomb of Rachel is now unknown. No name like Zelzah has been recovered in the district. Smith ("Samuel," ICC, at the place) suggests that we should read "Zela" for "Zelzah" (tsela`, for tseltsach).  W. Ewing
MAHALAH|     ma-ha'-la, ma'-ha-la (machlah; the Revised Version (British and American) has the correct form MAHLAH): A descendant of Manasseh ( 1 Chronicles 7:18 ).
ISUAH|   ISHUAH;   ish'-u-a, is'-u-a (yishwah, literally, "he will level").  See  ISHUAI ;  ISHVAH ; ISHVI.  ISUAH  is'-u-a. See  ISHVAH .
MIBSAM|Fragrance.  (1.) One of Ishmael's twelve sons, and head of an Arab tribe ( Genesis 25:13 ). (2.) A son of Simeon ( 1 Chronicles 4:25 ). 
BRICKS|The making of, formed the chief labour of the Israelites in Egypt ( Exodus 1:13 ,  14). Those found among the ruins of Babylon and Nineveh are about a foot square and four inches thick. They were usually dried in the sun, though also sometimes in kilns ( 2 Samuel 12:31 ;  Jeremiah 43:9 ;  Nahum 3:14 ). (see  NEBUCHADNEZZAR .) The bricks used in the tower of Babel were burnt bricks, cemented in the building by bitumen ( Genesis 11:3 ). 
BARTHOLOMEW|Son of Tolmai, one of the twelve apostles ( Matthew 10:3 ;  Acts 1:13 ); generally supposed to have been the same as Nathanael. In the synoptic gospels Philip and Bartholomew are always mentioned together, while Nathanael is never mentioned; in the fourth gospel, on the other hand, Philip and Nathanael are similarly mentioned together, but nothing is said of Bartholomew. He was one of the disciples to whom our Lord appeared at the Sea of Tiberias after his resurrection ( John 21:2 ). He was also a witness of the Ascension ( Acts 1:4 ,  12,  13). He was an "Israelite indeed" ( John 1:47 ). 
HUR|A hole, as of a viper, etc.  (1.) A son of Caleb ( 1 Chronicles 2:19 ,  50;  4:1 ,  4; Comp.  2 Chronicles 1:5 ). (2.) The husband of Miriam, Moses' sister ( Exodus 17:10 -12). He was associated with Aaron in charge of the people when Moses was absent on Sinai ( Exodus 24:14 ). He was probably of the tribe of Judah, and grandfather of Bezaleel ( Exodus 31:2 ;  35:30 ;  1 Chronicles 2:19 ). (3.) One of the five princes of Midian who were defeated and slain by the Israelites under the command of Phinehas ( Numbers 31:8 ). 
HASSENAAH|     has-e-na'-a (haccena'ah): In  Nehemiah 3:3  the "sons of Hassenaah" are mentioned among the builders of the wall. Probably the same as Senaah ( Ezra 2:35   Nehemiah 7:38 ) with the definite article, i.e. has-Senaah. The latter, from the connection, would appear to be a place-name.  See also  HASSENUAH .
HAKKATAN|     hak'-a-tan (ha-qaTan, "the little one"): The father of Johanan, who returned with Ezra to Jerusalem ( Ezra 8:12  = Akatan, APC 1Esdras 8:38).
BENAMMI|Son of my kindred; i.e., "born of incest", the son of Lot by his youngest daughter ( Genesis 19:38 ). 
GERSHON|=Ger'shom expulsion, the eldest of Levi's three sons ( Genesis 46:11 ;  Exodus 6:16 ). In the wilderness the sons of Gershon had charge of the fabrics of the taber
ISHUAH|   ; ISUAH  ish'-u-a, is'-u-a (yishwah, literally, "he will level").  See  ISHUAI ;  ISHVAH ; ISHVI.
TEKOAH|Pitching of tents; fastening down, a town of Judah, about 12 miles south of Jerusalem, and visible from the city. From this place Joab procured a "wise woman," who pretended to be in great affliction, and skilfully made her case known to David. Her address to the king was in the form of an apologue, similar to that of Nathan ( 2 Samuel 12:1 -6). The object of Joab was, by the intervention of this woman, to induce David to bring back Absalom to Jerusalem ( 2 Samuel 14:2 ,  4,  9). This was also the birth-place of the prophet Amos ( 1:1 ). It is now the village of Teku'a, on the top of a hill among ruins, 5 miles south of Bethlehem, and close to Beth-haccerem ("Herod's mountain"). 
MANOAH|Rest, a Danite, the father of Samson ( Judges 13:1 -22,  and 14:2-4). 
COUNCILLOR|   COUNCIL;   koun'-sil, koun'-siler (sumboulion): An assembly of advisers ( Acts 25:12 ); a body of those taking counsel (see Schurer's Jewish People in the Time of Christ, I (1), 60). Distinguished from sunedrion, the supreme court of the Jews, by being of a less formal character, i.e. less of an institution. For "council" in the latter sense, its most frequent use, see SANHEDRIN. A councilor (Greek bouleutes) was a member of the Sanhedrin. Applied to Joseph of Arimathea ( Mark 15:43   Luke 23:50 ). In the King James Version "counsellor."
ROME|The most celebrated city in the world at the time of Christ. It is said to have been founded B.C. 753. When the New Testament was written, Rome was enriched and adorned with the spoils of the world, and contained a population estimated at 1,200,000, of which the half were slaves, and including representatives of nearly every nation then known. It was distinguished for its wealth and luxury and profligacy. The empire of which it was the capital had then reached its greatest prosperity. On the day of Pentecost there were in Jerusalem "strangers from Rome," who doubtless carried with them back to Rome tidings of that great day, and were instrumental in founding the church there. Paul was brought to this city a prisoner, where he remained for two years ( Acts 28:30 ,  31) "in his own hired house." While here, Paul wrote his epistles to the Philippians, to the Ephesians, to the Colossians, to Philemon, and probably also to the Hebrews. He had during these years for companions Luke and Aristarchus ( Acts 27:2 ), Timothy ( Philippians 1:1 ;  Colossians 1:1 ), Tychicus ( Ephesians 6: 21 ), Epaphroditus ( Philippians 4:18 ), and John Mark ( Colossians 4:10 ). (see  PAUL .) Beneath this city are extensive galleries, called "catacombs," which were used from about the time of the apostles (one of the inscriptions found in them bears the date A.D. 71) for some three hundred years as places of refuge in the time of persecution, and also of worship and burial. About four thousand inscriptions have been found in the catacombs. These give an interesting insight into the history of the church at Rome down to the time of Constantine. 
MACEDONIA|In New Testament times, was a Roman province lying north of Greece. It was governed by a propraetor with the title of proconsul. Paul was summoned by the vision of the "man of Macedonia" to preach the gospel there ( Acts 16:9 ). Frequent allusion is made to this event ( 18:5 ;  19:21 ;  Romans 15:26 ;  2 Corinthians 1:16 ;  11:9 ;  Philippians 4:15 ). The history of Paul's first journey through Macedonia is given in detail in  Acts 16:10 - 17:15 . At the close of this journey he returned from Corinth to Syria. He again passed through this country ( 20:1 -6), although the details of the route are not given. After many years he probably visited it for a third time ( Philippians 2:24 ;  1 Timothy 1:3 ). The first convert made by Paul in Europe was ( Acts 16:13 -15) Lydia (q.v.), a "seller of purple," residing in Philippi, the chief city of the eastern division of Macedonia. 
HARHAS|     har'-has (charchas, "splendor"): Grandfather of Shallum, husband of Huldah ( 2 Kings 22:14 ). Name given as "Hasrah" in paralle passage ( 2 Chronicles 34:22 ).
MICAIAH|Who is like Jehovah?, the son of Imlah, a faithful prophet of Samaria ( 1 Kings 22:8 -28). Three years after the great battle with Ben-hadad ( 20:29 -34), Ahab proposed to Jehoshaphat, king of Judah, that they should go up against Ramoth-Gilead to do battle again with Ben-hadad. Jehoshaphat agreed, but suggested that inquiry should be first made "at the word of Jehovah." Ahab's prophets approved of the expedition; but Jehoshaphat, still dissatisfied, asked if there was no other prophet besides the four hundred that had appeared, and was informed of this Micaiah. He was sent for from prison, where he had been confined, probably on account of some prediction disagreeable to Ahab; and he condemned the expedition, and prophesied that it would end, as it did, in disaster. We hear nothing further of this prophet. Some have supposed that he was the unnamed prophet referred to in  1 Kings 20:35 -42. 
MANASSEH|Who makes to forget. "God hath made me forget" (Hebrews nashshani),  Genesis 41:51 .  (1.) The elder of the two sons of Joseph. He and his brother Ephraim were afterwards adopted by Jacob as his own sons ( 48:1 ). There is an account of his marriage to a Syrian ( 1 Chronicles 7:14 ); and the only thing afterwards recorded of him is, that his grandchildren were "brought up upon Joseph's knees" ( Genesis 50:23 ; R.V.,  "born upon Joseph's knees") i.e., were from their birth adopted by Joseph as his own children. The tribe of Manasseh was associated with that of Ephraim and Benjamin during the wanderings in the wilderness. They encamped on the west side of the tabernacle. According to the census taken at Sinai, this tribe then numbered 32,200 ( Numbers 1:10 ,  35;  2:20 ,  21). Forty years afterwards its numbers had increased to 52,700 ( 26:34 ,  37), and it was at this time the most distinguished of all the tribes. The half of this tribe, along with Reuben and Gad, had their territory assigned them by Moses on the east of the Jordan ( Joshua 13:7 -14); but it was left for Joshua to define the limits of each tribe. This territory on the east of Jordan was more valuable and of larger extent than all that was allotted to the nine and a half tribes in the land of Palestine. It is sometimes called "the land of Gilead," and is also spoken of as "on the other side of Jordan." The portion given to the half tribe of Manasseh was the largest on the east of Jordan. It embraced the whole of Bashan. It was bounded on the south by Mahanaim, and extended north to the foot of Lebanon. Argob, with its sixty cities, that "ocean of basaltic rocks and boulders tossed about in the wildest confusion," lay in the midst of this territory. The whole "land of Gilead" having been conquered, the two and a half tribes left their wives and families in the fortified cities there, and accompanied the other tribes across the Jordan, and took part with them in the wars of conquest. The allotment of the land having been completed, Joshua dismissed the two and a half tribes, commending them for their heroic service ( Joshua 22:1 -34). Thus dismissed, they returned over Jordan to their own inheritance. (see  ED .) On the west of Jordan the other half of the tribe of Manasseh was associated with Ephraim, and they had their portion in the very centre of Palestine, an area of about 1,300 square miles, the most valuable part of the whole country, abounding in springs of water. Manasseh's portion was immediately to the north of that of Ephraim ( Joshua 16 ). Thus the western Manasseh defended the passes of Esdraelon as the eastern kept the passes of the Hauran. (2.) The only son and successor of Hezekiah on the throne of Judah. He was twelve years old when he began to reign ( 2 Kings 21:1 ), and he reigned fifty-five years (B.C. 698-643). Though he reigned so long, yet comparatively little is known of this king. His reign was a continuation of that of Ahaz, both in religion and national polity. He early fell under the influence of the heathen court circle, and his reign was characterized by a sad relapse into idolatry with all its vices, showing that the reformation under his father had been to a large extent only superficial ( Isaiah 7:10 ;  2 Kings 21:10 -15). A systematic and persistent attempt was made, and all too successfully, to banish the worship of Jehovah out of the land. Amid this wide-spread idolatry there were not wanting, however, faithful prophets (Isaiah,  Micah) who lifted up their voice in reproof and in warning. But their fidelity only aroused bitter hatred, and a period of cruel persecution against all the friends of the old religion began. "The days of Alva in Holland, of Charles IX. in France, or of the Covenanters under Charles II. in Scotland, were anticipated in the Jewish capital. The streets were red with blood." There is an old Jewish tradition that Isaiah was put to death at this time ( 2 Kings 21:16 ;  24:3 ,  4;  Jeremiah 2:30 ), having been sawn asunder in the trunk of a tree. Psalms 49, 73, 77, 140, and 141 seem to express the feelings of the pious amid the fiery trials of this great persecution. Manasseh has been called the "Nero of Palestine." Esarhaddon, Sennacherib's successor on the Assyrian throne, who had his residence in Babylon for thirteen years (the only Assyrian monarch who ever reigned in Babylon), took Manasseh prisoner (B.C. 681) to Babylon. Such captive kings were usually treated with great cruelty. They were brought before the conqueror with a hook or ring passed through their lips or their jaws, having a cord attached to it, by which they were led. This is referred to in  2 Chronicles 33:11 , where the Authorized Version reads that Esarhaddon "took Manasseh among the thorns;" while the Revised Version renders the words, "took Manasseh in chains;" or literally, as in the margin, "with hooks." (Comp.  2 Kings 19:28. ) The severity of Manasseh's imprisonment brought him to repentance. God heard his cry, and he was restored to his kingdom ( 2 Chronicles 33:11 -13). He abandoned his idolatrous ways, and enjoined the people to worship Jehovah; but there was no thorough reformation. After a lengthened reign extending through fifty-five years, the longest in the history of Judah, he died, and was buried in the garden of Uzza, the "garden of his own house" ( 2 Kings 21:17 ,  18;  2 Chronicles 33:20 ), and not in the city of David, among his ancestors. He was succeeded by his son Amon. In  Judges 18:30  the correct reading is "Moses," and not "Manasseh." The name "Manasseh" is supposed to have been introduced by some transcriber to avoid the scandal of naming the grandson of Moses the great lawgiver as the founder of an idolatrous religion. 
PADAN|A plain, occurring only in  Genesis 48:7 , where it designates Padan-aram. 
CORINTHIANS|Corinthians, First Epistle to the  Was written from Ephesus ( 1 Corinthians 16:8 ) about the time of the Passover in the third year of the apostle's sojourn there ( Acts 19:10 ;  20:31 ), and when he had formed the purpose to visit Macedonia, and then return to Corinth (probably A.D. 57). The news which had reached him, however, from Corinth frustrated his plan. He had heard of the abuses and contentions that had arisen among them, first from Apollos ( Acts 19:1 ), and then from a letter they had written him on the subject, and also from some of the "household of Chloe," and from Stephanas and his two friends who had visited him ( 1 Corinthians 1:11 ;  16:17 ). Paul thereupon wrote this letter, for the purpose of checking the factious spirit and correcting the erroneous opinions that had sprung up among them, and remedying the many abuses and disorderly practices that prevailed. Titus and a brother whose name is not given were probably the bearers of the letter ( 2 Corinthians 2:13 ;  8:6 ,  16-18). The epistle may be divided into four parts: (1.) The apostle deals with the subject of the lamentable divisions and party strifes that had arisen among them ( 1 Corinthians 1 -4). (2.) He next treats of certain cases of immorality that had become notorious among them. They had apparently set at nought the very first principles of morality (5; 6). (3.) In the third part he discusses various questions of doctrine and of Christian ethics in reply to certain communications they had made to him. He especially rectifies certain flagrant abuses regarding the celebration of the Lord's supper (7-14). (4.) The concluding part (15; 16) contains an elaborate defense of the doctrine of the resurrection of the dead, which had been called in question by some among them, followed by some general instructions, intimations, and greetings. This epistle "shows the powerful self-control of the apostle in spite of his physical weakness, his distressed circumstances, his incessant troubles, and his emotional nature. It was written, he tells us, in bitter anguish, `out of much affliction and pressure of heart...and with streaming eyes' ( 2 Corinthians 2:4 ); yet he restrained the expression of his feelings, and wrote with a dignity and holy calm which he thought most calculated to win back his erring children. It gives a vivid picture of the early church...It entirely dissipates the dream that the apostolic church was in an exceptional condition of holiness of life or purity of doctrine." The apostle in this epistle unfolds and applies great principles fitted to guide the church of all ages in dealing with the same and kindred evils in whatever form they may appear. This is one of the epistles the authenticity of which has never been called in question by critics of any school, so many and so conclusive are the evidences of its Pauline origin. The subscription to this epistle states erroneously in the Authorized Version that it was written at Philippi. This error arose from a mistranslation of  1 Corinthians 16:5 , "For I do pass through Macedonia," which was interpreted as meaning, "I am passing through Macedonia." In 16:8 he declares his intention of remaining some time longer in Ephesus. After that, his purpose is to "pass through Macedonia."  Corinthians, Second Epistle to the  Shortly after writing his first letter to the Corinthians, Paul left Ephesus, where intense excitement had been aroused against him, the evidence of his great success, and proceeded to Macedonia. Pursuing the usual route, he reached Troas, the port of departure for Europe. Here he expected to meet with Titus, whom he had sent from Ephesus to Corinth, with tidings of the effects produced on the church there by the first epistle; but was disappointed ( 1 Corinthians 16:9 ;  2 Corinthians 1:8 ;  2:12 ,  13). He then left Troas and proceeded to Macedonia; and at Philippi, where he tarried, he was soon joined by Titus ( 2 Corinthians 7:6 ,  7), who brought him good news from Corinth, and also by Timothy. Under the influence of the feelings awakened in his mind by the favourable report which Titus brought back from Corinth, this second epistle was written. It was probably written at Philippi, or, as some think, Thessalonica, early in the year A.D. 58, and was sent to Corinth by Titus. This letter he addresses not only to the church in Corinth, but also to the saints in all Achaia, i.e., in Athens, Cenchrea, and other cities in Greece. The contents of this epistle may be thus arranged: (1.) Paul speaks of his spiritual labours and course of life, and expresses his warm affection toward the Corinthians ( 2 Corinthians 1 -7). (2.) He gives specific directions regarding the collection that was to be made for their poor brethren in Judea (8; 9). (3.) He defends his own apostolic claim (10-13), and justifies himself from the charges and insinuations of the false teacher and his adherents. This epistle, it has been well said, shows the individuallity of the apostle more than any other. "Human weakness, spiritual strength, the deepest tenderness of affection, wounded feeling, sternness, irony, rebuke, impassioned self-vindication, humility, a just self-respect, zeal for the welfare of the weak and suffering, as well as for the progress of the church of Christ and for the spiritual advancement of its members, are all displayed in turn in the course of his appeal."--Lias, Second Corinthians. Of the effects produced on the Corinthian church by this epistle we have no definite information. We know that Paul visited Corinth after he had written it ( Acts 20:2 ,  3), and that on that occasion he tarried there for three months. In his letter to Rome, written at this time, he sent salutations from some of the principal members of the church to the Romans.
BAZLUTH|   BAZLITH;   baz'-lith, baz'-luth (batslith,  Nehemiah 7:54 ; batsluth,  Ezra 2:52 ; Basaloth, 1 Esdras 5:31, "asking"): The descendants of Bazlith (temple-servants) returned with Zerubbabel to Jerusalem.
SHIBMAH|Fragrance, a town of Reuben, east of Jordan ( Numbers 32:38 ). 
JORKEAM|     jor'-ke-am (yorqe`am; the King James Version Jorkoam): This is probably to be taken as the name of a town, the "father" or "founder" of which was Raham ( 1 Chronicles 2:44 ). It may be identical with "Jokdeam" of  Joshua 15:56 .
DEDANITES|   DEDAN;   de'-dan, de'dan-its (the King James Version Dedanim, ded'-a-nim; dedhan, "low," dedhanim): An Arabian people named in  Genesis 10:7  as descended from Cush; in  Genesis 25:3  as descended from Keturah. Evidently, they were, like the related Sheba (Sabaeans), of mixed race (compare  Genesis 10:7, 28 ). In  Isaiah 21:13  allusion is made to the "caravans of Dedanites" in the wilds of Arabia, and Ezekiel mentions them as supplying Tyre with precious things ( Ezekiel 27:20 ; in verse 15, "Dedan" should probably be read as in Septuagint, "Rodan," i.e. Rhodians). The name seems still to linger in the island of Dadan, on the border of the Persian Gulf. It is found also in Min. and Sab. inscriptions (Glazer, II, 392).  James Orr
NEAPOLIS|New city, a town in Thrace at which Paul first landed in Europe ( Acts 16:11 ). It was the sea-port of the inland town of Philippi, which was distant about 10 miles. From this port Paul embarked on his last journey to Jerusalem ( Acts 20:6 ). It is identified with the modern Turco-Grecian Kavalla. 
BYWAYS|Only in  Judges 5:6  and  Psalm 125:5 ; literally "winding or twisted roads." The margin has "crooked ways." 
BOOTHS|   , FEAST OF  See  FEASTS AND FASTS, I, 2 .
JUSHABHESED|   JUSHAB-HESED  joo'-shab-he'-sed (yushabh checedh, "loving-kindness is returned"): Son of Zerubbabel. The name is probably symbolical ( 1 Chronicles 3:20 ); compare SHEAR-JASHUB.
CNIDUS|A town and harbour on the extreme south-west of the peninsula of Doris in Asia Minor. Paul sailed past it on his voyage to Rome after leaving Myra ( Acts 27:7 ). 
SUAH|     su'-a (cuach): Son of Zophah, of the tribe of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 7:36 ).
PARTHIANS|Were present in Jerusalem at Pentecost ( Acts 2:9 ). Parthia lay on the east of Media and south of Hyrcania, which separated it from the Caspian Sea. It corresponded with the western half of the modern Khorasan, and now forms a part of Persia. 
JULIUS|The centurion of the Augustan cohort, or the emperor's body-guard, in whose charge Paul was sent prisoner to Rome ( Acts 27:1 ,  3,  43). He entreated Paul "courteously," showing in many ways a friendly regard for him. 
JASHOBEAM|Dweller among the people; or to whom the people turn, the Hachmonite ( 1 Chronicles 11:11 ), one of David's chief heroes who joined him at Ziklag ( 12:6 ). He was the first of the three who broke through the host of the Philistines to fetch water to David from the well of Bethlehem ( 2 Samuel 23:13 -17). He is also called Adino the Eznite (8). 
KORE|Partridge.  (1.) A Levite and temple-warder of the Korahites, the son of Asaph. He was father of Shallum and Meshelemiah, temple-porters ( 1 Chronicles 9:19 ;  26:1 ). (2.) A Levitical porter at the east gate of the temple ( 2 Chronicles 31:14 ). (3.) In  1 Chronicles 26:19  the word should be "Korahites," as in the Revised Version. 
NEMUELITES|     nem'-u-el-its, ne-mu'-el-its (ha-nemu'eli).  See  NEMUEL, (2) .
IR|     ir (`ir): A descendant of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 7:12 ), called Iri in  1 Chronicles 7:7 .
BEZEK|Lightning.  (1.) The residence of Adoni-bezek, in the lot of Judah ( Judges 1:5 ). It was in the mountains, not far from Jerusalem. Probably the modern Bezkah, 6 miles south-east of Lydda. (2.) The place where Saul numbered the forces of Israel and Judah ( 1 Samuel 11:8 ); somewhere in the centre of the country, near the Jordan valley. Probably the modern Ibzik, 13 miles north-east of Shechem. 
SISERA|(Egypt. Ses-Ra,  "servant of Ra").  (1.) The captain of Jabin's army ( Judges 4:2 ), which was routed and destroyed by the army of Barak on the plain of Esdraelon. After all was lost he fled to the settlement of Heber the Kenite in the plain of Zaanaim. Jael, Heber's wife, received him into her tent with apparent hospitality, and "gave him butter" (i.e.,  lebben,  or curdled milk) "in a lordly dish." Having drunk the refreshing beverage, he lay down, and soon sank into the sleep of the weary. While he lay asleep Jael crept stealthily up to him, and taking in her hand one of the tent pegs, with a mallet she drove it with such force through his temples that it entered into the ground where he lay, and "at her feet he bowed, he fell; where he bowed, there he fell down dead." The part of Deborah's song ( Judges 5:24 -27) referring to the death of Sisera (which is a "mere patriotic outburst, " and "is no proof that purer eyes would have failed to see gross sin mingling with Jael's service to Israel") is thus rendered by Professor Roberts (Old Testament Revision): "Extolled above women be Jael, The wife of Heber the Kenite, Extolled above women in the tent. He asked for water, she gave him milk; She brought him cream in a lordly dish. She stretched forth her hand to the nail, Her right hand to the workman's hammer, And she smote Sisera; she crushed his head, She crashed through and transfixed his temples. At her feet he curled himself, he fell, he lay still; At her feet he curled himself, he fell; And where he curled himself, there he fell dead." (2.) The ancestor of some of the Nethinim who returned with Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:53 ;  Nehemiah 7:55 ). 
MESHEZABEL|     me-shez'-a-bel (meshezebhe'el, "God a deliverer"; the King James Version Meshezabeel, me-shez'-a-bel):  (1) A priest, ancestor of Meshullam, who assisted Nehemiah in rebuilding the wall of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 3:4 ).  (2) One of the chiefs of the people giving name to the family which sealed the covenant with Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 10:21 ).  (3) A descendant of Judah through Zerah, and father of Pethahiah ( Nehemiah 11:24 ).
MAGICIANS|Hebrews hartumim, ( dan. 1:20 ) were sacred scribes who acted as interpreters of omens, or "revealers of secret things." 
MITHCAH|Sweetness, one of the stations of the Israelites in the wilderness ( Numbers 33:28 ,  29). 
JASHUB|Returner.  (1.) The third of Issachar's four sons ( 1 Chronicles 7:1 ); called also Job ( Genesis 46:13 ). (2.)  Ezra 10:29 . 
CHURCHES|   ANGELS OF THE SEVEN   It is evident from the contexts of the various Biblical passages in which the word "angel" appears, that the word does not always represent the same idea. In such passages as  Daniel 12:1  and  Acts 12:15  it would seem that the angel was generally regarded as a superhuman being whose duty it was to guard a nation or an individual, not unlike the jenei of the Arabs. However, in  Malachi 2:7, 3:1  (Hebrew) the word is clearly used to represent men. In the New Testament also, there are passages, such as  James 2:25  (Greek), in which the word seems to be applied to men. The seven angels of the seven churches ( Revelation 1:20 ) received seven letters, figurative letters, and therefore it would seem that the seven angels are also figurative and may refer to the seven bishops who presided over the seven churches of Asia. Or the angels may be regarded as the personifications of the churches.  E. J. Banks  CHURCHES, ROBBERS OF  church'-iz.  See  ROBBERS OF TEMPLES .  CHURCHES, SEVEN  See  ANGELS OF THE SEVEN CHURCHES .
MENNA|     men'-a (Menna Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek, Tregelles, Tischendorf; Mainan Textus Receptus of the New Testament; the King James Version Menan): An ancestor of Jesus, a great-grandson of David ( Luke 3:31 ).
IVVAH|     iv'-a (`iwwah; Aba (= Ava), Aua,  2 Kings 18:34 , Oudou,  2 Kings 19:13 , apparently due to a misreading): The name is wanting in the Massoretic Text and Septuagint of  Isaiah 36:19 .  Ivvah was a city apparently conquered by the Assyrians, and is mentioned by them, in the verses quoted, with Hamath and Arpad, Sepharvaim and Hena. It has been assimilated with the Avva of  2 Kings 17:24  as one of the places whence Sargon brought captives to Samaria, and identified with Hit on the Euphrates, between Anah and Ramadieh, but this seems improbable, as is also the suggestion that it is Emma, the modern `Imm, between Antioch and Aleppo. Hommel (Expository Times, April, 1898, 330) upholds the view that Hena and Ivvah, or, as he prefers to read, Avvah, are not places at all, but the names of the two chief gods of Hamath, Arpad and Sepharvaim. This would be consistent with  2 Kings 18:34 ; but 19:13: "Where is the king. of Sepharvaim, of Hena, and Ivvah?" and 17:31, where the gods of Sepharvaim are stated to be Adrammelech and Anammelech, raise serious difficulties. In all probability, the identification of Ivvah depends upon the correct localization of the twofold Sepharvaim, of which Hena and Ivvah may have been the names. The identification of Sepharvaim with the Babylonian Sip(p)ar is now practically abandoned.  See  SEPHARVAIM .  T. G. Pinches
GEUEL|     gu'-el, ge-u'-el (ge'u'el, "majesty of God"): The spy from the tribe of Gad ( Numbers 13:15 ), sent by Moses to spy out the land of Canaan.
ZURIEL|Rock of God, chief of the family of the Merarites ( Numbers 3:35 ) at the time of the Exodus. 
OZNI|Hearing, one of the sons of Gad; also called Ezbon ( Genesis 46:16 ;  Numbers 26:16 ). 
LESHEM|     le'-shem.  See  LAISH .
LAHAIROI|   LAHAI-ROI  la-hi'-roi, la-hi-ro'-i, la'hi-roi (lachay ro'i).  See  BEER-LAHAI-ROI .
PRISCA|   ; PRISCILLA  pris'-ka, pri-sil'-a.  See  AQUILA .
KUSHAIAH|     ku-sha'-ya, ku-shi'-a (qushayahu, "bow of Yah"): A Merarite Levite ( 1 Chronicles 15:17 ), called in  1 Chronicles 6:44  KISHI (which see).
JOSAPHAT|     jos'-a-fat (Iosaphat, the King James Version in  Matthew 1:8  for JEHOSHAPHAT (which see)): A king of Judah, mentioned in Matthew's genealogy of Christ.
JALON|Lodger, the last of the four sons of Ezra, of the tribe of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:17 ). 
IBSAM|     ib'-sam (yibhsam, "fragrant," the King James Version Jibsam): Descendant of Issachar, family of Tolah ( 1 Chronicles 7:2 ).
LAHMI|     la'-mi (lachmi): According to  1 Chronicles 20:5 , the brother of Goliath of Gath.  See  ELHANAN .
KADESHBARNEA|   KADESH-BARNEA  ka'-desh-bar'-ne-a (qadhesh barnea`; Kades): Mentioned 10 times; called also "Kadesh" simply. The name perhaps means "the holy place of the desert of wandering." There are references to Kadesh in early history. At En-mishpat ("the same is Kadesh") Chedorlaomer and his allies smote the Amalekite and Amorite. Abraham dwelt near Kadesh, and it was at Beer-lahai-roi between Kadesh and Bered that the Angel of Yahweh appeared to Hagar ( Genesis 14:7 ;  Genesis 16:14 ;  Genesis 20:1 ). It was an important camp of the Israelites during their wanderings, and seems to have been their headquarters for 38 years ( Deuteronomy 1:2 ;  Deuteronomy 2:14 ; Judith 5:14). There the returning spies found the camp ( Numbers 13:26 ); there Miriam died and was buried ( Numbers 20:1 ); from thence messengers were sent to the king of Edom ( Numbers 20:14   Judges 11:16 ). There the people rebelled because of the want of water, and Moses brought water from the rock ( Numbers 20:2 ); it was called therefore Meribath-or Meriboth-Kadesh ( Numbers 27:14   Ezekiel 47:19 ;  Ezekiel 48:28 ). It was situated in the wilderness of Zin ( Numbers 20:1 ;  Numbers 33:36, 37 ) in the hill country of the Amorites ( Deuteronomy 1:19 ), 11 days' journey from Horeb, by the way of Mt. Seir ( Deuteronomy 1:2 ), "in the uttermost" of the border of Edom ( Numbers 20:16 ), and on the southern border, probably the Southeast corner, of Judah ( Ezekiel 47:19 ; compare Judith 19). See Cobern, Homiletic Review, April and May, 1914.  S. F. Hunter
HELDAI|Wordly.  (1.)  1 Chronicles 27:15 ; called also Heleb ( 2 Samuel 23:29 ); one of David's captains. (2.)  Zechariah 6:10 , one who returned from Babylon. 
NEKEB|Cavern, a town on the boundary of Naphtali ( Joshua 19:33 ). It has with probability, been identified with Seiyadeh, nearly 2 miles east of Bessum, a ruin half way between Tiberias and Mount Tabor. 
SABACHTHANI|Thou hast forsaken me, one of the Aramaic words uttered by our Lord on the cross ( Matthew 27:46 ;  Mark 15:34 ). 
MIAMIN|=Mijamin, from the right hand.  (1.) The head of one of the divisions of the priests ( 1 Chronicles 24:9 ). (2.) A chief priest who returned from Babylon with Zerubbabel (<a href="http://bible.cc/nehem
BITHYNIA|A province in Asia Minor, to the south of the Euxine and Propontis. Christian congregations were here formed at an early time ( 1 Peter 1:1 ). Paul was prevented by the Spirit from entering this province ( Acts 16:7 ). It is noted in church history as the province ruled over by Pliny as Roman proconsul, who was perplexed as to the course he should take with the numerous Christians brought before his tribunal on account of their profession of Christianity and their conduct, and wrote to Trajan, the emperor, for instructions (A.D. 107). 
GABA|     ga'-ba (gabha' (in pause)).  See  GEBA .
GABRIEL|Champion of God, used as a proper name to designate the angel who was sent to Daniel ( 8:16 ) to explain the vision of the ram and the he-goat, and to communicate the prediction of the seventy weeks ( Dan. 9:21 -27). He announced also the birth of John the Baptist ( Luke 1:11 ), and of the Messiah (26). He describes himself in the words, "I am Gabriel, who stand in the presence of God" ( 1:19 ). 
MEASURES|   MEASURE;   mezh'-ur, Several different words in the Hebrew and Greek are rendered by "measure" in English Versions of the Bible. In  Job 11:9  and  Jeremiah 13:25  it stands for madh, middah, and it is the usual rendering of the verb madhadh, "to measure," i.e. "stretch out," "extend," "spread." It is often used to render the words representing particular measures, such as ['ephah] ( Deuteronomy 25:14, 15   Proverbs 20:10   Micah 6:10 ); or kor ( 1 Kings 4:22 ;  1 Kings 5:11  (1 Kings 5:2, 5:25 Hebrew text);  2 Chronicles 2:10  (Hebrew text 2:9) 27:5;  Ezra 7:22 ); or seah ( Genesis 18:6   1 Samuel 25:18   1 Kings 18:32   2 Kings 7:1, 16, 18 ); or batos, "bath" ( Luke 16:6 ). For these terms see WEIGHTS AND MEASURES. It also renders middah, "measure of length" ( Exodus 26:2 ); mesurah, a liquid measure ( Leviticus 19:35   1 Chronicles 23:29   Ezekiel 4:11, 16 ); mishpaT, "judgment" ( Jeremiah 30:11 ;  Jeremiah 46:28 ); ca'ce'ah, a word of uncertain meaning, perhaps derived from seah ( Isaiah 27:8 ); shalish, "threefold, large measure" ( Psalm 80:5  (Hebrew text  Psalm 80:6 );  Isaiah 40:12 ); tokhen, and mathkoneth, "weight" and that which is weighed, taken as measure ( Ezekiel 45:11 ). In  Isaiah 5:14  it stands for choq, "limit." In the New Testament, besides being the usual rendering of the verb metreo, and of the noun metron, it is used for choinix, a dry measure containing about a quart ( Revelation 6:6 ).  H. Porter  WEIGHTS AND MEASURES  wats me'-zhur: The system of weights and measures in use among the Hebrews was derived from Babylonia and Egypt, especially from the former. The influence of these countries upon Palestine has long been recognized, but archaeological investigations in recent years have shown that the civilization of Babylonia impressed itself upon Syria and Palestine more profoundly in early times than did that of Egypt. The evidence of this has been most clearly shown by the discovery of the Tell el-Amarna Letters, which reveal the fact that the official correspondence between the Egyptian kings and their vassals in these lands was carried on in the language of Babylonia long after its political influence had been supplanted by that of Egypt. It is natural, then, that we should look to Babylonia for the origin of such important elements of civilization as a system of weights and measures.  1. Linear Measures:  It was quite natural that men should have found a standard for linear measures in the parts of the human body, and we find the cubit, originally the length of the forearm, taken as the standard, and the span, the palm and the digit, or finger-breadth, associated with it in linear measurement. They do not seem to have employed the foot, though it is represented in the two-thirds of the cubit, which was used by the Babylonians in the manufacture of building-brick.  This system, though adequate enough for man in the earliest times, was not so for an advanced stage of civilization, such as the Babylonians reached before the days of Abraham, and we find that they had introduced a far more accurate and scientific system (see CUBIT). They seem to have employed, however, two cubits, of different lengths, one for commercial purposes and one for building. We have no undoubted examples of either, but judging by the dimensions of their square building-bricks, which are regarded as being two-thirds of a cubit on a side, we judge the latter to have been of about 19 or 20 inches. Now we learn from investigations in Egypt that a similar cubit was employed there, being of from 20.6 to 20.77 inches, and it can hardly be doubted that the Hebrews were familiar with this cubit, but that in more common use was certainly shorter. We have no certain means of determining the length of the ordinary cubit among the Hebrews, but there are two ways by which we may approximate its value. The Siloam Inscription states that the tunnel in which it was found was 1,200 cubits long. The actual length has been found to be about 1,707 feet, which would give a cubit of about 17.1 in. (see PEFS, 1902, 179). Of course the given length may be a round number, but it gives a close approximation.  Again, the Mishna states that the height of a man is 4 cubits, which we may thus regard as the average stature of a Jew in former times. By reference to Jewish tombs we find that they were of a length to give a cubit of something over 17 inches, supposing the stature to be as above, which approximates very closely to the cubit of the Siloam tunnel. The consensus of opinion at the present day inclines toward a cubit of 17.6 inches for commercial purposes and one of about 20 inches for building. This custom of having two standards is illustrated by the practice in Syria today, where the builder's measure, or dra', is about 2 inches longer than the commercial.  Of multiples of the cubit we have the measuring-reed of 6 long cubits, which consisted of a cubit and a hand-breadth each ( Ezekiel 40:5 ), or about 10 feet. Another measure was the Sabbath day's journey, which was reckoned at 2,000 cubits, or about 1,000 yards. The measuring-line was used also, but whether it had a fixed length we do not know.  See  SABBATH DAY'S JOURNEY ;  MEASURING LINE .  In the New Testament we have the fathom (orguia), about 6 feet, and the furlong (stadion), 600 Greek feet or 606 3/4 English feet, which is somewhat less than one-eighth of a mile. The mile (milion) was 5,000 Roman feet, or 4,854 English feet, somewhat less than the English mile.  2. Measures of Capacity:  Regarding the absolute value of the measures of capacity among the Hebrews there is rather more uncertainty than there is concerning those of length and weight, since no examples of the former have come down to us; but their relative value is known. Sir Charles Warren considers them to have been derived from the measures of length by cubing the cubit and its divisions, as also in the case of weight. We learn from  Ezekiel 45:11  that the bath and ephah were equivalent, and he (Warren) estimates the capacity of these as that of 1/30 of the cubit cubed, or about 2,333.3 cubic inches, which would correspond to about 9 gallons English measure. Assuming this as the standard, we get the following tables for liquid and dry measure: Ce'ah and lethekh, in the above, occur in the Hebrew text, but only in the margin of the English. It will be noticed that the prevailing element in these tables is the duodecimal which corresponds to the sexagesimal of the Babylonian system, but it will be seen that in the case of weights there was a tendency on the part of the Hebrews to employ the decimal system, making the maneh 50 shekels instead of 60, and the talent 3,000 instead of 3,600, of the Babylonian, so here we see the same tendency in making the `omer the tenth of the 'ephah and the 'ephah the tenth of the chomer or kor.  3. Weights:  Weights were probably based by the ancients upon grains of wheat or barley, but the Egyptians and Babylonians early adopted a more scientific method. Sir Charles Warren thinks that they took the cubes of the measures of length and ascertained how many grains of barley corresponded to the quantity of water these cubes would contain. Thus, he infers that the Egyptians fixed the weight of a cubic inch of rain water at 220 grains, and the Babylonians at 222 2/9. Taking the cubic palm at 25,928 cubic inches, the weight of that quantity of water would be 5,760 ancient grains. The talent he regards as the weight of 2/3 of a cubit cubed, which would be equal to 101, 6 cubic palms, but assumes that for convenience it was taken at 100, the weight being 576,000 grains, deriving from this the maneh (1/60 of the talent) of 9,600 grains, and a shekel (1/50 of the maneh) 192 grains. But we have evidence that the Hebrew shekel differed from this and that they used different shekels at different periods. The shekel derived from Babylonia had a double standard: the light of 160 grains, or 1/3600 of the talent; and the heavy of just double this, of 320 grains. The former seems to have been used before the captivity and the latter after. The Babylonian system was sexagesimal, i.e. 60 shekels went to the maneh and 60 manehs to the talent, but the Hebrews reckoned only 50 shekels to the maneh, as appears from  Exodus 38:25, 26 , where it is stated that the amount of silver collected from 603, 550 males was 100 talents and 1,775 shekels, and, as each contributed a half-shekel, the whole amount must have been 301, 775. Deducting the 1,775 shekels mentioned besides the 100 talents, we have 300,000 or 3,000 to the talent, and, as there were 60 manehs in the talent, there were 50 shekels to each maneh. When the Hebrews adopted this system we do not know, but it was in vogue at a very early date.  The shekel was divided into gerahs, 20 to a shekel ( Exodus 30:13 ). The gerah (gerah) is supposed to be some kind of seed, perhaps a bean or some such plant. The shekel of which it formed a part was probably the royal or commercial shekel of 160 grains, derived from Babylon. But the Hebrews certainly had another shekel, called the Phoenician from its being the standard of the Phoenician traders. This would be natural on account of the close connection of the two peoples ever since the days of David and Solomon, but we have certain evidence of it from the extant examples of the monetary shekels of the Jews, which are of this standard, or very nearly so, allowing some loss from abrasion. The Phoenician shekel was about 224 grains, varying somewhat in different localities, and the Jewish shekels now in existence vary from 212 to 220 grains. They were coined after the captivity (see COINS), but whether this standard was in use before we have no means of knowing.  Examples of ancient weights have been discovered in Palestine by archaeological research during recent years, among them one from Samaria, obtained by Dr. Chaplin, bearing the inscription, in Hebrew rebha` netseph. This is interpreted, by the help of the cognate Arabic, as meaning "quarter-half," i.e. of a shekel. The actual weight is 39.2 grains, which, allowing a slight loss, would correspond quite closely to a quarter-shekel of the light Babylonian standard of 160 grains, or the quarter of the half of the double standard. Another specimen discovered at Tell Zakariyeh weighs 154 grains, which would seem to belong to the same standard. The weights, of which illustrations are given in the table, are all in the collection of the Syrian Protestant College, at Beirut, and were obtained from Palestine and Phoenicia and are of the Phoenician standard, which was the common commercial standard of Palestine. The largest, of the spindle or barrel type, weighs 1,350 grains, or 87.46 grams, evidently intended for a 6-shekel weight, and the smaller ones of the same type are fractions of the Phoenician shekel. They were of the same standard, one a shekel and the other a two-shekel weight. They each have 12 faces, and the smaller has a lion stamped on each face save one, reminding us of the lion-weights discovered in Assyria and Babylonia. The spindle weights are of black stone, the others of bronze.  The above is the Phoenician standard. In the Babylonian the shekel would be 160 or 320 grains; the maneh 8,000 or 16,000, and the talent 480,000 or 960,000 grains, according as it was of the light or heavy standard.  H. Porter
SHEDEUR|     shed'-e-ur, she-de'-ur (shedhe'ur, "daybreak"; Codex Vaticanus Sediour, Ediour): The father of Elizur, the chief of Reuben ( Numbers 1:5 ;  Numbers 2:10 ;  Numbers 7:30 ). French Delitzsch correctly conceives the name as an Assyrian compound, sad uri, "daybreak." Cf, however, Gray, HPN, 169, 197, who emends the text to read Shaddai 'Ur, "Shaddai is flame."
BUBASTIS|     bu-bas'-tis.  See  PI-BESETH .
ELI|Ascent, the high priest when the ark was at Shiloh ( 1 Samuel 1:3 ,  9). He was the first of the line of Ithamar, Aaron's fourth son ( 1 Chronicles 24:3 ; Comp.  2 Samuel 8:17 ), who held that office. The office remained in his family till the time of Abiathar ( 1 Kings 2:26 ,  27), whom Solomon deposed, and appointed Zadok, of the family of Eleazar, in his stead (35). He acted also as a civil judge in Israel after the death of Samson ( 1 Samuel 4:18 ), and judged Israel for forty years. His sons Hophni and Phinehas grossly misconducted themselves, to the great disgust of the people ( 1 Samuel 2:27 -36). They were licentious reprobates. He failed to reprove them so sternly as he ought to have done, and so brought upon his house the judgment of God ( 2:22 -33;  3:18 ). The Israelites proclaimed war against the Philistines, whose army was encamped at Aphek. The battle, fought a short way beyond Mizpeh, ended in the total defeat of Israel. Four thousand of them fell in "battle array". They now sought safety in having the "ark of the covenant of the Lord" among them. They fetched it from Shiloh, and Hophni and Phinehas accompanied it. This was the first time since the settlement of Israel in Canaan that the ark had been removed from the sanctuary. The Philistines put themselves again in array against Israel, and in the battle which ensued "Israel was smitten, and there was a very great slaughter." The tidings of this great disaster were speedily conveyed to Shiloh, about 20 miles distant, by a messenger, a Benjamite from the army. There Eli sat outside the gate of the sanctuary by the wayside, anxiously waiting for tidings from the battle-field. The full extent of the national calamity was speedily made known to him: "Israel is fled before the Philistines, there has also been a great slaughter among the people, thy two sons Hophni and Phinehas are dead, and the ark of God is taken" ( 1 Samuel 4:12 -18). When the old man, whose eyes were "stiffened" (i.e.,  fixed,  as of a blind eye unaffected by the light) with age, heard this sad story of woe, he fell backward from off his seat and died, being ninety and eight years old. (see  ITHAMAR .) Eli, Hebrews eli, "my God", ( Matthew 27:46 ), an exclamation used by Christ on the cross. Mark ( 15:34 ), as usual, gives the original Aramaic form of the word, Eloi.
JESHAIAH|Deliverance of Jehovah.  (1.) A Kohathite Levite, the father of Joram, of the family of Eliezer ( 1 Chronicles 26:25 ); called also Isshiah ( 24:21 ). (2.) One of the sons of Jeduthum ( 1 Chronicles 25:3 ,  15). (3.) One of the three sons of Hananiah ( 1 Chronicles 3:21 ). (4.) Son of Athaliah ( Ezra 8:7 ). (5.) A Levite of the family of Merari ( 8:19 ). 
HAZARSUSAH|Village of the horse, the same as Sansannah, one of Solomon's "chariot cities" ( Joshua 15:31 ;  2 Chronicles 1:14 ), a depot in the south border of Judah. 
SARAPH|     sa'-raf, sa'-raf (saraph, "noble one"; compare saraph, "burn" "shine"): A descendant of Judah through Shelah ( 1 Chronicles 4:22 ).
CHITTIM|Or Kittim, a plural form ( Genesis 10:4 ), the name of a branch of the descendants of Javan, the "son" of Japheth. Balaam foretold ( Numbers 24:24 ) "that ships shall come from the coast of Chittim, and afflict Eber." Daniel prophesied ( 11:30 ) that the ships of Chittim would come against the king of the north. It probably denotes Cyprus, whose ancient capital was called Kition by the Greeks. The references elsewhere made to Chittim ( Isaiah 23:1 ,  12;  Jeremiah 2:10 ;  Ezek. 27:6 ) are to be explained on the ground that while the name originally designated the Phoenicians only, it came latterly to be used of all the islands and various settlements on the sea-coasts which they had occupied, and then of the people who succeeded them when the Phoenician power decayed. Hence it designates generally the islands and coasts of the Mediterranean and the races that inhabit them. 
SIDON|Fishing; fishery,  Genesis 10:15 , 19 (A.V. marg.,  Tzidon; R.V.,  Zidon);  Matthew 11:21 , 22;  Luke 6:17 . (see  ZIDON .) 
GAMES| (1.) Of children ( Zechariah 8:5 ;  Matthew 11:16 ). The Jewish youth were also apparently instructed in the use of the bow and the sling ( Judges 20:16 ;  1 Chronicles 12:2 ). (2.) Public games, such as were common among the Greeks and Romans, were foreign to the Jewish institutions and customs. Reference, however, is made to such games in two passages ( Psalm 19:5 ;  Ecclesiastes 9:11 ). (3.) Among the Greeks and Romans games entered largely into their social life. (a) Reference in the New Testament is made to gladiatorial shows and fights with wild beasts ( 1 Corinthians 15:32 ). These were common among the Romans, and sometimes on a large scale. (b) Allusion is frequently made to the Grecian gymnastic contests ( Galatians 2:2 ;  5:7 ;  Philippians 2:16 ;  3:14 ;  1 Timothy 6:12 ;  2 Timothy 2:5 ;  Hebrews 12:1 ,  4,  12). These were very numerous. The Olympic, Pythian, Nemean, and Isthmian games were esteemed as of great national importance, and the victors at any of these games of wrestling, racing, etc., were esteemed as the noblest and the happiest of mortals. 
GOATSKINS|     got'-skinz (en aigeiois dermasin): Such skins are mentioned only once ( Hebrews 11:37 ), where the wearing of goatskins, indicating extreme poverty, is referred to, by implication, as the possible lot of the faithful Christian, even as it had been of others. Ascetics of different religions, especially of the Moslem sects, are frequently seen going about Syria and Palestine today, clad in sheepskins or goatskins, a sign of their renunciation of all things worldly.
PERFUMES|Were used in religious worship, and for personal and domestic enjoyment ( Exodus 30:35 -37;  Proverbs 7:17 ; Cant. 3:6;  Isaiah 57:9 ); and also in embalming the dead, and in other funeral ceremonies ( Mark 14:8 ;  Luke 24:1 ;  John 19:39 ). 
MISHAEL|Who is like God!  (1.) A Levite; the eldest of the three sons of Uzziel ( Exodus 6:22 ). (2.) One of the three Hebrew youths who were trained with Daniel in Babylon ( Dan. 1:11 ,  19), and promoted to the rank of Magi. He and his companions were afterwards cast into the burning fiery furnace for refusing to worship the idol the king had set up, from which they were miraculously delivered ( 3:13 -30). His Chaldean name was Meshach (q.v.). 
JORAI|     jo'-ra-i (yoray, "whom Yahweh teaches"): A Gadite chief, but possibly the name of a clan ( 1 Chronicles 5:13 ).
HIDDEKEL|Called by the Accadians id Idikla; i.e., "the river of Idikla", the third of the four rivers of Paradise ( Genesis 2:14 ). Gesenius interprets the word as meaning "the rapid Tigris." The Tigris rises in the mountains of Armenia, 15 miles south of the source of the Euphrates, which, after pursuing a south-east course, it joins at Kurnah, about 50 miles above Bassorah. Its whole length is about 1,150 miles. 
HANANEL|   , THE TOWER OF  ban'-an-el (chanan'el, "El (God) is gracious"; the King James Version Hananeel, ha-nan'e-el): A tower in the walls of Jerusalem adjoining ( Nehemiah 3:1 ;  Nehemiah 12:39 ) the tower of HAMMEAH (which see). The company of Levites coming from the West passed "by the fish gate, and the tower of Hananel, and the tower of Hammeah, even unto the sheep gate" ( Nehemiah 12:39 ). In  Jeremiah 31:38  it is foretold "that the city shall be built to Yahweh from the tower of Hananel unto the gate of the corner"-apparently the whole stretch of North wall. In  Zechariah 14:10  it says Jerusalem "shall dwell in her place, from Benjamin's gate unto the place of the first gate, unto the corner gate, and from the tower of Hananel unto the king's winepresses." These last were probably near Siloam, and the distance "from the tower of Hananel unto the king's winepresses" describes the greatest length of the city from North to South. All the indications point to a tower, close to the tower of Hammeah, near the Northeast corner, a point of the city always requiring special fortification and later the sites successively of the Baris and of the Antonia.  See  JERUSALEM .  E. W. G. Masterman
PATHRUSIM|     path-roo'-sim, path-ru'-sim (pathruci, "an inhabitant of Pathros"; Septuagint hoi Patrosonieim): The branch of the Egyptians who came from PATHROS (which see). They are represented as begotten of Mizraim, "Mizraim begat Zudim..... and Pathrusim" ( Genesis 10:13   1 Chronicles 1:11 f ).
LEBANA|     le-ba'-na, leb'-a-na (lebhana'), or family of returning exiles ( Ezra 2:45   Nehemiah 7:48 ; compare 1Es 5:29).
JABAL|A stream, a descendant of Cain, and brother of Jubal; "the father of such as dwell in tents and have cattle" ( Genesis 4:20 ). This description indicates that he led a wandering life. 
SENTENCES|   HARD SAYINGS; HARD   sa'-ingz;, sen'-ten-siz: In  Daniel 5:12  the King James Version (Aramaic 'aqiahan), the Revised Version (British and American) "dark sentences," of enigmatic utterances which preternatural wisdom was needed to interpret; in  John 6:60  (skleros. ho logos), of sayings (Christ's words at Capernaum about eating His flesh and drinking His blood) difficult for the natural mind to understand (compare 6:52).
CHARIOTS|    OF THE SUN  (markebhoth ha-shemesh): These, together with "horses of the sun," are mentioned in  2 Kings 23:11 . They are said to have stood in the temple, a gift of the kings of Judah. Josiah removed the horses from the precincts of the temple and burned the chariots. Among the Greeks, Helios was endowed with horses and chariots. Thus the course of the sun as he sped across the skies was understood by the mythological mind of antiquity. The Babylonian god Shamash (= Hebrew Shemesh) likewise had his chariot and horses as well as his charioteer. The cult of the sun and other heavenly bodies which was particularly in vogue during the latter days of the Judean monarchy (compare  2 Kings 23:5   Ezekiel 8:16 ;  Deuteronomy 17:3   Jeremiah 8:2 ) seems to have constituted an element of the Canaanitish religion (compare the names of localities like Beth-shemesh and the like). The chariots of the sun are also referred to in Enoch 72:5, 37; 75:4, and Greek Apocrypha of Baruch 6.  Max L. Margolis  SUN, CHARIOTS OF THE  See  HORSES OF THE SUN .
LEMUEL|Dedicated to God, a king whom his mother instructed ( Proverbs 31:1 -9). Nothing is certainly known concerning him. The rabbis identified him with Solomon. 
NIMRIM|Nimrim, Waters of  The stream of the leopards, a stream in Moab ( Isaiah 15:6 ;  Jeremiah 48:34 ); probably the modern Wady en-Nemeirah, a rich, verdant spot at the south-eastern end of the Dead Sea. 
DAMASCENES|     dam-a-senz', dam'-a-senz ten polin Damaskenon, ("the city of the Damascenes"): The inhabitants of Damascus under Aretas the Arabian are so called ( 2 Corinthians 11:32 ).
ELDAD|Whom God has loved, one of the seventy elders whom Moses appointed ( Numbers 11:26 ,  27) to administer justice among the people. He, with Medad, prophesied in the camp instead of going with the rest to the tabernacle, as Moses had commanded. This incident was announced to Moses by Joshua, who thought their conduct in this respect irregular. Moses replied, "Enviest thou for my sake? would God that all the Lord's people were prophets" ( Numbers 11:24 -30; Comp.  Mark 9:38 ;  Luke 9:49 ). 
OREB|Raven, a prince of Midian, who, being defeated by Gideon and put to straits, was slain along with Zeeb ( Judges 7:20 -25). Many of the Midianites perished along with him ( Psalm 83:9 ;  Isaiah 10:26 ).  Oreb, The rock of The place where Gideon slew Oreb after the defeat of the Midianites ( Judges 7:25 ;  Isaiah 10:26 ). It was probably the place now called Orbo, on the east of Jordan, near Bethshean. 
BENONI|   BEN-ONI  ben-o'-ni (ben-'oni; huios odunes mou, "son of my sorrow"): The name given by the dying Rachel to her new-born son; changed by his father Jacob to BENJAMIN ( Genesis 35:18 ) which see.
ISHMERAI|     ish'-me-ri (yishmeray, from shamar, meaning "to hedge about," i.e. "to guard," and therefore a "guard," "protector"): A descendant of Benjamin, son of Epaal, resident of Jerusalem, one of the "heads of fathers' houses throughout their generations, chief men" ( 1 Chronicles 8:18 ).
JEHUD|     je'-hud (yehudh): A town in the lot of Dan named between Baalath and Bene-berak ( Joshua 19:45 ). The only possible identification seems to be with el-Yehudiyeh, which lies about 8 miles East of Jaffa.
ELBETHEL|God of Bethel, the name of the place where Jacob had the vision of the ladder, and where he erected an altar ( Genesis 31:13 ;  35:7 ). 
SHEERAH|     she'-e-ra (she'erah; Codex Alexandrinus Saara, Codex Vaticanus omits): A daughter of Ephraim, who, according to the Massoretic Text of  1 Chronicles 7:24  (the King James Version "Sherah"), built the two Beth-horons and Uzzen-sheerah. The verse has been suspected because elsewhere in the Old Testament the founders of cities are men. Uzzen-sheerah as a place is unidentified; Conder suggests as the site Bet Sira, a village 2 miles Southwest of the Lower Beth-horon (Mem 3 16).
GERIZIM|A mountain of Samaria, about 3,000 feet above the Mediterranean. It was on the left of the valley containing the ancient town of Shechem (q.v.), on the way to Jerusalem. It stood over against Mount Ebal, the summits of these mountains being distant from each other about 2 miles ( Deuteronomy 27 ;  Joshua 8:30 -35). On the slopes of this mountain the tribes descended from the handmaids of Leah and Rachel, together with the tribe of Reuben, were gathered together, and gave the responses to the blessing pronounced as the reward of obedience, when Joshua in the valley below read the whole law in the hearing of all the people; as those gathered on Ebal responded with a loud Amen to the rehearsal of the curses pronounced on the disobedient. It was probably at this time that the coffin containing the embalmed body of Joseph was laid in the "parcel of ground which Jacob bought of the sons of Hamor" ( Genesis 33:19 ;  50:25 ). Josephus relates (Ant. 11:8,  2-4) that Sanballat built a temple for the Samaritans on this mountain, and instituted a priesthood, as rivals to those of the Jews at Jerusalem. This temple was destroyed after it had stood two hundred years. It was afterwards rebuilt by Herod the Great. There is a Samaritan tradition that it was the scene of the incident recorded in  Genesis 22 . There are many ruins on this mountain, some of which are evidently of Christian buildings. To this mountain the woman of Sychar referred in  John 4:20 . For centuries Gerizim was the centre of political outbreaks. The Samaritans (q.v.), a small but united body, still linger here, and keep up their ancient ceremonial worship. 
SALCHAH|   SALECAH; SALCAH,   sal'-e-ka, sal'-ka (calekhah; Codex Vaticanus Sekchai, Acha, Sela Codex Alexandrinus Elcha, Aselcha, Selcha): This place first appears in  Deuteronomy 3:10  as marking the eastern boundary of Bashan. It is named as one of the cities in which Og, king of Bashan, ruled ( Joshua 12:5 ). It must certainly have been included in the portion given to the half-tribe of Manasseh, "all the kingdom of Og king of Bashan," although it is not named among the cities that fell to him ( Joshua 13:29 ). At a later time we are told that Gad dwelt over against the Reubenites in the land of Bashan unto Salecah ( 1 Chronicles 5:11 ). The boundaries of the tribes probably changed from time to time.  The ancient city is represented by the modern Qalkhad, a city in a high and strong position at the southern end of Jebel ed-Druze (the Mountain of Bashan). On a volcanic hill rising some 300 ft. above the town, in what must have been the crater, stands the castle. The view from the battlements, as the present writer can testify, is one of the finest East of the Jordan, including the rich hollow of the Chauran, Mt. Hermon, and all the intervening country to the mountains of Samaria, with vast reaches of the desert to the South and to the East. The old Roman roads are still clearly seen running without curve or deviation across the country to Bozrah and Der'ah, away to the Southeast over the desert to Kal`at el-`Azraq, and eastward to the Persian Gulf. The castle was probably built by the Romans. Restored by the Arabs, it was a place of strength in Crusading times. It has now fallen on evil days. The modern town, containing many ancient houses, lies mainly on the slopes Southeast of the castle. The inhabitants are Druzes, somewhat noted for turbulence.  In the recent rising of the Druzes (1911) the place suffered heavily from bombardment by the Turks. For water-supply it is entirely dependent on cisterns filled during the rainy season. W. Ewing
IRI|     i'-ri (`iri).  See  IR ;  URIAS .
MALCHUS|Reigning, the personal servant or slave of the high priest Caiaphas. He is mentioned only by John. Peter cut off his right ear in the garden of Gethsemane ( John 18:10 ). But our Lord cured it with a touch ( Matthew 26:51 ;  Mark 14:47 ;  Luke 22:51 ). This was the last miracle of bodily cure wrought by our Lord. It is not mentioned by John. 
MAAZ|     ma'-az (ma`ats): A descendant of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:27 ).
PEREZUZZAH|The breach of Uzzah, a place where God "burst forth upon Uzzah, so that he died," when he rashly "took hold" of the ark ( 2 Samuel 6:6 -8). It was not far from Kirjath-jearim (q.v.). 
ONIONS|     un'-yunz (betsalim; krommuon): One of the delicacies of Egypt for which the children of Israel pined in the wilderness ( Numbers 11:5 ). The onion, alllium cepa (Natural Order Liliaceae), is known in Arabic as bucal and is cultivated all over Syria and Egypt; it appears to be as much a favorite in the Orient today as ever.
SELEUCIA|The sea-port of Antioch, near the mouth of the Orontes. Paul and his companions sailed from this port on their first missionary journey ( Acts 13:4 ). This city was built by Seleucus Nicator, the "king of Syria." It is said of him that "few princes have ever lived with so great a passion for the building of cities. He is reputed to have built in all nine Seleucias, sixteen Antiochs, and six Laodiceas." Seleucia became a city of great importance, and was made a "free city" by Pompey. It is now a small village, called el-Kalusi. 
ISHHOD|     ish'-hod ('ishehodh, "man of majesty"): A man of the tribe of Manasseh ( 1 Chronicles 7:18 , the King James Version "Ishod").
IRAD|Runner; wild ass, one of the antediluvian patriarchs, the father of Mehujael ( Genesis 4:18 ), and grandson of Cain. 
BARACHIAS|4 (q.v.), whom Jehovah hath blessed, father of the prophet Zechariah ( Zechariah 1:1 , 7;  Matthew 23:35 ). 
JAPHIA|Splendid.  (1.) The king of Lachish, who joined in the confederacy against Joshua ( Joshua 10:3 ), and was defeated and slain. In one of the Amarna tablets he speaks of himself as king of Gezer. Called also Horam ( Joshua 10:33 ). (2.) One of the sons of David ( 2 Samuel 5:15 ), born in Jerusalem. (3.) A town in the southern boundary of Zebulum ( Joshua 19:12 ); now Yafa, 2 miles south-west of Nazareth. 
HAMMIPHKAD|   , GATE OF  ha-mif'-kad (sha`ar ha-miphqadh, "Gate of the Muster"): One of the gates of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 3:31 ) not mentioned elsewhere; probably situated near the Northeast corner of the Temple area.
JEHOADAH|   JEHOADDAH;   je-ho-ad'-a (Revised Version (British and American)), je-ho'-a-da (the King James Version) (yeho`addah, "Yah has deposed" or "numbered"): A descendant of King Saul ( 1 Chronicles 8:36 ), called "Jarah" in  1 Chronicles 9:42 , where the Septuagint has Iada = ya`dah.  See  JARAH .
CHOZEBA|( 1 Chronicles 4:22 ), the same as Chezib and Achzib, a place in the lowlands of Judah ( Genesis 38:5 ;  Joshua 15:44 ). 
DIONYSIUS|The Areopagite, one of Paul's converts at Athens ( Acts 17:34 ). 
SIMRI|Watchman, a Levite of the family of Merari ( 1 Chronicles 26:10 ). 
REHOBOTH|Broad places.  (1.) A well in Gerar dug by Isaac ( Genesis 26:22 ), supposed to be in Wady er-Ruheibeh, about 20 miles south of Beersheba. (2.) An ancient city on the Euphrates ( Genesis 36:37 ;  1 Chronicles 1:48 ), "Rehoboth by the river." (3.) Named among the cities of Asshur ( Genesis 10:11 ). Probably, however, the words "rehoboth'ir" are to be translated as in the Vulgate and the margin of A.V., "the streets of the city," or rather "the public square of the city", i.e., of Nineveh. 
CAROUSINGS|     ka-rouz'-ingz (potois, dative plural of potos): This word is found only in the American Standard Revised Version and once only ( 1 Peter 4:3 ). The King James Version translates it "banquetings." It is one of the Gentileexcesses of fleshly indulgence against which the Christians are warned by Peter.
DEBIR|Oracle town; sanctuary.  (1.) One of the eleven cities to the west of Hebron, in the highlands of Judah ( Joshua 15:49 ;  Judges 1:11 -15). It was originally one of the towns of the Anakim ( Joshua 15:15 ), and was also called Kirjath-sepher (q.v.) and Kirjath-sannah (49). Caleb, who had conquered and taken possession of the town and district of Hebron ( Joshua 14:6 -15), offered the hand of his daughter to any one who would successfully lead a party against Debir. Othniel, his younger brother ( Judges 1:13 ;  3:9 ), achieved the conquest, and gained Achsah as his wife. She was not satisfied with the portion her father gave her, and as she was proceeding toward her new home, she "lighted from off her ass" and said to him, "Give me a blessing [i.e., a dowry]: for thou hast given me a south land" ( Joshua 15:19 ,  A.V.); or, as in the Revised Version, "Thou hast set me in the land of the south", i.e., in the Negeb, outside the rich valley of Hebron, in the dry and barren land. "Give me also springs of water. And he gave her the upper springs, and the nether springs." Debir has been identified with the modern Edh-Dhaheriyeh, i.e., "the well on the ridge", to the south of Hebron. (2.) A place near the "valley of Achor" ( Joshua 15:7 ), on the north boundary of Judah, between Jerusalem and Jericho. (3.) The king of Eglon, one of the five Canaanitish kings who were hanged by Joshua ( Joshua 10:3 ,  23) after the victory at Gibeon. These kings fled and took refuge in a cave at Makkedah. Here they were kept confined till Joshua returned from the pursuit of their discomfited armies, when he caused them to be brought forth, and "Joshua smote them, and slew them, and hanged them on five trees" (26). 
BALAH|A city in the tribe of Simeon ( Joshua 19:3 ), elsewhere called Bilhah ( 1 Chronicles 4:29 ) and Baalah ( Joshua 15:29 ). 
GODS|     ('elohim; theoi):  I. IN THE OLD TESTAMENT  1. Superhuman Beings (God and Angels)  2. Judges, Rulers  3. Gods of the Nations  4. Superiority of Yahweh to Other Gods  5. Regulations Regarding the Gods of the Nations  6. Israel's Tendency to Idolatry  II. IN THE APOCRYPHA  III. IN THE NEW TESTAMENT  The Hebrew plural 'elohim is generally known as the plural of "majesty" and is the ordinary name for God. The meaning of the plural seems to be "plenitude of powers." It denotes the fullness of those attributes of power which belonged to the Divine Being. Thus it is usually translated in the singular, "God," when referring to the God of Israel. When reference is made to the gods of the other nations the word is translated in the plural, "gods." The heathen nations usually had a plurality of gods. Among the Semites it was customary for one nation or tribe to have its own particular god. Often there were many tribes, or families, or communities, in one nation, each having a particular god. Thus, even among Semites a nation may have many gods and be polytheistic. Among the other nations, Iranian, Hamitic, etc., there were always a number of deities, sometimes a multitude. There are many references to these in the Old Testament. In a few cases where the plural is used, the singular would be better, e.g.  Genesis 3:5  the King James Version;  Exodus 32:4, 8, 23   Ruth 1:15  the King James Version;  Judges 17:5 ;  Judges 18:24   1 Samuel 17:43 . This, however, might be disputed.  I. In the Old Testament.  1. Superhuman Beings (God and Angels):  The following are the more important usages of the word in the Old Testament: The translation of  Psalm 8:5  is disputed. The Septuagint and the King James Version translate it "angels," the Revised Version (British and American) and the American Standard Revised Version, "God," with "angels" in the margin. The Epistle to the He has the word "angels." This seems to be more in keeping with the Old Testament ideas of the relation between God, men and angels.  Genesis 1:26  has the plural "us," but it is not certain to whom it refers, most probably to the angels or mighty ones which surrounded the throne of God as servants or counselors; compare  Job 38:7 , and see SONS OF GOD. In  Psalm 97:7  the expression "worship him, all ye gods," may possibly refer to the gods of the nations, but more probably to the angels or mighty ones.  2. Judges, Rulers:  Judges, rulers, are regarded "either as Divine representatives at sacred places, or as reflecting Divine majesty and power" (see BDB, under the word).  Exodus 21:6  might better be translated as in the margin, "the judges." These were men appointed to represent God and adjudicate on important matters of law. Septuagint has "Criterion of God." In  Exodus 22:8  the word is used in the same sense, and 22:9 would also be better translated "the judges"; 22:28 likewise. See also  1 Samuel 2:25   Psalm 82:1, 6 , where the reference is to those who act as judges.  3. Gods of the Nations:  (1) The ancestors of Israel "beyond the River" had their gods ( Joshua 24:14 f ). While there is no mention of idolatry before the Deluge, the ancestors and kindred of Abraham were idolaters. Ur of the Chaldees was the center for the worship of Sin, the Moon-god. Many others were worshipped in the various cities of Babylon.  See  BABYLONIA .  (2) The gods of Laban and his family ( Genesis 31:30, 32 ;  Genesis 35:2, 4 ) were household gods or teraphim, and were stolen by Rachel and carried off in her flight with Jacob.  See  TERAPHIM .  (3) Gods of Egypt: For many centuries before the time of Abraham there had been numerous objects of worship in Egypt. Many of these were animals, birds and natural objects. Horus, the hawk, was one of the earliest of all. The cat, the bull, etc., were worshipped at times. The plagues of Egypt were specially directed against these wretched deities ( Numbers 33:4   Exodus 12:12 ). Yahweh took vengeance on all the gods of Egypt. These terrible events showed that "Yahweh is greater than all gods" ( Exodus 18:11 ). He redeemed His people from the nations and its gods ( 2 Samuel 7:23 ). Jeremiah predicted the time when Yahweh should destroy the gods of Egypt ( Jeremiah 43:12 ;  Jeremiah 46:25 ).  (4) Of the gods of the Amorites ( Judges 6:10 ) no names are given, but they probably were the same as the gods of the Canaanites.  (5) The gods of the Canaanites were Nature-gods, and their worship was that of the productive and chiefly reproductive powers of Nature. Their service was perhaps the most immoral and degrading of all. The high places and altars of the different Baals, Ashtoreths, etc., were numerous throughout Canaan. These deities were always represented by images and Moses makes frequent reference to them with warnings against this seductive worship ( Deuteronomy 7:25 ;  Deuteronomy 12:3, 10, 31 ; 13:07; 20:18; 29:18:00; 32:16, etc.).  See also  IDOLATRY ;  BAAL ; ASHTORETH; ASHERAH, etc.  (6) Gods of the Philis: The champion Goliath cursed David by his gods ( 1 Samuel 17:43 ). Perhaps it would be better rendered "god." Saul's and his son's armor was put into the house of their gods ( 1 Chronicles 10:10 ).  See also  DAGON ;  BAALZEBUB .  (7) The two golden calves erected by Jeroboam at Dan and Bethel to keep the people from going to Jerusalem to worship are called gods ( 1 Kings 12:28   2 Chronicles 13:8 f ).  See  CALF, GOLDEN .  (8) The gods of Damascus: Ben-hadad was accustomed to worship in the house of the god Rimmon ( 2 Kings 5:18 ). No other names are mentioned, but from  2 Chronicles 28:23  it is clear that there were many gods in Syria.  See  RIMMON .  (9) Solomon's many wives worshipped their own gods, and he provided the means for their worship. Chief among these were Chemosh of Moab and Molech of Ammon ( 1 Kings 11:2, 4, 8 ).  See  CHEMOSH ;  MOLECH .  (10) The mixed peoples transplanted into Samaria by Sargon had their various gods and mingled their service with that of Yahweh, after being taught by a priest of Yahweh. The names of some of these gods were Succoth-benoth, Nergal, Ashima, Nibhaz, Tartak, Adrammelech ( 2 Kings 17:29, 30, 31, 33 ). See separate articles.  (11) Of the gods of Seir, which were brought to Jerusalem by Amaziah, the names are not given ( 2 Chronicles 25:14 ).  (12) The gods of the nations conquered by Sennacherib and his fathers, namely, Hamoth, Arpad, Sepharvaim, Hena, Ivvah ( 2 Kings 18:33-35 ;  2 Kings 19:13 ). Also those conquered by Sennacherib's fathers, Gozan, Haran, Rezeph, Eden or Telassar ( 2 Kings 19:12   Isaiah 36:18, 19, 20   2 Chronicles 32:13 f ).  (13) Gods of Moab are mentioned in  Ruth 1:15   1 Kings 11:1, 7 . Possibly  Ruth 1:15  should be translated "god."  See  CHEMOSH .  (14) Gods of Babylon: The graven images of her gods referred to in  Isaiah 21:9 ;  Isaiah 42:17 ; Bel and Nebo mentioned in  Isaiah 46:1 ; other gods of silver and gold ( Ezra 1:7   Daniel 4:8, 9, 18 ;  Daniel 5:4, 11, 14, 23 ).  (15) Nineveh's gods are merely referred to in  Nahum 1:14 . Sennacherib was worshipping in the house of Nisroch his god when slain by his sons ( 2 Kings 19:37 ).  (16) The coastlands or borders and peninsulas of the Aegean Sea had numerous idol gods, shrines and devotees. Isaiah challenges them to prove that they are gods ( Isaiah 41:22 f ).  Yahweh was "greater than all gods" ( Exodus 15:11 ;  Exodus 18:11 ); "God of gods, and Lord of lords" ( Deuteronomy 10:14, 17 ); "The Mighty One" ( Joshua 22:22 ); "to be feared above all gods" ( 1 Chronicles 16:25   2 Chronicles 2:5   Psalm 96:4 f );  4. Superiority of Yahweh to Other Gods:  "King above all gods" ( Psalm 95:3 ;  Psalm 97:7, 9 ; 86:08:00; 135:05:00; 135:05:00; 136:02:00; 138:1  Jeremiah 10:11   Zephaniah 2:11   Daniel 2:18, 47 ). Jeremiah advances so far toward a pure and well-defined monotheism that he speaks of all other gods as "not gods." They have no existence to him ( Jeremiah 2:11 ;  Jeremiah 5:7 ;  Jeremiah 16:20 ). A similar position is taken in Isaiah 41; 43, etc.  5. Regulations Regarding the Gods of the Nations:  The laws of Moses give no uncertain sound concerning them. The Decalogue begins: "Thou shalt have no other gods before me." Whatever may be the exact meaning of this, it is perfectly clear that Israel was to have nothing to do with any God but Yahweh ( Exodus 20:3   Deuteronomy 5:7 ). No images shall be made of them ( Exodus 20:4, 23 ;  Exodus 34:17   Leviticus 19:4   Deuteronomy 5:8 f ). No mention shall be made of them ( Exodus 23:13   Joshua 23:7 ). They are not to be worshipped but destroyed ( Exodus 23:24 ). They are to make no covenant with the people or their gods would be a snare to them ( Exodus 23:32   Deuteronomy 6:14 ;  Deuteronomy 7:4, 25 ). A curse will follow any defection from Yahweh to them ( Deuteronomy 11:28 ;  Deuteronomy 28:14 ; 12:3, 10; 13:07; 20:18; 29:17). These gods are an abomination to Yahweh ( Deuteronomy 12:31 ;  Deuteronomy 20:18 ;  Deuteronomy 29:17 ;  Deuteronomy 32:37   Ezekiel 7:20   1 Kings 11:5   2 Kings 23:13 ). They are to be as foreign gods to Israel ( 1 Samuel 7:3   Joshua 24:20, 23   Judges 10:16   2 Chronicles 14:3 ;  2 Chronicles 33:15 ).  6. Israel's Tendency to Idolatry:  The constant tendency of Israel to go after other gods was first made manifest at Sinai ( Exodus 32:1, 4, 8, 23, 11 ;  Exodus 34:15 ). Hosea says (11:2), "The more the prophets called them, the more they went from them." Ezekiel declares (16:3), "The Amorite was thy father, and thy mother was a Hittite," referring doubtless to the idolatrous taint in the blood of Israel. The tendency manifested itself also at Baal-peor where Israel was led into the licentious rites of the Moabites ( Numbers 25:2 f ). Moses saw the taint in the blood, foresaw the danger and repeatedly warned them ( Deuteronomy 17:3 ;  Deuteronomy 18:20 ;  Deuteronomy 29:26 ;  Deuteronomy 30:17 ;  Deuteronomy 31:18 ). Perhaps the most striking passages in Deuteronomy are chapters 13; 28; 30, where are pictured the consequences of going after other gods. Joshua also warns them (23:7), and the history of the period of the Judges is the story of their periodical defection from Yahweh and the punishment resulting therefrom ( Judges 2:12, 17, 19 ;  Judges 5:8 ;  Judges 10:6   1 Samuel 8:8 ). Solomon himself gave an impetus in that direction ( 1 Kings 11:5-8 ). After the disruption, the religion of the Northern Kingdom became very corrupt ( 1 Kings 14:9   2 Chronicles 13:8 f ). The golden calves of Jeroboam opened the door for an inrush of idols and other gods. Ahab's marriage to Jezebel threatened to wipe out Yahweh-worship and substitute Baal-worship, and, but for the powerful ministry of Elijah and Elisha, might have effected such a result. Partly checked for a time, the evil broke out in other forms, and even the preaching of Amos and Hosea failed to turn the tide of idolatry. The result was the destruction of the kingdom ( 2 Kings 17:7   Jeremiah 3:6-8   1 Chronicles 5:25 ). The Southern Kingdom fared better. Other gods were countenanced by Rehoboam, Abijah, Athaliah, Jehoram, Ahaz, Amon, Manasseh, Jehoiakim, etc. Reform movements were attempted by Asa, Jehoshaphat, Hezekiah and Josiah, but did not wholly avail. In the reign of Manasseh the nation plunged into the worship of other gods. The ministries of Isaiah, Jeremiah, etc., availed not to stop the tide ( 2 Chronicles 34:25   Jeremiah 11:13 ;  Jeremiah 5:19   2 Kings 22:17   Jeremiah 1:16 ;  Jeremiah 19:4 ;  Jeremiah 7:6 ;  Jeremiah 13:10 ;  Jeremiah 16:11 ;  Jeremiah 44:5, 8 ). The nation was carried into exile because of its going after other gods ( 2 Kings 22:17   Deuteronomy 29:25 f ). The captivity had its desired effect. The Israel that returned and perpetuated the nation never again lapsed into the worship of other gods.  II. In the Apocrypha.  The Apocrypha reiterates much of the Old Testament teaching: the defection of Israel (2 Esdras 1:6); the gods of the nations (Judith 3:8; 8:18); the gods which their fathers worshipped (Judith 5:7); the sin of Israel (Additions to Esther 14:7). The Book of The Wisdom of Solomon refers to the "creatures which they supposed to be gods" (12:27; 13:2, 3, 10; 15:15). Mention is made of the gods of Babylon (Baruch 1:22; 6:6-57 passim; Bel and the Dragon 1:27).  III. In the New Testament.  The expression "gods" occurs in six places in the New Testament:  (1) Jesus, in reply to the Pharisees, who questioned His right to call Himself the son of God, quoted  Psalm 82:6 : "I said, Ye are gods." He argues from this that if God Himself called them gods to whom the word of God came, i.e. the judges who acted as representatives of God in a judicial capacity, could not He who had been sanctified and sent into the world justly call Himself the Son of God? It was an argumentum ad hominem ( John 10:34-37 ).  (2) When Paul and Barnabas preached the gospel in Lystra they healed a certain man who had been a cripple from birth. The Lycaonians, seeing the miracle, cried out in their own dialect, "The gods are come down to us in the likeness of men. And they called Barnabas, Jupiter; and Paul, Mercury" ( Acts 14:11 f ). Their ascription of deity to the apostles in such times shows their familiarity with the Greek pantheon.  (3) As Paul preached Jesus and the resurrection at Athens the people said he seemed to be a setter forth of strange gods. The conception of only one God seemed to be wholly foreign to them ( Acts 17:18 ).  (4) In  1 Corinthians 8:5  Paul speaks of "gods many, and lords many," but the context shows that he did not believe in the existence of any god but one; "We know that no idol is anything in the world."  (5) While at Ephesus, Paul was said to have "persuaded and turned away much people, saying that they are no gods, that are made with hands" ( Acts 19:26 ).  (6) The Galatians had been "in bondage to them that by nature are no gods" ( Galatians 4:8 ). Indirect references are also found in  Acts 17:16 , where Paul observed the city full of idols. Likewise in  Romans 1:22 , 25. Paul refers to the numerous gods of the heathen world. These were idols, birds, four-footed beasts and creeping things. The results of this degrading worship are shown in the verse following.  See also  IDOLATRY ;  GOD, NAMES OF .  J. J. Reeve  STRANGE GODS  See  GOD, STRANGE .
SHAMMUAH|   SHAMMUA;   sha-mu'-a, sham'-u-a (shammua`):  (1) The Reubenite spy ( Numbers 13:4 , Samouel, and other forms).  (2) One of David's sons ( 2 Samuel 5:14   1 Chronicles 14:4 , Sammous). In  1 Chronicles 3:5  he is called "Shimea."  (3) A Levite ( Nehemiah 11:17 ); he is called "Shemaiah" in  1 Chronicles 9:16 . (4) The head of a priestly family ( Nehemiah 12:18 ); a contemporary of Joiakim.
NOBLES|   NOBLE; ; NOBLEMAN  no'-b'-l, no'-b'-lz, no'-b'-l-man (chorim, 'addir; eugenes, Kratistos, basilikos): "Nobles" is the translation of the Hebrew chorim (occurring only in the plural), "free-born," "noble" ( 1 Kings 21:8, 11   Nehemiah 2:16 ;  Nehemiah 6:17 , etc.); of 'addir, "begirded," "mighty," "illustrious" or "noble" ( Judges 5:13   2 Chronicles 23:20 , etc.); of nadhibh, "liberal," "a noble" ( Numbers 21:18   Proverbs 8:16 , etc.).  Other words are gadhol, "great" ( Jonah 3:7 ); yaqqir, Aramaic "precious" ( Ezra 4:10 ); naghidh, "a leader" ( Job 29:10 ); partemim, "foremost ones" ( Esther 1:3 ;  Esther 6:9 ); atsilim, "those near," "nobles" ( Exodus 24:11 ); bariah, "fugitive" ( Isaiah 43:14 ); kabhedh, "weighty," "honored" ( Psalm 149:8 ); eugenes, "wellborn" ( Acts 17:11   1 Corinthians 1:26 ); kratistos, "strongest," "most powerful" ( Acts 24:3 ;  Acts 26:25 ).  The Apocrypha, the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American), still further enlarges the list. In the Revised Version (British and American) we have megistanes, "great ones" (1 Esdras 1:38; 8:26, with entimos, "in honor"; The Wisdom of Solomon 18:12). Otherwise the Revised Version's uses of "noble," and "nobleness" are for words containing the root genitive and referring to birth (compare The Wisdom of Solomon 8:3; 2 Maccabees 6:27, 31; 12:42; 14:42 twice). The King James Version's uses are wider (Judith 2:2, etc.).  Nobleman is, in  Luke 19:12 , the translation of eugenes anthropos, "a man well born," and in  John 4:46, 49  of basilikos, "kingly," "belonging to a king," a designation extended to the officers, courtiers, etc., of a king, the Revised Version margin "king's officer"; he was probably an official, civil or military, of Herod Antipas, who was styled "king" (basileus).  For "nobles" ( Isaiah 43:14 ), the King James Version "have brought down all their nobles," the Revised Version (British and American) has "I will bring down all of them as fugitives," margin "or, as otherwise read, all their nobles even," etc.; for "nobles" ( Jeremiah 30:21 ), "prince"; the English Revised Version has "worthies" for "nobles" ( Nahum 3:18 ); the Revised Version (British and American) has "the noble" for "princes" ( Proverbs 17:26 ): "nobles" for "princes" ( Job 34:18   Daniel 1:3 ), for "Nazarites" ( Lamentations 4:7 , margin "Nazirites"); "her nobles" for "his fugitives," margin "or, as other otherwise read, fugitives" ( Isaiah 15:5 ); the American Standard Revised Version has "noble" for "liberal" ( Isaiah 32:5 ); for "The nobles held their peace," the King James Version margin "The voice of the nobles was hid" ( Job 29:10 ), the Revised Version (British and American) has "The voice of the nobles was hushed," margin "Hebrew: hid"; for "most noble" ( Acts 24:3 ;  Acts 26:25 ), "most excellent."  W. L. Walker
HAI|     ha'-i (ha-`ay, "the heap"):  Genesis 12:8 ;  Genesis 13:3  the King James Version; the Revised Version (British and American) AI (which see).
SYROPHOENICIAN|     si'-ro-fe-nish'-an, sir-o- (Surophoinissa, Surophoinikissa; Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek has variant Sura Phoinikissa; the King James Version Syrophenician): The woman from the borders of Tyre and Sidon whose daughter Jesus healed is described as "a Greek, a Syrophoenician by race" ( Mark 7:26 ), and again as "a Canaanitish woman" ( Matthew 15:22 ). This seems to mean that she was of Canaanite descent, a native of the Phoenician seaboard, Greek in religion, and probably also in speech. The names Syria and Phoenicia are both applied to the same region in  Acts 21:2, 3 . Syrophoenician may therefore denote simply an inhabitant of these parts. According to Strabo (xvii.3), this district was called Syrophoenicia to distinguish it from the North African Lybophoenicia.  W. Ewing
REMPHAN|( Acts 7:43 ; R.V.,  "Rephan"). In  Amos 5:26  the Hebrews Chiun (q.v.) is rendered by the LXX. "Rephan," and this name is adopted by Luke in his narrative of the Acts. These names represent the star-god Saturn or Moloch. 
YEARS|   SABBATHS, OF   sab'-aths, (shabbethoth shanim; anapauseis eton ( Leviticus 25:8 )): The seven sabbatic years preceding the Year of Jubilee.  See  SABBATICAL YEAR ;  JUBILEE YEAR ; ASTRONOMY, sec. I, 5.  SEVENTY YEARS  The period assigned by Jeremiah for the duration of the Jewish exile in Babylon ( Jeremiah 25:11, 12 ;  Jeremiah 29:10 ; compare  2 Chronicles 36:21   Ezra 1:1   Daniel 9:2 ). If the period be reckoned from the date of the first deportation in the 4th year of Jehoiakim ( 2 Kings 24:1   2 Chronicles 36:6   Daniel 1:1  by another reckoning calls it the 3rd year), i.e. 606 B.C., till the decree of Cyrus, 536 B.C., the prediction was fulfilled to a year.  See  CAPTIVITY .  YEARS, SEVENTY  See  SEVENTY YEARS .
WANDERINGS|    OF ISRAEL  won'-der-ingz:  I. CONDITIONS  1. The Wilderness  2. Four Separate Regions Included  3. "The Sandy Tract"  4. Description of the Arabah  5. Physical Condition of the Wilderness  6. Difficulties Regarding the Numbers of Israel and Account of Tabernacle  7. Difficulty as to Number of Wagons  8. Fauna of the Desert  9. Characteristic Names of the Districts  II. FIRST JOURNEY  1. Mode of Traveling  2. The Route: the First Camp  3. Waters of Marah  4. Camp by the Red Sea  5. The Route to Sinai  III. SECOND JOURNEY  1. The Stay at Sinai  2. Site of Kadesh-barnea  3. The Route: Hazeroth to Moseroth  4. The Camps between Hazeroth and Moseroth  IV. THE THIRTY-EIGHT YEARS  1. The History  2. The Camps Visited  V. THE FINAL JOURNEY  1. The Route  2. The Five Stations to the Border of Moab  3. From Iyim to Arnon  4. The Message to Sihon  5. From the Arnon to Shittim  6. Review  I. Conditions.  1. The Wilderness:  A consideration of the geography and natural features of the desert between Egypt and Edom, in which the Hebrews are said to have wandered for 40 years, has a very important bearing on the question of the genuineness of the Pentateuch narrative. This wilderness forms a wedge between the Gulfs of Suez and `Aqabah, tapering South to the granite mountains near Sinai. It has a base 175 miles long East and West on the North, and the distance North and South is 250 miles. The area is thus over 20,000 square miles, or double the size of the Promised Land East and West of Jordan. On the North of this desert lie the plains of Gaza and Gerar, and the Neghebh or "dry region" (the south; see  Numbers 13:17  the Revised Version (British and American)), including the plateau and low hills round Beersheba.  2. Four Separate Regions Included:  There are four separate regions included in the area, the largest part (13,000 square miles) being a plateau which on the South rises 3,000 to 4,000 feet above the sea, and shelves gently toward the Philistine plains. It is drained into the broad Wady el-`Arish, named from el-`Arish ("the booth"), a station on the Mediterranean coast South of Gaza, where this valley enters the sea. In this direction several prominent mountains occur (Jebel Yeleq, Jebel Hilal, and Jebel Ikhrimm), while further East-near the site of the Western Kadesh-there is a step on the plateau culminating on the South in Jebel el-Mukhrah; but none of these ranges appears to be more than about 4,000 feet above the sea. The plateau is known as Badiet et-Tih ("the pathless waste"), and though some Arab geographers of the Middle Ages speak of it as the desert "of the wandering of the Beni Israil," they refer to the whole region as far as `Aqabah, and not to the plateau alone. The elevation on the South forms a very steep ascent or "wall" (see SHUR), bending round on the West and East, and rising above the shore plains near Suez and the `Arabah near Edom. Near the center of the plateau is the small fort of Nakhl ("the palms"), where water is found; but, as a whole, the Tih is waterless, having very few springs, the most important being those near the western Kadesh (`Ain Kadis); for Rehoboth belongs to the region of the Neghebh rather than to the Tih. In winter, when very heavy rains occur, the valleys are often flooded suddenly by a seil, or "torrent," which is sometimes 10 feet deep for a few hours. Such a seil has been known to sweep away trees, flocks, and human beings; yet, in consequence of the hard rocky surface, the flood rushes away to the sea and soon becomes a mere rivulet. Where soft soil is found, in the valleys, grass will grow and afford pasture, but even early in spring the Arabs begin to suffer from want of water, which only remains in pits and in water holes among rocks. They have then much difficulty in watering their goats and sheep.  3. "The Sandy Tract":  Below the Tih escarpment on the South is another region called Debbet er-ramleh ("the sandy tract"), which is only 20 miles across at its widest; and to the West are the sandy plains, with limestone foothills, stretching East of the Bitter Lakes and of the Gulf of Suez. The third region consists of the granite chain (see SINAI) which rises to 8,550 feet above the sea, and some 6,000 feet above its valleys, near Jebel Musa. Parts of this region are better watered than is any part of the Tih, and the main route from Egypt to Edom has consequently always run through it.  4. Description of the Arabah:  The fourth region is that of the `Arabah, or broad valley (10 miles wide) between the Gulf of `Aqabah and the Dead Sea. It has a watershed some 700 feet high above the Gulf (South of the neighborhood of Petra); and North of this shed the water flows to the Dead Sea 1,292 feet below the Mediterranean. The total length of this valley is 120 miles, the watershed being (near the Edomite chain) about 45 miles North of `Aqabah. The head of the Gulf was once farther North; and, near `Ain Ghudian (probably Eziongeber) and `Ain et-Tabah (probably Jotbath), there is a mud flat which becomes a lake in winter-about 20 miles from the sea. Lower down-at `Ain edition Deffiyeh-there is another such flat, the head being 10 miles from `Aqabah. The whole region is much better watered than either of the three preceding districts, having springs at the foot of the mountains on either side; and the `Arabah is thus the best pastoral country within the limits described. It now supports a nomad population of about 2,000 or 3,000 souls (Chaiwatat and `Alawin Arabs), while the region round Sinai has some 2,000 souls (Towarah Arabs): the whole of the Tih has probably not more than 5,000 inhabitants; for the stronger tribes (`Azazimeh and Terabin) live chiefly between Gaza and Beersheba. These Arabs have goats, sheep and camels, but cattle are only found near Beersheba. The flocks are watered daily-as in Palestine generally-and are sometimes driven 20 miles in winter to find pasture and water. The water is also brought on donkeys and camels to the camps, and carried in goatskin bags on a journey through waterless districts.  See also  ARABAH .  5. Physical Condition of the Wilderness:  There is no reason to think that the conditions at the time of the Exodus differed materially from those of the present time. The Arabs have cut down a good many acacia trees for firewood in recent times, but the population is too small materially to affect the vegetation. The annual rainfall-except in years of drought-is from 10 to 20 inches, and snow falls in winter on the Tih, and whitens Sinai and the Edomite mountains for many days. The acacia, tamarisk and palm grow in the valleys. At Wady Feiran there are said to be 5,000 date palms, and they occur also in the `Arabah and the Edomite gorges, while the white broom ( 1 Kings 19:5 , the King James Version "juniper") grows on the Tih plateau. This Tih plateau is the bed of an ancient ocean which once surrounded the granite mountains of Sinai. It was upheaved probably in the Miocene age, long before man appeared on earth. The surface formation (Hull, Memoir on the Geology and Geography of Arabia-Petraea, etc., 1886) consists of Cretaceous limestones of the Eocene and Chalk ages, beneath which lies the Nubian sandstone of the Greensand period, which is also visible all along the route from Sinai to `Aqabah, and on the east side of the Dead Sea, and even at the foot of the Gilead plateau. These beds are all visible in the Tih escarpment; and North of Sinai there are yet older formations of limestone, and the "desert sandstone" of the Carboniferous period. Since the conditions of natural water-supply depend entirely on geological formation and on rainfall, neither of which can be regarded as having changed since the time of Moses, the scientific conclusion is that the desert thus described represents that of his age, This, as we shall see, affects our conclusion as to the route followed by Israel from Egypt to the `Arabah; for, on the direct route from Suez to Nakhl (about 70 miles), there is no water for the main part of the way, so it has to be carried on camels; while, East of Nakhl, in a distance of 80 miles, there is only one known supply in a well (Bir eth-Themed) a few miles South of the road. This route was thus practically impassable for the Hebrews and their beasts, whereas the Sinai route was passable. Thus when Wellhausen (History of Israel and Judah, 343) speaks of Israel as going straight to Kadesh, and not making a "digression to Sinai," he seems not to have considered the topography as described by many modern travelers. For not only was the whole object of their journey first to visit the "Mount of God," but it also lay on the most practicable route to Kadesh.  6. Difficulties Regarding the Numbers of Israel and Account of Tabernacle  It is true that there are certain difficulties as regards both the numbers of Israel and the account of the tabernacle. The first of these objections has been considered elsewhere (see EXODUS). The detailed account of the tabernacle (Exodus 25-28; 36-39) belongs to a part of the Pentateuch which many critical writers assign to a later date than that of the old narrative and laws (Exodus 1-24). The description may seem more applicable to the semi-permanent structure that existed at Shiloh and Nob, than to the original "tent of meeting" in the desert. On the other hand, living so long in civilized Egypt, the Hebrews no doubt had among them skilled artificers like Bezalel. The Egyptians used acacia wood for furniture; and though the desert acacia does not grow to the size which would furnish planks 1 1/4 cubits broad, it may be that these were made up by joiner's work such as the ancients were able to execute. There was plenty of gold in Egypt and Asia, but none near Sinai. It is suggested, however, that the ornaments of which the Hebrews spoiled the Egyptians were presented, like the stuffs ( Exodus 36:6 ) prepared for the curtains-just as the Arabs weave stuffs for their tents-and they might have served to spread a thin layer of gold over acacia boards, and on the acacia altar. It is more difficult to understand (on our present information) where silver enough for the bases ( Exodus 26:25 ) would be found. Copper ( Exodus 27:4 ) presents less difficulty, since there were copper mines in Wady Nucb near Serabit el Khadim. The women gave gold earrings to Aaron ( Exodus 32:3 ) for the Golden Calf, but this may have been a small object. Eusebius (in Onomasticon), referring to Dizahab, "the place of gold" ( Deuteronomy 1:1 ), now Dhahab ("gold") on the west shore of the Gulf of `Aqabah, East of Sinai, mentions the copper mines of Punon; and thought that veins of gold might also have existed in the mountains of Edom in old times. A little gold is also found in Midian. We know that the Egyptians and Assyrians carried arks and portable altars with their armies, and a great leather tent of Queen Habasu actually exists. Thothmes III, before the Exodus, speaks of "seven tent poles covered with plates of gold from the tent of the hostile king" which he took as spoil at Megiddo. The art of engraving gems was also already ancient in the time of Moses.  See  NUMBERS, BOOK OF .  7. Difficulty as to Number of Wagons:  Another difficulty is to understand how six ox wagons ( Numbers 7:3 ) sufficed to carry all the heavy planks and curtains, and vessels of the tabernacle; and though the use of ox carts, and of four-wheeled wagons also, is known to have been ancient in Asia, there are points on even the easiest route which it would seem impossible for wagons to pass, especially on the rough road through Edom and Moab. On the other hand, we know that an Egyptian Mohar did drive his chariot over the mountains in Palestine in the reign of Rameses II, though it was finally broken near Joppa.  8. Fauna of the Desert:  Whatever be thought as to these questions, there are indications in other passages of actual acquaintance with the desert fauna. Although the manna, as described ( Exodus 16:31 ), is said not to resemble the sweet gum which exudes from the twigs of the tamarisk (to which it has been compared by some), which melts in the sun, and is regarded as a delicacy by the Arabs, yet the quail ( Exodus 16:13   Numbers 11:31 ) still migrate from the sea northward across the desert in spring, flying low by night. The birds noticed ( Leviticus 11   Deuteronomy 14 ) include-as Canon Tristram remarked-species found on the seashores and in the wilderness, such as the cormorant, pelican and gull; the ostrich (in the desert East of Moab); the stork, the crane and the heron which migrate from Africa to the Jordan valley. It is notable that, except the heron (Assyrian anpatu), the Hebrew names are not those used by later Assyrians. The mammals include the boar which loves the marshes, and the hyrax (the King James Version "coney") which still exists near Sinai and in the desert of Judah, with the desert hare. It is remarkable that in Deuteronomy (14:5), besides the ibex and the bubak, two species are added (the fallow deer, Hebrew 'ayyal, the King James Version "hart," and the roebuck, Hebrew yachmur, Arabic yachmur, the King James Version "fallow deer") which are not desert animals. The former occurs at Tabor; the latter was found by the present writer in 1873 on Carmel, and is since known in Gilead and Lebanon. But Deuteronomy refers to conditions subsequent to the capture of Gilead and Bashan.  9. Characteristic Names of the Districts:  The various districts in the desert receive characteristic names in the account of the Exodus. Thus, Shur is the coast region under the "wall" of the Tih, and Sin ( Exodus 17:1   Numbers 33:11 ) was the "glaring" desert (see SINAI) of white chalk, West of Sinai. Paran is noticed 10 times, as a desert and mountain region ( Deuteronomy 33:2   Habakkuk 3:3 ) between Sinai and Kadesh. The name seems to survive in Wady Feiran West of Sinai. It means some kind of "burrows," whether referring to mines, caves or water pits, according to the usual explanation; but in Arabic the root also means "hot," which is perhaps more likely. The term seems to be of very wide extension, and to refer to the Tih generally ( Genesis 21:21 ); for David ( 1 Samuel 25:1 ) in Paran was not far from Maon and Carmel South of Hebron, and the same general application ( 1 Kings 11:18 ) is suggested in another passage. Finally the desert of Zin (tsin) is noticed 9 times, and very clearly lay close to Kadesh-barnea and East of Paran ( Numbers 13:21 ;  Numbers 20:1 ;  Numbers 34:3   Deuteronomy 32:51   Joshua 15:3 ). The rabbis rendered it "palm" (tsin), which is appropriate to the `Arabah valley which still retains the old name mentioned in  Deuteronomy 1:1 . These various considerations as to the conditions to be fulfilled may serve to show that the difficulties often raised, as to the historic character of the Exodus narrative, have been much overstated; and a further study of the various journeys serves to confirm this view.  II. First Journey.  1. Mode of Traveling:  Israel left Egypt in the early part of April (after the 14th of Abib) and reached Sinai about the 14th or 19th of the 3rd month ( Exodus 19:1 ), or at the end of May. They thus took two months to accomplish a journey of about 117 miles; but from the first camp after crossing the Red Sea to that in the plain before the Mount ten marches are mentioned, giving intervals of less than 12 miles between each camp. Thus they evidently remained in camp for at least 50 days of the time, probably at the better supplied springs, including that of the starting-point, and those at Elim and Rephidim, in order to rest their flocks. The camps were probably not all crowded round one spring, but spread over a distance of some miles. The Arabs indeed do not camp or keep their flocks close to the waters, probably in order not to defile them, but send the women with donkeys to fetch water, and drive the sheep and goats to the spring or well in the cool of the afternoon. Thus we read that Amalek "smote the hindmost" ( Deuteronomy 25:18 ), which may either mean the stragglers unable to keep up when "weary," or perhaps those in the camp most in the rear.  2. The Route: the First Camp:  The route of Israel has been very carefully described by Robinson (BR, 1838, I, 60-172; II, 95-195), and his account is mainly followed in this and the next sections. We may place the first camp (see EXODUS), between the springs which supply Suez (`Ain Nab'a and `Ayyun Musa), which are about 4 miles apart. The first of these is scooped out among the sand hillocks, and bubbles up in a basin some 6 ft. deep. The water is brackish, but supplies as many as 200 camel loads at once for Suez. At `Ayyun Musa ("the springs of Moses") there are seven springs, some being small and scooped in the sand. A few palms occur near the water (which is also brackish), and a little barley is grown, while in recent times gardens of pomegranates have been cultivated (A. E. Haynes, Man-Hunting in the Desert, 1894, 106), which, with the palms, give a grateful shade.  3. Waters of Marah:  From this base Israel marched "three days in the wilderness" of Shur, "and found no water" ( Exodus 15:22 ). They no doubt carried it with them, and may have sent back camels to fetch it. Even when they reached the waters of Marah ("the bitter") they found them undrinkable till sweetened. The site of Marah seems clearly to have been at `Ain Chawarah ("the white chalk spring"), named from the chalky mound beside it. This is 36 miles from `Ayyun Musa, giving an average daily march of 12 miles. There is no water on the route, though some might have been fetched from `Ain Abu Jerad in Wady Sudr, and from the small spring of Abu Suweirah near the sea. Burckhardt thought that the water was sweetened from the berries of the Gharqad shrub (which have an acid juice) on the thorny bushes near the spring. This red berry ripens, however, in June. There is no doubt, on the other hand, that the best treatment for brack water is the addition of an acid taste. The Arabs consider the waters of this spring to be the most bitter in the country near.  4. Camp by the Red Sea:  From Marah, the next march led to Elim ("the palms"), where were "twelve springs (not "wells") of water and seventy palms." The site seems clearly to have been in Wady Gharandil, where a brook is found fed by springs of better water than that of Marah. The distance is only about 6 miles, or an easy march, and palm trees exist near the waters. Israel then entered the desert of Sin, stretching from Elim to Sinai, reaching a camp "by the Red Sea" ( Numbers 33:10 ) just a month after leaving Egypt ( Exodus 16:1 ). The probable site is near the mouth of Wady et-Taiyibeh ("the goodly valley"), which is some 10 or 12 miles from the springs of Gharandil. The foothills here project close to the coast, and North of the valley is Jebel Chammam Far'aun ("the mountain of Pharaoh's hot bath"), named from hot sulphur springs. The water in Wady et-Taiyibeh is said to be better than that of Marah, and this is the main Arab watering-place after passing Gharandil. A small pond is here described by Burckhardt at el-Murkhat, in the sandstone rock near the foot of the mountains, but the water is bitter and full of weeds, moss and mud. The site is close to a broad shore plain stretching South Here two roads diverge toward Sinai, which lies about 65 miles to the Southeast, and in this interval ( Numbers 33:11-15 ) five stations are named, giving a daily march of 13 miles. The Hebrews probably took the lower and easier road, especially as it avoided the Egyptian mines of Wady el-Maghdrah ("valley of the cave") and their station at Serabit el-Khadim ("pillars of the servant"), where-though this is not certain-there may have been a detachment of bowmen guarding the mines.  5. The Route to Sinai:  None of the five camps on this section of the route is certainly known. Dophkah apparently means "overdriving" of flocks, and Alush (according to the rabbis) "crowding," thus indicating the difficulties of the march. Rephidim ("refreshments") contrasts with these names and indicates a better camp. The site, ever since the 4th century A.D., has always been shown in Wady Feiran (Eusebius, Onomasticon, under the word "Rephidim")-an oasis of date palms with a running stream. The distance from Sinai is about 18 miles, or 14 from the western end of the broad plain er-Rachah in which Israel camped in sight of Horeb; and the latter name ( Exodus 17:6 ) included the Desert of Sinai even as far West as Rephidim. Here the rod of Moses, smiting the rock, revealed to the Hebrews an abundant supply, just as they despaired of water. Here apparently they could rest in comfort for some three weeks before the final march to the plain "before the mount" ( Exodus 19:1, 2 ), which they reached two months after leaving Egypt. Here Amalek-coming down probably from the mines-attacked them in the rear. Meanwhile there was ample time for the news of their journey to reach Midian, and for the family of Moses ( Exodus 18:1-5 ) to reach Sinai. On one of the low hills near Wady Feiran, Moses watched the doubtful fight and built his stone altar. A steep pass separates the oasis from the Rachah plain, and baggage camels usually round it on the North by Wady esh-Sheikh, which may have been the actual route. The Rephidim oasis has a fertile alluvial soil, and the spot was chosen by Christian hermits perhaps as early as the 3rd century A.D.  III. Second Journey.  1. The Stay at Sinai:  Israel remained at Mt. Sinai for 10 months, leaving it after the Passover of the "second year" ( Numbers 9:1-3 ), and apparently soon after the feast, since, when they again witnessed the spring migration of the quail ( Numbers 11:31 ) "from the sea"-as they had done in the preceding year ( Exodus 16:13 ) farther West-they were already about 20 miles on their road, at Kibroth-hattaavah, or "the graves of lust."  2. Site of Kadesh-barnea:  (1) In order to follow their journey it is necessary to fix the site of Kadesh-barnea to which they were going, and there has been a good deal of confusion as to this city since, in 1844, John Rowlands discovered the site of the western Kadesh, at `Ain Qadis in the northern part of the Tih. Robinson pointed out (BR, II, 194, note 3) that this site could not possibly be right for Kadesh-barnea; and, though it was accepted by Professor Palmer, who visited the vicinity in January, 1870, and has been advocated by Henry Clay Trumbull (Kadesh-barnea, 1884), the identification makes hopeless chaos of the Old Testament topography. The site of `Ain Qadis is no doubt that of the Kadesh of Hagar (see SHUR), and a tradition of her presence survives among the Arabs, probably derived from one of the early hermits, since a small hermitage was found by Palmer in the vicinity (Survey of Western Palestine, Special Papers, 1881, 19). But this spring is not said to have been at the "city" of Kadesh-barnea, which is clearly placed at the southeast corner of the land of Israel ( Joshua 15:3 ), while, in the same chapter ( Joshua 15:23 ), another site called Kedesh is mentioned, with Adadah (`Ada'deh 7 miles Southeast of Arad) and Hazor (at Jebel Chadireh); this Kedesh may very well have been at the western Kadesh.  (2) Kadesh-barnea is noticed in 10 passages of the Old Testament, and in 16 other verses is called Kadesh only. The name probably means "the holy place of the desert of wandering," and-as we shall see-the wanderings of Israel were confined to the `Arabah. The place is described as "a city in the uttermost.... border" of Edom ( Numbers 20:16 ), Edom being the "red land" of Mt. Seir, so called from its red sandstones, as contrasted with the white Tih limestone. It is also very clearly placed ( Numbers 34:3, 4 ) South of the Dead Sea (compare  Joshua 15:3 ), while Ezekiel also (47:19) gives it as the southeastern limit of the land, opposed to Tamar (Tamrah near Gaza) as the southeastern border town. A constant tradition, among Jews and Christians alike, identifies Kadesh-barnea with Petra, and this as early as the time of Josephus, who says that Aaron died on a mountain near Petra (Ant., IV, iv, 7), and that the old name of Petra was Arekem (vii, 1). The Targum of Onkelos (on  Numbers 34:4 ) renders Kadesh-barnea by "Rekem of the G'aia" and this name-meaning "many-colored"-was due to the many-colored rocks near Petra, while the g'aia or "outcry" is probably that of Israel at Meribah-kadesh ( Numbers 27:14 ), and may have some connection with the name of the village el-Jii, at Petra, which is now called Wady Musa ("the valley of Moses") by the Arabs, who have a tradition that the gorge leading to Petra was cloven by the rod of Moses when he struck the rock at the "waters of strife" ( Numbers 27:14 ), forming the present stream which represents that of "Meribah of Kadesh." Eusebius also (in Onomasticon under the word "Barne") connects Kadesh with Petra, and this traditional site so fully answers the requirements of the journey in question that it may be accepted as one of the best-fixed points on the route, especially as the position of Hazeroth agrees with this conclusion. Hazeroth ( Numbers 11:35 ;  Numbers 12:16 ;  Numbers 33:17   Deuteronomy 1:1 ) means "enclosures," and the name survives at `Ain Chadrah ("spring of the enclosure") about 30 miles Northeast of Mt. Sinai on the way to the `Arabah. It was the 3rd camp from Sinai, the 1st being Taberah ( Numbers 11:3 ) and the 2nd Kibroth-hattaavah ( Numbers 11:35 ), giving a daily march of 10 miles.  See  KADESH-BARNEA .  3. The Route: Hazeroth to Moseroth:  After passing Hazeroth ( Numbers 12:16 ;  Numbers 13:3 ) the journey appears to have been leisurely, and Israel probably camped for some time in the best pastures of the `Arabah. For the spies were sent from Paran near Hazeroth to explore the route to Kadesh, and to examine the "south country" through which Israel hoped to enter Palestine ( Numbers 13:17, 21 ). They explored this district ( Numbers 13:21 ;  Numbers 32:8 ) from "the wilderness of Zin," or otherwise "from Kadesh-barnea," on the East, to Rehob-probably Rehoboth (now er-Ruheibeh)-on the West; and-having been absent 40 days ( Numbers 13:25 )-after visiting Hebron ( Numbers 13:22 ) they returned by the direct route leading South of Arad (Tell `Arad) to Petra, which road is called ( Numbers 21:1 ) the "way of the spies." On their return, in the season of "first-ripe grapes" ( Numbers 13:20 ), they found Israel at Kadesh ( Numbers 13:26 ). No place North of Hebron is mentioned in the account of their explorations, and it is difficult to suppose that, in 40 days, they could have reached the Syrian city of Hamath, which is some 350 miles North of Petra, and have returned thence. The definition of Rehob (mentioned before Hebron) as being `on the coming to Hamath' ( Numbers 13:21 ) is best explained as a scribe's error, due to an indistinct manuscript, the original reading being chalatseth, and referring to the classical Elussa (now Khalasah) which lies 10 miles North of Rehoboth on the main road to Beersheba and Hebron. Israel left Sinai in the spring, after the Passover, and was near Hazeroth in the time of the quail migration. Hazeroth possesses the only perennial supply of water in the region, from its vicinity the spies set forth in August.  4. The Camps between Hazeroth and Moseroth:  Most of the sites along this route are unknown, and their position can only be gathered from the meaning of the names; but the 6th station from Hazeroth was at Mt. Shepher ( Numbers 33:23 ), and may have left its name corrupted into Tell el-`Acfar (or `Asfar), the Hebrew meaning "the shining hill," and the Arabic either the same or else "the yellow." This site is 60 miles from Hazeroth, giving a daily march of 10 miles. As regards the other stations, Rithmah means "broomy," referring to the white desert broom; Rimmon-perez was a "cloven height," and Libnab a "white" chalky place; Rissah means "dewy," and Kehelathah, "gathering." From Mt. Shepher the distance to the vicinity of Mt. Hor is about 55 miles, and seven stations are named, giving an average march of 8 miles. The names are Haradah ( Numbers 33:24 ), "fearful," referring to a mountain; Makheloth, "gatherings"; Tahath-probably "below"-marking the descent into the `Arabah; Terah, "delay," referring to rest in the better pastures; Mithkah, "sweetness" of pasture or of water; Hashmonah, "fatness"; and Moseroth; probably meaning "the boundaries," near Mt. Hor. These names, though now lost, agree well with a journey through a rugged region of white limestone and yellow sandstone, followed by a descent into the pastoral valley of the `Arabah. The distances also are all probable for flocks.  Read Complete Article...  
TIRHAKAH|The last king of Egypt of the Ethiopian (the fifteenth) dynasty. He was the brother-in-law of So (q.v.). He probably ascended the throne about B.C. 692, having been previously king of Ethiopia ( 2 Kings 19:9 ;  Isaiah 37:9 ), which with Egypt now formed one nation. He was a great warrior, and but little is known of him. The Assyrian armies under Esarhaddon, and again under Assur-bani-pal, invaded Egypt and defeated Tirhakah, who afterwards retired into Ethiopia, where he died, after reigning twenty-six years. 
SHECHANIAH|   SHECANIAH;   shek-a-ni'-a, shekan'-ya (shekhanyah (in  1 Chronicles 24:11   2 Chronicles 31:15 , shekhanyahu); Codex Vaticanus Ischania, Sekenia):  (1) A descendant of Zerubbabel ( 1 Chronicles 3:21, 22 ). This is the same Shecaniah mentioned in  Ezra 8:3 .  (2) "The sons of Shecaniah," so the Massoretic Text of  Ezra 8:5  reads, were among those who returned with Ezra, but a name appears to have been lost from the text, and we should probably read "of the sons of Zattu, Shecaniah the son of Jahaziel" (compare 1 Esdras 8:32, "of the sons of Zathoes, Sechenias the son of Jezelus").  (3) Chief of the tenth course of priests ( 1 Chronicles 24:11 ).  (4) A priest in the reign of Hezekiah ( 2 Chronicles 31:15 ).  (5) A contemporary of Ezra who supported him in his opposition to foreign marriages ( Ezra 10:2 ).  (6) The father of Shemaiah, "the keeper of the east gate" ( Nehemiah 3:29 ).  (7) The father-in-law of Tobiah the Ammonite ( Nehemiah 6:18 ).  (8) The eponym of a family which returned with Zerubbabel ( Nehemiah 12:3 ). It is the same name which, by an interchange of "bh" and "kh", appears as Shebaniah (see SHEBANIAH, (2)) in  Nehemiah 10:4, 12, 14 .  Horace J. Wolf
EL|    ROI  ( Genesis 16:13  margin).  See  GOD, NAMES OF .  EL  See  GOD, NAMES OF .  EL ELYON  el e-li'-on.  See  GOD, NAMES OF .
SHUHAM|     shoo'-ham (shucham): Son of Dan, ancestor of the Shuhamites ( Numbers 26:42 f ). In  Genesis 46:23  called "Hushim."
HEMAN|Faithful.  (1.)  1 Kings 4:31 ;  1 Chronicles 2:6 , a son of Zerah, noted for his wisdom.  (2.) Grandson of Samuel ( 1 Chronicles 6:33 ;  15:17 ), to whom the 88th Psalm probably was inscribed. He was one of the "seers" named in  2 Chronicles 29:14 , 30, and took a leading part in the administration of the sacred services. 
COINS|     koinz: There were no coins in use in Palestine until after the Captivity. It is not quite certain whether gold and silver were before that time divided into pieces of a certain weight for use as money or not, but there can be no question of coinage proper until the Persian period. Darius I is credited with introducing a coinage system into his empire, and his were the first coins that came into use among the Jews, though it seems probable that coins were struck in Lydia in the time of Croesus, the contemporary of Cyrus the Great, and these coins were doubtless the model upon which Darius based his system, and they may have circulated to some extent in Babylonia before the return of the Jews. The only coins mentioned in the Old Testament are the Darics (see DARIC), and these only in the Revised Version (British and American), the word "dram" being used in the King James Version ( Ezra 2:69 ;  Ezra 8:27   Nehemiah 7:70-72 ). The Jews had no native coins until the time of the Maccabees, who struck coins after gaining their independence about 143-141 B.C. These kings struck silver and copper, or the latter, at least (see MONEY), in denominations of shekels and fractions of the shekel, until the dynasty was overthrown by the Romans. Other coins were certainly in circulation during the same period, especially those of Alexander and his successors the Ptolemies of Egypt and the Seleucids of Syria, both of whom bore sway over Palestine before the rise of the Maccabees. Besides these coins there were the issues of some of the Phoenician towns, which were allowed to strike coins by the Persians and the Seleucids. The coins of Tyre and Sidon, both silver and copper, must have circulated largely in Palestine on account of the intimate commercial relations between the Jews and Phoenicians (for examples, see under MONEY). After the advent of the Romans the local coinage was restricted chiefly to the series of copper coins, such as the mites mentioned in the New Testament, the silver denarii being struck mostly at Rome, but circulating wherever the Romans went. The coins of the Herods and the Procurators are abundant, but all of copper, since the Romans did not allow the Jewish rulers to strike either silver or gold coins. At the time of the first revolt (66-70 A.D.) the Jewish leader, Simon, struck shekels again, or, as some numismatists think, he was the first to do so. But this series was a brief one, lasting between 3 and 4 years only, as Jerusalem was taken by Titus in 70 A.D., and this put an end to the existence of the Jewish state. There was another short period of Jewish coinage during the second revolt, in the reign of Hadrian, when Simon Barcochba struck coins with Hebrew legends which indicate his independence of Roman rule. They were of both silver and copper, and constitute the last series of strictly Jewish coins (see MONEY). After this the coins struck in Judea were Roman, as Jerusalem was made a Roman colony.  H. Porter
ESHBAAL|Man of Baal, the fourth son of king Saul ( 1 Chronicles 8:33 ;  9:39 ). He is also called Ish-bosheth (q.v.),  2 Samuel 2:8 . 
HAGGITH|Festive; the dancer, a wife of David and the mother of Adonijah ( 2 Samuel 3:4 ;  1 Kings 1:5 ,  11;  2:13 ;  1 Chronicles 3:2 ), who, like Absalom, was famed for his beauty. 
BAVVAI|     bav'-a-i (bawway; Septuagint Codex Alexandrinus, Benei; Codex Vaticanus, Bedei; the King James Version Bavai, "wisher" (?) ( Nehemiah 3:18 )): Perhaps identical with or a brother of Binnui ( Nehemiah 3:24 ). See  BINNUI . Bavvai, "the son of Henadad, the ruler of half the district of Keilah," was of a Levitical family. He is mentioned as one of those who repaired the wall of Jerusalem after the return from Babylon ( Nehemiah 3:17 f ).
MATHUSALA|     ma-thu'-sa-la (Mathousala): Greek form of "Methuselah," the Revised Version (British and American) ( Luke 3:37  the King James Version).
HADRACH|The name of a country ( Zechariah 9:1 ) which cannot be identified. Rawlinson would identify it with Edessa. He mentions that in the Assyrian inscriptions it is recorded that "Shalmanezer III. made two expeditions, the first against Damascus B.C. 773, and the second against Hadrach B.C. 772; and again that Asshurdanin-il II. made expeditions against Hadrach in B.C. 765 and 755." 
MENE|( Dan. 5:25 ,  26), numbered, one of the words of the mysterious inscription written "upon the plaister of the wall" in Belshazzar's palace at Babylon. The writing was explained by Daniel. (see  BELSHAZZAR .) 
CESAREA|(Palestinae), a city on the shore of the Mediterranean, on the great road from Tyre to Egypt, about 70 miles northwest of Jerusalem, at the northern extremity of the plain of Sharon. It was built by Herod the Great (B.C. 10), who named it after Caesar Augustus, hence called Caesarea Sebaste (Gr. Sebastos = "Augustus"), on the site of an old town called "Strato's Tower." It was the capital of the Roman province of Judaea, the seat of the governors or procurators, and the headquarters of the Roman troops. It was the great Gentile city of Palestine, with a spacious artificial harbour. It was adorned with many buildings of great splendour, after the manner of the Roman cities of the West. Here Cornelius the centurion was converted through the instrumentality of Peter ( Acts 10:1 ,  24), and thus for the first time the door of faith was opened to the Gentiles. Philip the evangelist resided here with his four daughters ( 21:8 ). From this place Saul sailed for his native Tarsus when forced to flee from Jerusalem ( 9:30 ), and here he landed when returning from his second missionary journey ( 18:22 ). He remained as a prisoner here for two years before his voyage to Rome ( Acts 24:27 ;  25:1 ,  4,  6,  13). Here on a "set day," when games were celebrated in the theatre in honour of the emperor Claudius, Herod Agrippa I. appeared among the people in great pomp, and in the midst of the idolatrous homage paid to him was suddenly smitten by an angel, and carried out a dying man. He was "eaten of worms" ( 12:19 -23), thus perishing by the same loathsome disease as his granfather, Herod the Great. It still retains its ancient name Kaiseriyeh, but is now desolate. "The present inhabitants of the ruins are snakes, scorpions, lizards, wild boars, and jackals." It is described as the most desolate city of all Palestine. 
ELISHAMA|Whom God hears.  (1.) A prince of Benjamin, grandfather of Joshua ( Numbers 1:10 ;  1 Chronicles 7:26 ).  (2.) One of David's sons ( 2 Samuel 5:16 ).  (3.) Another of David's sons ( 1 Chronicles 3:6 ).  (4.) A priest sent by Jehoshaphat to teach the people the law ( 2 Chronicles 17:8 ). 
TIMOTHEUS|The Greek form of the name of Timothy ( Acts 16:1 ,  etc.; the R.V. always "Timothy"). 
SARON|A plain, a level tract extending from the Mediterranean to the hill country to the west of Jerusalem, about 30 miles long and from 8 to 15 miles broad, celebrated for its beauty and fertility ( 1 Chronicles 27:29 ;  Isaiah 33:9 ;  35:2 ;  65:10 ). The "rose of Sharon" is celebrated (Cant. 2:1). It is called Lasharon (the article la being here a part of the word) in  Joshua 12:18 . 
JOAHAZ|( 2 Chronicles 34:8 ), a contracted form of Jehoahaz (q.v.). 
HUSHATHITE|     hu'-shath-it, (chushathi, "a dweller in Hushah"?): The patronymic given in two forms, but probably of the same man, Sibbeccai, one of David's thirty heroes ( 2 Samuel 21:18   1 Chronicles 11:29 ;  1 Chronicles 20:4 ;  1 Chronicles 27:11 ), or Mebunnai as named in the parallel passage ( 2 Samuel 23:27 ).
MATTITHIAH|Gift of Jehovah.  (1.) One of the sons of Jeduthun ( 1 Chronicles 25:3 ,  21). (2.) The eldest son of Shallum, of the family of Korah ( 1 Chronicles 9:31 ). (3.) One who stood by Ezra while reading the law ( Nehemiah 8:4 ). (4.) The son of Amos, and father of Joseph, in the genealogy of our Lord ( Luke 3:25 ). 
JEHOIACHIN|Succeeded his father Jehoiakin (B.C. 599) when only eight years of age, and reigned for one hundred days ( 2 Chronicles 36:9 ). He is also called Jeconiah ( Jeremiah 24:1 ;  27:20 ,  etc.), and Coniah ( 22:24 ;  37:1 ). He was succeeded by his uncle, Mattaniah = Zedekiah (q.v.). He was the last direct heir to the Jewish crown. He was carried captive to Babylon by Nebuchadnezzar, along with the flower of the nobility, all the leading men in Jerusalem, and a great body of the general population, some thirteen thousand in all ( 2 Kings 24:12 -16;  Jeremiah 52:28 ). After an imprisonment of thirty-seven years ( Jeremiah 52:31 ,  33), he was liberated by Evil-merodach, and permitted to occupy a place in the king's household and sit at his table, receiving "every day a portion until the day of his death, all the days of his life" ( 52:32 -34). 
MAACAH|     ma'-a-ka (ma`akhah; Septuagint: Codex Vaticanus Mocha; Codex Alexandrinus Maacha): A small Syrian kingdom adjoining that of Geshur on the western border of Bashan, the inhabitants of which are called Maachathites (the Revised Version (British and American) "Maacathites"), whose territory was taken by Jair ( Deuteronomy 3:14   Joshua 12:5 ). The border of the Geshurites and the Maacathites and all Mt. Hermon were given to the half-tribe of Manasseh ( Joshua 13:11 ). The inhabitants of these kingdoms, however, were not driven out by Israel ( Joshua 13:13 ), and at a later day the children of Ammon hired mercenaries from Maacah for their encounter with David. The armies met near Medeba when the "Syrians" from Maacah found themselves opposed to Joab. That famous captain completely routed them ( 2 Samuel 10:6 ; the Septuagint has "Amalek"). In  1 Chronicles 19:6  it is called Aram-maacah, Syria-maachah (the King James Version); and in  1 Chronicles 2:23  "Aram" appears instead of "Maacah."  It evidently lay between Geshur on the South and Hermon on the North, being probably bounded by Jordan on the West, although no certain indication of boundaries is now possible. They would thus be hemmed in by Israel, which accounts for `Geshur and Maacath dwell in the midst of Israel" ( Joshua 13:13 ).It is possible that Abel-beth-maacah may have been a colony founded by men from Maacah.  W. Ewing  MAACAH; MAACHAH  ma'-a-ka (ma`akhah):  (1) Septuagint: Codex Vaticanus Mocha; Codex Alexandrinus Mocha, daughter of Nahor, borne to him by Reumah ( Genesis 22:24 ).  (2) Septuagint: Codex Vaticanus Maacha; Codex Alexandrinus Maachath, the one wife of David who was of royal rank, the daughter of Talmai, king of Geshur, who became the mother of Absalom ( 2 Samuel 3:3   1 Chronicles 3:2 ).  (3) Maacha, father of Achish, king of Gath ( 1 Kings 2:39 ). He is probably referred to as "Maoch" in  1 Samuel 27:2 .  (4) The daughter of Absalom, the favorite wife of Rehoboam, and mother of Abijah ( 1 Kings 15:2   2 Chronicles 11:20 , etc.). Evidently "daughter" must here be understood as "granddaughter," according to a common oriental usage. Tamar was the only daughter of Absalom. If Tamar married Uriel of Gibeah ( 2 Chronicles 13:2 ), then Maacah was her daughter. In that case the name Micaiah in this passage would be either a copyist's error or a variant of Maacah. She must have been a woman of strong personality. Unfortunately, her influence was cast upon the side of idolatry. She maintained her position in the palace, however, till the reign of her grandson Asa. Possibly she acted as regent during his minority. Ultimately, she was degraded by him for an act of peculiar infamy ( 1 Kings 15:13   2 Chronicles 15:16 ).  (5) Concubine of Caleb, son of Hezron ( 1 Chronicles 2:48 ).  (6) Sister of Huppim and Shuppim the Benjamites, who became the wife of Machir the Manassite, the "father" of Gilead ( 1 Chronicles 7:12, 15 f ).  (7) Wife of Jeiel, the "father" of Gibeon, an ancestress of King Saul ( 1 Chronicles 8:29 ;  1 Chronicles 9:35 ).  (8) Father of Hanan, one of David's mighty men ( 1 Chronicles 11:43 ).  (9) Father of Shephatiah, ruler of the Simeonites under David ( 1 Chronicles 27:16 ).  W. Ewing
JEHOASH|Jehovah-given.  (1.) The son of King Ahaziah. While yet an infant, he was saved from the general massacre of the family by his aunt Jehosheba, and was apparently the only surviving descendant of Solomon ( 2 Chronicles 21:4 ,  17). His uncle, the high priest Jehoiada, brought him forth to public notice when he was eight years of age, and crowned and anointed him king of Judah with the usual ceremonies. Athaliah was taken by surprise when she heard the shout of the people, "Long live the king;" and when she appeared in the temple, Jehoiada commanded her to be led forth to death ( 2 Kings 11:13 -20). While the high priest lived, Jehoash favoured the worship of God and observed the law; but on his death he fell away into evil courses, and the land was defiled with idolatry. Zechariah, the son and successor of the high priest, was put to death. These evil deeds brought down on the land the judgement of God, and it was oppressed by the Syrian invaders. He is one of the three kings omitted by Matthew ( 1:8 ) in the genealogy of Christ, the other two being Ahaziah and Amaziah. He was buried in the city of David ( 2 Kings 12:21 ). (see  JOASH  .) (2.) The son and successor of Jehoahaz, king of Israel ( 2 Kings 14:1 ; Comp.  12:1 ;  13:10 ). When he ascended the throne the kingdom was suffering from the invasion of the Syrians. Hazael "was cutting Israel short." He tolerated the worship of the golden calves, yet seems to have manifested a character of sincere devotion to the God of his fathers. He held the prophet Elisha in honour, and wept by his bedside when he was dying, addressing him in the words Elisha himself had used when Elijah was carried up into heaven: "O my father, my father, the chariot of Israel and the horsemen thereof." He was afterwards involved in war with Amaziah, the king of Judah ( 2 Chronicles 25:23 -24), whom he utterly defeated at Beth-shemesh, on the borders of Dan and Philistia, and advancing on Jerusalem, broke down a portion of the wall, and carried away the treasures of the temple and the palace. He soon after died (B.C. 825), and was buried in Samaria ( 2 Kings 14:1 -17,  19,  20). He was succeeded by his son. (see  JOASH  [5.]...) 
CYMBALS|(Hebrews tzeltzelim,  from a root meaning to "tinkle"), musical instruments, consisting of two convex pieces of brass one held in each hand, which were clashed together to produce a loud clanging sound; castanets; "loud cymbals." "Highsounding cymbals" consisted of two larger plates, one held also in each hand ( 2 Samuel 6:5 ;  Psalm 150:5 ;  1 Chronicles 13:8 ;  15:16 ,  19,  28;  1 Corinthians 13:1 ). 
JOANAN|     jo-a'-nan (Westcott-Hort, Greek New Testament, Ioanan; Textus Receptus of the New Testament, Ioanna; the King James Version, Joanna):  (1) A grandson of Zerubbabel in the genealogy of Jesus according to Luke (3:27).  (2) The son of Eliasib (1 Esdras 9:1 the King James Version, the Revised Version (British and American) "Jonas").
JEREMAI|     jer'-e-mi, jer-e-ma'-i (yeremay, meaning unknown): One of those who had married foreign wives ( Ezra 10:33 ).  See  JEREMIAS (1 Esdras 9:34) .
BARTIMAEUS|Son of Timaeus, one of the two blind beggars of Jericho ( Mark 10:46 ;  Matthew 20:30 ). His blindness was miraculously cured on the ground of his faith. 
OCRAN|     ok'-ran.  See  OCHRAN .
WORKS|Works, Covenant of Entered into by God with Adam as the representative of the human race (Comp.  Genesis 9:11 ,  12;  17:1 -21), so styled because perfect obedience was its condition, thus distinguishing it from the covenant of grace. (see  COVENANT OF  .)  Works, Good The old objection against the doctrine of salvation by grace, that it does away with the necessity of good works, and lowers the sense of their importance ( Romans 6 ), although it has been answered a thousand times, is still alleged by many. They say if men are not saved by works, then works are not necessary. If the most moral of men are saved in the same way as the very chief of sinners, then good works are of no moment. And more than this, if the grace of God is most clearly displayed in the salvation of the vilest of men, then the worse men are the better. The objection has no validity. The gospel of salvation by grace shows that good works are necessary. It is true, unchangeably true, that without holiness no man shall see the Lord. "Neither adulterers, nor thieves, nor covetous, nor drunkards" shall inherit the kingdom of God. Works are "good" only when, (1) they spring from the principle of love to God. The moral character of an act is determined by the moral principle that prompts it. Faith and love in the heart are the essential elements of all true obedience. Hence good works only spring from a believing heart, can only be wrought by one reconciled to God ( Ephesians 2:10 ;  James 2:18 ,22).  (2.) Good works have the glory of God as their object; and (3) they have the revealed will of God as their only rule ( Deuteronomy 12:32 ;  Revelation 22:18 ,  19). Good works are an expression of gratitude in the believer's heart ( John 14:15 ,  23;  Galatians 5:6 ). They are the fruits of the Spirit ( Titus 2:10 -12), and thus spring from grace, which they illustrate and strengthen in the heart. Good works of the most sincere believers are all imperfect, yet like their persons they are accepted through the mediation of Jesus Christ ( Colossians 3:17 ), and so are rewarded; they have no merit intrinsically, but are rewarded wholly of grace. 
SABTECA|     sab'te-ka (cabhtekha'; Sabakatha, Sebethacha; the King James Version Sabtechah): The 5th named of the sons of Cush in the genealogy of  Genesis 10:5-7 . In  1 Chronicles 1:8, 9  the King James Version reads "Sabtecha," the Revised Version (British and American) "Sabteca." Many conjectures have been made as to the place here indicated. Recently Glazer (Skizze, II, 252) has revived the suggestion of Bochart that it is to be identified with Samydake in Carmania on the East of the Persian Gulf. This seems to rest on nothing more than superficial resemblance of the names; but the phonetic changes involved are difficult. Others have thought of various places in Arabia, toward the Persian Gulf; but the data necessary for any satisfactory decision are not now available.  W. Ewing
STIFFNECKED|   STIFF-NECKED  stif'-nekt (qesheh `oreph, literally, "hard of neck"): As it is figuratively used, both in the Old Testament and in the New Testament, the word means "stubborn," "untractable," "not to be led." The derivation of the idea was entirely familiar to the Jews, with whom the ox was the most useful and common of domestic animals. It was especially used for such agricultural purposes as harrowing and plowing ( Judges 14:18   1 Corinthians 9:9 ).  The plow was usually drawn by two oxen. As the plowman required but one hand to guide the plow, he carried in the other an "ox-goad." This was a light pole, shod with an iron spike. With this he would prick the oxen upon the hind legs to increase their speed, and upon the neck to turn, or to keep a straight course when deviating. If an ox was hard to control or stubborn, it was "hard of neck," or stiff-necked. Hence, the figure was used in the Scriptures to express the stubborn, untractable spirit of a people not responsive to the guiding of their God ( Exodus 32:9 ;  Exodus 33:3   Deuteronomy 9:6   2 Chronicles 36:13   Jeremiah 17:23 , etc.). See also the New Testament where sklerotrachelos, is so translated ( Acts 7:51 ), "Ye stiff-necked and uncircumcised in heart and ears, ye do always resist the Holy Spirit.". Compare Baruch 2:30, 33.  Arthur Walwyn Evans
HALI|     ha'-li (chali): A town named with Helkath, Beten and Achshaph on the border of Asher ( Joshua 19:25 ). No certain identification is possible; but it may be represented by the modern Khirbet `Alia, circa 13 miles Northeast of Acre.
SHUHAH|     shoo'-ha (shuchah, "depression"): A brother of Caleb ( 1 Chronicles 4:11 ).
ISSUES|     ish'-uz (tots'-oth, literally, "outgoings"):  (1) Ways of escape ( Psalm 68:20  the King James Version);  (2) free moral choices ( Proverbs 4:23 ).
BAANAH|Son of affliction.  (1.) One of the two sons of Rimmon the Beerothite, a captain in Saul's army. He and his brother Rechab assassinated Ishbosheth ( 2 Samuel 4:2 ), and were on this account slain by David, and their mutilated bodies suspended over the pool at Hebron (5,  6,  12). (2.) The father of Heled, who was one of David's thirty heroes ( 2 Samuel 23:29 ;  1 Chronicles 11:30 ). 
BETHDIBLATHAIM|House of two cakes of figs, a city of Moab, upon which Jeremiah ( 48:22 ) denounced destruction. It is called also Almon-diblathaim ( Numbers 33:46 ) and Diblath ( Ezek. 6:14 ). (R.V.,  "Diblah.") 
SHIHORLIBNATH|Black-white, a stream on the borders of Asher, probably the modern Nahr Zerka, i.e., the "crocodile brook," or "blue river", which rises in the Carmel range and enters the Mediterranean a little to the north of Caesarea ( Joshua 19:26 ). Crocodiles are still found in the Zerka. Thomson suspects "that long ages ago some Egyptians, accustomed to worship this ugly creature, settled here (viz.,  at Caesarea), and brought their gods with them. Once here they would not easily be exterminated" (The Land and the Book). 
JEHUSH|     je'-hush ( 1 Chronicles 8:39 ).  See  JEUSH, (3) .
LIBNI|White, one of the two sons of Gershon, the son of Levi ( Exodus 6:17 ;  Numbers 3:18 ,  21). (see  LAADAN .) 
JADA|     ja'-da (yadha`, "the knowing one"): Son of Onam and grandson of Jerahmeel by his wife Atarah ( 1 Chronicles 2:26, 28, 32 ).
DARKON|     dar'-kon (darqon, "carrier"): Ancestor of a subdivision of "Solomon's servants," so called, in post-exilic times ( Ezra 2:56 ; Ne 7:58; Lozon, 1 Esdras 5:33).
CUTHAH|One of the Babylonian cities or districts from which Shalmaneser transplanted certain colonists to Samaria ( 2 Kings 17:24 ). Some have conjectured that the "Cutheans" were identical with the "Cossaeans" who inhabited the hill-country to the north of the river Choaspes. Cuthah is now identified with Tell Ibrahim, 15 miles north-east of Babylon. 
EGLAH|A heifer, one of David's wives, and mother of Ithream ( 2 Samuel 3:5 ;  1 Chronicles 3:3 ). According to a Jewish tradition she was Michal. 
HABAIAH|   ; HOBAIAH  ha-ba'-ya, (cha-bhayah, chobhayah): A post-exilic priestly family which was unable to establish its pedigree. "Habaiah" is the form in  Ezra 2:61 ; in the parallel passage ( Nehemiah 7:63 ), the King James Version has "Habaiah," and the Revised Version (British and American) "Hobaiah"; in the parallel passage in 1 Esdras 5:38, the form is Obdia, Codex Vaticanus, Obbeia.
IKKESH|     ik'-esh (`iqqesh, "crooked"): A Tekoite, father of Ira, one of David's "thirty" ( 2 Samuel 23:26   1 Chronicles 11:28 ;  1 Chronicles 27:9 ).
MEHUNIM|     me-hu'-nim (me`unim).  See  MEUNIM .
TABERNACLES|Tabernacles, Feast of  The third of the great annual festivals of the Jews ( Leviticus 23:33 -43). It is also called the "feast of ingathering" ( Exodus 23:16 ;  Deuteronomy 16:13 ). It was celebrated immediately after the harvest, in the month Tisri, and the celebration lasted for eight days ( Leviticus 23:33 -43). During that period the people left their homes and lived in booths formed of the branches of trees. The sacrifices offered at this time are mentioned in  Numbers 29:13 -38. It was at the time of this feast that Solomon's temple was dedicated ( 1 Kings 8:2 ). Mention is made of it after the return from the Captivity. This feast was designed (1) to be a memorial of the wilderness wanderings, when the people dwelt in booths ( Leviticus 23:43 ), and (2) to be a harvest thanksgiving ( Nehemiah 8:9 -18). The Jews, at a later time, introduced two appendages to the original festival, viz., (1) that of drawing water from the Pool of Siloam, and pouring it upon the altar ( John 7:2 ,  37), as a memorial of the water from the rock in Horeb; and (2) of lighting the lamps at night, a memorial of the pillar of fire by night during their wanderings. "The feast of Tabernacles, the harvest festival of the Jewish Church, was the most popular and important festival after the Captivity. At Jerusalem it was a gala day. It was to the autumn pilgrims, who arrived on the 14th (of the month Tisri,  the feast beginning on the 15th) day, like entrance into a silvan city. Roofs and courtyards, streets and squares, roads and gardens, were green with boughs of citron and myrtle, palm and willow. The booths recalled the pilgrimage through the wilderness. The ingathering of fruits prophesied of the spiritual harvest.", Valling's Jesus Christ, p. 133.
ISHBAK|Leaving, one of Abraham's sons by Keturah ( Genesis 25:2 ). 
MAGPIASH|     mag'-pi-ash.  See  MAGBISH .
ITHREAM|     ith'-re-am (yithre`am, "residue of the people"): The 6th son born to David at Hebron. His mother's name was Eglah ( 2 Samuel 3:5   1 Chronicles 3:3 ).
JEZANIAH|     jez-a-ni'-a (yezanyahu, probably "Yahweh hears"; compare JAAZANIAH): In  Jeremiah 40:8 , and also 42:1 where Septuagint has "Azariah," as in 43:2 (see Driver, Jer) = JAAZANIAH, (1) (which see).
BARSABAS|Son of Saba, the surname (1) of Joseph, also called Justus ( Acts 1:23 ), some identify him with Barnabas; (2) of Judas, who was a "prophet." Nothing more is known of him than what is mentioned in  Acts 15:32 . 
EHI|     e'-hi ('ehi):  Apparently a contracted form ( Genesis 46:21 ).  See  AHIRAM .
RECAH|     re'-ka (rekhah; Codex Vaticanus Rhechab; Codex Alexandrinus Rhepha; the King James Version Rechah): In  1 Chronicles 4:12  certain persons are described as "the men of Recah," but there is absolutely no information either about the place or its position.
MANAHETHITES|     man-a-he'-thits, ma-na'-heth-its.  See  MANAHATHITES .
VEDAN|     ve'-dan (wedhan): A place-name occurring only in  Ezekiel 27:19 , "Vedan and Javan traded with yarn for thy wares." the King James Version, taking the syllable we as the Hebrew conjunction, renders "and Dan also." The text is in bad condition. Some read "Dedan," but Dedan is spoken of separately in the following verse. Assuming that Vedan is the correct reading, an identification may be conjectured with Waddan, also called al-`Abwa`, between Mecca and Medina. It was the object of Mohammed's first expedition (Ibn Hisham, 415). The name contains that of the god Wadd who was worshipped chiefly by the Arab tribe Kalb.  A. S. Fulton
DWELLINGS|The materials used in buildings were commonly bricks, sometimes also stones ( Leviticus 14:40 ,  42), which were held together by cement ( Jeremiah 43:9 ) or bitumen ( Genesis 11:3 ). The exterior was usually whitewashed ( Leviticus 14:41 ;  Ezek. 13:10 ;  Matthew 23:27 ). The beams were of sycamore ( Isaiah 9:10 ), or olive-wood, or cedar ( 1 Kings 7:2 ;  Isaiah 9:10 ). The form of Eastern dwellings differed in many respects from that of dwellings in Western lands. The larger houses were built in a quadrangle enclosing a court-yard ( Luke 5:19 ;  2 Samuel 17:18 ;  Nehemiah 8:16 ) surrounded by galleries, which formed the guest-chamber or reception-room for visitors. The flat roof, surrounded by a low parapet, was used for many domestic and social purposes. It was reached by steps from the court. In connection with it ( 2 Kings 23:12 ) was an upper room, used as a private chamber ( 2 Samuel 18:33 ;  Dan. 6:11 ), also as a bedroom ( 2 Kings 23:12 ), a sleeping apartment for guests ( 2 Kings 4:10 ), and as a sick-chamber ( 1 Kings 17:19 ). The doors, sometimes of stone, swung on morticed pivots, and were generally fastened by wooden bolts. The houses of the more wealthy had a doorkeeper or a female porter ( John 18:16 ;  Acts 12:13 ). The windows generally opened into the courtyard, and were closed by a lattice ( Judges 5:28 ). The interior rooms were set apart for the female portion of the household. The furniture of the room ( 2 Kings 4:10 ) consisted of a couch furnished with pillows ( Amos 6:4 ;  Ezek. 13:20 ); and besides this, chairs, a table and lanterns or lamp-stands ( 2 Kings 4:10 ). 
SHUSHAN|A lily, the Susa of Greek and Roman writers, once the capital of Elam. It lay in the uplands of Susiana, on the east of the Tigris, about 150 miles to the north of the head of the Persian Gulf. It is the modern Shush, on the northwest of Shuster. Once a magnificent city, it is now an immense mass of ruins. Here Daniel saw one of his visions ( Dan. 8 ); and here also Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 1 ) began his public life. Most of the events recorded in the Book of Esther took place here. Modern explorers have brought to light numerous relics, and the ground-plan of the splendid palace of Shushan, one of the residences of the great king, together with numerous specimens of ancient art, which illustrate the statements of Scripture regarding it ( Dan. 8:2 ). The great hall of this palace ( Esther 1 ) "consisted of several magnificent groups of columns, together with a frontage of 343 feet 9 inches, and a depth of 244 feet. These groups were arranged into a central phalanx of thirty-six columns (six rows of six each), flanked on the west, north, and east by an equal number, disposed in double rows of six each, and distant from them 64 feet 2 inches." The inscriptions on the ruins represent that the palace was founded by Darius and completed by Artaxerxes.
MENAN|     me'-nan.  See  MENNA .
JAHZERAH|Returner, the son of Meshullam, and father of Adiel ( 1 Chronicles 9:12 ). 
HEMATH|A Kenite ( 1 Chronicles 2:55 ), the father of the house of Rechab. 
DEMAS|A companion and fellow-labourer of Paul during his first imprisonment at Rome ( Philemon 1:24 ;  Colossians 4:14 ). It appears, however, that the love of the world afterwards mastered him, and he deserted the apostle ( 2 Timothy 4:10 ). 
ZOHELETH|The serpent-stone, a rocky plateau near the centre of the village of Siloam, and near the fountain of En-rogel, to which the women of the village resort for water ( 1 Kings 1:5 -9). Here Adonijah (q.v.) feasted all the royal princess except Solomon and the men who took part with him in his effort to succeed to the throne. While they were assembled here Solomon was proclaimed king, through the intervention of Nathan. On hearing this, adonijah fled and took refuge in the sanctuary ( 1 Kings 1:49 -53). He was afterwards pardoned. Zoheleth projects into or slightly over-hangs the Kidron valley. It is now called ez-Zehwell or Zahweileh. 
STOREHOUSES|     stor'-houz-iz, -ez: The following chief changes in the use of this word (representing various Hebrew words) in the Revised Version (British and American) to be noted are: In  Deuteronomy 28:8 , the Revised Version (British and American) has "barns" ('acamim); in  1 Chronicles 27:25 , "treasures" ('otsroth); in  Nehemiah 12:25 , for "thresholds" has "storehouses" ('asuppim), so, for "Asuppim" in  1 Chronicles 26:15, 17  ("house of Asuppim," "toward Asuppim") has "store-house"; in  Luke 12:24 , for "storehouse" has "store-chamber" (tameion). In other passages the King James Version "storehouse" is retained ( Genesis 41:56   2 Chronicles 32:28 , mickenoth;  Psalm 33:7 , 'otsroth;  Jeremiah 50:26 , ma'abhucim).
MERODACHBALADAN|Merodach has given a son, ( Isaiah 39:1 ), "the hereditary chief of the Chaldeans, a small tribe at that time settled in the marshes at the mouth of the Euphrates, but in consequence of his conquest of Babylon afterwards, they became the dominant caste in Babylonia itself." One bearing this name sent ambassadors to Hezekiah (B.C. 721). He is also called Berodach-baladan ( 2 Kings 20:12 ;  2 Chronicles 20:31 ). (see  HEZEKIAH .) 
ZUZIM|     zu'-zim (zuzim; (ethne ischura, "strong nations." So Jerome in Quaest. Hebr.: genres fortes): A people conquered by Chedorlaomer ( Genesis 14:5 ). They dwelt in Ham, a region not otherwise known but, from the connection, inferred to be East of the Jordan. It may also be inferred that they were a race of giants. They were perhaps to be identified with the Zamzummim.
ZANOAH|Marsh.  (1.) A town in the low country or shephelah of Judah, near Zorah ( Joshua 15:34 ). It was re-occupied after the return from the Captivity ( Nehemiah 11:30 ). Zanu'ah in Wady Ismail, 10 miles west of Jerusalem, occupies probably the same site. (2.) A town in the hill country of Judah, some 10 miles to the south-west of Hebron ( Joshua 15:56 ). 
JERUSHA|Possession, or possessed; i.e., "by a husband", the wife of Uzziah, and mother of king Jotham ( 2 Kings 15:33 ). 
MINNITH|Distribution, an Ammonitish town ( Judges 11:33 ) from which wheat was exported to Tyre ( Ezek. 27:17 ). It was probably somewhere in the Mishor or table-land on the east of Jordan. There is a gentle valley running for about 4 miles east of Dhiban called Kurm Dhiban, "the vineyards of Dibon." Tristram supposes that this may be the "vineyards" mentioned in Judges (l.c.). 
MAONITES|   MAON;   ma'-on, ma'-on-its, ma-o'-nits (ma`on; Septuagint: Codex Vaticanus Maor, Maan; Codex Alexandrinus Maon):  (1) A town in the mountain of Judah named along with Carmel and Ziph ( Joshua 15:55 ). It appears again as the home of Nabal, the great flockmaster ( 1 Samuel 25:2 ). In the genealogical list of  1 Chronicles 2 , Maon stands as the "son" of Shammai and the "father" of Beth-zur (2:44, 45). This evidently means that Shammai was the founder of Maon. About a mile South of el-Karmil, the ancient Carmel, lies Tell Ma`in. This may be confidently identified with Maon, the radicals of the names being the same. It suits the requirements of the narratives in other respects, being near to Carmel, while the surrounding wilderness is still used as the wide pasture land for multitudinous flocks. In this district, the wilderness of Maon, David was hiding when his whereabouts was betrayed to Saul by the men of Ziph ( 1 Samuel 23:24 f ), and only a timely raid by the Philistines delivered him out of that monarch's hands ( 1 Samuel 23:27 ).  (2) (Madiam): Maon is named along with the Zidonians and Amalek as having at some time, not mentioned, oppressed Israel ( Judges 10:12 ). The Septuagint "Midian" has been accepted by some scholars as restoring the original text, since, otherwise, the Midianites remain unmentioned. But the Maonites are evidently identical with the Meunim of  1 Chronicles 4:41  (Revised Version), the pastoral people destroyed by Hezekiah. In  2 Chronicles 20:1  the King James Version, instead of "other beside the Ammonites" we must read "some of the Meunim," as associated with the Ammonites in the battle with Jehoshaphat. Against them also Uzziah was helped of God ( 2 Chronicles 26:7 ). They are included among the inhabitants of Mt. Seir ( 2 Chronicles 20:10, 23 ), so that an Edomite tribe is intended. It is natural to connect them with Ma`an, a place on the great pilgrimage road, and now a station on the Damascus-Hejaz Railway, to the Southeast of Petra. It undoubtedly represents an ancient stronghold.  The Maonites appear in the lists of those who returned from exile ( Ezra 2:50 , the King James Version "Mehunim," the Revised Version (British and American) "Meunim";  Nehemiah 7:52 , "Meunim"). These may possibly be the descendants of prisoners taken in the wars of Jehoshaphat and Uzziah, to whom menial tasks may have been appointed in the temple services.  W. Ewing
EKRON|Firm-rooted, the most northerly of the five towns belonging to the lords of the Philistines, about 11 miles north of Gath. It was assigned to Judah ( Joshua 13:3 ), and afterwards to Dan ( 19:43 ), but came again into the full possession of the Philistines ( 1 Samuel 5:10 ). It was the last place to which the Philistines carried the ark before they sent it back to Israel ( 1 Samuel 5:10 ;  6:1 -8). There was here a noted sanctuary of Baal-zebub ( 2 Kings 1: 2 ,  3,  6,  16). Now the small village Akir. It is mentioned on monuments in B.C. 702, when Sennacherib set free its king, imprisoned by Hezekiah in Jerusalem, according to the Assyrian record. 
SHELOMITH|     she-lo'-mith, shel'-o-mith (shelomith; in  Ezra 8:10 , shelomith):  (1) The mother of the man who was stoned for blasphemy ( Leviticus 24:11 ) (BAF, Salomeith, Lucian, Salmith).  (2) Daughter of Zerubbabel ( 1 Chronicles 3:19 ) (Codex Vaticanus Salomethei; Codex Alexandrinus Salomethi, Lucian, Salomith).  (3) One of the "sons of Izhar" ( 1 Chronicles 23:18 ) (Codex Vaticanus Salomoth; Codex Alexandrinus Saloumoth, Lucian, Salomith), called "Shelomoth" in 24:22.  (4) The name of a family whose representatives returned with Ezra ( Ezra 8:10 ) (Codex Vaticanus Saleimouth; Lucian, Salimoth). The Massoretic Text here should read, "and the sons of Bani; Shelomith, son of Josiphiah"; and in 1 Esdras 8:36, "of the sons of Banias, Salimoth, son of Josaphias."  Horace J. Wolf
IDUMAEA|The Greek form of Edom ( Isaiah 34:5 ,  6;  Ezek. 35:15 ;  36:5 ,  but in R.V. "Edom"). (see  EDOM ). 
LAMENTATIONS|Lamentations, Book of Called in the Hebrew canon 'Ekhah, meaning "How," being the formula for the commencement of a song of wailing. It is the first word of the book (see  2 Samuel 1:19 -27). The LXX. adopted the name rendered "Lamentations" (Gr. threnoi = Hebrews qinoth) now in common use, to denote the character of the book, in which the prophet mourns over the desolations brought on the city and the holy land by Chaldeans. In the Hebrew Bible it is placed among the Khethubim. (see  BIBLE .) As to its authorship, there is no room for hesitancy in following the LXX. and the Targum in ascribing it to Jeremiah. The spirit, tone, language, and subject-matter are in accord with the testimony of tradition in assigning it to him. According to tradition, he retired after the destruction of Jerusalem by Nebuchadnezzar to a cavern outside the Damascus gate, where he wrote this book. That cavern is still pointed out. "In the face of a rocky hill, on the western side of the city, the local belief has placed `the grotto of Jeremiah.' There, in that fixed attitude of grief which Michael Angelo has immortalized, the prophet may well be supposed to have mourned the fall of his country" (Stanley,  Jewish Church). The book consists of five separate poems. In chapter 1 the prophet dwells on the manifold miseries oppressed by which the city sits as a solitary widow weeping sorely. In chapter 2 these miseries are described in connection with the national sins that had caused them. Chapter 3 speaks of hope for the people of God. The chastisement would only be for their good; a better day would dawn for them. Chapter 4 laments the ruin and desolation that had come upon the city and temple, but traces it only to the people's sins. Chapter 5 is a prayer that Zion's reproach may be taken away in the repentance and recovery of the people. The first four poems (chapters) are acrostics, like some of the Psalms (25,  34,  37,  119), i.e., each verse begins with a letter of the Hebrew alphabet taken in order. The first, second, and fourth have each twenty-two verses, the number of the letters in the Hebrew alphabet. The third has sixty-six verses, in which each three successive verses begin with the same letter. The fifth is not acrostic. Speaking of the "Wailing-place (q.v.) of the Jews" at Jerusalem, a portion of the old wall of the temple of Solomon, Schaff says: "There the Jews assemble every Friday afternoon to bewail the downfall of the holy city, kissing the stone wall and watering it with their tears. They repeat from their well-worn Hebrew Bibles and prayer-books the Lamentations of Jeremiah and suitable Psalms." 
BEULAH|Married, is used in Isaiah 62:4 metaphorically as the name of Judea: "Thy land shall be married," i.e., favoured and blessed of the Lord. 
BETHGAMUL|Camel-house, a city in the "plain country" of Moab denounced by the prophet ( Jeremiah 48:23 ); probably the modern Um-el-Jemal, near Bozrah, one of the deserted cities of the Hauran. 
LINES|Were used for measuring and dividing land; and hence the word came to denote a portion or inheritance measured out; a possession ( Psalm 16:6 ). 
EHUD|Union.  (1.) A descendant of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 7:10 ), his great-grandson. (2.) The son of Gera, of the tribe of Benjamin ( Judges 3:15 ). After the death of Othniel the people again fell into idolatry, and Eglon, the king of Moab, uniting his bands with those of the Ammonites and the Amalekites, crossed the Jordan and took the city of Jericho, and for eighteen years held that whole district in subjection, exacting from it an annual tribute. At length Ehud, by a stratagem, put Eglon to death with a two-edged dagger a cubit long, and routed the Moabites at the fords of the Jordan, putting 10,000 of them to death. Thenceforward the land, at least Benjamin, enjoyed rest "for fourscore years" ( Judges 3:12 -30). (see  QUARRIES  .) But in the south-west the Philistines reduced the Israelites to great straits ( Judges 5:6 ). From this oppression Shamgar was raised up to be their deliverer.
BARJESUS|Son of Joshua, the patronymic of Elymas the sorcerer ( Acts 13:6 ), who met Paul and Barnabas at Paphos. Elymas is a word of Arabic origin meaning "wise." 
ONESIMUS|Useful, a slave who, after robbing his master Philemon (q.v.) at Colosse, fled to Rome, where he was converted by the apostle Paul, who sent him back to his master with the epistle which bears his name. In it he beseeches Philemon to receive his slave as a "faithful and beloved brother." Paul offers to pay to Philemon anything his slave had taken, and to bear the wrong he had done him. He was accompanied on his return by Tychicus, the bearer of the Epistle to the Colossians ( Philemon 1:16 ,  18). The story of this fugitive Colossian slave is a remarkable evidence of the freedom of access to the prisoner which was granted to all, and "a beautiful illustration both of the character of St. Paul and the transfiguring power and righteous principles of the gospel." 
THYATIRA|A city of Asia Minor, on the borders of Lydia and Mysia. Its modern name is Ak-hissar, i.e., "white castle." Here was one of the seven churches ( Revelation 1:11 ;  2:18 -28). Lydia, the seller of purple, or rather of cloth dyed with this colour, was from this city ( Acts 16:14 ). It was and still is famous for its dyeing. Among the ruins, inscriptions have been found relating to the guild of dyers in that city in ancient times. 
CALAH|One of the most ancient cities of Assyria. "Out of that land he [i.e., Nimrod] went forth into Assyria, and built Nineveh, Rehoboth-Ir, and Calah, and Resen" ( Genesis 10:11 ,  R.V.). Its site is now Marked probably by the Nimrud ruins on the left bank of the Tigris. These cover an area of about 1,000 acres, and are second only in size and importance to the mass of ruins opposite Mosul. This city was at one time the capital of the empire, and was the residence of Sardanapalus and his successors down to the time of Sargon, who built a new capital, the modern Khorsabad. It has been conjectured that these four cities mentioned in  Genesis 10:11  were afterwards all united into one and called Nineveh (q.v.). 
BIZTHA|     biz'-tha (Septuagint Mazan; also Bazan and Bazea): One of the seven eunuchs or chamberlains of King Ahasuerus (Xerxes). It is possible that the name is derived from the Persian besteh, "bound," hence, "eunuch" ( Esther 1:10 ).
SHOCHOH|     sho'-ko (sokhoh, Codex Vaticanus Sokchoth; Codex Alexandrinus Okcho): This in  1 Samuel 17:1  the King James Version is a variant of SOCOH (which see).
HASSENUAH|     has-e-nu'-a (haccenu'ah): A family name in the two lists of Benjamite inhabitants of Jerusalem ( 1 Chronicles 9:7 , the King James Version "Hasenuah";  Nehemiah 11:9 , "Senuah"). The name is possibly the same as HASSENAAH (which see), yet the occurrence of the singular ("son of Hassenuah") does not so well accord with the idea of a place-name.
NUTS|Were among the presents Jacob sent into Egypt for the purpose of conciliating Joseph ( Genesis 43:11 ). This was the fruit of the pistachio tree, which resembles the sumac. It is of the size of an olive. In Cant. 6:11 a different Hebrew word (`egoz), which means "walnuts," is used. 
ELIPHAZ|God his strength.  (1.) One of Job's "three friends" who visited him in his affliction ( 4:1 ). He was a "Temanite", i.e., a native of Teman, in Idumea. He first enters into debate with Job. His language is uniformly more delicate and gentle than that of the other two, although he imputes to Job special sins as the cause of his present sufferings. He states with remarkable force of language the infinite purity and majesty of God ( 4:12 -21;  15:12 -16). (2.) The son of Esau by his wife Adah, and father of several Edomitish tribes ( Genesis 36:4 ,  10,  11,  16). 
BETHBAALMEON|   BETH-BAAL-MEON  beth-ba-al-me'-on ( Joshua 13:17 ).  See  BAAL-MEON .
BERED|Hail.  (1.) A town in the south of Palestine ( Genesis 16:14 ), in the desert of Shur, near Lahai-roi. (2.) A son of Shuthelah, and grandson of Ephraim ( 1 Chronicles 7:20 ). 
ELELOHEISRAEL|   EL-ELOHE-ISRAEL  el-e-lo'-he-iz'-ra-el, el-el'-o-he-iz'-ra-el ('el 'elohe yisra'el, translated "God, the God of Israel" in the American Revised Version, margin and the King James Version margin):  Found only in  Genesis 33:20  as the name given to the altar erected at Shechem by Jacob, henceforth, known as Israel, on the parcel of ground purchased by him from the inhabitants of Shechem, his first encampment of length and importance since the return to Palestine from Paddan-aram and the eventful night at Peniel ( Genesis 32:30 ). This unusual combination of names has given occasion for much speculation and for various text emendations. Already the Septuagint sought to meet the difficulty by reading wa-yiqra' 'el 'elohe yisra'el, "and he called upon the God of Israel," instead of the wa-yiqra' lo 'el of Massoretic Text, "and he called it El" etc. Wellhausen, followed by Dillmann, Driver and others, changes "altar" to "pillar," because the Hebrew verb, hitstsibh, is used with mitstsbhah, "pillar," in  Genesis 35:14, 20 , so making this religious act a parallel to that at Bethel. But Delitzsch, New Commentary on Genesis, properly rejects this purely fanciful change, and understands the compound name as the altar's inscription. Dillmann well suggests that "altar" (or "pillar") be supplied, reading thus: "called it the altar of El, the God of Israel." The peculiar phrase is best and most readily understood in its close connection with the struggle at Peniel, recorded in  Genesis 32 . Being victorious in that struggle, Jacob received the new name "Israel"; and to his first altar in Palestine he gave that name of God which appeared in his own new name, further explaining it by the appositive phrase "Elohe-Israel." Thus, his altar was called, or dedicated to, "El, the God of Israel."  Edward Mack
MAHAZIOTH|Visions, a Kohathite Levite, chief of the twenty-third course of musicians ( 1 Chronicles 25:4 ,  30). 
FREEWOMAN|     fre'-woom-an (eleuthera): Found but 4 times in the King James Version ( Galatians 4:22, 23, 10, 31 ). In the first three passages it refers to Sarah, the freewoman and true wife of Abraham as in contrast with Hagar, the Egyptian slave girl who became his concubine ( Genesis 16:1 ). In the last passage a metaphorical application of the term is made to the Christians who are the children of promise, of freedom, of the spirit, the children of the freewoman, in contrast with the Jews who are the children of the letter, of bondage, of the bondwoman.
SHILONITE|Ahijah the prophet, whose home was in Shiloh, is so designated ( 1 Kings 11:29 ;  15:29 ). The plural form occurs ( 1 Chronicles 9:5 ), denoting the descendants of Shelah, Judah's youngest son. 
IGEAL|     i'-ge-al, i'-je-al (yigh'al, "he (i.e. God) redeems"): A remote descendant of David ( 1 Chronicles 3:22 , the Revised Version (British and American) "Igal").
BAMOTH|Heights, the forty-seventh station of the Israelites ( Numbers 21:19 , 20) in the territory of the Moabites. 
NEAH|Shaking, or settlement, or descent, a town on the east side of Zebulun, not far from Rimmon ( Joshua 19:13 ). 
ZARETAN|When the Hebrews crossed the Jordan, as soon as the feet of the priests were dipped in the water, the flow of the stream was arrested. The point of arrest was the "city of Adam beside Zaretan," probably near Succoth, at the mouth of the Jabbok, some 30 miles up the river from where the people were encamped. There the water "stood and rose upon an heap." Thus the whole space of 30 miles of the river-bed was dry, that the tribes might pass over ( Joshua 3:16 ,  17; Comp.  Psalm 104:3 ). 
REMETH|Another form of Ramah (q.v.) or Ramoth ( 1 Chronicles 6:73 ;  Joshua 19:21 ), and probably also of Jarmuth ( Joshua 21:29 ). 
CRAFTS|     I. SOURCES OF OUR KNOWLEDGE OF THE CRAFTS OF THE BIBLE  1. Written Records and Discoveries of Craftsmanship  (1) Jewish  (2) Canaanitish and Phoenician  (3) Assyrian and Babylonian  (4) Egyptian  2. Post-Biblical Writings  3. Present Methods in Bible Lands   II. CRAFTS MENTIONED IN THE BIBLE  1. Brickmaking  2. Carpentering (Wood-Working)  3. Carving (Engraving)  4. Ceramics  5. Dyeing and Cleansing  6. Embroidering (Needlework)  7. Glass-Making  8. Grinding  9. Mason Work  10. Metal-Working (Mining)  11. Oil-Making  12. Painting  13. Paper-Making  14. Perfume-Making  15. Plastering  16. Spinning and Weaving  17. Tanning  18. Tent-Making  19. Wine-Making  III. CRAFTSMEN  LITERATURE   I. Sources of Our Knowledge of the Crafts of the Bible.  1. Written Records and Discoveries of Craftsmanship:  Our knowledge of the arts and crafts of Bible times has come to us through two principal ways. First, from Biblical, Assyrian, Babylonian and Egyptian written records. Of these the Egyptian are the most illuminating. Second, from examples of ancient handicraft which have been buried and preserved through many centuries and brought to light again by modern discoveries.  (1) Jewish.  The chief written documents from which we may learn about Hebrew handicraft are the Bible records. A study of what few references there are leads us to believe that before the Israelites came in contact with the people of Canaan and Phoenicia they had not developed any considerable technical skill ( 1 Kings 5:6   1 Chronicles 14:1   2 Chronicles 2:7, 14   Ezra 3:7 ). Some of the simpler operations, such as the spinning and weaving of the common fabrics and the shaping of domestic utensils, were performed in the household ( Exodus 35:25, 26 ) but the weaving and dyeing of fine fabrics, carving, inlaying, metal-working, etc., was the work of foreigners, or was learned by the Jews after the Exodus, from the dwellers in Palestine  The Jews, however, gradually developed skill in many of these crafts. It is believed that as early as Nehemiah's time, Jewish craftsmen had organized into guilds ( Nehemiah 3:8, 31, 32 ). In post-Biblical times the Jews obtained monopolies in some of the industries, as for example, glass-making and dyeing. These trades remained the secrets of certain families for generations. It is because of this secrecy and the mystery that surrounded these trades, and is still maintained in many places, that we know so little as to how they were conducted. Until recently the principal indigo dyers in Damascus were Jews, and the Jews shared with Moslem craftsmen the right to make glass. In some of the Syrian cities Jewish craftsmen are now outnumbering other native workmen in certain trades.  Few examples of Hebrew handicraft have been discovered by the archaeologists which shed much light upon early Hebrew work. Aside from the pottery of the Israelite period, and a few seals and coins, no traces of Hebrew workmanship remain. It is even doubtful how many of the above objects are really the work of this people.  (2) Canaanitish and Phoenician.  It is generally conceded that what technical skill the Hebrews acquired resulted from their contact with the Canaanites and Phoenicians. Frequent mention of the workmanship of these peoples is made in the Bible, but their own records are silent. Ezekiel's account of the glories of Tyre ( Ezekiel 27 ) gives some idea of the reputation of that city for craftsmanship: "Thy builders have perfected thy beauty" ( Ezekiel 27:4 ); "Syria was thy merchant. Damascus was thy merchant for the multitude of thy handiworks" ( Ezekiel 27:16, 18 ). Adad-nirari III (812-783 B.C.), the Assyrian king, enumerates the tribute which he exacted from the king of Damascus.  "Variegated cloth, linen, an ivory bed, a seat of inlaid ivory, a table" were among the captured articles. These were probably Phoenician work.  Many examples of Phoenician craftsmanship have been discovered. These are characterized, from the standpoint of art, by a crudeness which distinguishes them from the more delicately and artistically wrought work of their teachers, the Babylonians and Egyptians. The credit remains, however, to the Phoenicians of introducing skilled workmanship into Palestine. The Phoenicians, too, furnished the means of intercourse between the Babylonians and Egyptians. From the very earliest times there was an interchange of commodities and ideas between the people of the Nile and those of the Tigris and Euphrates.  (3) Assyrian and Babylonian.  The Babylonians and Assyrians made few references to their own handicraft in their records, but the explorers of recent years have revealed many examples of the remarkable workmanship of the early inhabitants of Mesopotamia. In referring to a silver vase found in that country (Telloh), dating from the 4th millennium B.C., Clay (see "Literature") says "the whole is exceedingly well rendered and indicates remarkable skill, which in no respect is less striking than that of Egyptian contemporaries in this handicraft." Jewelry, weapons, votive images, various utensils, tools of many kinds, statues in the hardest stones, delicately wrought, gems, dating from the times of Abraham and earlier, lead us to ask when these people acquired their skill.  2. and 3. Egyptian and Post-Biblical Craftsmanship:  (4) Egyptian.  The written records of Egypt are doubly important, because they not only refer to the various crafts, but also illustrate the processes by drawings which can leave no doubt as to how the workmen accomplished their ends. The extensive explorations in Egypt have given to the world many priceless relics of craftsmanship, some of them dating from the very dawn of civilization. Among the ruins of early Syrian and Palestinian cities are found numerous objects witnessing to the skill of the Egyptians. These objects and the evidences of the influence of their work on the Phoenician arts show the part that the Egyptians played in moulding the ideas of the workmen who were chosen to build the temple at Jerusalem. In the following brief summary of the crafts mentioned in the Bible, it will be noticeable how well they may be illustrated by the monuments of the Nile country. To confirm the knowledge derived from the above sources, post-Biblical writings and some of the present-day customs in Bible lands are valuable. These will be mentioned in discussing the various crafts.   II. Crafts Mentioned in the Bible.  (For a more detailed treatment of the crafts see under separate articles.)  1. Brickmaking:  This industry probably originated in Babylonia, but the knowledge of the process was early carried to Egypt, where later the Hebrews, along with other captives, were driven to making the bricks of the Egyptian kings. The making of sun-dried bricks called for little skill, but the firing and glazing of bricks required trained workmen.  See  BRICK .  2. Carpentering (Wood-Working):  Wood was extensively used by ancient builders. With the exception of the Egyptian antiquities, little remains but the records to indicate this fact. Numerous references are made to the carpenter work in building the temple and subsequent repairing of this structure ( 1 Kings 5:6   2 Chronicles 2:3   2 Kings 12:11   2 Chronicles 24:12   2 Kings 22:6   Ezra 3:7 ;  Ezra 4:1 ). David's house and that of Solomon and his favorite wife were made partly of wood. In the story of the building of the tabernacle, wood-working is mentioned ( Exodus 25 ). The people of Tyre built ships of cypress, with masts of cedar wood and oars of oak ( Ezekiel 27:5, 6 ). Idols were carved from wood ( Deuteronomy 29:17   2 Kings 19:18   Isaiah 37:19 ;  Isaiah 45:20 ). The Philistines built a wooden cart to carry the ark ( 1 Samuel 6:7 ). Threshing instruments and yokes were made of wood ( 2 Samuel 24:22 ). Ezra read the law from a pulpit of wood ( Nehemiah 8:4 ). Solomon's chariots were made of wood ( Songs 3:9 ). Inlaid work, still a favorite form of decoration in Syria, was used by the Phoenicians ( Ezekiel 27:6 ). How the ancient carpenters did their work can assumed from the Egyptian monuments. Some of the operations there pictured are still performed in the same ways.  See  TOOLS ;  CARPENTER .  3. Carving (Engraving):  The terms "carving" and "engraving" are used interchangeably in translating Old Testament passages. The first mention made of engraved objects is the signet of Judah ( Genesis 38:18 ). The art of engraving on various hard objects, such as clay, bone, ivory, metals and precious stones, probably came from Mesopotamia. The Hebrews learned engraving from the Canaanites. The nature of this engraving is shown by the Assyrian cylinders and Egyptian scarabs. It is doubtful how many of the signets found in Palestine are Hebrew work, as the engraved devices are mostly Phoenician or Egyptian. From the earliest times it has been the custom in the Orient for men of affairs to carry constantly with them their signets. The seal was set in a ring, or, as was the case with Judah, and as the Arabs do today, it was worn on a cord suspended about the neck. One of the present-day sights in a Syrian city street is the engraver of signets, seated at his low bench ready to cut on one of his blank seals the buyer's name or sign.  The second form of carving is suggested by the Decalogue ( Exodus 20:4 ). The commandment explains why sculpturing remained undeveloped among the Jews, as it has to this day among the Moslems. In spite of the commandment, however, cherubim were carved on the wooden fittings of the temple interior ( 1 Kings 6:23 ).  Among the peoples with whom the Jews came in contact, stone-cutting had reached a high degree of perfection. No stone proved too hard for their tools. In Egyptian and Phoenician tombs the carving was often done on plastered surfaces.  See  CARVING .  4. Ceramics:  Both the Egyptians and Babylonians were skilled in molding and baking objects of clay. The early Babylonian records consist of burnt clay tablets. Glazed bricks formed an important decorative feature. In Egypt, idols, scarabs and amulets were often made of fired clay, glazed or unglazed. By far the most important branch of ceramic art was the making of jars for holding water or other liquids. These jars have been used throughout the East from earliest times. The Jews learned what they knew about this art from the Phoenicians.  See  POTTERY .  5. Dyeing and Cleansing:  Dyeing is one of the oldest of the crafts. The only references to the act of dyeing in the Bible are  (a) in connection with the dyed skins of animals ( Exodus 25:5 ;  Exodus 26:14 ), and  (b)  Judges 5:30 .  That it was a highly developed trade is implied in the many other references to dyed stuffs both in the Bible and in profane literature. Cleansing was done by the fuller, who was probably a dyer also.  See  COLOR ;  DYE ; FULLER.  6. Embroidering (Needlework):  Very little is known of the work of embroidering, further than that it was the working-in of color designs on cloth. In  Ezekiel 27:7  we learn that it was one of the exports of Egypt.  See  EMBROIDERY .  7. Glass-Making:  In  Deuteronomy 33:19  "hidden treasures of the sand" is interpreted by some to mean the making of glass objects from the sand. There can be no question about the Hebrews being acquainted with glass-making, as its history extends back to very early times. The Egyptians and Phoenicians made bottles, glass beads, idols, etc. These objects are among those usually found in the tombs. Glass beads of very early manufacture were found in the mound at Gezer. Some of the pigments used for painting were made of powdered colored glass. In the New Testament we read of the "sea of glass like unto crystal" ( Revelation 4:6 ).  See  GLASS . 8. Grinding:  Grinding was a domestic task and can hardly be classed as one of the crafts. When flour was needed, the housewife, or more likely the servant, rubbed the wheat or barley between two millstones (see MILLSTONE) or, with a rounded river stone, crushed the wheat on a large flat stone. It is still a common custom in Syria and Palestine for two women to work together as indicated in  Matthew 24:41  and  Luke 17:35 . Grinding of meal was a menial task, considered the employment of a concubine; hence, setting Samson to grinding at the mill was intended as a disgrace.  9. Mason Work:  The rhythmic sound of the stone cutter at his work never ceases in the prosperous oriental city. It is more common today, however, than in the earlier centuries when only high officials could afford stone houses. Frequently only the temple or shrines or tombs of a city were made of stone. As such buildings were very common, and much attention was paid to every detail of their construction, there was developed an efficient corps of masons, especially in Egypt and Syria. When the Israelites abandoned their nomadic life, among the first things that they planned were permanent places of worship. As these developed into structures more pretentious than mere piles of stones, the builders naturally resorted to the skill of the master builders of the country. A visitor to Jerusalem may still see the work of the ancient masons. The so-called Solomon's quarries under the city, the great drafted stones of the temple area, belong to an early date. The very shape of the masons' tools may be determined from the marks on the stones.  See  MASON .  10. Metal-Working (Mining):  Among the oldest objects that have been preserved are those of silver, gold and bronze. These are proof that the ancients understood the various processes of mining, smelting, refining and working of metals.  See  MINING ;  METAL WORKING .  11. Oil-Making:  The oil referred to in the Bible is olive oil. Pliny mentions many other oils which were extracted in Egypt. The oils were usually extracted by first crushing the fruit and then pressing the crushed mass. At Gezer, Tell es Cafi and other ancient ruins old oil presses have been discovered.  See  OIL .  12. Painting:  One who has visited the tombs and temples of Egypt will never forget the use which the ancient Egyptian painters made of colors. The otherwise somber effect produced by expansive plain walls was overcome by sculpturing, either in relief or intaglio, on a coating of stucco, and then coloring these engravings in reds, yellows, greens and blues. Architectural details were also painted. The capitals of columns and the columns themselves received special attention from the painter. Colors were similarly used by the Greeks and Phoenicians. In the Sidon tombs, at Palmyra and similar ruins, traces of painting are still evident.  See  PAINTING .  13. Paper-Making:  The word "paper" occurs twice, once in the Old Testament ( Isaiah 19:7  the King James Version) and once in New Testament (2Jo 1:12). In  Isaiah 19:7  the Revised Version (British and American) renders "paper reeds," "meadows." PAPYRUS (which see) occurs in  Isaiah 18:2  and the Revised Version, margin of  Exodus 2:3 . The nearest approach to our paper which the ancients possessed was that made from a species of papyrus. The process consisted in spreading out, side by side, long strips of the inner lining of the papyrus reed, then over these other strips at right angles to the first, afterward soaking with some adhesive material and finally pressing and drying. Sheets made in this way were fastened together with glue into a long scroll. The Greek for papyrus plant is "biblos," from which the English word "Bible" is derived. Parchment, leather and leaves were also used as paper. The natives of Syria and Palestine still call a sheet of paper a "leaf" (Arabic waraqet).  14. Perfume-Making:  The art of perfume-making dates back to the ancient Egyptians. In  Exodus 30:35  we have the first mention of scented anointing oils. The perfumers' (the King James Version "confectioner" or "apothecary") products were used  (a) for religious rites as offerings and to anoint the idols and  (b) for personal use on the body or clothes. Some perfumes were powders (incense); others were scented oils or fats (ointments).  See  PERFUME .  15. Plastering:  (The King James Version "Plaistering.") The trade of plastering dates back to the beginning of the history of building. There were two reasons for using plastering or stucco:  (a) to render the buildings more resisting to the weather and  (b) to make the surfaces more suitable for decoration by engraving or painting.  See  PLASTER .  16. Spinning and Weaving:  The arts of spinning and weaving were early practiced in the household ( Exodus 35:25 ). Many different fibers were spun and woven into cloth. Fabrics of wool, cotton, flax, silk, wood fiber have been preserved from Bible times. In the more progressive communities, the weaving of the fabrics was taken over by the weavers who made it their profession. In  1 Chronicles 4:21  it is stated that many of the families of the house of Asbea were workers in fine linen. The modern invasion of European manufacturers has not yet driven out the weavers who toil at looms much like those described by the ancient Egyptian drawings.  See  SPINNING ;  WEAVING .  17. Tanning:  Although it is known that tanning was practiced, the only reference to this trade mentioned in the Bible is to Simon the tanner ( Acts 9:43 ;  Acts 10:6, 32 ). Leather girdles are mentioned in  2 Kings 1:8   Matthew 3:4 . Relics taken from the tombs show that the ancients understood the various methods for preserving skins which are used in present-day practice.  See  TANNER .  18. Tent-Making:  We think of Paul as the tent-maker. The tents which he made however were probably not like those so frequently referred to in the Old Testament. Tents in Paul's time were made from Cilician cloth. Paul's work was probably the sewing together of the proper lengths of cloth and the attaching of ropes and loops. In Old Testament times the tents were made of strips of coarse goat's hair cloth or of the skins of animals.  See  TENT .  19. Wine-Making:  This article is being written within sound of festivities about the winepresses of Mt. Lebanon where men and women are gathered for the annual production of wine and molasses (Arabic, dibs). Their process is so like that of Bible times that one is transported in thought to similar festivities that must have attended the wine-making even so far back as the early Egyptian kings. That these workers understood the precautions necessary for procuring a desirable product is evidenced by early writings. The choice of proper soil for the vineyards, the adding of preservatives to keep the wine, boiling the juice to kill undesirable ferments, guarding against putting new wine into old bottles, are examples of their knowledge of wine-making.  See  WINE PRESS .   III. Craftsmen.  Craftsmen were early segregated into groups. A trade usually remained in a family. This is true to some extent in the East today. In such cities as Beirut, Damascus, or Aleppo the shops of the craftsmen of a given trade will be found grouped together. There is a silver and goldsmiths' market (Arabic suq), an iron market, a dyeing quarter, etc. Jewish craftsmen in early times sat separately in the synagogues. Some crafts were looked upon with disfavor, especially those which brought men in contact with women, as for example, the trade of goldsmith, carder, weaver, fuller or tanner. There was a fellow-feeling among craftsmen referred to by Isaiah ( Isaiah 41:6, 7 ). This same feeling is observed among Syrian workmen today. The Arab has many phrases of encouragement for a man at his work, such as, "Peace to your hands," "May God give you strength." A crowd of men pulling at a pulley rope, for example, shout or sing together as they pull.  LITERATURE.  Perrot and Chipiez, History of Art in Sardinia, Judea, etc.; History of Art in Ancient Egypt; History of Art in Phoenicia and Cyprus; Wilkinson, The Ancient Egyptians; Macalister, Bible Side-Lights from the Mound of Gezer; Standard Dict. of the Bible; Bliss, Macalister and Wunsch, Excavations in Palestine; Hilprecht, Explorations in Bible Lands during the 19th Century; Harper, The Bible and Modern Discoveries; Delitzsch, Jewish Artisan Life, etc.; Clay, Light on the Old Testament from Babel; Jewish Encyclopedia.  James A. Patch
SHIKKERON|     shik'-er-on (shikkeron; the King James Version Shicron): A place mentioned in  Joshua 15:11  as being on the northern border of Judah, between Ekron and Baalah, Jabneel being beyond, toward the sea. The site is unknown, but Rev. C. Hauser (PEFS, 1907, 289) suggests Tell es-Sellakeh, Northwest of `Akir, remarking that if this were the site the boundary would follow a natural course over the mountain to Jabneel.
LECAH|     le'-ka (lekhah): A descendant of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:21 ).
JEHIZKIAH|Jehovah strengthens, one of the chiefs of Ephraim ( 2 Chronicles 28:12 ). 
ELDAAH|     el-da'-a ('elda`ah, "God has called"?):  A son of Midian ( Genesis 25:4   1 Chronicles 1:33 ).
GOIIM|     goi'-yim (goyim): This word, rendered in the King James Version "nations," "heathen," "Gentiles," is commonly translated simply "nations" in the Revised Version (British and American). In  Genesis 14:1  where the King James Version has "Tidal, king of nations," the Revised Version (British and American) retains in the text the Hebrew "Goiim" as a proper name. Some identify with Gutium. The Hebrew word is similarly retained in  Joshua 12:23 .
DOEG|Fearful, an Edomite, the chief overseer of Saul's flocks ( 1 Samuel 21:7 ). At the command of Saul he slew the high priest Ahimelech (q.v.) at Nob, together with all the priests to the number of eighty-five persons. (Comp.  Psalm 52 ,  title.) 
MAKKEDAH|Herdsman's place, one of the royal cities of the Canaanites ( Joshua 12:16 ), near which was a cave where the five kings who had confederated against Israel sought refuge ( 10:10 -29). They were put to death by Joshua, who afterwards suspended their bodies upon five trees. It has been identified with the modern village called Sumeil, standing on a low hill about 7 miles to the north-west of Eleutheropolis (Beit Jibrin), where are ancient remains and a great cave. The Palestine Exploration surveyors have, however, identified it with el-Mughar, or "the caves," 3 miles from Jabneh and 2 1/2 southwest of Ekron, because, they say, "at this site only of all possible sites for Makkedah in the Palestine plain do caves still exist." (see  ADONI -ZEDEC.) 
MACHIR|Sold.  (1.) Manasseh's oldest son ( Joshua 17:1 ), or probably his only son (see  1 Chronicles 7:14 ,  15; Comp.  Numbers 26:29 -33;  Joshua 13:31 ). His descendants are referred to under the name of Machirites, being the offspring of Gilead ( Numbers 26:29 ). They settled in land taken from the Amorites ( Numbers 32:39 ,  40;  Deuteronomy 3:15 ) by a special enactment ( Numbers 36:1 -3;  Joshua 17:3 ,  4). He is once mentioned as the representative of the tribe of Manasseh east of Jordan ( Judges 5:14 ). (2.) A descendant of the preceding, residing at Lo-debar, where he maintained Jonathan's son Mephibosheth till he was taken under the care of David ( 2 Samuel 9:4 ), and where he afterwards gave shelter to David himself when he was a fugitive ( 17:27 ). 
THADDAEUS|Breast, the name of one of the apostles ( Mark 3:18 ), called "Lebbaeus" in  Matthew 10:3 , and in  Luke 6:16 , "Judas the brother of James;" while John ( 14:22 ), probably referring to the same person, speaks of "Judas, not Iscariot." These different names all designate the same person, viz., Jude or Judas, the author of the epistle. 
JECAMIAH|     jek-a-mi'-a: the King James Version for JEKAMIAH (which see).
THAMAH|     tha'-ma.  See  TEMAH .
JEHOIADA|Jehovah-known.  (1.) The father of Benaiah, who was one of David's chief warriors ( 2 Samuel 8:18 ;  20:23 ). (2.) The high priest at the time of Athaliah's usurpation of the throne of Judah. He married Jehosheba, or Jehoshabeath, the daughter of king Jehoram ( 2 Chronicles 22:11 ), and took an active part along with his wife in the preservation and training of Jehoash when Athaliah slew all the royal family of Judah. The plans he adopted in replacing Jehoash on the throne of his ancestors are described in  2 Kings 11:2 ;  12:2 ;  2 Chronicles 22:11 ;  23:24 . He was among the foremost of the benefactors of the kingdom, and at his death was buried in the city of David among the kings of Judah ( 2 Chronicles 24:15 ,  16). He is said to have been one hundred and thirty years old. 
SHOHAM|     sho'-ham (shoham, "onyx"; Codex Vaticanus Isoam; Codex Alexandrinus Issoam): One of the sons of Merari ( 1 Chronicles 24:27 ).
EDOM| (1.) The name of Esau (q.v.),  Genesis 25:30 , "Feed me, I pray thee, with that same red pottage [Hebrews haadom, haadom, i.e., `the red pottage, the red pottage'] ...Therefore was his name called Edom", i.e., Red. (2.) Idumea ( Isaiah 34:5 ,  6;  Ezek. 35:15 ). "The field of Edom" ( Genesis 32:3 ), "the land of Edom" ( Genesis 36:16 ), was mountainous ( Obadiah 1:8 ,  9,  19,  21). It was called the land, or "the mountain of Seir," the rough hills on the east side of the Arabah. It extended from the head of the Gulf of Akabah, the Elanitic gulf, to the foot of the Dead Sea ( 1 Kings 9:26 ), and contained, among other cities, the rock-hewn Sela (q.v.), generally known by the Greek name Petra ( 2 Kings 14:7 ). It is a wild and rugged region, traversed by fruitful valleys. Its old capital was Bozrah ( Isaiah 63:1 ). The early inhabitants of the land were Horites. They were destroyed by the Edomites ( Deuteronomy 2:12 ), between whom and the kings of Israel and Judah there was frequent war ( 2 Kings 8:20 ;  2 Chronicles 28:17 ). At the time of the Exodus they churlishly refused permission to the Israelites to pass through their land ( Numbers 20:14 -21), and ever afterwards maintained an attitude of hostility toward them. They were conquered by David ( 2 Samuel 8:14 ; Comp.  1 Kings 9:26 ), and afterwards by Amaziah ( 2 Chronicles 25:11 ,  12). But they regained again their independence, and in later years, during the decline of the Jewish kingdom ( 2 Kings 16:6 ; R.V. marg.,  "Edomites"), made war against Israel. They took part with the Chaldeans when Nebuchadnezzar captured Jerusalem, and afterwards they invaded and held possession of the south of Palestine as far as Hebron. At length, however, Edom fell under the growing Chaldean power ( Jeremiah 27:3 ,  6). There are many prophecies concerning Edom ( Isaiah 34:5 ,  6;  Jeremiah 49:7 -18;  Ezek. 25:13 ;  35:1 -15;  Joel 3:19 ;  Amos 1:11 ; Obadiah;  Malachi 1:3 ,  4) which have been remarkably fulfilled. The present desolate condition of that land is a standing testimony to the inspiration of these prophecies. After an existence as a people for above seventeen hundred years, they have utterly disappeared, and their language even is forgotten for ever. In Petra, "where kings kept their court, and where nobles assembled, there no man dwells; it is given by lot to birds, and beasts, and reptiles." The Edomites were Semites, closely related in blood and in language to the Israelites. They dispossessed the Horites of Mount Seir; though it is clear, from  Genesis 36 , that they afterwards intermarried with the conquered population. Edomite tribes settled also in the south of Judah, like the Kenizzites ( Genesis 36:11 ), to whom Caleb and Othniel belonged ( Joshua 15:17 ). The southern part of Edom was known as Teman. 
EDREI|Mighty; strength.  (1.) One of the chief towns of the kingdom of Bashan ( Joshua 12:4 ,  5). Here Og was defeated by the Israelites, and the strength of the Amorites broken ( Numbers 21:33 -35). It subsequently belonged to Manasseh, for a short time apparently, and afterwards became the abode of banditti and outlaws ( Joshua 13:31 ). It has been identified with the modern Edr'a, which stands on a rocky promontory on the south-west edge of the Lejah (the Argob of the Hebrews,  and Trachonitis of the Greeks). The ruins of Edr'a are the most extensive in the Hauran. They are 3 miles in circumference. A number of the ancient houses still remain; the walls, roofs, and doors being all of stone. The wild region of which Edrei was the capital is thus described in its modern aspect: "Elevated about 20 feet above the plain, it is a labyrinth of clefts and crevasses in the rock, formed by volcanic action; and owing to its impenetrable condition, it has become a refuge for outlaws and turbulent characters, who make it a sort of Cave of Adullam...It is, in fact, an impregnable natural fortress, about 20 miles in length and 15 in breadth" (Porter's Syria,  etc.). Beneath this wonderful city there is also a subterranean city, hollowed out probably as a refuge for the population of the upper city in times of danger. (see  BASHAN .) (2.) A town of Naphtali ( Joshua 19:37 ). 
CHRONICLES|Chronicles The words of the days, ( 1 Kings 14:19 ;  1 Chronicles 27:24 ), the daily or yearly records of the transactions of the kingdom; events recorded in the order of time. Chronicles, Books of The two books were originally one. They bore the title in the Massoretic Hebrew Dibre hayyamim, i.e., "Acts of the Days." This title was rendered by Jerome in his Latin version "Chronicon," and hence "Chronicles." In the Septuagint version the book is divided into two, and bears the title Paraleipomena, i.e., "things omitted," or "supplements", because containing many things omitted in the Books of Kings. The contents of these books are comprehended under four heads.  (1.) The first nine chapters of Book I. contain little more than a list of genealogies in the line of Israel down to the time of David.  (2.) The remainder of the first book contains a history of the reign of David.  (3.) The first nine chapters of Book II. contain the history of the reign of Solomon.  (4.) The remaining chapters of the second book contain the history of the separate kingdom of Judah to the time of the return from Babylonian Exile. The time of the composition of the Chronicles was, there is every ground to conclude, subsequent to the Babylonian Exile, probably between 450 and 435 B.C. The contents of this twofold book, both as to matter and form, correspond closely with this idea. The close of the book records the proclamation of Cyrus permitting the Jews to return to their own land, and this forms the opening passage of the Book of Ezra, which must be viewed as a continuation of the Chronicles. The peculiar form of the language, being Aramaean in its general character, harmonizes also with that of the books which were written after the Exile. The author was certainly contemporary with Zerubbabel, details of whose family history are given ( 1 Chronicles 3:19 ). The time of the composition being determined, the question of the authorship may be more easily decided. According to Jewish tradition, which was universally received down to the middle of the seventeenth century, Ezra was regarded as the author of the Chronicles. There are many points of resemblance and of contact between the Chronicles and the Book of Ezra which seem to confirm this opinion. The conclusion of the one and the beginning of the other are almost identical in expression. In their spirit and characteristics they are the same, showing thus also an identity of authorship. In their general scope and design these books are not so much historical as didactic. The principal aim of the writer appears to be to present moral and religious truth. He does not give prominence to political occurences, as is done in Samuel and Kings, but to ecclesiastical institutions. "The genealogies, so uninteresting to most modern readers, were really an important part of the public records of the Hebrew state. They were the basis on which not only the land was distributed and held, but the public services of the temple were arranged and conducted, the Levites and their descendants alone, as is well known, being entitled and first fruits set apart for that purpose." The "Chronicles" are an epitome of the sacred history from the days of Adam down to the return from Babylonian Exile, a period of about 3,500 years. The writer gathers up "the threads of the old national life broken by the Captivity." The sources whence the chronicler compiled his work were public records, registers, and genealogical tables belonging to the Jews. These are referred to in the course of the book ( 1 Chronicles 27:24 ;  29:29 ;  2 Chronicles 9:29 ;  12:15 ;  13:22 ;  20:34 ;  24:27 ;  26:22 ;  32:32 ;  33:18 ,  19;  27:7 ;  35:25 ). There are in Chronicles, and the books of Samuel and Kings, forty parallels, often verbal, proving that the writer both knew and used these records ( 1 Chronicles 17:18 ; Comp.  2 Samuel 7:18 -20;  1 Chronicles 19 ; Comp.  2 Samuel 10 ,  etc.). As compared with Samuel and Kings, the Book of Chronicles omits many particulars there recorded ( 2 Samuel 6:20 -23; 9; 11; 14-19,  etc.), and includes many things peculiar to itself ( 1 Chronicles 12 ; 22; 23-26; 27; 28; 29,  etc.). Twenty whole chapters, and twenty-four parts of chapters, are occupied with matter not found elsewhere. It also records many things in fuller detail, as (e.g.) the list of David's heroes ( 1 Chronicles 12:1 -37), the removal of the ark from Kirjath-jearim to Mount Zion ( 1 Chronicles 13 ;  15:2 -24;  16:4 -43; Comp.  2 Samuel 6 ), Uzziah's leprosy and its cause ( 2 Chronicles 26:16 -21; Comp.  2 Kings 15:5 ), etc. It has also been observed that another peculiarity of the book is that it substitutes modern and more common expressions for those that had then become unusual or obsolete. This is seen particularly in the substitution of modern names of places, such as were in use in the writer's day, for the old names; thus Gezer ( 1 Chronicles 20:4 ) is used instead of Gob ( 2 Samuel 21:18 ), etc. The Books of Chronicles are ranked among the khethubim or hagiographa. They are alluded to, though not directly quoted, in the New Testament ( Hebrews 5:4 ;  Matthew 12:42 ;  23:35 ;  Luke 1:5 ;  11:31 ,  51). Chronicles of king David ( 1 Chronicles 27:24 ) were statistical state records; one of the public sources from which the compiler of the Books of Chronicles derived information on various public matters. 
HABAKKUK|Embrace, the eighth of the twelve minor prophets. Of his personal history we have no reliable information. He was probably a member of the Levitical choir. He was contemporary with Jeremiah and Zephaniah.  Habakkuk, Prophecies of Were probably written about B.C. 650-627, or, as some think, a few years later. This book consists of three chapters, the contents of which are thus comprehensively described: "When the prophet in spirit saw the formidable power of the Chaldeans approaching and menacing his land, and saw the great evils they would cause in Judea, he bore his complaints and doubts before Jehovah, the just and the pure ( 1:2 -17). And on this occasion the future punishment of the Chaldeans was revealed to him (2). In the third chapter a presentiment of the destruction of his country, in the inspired heart of the prophet, contends with his hope that the enemy would be chastised." The third chapter is a sublime song dedicated "to the chief musician," and therefore intended apparently to be used in the worship of God. It is "unequalled in majesty and splendour of language and imagery." The passage in 2:4, "The just shall live by his faith," is quoted by the apostle in  Romans 1:17 . (Comp.  Galatians 3:12 ;  Hebrews 10:37 ,  38.)
SOCO|   H; SOCO  so'-ko (sokkhoh, "branches"), (sokho (in Chronicles only); Socho, most usual, but many forms in Septuagint and in the King James Version: Socoh, Shochoh, Shoco, Shocho):  (1) A city in the Shephelah of Judah mentioned along with Jarmuth, Adullam, Azekah, etc. ( Joshua 15:35 ); the Philistines "gathered together at Socoh, which belongeth to Judah, and encamped between Socoh and Azekah" ( 1 Samuel 17:1 ); it is mentioned as one of the districts from which Solomon drew his supplies ( 1 Kings 4:10 , the King James Version "Sochoh"); the association of Socoh in this verse with Hepher is worth noticing in connection with  1 Chronicles 4:18  ("Heber"). Soco (the King James Version "Shoco") was one of the cities fortified by Rehoboam for the defense of Judah ( 2 Chronicles 11:7 ); it was captured by the Philistines in the time of Ahaz ( 2 Chronicles 28:18 ). The site is, without doubt, Khirbet esh Shuweikeh (Shuweikeh is a diminutive of Shaukeh, "a thorn"), a rounded, elongated hilltop, showing clear traces of ancient city walls. The situation is one of considerable natural strength on the south side of the Vale of Elah just where the Wady ec Cur makes a sweep to the West and becomes the Wady es Sunt. Like so many such ancient sites, the hill has very steep slopes on 3 sides (South, West, and North), and is isolated from the ridge of higher ground to the East by a narrow neck of lower ground. In the valley to the Southwest is a plentiful spring. The site was known to Jerome in the 4th century. He described it as 8 or 9 Roman miles from Eleutheropolis (Beit Jibrin) (PEF, III, 53, 125, Sh XVII, BR, II, 21). The Sucathites ( 1 Chronicles 2:55 ) were probably inhabitants of Soco.  (2) A city of Judah in the South, associated ( Joshua 15:48 ) with Shamir and Jattir. This is doubtless Khirbet Shuweikeh, a large ruin occupying a low hill, 10 miles Southwest of Hebron; there are many caves and rock-cut cisterns as well as drafted stones. Cheyne doubtfully locates the Socoh of  1 Kings 4:10  here. See  PEF, 404, 410, Sh XXV ; B R, I, 494.  E. W. G. Masterman
HAPHARAIM|     haf-a'-ra'-im (chapharayim; the King James Version Haphraim, haf-ra'im, possibly "place of a moat"): A town in the territory of Issachar, named with Shunem and Anaharath ( Joshua 19:19 ). Eusebius, Onomasticon identifies it with "Affarea," and places it 6 miles North of Legio-Megiddo. This position corresponds with that of the modern el-Ferriyeh, an ancient site with remarkable tombs Northwest of el-Lejjun.
SOOTHSAYERS|     sooth'-sa-erz.  See  ASTROLOGY, 1 ;  DIVINATION .
PARVAIM|The name of a country from which Solomon obtained gold for the temple ( 2 Chronicles 3:6 ). Some have identified it with Ophir, but it is uncertain whether it is even the name of a place. It may simply, as some think, denote "Oriental regions." 
MARCUS|Colossians 4:10;  Philemon 1:24 ;  1 Peter 5:13 ; R.V., "Mark" (q.v.). 
JEUSH|Assembler.  (1.) The oldest of Esau's three sons by Aholibamah ( Genesis 36:5 ,  14,  18). (2.) A son of Bilhan, grandson of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 7:10 ). (3.) A Levite, one of the sons of Shimei ( 1 Chronicles 23:10 ,  11). (4.) One of the three sons of Rehoboam ( 2 Chronicles 11:19 ). (5.)  1 Chronicles 8:39 . 
SHEMED|     she'-med.  See  SHEMER, (4) .
GADDI|Fortunate, the representative of the tribe of Manasseh among the twelve "spies" sent by Moses to spy the land ( Numbers 13:11 ). 
URIEL|God is my light.  (1.) A Levite of the family of Kohath ( 1 Chronicles 6:24 ). (2.) The chief of the Kohathites at the time when the ark was brought up to Jerusalem ( 1 Chronicles 15:5 ,  11). (3.) The father of Michaiah, one of Rehoboam's wives, and mother of Abijah ( 2 Chronicles 13:2 ). 
THAMAR|     tha'-mar (Thamar): the King James Version; Greek form of "Tamar" (thus  Matthew 1:3  the Revised Version (British and American)). Mother of Perez and Zerah.
DISEASES|   DISEASE;   di-zez', di-zez'-iz (chalah, choli; nosos): Palestine, from its position and physical conditions, ought to be a healthy country. That it is not so depends on the unsanitary conditions in which the people live and the absence of any attempts to check the introduction or development of zymotic diseases. The number of marshes or pools is fairly small, and the use of active measures to destroy the larvae of mosquitos might easily diminish or abolish the malarial fevers which now prevail all over the country.  The freeing of Ismailieh and Port Said from these pests is an object-lesson in sanitation. When one examines the conditions of life in towns and villages all over the country, the evidences of the ravages of these fevers and their sequelae appear on every hand as they affect all ages from infancy to middle age, and one meets but few individuals of extreme old age. The absence of any adequate system of drainage and the pollution of the water supplies are also factors of great importance in preserving this unhealthiness.  In ancient times it was regarded as healthier than Egypt, as it well might be, hence, the diseases of Egypt are referred to as being worse than those of Palestine ( Deuteronomy 7:15 ;  Deuteronomy 28:60   Amos 4:10 ). The sanitary regulations and restrictions of the Priestly Code would doubtless have raised the standard of public health, but it is unlikely that these were ever observed over any large area. The types of disease which are referred to in the Bible are those that still prevail. Fevers of several kinds, dysentery, leprosy, intestinal worms, plague, nervous diseases such as paralysis and epilepsy, insanity, ophthalmia and skin diseases are among the commonest and will be described under their several names. Methods of treatment are described under MEDICINE; PHYSICIAN. The word "disease" or "diseases" in the King James Version is changed to "sickness" in the Revised Version (British and American) in  2 Kings 1:2 ;  2 Kings 8:8   Matthew 9:35 , and left out in  John 5:4 ; while in  Matthew 8:17  "sicknesses" is replaced by "diseases." the Revised Version (British and American) also changes "infirmity" in  Luke 7:21  to "diseases," and in  Psalm 38:7  "a loathsome disease" is changed to "burning."  Alex. Macalister  EYES, DISEASES OF THE  di-zez'-is:  Blindness, defects of sight and diseases of the eye are frequently mentioned in the Scriptures, but usually in general terms. It is probable that in the period covered by the Bible, ophthalmia was as common in Palestine and Egypt as it is now. See  BLINDNESS . The commonest of the diseases at present is the purulent conjunctivitis which is a highly infectious malady affecting people of all ages, but especially children, and whose germs are carried from eye to eye by the flies, which are allowed to walk freely over the diseased eyes. This is one of the most disgusting sights in a Palestine village, but I have been told by mothers that it is esteemed unlucky to drive off the flies. In this manner the disease is propagated. The number of persons in any Palestine village whose eyes are more or less blemished by disease is on this account phenomenally large.  Blindness incapacitated a man from serving in the priesthood ( Leviticus 21:16, 18 ); even a blemish of the eye was regarded as a disqualification ( Leviticus 21:20 ).  The cases in the New Testament of persons blind from their birth (as  John 9:1 ) were probably the results of this ophthalmia, but may have been due to congenital malformation. The interesting psychological record of the difficulty of interpreting the new visual sensations by the blind man healed by our Lord ( Mark 8:22 ) indicates that it was probably not a case of congenital blindness, as the evangelist uses the word apokatestathe ("restored"), but he had been so long blind that he had lost the power of appreciating the sense-impressions. This condition has been often discussed as a psycho-physical problem since the days of Molyneux and Locke (Essay on the Human Understanding, II, 9, 8).  The blindness of Paul was probably a temporary paralysis of the retina from the shock of a dazzling light accentuated by the intense emotion which accompanied his vision on the road to Damascus. The "scales" mentioned in  Acts 9:18  were not material, but his sight was restored as if (hosei) scales had fallen from his eyes. How far this left his eyes weak we do not know, but from his inability to recognize the high priest ( Acts 23:5 ) and from his employing an amanuensis for transcribing his epistles ( Romans 16:22 ), as well as from his writing in characters of large size (pelikos;  Galatians 6:11 ), it is probable that his vision was defective, and this it has been conjectured was the "thorn in the flesh" of  2 Corinthians 12:7 .  Senile blindness, the result either of cataract or retinal degeneration, is mentioned in the cases of Isaac ( Genesis 27:1 ), Jacob ( Genesis 48:10 ) and Eli ( 1 Samuel 4:15 ). The frequency of such senile dimness of sight made the case of Moses the more remarkable that at the age of 120 his eye was not dim ( Deuteronomy 34:7 ).  Tobit's blindness, caused by the irritation of the sparrow's dung (APC Tobit 2:10), was a traumatic conjunctivitis which left an opacity. It is not said that the whiteness was itself sufficiently large to destroy vision. There was with it probably a considerable amount of conjunctival thickening, and it is possible that the remedy might have removed this. It certainly could not remove a cicatricial white spot of the nature of an albugo. The conjecture of a recent commentator that the gall, by coloring the spot, made the eye look as if sight was restored when it really was not, seems ludicrously inept. In any case the historical accuracy of the narrative is so problematical that explanation is unnecessary.  See  BLINDNESS .  Alexander Macalister  DISEASES OF THE EYE  See  EYES, DISEASES OF THE .
DALMATIA|A mountainous country on the eastern shore of the Adriatic, a part of the Roman province of Illyricum. It still bears its ancient name. During Paul's second imprisonment at Rome, Titus left him to visit Dalmatia ( 2 Timothy 4:10 ) for some unknown purpose. Paul had himself formerly preached in that region ( Romans 15:19 ). The present Emperor of Austria bears, among his other titles, that of "King of Dalmatia." 
SHAPHER|Brightness, one of the stations where Israel encamped in the wilderness ( Numbers 33:23 ,  24). 
JOSHBEKASHAH|     josh-be-ka'-sha, josh-be-kash'-a (yoshbeqashah, "son" of Heman;  1 Chronicles 25:4, 24 ): The last 8 or 9 names in per 4 are taken by commentators to be not names but the words of a prayer. See  OTJ C2, 143, note ; Curtis, Chron, 278, 280; SBOT.
JOSHAH|     jo'-sha (yoshah, "Yahweh's gift"): A descendant of Simeon, chief in his family ( 1 Chronicles 4:34, 38 ).
ELEADAH|   ; ELADAH  el-e-a'-da, (the King James Version) ('el`adhah, "God has adorned"):  An Ephraimite ( 1 Chronicles 7:20 ).
WEN|     Only in  Leviticus 22:22 , "maimed" or "having a wen (margin "sores"), or scurvy," for (yabbal), "running," hence, "a suppurating sore" (compare the Revised Version margin). A "wen" is a non-inflamed indolent tumor, and so "wen" is about as far as possible from the meaning of the Hebrew.
LAHAD|     la'-had (lahaah): A descendant of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:2 ).
SELED|     se'-led (tseledh): A Jerahmeelite ( 1 Chronicles 2:30  twice).
BEBAI|     be'-ba-i, beb'-a-i (bebhay; Septuagint Bebai, "fatherly"):  (1) Descendants of B: returned with Ezra to Jerusalem ( Ezra 8:11  called Babi; 1 Esdras 8:37); one of these is Zechariah, the son of Bebai ( Ezra 8:11 , Zaeharias; 1 Esdras 8:37). 623 returned with Zerubbabel to Jerusalem ( Ezra 2:11 ; 1 Esdras 5:13;  Nehemiah 7:16  gives the number 628); some of these had married "strange wives" ( Ezra 10:28 ; 1 Esdras 9:29).  (2) A chief of the people who sealed the covenant with Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 10:15 ).  (3) An unknown town (Judith 15:4). Omitted in Codex Vaticanus and Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.)
JAHAZ|Trodden down (called also Jahaza,   Joshua 13:18 ; Jahazah,   21:36 ; Jahzah,   1 Chronicles 6:78 ), a town where Sihon was defeated, in the borders of Moab and in the land of the Ammonites beyond Jordan, and north of the river Arnon ( Numbers 21:23 ;  Deuteronomy 2:32 ). It was situated in the tribe of Reuben, and was assigned to the Merarite Levites ( Joshua 13:18 ;  21:36 ). Here was fought the decisive battle in which Sihon (q.v.) was completely routed, and his territory (the modern Belka) came into the possession of Israel. This town is mentioned in the denunciations of the prophets against Moab ( Isaiah 15:4 ;  Jeremiah 48:34 ). 
SCEVA|An implement, a Jew, chief of the priests at Ephesus ( Acts 19:13 -16); i.e., the head of one of the twenty-four courses of the house of Levi. He had seven sons, who "took upon them to call over them which had evil spirits the name of the Lord Jesus," in imitation of Paul. They tried their method of exorcism on a fierce demoniac, and failed. His answer to them was to this effect ( 19:15 ): "The Jesus whom you invoke is One whose authority I acknowledge; and the Paul whom you name I recognize to be a servant or messenger of God; but what sort of men are ye who have been empowered to act as you do by neither?" (Lindsay on the Acts of the Apostles.) 
CHORASHAN|Smoking furnace, one of the places where "David himself and his men were wont to haunt" ( 1 Samuel 30:30 ,  31). It is probably identical with Ashan ( Joshua 15:42 ;  19:7 ), a Simeonite city in the Negeb, i.e., the south, belonging to Judah. The word ought, according to another reading, to be "Bor-ashan." 
HUPPAH|     hup'-a (chuppah, "protection"): The priest in charge of the 13th course as prescribed under David ( 1 Chronicles 24:13 ).
COLOSSIANS|Colossians, Epistle to the: Was written by Paul at Rome during his first imprisonment there ( Acts 28:16 ,  30), probably in the spring of A.D. 57, or, as some think, 62, and soon after he had written his Epistle to the Ephesians. Like some of his other epistles (e.g.,  those to Corinth), this seems to have been written in consequence of information which had somehow been conveyed to him of the internal state of the church there ( Colossians 1:4 -8). Its object was to counteract false teaching. A large part of it is directed against certain speculatists who attempted to combine the doctrines of Oriental mysticism and asceticism with Christianity, thereby promising the disciples the enjoyment of a higher spiritual life and a deeper insight into the world of spirits. Paul argues against such teaching, showing that in Christ Jesus they had all things. He sets forth the majesty of his redemption. The mention of the "new moon" and "sabbath days" ( 2:16 ) shows also that there were here Judaizing teachers who sought to draw away the disciples from the simplicity of the gospel. Like most of Paul's epistles, this consists of two parts, a doctrinal and a practical. (1.) The doctrinal part comprises the first two chapters. His main theme is developed in chapter 2. He warns them against being drawn away from Him in whom dwelt all the fulness of the Godhead, and who was the head of all spiritual powers. Christ was the head of the body of which they were members; and if they were truly united to him, what needed they more? (2.) The practical part of the epistle (3-4) enforces various duties naturally flowing from the doctrines expounded. They are exhorted to mind things that are above ( 3:1 -4), to mortify every evil principle of their nature, and to put on the new man ( 3:5 -14). Many special duties of the Christian life are also insisted upon as the fitting evidence of the Christian character. Tychicus was the bearer of the letter, as he was also of that to the Ephesians and to Philemon, and he would tell them of the state of the apostle ( 4:7 -9). After friendly greetings (10-14), he bids them interchange this letter with that he had sent to the neighbouring church of Laodicea. He then closes this brief but striking epistle with his usual autograph salutation. There is a remarkable resemblance between this epistle and that to the Ephesians (q.v.). The genuineness of this epistle has not been called in question. 
BETHREHOB|   BETH-REHOB  beth-re'-hob (beth-rechobh; ho oikos Rhaab): An Aramean town and district which, along with Zobah and Maacah, assisted Ammon against David ( 2 Samuel 10:6, 8 , Rehob). It is probably identical with Rehob ( Numbers 13:21 ), the northern limit of the spies' journey. Laish-Da (probably Tell el-Kadi) was situated near it ( Judges 18:28 ). The site of the town is unknown. It has been conjecturally identified with Hunin, West of Banias, and, more plausibly, with Banias itself (Thomson, The Land and the Book (2), 218; Buhl, Geog., 240; Moore, ICC, Judges, 399).  C. H. Thomson
ELIMELECH|God his king, a man of the tribe of Judah, of the family of the Hezronites, and kinsman of Boaz, who dwelt in Bethlehem in the days of the judges. In consequence of a great dearth he, with his wife Naomi and his two sons, went to dwell in the land of Moab. There he and his sons died ( Ruth 1:2 , 3;  2:1 , 3;  4:3 , 9). Naomi afterwards returned to Palestine with her daughter Ruth. 
ENOCH|Initiated.  (1.) The eldest son of Cain ( Genesis 4:17 ), who built a city east of Eden in the land of Nod, and called it "after the name of his son Enoch." This is the first "city" mentioned in Scripture. (2.) The son of Jared, and father of Methuselah ( Genesis 5:21 ;  Luke 3:37 ). His father was one hundred and sixty-two years old when he was born. After the birth of Methuselah, Enoch "walked with God three hundred years" ( Genesis 5:22 -24), when he was translated without tasting death. His whole life on earth was three hundred and sixty-five years. He was the "seventh from Adam" ( Jude 1:14 ), as distinguished from the son of Cain, the third from Adam. He is spoken of in the catalogue of Old Testament worthies in the Epistle to the Hebrews ( 11:5 ). When he was translated, only Adam, so far as recorded, had as yet died a natural death, and Noah was not yet born. Mention is made of Enoch's prophesying only in  Jude 1:14 . 
NEDABIAH|Moved of Jehovah, one of the sons of Jeconiah ( 1 Chronicles 3:18 ). 
MATTHAT|Gift of God.  (1.) The son of Levi, and father of Heli ( Luke 3:24 ). (2.) Son of another Levi ( Luke 3:29 ). 
HAZAEL|Whom God beholds, an officer of Ben-hadad II., king of Syria, who ultimately came to the throne, according to the word of the Lord to Elijah ( 1 Kings 19:15 ), after he had put the king to death ( 2 Kings 8:15 ). His interview with Elisha is mentioned in  2 Kings 8 . The Assyrians soon after his accession to the throne came against him and defeated him with very great loss; and three years afterwards again invaded Syria, but on this occasion Hazael submitted to them. He then turned his arms against Israel, and ravaged "all the land of Gilead," etc. ( 2 Kings 10:33 ), which he held in a degree of subjection to him ( 13:3 -7,  22). He aimed at the subjugation also of the kingdom of Judah, when Joash obtained peace by giving him "all the gold that was found in the treasures of the house of the Lord, and in the king's house" ( 2 Kings 12:18 ;  2 Chronicles 24:24 ). He reigned about forty-six years (B.C.886-840), and was succeeded on the throne by his son Ben-hadad ( 2 Kings 13:22 -25), who on several occasions was defeated by Jehoash, the king of Israel, and compelled to restore all the land of Israel his father had taken. 
HADADRIMMON|(composed of the names of two Syrian idols), the name of a place in the valley of Megiddo. It is alluded to by the prophet Zechariah ( 12:11 ) in a proverbial expression derived from the lamentation for Josiah, who was mortally wounded near this place ( 2 Chronicles 35:22 -25). It has been identified with the modern Rummaneh, a village "at the foot of the Megiddo hills, in a notch or valley about an hour and a half south of Tell Metzellim." 
RAMOTHGILEAD|Heights of Gilead, a city of refuge on the east of Jordan; called "Ramoth in Gilead" ( Deuteronomy 4:43 ;  Joshua 20:8 ;  21:38 ). Here Ahab, who joined Jehoshaphat in an endeavour to rescue it from the hands of the king of Syria, was mortally wounded ( 1 Kings 22:1 -36). A similar attempt was afterwards made by Ahaziah and Joram, when the latter was wounded ( 2 Kings 8:28 ). In this city Jehu, the son of Jehoshaphat, was anointed by one of the sons of the prophets ( 9:1 ,  4). It has with probability been identified with Reimun, on the northern slope of the Jabbok, about 5 miles west of Jerash or Gerasa, one of the cities of Decapolis. Others identify it with Gerosh, about 25 miles north-east of es-Salt, with which also many have identified it. (see  RAMATH -MIZPEH.) 
TABBAOTH|Impressions; rings, "the children of," returned from the Captivity ( Ezra 2:43 ). 
MIZRAIM|The dual form of matzor, meaning a "mound" or "fortress," the name of a people descended from Ham ( Genesis 10:6 ,  13;  1 Chronicles 1:8 ,  11). It was the name generally given by the Hebrews to the land of Egypt (q.v.), and may denote the two Egypts, the Upper and the Lower. The modern Arabic name for Egypt is Muzr. 
BARACHIAH|     bar-a-ki'-a (Barachias; the King James Version Barachias;  Matthew 23:35 ): Father of Zachariah who was murdered between the sanctuary and the altar. It is possible that reference is made to Zechariah, the son of Jehoiada ( 2 Chronicles 24:20 ), whom Matthew by mistake calls "Z., the son of Barachiah."  Luke 11:51  omits the name of the father of Z. (compare Zahn's Kommentar, 649, note).
ELIHOENAI|     el-i-ho-e'-na-i.  See  ELIEHOENAI .
ETHAN|Firm.  (1.) "The Ezrahite," distinguished for his wisdom ( 1 Kings 4:31 ). He is named as the author of the 89th Psalm. He was of the tribe of Levi. (2.) A Levite of the family of Merari, one of the leaders of the temple music ( 1 Chronicles 6:44 ;  15:17 ,  19). He was probably the same as Jeduthun. He is supposed by some to be the same also as (1). 
SHAMMAH|Desert.  (1.) One of the "dukes" of Edom ( Genesis 36:13 ,  17). (2.) One of the sons of Jesse ( 1 Samuel 16:9 ). He is also called Shimeah ( 2 Samuel 13:3 ) and Shimma ( 1 Chronicles 2:13 ). (3.) One of David's three mighty men ( 2 Samuel 23:11 ,  12). (4.) One of David's mighties ( 2 Samuel 23:25 ); called also Shammoth ( 1 Chronicles 11:27 ) and Shamhuth ( 27:8 ). 
BANI|Built.  (1.)  1 Chronicles 6:46 .  (2.) One of David's thirty-seven warriors, a Gadite ( 2 Samuel 23:36 ).  (3.)  Ezra 2:10 ;  10:29 ,34,38.  (4.) A Levite who was prominent in the reforms on the return from Babylon ( Nehemiah 8:7 ;  9:4 , 5). His son Rehum took part in rebuilding the wall of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 3:17 ). 
BETHLEBAOTH|   BETH-LEBAOTH  beth-le-ba'-oth, beth-leb'-aoth (beth lebha'oth; Baithalbath, "house of lionesses"): A town in the territory of Simeon ( Joshua 19:6 ). In  1 Chronicles 4:31  the name is given as Beth-birei: the Revised Version (British and American) BETH-BIRI (which see).
TIZITE|     ti'-zit (ha-titsi; Codex Vaticanus ho Ieasei; Codex Alexandrinus ho Thosaei; Lucian Athosi): A gentilic attached to the name "Joha" ( 1 Chronicles 11:45 ), one of the soldiers of David; the origin is totally unknown.
NEIEL|Dwelling-place of God, a town in the territory of Asher, near its southern border ( Joshua 19:27 ). It has been identified with the ruin Y'anin, near the outlet of the Wady esh Sha-ghur, less than 2 miles north of Kabul, and 16 miles east of Caesarea. 
MEBUNNAI|Construction, building of Jehovah, one of David's bodyguard ( 2 Samuel 23:27 ; Comp.  21:18 ); called Sibbechai and Sibbecai ( 1 Chronicles 11:29 ;  27:11 ). 
ISHMAIAH|Heard by Jehovah.  (1.) A Gibeonite who joined David at Ziklag, "a hero among the thirty and over the thirty" ( 1 Chronicles 12:4 ). (2.) Son of Obadiah, and viceroy of Zebulun under David and Solomon ( 1 Chronicles 27:19 ). 
SHEBNA|Tender youth, "treasurer" over the house in the reign of Hezekiah, i.e., comptroller or governor of the palace. On account of his pride he was ejected from his office, and Eliakim was promoted to it ( Isaiah 22:15 -25). He appears to have been the leader of the party who favoured an alliance with Egypt against Assyria. It is conjectured that "Shebna the scribe," who was one of those whom the king sent to confer with the Assyrian ambassador ( 2 Kings 18:18 ,  26,  37;  19:2 ;  Isaiah 36:3 ,  11,  22;  37:2 ), was a different person. 
NATHAN|Given.  (1.) A prophet in the reigns of David and Solomon ( 2 Chronicles 9:29 ). He is first spoken of in connection with the arrangements David made for the building of the temple ( 2 Samuel 7:2 ,  3,  17), and next appears as the reprover of David on account of his sin with Bathsheba ( 12:1 -14). He was charged with the education of Solomon ( 12:25 ), at whose inauguration to the throne he took a prominent part ( 1 Kings 1:8 ,  10,  11,  22-45). His two sons, Zabad ( 1 Chronicles 2:36 ) and Azariah ( 1 Kings 4:5 ) occupied places of honour at the king's court. He last appears in assisting David in reorganizing the public worship ( 2 Chronicles 29:25 ). He seems to have written a life of David, and also a life of Solomon ( 1 Chronicles 29:29 ;  2 Chronicles 9:29 ). (2.) A son of David, by Bathsheba ( 2 Samuel 5:14 ), whose name appears in the genealogy of Mary, the mother of our Lord ( Luke 3:31 ). (3.)  Ezra 8:16 . 
NISROCH|Probably connected with the Hebrew word nesher, an eagle. An Assyrian god, supposed to be that represented with the head of an eagle. Sennacherib was killed in the temple of this idol ( 2 Kings 19:37 ;  Isaiah 37:38 ). 
GITTAHHEPHER|( Joshua 19:13 ). See GATH-HEPHER. 
MEZOBAITE|     me-zo'-ba-it (ha-metsbhayah): The designation of Jaasiel, one of David's heroes ( 1 Chronicles 11:47 ).
NAPHTALI|My wrestling, the fifth son of Jacob. His mother was Bilhah, Rachel's handmaid ( Genesis 30:8 ). When Jacob went down into Egypt, Naphtali had four sons ( Genesis 46:24 ). Little is known of him as an individual.  Naphtali, Mount The mountainous district of Naphtali ( Joshua 20:7 ).  Naphtali, Tribe of On this tribe Jacob pronounced the patriarchal blessing, "Naphtali is a hind let loose: he giveth goodly words" ( Genesis 49:21 ). It was intended thus to set forth under poetic imagery the future character and history of the tribe. At the time of the Exodus this tribe numbered 53,400 adult males ( Numbers 1:43 ), but at the close of the wanderings they numbered only 45,400 ( 26:48 -50). Along with Dan and Asher they formed "the camp of Dan," under a common standard ( 2:25 -31), occupying a place during the march on the north side of the tabernacle. The possession assigned to this tribe is set forth in  Joshua 19:32 -39. It lay in the north-eastern corner of the land, bounded on the east by the Jordan and the lakes of Merom and Galilee, and on the north it extended far into Coele-Syria, the valley between the two Lebanon ranges. It comprehended a greater variety of rich and beautiful scenery and of soil and climate than fell to the lot of any other tribe. The territory of Naphtali extended to about 800 square miles, being the double of that of Issachar. The region around Kedesh, one of its towns, was originally called Galil, a name afterwards given to the whole northern division of Canaan. A large number of foreigners settled here among the mountains, and hence it was called "Galilee of the Gentiles" (q.v.),  Matthew 4:15 , 16. The southern portion of Naphtali has been called the "Garden of Palestine." It was of unrivalled fertility. It was the principal scene of our Lord's public ministry. Here most of his parables were spoken and his miracles wrought. This tribe was the first to suffer from the invasion of Benhadad, king of Syria, in the reigns of Baasha, king of Israel, and Asa, king of Judah ( 1 Kings 15:20 ;  2 Chronicles 16:4 ). In the reign of Pekah, king of Israel, the Assyrians under Tiglath-pileser swept over the whole north of Israel, and carried the people into captivity ( 2 Kings 15:29 ). Thus the kingdom of Israel came to an end (B.C. 722). Naphtali is now almost wholly a desert, the towns of Tiberias, on the shore of the Lake of Galilee, and Safed being the only places in it of any importance. 
CARITES|     kar'-i-tez (kari), ("one ready," "life-guardsman"): A body of troops mentioned in  2 Kings 11:4, 19  (the King James Version "captains"). Instead of CHERETHITES (which see), the Kethibh of  2 Samuel 20:23  offers the reading Carites.
TEMENI|One of the sons of Ashur, the father of Tekoa ( 1 Chronicles 4:6 ). 
DAMARIS|A heifer, an Athenian woman converted to Christianity under the preaching of Paul ( Acts 17:34 ). Some have supposed that she may have been the wife of Dionysius the Areopagite. 
MEZAHAB|Water of gold, the father of Matred ( Genesis 36:39 ;  1 Chronicles 1:50 ), and grandfather of Mehetabel, wife of Hadar, the last king of Edom. 
BETHSHEMESH|House of the sun.  (1.) A sacerdotal city in the tribe of Dan ( Joshua 21:16 ;  1 Samuel 6:15 ), on the north border of Judah ( Joshua 15:10 ). It was the scene of an encounter between Jehoash, king of Israel, and Amaziah, king of Judah, in which the latter was made prisoner ( 2 Kings 14:11 ,  13). It was afterwards taken by the Philistines ( 2 Chronicles 28:18 ). It is the modern ruined Arabic village `Ain-shems, on the north-west slopes of the mountains of Judah, 14 miles west of Jerusalem. (2.) A city between Dothan and the Jordan, near the southern border of Issachar ( Joshua 19:22 ), 7 1/2 miles south of Beth-shean. It is the modern Ain-esh-Shemsiyeh. (3.) One of the fenced cities of Naphtali ( Joshua 19:38 ), between Mount Tabor and the Jordan. Now Khurbet Shema, 3 miles west of Safed. But perhaps the same as No. 2. (4.) An idol sanctuary in Egypt ( Jeremiah 43:13 ); called by the Greeks Heliopolis, and by the Egyptians On (q.v.),  Genesis 41:45 . 
SHEPHI|   , SHEPHO  she'-fi, she'-fo (shephi; Codex Vaticanus Sob, Codex Alexandrinus Sophar; Lucian, Sapphei ( 1 Chronicles 1:40 ); or Shepho, shepho; Codex Alexandrinus Soph; Lucian, Sophan ( Genesis 36:23 )): A Horite chief.
HANGINGS|     hang'-ingz:  (1) In English Versions of the Bible this word in the plural represents the Hebrew qela`im, the curtains of "fine twined linen" with which the court of the tabernacle was enclosed. These were five cubits in height, and of lengths corresponding to the sides of the enclosure and the space on either side of the entrance in front, and were suspended from hooks fastened to the pillars of the court. They are described at length in  Exodus 27:9-15 ;  Exodus 38:9-18 . See , besides,  Exodus 35:17 ;  Exodus 39:40   Numbers 3:26 ;  Numbers 4:26 .  (2) In the King James Version another word, macakh (the Revised Version (British and American) uniformly "screen"), is distinguished from the preceding only by the singular, "hanging" ( Exodus 35:17 ;  Exodus 38:18 , etc.). It is used of the screen or portiere, embroidered in colors, that closed the entrance of the court ( Exodus 27:16 ;  Exodus 35:17 ;  Exodus 38:18 ;  Exodus 39:40 ;  Exodus 40:8, 33   Numbers 3:26 ;  Numbers 4:26 ); of the screen of similar workmanship at the entrance of the tabernacle ( Exodus 26:36, 37 ;  Exodus 35:15 ;  Exodus 36:37 ;  Exodus 39:38 ;  Exodus 40:5, 28   Numbers 3:25 ;  Numbers 4:25 ); and once ( Numbers 3:31 ) of the tapestry veil, adorned with cherubim, at the entrance of the Holy of Holies (elsewhere, parokheth, "veil,"  Exodus 26:31-33 , etc., or parokheth ha-macakh, "veil of the screen,"  Exodus 35:12 , etc.). In  Numbers 3:26 , the King James Version renders macakh "curtain," and in  Exodus 35:12 ;  Exodus 39:34 ;  Exodus 40:21  (compare also  Numbers 4:5 ), "covering."  (3) In  2 Kings 23:7  we read of "hangings" (Hebrew "houses") which the women wove for the Asherah. If the text is correct we are to think perhaps of tent shrines for the image of the goddess. Lucian's reading (stolas, "robes") is preferred by some, which would have reference to the custom of bringing offerings of clothing for the images of the gods. In  1 Kings 7:29  the Revised Version (British and American), "wreaths of hanging work" refers to a kind of ornamentation on the bases of the lavers. In  Esther 1:6 , "hangings" is supplied by the translators.  Benjamin Reno Downer
SISMAI|     sis'-mi (tsitsmay; the King James Version Sisamai): A Judahite, of the descendants of the daughter of Sheshan and Jarha, his Egyptian servant ( 1 Chronicles 2:40 ). Commentators have compared the name to tstsm, a Phoenician god (compare Rudolph Kittel, Commentary at the place; BDB, under the word).
RECHAH|     re'-ka (rekhah).  See  RECAH .
TIBERIAS|A city, the modern Tubarich, on the western shore of the Sea of Tiberias. It is said to have been founded by Herod Antipas (A.D. 16), on the site of the ruins of an older city called Rakkath, and to have been thus named by him after the Emperor Tiberius. It is mentioned only three times in the history of our Lord ( John 6:1 , 23;  21:1 ). In 1837 about one-half of the inhabitants perished by an earthquake. The population of the city is now about six thousand, nearly the one-half being Jews. "We do not read that our Lord ever entered this city. The reason of this is probably to be found in the fact that it was practically a heathen city, though standing upon Jewish soil. Herod, its founder, had brought together the arts of Greece, the idolatry of Rome, and the gross lewdness of Asia. There were in it a theatre for the performance of comedies, a forum, a stadium, a palace roofed with gold in imitation of those in Italy, statues of the Roman gods, and busts of the deified emperors. He who was not sent but to the lost sheep of the house of Israel might well hold himself aloof from such scenes as these" (Manning's Those Holy Fields). After the fall of Jerusalem (A.D. 70), Tiberias became one of the chief residences of the Jews in Palestine. It was for more than three hundred years their metropolis. From about A.D. 150 the Sanhedrin settled here, and established rabbinical schools, which rose to great celebrity. Here the Jerusalem (or Palestinian) Talmud was compiled about the beginning of the fifth century. To this same rabbinical school also we are indebted for the Masora, a "body of traditions which transmitted the readings of the Hebrew text of the Old Testament, and preserved, by means of the vowel-system, the pronunciation of the Hebrew." In its original form, and in all manuscripts, the Hebrew is written without vowels; hence, when it ceased to be a spoken language, the importance of knowing what vowels to insert between the consonants. This is supplied by the Masora, and hence these vowels are called the "Masoretic vowel-points."  Tiberias, Sea of Called also the Sea of Galilee (q.v.) and of Gennesaret. In the Old Testament it is called the Sea of Chinnereth or Chinneroth. John ( 21:1 ) is the only evangelist who so designates this lake. His doing so incidentally confirms the opinion that he wrote after the other evangelists, and at a period subsequent to the taking of Jerusalem (A.D. 70). Tiberias had by this time become an important city, having been spared by the Romans, and made the capital of the province when Jerusalem was destroyed. It thus naturally gave its name to the lake. 
EMMAUS|Hot baths, a village "three-score furlongs" from jerusalem, where our Lord had an interview with two of his disciples on the day of his resurrection ( Luke 24:13 ). This has been identified with the modern el-Kubeibeh, lying over 7 miles north-west of Jerusalem. This name, el-Kubeibeh, meaning "little dome," is derived from the remains of the Crusaders' church yet to be found there. Others have identified it with the modern Khurbet Khamasa i.e., "the ruins of Khamasa", about 8 miles south-west of Jerusalem, where there are ruins also of a Crusaders' church. Its site, however has been much disputed. 
GILBOA|Boiling spring, a mountain range, now Jebel Fukua', memorable as the scene of Saul's disastrous defeat by the Philistines. Here also his three sons were slain, and he himself died by his own hand ( 1 Samuel 28:4 ;  31:1 -8;  2 Samuel 1:6 -21;  21:12 ;  1 Chronicles 10:1 ,  8). It was a low barren range of mountains bounding the valley of Esdraelon (Jezreel) on the east, between it and the Jordan valley. When the tidings of this defeat were conveyed to David, he gave utterance to those pathetic words in the "Song of the Bow" ( 2 Samuel 1:19 -27). 
ZARED|     za'-red (zaredh (in pause)).  See  ZERED .
SHEMIRAMOTH|Most high name.  (1.) A Levite in the reign of Jehoshaphat ( 2 Chronicles 17:8 ). (2.) A Levite in David's time ( 1 Chronicles 15:18 ,  20). 
JEDUTHUN|Lauder; praising, a Levite of the family of Merari, and one of the three masters of music appointed by David ( 1 Chronicles 16:41 ,  42;  25:1 -6). He is called in  2 Chronicles 35:15  "the king's seer." His descendants are mentioned as singers and players on instruments ( Nehemiah 11:17 ). He was probably the same as Ethan ( 1 Chronicles 15:17 ,  19). In the superscriptions to  Psalm 39 , 62, and 77, the words "upon Jeduthun" probably denote a musical instrument; or they may denote the style or tune invented or introduced by Jeduthun, or that the psalm was to be sung by his choir. 
NIBSHAN|Fertile; light soil, a city somewhere "in the wilderness" of Judah ( Joshua 15:62 ), probably near Engedi. 
EKRONITE|   EKRON;   ek'-ron, ek'-ron-it 'eqron, "migration," "rooting out"; Akkaron:  The most northerly of the chief cities of the Philistines. It was not subdued by Joshua (13:3) but was allotted, in the division of the land, first to Judah and then to Dan ( Joshua 15:11, 45, 46 ;  Joshua 19:43 ). It was taken by Judah ( Judges 1:18 ). The people of Ekron are prominent in the story of the ark in the land of the Philistines. It was they who proposed to have it sent back to Israel ( 1 Samuel 5:10 ;  1 Samuel 6:16, 17 ). After the defeat of the Philistines, when David killed Goliath, the Israelites pursued them to the gates of Ekron, which was evidently the nearest walled town in which the fugitives could take refuge ( 1 Samuel 17:52 ). It was the seat of the worship of the god Baalzebub, as appears in the account of the sickness and death of Ahaziah ( 2 Kings 1:2, 3, 6:16 ). It is included among other cities in the denunciations of Amos (1:8) and of Jeremiah (25:20). Zephaniah declares that it shall be rooted up (2:4), and Zechariah speaks of its consternation at the fall of Tyre (9:5, 7).  From the Assyrian records we learn that it revolted against Sennacherib and expelled Padi, the governor he had placed over it, and sent him to Hezekiah, at Jerusalem, for safe keeping. Sennacherib marched against it and Ekron called in the aid of the king of Mutsri, formerly supposed to be Egypt but now regarded by some scholars as a district of Northwestern Arabia. Sennacherib raised the siege of Ekron to defeat this army, which he did at Eltekeh, and then returned and took the city by storm and put to death the leaders of the revolt and carried their adherents into captivity. He then compelled Hezekiah to restore Padi, who was once more made governor. This affair led to the famous attack of Sennacherib on Hezekiah and Jerusalem (Rawl., Anc. Mon., II, 159). Ekron is mentioned in 1 Maccabees 10:89 as being given by Alexander Balas to Jonathan Maccabeus, and it appears in the accounts of the first Crusade.  Ekronite:  An inhabitant of Ekron, used in plural in  Joshua 13:3  and  1 Samuel 5:10 .  H. Porter
SUCCOTHBENOTH|Tents of daughters, supposed to be the name of a Babylonian deity, the goddess Zir-banit, the wife of Merodach, worshipped by the colonists in Samaria ( 2 Kings 17:30 ). 
KABZEEL|Gathering of God, a city in the extreme south of Judah, near to Idumaea ( Joshua 15:21 ), the birthplace of Benaiah, one of David's chief warriors ( 2 Samuel 23:20 ;  1 Chronicles 11:22 ). It was called also Jekabzeel ( Nehemiah 11:25 ), after the Captivity. 
QUICKSANDS|Found only in  Acts 27:17 , the rendering of the Greek Syrtis. On the north coast of Africa were two localities dangerous to sailors, called the Greater and Lesser Syrtis. The former of these is probably here meant. It lies between Tripoli and Barca, and near Cyrene. The Lesser Syrtis lay farther to the west. 
OZIAS|Son of Joram ( Matthew 1:8 ); called also Uzziah ( 2 Kings 15:32 ,  34). 
KOLAIAH|     ko-la'-ya, ko-li'-a (qolayah, "voice of Yah"):  (1) A Benjamite, son of Maaseiah ( Nehemiah 11:7 ).  (2) Father of Ahab, a false prophet and a lecherous man ( Jeremiah 29:21-23 ).
JEKUTHIEL|     je-ku'-thi-el (yeqthi'el meaning doubtful): A Judahite ( 1 Chronicles 4:18 ). The meaning may be "preservation of God" or perhaps the same as yoqthe'el, "Joktheel," the name of a place in  Joshua 15:38   2 Kings 14:7 .
THREESCORE|     thre'-skor.  See  NUMBER .
HAGRITES|     hag'-rits (haghri'im): An Arab tribe, or confederation of tribes ( 1 Chronicles 5:10, 19, 20  the King James Version "Hagarites";  1 Chronicles 27:31  the King James Version "Hagerite";  Psalm 83:6  "Hagarenes"), against which the Reubenites fought in the days of Saul. In  Genesis 25:12-18  are recorded the descendants, "generations," of Ishmael, "whom Hagar the Egyptian Sarah's handmaid, bare unto Abraham." Two, and possibly three, of these tribes, Jetur, Naphish and Kedemah (25:15), appear to be identical with the 3 tribes whom the Reubenites and the other Israelite tribes East of the Jordan conquered and dispossessed ( 1 Chronicles 5 ). The correspondence of names in Genesis and 1 Chronicles leaves little doubt that "Hagrite" is a generic term roughly synonymous with "Ishmaelite," designating the irregular and shifting line of desert tribes stretching along the East and South of Palestine. Those "East of Gilead," "Jetur, Naphish and Nodah," were overcome by Reuben: "The Hagrites were delivered into their hand, and all that were with them.. And they took away their cattle. they dwelt in their stead until the captivity" ( 1 Chronicles 5:20-22 ).  These along with other Arab tribes are mentioned in the inscriptions of Tiglath-pileser III (745-727 B.C.). Jetur gave his name to the Itureans of Roman times, who were famed soldiers dwelling in Anti-Libanus. Compare Curtis, Commentary on Chronicles; Skinner, "Genesis," ICC, in the place cited.  Edward Mack
JABNEH|Building, ( 2 Chronicles 26:6 ), identical with Jabneel ( Joshua 15:11 ). 
SHIMI|   , SHIMITES  shim'-i, shi'-mi, shim'-its.  See  SHIMEI .
JUDA| (1.) The patriarch Judah, son of Jacob ( Luke 3:33 ;  Hebrews 7:14 ). In  Luke 1:39 ;  Hebrews 7:14 ;  Revelation 5:5 ;  7:5 , the word refers to the tribe of Judah. (2.) The father of Simeon in Christ's maternal ancestry ( Luke 3:30 ). (3.) Son of Joanna, and father of Joseph in Christ's maternal ancestry (26), probably identical with Abiud ( Matthew 1:13 ), and with Obadiah ( 1 Chronicles 3:21 ). (4.) One of the Lord's "brethren" ( Mark 6:3 ). 
STEADS|   STEAD;   sted, stedz (tachath, "(same) place"; AS stede, "place"): Occurs only in  1 Chronicles 5:22 , "They dwelt in their stead (place) until the captivity."
SIBRAIM|     sib-ra'-im, sib'-ra-im (cibhrayim; Codex Vaticanus Sebram; Codex Alexandrinus Sephram): A place named as on the boundary of Palestine in Ezekiel's ideal delineation, "between the border of Damascus and the border of Hamath" ( Ezekiel 47:16 ). It may possibly be represented by the modern Khirbet Sanbariyeh on the west bank of Nahr el-Chasbany, about 3 miles Southeast of `Abil.
ELEALEH|God has ascended, a place in the pastoral country east of Jordan, in the tribe of Reuben ( Numbers 32:3 ,  37). It is not again mentioned till the time of Isaiah ( 15:4 ;  16:9 ) and Jeremiah ( 48:34 ). It is now an extensive ruin called el-A'al, about one mile north-east of Heshbon. 
JANNES|One of the Egyptians who "withstood Moses" ( 2 Timothy 3:8 ). 
POINTS|     points: The word occurs in  Ecclesiastes 5:16 , "In all points (`ummah) as he came, so shall he go"-a man leaves the world in all regards as helpless as he entered it, no matter what he may have gained or accomplished during his life.  Also in  Hebrews 4:15 , "In all points (kata panta, "in all things," as in His human nature ( Hebrews 2:14 ), so in His human experience (compare  Hebrews 2:17, 18 )) tempted like as we are, yet without sin." He successfully resisted temptation at all points of His nature, in body, soul, and spirit. See  TEMPTATION OF CHRIST . Westcott (in loc.) thinks that the reference is not so much to Christ issuing out of all His trials without the least stain of sin, as to "a limitation of His temptation. Man's temptations come in many cases from previous sin. Such temptations had necessarily no place in Christ. He was tempted as we are, sharing our nature, yet with this exception, that there was no sin in Him to become the spring of trial." Whichever interpretation is adopted there is profound insight into the things of the soul in joining sinlessness with fullness of experience of temptation.  M. O. Evans
IBHAR|Chosen, one of David's sons ( 1 Chronicles 3:6 ;  2 Samuel 5:15 ). 
MIZAR|Smallness, a summit on the eastern ridge of Lebanon, near which David lay after escaping from Absalom ( Psalm 42:6 ). It may, perhaps, be the present Jebel Ajlun, thus named, "the little", in contrast with the greater elevation of Lebanon and Hermon. 
CRISPUS|Curled, the chief of the synagogue at Corinth ( Acts 18:8 ). He was converted and, with his family, baptized by Paul ( 1 Corinthians 1:14 ). 
EBER|Beyond.  (1.). The third post-duluvian patriach after Shem ( Genesis 10:24 ;  11:14 ). He is regarded as the founder of the Hebrew race ( 10:21 ;  Numbers 24:24 ). In  Luke 3:35  he is called Heber. (2.) One of the seven heads of the families of the Gadites ( 1 Chronicles 5:13 ). (3.) The oldest of the three sons of Elpaal the Benjamite ( 8:12 ). (4.) One of the heads of the familes of Benjamites in Jerusalem (22). (5.) The head of the priestly family of Amok in the time of Zerubbabel ( Nehemiah 12:20 ). 
ELONITES|     e'-lon-its: Descendants of ELON (which see (2)  Numbers 26:26 ).
GIBLITES|     gib'-lits.  See  GEBALITES .
SIDES|     sidz (yarekhah, "thigh," "flank"): the Revised Version (British and American) substitutes "innermost parts" for the King James Version "sides" in  Jonah 1:5 ; compare  1 Samuel 24:3 .
ZACCHAEUS|Pure, a superintendant of customs; a chief tax-gather (publicanus) at Jericho ( Luke 19:1 -10). "The collection of customs at Jericho, which at this time produced and exported a considerable quantity of balsam, was undoubtedly an important post, and would account for Zacchaeus being a rich man." Being short of stature, he hastened on before the multitude who were thronging about Christ as he passed through Jericho on his way to Jerusalem, and climbed up a sycamore tree that he might be able to see him. When our Lord reached the spot he looked up to the publican among the branches, and addressing him by name, told him to make haste and come down, as he intended that day to abide at his house. This led to the remarkable interview recorded by the evangelist, and to the striking parable of the ten pounds ( Luke 19:12 -27). At Er-riha (Jericho) there is a large, venerable looking square tower, which goes by the traditional name of the House of Zacchaeus. 
SHILLEM|   , SHILLEMITES  shil'-em, shil'-em-its (shillem, ha-shillemi): Shillem is found in  Genesis 46:24 , a son of Naphtali; Shillemites, his descendants, are mentioned in  Numbers 26:49 ; SHALLUM (which see) is found in  1 Chronicles 7:13 .
ESHTON|     esh'-ton ('eshton, "uxorious"):  A name found in the genealogical table of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:12 ).
HUMTAH|     hum'-ta (chumTah): A place mentioned between Aphekah and Hebron in the mountain of Judah ( Joshua 15:54 ).
LYDIA| (1.)  Ezek. 30:5  (Hebrews Lud), a province in the west of Asia Minor, which derived its name from the fourth son of Shem ( Genesis 10:22 ). It was bounded on the east by the greater Phrygia, and on the west by Ionia and the AEgean Sea. (2.) A woman of Thyatira, a "seller of purple," who dwelt in Philippi ( Acts 16:14 ,  15). She was not a Jewess but a proselyte. The Lord opened her heart as she heard the gospel from the lips of Paul ( 16:13 ). She thus became the first in Europe who embraced Christianity. She was a person apparently of considerable wealth, for she could afford to give a home to Paul and his companions. (see  THYATIRA .) 
EUODIA|     1. Women Prominent in Church at Philippi:  The Textus Receptus of the New Testament of Stephen reads Euodia, which means "fragrant,"  Philippians 4:2 . King James Version has transformed Euodia into Euodias, which is a man's name. The mistake is rectified in the Revised Version (British and American): A Christian woman, one of the members of the church in Philippi. She and Syntyche, who is named in the same verse, were evidently persons of note, prominent in the work of the church there. At Philippi the gospel was first preached to women  Acts 16:13 , and the church was first formed among women-evidently in the house of Lydia  Acts 16:15, 40 . Paul here makes a request of Euodia and Syntyche. He requests-the word is never used of prayer from us to God-he asks, he beseeches. Euodia, and then he repeats the word, he beseeches Syntyche, to be of the same mind in the Lord. Possibly, as Lightfoot suggests, they may have been deaconesses in the Philippian church, but whatever their position in this respect may have been, differences had arisen between them on some subject, we know not what.  2. The Difference Which Arose:  But whatever the subject in dispute was, it had become so serious that, instead of the breach being healed, matters had become chronic; and news regarding this lack of forbearance between Euodia and Syntyche had been carried to Paul in his captivity in Rome.  3. Paul Entreats Them:  The state of Christian life in the church at Philippi gave Paul almost unmingled satisfaction. He regarded with joy their faith and steadfastness and liberality. There was no false teaching, no division; among them. The only thing which could cause him any uneasiness was the want of harmony between Euodia and Syntyche. He beseeches them to give up their differences, and to live at peace in the Lord. Such is the motive which he puts before them with a view to bring about their reconciliation; to live in dispute and enmity is not worthy of those who are "in the Lord," who have been redeemed by the Lord, and whose whole life should be an endeavor to please Him.  4. The True Yokefellow:  Paul proceeds to ask a certain person, unnamed, but whom he terms "true yokefellow" to assist them, that is, to assist Euodia and Syntyche; for each of them, he says, "labored with me in the gospel." It is uncertain what is meant by "true yokefellow." He may refer to Epaphroditus, who carried the epistle from Rome to Philippi. Other names have been suggested-Luke, Silas, Timothy. It has been thought by some that Paul here refers to his own wife, or to Lydia. But such a suggestion is untenable, inasmuch as we know from his own words ( 1 Corinthians 7:8 ) that he was either unmarried or a widower. And the idea that the "true yokefellow" is Lydia, is equally wrong, because the word "true" is in the Greek masculine Another suggestion is that "yokefellow" is really a proper name-Syzygus. If so, then the apostle addresses Syzygus; or if this is not so, then he speaks to the unnamed "true yokefellow"; and what he says is that he asks him to help Euodia and Syntyche, inasmuch as their work in the gospel was no new thing. Far from this, when Paul brought the gospel to Philippi at the first, these two Christian women had been his loyal and earnest helpers in spreading the knowledge of Christ.  5. The Plea for Reconciliation:  How very sad then that any difference should exist between them; how sad that it should last so long! He asks Clement also, and all the other Christians at Philippi, his fellow-laborers, whose names, though not mentioned by the apostle, are nevertheless in the book of life, to assist Euodia and Syntyche; he asks them all to aid in this work of reconciliation. Doubtless he did not plead in vain.  See  SYNTYCHE ;  YOKE-FELLOW .  John Rutherfurd
SHAVSHA|("Seraiah, "  2 Samuel 8:17 ; "Shisha, "  1 Kings 4:3 ), one of David's secretaries ( 1 Chronicles 18:16 ). 
MITHNITE|     mith'-nit (ha-mithni): Designation of Jehoshaphat, one of David's officers ( 1 Chronicles 11:43 ).
JAPHLETI|     jaf'-le-ti, jaf-le'-ti: the King James Version in  Joshua 16:3 , where Hebrew is ha-yaphleTi, "the Japhletites," the Revised Version (British and American), a clan said to border on the territory of Joseph, but not mentioned elsewhere.
CAMON|Full of stalks, a place ( Judges 10:5 ) where Jair was buried. It has usually been supposed to have been a city of Gilead, on the east of Jordan. It is probably, however, the modern Tell-el-Kaimun, on the southern slopes of Carmel, the Jokneam of Carmel ( Joshua 12:22 ;  1 Kings 4:12 ), since it is not at all unlikely that after he became judge, Jair might find it more convenient to live on the west side of Jordan; and that he was buried where he had lived. 
ETHNI|     eth'-ni ('ethni, "gift"):  An ancestor of Asaph, of the Gershom branch of the Levites ( 1 Chronicles 6:41 ).
UZZIAH|A contracted form of Azari'ah the Lord is my strength.  (1.) One of Amaziah's sons, whom the people made king of Judah in his father's stead ( 2 Kings 14:21 ;  2 Chronicles 26:1 ). His long reign of about fifty-two years was "the most prosperous excepting that of Jehosaphat since the time of Solomon." He was a vigorous and able ruler, and "his name spread abroad, even to the entering in of Egypt" ( 2 Chronicles 26:8 ,  14). In the earlier part of his reign, under the influence of Zechariah, he was faithful to Jehovah, and "did that which was right in the sight of the Lord" ( 2 Kings 15:3 ;  2 Chronicles 26:4 ,  5); but toward the close of his long life "his heart was lifted up to his destruction," and he wantonly invaded the priest's office ( 2 Chronicles 26:16 ), and entering the sanctuary proceeded to offer incense on the golden altar. Azariah the high priest saw the tendency of such a daring act on the part of the king, and with a band of eighty priests he withstood him ( 2 Chronicles 26:17 ), saying, "It appertaineth not unto thee, Uzziah, to burn incense." Uzziah was suddenly struck with leprosy while in the act of offering incense ( 26:19 -21), and he was driven from the temple and compelled to reside in "a several house" to the day of his death ( 2 Kings 15:5 ,  27;  2 Chronicles 26:3 ). He was buried in a separate grave "in the field of the burial which belonged to the kings" ( 2 Kings 15:7 ;  2 Chronicles 26:23 ). "That lonely grave in the royal necropolis would eloquently testify to coming generations that all earthly monarchy must bow before the inviolable order of the divine will, and that no interference could be tolerated with that unfolding of the purposes of God, which, in the fulness of time, would reveal the Christ, the true High Priest and King for evermore" (Dr. Green's Kingdom of Israel,  etc.). (2.) The father of Jehonathan, one of David's overseers ( 1 Chronicles 27:25 ). 
BETRAYERS|     be-tra'-ers (prodotai, "betrayers," "traitors"): Stephen charged the Jews with being betrayers of the Righteous One ( Acts 7:52 ) i.e. as having made Judas' act their own; compare  Luke 6:16 : "Judas Iscariot, who became a traitor;"  2 Timothy 3:4 , "traitors."
ESHTEMOH|     esh'-te-mo.  See  ESHTEMOA .
NEPHUSHESIM|   ; NEPHISHESIM  ne-fush'-e-sim, ne-fish'-e-sim (nephushecim, nephishecim): The former is the Kethibh (Hebrew "written") form of the name adopted in the Revised Version (British and American); the latter the Qere (Hebrew "read") form adopted in the King James Version and the Revised Version margin ( Nehemiah 7:52 ).  See  NAPHISH ;  NEPHISIM .
EBRONAH|Passage, one of the stations of the Israelites in their wanderings ( Numbers 33:34 ,  35). It was near Ezion-geber. 
MAHAVITE|     ma'-ha-vit (machawim, "villagers"): The description given to Eliel, one of David's warrior guard ( 1 Chronicles 11:46 ), perhaps to distinguish him from the Eliel in the next verse. Massoretic Text is very obscure here.
SHIMITES|   SHIMI,   shim'-i, shi'-mi, shim'-its.  See  SHIMEI .
EZRA|Help.  (1.) A priest among those that returned to Jerusalem under Zerubabel ( Nehemiah 12:1 ). (2.) The "scribe" who led the second body of exiles that returned from Babylon to Jerusalem B.C. 459, and author of the book of Scripture which bears his name. He was the son, or perhaps grandson, of Seraiah ( 2 Kings 25:18 -21), and a lineal descendant of Phinehas, the son of Aaron ( Ezra 7:1 -5). All we know of his personal history is contained in the last four chapters of his book, and in  Nehemiah 8  and 12:26. In the seventh year of the reign of Artaxerxes Longimanus (see  DARIUS ), he obtained leave to go up to Jerusalem and to take with him a company of Israelites ( Ezra 8 ). Artaxerxes manifested great interest in Ezra's undertaking, granting him "all his request," and loading him with gifts for the house of God. Ezra assembled the band of exiles, probably about 5,000 in all, who were prepared to go up with him to Jerusalem, on the banks of the Ahava, where they rested for three days, and were put into order for their march across the desert, which was completed in four months. His proceedings at Jerusalem on his arrival there are recorded in his book. He was "a ready scribe in the law of Moses," who "had prepared his heart to seek the law of the Lord and to do it, and to teach in Israel statutes and judgments." "He is," says Professor Binnie, "the first well-defined example of an order of men who have never since ceased in the church; men of sacred erudition, who devote their lives to the study of the Holy Scriptures, in order that they may be in a condition to interpret them for the instruction and edification of the church. It is significant that the earliest mention of the pulpit occurs in the history of Ezra's ministry ( Nehemiah 8:4 ). He was much more of a teacher than a priest. We learn from the account of his labours in the book of Nehemiah that he was careful to have the whole people instructed in the law of Moses; and there is no reason to reject the constant tradition of the Jews which connects his name with the collecting and editing of the Old Testament canon. The final completion of the canon may have been, and probably was, the work of a later generation; but Ezra seems to have put it much into the shape in which it is still found in the Hebrew Bible. When it is added that the complete organization of the synagogue dates from this period, it will be seen that the age was emphatically one of Biblical study" (The Psalms: their History,  etc.). For about fourteen years, i.e., till B.C. 445, we have no record of what went on in Jerusalem after Ezra had set in order the ecclesiastical and civil affairs of the nation. In that year another distinguished personage, Nehemiah, appears on the scene. After the ruined wall of the city had been built by Nehemiah, there was a great gathering of the people at Jerusalem preparatory to the dedication of the wall. On the appointed day the whole population assembled, and the law was read aloud to them by Ezra and his assistants ( Nehemiah 8:3 ). The remarkable scene is described in detail. There was a great religious awakening. For successive days they held solemn assemblies, confessing their sins and offering up solemn sacrifices. They kept also the feast of Tabernacles with great solemnity and joyous enthusiasm, and then renewed their national covenant to be the Lord's. Abuses were rectified, and arrangements for the temple service completed, and now nothing remained but the dedication of the walls of the city ( Nehemiah 12 ).  Ezra, Book of This book is the record of events occurring at the close of the Babylonian exile. It was at one time included in Nehemiah, the Jews regarding them as one volume. The two are still distinguished in the Vulgate version as I. and II. Esdras. It consists of two principal divisions: (1.) The history of the first return of exiles, in the first year of Cyrus (B.C. 536), till the completion and dedication of the new temple, in the sixth year of Darius Hystapes (B.C. 515), ch. 1-6. From the close of the sixth to the opening of the seventh chapter there is a blank in the history of about sixty years. (2.) The history of the second return under Ezra, in the seventh year of Artaxerxes Longimanus, and of the events that took place at Jerusalem after Ezra's arrival there (7-10). The book thus contains memorabilia connected with the Jews, from the decree of Cyrus (B.C. 536) to the reformation by Ezra (B.C. 456), extending over a period of about eighty years. There is no quotation from this book in the New Testament, but there never has been any doubt about its being canonical. Ezra was probably the author of this book, at least of the greater part of it (Comp.  7:27 ,  28;  8:1 ,  etc.), as he was also of the Books of Chronicles, the close of which forms the opening passage of Ezra. 
SHEMAIAH|Whom Jehovah heard.  (1.) A prophet in the reign of Rehoboam ( 1 Kings 12:22 -24). (2.)  Nehemiah 3:29 . (3.) A Simeonite ( 1 Chronicles 4:37 ). (4.) A priest ( Nehemiah 12:42 ). (5.) A Levite ( 1 Chronicles 9:16 ). (6.)  1 Chronicles 9:14 ;  Nehemiah 11:15 . (7.) A Levite in the time of David, who with 200 of his brethren took part in the bringing up of the ark from Obed-edom to Hebron ( 1 Chronicles 15:8 ). (8.) A Levite ( 1 Chronicles 24:6 ). (9.) The eldest son of Obed-edom ( 1 Chronicles 26:4 -8). (10.) A Levite ( 2 Chronicles 29:14 ). (11.) A false prophet who hindered the rebuilding of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 6:10 ). (12.) A prince of Judah who assisted at the dedication of the wall of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 12:34 -36). (13.) A false prophet who opposed Jeremiah ( Jeremiah 29:24 -32). (14.) One of the Levites whom Jehoshaphat appointed to teach the law ( 2 Chronicles 17:8 ). (15.) A Levite appointed to "distribute the oblations of the Lord" ( 2 Chronicles 31:15 ). (16.) A Levite ( 2 Chronicles 35:9 ). (17.) The father of Urijah the prophet ( Jeremiah 26:20 ). (18.) The father of a prince in the reign of Jehoiakim ( Jeremiah 36:12 ). 
PASHHUR|   , PASHUR  pash'-hur, pash'-ur (pashchur, "splitter," "cleaver"): The name of several persons difficult to individuate:  (1) A priest, son of Immer, and "chief governor in the house of the Lord" ( Jeremiah 20:1 ), who persecuted Jeremiah, putting him in "the stocks" hard by the "house of Yahweh" in the "gate of Benjamin" ( Jeremiah 20:2 ). When released, Jeremiah pronounced Divine judgment on him and the people. Future captivity and an exile's death are promised to Pashur whose name he changed from its masterful significance to a cowering one. "Terror on every side" (maghor miccabhibh) is to take the place of "stable strength" ( Jeremiah 20:3 ).  (2) Son of Melchiah, a prince of Judah, and one of the delegation sent by Zedekiah, the king, to consult Jeremiah ( Jeremiah 21:1 ). It looks like a larger and later deputation, similarly sent, to which this Pashur belongs, whose record is given in  Jeremiah 38:1-13 . Accompanying them was one, Gedaliah, who was a son of (3).  (3) Another Pashur ( Jeremiah 38:1 ), who may be the person mentioned in  1 Chronicles 9:12   Nehemiah 11:12 .  (4) A priest, of those who "sealed" Nehemiah's covenant ( Nehemiah 10:1, 3 ), who may, however, be the same as (5).  (5) The chief of a priestly family called "sons of Pashur" ( Ezra 2:38 ;  Ezra 10:22   Nehemiah 7:41 ; 1 Esdras 5:25 ("Phassurus," margin "Pashhur"); 1 Esdras 9:22 ("Phaisur," margin "Pashhur")). Doubtless it is this Pashur, some of whose sons had "strange wives" ( Ezra 10:22 ).  Henry Wallace
MOZAH|An issuing of water, a city of Benjamin ( Joshua 18:26 ). 
GITTAIM|Two wine-presses, ( 2 Samuel 4:3 ;  Nehemiah 11:33 ), a town probably in Benjamin to which the Beerothites fled. 
HERETH|   , THE FOREST OF  he'-reth (ya`-ar chareth; Septuagint polis Sareik; the King James Version Hareth): David ( 1 Samuel 22:5 ) was told by the prophet Gad to depart from Mizpah of Moab and go to the land of Judah, and he "came into the forest of Hereth." The Septuagint has "city" instead of forest; see also Josephus, Ant, VI, xii, 4. The village Kharas, on an ancient high road, 3 miles Southeast of Aid el ma, probably David's stronghold ADULLAM (which see), may possibly answer to the place (PEF, III, 305, Sh XXI). "Horesh" has been suggested as an alternative reading.  E. W. G. Masterman
SENNACHERIB|Sin (the god) sends many brothers, son of Sargon, whom he succeeded on the throne of Assyria (B.C. 705), in the 23rd year of Hezekiah. "Like the Persian Xerxes, he was weak and vainglorious, cowardly under reverse, and cruel and boastful in success." He first set himself to break up the powerful combination of princes who were in league against him. Among these was Hezekiah, who had entered into an alliance with Egypt against Assyria. He accordingly led a very powerful army of at least 200,000 men into Judea, and devastated the land on every side, taking and destroying many cities ( 2 Kings 18:13 -16; Comp.  Isaiah 22 ,  24,  29,  and  2 Chronicles 32:1 -8). His own account of this invasion, as given in the Assyrian annals, is in these words: "Because Hezekiah, king of Judah, would not submit to my yoke, I came up against him, and by force of arms and by the might of my power I took forty-six of his strong fenced cities; and of the smaller towns which were scattered about, I took and plundered a countless number. From these places I took and carried off 200,156 persons, old and young, male and female, together with horses and mules, asses and camels, oxen and sheep, a countless multitude; and Hezekiah himself I shut up in Jerusalem, his capital city, like a bird in a cage, building towers round the city to hem him in, and raising banks of earth against the gates, so as to prevent escape...Then upon Hezekiah there fell the fear of the power of my arms, and he sent out to me the chiefs and the elders of Jerusalem with 30 talents of gold and 800 talents of silver, and divers treasures, a rich and immense booty...All these things were brought to me at Nineveh, the seat of my government." (Comp.  Isaiah 22:1 -13 for description of the feelings of the inhabitants of Jerusalem at such a crisis.) Hezekiah was not disposed to become an Assyrian feudatory. He accordingly at once sought help from Egypt ( 2 Kings 18:20 -24). Sennacherib, hearing of this, marched a second time into Palestine ( 2 Kings 18:17 ,  37; 19;  2 Chronicles 32:9 -23;  Isaiah 36:2 -22. Isaiah 37:25 should be rendered "dried up all the Nile-arms of Matsor, " i.e.,  of Egypt,  so called from the "Matsor" or great fortification across the isthmus of Suez,  which protected it from invasions from the east). Sennacherib sent envoys to try to persuade Hezekiah to surrender, but in vain. (see  TIRHAKAH .) He next sent a threatening letter ( 2 Kings 19:10 -14), which Hezekiah carried into the temple and spread before the Lord. Isaiah again brought an encouraging message to the pious king ( 2 Kings 19:20 -34). "In that night" the angel of the Lord went forth and smote the camp of the Assyrians. In the morning, "behold, they were all dead corpses." The Assyrian army was annihilated. This great disaster is not, as was to be expected, taken notice of in the Assyrian annals. Though Sennacherib survived this disaster some twenty years, he never again renewed his attempt against Jerusalem. He was murdered by two of his own sons (Adrammelech and Sharezer), and was succeeded by another son, Esarhaddon (B.C. 681), after a reign of twenty-four years. 
PHILISTINES|( Genesis 10:14 ,  R.V.; but in A.V.,  "Philistim"), a tribe allied to the Phoenicians. They were a branch of the primitive race which spread over the whole district of the Lebanon and the valley of the Jordan, and Crete and other Mediterranean islands. Some suppose them to have been a branch of the Rephaim ( 2 Samuel 21:16 -22). In the time of Abraham they inhabited the south-west of Judea, Abimelech of Gerar being their king ( Genesis 21:32 ,  34;  26:1 ). They are, however, not noticed among the Canaanitish tribes mentioned in the Pentateuch. They are spoken of by Amos ( 9:7 ) and Jeremiah ( 47:4 ) as from Caphtor, i.e., probably Crete, or, as some think, the Delta of Egypt. In the whole record from Exodus to Samuel they are represented as inhabiting the tract of country which lay between Judea and Egypt ( Exodus 13:17 ;  15:14 ,  15;  Joshua 13:3 ;  1 Samuel 4 ). This powerful tribe made frequent incursions against the Hebrews. There was almost perpetual war between them. They sometimes held the tribes, especially the southern tribes, in degrading servitude ( Judges 15:11 ;  1 Samuel 13:19 -22); at other times they were defeated with great slaughter ( 1 Samuel 14:1 -47; 17). These hostilities did not cease till the time of Hezekiah ( 2 Kings 18:8 ), when they were entirely subdued. They still, however, occupied their territory, and always showed their old hatred to Israel ( Ezek. 25:15 -17). They were finally conquered by the Romans. The Philistines are called Pulsata or Pulista on the Egyptian monuments; the land of the Philistines (Philistia) being termed Palastu and Pilista in the Assyrian inscriptions. They occupied the five cities of Gaza, Ashkelon, Ashdod, Ekron, and Gath, in the south-western corner of Canaan, which belonged to Egypt up to the closing days of the Nineteenth Dynasty. The occupation took place during the reign of Rameses III. of the Twentieth Dynasty. The Philistines had formed part of the great naval confederacy which attacked Egypt, but were eventually repulsed by that Pharaoh, who, however, could not dislodge them from their settlements in Palestine. As they did not enter Palestine till the time of the Exodus, the use of the name Philistines in  Genesis 26:1  must be proleptic. Indeed the country was properly Gerar, as in ch. 20. They are called Allophyli, "foreigners," in the Septuagint, and in the Books of Samuel they are spoken of as uncircumcised. It would therefore appear that they were not of the Semitic race, though after their establishment in Canaan they adopted the Semitic language of the country. We learn from the Old Testament that they came from Caphtor, usually supposed to be Crete. From Philistia the name of the land of the Philistines came to be extended to the whole of "Palestine." Many scholars identify the Philistines with the Pelethites of  2 Samuel 8:18 . 
IZRI|     iz'-ri (yitsri, "creator," "former"): A man of the "sons of Jeduthun," leader of the fourth band of musicians, who served in the sanctuary ( 1 Chronicles 25:11 ). Identical with Zeri (25:3).
BOCHIM|Weepers, a place where the angel of the Lord reproved the Israelites for entering into a league with the people of the land. This caused them bitterly to weep, and hence the name of the place ( Judges 2:1 ,  5). It lay probably at the head of one of the valleys between Gilgal and Shiloh. 
MEAH|An hundred, a tower in Jersalem on the east wall ( Nehemiah 3:1 ) in the time of Nehemiah. 
HAGGERI|     hag'-e-ri.  See  HAGRI .
TEMANITE|A man of Teman, the designation of Eliphaz, one of Job's three friends ( Job 2:11 ;  22:1 ). 
MOREH|An archer, teacher; fruitful.  (1.) A Canaanite probably who inhabited the district south of Shechem, between Mounts Ebal and Gerizim, and gave his name to the "plain" there ( Genesis 12:6 ). Here at this "plain," or rather (R.V.) "oak," of Moreh, Abraham built his first altar in the land of Palestine; and here the Lord appeared unto him. He afterwards left this plain and moved southward, and pitched his tent between Bethel on the west and Hai on the east ( Genesis 12:7 ,  8).  Moreh, the Hill of Probably identical with "little Hermon," the modern Jebel ed-Duhy, or perhaps one of the lower spurs of this mountain. It is a gray ridge parallel to Gilboa on the north; and between the two lay the battle-field, the plain of Jezreel (q.v.), where Gideon overthrew the Midianites ( Judges 7:1 -12). 
HERESH|     he'-resh (cheresh; the Septuagint's Codex Vaticanus, Rharaiel; Codex Alexandrinus, Hares): A Levite ( 1 Chronicles 9:15 ).
BATHRABBIM|Daughter of many, the name of one of the gates of the city of Heshbon, near which were pools (Cant.7:4). 
ELEASAH|     el-e-a'-sa (in Hebrew identical with ELASAH, which see):  (1) A descendant of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:39, 40 ).  (2) A Benjamite, a descendant of Saul ( 1 Chronicles 8:37 ;  1 Chronicles 9:43 ).
SYENE|Opening ( Ezek. 29:10 ;  30:6 ), a town of Egypt, on the borders of Ethiopia, now called Assouan, on the right bank of the Nile, notable for its quarries of beautiful red granite called "syenite." It was the frontier town of Egypt in the south, as Migdol was in the north-east. 
SITNAH|Strife, the second of the two wells dug by Isaac, whose servants here contended with the Philistines ( Genesis 26:21 ). It has been identified with the modern Shutneh, in the valley of Gerar, to the west of Rehoboth, about 20 miles south of Beersheba. 
SARUCH|     sa'-ruk (Sarouch, Serouch): the King James Version; Greek form of Serug (thus,  Luke 3:35  the Revised Version (British and American)).
HAGAB|     ha'-gab (chaghabh, "locust"): Ancestor of some of the Nethinim who returned from the Babylonian captivity with Zerubbabel and Nehemiah. The name occurs second after Hagabah in  Ezra 2:46 , but is omitted entirely from the parallel list of  Nehemiah 7:48 .
SIRAH|Retiring, a well from which Joab's messenger brought back Abner ( 2 Samuel 3:26 ). It is now called `Ain Sarah, and is situated about a mile from Hebron, on the road to the north. 
ERI|   ; ERITES  e'-ri, e'-rits (`eri, "watcher"):  The fifth of the seven sons of Gad ( Genesis 46:16   Numbers 26:16 ).  Patronymic, Erites (same place), a clan of Gad.
SETH|Appointed; a substitute, the third son of Adam and Eve ( Genesis 4:25 ;  5:3 ). His mother gave him this name, "for God," said she, "hath appointed me [i.e., compensated me with] another seed instead of Abel, whom Cain slew." 
TABERING|Playing on a small drum or tabret. In  Nahum 2:7 , where alone it occurs, it means beating on the breast, as players beat on the tabret. 
NIBHAZ|Barker, the name of an idol, supposed to be an evil demon of the Zabians. It was set up in Samaria by the Avites ( 2 Kings 17:31 ), probably in the form of a dog. 
GIDEON|Called also Jerubbaal ( Judges 6:29 ,  32), was the first of the judges whose history is circumstantially narrated ( Judges 6 -8). His calling is the commencement of the second period in the history of the judges. After the victory gained by Deborah and Barak over Jabin, Israel once more sank into idolatry, and the Midianites (q.v.) and Amalekites, with other "children of the east," crossed the Jordan each year for seven successive years for the purpose of plundering and desolating the land. Gideon received a direct call from God to undertake the task of delivering the land from these warlike invaders. He was of the family of Abiezer ( Joshua 17:2 ;  1 Chronicles 7:18 ), and of the little township of Ophrah ( Judges 6:11 ). First, with ten of his servants, he overthrew the altars of Baal and cut down the asherah which was upon it, and then blew the trumpet of alarm, and the people flocked to his standard on the crest of Mount Gilboa to the number of twenty-two thousand men. These were, however, reduced to only three hundred. These, strangely armed with torches and pitchers and trumpets, rushed in from three different points on the camp of Midian at midnight, in the valley to the north of Moreh, with the terrible war-cry, "For the Lord and for Gideon" ( Judges 7:18 ,  R.V.). Terror-stricken, the Midianites were put into dire confusion, and in the darkness slew one another, so that only fifteen thousand out of the great army of one hundred and twenty thousand escaped alive. The memory of this great deliverance impressed itself deeply on the mind of the nation ( 1 Samuel 12:11 ;  Psalm 83:11 ;  Isaiah 9:4 ;  10:26 ;  Hebrews 11:32 ). The land had now rest for forty years. Gideon died in a good old age, and was buried in the sepulchre of his fathers. Soon after his death a change came over the people. They again forgot Jehovah, and turned to the worship of Baalim, "neither shewed they kindness to the house of Jerubbaal" ( Judges 8:35 ). Gideon left behind him seventy sons, a feeble, sadly degenerated race, with one exception, that of Abimelech, who seems to have had much of the courage and energy of his father, yet of restless and unscrupulous ambition. He gathered around him a band who slaughtered all Gideon's sons, except Jotham, upon one stone. (see  OPHRAH .) 
JUCAL|     joo'-kal.  See  JEHUCAL .
SIBBECHAI|   SIBBECAI,   sib'-e-ki, sib-e-ka'-i (cibbekhay): One of the valiant men in David's army ( 2 Samuel 21:18   1 Chronicles 11:29 ;  1 Chronicles 20:4 ;  1 Chronicles 27:11 ).
JAPHLET|     jaf'-let (yaphleT, "he escapes"(?)): In  1 Chronicles 7:32, 33 , a "son" of Heber, an Asherite.
DECENTLY|     de'-sent-li (euschemonos): Only once is this word found in our English Bible ( 1 Corinthians 14:40 ). It is in the last verse of that remarkable chapter on the proper use of spiritual gifts in the church and the proper conduct of public worship. It does not refer here to absence of impurity or obscenity. It rather refers to good order in the conduct of public worship. All things that are done and said in public worship are to be in harmony with that becoming and reverent spirit and tone that befit the true worshippers of God.
GINNETHON|   GINNETHOI;   gin-e-tho'-i, gin'-e-thon (the King James Version Ginnetho), (ginnethoy, and ginnethon): The head of a priestly family. Ginnethoi (Ginnetho) is found in  Nehemiah 12:4 , and Ginnethon in 10:6; 12:16.
JUDAEA|     joo-de'-a, ju-de'-a (Ioudaia): The "land of the Jews," the Greco-Roman equivalent of Judah. As most of the Israelites returning from the captivity belonged to the tribe of Judah, they came to be called Jews and their land Judea. In Tobit 1:18 the name is applied to the old kingdom of Judah. For a general description of the physical geography and early history of this region see JUDAH. The limits of this district varied greatly, extending as the Jewish population increased, but in many periods with very indefinite boundaries.  Under the Persian empire, Judea (or Judah) was a district administered by a governor who, like Zerubbabel ( Haggai 1:14 ;  Haggai 2:2 ), was probably usually a Jew. Even as late as Judas Maccabeus, Hebron and its surroundings-the very heart of old Judah was under the domination of the Edomites, whom, however, Judas conquered (1 Maccabees 5:65); in the time of his brother Jonathan (145 B.C.), three tetrarchies of Samaria, Aphaerema, Lydda and Ramathaim, were added to Judea (1 Maccabees 10:30, 38; 11:34); in some passages it is referred to at this time as the "land of Judah" (Iouda) (1 Maccabees 10:30, 33, 37). The land was then roughly limited by what may be called the "natural boundaries of Judah" (see JUDAH).  Strabo (xvi.11, 21) extends the name Judea to include practically all Palestine; as does Luke (4:44 m; 23:05;  Acts 2:9 ;  Acts 10:37 , etc.). In several New Testament references ( Matthew 4:25   Mark 1:5 ;  Mark 3:7   Luke 5:17   John 3:22   Acts 1:8 ), Judea is contrasted with its capital Jerusalem. The country bordering on the shores of the Dead Sea for some miles inland was known as the Wilderness of Judea (see JUDAH; JESHIMON) ( Matthew 3:1 ), or "the wilderness" ( Mark 1:4   Luke 3:2 ); here John the Baptist appeared as a preacher. According to  Matthew 19:1  (but compare  Mark 10:1 , where the Revised Version (British and American) has "Judaea and beyond Jordan"), some cities beyond Jordan belonged to Judea. That this was an actual fact we know from Ptolemy (v.16, 9) and Josephus (Ant., XII, iv, 11).  According to Josephus (BJ, III, iii, 5), Judea extended from Anuath-Borkaeos (i.e. Khan Berkit near Khan es Saweh, close to the most northerly frontier of Judah as described in JUDAH (which see)) to the village Jordan, possibly Tell `Arad, near Arabia in the South. Its breadth was from Joppa in the West to Jordan in the East. The seacoast also as far north as Ptolemais (`Akka), except Jamnia, Joppa and (according to the Talm) Caesarea, belonged to this province.  After the death of Herod the Great, Archelaus received Judea, Samaria and Idumea as his ethnarchy, but on his deposition Judea was absorbed into the Roman province of Syria, the procurator of which lived at Caesarea.  Of later history it is only necessary to notice that in the 5th century Judea became part of the land known as Palaestina Prima; that at the time of the Latin kingdom of Jerusalem (12th century) all the hill country of Judah from Sinjil to Tekoa was the royal domain, while the southern section to Beersheba belonged to the Seigneur de Abraham (i.e. of Hebron); and lastly that a district, the rough equivalent of the kingdom of Judah, though larger, and of the Judea described by Josephus (BJ, III, iii, 5), though slightly smaller, forms today the Mutaserraflic of el Kuds, an administrative area where more than in any spot in the world the problem of the "land of the Jews" is today increasingly acute.  E. W. G. Masterman  JUDAEA, WILDERNESS OF  ( Matthew 3:1 ).  See  JUDAEA .
DEUEL|     du'-el, de-u'-el de`u'el, ("knowledge of God"): A Gadite, the father of Eliasaph, the representative of the tribe of Gad in the census-taking ( Numbers 1:14 ), in making the offering of the tribe at the dedication of the altar ( Numbers 7:42, 47 ), and as leader of the host of the tribe of the children of Gad in the wilderness ( Numbers 10:20 ). Called Reuel in  Numbers 2:14 , daleth (d) being confused with resh (r).
NAZARETH|Separated, generally supposed to be the Greek form of the Hebrew netser, a "shoot" or "sprout." Some, however, think that the name of the city must be connected with the name of the hill behind it, from which one of the finest prospects in Palestine is obtained, and accordingly they derive it from the Hebrew notserah, i.e., one guarding or watching, thus designating the hill which overlooks and thus guards an extensive region. This city is not mentioned in the Old Testament. It was the home of Joseph and Mary ( Luke 2:39 ), and here the angel announced to the Virgin the birth of the Messiah ( 1:26 -28). Here Jesus grew up from his infancy to manhood ( 4:16 ); and here he began his public ministry in the synagogue ( Matthew 13:54 ), at which the people were so offended that they sought to cast him down from the precipice whereon their city was built ( Luke 4:29 ). Twice they expelled him from their borders ( 4:16 -29;  Matthew 13:54 -58); and he finally retired from the city, where he did not many mighty works because of their unbelief ( Matthew 13:58 ), and took up his residence in Capernaum. Nazareth is situated among the southern ridges of Lebanon, on the steep slope of a hill, about 14 miles from the Sea of Galilee and about 6 west from Mount Tabor. It is identified with the modern village en-Nazirah, of six or ten thousand inhabitants. It lies "as in a hollow cup" lower down upon the hill than the ancient city. The main road for traffic between Egypt and the interior of Asia passed by Nazareth near the foot of Tabor, and thence northward to Damascus. It is supposed from the words of Nathanael in  John 1:46  that the city of Nazareth was held in great disrepute, either because, it is said, the people of Galilee were a rude and less cultivated class, and were largely influenced by the Gentiles who mingled with them, or because of their lower type of moral and religious character. But there seems to be no sufficient reason for these suppositions. The Jews believed that, according to  Micah 5:2 , the birth of the Messiah would take place at Bethlehem, and nowhere else. Nathanael held the same opinion as his countrymen, and believed that the great "good" which they were all expecting could not come from Nazareth. This is probably what Nathanael meant. Moreover, there does not seem to be any evidence that the inhabitants of Galilee were in any respect inferior, or that a Galilean was held in contempt, in the time of our Lord. (See Dr. Merrill's Galilee in the Time of Christ.) The population of this city (now about 10, n000) in the time of Christ probably amounted to 15,000 or 20,000 souls. "The so-called `Holy House' is a cave under the Latin church, which appears to have been originally a tank. The `brow of the hill', site of the attempted precipitation, is probably the northern cliff: the traditional site has been shown since the middle ages at some distance to the south. None of the traditional sites are traceable very early, and they have no authority. The name Nazareth perhaps means `a watch tower' (now en-Nasrah), but is connected in the New Testament with Netzer, 'a branch' ( Isaiah 4:2 ;  Jeremiah 23:5 ;  Zechariah 3:8 ;  6:12 ;  Matthew 2:23 ), Nazarene being quite a different word from Nazarite." 
VASHTI|Beautiful, the queen of Ahasuerus, who was deposed from her royal dignity because she refused to obey the king when he desired her to appear in the banqueting hall of Shushan the palace ( Esther 1:10 -12). (See Esther.) 
MICHTAM|Writing; i.e., a poem or song found in the titles of  Psalm 16 ; 56-60. Some translate the word "golden", i.e., precious. It is rendered in the LXX. by a word meaning "tablet inscription" or a "stelograph." The root of the word means to stamp or grave, and hence it is regarded as denoting a composition so precious as to be worthy to be engraven on a durable tablet for preservation; or, as others render, "a psalm precious as stamped gold," from the word kethem, "fine or stamped gold." 
WEAVERS|Weaving was an art practised in very early times ( Exodus 35:35 ). The Egyptians were specially skilled in it ( Isaiah 19:9 ;  Ezek. 27:7 ), and some have regarded them as its inventors. In the wilderness, the Hebrews practised it ( Exodus 26:1 ,  8;  28:4 ,  39;  Leviticus 13:47 ). It is referred to in subsequent times as specially the women's work ( 2 Kings 23:7 ;  Proverbs 31:13 ,  24). No mention of the loom is found in Scripture, but we read of the "shuttle" ( Job 7:6 ), "the pin" of the beam ( Judges 16:14 ), "the web" (13,  14), and "the beam" ( 1 Samuel 17:7 ;  2 Samuel 21:19 ). The rendering, "with pining sickness," in Isaiah 38:12 (A.V.) should be, as in the Revised Version, "from the loom," or, as in the margin, "from the thrum." We read also of the "warp" and "woof" ( Leviticus 13:48 ,  49,  51-53,  58,  59), but the Revised Version margin has, instead of "warp," "woven or knitted stuff." 
CHELUB|     ke'-lub:  (1) kelubh, father of Mehir ( 1 Chronicles 4:11 ); the name is probably a variation of Caleb. Wellhausen (De gentibus et familiis Judaeis) reads kalebh ben chezron.  (2) Father of Ezri ( 1 Chronicles 27:26 ), one of the officers of David.  See  GENEALOGY .
ELOTH|   ELATH;   e'-lath, or e'-loth ('eloth, 'elath; Ailon ( Deuteronomy 2:8 ), Ailath ( 2 Kings 16:6 )):  A seaport on the Red Sea in the territory of Edom. It is named along with Ezion-geber in the account of Israel's journey round the land of Edom ( Deuteronomy 2:8 ). It appears as Ailath, and Alion in the Septuagint, and in Josephus as Ilanis (Ant., VIII, vi, 4), while Eusebius (Onomasticon) has Aila. From this we may gather that the Aramaic Ilan or Ilana was in use as well as the Hebrew 'elath or 'eloth. The name, "grove," was doubtless derived from the presence of certain sacred trees. It may be identical with El-paran of  Genesis 14:6 , and Elah of  Genesis 36:41 . When David conquered Edom, Elath passed into the hands of Israel ( 2 Samuel 8:14 ). It was a position of great importance in connection with the trade with South Arabia. Here the merchant fleets of Solomon and Jehoshaphat were fitted out, and hence, they sailed ( 1 Kings 9:26   2 Chronicles 8:17   1 Kings 22:48 ).  In the reign of Jehoram, son of Jehoshaphat, Edom shook off the hand of Judah ( 2 Kings 8:20 ), but under Amaziah and Uzziah it was again subdued ( 2 Kings 14:7, 10, 22 ). Finally it was taken from Ahaz by Rezin, king of Syria. The Jews were driven out and the Syrians (Edomites?) took permanent possession ( 2 Kings 16:6 ). It is identical with the modern `Aqaba, at the head of the gulf of that name.  W. Ewing  ELOTH  e'-loth.  See  ELATH .
HORESH|     ho'-resh (choreshah,  1 Samuel 23:15, 18 , margin only; Septuagint en Te Kaine, "in the New"; English Versions of the Bible "in the wood" (ba-choreshdh), the particle "in" being combined with the article): Choresh in other passages is translated "forest" (compare  2 Chronicles 27:4   Isaiah 17:9   Ezekiel 31:3 ) and it is most probable that it should be so translated here.
ZAREATHITES|     za-re'a-thits.  See  ZORATHITES .
BETHZUR|House of rock, a town in the mountains of Judah ( Joshua 15:58 ), about 4 miles to the north of Hebron. It was built by Rehoboam for the defence of his kingdom ( 2 Chronicles 11:7 ). It stood near the modern ed-Dirweh. Its ruins are still seen on a hill which bears the name of Beit-Sur, and which commands the road from Beer-sheba and Hebron to Jerusalem from the south. 
GERAR|A region; lodging-place, a very ancient town and district in the south border of Palestine, which was ruled over by a king named Abimelech ( Genesis 10:19 ;  20:1 ,  2). Abraham sojourned here, and perhaps Isaac was born in this place. Both of these patriarchs were guilty of the sin of here denying their wives, and both of them entered into a treaty with the king before they departed to Beersheba ( 21:23 -34; 26). It seems to have been a rich pastoral country ( 2 Chronicles 14:12 -18). Isaac here reaped an hundred-fold, and was blessed of God ( Genesis 26:12 ). The "valley of Gerar" ( Genesis 26:17 ) was probably the modern Wady el-Jerdr. 
JEREMOTH|     jer'-e-moth  (a) yeremoth and  (b) yeremowth,  (c) yerimowth, meaning unknown:  Of the following (1) has form (b), (5) the form (c), the rest (a).  (1) In  1 Chronicles 7:8  (the King James Version "Jerimoth"), and  (2) In  1 Chronicles 8:14 , Benjamites. Compare JEROHAM, (2).  (3) In  1 Chronicles 23:23 , and (4) in  1 Chronicles 25:22  = "Jerimoth," 24:30; heads of Levitical houses.  (5) A Naphtalite, one of David's tribal princes ( 1 Chronicles 27:19 ); the King James Version "Jerimoth."  (6) (7) (8) Men who had married foreign wives. In  Ezra 10:26  (="Hieremoth," 1 Esdras 9:27);  Ezra 10:27  (="Jarimoth," 1 Esdras 9:28);  Ezra 10:29  (="Hieremoth," 1 Esdras 9:30); the Qere of the last is weramoth, "and Ramoth"; so the Revised Version margin, the King James Version.  David Francis Roberts
BEALOTH|Citizens, a town in the extreme south of Judah ( Joshua 15:24 ); probably the same as Baalath-beer ( 19:8 ). In  1 Kings 4:16 , the Authorized Version has "in Aloth," the Revised Version "Bealoth." 
EPAPHRODITUS|Fair, graceful; belonging to Aphrodite or Venus the messenger who came from Phillipi to the apostle when he was a prisoner at Rome ( Philippians 2:25 -30;  4:10 -18). Paul mentions him in words of esteem and affection. On his return to Philippi he was the bearer of Paul's letter to the church there. 
SALLAI|Basket-maker.  (1.) A Benjamite ( Nehemiah 11:8 ). (2.) A priest in the days of Joshua and Zerubbabel ( Nehemiah 12:20 ). 
MESHOBAB|     me-sho'-bab (meshobhabh): A Simeonite ( 1 Chronicles 4:34 ). This name heads the list of those who, for the sake of wider pasturelands, occupied a Hamitic settlement in the neighborhood of Gerar (Mount GEDOR (which see)), and a Maonite settlement in Edomite territory ( 1 Chronicles 4:39-41 ). The latter event is dated in the days of Hezekiah (see Curtis, Chronicles, in the place cited.).
MATTATTAH|     mat'-a-ta (mattattah): the Revised Version (British and American) for "Mattathah" in the King James Version ( Ezra 10:33 ). The same as "Mattathias" of 1 Esdras 9:33, the King James Version "Matthias" (which see).
HUSHIM|     hu'-shim (chusim, "hasters''):  (1) Family name of the children of Dan ( Genesis 46:23 ), but of form "Shuham" in  Numbers 26:42 .  (2) The sons of Aher of the lineage of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 7:12 ).  (3) One of the wives of Shaharaim, of the family of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:8, 11 ).
SHAUL|   ; SHAULITES  sha'-ul, sha'-ul-its (sha'ul; Saoul):  (1) A king of Edom ( Genesis 36:37  =  1 Chronicles 1:48 ).  (2) A son of Simeon ( Genesis 46:10   Exodus 6:15   Numbers 26:13   1 Chronicles 4:24 ). The clan was of notoriously impure stock, and, therefore, Shaul is called "the son of a Canaanitish woman" ( Genesis 46:10   Exodus 6:15 ); the clan was of mixed Israelite and Canaanitish descent. The patronymic Shaulites is found in  Numbers 26:13 .  (3) An ancestor of Samuel ( 1 Chronicles 6:24 (Hebrew 9 )); in  1 Chronicles 6:36  he is called "Joel."
MAGDIEL|     mag'-di-el (maghdi'el;  Genesis 36:43 , Septuagint: Codex Alexandrinus Metoduel;  1 Chronicles 1:54 ; Codex Alexandrinus Mageduel; Codex Vaticanus Meduel): One of the "dukes" of Edom.
HATIPHA|Captured, one of the Nethinim ( Ezra 2:54 ). 
HAMON|see  See BAAL-.  . 
JAZER|     ja'-zer (ya`zer or ya`zeyr; Septuagint Iazen in Codex Alexandrinus; Iazer): In some cases, e.g.  Numbers 21:32 , the King James Version reads "Jaazer." This was a city of the Amorites East of the Jordan taken, along with its towns, by Moses, and occupied by the tribe of Gad ( Numbers 21:32 ;  Numbers 32:35 ). The country was very fertile, and its spacious pasture-lands attracted the flock-masters of Gad ( Numbers 32:1 ), the southern border of whose territory it marked ( Joshua 13:25 ). It was assigned to the Merarite Levites ( Joshua 21:39   1 Chronicles 6:81 ). The place was reached by Joab when taking the census ( 2 Samuel 24:5 ). In the 40th year of King David mighty men of valor were found here to whom he entrusted the oversight in Reuben and Gad "for every matter pertaining to God, and run the affairs of the king" ( 1 Chronicles 26:32 f ). The fruitfulness of the country is alluded to in  Isaiah 16:8  f;  Jeremiah 48:32 . (Note: "Sea of" Jazer in this verse has arisen through accidental repetition of yam, "sea," from the preceding clause.) The city was taken from the Ammonites by Judas Maccabeus, and burned (1 Maccabees 5:7, 8; Ant, XII, viii, 1).  Onomasticon places Jazer 10 Roman miles West of Philadelphia (`Amman), and about 15 miles from Heshbon, where a great stream rises, which flows into the Jordan. Many would identify it with Khirbet Car, on the South of Wady Cir, about 5 miles West of `Amman. The perennial stream from Wady Cir reaches the Jordan by Wady el-Kefrein. Cheyne (EB, under the word) suggests Yajuz on Wady Zorby, tributary of the Jabbok, with extensive Roman remains. It lies a little way to the East of el Jubeihat ("Jogbehah,"  Numbers 32:35 ). It is situated, however, to the North and not to the West of `Amman, where Eusebius, Onomasticon, places it. Neither identification is certain.  W. Ewing  SEA OF JAZER  (yam ya`zer): This is a scribal error ( Jeremiah 48:32 ), yam ("sea") being accidentally imported from the preceding clause.  See  JAZER ;  SEA .
JAARESHIAH|     ja-ar-e-shi'-a (ya`areshyah, meaning unknown): In  1 Chronicles 8:27 , a Benjamite, "son" of Jeroham. The King James Version has "Jaresiah."
HOPHRA|I.e., PHARAOH- (called Apries by the Greek historian Herodotus) king of Egypt (B.C. 591-572) in the time of Zedekiah, king of Judah ( Jeremiah 37:5  and  44:30 ;  Ezek. 29:6 ,  7). 
ELUZAI|     e-lu'-za-i ('el`uzai, "God is my strength"; compare UZZIEL):  One of David's heroes ( 1 Chronicles 12:5 ).
JONAS| (1.) Greek form of Jonah ( Matthew 12:39 ,  40,  41,  etc.). (2.) The father of the apostles Peter ( John 21:15 -17) and Andrew; but the reading should be (also in 1:42), as in the Revised Version, "John," instead of Jonas. 
RAMATH|Ramath of the south (Hebrews Ramath-negeb). The Hebrews negeb is the general designation for south or south-west of Judah. This was one of the towns of Simeon ( Joshua 19:8 ). It is the same as "south Ramoth" ( 1 Samuel 30:27 ; R.V.,  "Ramoth of the south"). Its site is doubtful. Some have thought it another name for Baalath-beer. 
ERASTUS|Beloved.  (1.) The "chamberlain" of the city of Corinth ( Romans 16:23 ), and one of Paul's disciples. As treasurer of such a city he was a public officer of great dignity, and his conversion to the gospel was accordingly a proof of the wonderful success of the apostle's labours. (2.) A companion of Paul at Ephesus, who was sent by him along with Timothy into Macedonia ( Acts 19:22 ). Corinth was his usual place of abode ( 2 Timothy 4:20 ); but probably he may have been the same as the preceding. 
NAIN|(from Hebrews nain,  "green pastures, " "lovely"), the name of a town near the gate of which Jesus raised to life a widow's son ( Luke 7:11 -17). It is identified with the village called Nein, standing on the north-western slope of Jebel ed-Duhy (=the "hill Moreh" = "Little hermon"), about 4 miles from Tabor and 25 southwest of Capernaum. At the foot of the slope on which it stands is the great plain of Esdraelon. This was the first miracle of raising the dead our Lord had wrought, and it excited great awe and astonishment among the people. 
JEHOVAHNISSI|Jehovah my banner, the title given by Moses to the altar which he erected on the hill on the top of which he stood with uplifted hands while Israel prevailed over their enemies the Amalekites ( Exodus 17:15 ). 
NAPHTUHIM|A Hamitic tribe descended from Mizraim ( Genesis 10:13 ). Others identify this word with Napata, the name of the city and territory on the southern frontier of Mizraim, the modern Meroe, at the great bend of the Nile at Soudan. This city was the royal residence, it is said, of Queen Candace ( Acts 8:27 ). Here there are extensive and splendid ruins. 
TAHREA|     ta'-re-a, ta-re'-a (tachrea`): Son of Micah, a descendant of Gibeon ( 1 Chronicles 9:41 ; in 8:35 "Tarea").
HARBOUR|     har'-ber. Used figuratively of God in  Joel 3:16  the King James Version margin, (Hebrew) "place of repair, or, harbour" (the King James Version "hope," the Revised Version (British and American) "refuge").  See  HAVEN ;  SHIPS AND BOATS, I, II, (1), II, 3 .
HASHUB|Intelligent.  (1.) A Levite of the family of Merari ( Nehemiah 11:15 ;  1 Chronicles 9:14 ).  (2.)  Nehemiah 3:23 . 3:11. 
ZOHETH|Snatching (?), one of the sons of Ishi ( 1 Chronicles 4:20 ). 
JASHER|Upright. "The Book of Jasher," rendered in the LXX. "the Book of the Upright One," by the Vulgate "the Book of Just Ones," was probably a kind of national sacred song-book, a collection of songs in praise of the heroes of Israel, a "book of golden deeds," a national anthology. We have only two specimens from the book, (1) the words of Joshua which he spake to the Lord at the crisis of the battle of Beth-horon ( Joshua 10:12 ,  13); and (2) "the Song of the Bow," that beautiful and touching mournful elegy which David composed on the occasion of the death of Saul and Jonathan ( 2 Samuel 1:18 -27). 
BILSHAN|Son of the tongue; i.e., "eloquent", a man of some note who returned from the Captivity with Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:2 ;  Nehemiah 7:7 ). 
SHAALBIM|     sha-al'-bim (sha`albim; Codex Vaticanus Bethalamei; Codex Alexandrinus Salabeim, in Joshua, Codex Vaticanus and Codex Alexandrinus Thalabeim): When the Amorites had forced the children of Dan into the mountain they came and dwelt in Mt. Heres, Aijalon and Shaalbim, where, it appears, they were made tributary to the house of Joseph ( Judges 1:35 ). In the time of Solomon it was included in the administrative district presided over by Ben-deker, along with Makaz, Beth-shemesh and Elon-beth-hanan ( 1 Kings 4:9 ). Beth-shemesh is the same as Ir-shemesh ( Joshua 19:42 ). Shaalbim is probably only another name of Shaalabbin. One of David's mighty men is called Eliahba the Shaalbonite. This presumes the existence of a town called Shaalbon ( 2 Samuel 23:32   1 Chronicles 11:33 ), which again is probably identical with Shaalbim. Eusebius (in Onomasticon) identifies it with Salaba, a large village in the district of Sebaste (Samaria), which apparently Eusebius and Jerome thought to be in the territory of Dan. It seems, however, too far to the North. Jerome in his commentary on  Ezekiel 48  speaks of the towers of Aijalon and Selebi and Emmaus. Conder would identify Selebi with Selbit, 3 miles Northwest of Aijalon (Yalo), and 8 miles North of Bethshemesh. This would suit for Shaalbim, as far as position is concerned; but it is difficult to account for the heavy "T" (Hebrew letter Tet) in the name, if derived from Shaalbim.  W. Ewing
RITHMAH|Wild broom, a station in the wilderness ( Numbers 33:18 ,  19), the "broom valley," or "valley of broombushes," the place apparently of the original encampment of Israel, near Kadesh. 
SIPPAI|     sip'-i, si-pa'-i.  See  SAPH .
KIRHERES|   QIR-HARESETH; KIR-HERES  kur-har'-seth, -ha-re'-seth> (qir-charesh,  Isaiah 16:7 ; in  2 Kings 3:25  the King James Version reads Kir-haraseth (pausal form)); (qir cheres,  Jeremiah 48:31, 36 ; in  Isaiah 16:11  the King James Version reads Kir-haresh (pausal form)): Modern scholars unanimously identify this city with Kir of Moab. In Jehoram's invasion of Moab it alone withstood his attack; and on the city wall the king of Moab sacrificed his son ( 2 Kings 3:25 ). It was obviously the capital, i.e. Kir Moab. The name is generally taken to mean "city of the sun." Cheyne, however, points out (EB, under the word):  (1) that this explanation was unknown to the ancients;  (2) that"kir" is nowhere suposed to mean "city," except in the compound names Kir-heres, Kir-hareseth, and Kir Moab;  (3) that cheres, "sun," nowhere has a feminine ending, and  (4) that  Isaiah 16:7  Septuagint and Aquila.) indicates "d" and not "r" in the second part of the name (Deseth). He suggests, therefore, that we should possibly read qiryath chadhdshah, "new city."  W. Ewing
ELONBETHHANAN|   BETH-HANAN; ELON-BETH-HANAN  beth-ha'-nan ( 1 Kings 4:9 ).  See  ELON .
GUR|A whelp, a place near Ibleam where Jehu's servants overtook and mortally wounded king Ahaziah ( 2 Kings 9:27 ); an ascent from the plain of Jezreel. 
SIBMAH|Coolness; fragrance, a town in Reuben, in the territory of Moab, on the east of Jordan ( Joshua 13:19 ); called also Shebam and Shibmah ( Numbers 32:3 ,  38). It was famous for its vines ( Isaiah 16:9 ;  Jeremiah 48:32 ). It has been identified with the ruin of Sumieh, where there are rock-cut wine-presses. This fact explains the words of the prophets referred to above. It was about 5 miles east of Heshbon. 
KIRJATHJEARIM|City of jaars; i.e., of woods or forests, a Gibeonite town ( Joshua 9:17 ) on the border of Benjamin, to which tribe it was assigned ( 18:15 ,  28). The ark was brought to this place ( 1 Samuel 7:1 ,  2) from Beth-shemesh and put in charge of Abinadab, a Levite. Here it remained till it was removed by David to Jerusalem ( 2 Samuel 6:2 ,  3,  12;  1 Chronicles 15:1 -29; Comp.  Psalm 132 ). It was also called Baalah ( Joshua 15:9 ) and Kirjath-baal (60). It has been usually identified with Kuriet el-`Enab (i.e.,  "city of grapes"), among the hills, about 8 miles north-east of `Ain Shems (i.e.,  Beth-shemesh). The opinion, however, that it is to be identified with `Erma, 4 miles east of `Ain Shems, on the edge of the valley of Sorek, seems to be better supported. (see  KIRJATH .) The words of  Psalm 132:6 , "We found it in the fields of the wood," refer to the sojourn of the ark at Kirjath-jearim. "Wood" is here the rendering of the Hebrew word jaar, which is the singular of jearim. 
DEMONS|   COMMUNION WITH ; DEVILS  de'-monz, (dev'-'-lz):   I. Use of Term:  The actual expression "communion with demons" (koinonoi ton daimonion) occurs but once in Scripture ( 1 Corinthians 10:20 ) where its figurative meaning is evident, but it is implied in the English version of a number of passages by the terms "one who has" or "those who have" "familiar spirits" ( Leviticus 19:31 ;  Leviticus 20:6, 27   Deuteronomy 18:11   1 Samuel 28:3, 7, 8, 9 ;  2 Kings 21:6 ;  2 Kings 23:24   1 Chronicles 10:13   2 Chronicles 33:6   Isaiah 8:19 ;  Isaiah 19:3 ;  Isaiah 29:4 ). These passages seem to be somewhat incongruous with Paul's statement, but are in reality so intimately related to it as to give and receive light through the connection.   II. Teaching of Scripture.  To begin with, we may safely say, in general, that there is no ground for asserting that the Bible admits the possibility of conscious and voluntary communion with spirits. This is an essential element of popular demonology in all ages, but it is absent from Scripture. Even in the passages mentioned above which refer to necromancers and wizards, while, as we shall see, the words indicate that such practitioners professed to rely upon spirits in their divinations, the Scriptures carefully refrain from sanctioning these claims, and a number of features in the various passages serve to indicate that the true scriptural view is quite the opposite. As this is not a prevalent opinion, we should do well to examine the passages with some little care.  1. The New Testament:  (1) We may first deal with the New Testament. In the Gospels the demoniacs are consistently looked upon and treated as unconscious and helpless victims (see DEMON, DEMONOLOGY). The frequent use of this term "demonized" (daimonizomenoi) together with all that is told us of the methods of treating these eases adopted by our Lord and His apostles (see EXORCISM) indicates the belief of the New Testament writers that the control of demons over men is obtained outside of or below the region of conscious volition and that the condition of the sufferers is pathological.  (2) The same must be said of the Lydian maiden whose cure by Paul is recorded in  Acts 16:16 . This is the one instance in the New Testament where divination is connected with spirits. The account emphasizes the excitable neurosis of the patient; and the belief on the part of the apostles and of the writer of Acts that the girl was not the conscious accomplice of her masters, but their unfortunate victim through her mysterious malady, is clear. She was treated, as the other eases recorded in the New Testament, not as a conscious wrongdoer, but as a sick person to be healed.  2. The Old Testament:  (1) Turning now to the Old Testament, the instance which requires the most careful treatment, because it holds the key to all the rest, is the narrative of Saul's visit to the Witch of Endor in  1 Samuel 28:3-25 . The Hebrew word 'obh which is usually translated "one who has a familiar spirit" (see list of passages at beginning of article) occurs in this narrative four times (verses 3, 7 twice, 8). According to the ordinary interpretation it is used in three different senses, two of which occur here. These three senses are  (a) a person who controls a spirit,  (b) the spirit controlled,  (c) the power to control such a spirit.  This meaning appears to be altogether too broad. Omitting to translate the word we have: (verse 3) "Saul had put away 'obhoth, and yidh`onim"; (verse 7), a woman, a mistress of an 'obh; (verse 8) "Divine unto me. by the 'obh." It is extremely unlikely that the same word should be used in two senses so far apart as "person who has a spirit" and the "spirit itself" in the same context. In the last passage mentioned (verse 8) there is a double indication that the word 'obh cannot have either signification mentioned. Saul says: "Divine unto me by the 'obh and bring me up whomsoever I shall name unto thee." The expression "divine by" clearly points to some magical object used in divination. Control of a spirit through some magical object is familiar enough. The rest of Saul's statement confirms this view. The result of the divination is the calling up of a spirit. A spirit would hardly be used to call up another spirit. This conclusion is confirmed by the etymology. The word 'obh is supposed to mean "one who has a familiar spirit," from its root-significance of hollow and its primary meaning of wineskin. According to this derivation the word is applied to a necromancer on the supposition that the spirit inhabits his body and speaks from within. The transference to spirit is extremely unlikely and the explanation is not consistent with primitive ideas on spirit manifestation (see Brown, Driver, and Briggs, Hebrew and English Lexicon of the Old Testament, 'owb end).  (2) We, therefore, hold with H. P. Smith (International Critical Commentary, "Samuel" in the place cited.), though partly on different grounds, that the word 'obh has the same meaning in all the passages where it occurs, and that it refers to a sacred object or fetish by which spiritistic divination was carried on.  The significance of this conclusion is that the misleading expression "familiar spirit" disappears from the text, for Dr. Driver's interpretation of the companion word yidh`onim (see International Critical Commentary, Commentary on Deuteronomy in the place cited.) will scarcely be maintained in the face of this new meaning for 'obh. The prohibition contained in the law ( Leviticus 20:27 ) against 'ohboth, and those using them, places them in the same catalogue of offense and futility with idol-worship in general.  (3) This opinion is confirmed by two separate items of evidence.  (a) In the Witch of Endor story Samuel's appearance, according to the idea of the narrator, was due to a miracle, not to the magic power of the feeble and cheating old woman to whom Saul had resorted. God speaks through the apparition a stern message of doom. No one was more startled than the woman herself, who for once had a real vision ( 1 Samuel 28:12 ). She not only gave a loud cry of astonishment and alarm but she described the figure which she saw as "a god coming up out of the each." The story is told with fidelity and clearly indicates the opinion that the actual appearance of a spirit is so violently exceptional as to indicate the immediate power and presence of God.  (b) In  Isaiah 8:19  the 'obhoth and yidh`onim are spoken of as those who "chirp and mutter." These terms refer to the necromancers themselves (Septuagint translates 'obhoth by eggastromuthoi = ventriloquists) who practiced ventriloquism in connection with their magical rites. In  Isaiah 29:4  it is said "Thy voice shall be as an 'obh, out of the ground." Here 'obh is usually interpreted as "ghost," but it is far more probable (see Brown, Driver, and Briggs, Hebrew and English Lexicon of the Old Testament sub loc.) that it refers as in 8:19 to the ventriloqustic tricks of those who utter their oracles in voices intended to represent the spirits which they have evoked. They are stamped in these passages, as in the Witch of Endor narrative, as deceivers practicing a fraudulent article. By implication their power to evoke spirits with whom they were in familiar intercourse is denied.  3. The Meaning of Idol-Worship:  This leaves the way clear for a brief consideration of the words of Paul in  1 Corinthians 10:20  in connection with cognate passages in the Old Testament.  (1) He argues that since idol-worship is really demon-worship, the partaking of heathen sacrifice is a communion with demons and a separation from Christ. It is usually taken for granted that this characterization of heathen worship was simply a part of the Jewish-Christian polemic against idolatry. Our fuller knowledge of the spiritism which conditions the use of images enables us to recognize the fact that from the viewpoint of heathenism itself Paul's idea was strictly correct. The image is venerated because it is supposed to represent or contain an invisible being or spirit, not necessarily a deity in the absolute sense, but a super-human living being capable of working good or ill to men.  (2) In the King James Version the term devils is used in four Old Testament passages ( Leviticus 17:7   Deuteronomy 32:17   2 Chronicles 11:15   Psalm 106:37 ). In the Revised Version (British and American) "devils" has disappeared from the text-the word he-goats appears in  Leviticus 17:7  and  2 Chronicles 11:15 , while "demons" appears in  Deuteronomy 32:17  and  Psalm 106:37 . The translation of se`irim as "he-goats" is literally correct, but conveys an erroneous conception of the meaning. The practice reprobated is the worship of Satyrs (see SATYR) or wood-demons supposed to be like goats in appearance and to inhabit lonely places. The same word is used in  Isaiah 13:21 ;  Isaiah 34:14 . The word translated "demons" in the Revised Version (British and American) is shedhim, a term used only twice and both times in connection with the rites and abominations of heathen worship. It is interesting to note that the word shidu is applied to the beings represented by the bull-colossi of Assyria (Driver, Deuteronomy in the place cited.). Brown, Driver, and Briggs, Hebrew and English Lexicon of the Old Testament holds that the word shedhim is an Assyrian loan-word, while Briggs (ICC,  Psalm 106:37 ) holds that shedhim were ancient gods of Canaan. In either case the word belongs to heathenism and is used in Scripture to describe heathen worship in its own terminology. The interpretation of these beings as evil is characteristic of Biblical demonism in general (see DEMON, etc.). The worship of idols was the worship of personal beings more than man and less than God, according to Jewish and Christian ideas (see Driver op. cit., 363). Septuagint translates both the above words by daimonia.  4. Conclusion:  The term "communion with demons" does not imply any power on the part of men to enter into voluntary relationship with beings of another world, but that, by sinful compliance in wrongdoing, such as idol-worship and magical rites, men may enter into a moral identification with evil powers against which it is their duty to fight.  LITERATURE.  The Dictionaries and Commentaries dealing with the passages quoted above contain discussions of the various aspects of the subject. Jewish superstitions are ably treated by Edersheim, Edersheim, Life and Times of Jesus the Messiah (8th edition), II, 771, 773.  Louis Matthews Sweet
SHIMEI|Famous.  (1.) A son of Gershon, and grandson of Levi ( Numbers 3:18 ;  1 Chronicles 6:17 ,  29); called Shimi in  Exodus 6:17 . (2.) A Benjamite of the house of Saul, who stoned and cursed David when he reached Bahurim in his flight from Jerusalem on the occasion of the rebellion of Absalom ( 2 Samuel 16:5 -13). After the defeat of Absalom he "came cringing to the king, humbly suing for pardon, bringing with him a thousand of his Benjamite tribesmen, and representing that he was heartily sorry for his crime, and had hurried the first of all the house of Israel to offer homage to the king" ( 19:16 -23). David forgave him; but on his death-bed he gave Solomon special instructions regarding Shimei, of whose fidelity he seems to have been in doubt ( 1 Kings 2:8 , 9). He was put to death at the command of Solomon, because he had violated his word by leaving Jerusalem and going to Gath to recover two of his servants who had escaped (36-46). (3.) One of David's mighty men who refused to acknowledge Adonijah as David's successor ( 1 Kings 1:8 ). He is probably the same person who is called elsewhere ( 4:18 ) "the son of Elah." (4.) A son of Pedaiah, the brother of Zerubbabel ( 1 Chronicles 3:19 ). (5.) A Simeonite ( 1 Chronicles 4:26 ,  27). (6.) A Reubenite ( 1 Chronicles 5:4 ). (7.) A Levite of the family of Gershon ( 1 Chronicles 6:42 ). (8.) A Ramathite who was "over the vineyards" of David ( 1 Chronicles 27:27 ). (9.) One of the sons of Heman, who assisted in the purification of the temple ( 2 Chronicles 29:14 ). (10.) A Levite ( 2 Chronicles 31:12 ,  13). (11.) Another Levite ( Ezra 10:23 ). "The family of Shimei" ( Zechariah 12:13 ; R.V.,  "the family of the Shimeites") were the descendants of Shimei (1).
SAVIOUR|One who saves from any form or degree of evil. In its highest sense the word indicates the relation sustained by our Lord to his redeemed ones, he is their Saviour. The great message of the gospel is about salvation and the Saviour. It is the "gospel of salvation." Faith in the Lord Jesus Christ secures to the sinner a personal interest in the work of redemption. Salvation is redemption made effectual to the individual by the power of the Holy Spirit. 
EBIASAPH|     e-bi'-a-saf:  A descendant of Kohath the son of Levi ( 1 Chronicles 6:37 ).  See  ABIASAPH .
HEZEKI|     hez'-e-ki (chizqi).  See  HIZKI .
HARROWS|     har'-oz (chrits): Charits has no connection with the verb translated "harrows." The context seems to indicate some form of pointed instrument ( 2 Samuel 12:31   1 Chronicles 20:3 ; see especially the Revised Version margin).
PATARA|A city on the south-west coast of Lycia at which Paul landed on his return from his third missionary journey ( Acts 21:1 ,  2). Here he found a larger vessel, which was about to sail across the open sea to the coast of Phoenicia. In this vessel he set forth, and reached the city of Tyre in perhaps two or three days. 
JEHOIARIB|Jehovah defends, a priest at Jerusalem, head of one of the sacerdotal courses ( 1 Chronicles 9:10 ;  24:7 ). His "course" went up from Babylon after the Exile ( Ezra 2:36 -39;  Nehemiah 7:39 -42). 
PHANUEL|Face of God, father of the prophetess Anna (q.v.),  Luke 2:36 . 
SHECHEMITES|     she'-kem-its (hashikhmi; Suchemei): The descendants of Shechem the son of Gilead, a clan of Eastern Manasseh ( Numbers 26:31   Joshua 17:2 ).
PLANETS|     plan'-ets (mazzaloth).  See  ASTROLOGY, sec . II, 3.
MORIAH|The chosen of Jehovah. Some contend that Mount Gerizim is meant, but most probably we are to regard this as one of the hills of Jerusalem. Here Solomon's temple was built, on the spot that had been the threshing-floor of Ornan the Jebusite ( 2 Samuel 24:24 ,  25;  2 Chronicles 3:1 ). It is usually included in Zion, to the north-east of which it lay, and from which it was separated by the Tyropoean valley. This was "the land of Moriah" to which Abraham went to offer up his son Isaac ( Genesis 22:2 ). It has been supposed that the highest point of the temple hill, which is now covered by the Mohammedan Kubbetes-Sakhrah, or "Dome of the Rock," is the actual site of Araunah's threshing-floor. Here also, one thousand years after Abraham, David built an altar and offered sacrifices to God. (see  JERUSALEM ; NUMBERING THE PEOPLE.) 
SADOC|Just, mentioned in the genealogy of our Lord ( Matthew 1:14 ). 
HAZEROTH|Fenced enclosures consisting of "a low wall of stones in which thick bundles of thorny acacia are inserted, the tangled branches and long needle-like spikes forming a perfectly impenetrable hedge around the encampment" of tents and cattle which they sheltered. Such like enclosures abound in the wilderness of Paran, which the Israelites entered after leaving Sinai ( Numbers 11:35 ;  12:16 ;  33:17 ,  18). This third encampment of the Israelites has been identified with the modern `Ain el-Hudhera, some 40 miles north-east of Sinai. Here Miriam (q.v.), being displeased that Moses had married a Cushite wife ( Numbers 12:1 ), induced Aaron to join with her in rebelling against Moses. God vindicated the authority of his "servant Moses," and Miriam was smitten with leprosy. Moses interceded for her, and she was healed ( Numbers 12:4 -16). From this encampment the Israelites marched northward across the plateau of et-Tih, and at length reached KADESH. 
MANAHATH|     man'-a-hath (manachath; Machanathi):  (1) A place to which certain Benjamites, victims, apparently, of intra-tribal jealousy, were carried captive ( 1 Chronicles 8:6 ). Of this town the Manahathites were probably natives. It is possibly denoted by Manocho which Septuagint adds to the list of towns in Judah ( Joshua 15:59 ). This place is named along with Bether (Bittir). The name seems to be preserved in that of Malicha, a large village not far from Bittir, Southwest of Jerusalem. The change of "l" to "n", and vice versa, is not uncommon. The same place may be intended by Menuhah ( Judges 20:43  the Revised Version margin), where the King James Version reads "with ease," and the Revised Version (British and American) "at their resting-place."  (2) One of the sons of Shobal, the son of Seir the Horite ( Genesis 36:23   1 Chronicles 1:40 ), the "name-father" of one of the ancient tribes in Mt. Seir, afterward subdued and incorporated in Edom.  W. Ewing
JOIARIB|(whom Jehovah defends) = Jehoiarib.  (1.) The founder of one of the courses of the priests ( Nehemiah 11:10 ). (2.)  Nehemiah 11:5 ; a descendant of Judah. (3.)  Nehemiah 12:6 . (4.)  Ezra 8:16 , a "man of understanding" whom Ezra sent to "bring ministers for the house of God." 
CONONIAH|     kon-o-ni'a.  See  CONANIAH .
JACHIN|Firm.  (1.) The fourth son of Simeon ( Genesis 46:10 ), called also Jarib ( 1 Chronicles 4:24 ). (2.) The head of one of the courses (the twenty-first) of priests ( 1 Chronicles 24:17 ). (3.) One of the priests who returned from the Exile ( 1 Chronicles 9:10 ).  Jachin and Boaz The names of two brazen columns set up in Solomon's temple ( 1 Kings 7:15 -22). Each was eighteen cubits high and twelve in circumference ( Jeremiah 52:21 ,  23;  1 Kings 7:17 -21). They had doubtless a symbolical import. 
ONO|A town of Benjamin, in the "plain of Ono" ( 1 Chronicles 8:12 ;  Ezra 2:33 ); now Kefr `Ana, 5 miles north of Lydda, and about 30 miles north-west of Jerusalem. Not succeeding in their attempts to deter Nehemiah from rebuilding the walls of Jerusalem, Sanballat and Tobiah resorted to strategem, and pretending to wish a conference with him, they invited him to meet them at Ono. Four times they made the request, and every time Nehemiah refused to come. Their object was to take him prisoner. 
CUSHI|     ku'-shi: This name represents kushi, (in the original Septuagint Chousei, Chousi), either with or without the article. With the article (so in  2 Samuel 18:21-32  seven out of eight times, all readings supported by the Septuagint) it simply indicate that the person so designated was of the Cushite people, as in  Jeremiah 38:7 . Its use without the article has doubtless developed out of the foregoing according to a familiar process. For the Cush of  Psalm 7 , title read "Cushi" with Septuagint.  (1) The messenger (the Revised Version (British and American) "the Cushite") sent by Joab to acquaint David with the victory over Absalom. That this man was in fact a foreigner is indicated by his ignorance of a shorter path which Ahimaaz took, by his being unrecognized by the watchman who recognizes Ahimaaz, and by his ignorance, as compared with Ahimaaz, of the sentiments of David, whom he knows only as a king and not as a man.  2 Samuel 18:21  (twice, the second time without the article),  2 Samuel 18:22, 23, 11  (twice),  2 Samuel 18:32  (twice).  (2) The great-grandfather of Jehudi, a contemporary of Jeremiah ( Jeremiah 36:14 ). The name Jehudi itself ("a man of Judah") is sufficient refutation of the opinion that the use of Cushi as or in lieu of a proper name "seems to show that there were but few Cushites among the Israelites."  (3) The father of Zephaniah the prophet (Ze 1:1).  J. Oscar Boyd
TIGLATHPILESER|   TIGLATH-PILESER  tig-lath-pi-le-zer  tighlath pil'eser, as the name is read in 2 Kings, tilleghath pilnecer, in 2 Chronicles; Septuagint Algathphellasar; Assyrian, Tukulti-abal-i-sarra): King of Assyria in the days of Menahem, Pekahiah, and Pekah, kings of Israel, and of Uzziah, Jotham and Ahaz, kings of Judah. The king of Assyria, whom the historian of 2 Kings knows as exacting tribute from Menahem, is Pul ( 2 Kings 15:19 f ). In the days of Pekah who had usurped the throne of Menahem's son and successor, Pekahiah, the king of Assyria is known as Tiglath-pileser, who invaded Naphtali and carried the inhabitants captive to Assyria ( 2 Kings 15:29 ). This invasion is described by the Chronicler ( 1 Chronicles 5:25 f ) rather differently, to the effect that "the God of Israel stirred up the spirit of Pul king of Assyria, and the spirit of Tilgath-pilneser king of Assyria, and he carried them away, even the Reubenites and the Gadites, and the half-tribe of Manasseh, and brought them unto Halah, and Habor, and Hara, and to the river of Gozan, unto this day." Still later we find Pekah forming a coalition with Rezin, king of Damascus, into which they tried to force Ahaz, even going the length of besieging him in Jerusalem ( 2 Kings 16:5 ). The siege was unsuccessful. Ahaz called in the aid of Tiglath-pileser, sacrificing his independence to get rid of the invaders ( 2 Kings 16:7, 8 ). He offered the Assyrian the silver and gold that were found in the house of the Lord and in the royal treasury; and Tiglath-pileser, in return, invaded the territories of Damascus and Israel in the rear, compelling the allied forces to withdraw from Judah, while he captured Damascus, and carried the people away to Kir and slew Rezin ( 2 Kings 16:9 ). It was on the occasion of his visit to Damascus to do homage to his suzerain Tiglath-pileser, that Ahaz fancied the idolatrous altar, a pattern of which he sent to Urijah, the priest, that he might erect an altar to take the place of the brazen altar which was before the Lord in the temple at Jerusalem. It is a significant comment which is made by the Chronicler ( 2 Chronicles 28:21 ) upon the abject submission of Ahaz to the Assyrian king: "It helped him not."  From the inscriptions we learn particulars which afford striking corroboration of the Biblical narrative and clear up some of the difficulties involved. It is now practically certain that Pul, who is mentioned as taking tribute from Menahem, is identical with Tiglath-pileser (Schrader, COT, I, 230, 231). In all probability Pul, or Pulu, was a usurper, who as king of Assyria assumed the name of one of his predecessors, Tiglath-pileser I, and reigned as Tiglath-pileser III. This king of Assyria, who reigned, as we learn from his annals, from 745 B.C. to 727 B.C., was one of the greatest of Assyrian monarchs. See  ASSYRIA . From the fact that no fewer than five Hebrew kings are mentioned in his annals, the greatest interest attaches to his history as it has come down to us. These kings are Uzziah or Azariah, and Jehoahaz, that is Ahaz, of Judah; and Menahem, Pekah and Hushes of Israel. Along with them are mentioned their contemporaries Rezin of Damascus, Hiram of Tyre, and two queens of Arabia otherwise unknown, Zabibi and Samsi. When he died in 727 B.C., he was succeeded by Shalmaneser IV, who had occasion to suspect the loyalty of his vassal Hoshea, king of Israel, and besieged him in Samaria.  LITERATURE.  Schrader, COT, I, 229-57; McCurdy, HPM, sections 279-341.  T. Nicol
OLYMPAS|A Roman Christian whom Paul salutes ( Romans 16:15 ). 
KINGS|Kings, The Books of The two books of Kings formed originally but one book in the Hebrew Scriptures. The present division into two books was first made by the LXX., which now, with the Vulgate, numbers them as the third and fourth books of Kings, the two books of Samuel being the first and second books of Kings. They contain the annals of the Jewish commonwealth from the accession of Solomon till the subjugation of the kingdom by Nebuchadnezzar and the Babylonians (apparently a period of about four hundred and fifty-three years). The books of Chronicles (q.v.) are more comprehensive in their contents than those of Kings. The latter synchronize with  1 Chronicles 28 - 2 Chronicles 36:21 . While in the Chronicles greater prominence is given to the priestly or Levitical office, in the Kings greater prominence is given to the kingly. The authorship of these books is uncertain. There are some portions of them and of Jeremiah that are almost identical, e.g.,  2 Kings 24:18 -25 and  Jeremiah 52 ;  39:1 -10;  40:7 - 41:10 . There are also many undesigned coincidences between Jeremiah and Kings ( 2 Kings 21 -23 and  Jeremiah 7:15 ;  15:4 ;  19:3 ,  etc.), and events recorded in Kings of which Jeremiah had personal knowledge. These facts countenance in some degree the tradition that Jeremiah was the author of the books of Kings. But the more probable supposition is that Ezra, after the Captivity, compiled them from documents written perhaps by David, Solomon, Nathan, Gad, and Iddo, and that he arranged them in the order in which they now exist. In the threefold division of the Scriptures by the Jews, these books are ranked among the "Prophets." They are frequently quoted or alluded to by our Lord and his apostles ( Matthew 6:29 ;  12:42 ;  Luke 4:25 ,  26;  10:4 ; Comp.  2 Kings 4:29 ;  Mark 1:6 ; Comp.  2 Kings 1:8 ;  Matthew 3:4 ,  etc.). The sources of the narrative are referred to (1) "the book of the Acts of Solomon" ( 1 Kings 11:41 ); (2) the "book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah" ( 14:29 ;  15:7 ,  23,  etc.); (3) the "book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel" ( 14:19 ;  15:31 ;  16:14 ,  20,  27,  etc.). The date of its composition was some time between B.C. 561, the date of the last chapter ( 2 Kings 25 ), when Jehoiachin was released from captivity by Evil-merodach, and B.C. 538, the date of the decree of deliverance by Cyrus. 
BELIEVERS|     be-lev'-ers (in the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American) of  Acts 5:14 , for posteuontes, the Revised Version, margin "believing"; in the King James Version of  1 Timothy 4:12  for hoi pistoi, the Revised Version (British and American) "them that believe"): Equivalent phrases, they (he, she) that believe (for hoi pepisteukotes; hoi, pisteuontes; (adj.), pistos, etc.) occur frequently as a regular description of those who professed their faith in Christ, and attached themselves to the Christian church. The one essential condition of admission into the Christian community was, that men should believe in Jesus Christ ( Acts 16:31 ). The actual experiences of the men thus denoted varied with all the possible degrees and modifications of FAITH (which see). Believers are nowhere in the New Testament distinguished as a subordinate class from the "Christians who know" as in the Gnostic antithesis of pistikoi and gnostikoi, "believers" and "knowers."  T. Rees
MERAIAH|Resistance, a chief priest, a contemporary of the high priest Joiakim ( Nehemiah 12:12 ). 
MAOCH|Compressed, the father of Achish, king of Gath ( 1 Samuel 27:2 ). Called also Maachah ( 1 Kings 2:39 ). 
JEHOVAHJIREH|Jehovah will see; i.e., will provide, the name given by Abraham to the scene of his offering up the ram which was caught in the thicket on Mount Moriah. The expression used in  Genesis 22:14 , "in the mount of the Lord it shall be seen," has been regarded as equivalent to the saying, "Man's extremity is God's opportunity." 
ZAANAN|Place of flocks, mentioned only in  Micah 1:11 . It may be identified with Zenan, in the plain country of Judah ( Joshua 15:37 ). 
MELONS|Only in  Numbers 11:5 , the translation of the Hebrew abattihim, the LXX. and Vulgate pepones, Arabic britikh. Of this plant there are various kinds, the Egyptian melon, the Cucumus chate, which has been called "the queen of cucumbers;" the water melon, the Cucurbita citrullus; and the common or flesh melon, the Cucumus melo. "A traveller in the East who recollects the intense gratitude which a gift of a slice of melon inspired while journeying over the hot and dry plains, will readily comprehend the regret with which the Hebrews in the Arabian desert looked back upon the melons of Egypt" (Kitto). 
THRESHINGFLOOR|   CHIDON, THE THRESHING-FLOOR OF  ki'-don, (goren kidhon; Septuagint B, omits; A has Cheilo): The place where Uzza perished because he touched the ark ( 1 Chronicles 13:9 ). In  2 Samuel 6:6  it is called the threshing-floor of Nachon. No name resembling either of these has been discovered.  THRESHING-FLOOR  thresh'-ing-flor (goren; halon; 'iddar, occurs in  Daniel 2:35 ): The location and method of making threshing-floors have already been described under AGRICULTURE. These floors have come into prominence because of the Biblical events which occurred on or near them. Joseph with his kinsmen and Egyptian followers halted for seven days at the threshing-floor of Atad to lament the death of Jacob ( Genesis 50:10 ). Probably there was a group of floors furnishing a convenient spot for a caravan to stop. Travelers today welcome the sight of a threshing-floor at their halting-place. The hard, level spot is a much preferable to the surrounding stony fields for their tents.  David built an altar on Ornan's (Araunah's) threshing-floor ( 2 Samuel 24:18-24   1 Chronicles 21:18-27 ), which later became the site of the Temple ( 2 Chronicles 3:1 ). David probably chose this place for his altar because it was on an elevation, and the ground was already level and prepared by rolling. Uzzah died near the threshing-floor of Nacon for touching the ark ( 2 Samuel 6:6 ). Ruth reveals herself to Boaz on his threshing-floor ( Ruth 3:6-9 ).  Threshing-floors are in danger of being robbed ( 1 Samuel 23:1 ). For this reason, someone always sleeps on the floor until the grain is removed ( Ruth 3:7 ). In Syria, at the threshing season, it is customary for the family to move out to the vicinity of the threshing-floor. A booth is constructed for shade; the mother prepares the meals and takes her turn with the father and children at riding on the sledge.  The instruments of the threshing-floor referred to in  2 Samuel 24:22  were probably:  (1) the wooden drag or sledge, charuts or moragh, Arabic lauch eddiras;  (2) the fan (fork), mizreh, Arabic midra, for separating straw from wheat;  (3) shovel, meghraphah, Arabic mirfashat, for tossing the wheat into the air in winnowing;  (4) broom, maT'aTe', for sweeping the floor between threshing and for collecting the wheat after winnowing;  (5) goad, malmedh, Arabic messas;  (6) the yoke, `ol, Arabic tauk;  (7) sieve, kebharah, Arabic gharbal;  (8) dung catcher, Arabic milkat.
IDBASH|     id'-bash (yidhbash, "honeysweet"(?)): A man of Judah, one of the sons of the father of Etam ( 1 Chronicles 4:3 ; Septuagint "sons of Etam").
ZEBULONITE|The designation of Elon, the judge who belonged to the tribe of Zebulun ( Judges 12:11 ,  12). 
REMMONMETHOAR|( Joshua 19:13 ), rendered correctly in the Revised Version, "Rimmon, which stretcheth unto Neah," a landmark of Zebulun; called also Rimmon ( 1 Chronicles 6:77 ). 
SHEREBIAH|Flame of the Lord, a priest whose name is prominent in connection with the work carried on by Ezra and Nehemiah at Jerusalem ( Ezra 8:17 ,  18,  24-30;  Nehemiah 8:7 ;  9:4 ,  5;  10:12 ). 
NINEVEH|First mentioned in  Genesis 10:11 , which is rendered in the Revised Version, "He [i.e., Nimrod] went forth into Assyria and builded Nineveh." It is not again noticed till the days of Jonah, when it is described ( Jonah 3:3 ;  4:11 ) as a great and populous city, the flourishing capital of the Assyrian empire ( 2 Kings 19:36 ;  Isaiah 37:37 ). The book of the prophet Nahum is almost exclusively taken up with prophetic denunciations against this city. Its ruin and utter desolation are foretold ( Nahum 1:14 ;  3:19 ,  etc.). Zephaniah also ( 2:13 -15) predicts its destruction along with the fall of the empire of which it was the capital. From this time there is no mention of it in Scripture till it is named in gospel history ( Matthew 12:41 ;  Luke 11:32 ). This "exceeding great city" lay on the eastern or left bank of the river Tigris, along which it stretched for some 30 miles, having an average breadth of 10 miles or more from the river back toward the eastern hills. This whole extensive space is now one immense area of ruins. Occupying a central position on the great highway between the Mediterranean and the Indian Ocean, thus uniting the East and the West, wealth flowed into it from many sources, so that it became the greatest of all ancient cities. About B.C. 633 the Assyrian empire began to show signs of weakness, and Nineveh was attacked by the Medes, who subsequently, about B.C. 625, being joined by the Babylonians and Susianians, again attacked it, when it fell, and was razed to the ground. The Assyrian empire then came to an end, the Medes and Babylonians dividing its provinces between them. "After having ruled for more than six hundred years with hideous tyranny and violence, from the Caucasus and the Caspian to the Persian Gulf, and from beyond the Tigris to Asia Minor and Egypt, it vanished like a dream" ( Nahum 2:6 -11). Its end was strange, sudden, tragic. It was God's doing, his judgement on Assyria's pride ( Isaiah 10:5 -19). Forty years ago our knowledge of the great Assyrian empire and of its magnificent capital was almost wholly a blank. Vague memories had indeed survived of its power and greatness, but very little was definitely known about it. Other cities which had perished, as Palmyra, Persepolis, and Thebes, had left ruins to Mark their sites and tell of their former greatness; but of this city, imperial Nineveh, not a single vestige seemed to remain, and the very place on which it had stood was only matter of conjecture. In fulfilment of prophecy, God made "an utter end of the place." It became a "desolation." In the days of the Greek historian Herodotus, B.C. 400, it had become a thing of the past; and when Xenophon the historian passed the place in the "Retreat of the Ten Thousand," the very memory of its name had been lost. It was buried out of sight, and no one knew its grave. It is never again to rise from its ruins. At length, after being lost for more than two thousand years, the city was disentombed. A little more than forty years ago the French consul at Mosul began to search the vast mounds that lay along the opposite bank of the river. The Arabs whom he employed in these excavations, to their great surprise, came upon the ruins of a building at the mound of Khorsabad, which, on further exploration, turned out to be the royal palace of Sargon, one of the Assyrian kings. They found their way into its extensive courts and chambers, and brought forth form its hidded depths many wonderful sculptures and other relics of those ancient times. The work of exploration has been carried on almost continuously by M. Botta, Sir Henry Layard, George Smith, and others, in the mounds of Nebi-Yunus, Nimrud, Koyunjik, and Khorsabad, and a vast treasury of specimens of old Assyrian art has been exhumed. Palace after palace has been discovered, with their decorations and their sculptured slabs, revealing the life and manners of this ancient people, their arts of war and peace, the forms of their religion, the style of their architecture, and the magnificence of their monarchs. The streets of the city have been explored, the inscriptions on the bricks and tablets and sculptured figures have been read, and now the secrets of their history have been brought to light. One of the most remarkable of recent discoveries is that of the library of King Assur-bani-pal, or, as the Greek historians call him, Sardanapalos, the grandson of Sennacherib (q.v.). (see  ASNAPPER .) This library consists of about ten thousand flat bricks or tablets, all written over with Assyrian characters. They contain a record of the history, the laws, and the religion of Assyria, of the greatest value. These strange clay leaves found in the royal library form the most valuable of all the treasuries of the literature of the old world. The library contains also old Accadian documents, which are the oldest extant documents in the world, dating as far back as probably about the time of Abraham. (see  SARGON .) "The Assyrian royalty is, perhaps, the most luxurious of our century [reign of Assur-bani-pa]...Its victories and conquests, uninterrupted for one hundred years, have enriched it with the spoil of twenty peoples. Sargon has taken what remained to the Hittites; Sennacherib overcame Chaldea, and the treasures of Babylon were transferred to his coffers; Esarhaddon and Assur-bani-pal himself have pillaged Egypt and her great cities, Sais, Memphis, and Thebes of the hundred gates...Now foreign merchants flock into Nineveh, bringing with them the most valuable productions from all countries, gold and perfume from South Arabia and the Chaldean Sea, Egyptian linen and glass-work, carved enamels, goldsmiths' work, tin, silver, Phoenician purple; cedar wood from Lebanon, unassailable by worms; furs and iron from Asia Minor and Armenia" (Ancient Egypt and Assyria,  by G. Maspero,  page 271). The bas-reliefs, alabaster slabs, and sculptured monuments found in these recovered palaces serve in a remarkable manner to confirm the Old Testament history of the kings of Israel. The appearance of the ruins shows that the destruction of the city was due not only to the assailing foe but also to the flood and the fire, thus confirming the ancient prophecies concerning it. "The recent excavations," says Rawlinson, "have shown that fire was a great instrument in the destruction of the Nineveh palaces. Calcined alabaster, charred wood, and charcoal, colossal statues split through with heat, are met with in parts of the Nineveh mounds, and attest the veracity of prophecy." Nineveh in its glory was ( Jonah 3:4 ) an "exceeding great city of three days' journey", i.e., probably in circuit. This would give a circumference of about 60 miles. At the four corners of an irregular quadrangle are the ruins of Kouyunjik, Nimrud, Karamless and Khorsabad. These four great masses of ruins, with the whole area included within the parallelogram they form by lines drawn from the one to the other, are generally regarded as composing the whole ruins of Nineveh.
SHALISHA|Shalisha, Land of  Probably the district of Baal-shalisha ( 2 Kings 4:42 ), lying about 12 miles north of Lydda ( 1 Samuel 9:4 ). 
GATH|A wine-vat, one of the five royal cities of the Philistines ( Joshua 13:3 ) on which the ark brought calamity ( 1 Samuel 5:8 ,  9;  6:17 ). It was famous also as being the birthplace or residence of Goliath ( 1 Samuel 17:4 ). David fled from Saul to Achish, king of Gath ( 1 Samuel 21:10 ;  27:2 -4;  Psalm 56 ), and his connection with it will account for the words in  2 Samuel 1:20 . It was afterwards conquered by David ( 2 Samuel 8:1 ). It occupied a strong position on the borders of Judah and Philistia ( 1 Samuel 21:10 ;  1 Chronicles 18:1 ). Its site has been identified with the hill called Tell esSafieh, the Alba Specula of the Middle Ages, which rises 695 feet above the plain on its east edge. It is noticed on monuments about B.C. 1500. (see  METHEGAMMAH .) 
ZUAR|     zu'-ar, zoo'-ar (tsu`-ar "little one"; Sogar): Father of Nethanel ( Numbers 1:8 ;  Numbers 2:5 ;  Numbers 7:18, 23 ; 10:15), who was head of the tribe of Issachar.
ELISABETH|God her oath, the mother of John the Baptist ( Luke 1:5 ). She was a descendant of Aaron. She and her husband Zacharias (q.v.) "were both righteous before God" ( Luke 1:5 ,  13). Mary's visit to Elisabeth is described in 1:39-63. 
RELATIONSHIPS|   , FAMILY  re-la'-shun-ships:  I. CONSANGUINITY  1. In General  2. Parents and Children  3. Brothers and Sisters  4. Uncles, Aunts, Cousins, Kinsmen  II. AFFINITY  1. Husband and Wife  2. Father-in-Law, etc.  3. Brother-in-Law, etc.  III. OTHER DOMESTIC RELATIONS  1. Foster-Father  2. Master and Servants  3. Host and Guest  4. The Dependent Stranger  The family or domestic relations of the Bible include  (1) those of consanguinity or blood relationship,  (2) affinity or marriage relationship, and  (3) legal convention.  Those of consanguinity may be divided into lineal and collateral groups; the former are those of parents and children, grandparents and grandchildren, and ancestors and descendants in general; the latter are those of brothers and sisters, uncles and aunts in relation to nephews and nieces, cousins of various degrees, including mere tribesmen and even remoter kinsfolk. The relations of affinity include besides that of husband and wife or concubine, the relations among rival wives, and their children, those of father-in-law and mother-in-law in relation to son-in-law and daughter-in-law, and those of brothers-in-law and sisters-in-law. The domestic relations based on legal convention are either legal fictions or the results of agreement: among the former we must include those of foster-father or mother and foster-children; among the latter the relations between master and the various classes of servants and slaves held by the ancient Hebrews, those between host and guest, especially where they became covenant brothers, and between the citizen and the stranger who had attached himself to him for his protection.  I. Consanguinity.  1. In General:  Genealogies were carefully kept by the ancient Hebrews (compare those of Genesis, Numbers, Chronicles, Ezra, Nehemiah, Matthew, Luke), not only because they formed the basis of a man's title to his property ( Numbers 27:8-11 ; exceptional case,  Numbers 36:1-12 ), but also because on one's pedigree depended the right of his family to intermarry with the priestly caste. Descent was traced through the father; a man's closest association was therefore with his father's family, and he was ordinarily referred to as the son of his father, thus Isaac the son of Abraham ( Genesis 25:19 ), Joshua the son of Nun, Caleb the son of Jephunneh ( Numbers 14:6 ). Still there are instances of men named for their mothers (Joab the son of Zeruiah), and a man's relation with his mother's family was fully recognized in the laws forbidding incest. No lineal relatives were permitted to intermarry ( Leviticus 18:7, 10 ). The relations of ancestors and descendants were considered so close that the ordinary terms of relationship between children and parents are used constantly in relation to grandparents and remoter ancestors. The wishes of a great-grandfather are respected long after his death as the wishes of a father ( Jeremiah 35:16 ).  2. Parents and Children:  The father ('abh; pater) was the head of the family (mishpachah) or household (bayith), which was a religious ( 1 Samuel 20:6, 29   Exodus 12:3   Job 1:5 ) as well as a social and political unit, consisting usually of a combination of families in the modern sense. As long as polygamy prevailed a family would include at least the several groups of children of the wives and concubines. The Bible represents the Hebrew father as commanding ( Genesis 50:16   Jeremiah 35:6   Proverbs 6:20 ), instructing ( Proverbs 1:8 ;  Proverbs 4:1 ), and rebuking ( Genesis 37:10   Numbers 12:14 ); at the same time, as loving ( Genesis 25:28 ;  Genesis 37:4 ;  Genesis 44:20 ), pitying ( Psalm 103:13 ), and blessing his household ( Genesis 27:41 ), rejoicing over its triumphs ( Proverbs 10:1 ;  Proverbs 15:20 ), or grieving over its misfortunes ( Genesis 37:35 ). The mother, too ('em; meter), naturally displays love and care ( Genesis 25:28   Proverbs 4:3   Isaiah 49:15 ;  Isaiah 66:13 ). To the Hebrew woman childlessness was considered the greatest of misfortunes ( 1 Samuel 1:10 , of Hannah;  Genesis 30:23 , of Rachel). Children were looked upon as a blessing from God ( Psalm 127:3 ) and the defenders of the home ( Psalm 127:4, 5 ). In early life a child was more directly under the control of the mother than the father; the mother was its first teacher ( Proverbs 1:8 ). Thereafter the father was expected to direct the training of the son (ben; huios, teknon) ( Genesis 18:19   Exodus 12:26 ;  Exodus 13:8, 14, 15   Deuteronomy 6:7 ), while the daughter (bath; thugater) probably remained with the mother until her marriage ( Micah 7:6 ). Both parents are looked upon in the Law as objects of honor ( Exodus 20:12  parallel  Deuteronomy 5:16  (the Fifth Commandment);  Exodus 21:15   Leviticus 20:9   Deuteronomy 27:16   Proverbs 20:20   Ezekiel 22:7 ;  Micah 7:6 ), obedience ( Genesis 28:7   Leviticus 19:3   Deuteronomy 21:18   Proverbs 1:8 ;  Proverbs 30:17 ) and love ( 1 Kings 19:20   Proverbs 28:24 ;  Proverbs 30:11 ). The control of parents was so great as to include the right to sell daughters in marriage, but not, without restrictions, into slavery ( Exodus 21:7-11 ; compare  Exodus 22:16   Nehemiah 5:5 ), and never into a life of shame ( Leviticus 19:29 ); they could chastise children ( Deuteronomy 8:5 ;  Deuteronomy 21:18   Proverbs 13:24 ; compare Ecclesiasticus 30:1-13), and in the early days even exerted the power of life and death over them ( Genesis 22   Judges 11:39   Leviticus 18:21 ;  Leviticus 20:2-5   2 Kings 23:10 ; compare  Matthew 15:4 ). This power, at least for sacrificial purposes, was entirely removed by the Law, and changed, even for punishment, in the case of a stubborn, rebellious, gluttonous and disobedient son to a mere right of complaint to the proper authorities ( Deuteronomy 21:18-21 ), who were to put him to death. Infanticide by exposure, such as was common among other ancient peoples, seems never to have been practiced by the Hebrews. That the children were nevertheless the chattels of the parents seems to be attested from the fact that they could be seized for the debts of the father ( 2 Kings 4:1 ). The father could annul the vows of his daughter ( Numbers 30:3-5 ), and damages for wrongs done to her were paid to him, as in English law "for loss of services" ( Deuteronomy 22:29 ). A widowed or divorced daughter could return to her father ( Genesis 38:11   Leviticus 22:13   Ruth 1:15 ). At his death the mother would become the actual, if not the legal, head of the household ( 2 Kings 8:1-6 , the Shunammite woman; Tob 1:8, Tobit's grandmother; compare the position of the mother of Jesus). This was especially true of the queen mother (gebhirah), whose name is usually given in the accounts of the kings of Judah ( 1 Kings 1:11 ;  1 Kings 2:19 , where a throne at the king's right hand was set for the king's mother;  1 Kings 11:26 ;  1 Kings 14:21, 31 ; 15:2, 10, 13; 22:42  2 Kings 8:26 ;  2 Kings 10:13 ;  2 Kings 14:2 ;  2 Kings 15:2, 33 ; 18:02; 21:1, 19; 22:01; 23:31, 36; 24:8, 12, 15, 18  2 Chronicles 22:2   Jeremiah 13:18 ;  Jeremiah 22:26 ; see QUEEN MOTHER). While it is true that the position of the widowed mother depended to some extent on the will of her son ( 1 Kings 2:18 ), it must be remembered that the sense of filial duty was highly developed among all classes in Palestine ( Joshua 2:13, 18 ;  Joshua 6:23   1 Samuel 22:3   2 Samuel 19:37   1 Kings 19:20 ). The rebellion of children marked the acme of social degeneration ( Micah 7:6   Proverbs 30:11 ); on the other hand the "great day" according to Malachi (4:5 (Hebrew 3:23)) is one of conciliation of parents and children.  3. Brothers and Sisters:  The terms "brother" ('ach; adelphos) and "sister" ('ahoth; adelphe) apply to children of the same father and mother ( Genesis 4:2 ), and also to children of one father ( Genesis 20:12 ) or of one mother ( Genesis 43:7   Leviticus 18:9 ;  Leviticus 20:17 ). The brother as well as the father was the natural protector of the honor of his sister; thus, the sons of Jacob speak of Dinah as "our daughter" ( Genesis 34:17 ). Absalom feels more deeply aggrieved over the crime against Tamar than does David himself ( 2 Samuel 13:21 ). The brother's other duties toward a sister were very much like those of a father ( Songs 8:8 ). The Law strictly forbids the intermarriage of brother and sister, whether of the same father and mother or not, whether born at home or born abroad, as a "disgraceful thing" (chesedh, a different word from checedh, "kindness" ( Leviticus 18:9, 11 ;  Leviticus 20:17 ). In earlier times marriage between half-brother and sister was allowable ( Genesis 20:12 ; compare  2 Samuel 13:13 ). In fact, we are expressly told that the laws against incest were not obeyed by the Egyptians or the Canaanites ( Leviticus 18:3 ; 20:23). Brotherly sentiment was highly developed ( Genesis 24:60   Joshua 2:13   Proverbs 17:17 ; compare  Leviticus 25:35   Deuteronomy 15:11 ;  Deuteronomy 25:3 ); the dwelling of brothers together in unity is considered good and pleasant ( Psalm 133:1 ). Brothers were ever ready to protect or avenge each other ( 2 Samuel 3:27 ). Indeed, it is part of the unwritten, common law, recognized though not necessarily approved in the Bible, that the brother or next of kin, the go'el, is expected to avenge a death ( Numbers 35:19   Deuteronomy 19:6   Joshua 20:3   2 Samuel 14:11 ), and no punishment is meted out to prevent such self-help, unless it occurs in a refuge-city. A brother was also expected to ransom a captive or slave ( Leviticus 25:48   Psalm 49:7 ). Half-brothers were of course not so near as brothers of the full blood (compare Joseph and his brothers), and it is not surprising to find the sons of a wife despising and driving out the son of a harlot ( Judges 11:1 , Jephthah). The words "brother" and "sister" are used frequently of more distant relationships (see below) and figuratively of a friend.  4. Uncles, Aunts, Cousins, Kinsmen:  The Hebrew dodh ( Leviticus 10:4 , "uncles";  Numbers 36:11 , "cousins";  1 Samuel 14:50 ), coming from a primitive caressing word, possibly indicating "dandle" "fondle" "love" means both "uncle" and "beloved." It is used of the father's and also of the mother's brother, and the corresponding feminine form (dodhah) is used of the father's sister ( Exodus 6:20 ; compare  Numbers 26:59 ) and even of the father's brother's wife ( Leviticus 18:14 ;  Leviticus 20:20 ). Intermarriage between nephew and aunt (i.e. father's sister, mother's sister, or father's brother's wife, or, in general, uncle's wife) was prohibited ( Leviticus 18:12, 13, 14 ;  Leviticus 20:19, 20 ), though nothing is said of intermarriage between uncle and niece nor between cousins (compare  Numbers 36:11 ). On the relations between uncle and nephew compare the Bible accounts of Jacob and Laban, Abraham and Lot, David and Joab, etc. In a more general sense the word dodh is used of kinsmen,  Amos 6:10  (where the dodh, "even he that burneth him" (mecarepho, perhaps "maternal uncle"; the Jewish Encyclopedia, under the word "Cremation"), takes charge of a dead body); ben dodh is used of cousin (compare ben 'ahi 'immo, brother of his mother," etc.) and bath dodh of a female cousin. For other relations of this and remoter degrees the word for brother is loosely used (e.g. of nephews,  Genesis 13:8 ;  Genesis 14:14 , etc.; of tribesmen,  Leviticus 21:10 ; and of more distant relatives,  Deuteronomy 2:4, 8 ;  Deuteronomy 23:7 ).  II. Affinity.  1. Husband and Wife:  The husband ('ish; compare ba`al,  Hosea 2:16 ; aner), though in a sense leaving father and mother for his wife ('ishshah; gune) ( Genesis 2:24 ), under normal conditions remained a member of his father's family. If such passages as  Genesis 2:24 ;  Genesis 21:10 ;  Genesis 24:5, 67 ; 30:03:00; 31:31  Judges 4:17 ;; 5:24;; 8:19; 9:3, indicate the existence in pre-Biblical times of a matriarchate, the allusions are at least too vague to justify the predication of its persistence in Biblical times. The wife was "taken" by her husband, or "given" by her father or, in the case of a servant, by her master or mistress ( Genesis 2:22 ;  Genesis 16:3 ;  Genesis 34:9, 21 ), and although the contract was between the men ( Genesis 29 ;  Genesis 34:16   Exodus 22:16   Deuteronomy 22:29   Ruth 4:10 ) or the parents ( Genesis 21:21 ;  Genesis 24 ), it is probable that the consent of the girl was usually asked ( Genesis 24:58 ). Love between the young people was given due consideration (as in the case of Samson, Shechem, Jacob and Rachel ( Genesis 29:18 ), David and Michal ( 1 Samuel 18:20 )); at least it developed among married people, so that Hosea could compare the attitude of husband toward wife to that of Yahweh toward Israel. As a matter of legal right, it is probable that throughout the Orient long before the events narrated in the Book of Esther, every man did "bear rule in his own house" ( Esther 1:22 ). In fact a precedent for the Persian decree has been traced as far back as the first human pair ( Genesis 3:16 ). Nevertheless, we find many instances in which the wife seems to take the lead in the affairs of the household, as in the case of Samson's parents ( Judges 13:23 ), of the Shunammite woman ( 2 Kings 4 ), of Jael ( Judges 4:18 ; 5:24), of Achsah ( Joshua 15:18   Judges 1:12 f ), and in less pleasant matters of Jezebel ( 1 Kings 18:4 ;  1 Kings 21 ), Sapphira ( Acts 5:2 ), and Zeresh ( Esther 5:14 ), who were at least consulted in the affairs of their several households. Abraham is even commanded by the voice of God, "In all that Sarah saith unto thee, hearken unto her voice" ( Genesis 21:12 ). That most women were not so fortunate is probably best attested by the fact that at least in the earlier times the best of them had to resort to stratagem to accomplish their purposes (as in the cases of Rebekah ( Genesis 27:6 ), Rachel ( Genesis 31:34 ), Leah ( Genesis 30:16 ) and Abigail ( 1 Samuel 25:18 ), and even to get information as to their husband's affairs (Sarah,  Genesis 18:10 ; Rebekah,  Genesis 27:5 )). Perhaps their humbler sisters in later days accomplished their ends by being so contentious as to attract the notice of two proverb-collectors ( Proverbs 21:9 ;  Proverbs 25:24 ). Though we have no instance of the exercise of the right of life and death over the wife by the husband, and though it is clear that the Hebrew husband had no power of sale (compare  Exodus 21:8 ), it is frequently asserted on the basis of the one-sided divorce doctrine of the Old Testament ( Deuteronomy 24:1 ), and on the basis of analogy with other ancient laws, as well as because the wife is spoken of in conjunction with property ( Exodus 20:17 ) and because the husband exercised the right to annul the wife's vows ( Numbers 30:6 ), that the wife occupied in the ordinary Hebrew home a very subordinate position. It must not be forgotten, however, that the husband owed duties to the wife ( Exodus 21:10 ). It must also be borne in mind that great divergence existed at different times and places, and in different stations of society. Most of our Old Testament evidence pertains to the wealthier classes. The two extremes of the women that are "at ease in Zion" ( Isaiah 32:9-20 ; compare  Amos 4:1 ; 6:1) and the busy "good wife" described in  Proverbs 31:10 ; are hardly exceeded in the most complex society today. The latter probably gives the fairer as well as the more wholesome picture of the functions of the wife in the home, and it is significant that her husband as well as her sons are expected to call her blessed ( Proverbs 31:28 ).  It is difficult to estimate the extent to which polygamy and concubinage were practiced in ancient Palestine, but it is clear that the former practice was discouraged even among kings ( Deuteronomy 17:17 ), and the latter, an outgrowth of slavery, was not held in high repute (compare  Deuteronomy 21:10-14 ). The position of a less-favored wife ( Deuteronomy 21:15 , "hated") was naturally unpleasant, and her relations with other wives of her husband decidedly bitter-they were called each other's tsaroth, literally, "vexers" (the Revised Version (British and American) "rivals,"  Leviticus 18:18   1 Samuel 1:6 , the King James Version "adversary"; compare Ecclesiasticus 37:11)-even when they were sisters (as in the case of Rachel and Leah,  Genesis 30:1 ). Hence, the Law forbade the marrying of two sisters ( Leviticus 18:18 ). On the other hand so strong was the desire of a Hebrew mother for children that the childless wife welcomed the children of a maidservant born to her husband as her own ( Genesis 30:1-12 , etc.).  2. Father-in-Law, etc.:  In normal Hebrew society, for reasons already explained, the relations of a family with the husband's parents (cham, from chamoth) were closer than those with the wife's parents (chothen, feminine chotheneth; pentheros, penthera. Where under special conditions a man remained with his wife's tribe after marriage, as in the case of Jacob, serving out his mohar, or Moses fleeing from the wrath of the Egyptians, or the sons of Elimelech sojourning in the land of Moab because of the famine in Palestine, his identity with his own tribe was not destroyed, and at the first opportunity the natural impulse was to return to his own country. The bride, on the other hand, leaving her people, would become a member of her husband's family, with all the rights and duties of a daughter ( Micah 7:6 ). Thus Judah can order Tamar burned for violation of the obligations of a widow ( Genesis 38:24 ). No doubt the position of the daughter-in-law varied in the Hebrew home between the extremes of those who vexed their parents-in-law unto-the death ( Genesis 26:35 ;  Genesis 27:46 ;  Genesis 28:8 ) and the one who said to her mother-in-law, "Yahweh do so to me.... if aught but death part thee and me" ( Ruth 1:17 ). Parents-in-law and children-in-law were considered too closely related to intermarry ( Leviticus 18:15 ;  Leviticus 20:12, 14 ).  3. Brother-in-Law, etc.:  A woman's brother acting in loco parentis might perform all the offices of a father-in-law and possibly be called chothen ( Genesis 24:50, 55 ;  Genesis 34:11 ). Naturally, brothers-in-law and sisters-in-law would be considered too closely related to intermarry ( Leviticus 18:16, 18 ;  Leviticus 20:21 ). Nevertheless the husband's brother (yabham) was expected to marry the childless widow to establish the name of the deceased on his inheritance ( Deuteronomy 25:5-10 ). This custom dated back to Canaanitic practice ( Genesis 38:8 ), and from the connection between marrying the childless widow and the redemption of land may be called a part of the land law of Palestine ( Ruth 4:1-12 ; compare  Jeremiah 32:6 ). In practice the Levirate was probably considered more in the nature of a moral duty than a privilege ( Deuteronomy 25:7   Ruth 4:6 ), and devolved not only on the brother, but on other members of a deceased husband's family in the order of the nearness of their relationship to him ( Ruth 3:12 ). In the Hebrew family brothers-in-law and sisters-in-law would form part of the same household. In this relation as in others we find both ideal friendship (David and Jonathan,  1 Samuel 18:3   2 Samuel 1:26 ) and petty jealousies (in the matter of Moses' wife,  Numbers 12:1 ).  III. Other Domestic Relations.  1. Foster-father:  The Hebrew 'omen, feminine 'omeneth (participle of 'aman), literally, "nourishing," is translated "nursing father" ( Numbers 11:12   Isaiah 49:23 ), nursing mother" ( Isaiah 49:23 ), "nurse" ( Ruth 4:16   2 Samuel 4:4 ), or simply as the equivalent of "bringing up" ( 2 Kings 10:1, 5   Esther 2:7 ). In the case of Esther and of Ahab's children, and possibly in the other instances referred to, the relation of foster-parents is suggested. The foster-children under such conditions obeyed the words of the foster-father as the words of a father ( Esther 2:20 ). Michal is spoken of as the mother of Merab's two children ( 2 Samuel 21:8 ) because she reared them (Sanhedhrin 19b). Adoption in the Roman sense was, however, hardly to be expected in a polygamous society where the childless father could remarry. Nevertheless, Jacob adopts Manasseh and Ephraim ( Genesis 48:5 ), and thereby makes them the fathers of tribes. According to Josephus, while Abraham was childless he adopted Lot (Ant., I, vii, 1), and the daughter of Pharaoh adopted Moses (Ant., II, ix, 7; compare  Exodus 2:10 ). In New Testament times the notion of adoption was so familiar that Paul uses the word figuratively of conversion (huiothesia,  Romans 8:15 ;  Romans 9:4   Galatians 4:5   Ephesians 1:5 ).  2. Master and Servants:  The "family" as the word is used of ancient peoples included dependents. The Hebrew mishpachah is connected with the word shiphchah, "maidservant," as the Latin familia is connected with famulus, "servant." For a discussion of the various classes of servants and slaves, Hebrew and foreign, male and female, see SLAVERY.  3. Host and Guest:  When Lot protested against betraying his visitors to the men of Sodom, forasmuch as they had come under the shadow of his roof, and he even preferred to give his daughters to the mob rather than fail in his duties as a host ( Genesis 19:8 ), he was acting on the ancient principle of guest-friendship (compare Greek xenia), which bound host and guest by sacred ties.  Read Complete Article...    FAMILY RELATIONSHIPS  See  RELATIONSHIPS, FAMILY .
JAALAH|   JAALA;   ja'-a-la, ja-a'-la (ya`ala', meaning unknown,  Nehemiah 7:58 ) and (ya`alah, "mountain goat" (?),  Ezra 2:56 ): The name of a family of returned exiles, "children of Solomon's servants" = "Jeeli" in 1 Esdras 5:33.
CYRENE|A city (now Tripoli) in Upper Libya, North Africa, founded by a colony of Greeks (B.C. 630). It contained latterly a large number of Jews, who were introduced into the city by Ptolemy, the son of Lagus, because he thought they would contribute to the security of the place. They increased in number and influence; and we are thus prepared for the frequent references to them in connection with the early history of Christianity. Simon, who bore our Lord's cross, was a native of this place ( Matthew 27:32 ;  Mark 15:21 ). Jews from Cyrene were in Jerusalem at Pentecost ( Acts 2:10 ); and Cyrenian Jews had a synagogue at Jerusalem ( 6:9 ). Converts belonging to Cyrene contributed to the formation of the first Gentile church at Antioch ( 11:20 ). Among "the prophets and teachers" who "ministered to the Lord at Antioch" was Lucius of Cyrene ( 13:1 ). 
ELEAZAR|God has helped.  (1.) The third son of Aaron ( Exodus 6:23 ). His wife, a daughter of Putiel, bore him Phinehas ( Exodus 6:25 ). After the death of Nadab and Abihu ( Leviticus 10:12 ;  Numbers 3:4 ) he was appointed to the charge of the sanctuary ( Numbers 3:32 ). On Mount Hor he was clothed with the sacred vestments, which Moses took from off his brother Aaron and put upon him as successor to his father in the high priest's office, which he held for more than twenty years ( Numbers 20:25 -29). He took part with Moses in numbering the people ( 26:3 ,  4), and assisted at the inauguration of Joshua. He assisted in the distribution of the land after the conquest ( Joshua 14:1 ). The high-priesthood remained in his family till the time of Eli, into whose family it passed, till it was restored to the family of Eleazar in the person of Zadok ( 1 Samuel 2:35 ; Comp.  1 Kings 2:27 ). "And Eleazar the son of Aaron died; and they buried him in a hill that pertained to Phinehas his son" ( Joshua 24:33 ). The word here rendered "hill" is Gibeah, the name of several towns in Palestine which were generally on or near a hill. The words may be more suitably rendered, "They buried him in Gibeah of Phinehas", i.e., in the city of Phinehas, which has been identified, in accordance with Jewish and Samaritan traditions, with Kefr Ghuweirah=`Awertah, about 7 miles north of Shiloh, and a few miles south-east of Nablus. "His tomb is still shown there, overshadowed by venerable terebinths." Others, however, have identified it with the village of Gaba or Gebena of Eusebius, the modern Khurbet Jibia, 5 miles north of Guphna towards Nablus. (2.) An inhabitant of Kirjath-jearim who was "sanctified" to take charge of the ark, although not allowed to touch it, while it remained in the house of his father Abinadab ( 1 Samuel 7:1 ,  2; Comp.  Numbers 3:31 ;  4:15 ). (3.) The son of Dodo the Ahohite, of the tribe of Benjamin, one of the three most eminent of David's thirty-seven heroes ( 1 Chronicles 11:12 ) who broke through the Philistine host and brought him water from the well of Bethlehem ( 2 Samuel 23:9 ,  16). (4.) A son of Phinehas associated with the priests in taking charge of the sacred vessels brought back to Jerusalem after the Exile ( Ezra 8:33 ). (5.) A Levite of the family of Merari ( 1 Chronicles 23:21 ,  22). 
PAULUS|Sergius Paulus  A "prudent man" (R.V.,  "man of understanding"), the deputy (R.V.,  "proconsul") of Cyprus ( Acts 13:6 -13). He became a convert to Christianity under Paul, who visited this island on his first mission to the heathen. A remarkable memorial of this proconsul was recently (1887) discovered at Rome. On a boundary stone of Claudius his name is found, among others, as having been appointed (A.D. 47) one of the curators of the banks and the channel of the river Tiber. After serving his three years as proconsul at Cyprus, he returned to Rome, where he held the office referred to. As he is not saluted in Paul's letter to the Romans, he probably died before it was written. 
HAZZELELPONI|     haz-e-lel-po'-ni (hatstselelponi): A feminine name occurring in the list of the genealogy of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:3 ); probably representing a clan.
SHOBAL|Pilgrim.  (1.) The second son of Seir the Horite; one of the Horite "dukes" ( Genesis 36:20 ). (2.) One of the sons of Caleb, and a descendant of Hur ( 1 Chronicles 2:50 ,  52;  4:1 ,  2). 
TONGUES|Tongues, Confusion of At Babel, the cause of the early separation of mankind and their division into nations. The descendants of Noah built a tower to prevent their dispersion; but God "confounded their language" ( Genesis 11:1 -8), and they were scattered over the whole earth. Till this time "the whole earth was of one language and of one speech." (see  SHINAR .)  Tongues, Gift of Granted on the day of Pentecost ( Acts 2:4 ), in fulfilment of a promise Christ had made to his disciples ( Mark 16:17 ). What this gift actually was has been a subject of much discussion. Some have argued that it was merely an outward sign of the presence of the Holy Spirit among the disciples, typifying his manifold gifts, and showing that salvation was to be extended to all nations. But the words of Luke ( Acts 2:9 ) clearly show that the various peoples in Jerusalem at the time of Pentecost did really hear themselves addressed in their own special language with which they were naturally acquainted (Comp.  Joel 2:28 ,  29). Among the gifts of the Spirit the apostle enumerates in  1 Corinthians 12:10 - 14:30 , "divers kinds of tongues" and the "interpretation of tongues." This "gift" was a different manifestation of the Spirit from that on Pentecost, although it resembled it in many particulars. Tongues were to be "a sign to them that believe not." 
MIDIANITES|   MIDIAN;   mid'-i-an, mid'-i-an-its (midhyan, midhyanim; Madiam, Madienaioi):  1. The See d of Abraham to the Time of the Judges:  Midian was a son of Abraham by his concubine Keturah. To him were born 5 sons, Ephah, Epher, Hanoch, Abida and Eldaah ( Genesis 25:2, 4   1 Chronicles 1:32 f ). Bearing gifts from Abraham, he and his brothers, each with his own household, moved off from Isaac into "the east country" ( Genesis 25:6 ). The first recorded incident in the history of the tribe is a defeat suffered "in the field of Moab" at the hands of Hadad, king of Edom. Of this nothing beyond the fact is known ( Genesis 36:35   1 Chronicles 1:46 ). The Midianites next appear as merchantmen traveling from Gilead to Egypt, with "spicery and balm and myrrh," with no prejudice against a turn of slave-dealing ( Genesis 37:25 ). Moses, on fleeing from Egypt, found refuge in the land of Midian, and became son-in-law of Jethro, the priest of Midian ( Exodus 2:15, 21 ). In Midian Moses received his commission to Israel in Egypt ( Exodus 4:19 ). A Midianite, familiar with the desert, acted as guide ("instead of eyes") to the children of Israel in their wilderness wanderings ( Numbers 10:29 ). The friendly relations between Israel and Midian, which seem to have prevailed at first, had been ruptured, and we find the elders of Midian acting with those of Moab in calling Balaam to curse Israel ( Numbers 22:4-7 ). Because of the grievous sin into which they had seduced Israel on the shrewd advice of Balaam, a war of vengeance was made against the Midianites in which five of their chiefs perished; the males were ruthlessly slain, and Balaam also was put to death ( Numbers 25:15, 17 ;  Numbers 31:2 ). We next hear of Midian as oppressing Israel for 7 years. Along with the Amalekites and the children of the East they swarmed across the Jordan, and their multitudinous beasts swept up the produce of the earth. Overwhelming disaster befell this horde at the onset of Gideon's chosen men. In the battle and pursuit "there fell a hundred and twenty thousand men that drew sword"; their kings, Zebah and Zalmunna, and their princes, Oreb and Zeeb, sharing the common fate ( Judges 6 ;  Judges 7 ;  Judges 7 8 ). Echoes of this glorious victory-"the day of Midian"-are heard in later literature ( Psalm 83:9   Isaiah 9:4 ;  Isaiah 10:26   Habakkuk 3:7 ).  2. The Kenite Branch:  The Kenites appear to have been a branch of the Midianites. Jethro could hardly have attained the dignity of the priesthood in Midian had he been of alien blood ( Judges 1:16 ). See  KENITES . Again, the tribesmen are named indifferently Ishmaelites and Midianites ( Genesis 37:25, 28, 36   Judges 8:22, 24 ). They must therefore have stood in close relations with the descendants of Hagar's son.  3. Modern Arabs:  The representations of Midian in Scripture are consistent with what we know of the immemorial ways of Arabian tribes, now engaged in pastoral pursuits, again as carriers of merchandise, and yet again as freebooters. Such tribes often roam through wide circles. They appear not to have practiced circumcision ( Exodus 4:25 ), which is now practically universal among the Arabs. The men wore golden ornaments, as do the modern nomads ( Judges 8:24 ).  4. Historical References:  The name of "Midian" is not found in Egyptian or Assyrian documents. Delitzsch (Wo lag das Paradies? 304) suggests that Ephah ( Genesis 25:4 ) may be identical with Chayapa of the cuneiform inscriptions. If this is correct the references point to the existence of this Midianite tribe in the North of el-Chijaz in the times of Tiglath-pileser and Sargon (745-705 B.C.). Isaiah speaks of Midian and Ephah apparently as separate tribes, whose dromedaries bear gold and frankincense to Zion (60:6); but he gives no hint of the districts they occupied. The tribe of Ghifar, found in the neighborhood of Medina in Mohammed's day, Knobel would identify with Epher, another of Midian's sons.  5. Territory:  No boundaries can now be assigned to "the land of Midian." It included territory on the West as well as on the East of the Gulf of `Aqaba ( Exodus 4:19 ). It lay between Edom and Paran ( 1 Kings 11:18 ). In the time of the Judges their district seems to have extended northward to the East of Gilead (8:10).  A trace of the ancient name is found in that of Madyah, a place mentioned by the Arabic geographers, with a plentiful supply of water, now called Maghair Sho`aib. It lies East of the Gulf of `Aqaba, some miles from the coast, almost opposite the point of the Sinaitic peninsula. The name Sho`aib, given by Mohammed to Jethro, may here be due to ancient Midianite tradition.  W. Ewing
OSEE|     o'-ze, o'-se (Hosee): the King James Version in  Romans 9:25 ; the prophet Hosea (thus the Revised Version (British and American)).
MELICU|     mel'-i-ku (melikhu, also melukhi, "regnant"): Same as MALLUCHI (which see).
BETAH|Confidence, a city belonging to Hadadezer, king of Zobah, which yielded much spoil of brass to David ( 2 Samuel 8:8 ). In  1 Chronicles 18:8  it is called Tibhath. 
ESHCOL|Bunch; brave.  (1.) A young Amoritish chief who joined Abraham in the recovery of Lot from the hands of Chedorlaomer ( Genesis 14:13 ,  24). (2.) A valley in which the spies obtained a fine cluster of grapes ( Numbers 13:23 ,  24; "the brook Eshcol, " A.V.; "the valley of Eshcol, " R.V.), which they took back with them to the camp of Israel as a specimen of the fruits of the Promised Land. On their way back they explored the route which led into the south (the Negeb) by the western edge of the mountains at Telilat el-`Anab, i.e., "grape-mounds", near Beersheba. "In one of these extensive valleys, perhaps in Wady Hanein, where miles of grape-mounds even now meet the eye, they cut the gigantic clusters of grapes, and gathered the pomegranates and figs, to show how goodly was the land which the Lord had promised for their inheritance.", Palmer's Desert of the Exodus. 
HEZRON|Enclosed.  (1.) One of the sons of Reuben ( Genesis 46:9 ;  Exodus 6:14 ).  (2.) The older of the two sons of Pharez ( Genesis 46:12 ).  (3.) A plain in the south of Judah, west of Kadesh-barnea ( Joshua 15:3 ). 
GABBATHA|Gab Baitha, i.e., "the ridge of the house" = "the temple-mound," on a part of which the fortress of Antonia was built. This "temple-mound" was covered with a tesselated "pavement" (Gr. lithostroton,  i.e.,  "stone-paved"). A judgement-seat (bema) was placed on this "pavement" outside the hall of the "praetorium" (q.v.), the judgment-hall ( John 18:28 ;  19:13 ). 
NATIONS|   DESIRE OF ALL   This phrase occurs only in  Haggai 2:7  (King James Version, the English Revised Version "desirable things," the American Revised Version, margin "things desired"), and is commonly applied to the Messiah.  At the erection of the temple in Ezra's time, the older men who had seen the more magnificent house of Solomon were disappointed and distressed at the comparison. The prophet, therefore, is directed to encourage them by the assurance that Yahweh is with them nevertheless, and in a little while will shake the heavens, the earth, the sea, the dry land and the nations, and "the desire of all nations" shall come, and the house shall be filled with glory, so that "the later glory of this house shall be greater than the former."  (1) Many expositors refer the prophecy to the first advent of Christ. The shaking of the heavens, the earth, the sea and the dry land is the figurative setting of the shaking of the nations, while this latter expression refers to those changes of earthly dominion coincident with the overthrow of the Persians by the Greeks, the Greeks by the Romans, and so on down to the beginning of our era. The house then in process of construction was filled with glory by the later presence of the Messiah, which glory was greater than the Shekinah of Solomon's time. Objections are presented to this view as follows: First, there is the element of time. Five centuries, more or less, elapsed between the building of Ezra's temple and the first advent of Christ, and the men of Ezra's time needed comfort for the present. Then there is the difficulty of associating the physical phenomena with any shaking of the nations occurring atthe first advent. Furthermore, in what sense, it is asked, could Christ, when He came, be said to be the desire of all nations? And finally, what comfort would a Jew find in this magnifying of the Gentiles?  (2) These difficulties, though not insuperable, lead others to apply the prophecy to the second advent of Christ. The Jews are to be restored to Jerusalem, and another temple is to be built (Ezekiel 40-48). The shaking of the nations and the physical phenomena find their fulfillment in the "Great Tribulation" so often spoken of in the Old Testament and Revelation, and which is followed by the coming of Christ in glory to set up His kingdom ( Malachi 3:1   Matthew 24:29, 30  and other places). Some of the difficulties spoken of in the first instance apply here also, but not all of them, while others are common to both interpretations. One such common difficulty is that Ezra's temple can hardly be identified with that of the time of Herod and Christ, and certainly not with that of Ezekiel; which is met, however, by saying that all the temples, including Solomon's, are treated as but one "house"-the house of the Lord, in the religious sense, at least, if not architecturally. Another such difficulty touches the question of time, which, whether it includes five centuries or twenty, is met by the principle that to the prophets, "ascending in heart to God and the eternity of God, all times and all things of this world are only a mere point." When the precise time of particular events is not revealed, they sometimes describe them as continuous, and sometimes blend two events together, having a near or partial, and also a remote or complete fulfillment. "They saw the future in space rather than in time, or the perspective rather than the actual distance." It is noted that the Lord Jesus so blends together the destruction of Jerusalem by Titus, A.D. 70, and the days of the anti-Christ at the end of this age, that it is difficult to separate them, and to say which belongs exclusively to either ( Matthew 24 ). That the words may have an ultimate fulfillment in the second advent of Christ receives strength from a comparison of  Haggai 2:21, 22  with  Hebrews 12:26, 27 . The writer of that epistle condenses the two passages in  Haggai 2:6, 7  and  Haggai 2:21, 22 , implying that it was one and the same shaking, of which the former verses denote the beginning, and the latter the end. The shaking, in other words, began introductory to the first advent and will be finished at the second. Concerning the former, compare  Matthew 3:17 ;  Matthew 27:51 ;  Matthew 28:2   Acts 2:2 ;  Acts 4:31 , and concerning the latter,  Matthew 24:7   Revelation 16:20 ;  Revelation 20:11  (Bengel, quoted by Canon Faussett).  (3) Other expositors seek to cut the Gordian knot by altogether denying the application to the Messiah, and translating "the desire of all nations" by "the beauty," or "the desirable things of all nations," i.e. their precious gifts (see  Isaiah 60:5, 11 ;  Isaiah 61:6 ). This application is defended in the following way:  (a) The Hebrew word means the quality and not the thing desired;  (b) the Messiah was not desired by all the nations when He came;  (c) the verb "shall come" is plural, which requires the noun to be understood in the plural, whereas if the Messiah be intended, the noun is singular;  (d) "The silver is mine," etc. ( Haggai 2:8 ) accords with the translation "the desirable things of all nations";  (e) the agreement of the Septuagint and Syriac versions with such rendering.  All these arguments, however, can be fairly met by counter-arguments, leaving the reader still in doubt.  (a) An abstract noun is often put for the concrete;  (b) the result shows that while the Jews rejected Christ, the Gentiles received and hence, desired Him;  (c) where two nouns stand together after the manner of "the desire" and "nations," the verb agrees in number sometimes with the latter, even though the former be its nominative;  (d) the 8th verse of the prophecy can be harmonized about as easily with one view as the other;  (e) the King James Version is sustained by the Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) and early Jewish rabbis.  James M. Gray  DISPERSION OF NATIONS  See  BABEL ;  DISPERSION ; TABLE OF NATIONS.  HAROSHETH, OF THE GENTILES, OF THE NATIONS  ha-ro'-sheth or (charosheth ha-goyim): There is now no means of discovering what is meant by the phrase "of the nations." This is the place whence Sisera led his hosts to the Kishon against Deborah and Barak ( Judges 4:13 ), to which the discomfited and leaderless army fled after their defeat ( Judges 4:16 ). No site seems so well to meet the requirements of the narrative as el Charithiyeh. There are still the remains of an ancient stronghold on this great double mound, which rises on the North bank of the Kishon, in the throat of the pass leading by the base of Carmel, from the coast to Esdraelon. It effectually commands the road which here climbs the slope, and winds through the oak forest to the plain; Megiddo being some 16 miles distant. The modern also preserves a reminiscence of the ancient name. By emending the text, Cheyne would here find the name "Kadshon," to be identified with Kedesh in Galilee (EB, under the word). On any reasonable reading of the narrative this is unnecessary.  W. Ewing
HADASHAH|New, a city in the valley of Judah ( Joshua 15:37 ). 
SHOSHANNIM|Lilies, the name of some musical instrument, probably like a lily in shape ( Psalm 45 ; 69,  title). Some think that an instrument of six strings is meant. 
SCRIPTURES|   SEARCH THE   The sentence beginning with (eraunate), in  John 5:39  the King James Version has been almost universally regarded as meaning "Search the scriptures, for in them ye think ye have eternal life." But one cannot read as far as dokeite, "ye think," without feeling that there is something wrong with the ordinary version. This verb is at least a disturbing element in the current of thought (if not superfluous), and only when the first verb is taken as an indicative does the meaning of the writer become clear. The utterance is not a command, but a declaration: "Ye search the scriptures, because ye think that in them," etc. Robert Barclay as early as 1675, in his Apology for the True Christian Divinity (91;), refers to two scholars before him who had handed down the correct tradition: "Moreover, that place may be taken in the indicative mood, Ye search the Scriptures; which interpretation the Greek word will bear, and so Pasor translated it: which by the reproof following seemeth also to be the more genuine interpretation, as Cyrillus long ago hath observed." So Dr. Edwin A. Abbott, in his Johannine Grammar (London, 1906, section 2439 (i)). See also Transactions American Philological Association, 1901, 64 f.  J. E. Harry  SCRIPTURES, SEARCH THE  skrip'-turz.  See  SEARCH THE SCRIPTURES .
GINNETHOI|   ; GINNETHON  gin-e-tho'-i, gin'-e-thon (the King James Version Ginnetho), (ginnethoy, and ginnethon): The head of a priestly family. Ginnethoi (Ginnetho) is found in  Nehemiah 12:4 , and Ginnethon in 10:6; 12:16.
LIBNITES|     lib'-nits (ha-libhni).  See  LIBNI .
JASHUBITES|   , THE  ja'-shub-its, jash'-ub-its (ha-yashubhi, coll. with article): In  Numbers 16:24 , descendants of JASHUB (q.v. (1)).
HAZARMAVETH|Court of death, the third son of Joktan, and a region in Arabia-Felix settled by him ( Genesis 10:26 ;  1 Chronicles 1:20 ). It is probably the modern province of Hadramaut, situated on the Indian Ocean east of the modern Yemen. 
RIMMONO|   RIMMONAH;   rim-mo'-na, rimmo'-no.  See  RIMMON, (3) .
RABSHAKEH|Chief of the princes, the name given to the chief cup-bearer or the vizier of the Assyrian court; one of Sennacherib's messengers to Hezekiah. See the speech he delivered, in the Hebrew language, in the hearing of all the people, as he stood near the wall on the north side of the city ( 2 Kings 18:17 -37). He and the other envoys returned to their master and reported that Hezekiah and his people were obdurate, and would not submit. 
SHIPHRAH|Beauty, one of the Egyptian midwives ( Exodus 1:15 ). 
BARNABAS|Son of consolation, the surname of Joses, a Levite ( Acts 4:36 ). His name stands first on the list of prophets and teachers of the church at Antioch ( 13:1 ). Luke speaks of him as a "good man" ( 11:24 ). He was born of Jewish parents of the tribe of Levi. He was a native of Cyprus, where he had a possession of land ( Acts 4:36 ,  37), which he sold. His personal appearance is supposed to have been dignified and commanding ( Acts 14:11 ,  12). When Paul returned to Jerusalem after his conversion, Barnabas took him and introduced him to the apostles ( 9:27 ). They had probably been companions as students in the school of Gamaliel. The prosperity of the church at Antioch led the apostles and brethren at Jerusalem to send Barnabas thither to superintend the movement. He found the work so extensive and weighty that he went to Tarsus in search of Saul to assist him. Saul returned with him to Antioch and laboured with him for a whole year ( Acts 11:25 ,  26). The two were at the end of this period sent up to Jerusalem with the contributions the church at Antioch had made for the poorer brethren there ( 11:28 -30). Shortly after they returned, bringing John Mark with them, they were appointed as missionaries to the heathen world, and in this capacity visited Cyprus and some of the principal cities of Asia Minor ( Acts 13:14 ). Returning from this first missionary journey to Antioch, they were again sent up to Jerusalem to consult with the church there regarding the relation of Gentiles to the church ( Acts 15:2 :  Galatians 2:1 ). This matter having been settled, they returned again to Antioch, bringing the decree of the council as the rule by which Gentiles were to be admitted into the church. When about to set forth on a second missionary journey, a dispute arose between Saul and Barnabas as to the propriety of taking John Mark with them again. The dispute ended by Saul and Barnabas taking separate routes. Saul took Silas as his companion, and journeyed through Syria and Cilicia; while Barnabas took his nephew John Mark, and visited Cyprus ( Acts 15:36 -41). Barnabas is not again mentioned by Luke in the Acts. 
HEZEKIAH|Whom Jehovah has strengthened.  (1.) Son of Ahaz ( 2 Kings 18:1 ;  2 Chronicles 29:1 ), whom he succeeded on the throne of the kingdom of Judah. He reigned twenty-nine years (B.C. 726-697). The history of this king is contained in  2 Kings 18:20 ,  Isaiah 36 -39, and  2 Chronicles 29 -32. He is spoken of as a great and good king. In public life he followed the example of his great-granfather Uzziah. He set himself to abolish idolatry from his kingdom, and among other things which he did for this end, he destroyed the "brazen serpent," which had been removed to Jerusalem, and had become an object of idolatrous worship ( Numbers 21:9 ). A great reformation was wrought in the kingdom of Judah in his day ( 2 Kings 18:4 ;  2 Chronicles 29:3 -36). On the death of Sargon and the accession of his son Sennacherib to the throne of Assyria, Hezekiah refused to pay the tribute which his father had paid, and "rebelled against the king of Assyria, and served him not," but entered into a league with Egypt ( Isaiah 30 ; 31;  36:6 -9). This led to the invasion of Judah by Sennacherib ( 2 Kings 18:13 -16), who took forty cities, and besieged Jerusalem with mounds. Hezekiah yielded to the demands of the Assyrian king, and agreed to pay him three hundred talents of silver and thirty of gold ( 18:14 ). But Sennacherib dealt treacherously with Hezekiah ( Isaiah 33:1 ), and a second time within two years invaded his kingdom ( 2 Kings 18:17 ;  2 Chronicles 32:9 ;  Isaiah 36 ). This invasion issued in the destruction of Sennacherib's army. Hezekiah prayed to God, and "that night the angel of the Lord went out, and smote in the camp of the Assyrians 185,000 men." Sennacherib fled with the shattered remnant of his forces to Nineveh, where, seventeen years after, he was assassinated by his sons Adrammelech and Sharezer ( 2 Kings 19:37 ). (see  SENNACHERIB .) The narrative of Hezekiah's sickness and miraculous recovery is found in  2 Kings 20:1 ,  2 Chronicles 32:24 ,  Isaiah 38:1 . Various ambassadors came to congratulate him on his recovery, and among them Merodach-baladan, the viceroy of Babylon ( 2 Chronicles 32:23 ;  2 Kings 20:12 ). He closed his days in peace and prosperity, and was succeeded by his son Manasseh. He was buried in the "chiefest of the sepulchres of the sons of David" ( 2 Chronicles 32:27 -33). He had "after him none like him among all the kings of Judah, nor any that were before him" ( 2 Kings 18:5 ). (see  ISAIAH .) 
JUDGES|Judges, Book of Is so called because it contains the history of the deliverance and government of Israel by the men who bore the title of the "judges." The book of Ruth originally formed part of this book, but about A.D. 450 it was separated from it and placed in the Hebrew scriptures immediately after the Song of Solomon. The book contains,  (1.) An introduction (1- 3:6 ), connecting it with the previous narrative in Joshua, as a "link in the chain of books."  (2.) The history of the thirteen judges ( 3:7 - 16:31 ) in the following order: " FIRST PERIOD ( 3:7 -ch. 5) " Years " I. Servitude under Chushan-rishathaim of " Mesopotamia 8 " 1. OTHNIEL delivers Israel, rest 40 " II. Servitude under Eglon of Moab: " Ammon, Amalek 18 " 2. EHUD'S deliverance, rest 80 " 3. SHAMGAR Unknown. " III. Servitude under Jabin of Hazor in " Canaan 20 " 4. DEBORAH and, " 5. BARAK 40 " (206) " " SECOND PERIOD (6- 10:5 ) " " IV. Servitude under Midian, Amalek, and " children of the east 7 " 6. GIDEON 40 " ABIMELECH, Gideon's son, reigns as " king over Israel 3 " 7. TOLA 23 " 8. JAIR 22 " (95) " " THIRD PERIOD ( 10:6 -ch. 12) " " V. Servitude under Ammonites with the " Philistines 18 " 9. JEPHTHAH 6 " 10. IBZAN 7 " 11. ELON 10 " 12. ABDON 8 " (49) " " FOURTH PERIOD (13-16) " VI. Seritude under Philistines 40 " 13. SAMSON 20 " (60) " In all 410 Samson's exploits probably synchronize with the period immediately preceding the national repentance and reformation under Samuel ( 1 Samuel 7:2 -6). After Samson came Eli, who was both high priest and judge. He directed the civil and religious affairs of the people for forty years, at the close of which the Philistines again invaded the land and oppressed it for twenty years. Samuel was raised up to deliver the people from this oppression, and he judged Israel for some twelve years, when the direction of affairs fell into the hands of Saul, who was anointed king. If Eli and Samuel are included, there were then fifteen judges. But the chronology of this whole period is uncertain. (3.) The historic section of the book is followed by an appendix (17-21), which has no formal connection with that which goes before. It records (a) the conquest (17,  18) of Laish by a portion of the tribe of Dan; and (b) the almost total extinction of the tribe of Benjamin by the other tribes, in consequence of their assisting the men of Gibeah (19-21). This section properly belongs to the period only a few years after the death of Joshua. It shows the religious and moral degeneracy of the people. The author of this book was most probably Samuel. The internal evidence both of the first sixteen chapters and of the appendix warrants this conclusion. It was probably composed during Saul's reign, or at the very beginning of David's. The words in 18:30,31, imply that it was written after the taking of the ark by the Philistines, and after it was set up at Nob ( 1 Samuel 21 ). In David's reign the ark was at Gibeon ( 1 Chronicles 16:39 ) 
CHELLUH|     kel'-u.  See  CHELUHI .
COURTS|   , JUDICIAL  joo-dish'-al, ju-dish'-al.  1. Their Organization:  At the advice of Jethro, Moses appointed judges (shopheTim,  Exodus 18 ). In Egypt it appears that the Hebrews did not have their own judges, which, of course, was a source of many wrongs. Leaving Egypt, Moses took the judicial functions upon himself, but it was impossible that he should be equal to the task of administering justice to two and one-half million people; hence, he proceeded to organize a system of jurisprudence. He appointed judges over tens, fifties, hundreds, thousands-in all 78,600 judges. This system was adequate for the occasion, and these courts respectively corresponded practically to our Justices of the Peace, Mayor's Court, District Court, Circuit Court. Finally, there was a Supreme Court under Moses and his successors. These courts, though graded, did not afford an opportunity of appeal. The lower courts turned their difficult cases over to the next higher. If the case was simple, the judge over tens would take it, but if the question was too intricate for him, he would refer it to the next higher court, and so on until it finally reached Moses. There were certain kinds of questions which the tens, fifties, and hundreds would not take at all, and the people understood it and would bring them to the higher courts for original jurisdiction. When any court decided it, that was the end of that case, for it could not be appealed ( Exodus 18:25, 26 ). On taking possession in Palestine, the judges were to be appointed for every city and vicinity ( Deuteronomy 16:18 ), thus giving to all Israel a speedy and cheap method of adjudication. Though not so prescribed by the constitution, the judges at length were generally chosen from among the Levites, as the learned class. The office was elective. Josephus states this plainly, and various passages of the Scriptures express it positively by inference (see  Deuteronomy 1:13 ). Jephthah's election by vote of the people is clearly set forth ( Judges 11:5-11 ).  2. Character of the Judges:  Among the Hebrews, the law was held very sacred; for God Himself had given it. Hence, those who administered the law were God's special representatives, and their person was held correspondingly sacred. These circumstances placed upon them the duty of administering justice without respect to persons ( Deuteronomy 1:17 ;  Deuteronomy 16:18 ). They were to be guided by the inalienable rights granted to every citizen by the Hebrew constitution:  (1) No man was to be deprived of life, liberty or property without due process of law ( Numbers 35:9-34 ).  (2) Two or three witnesses were required to convict anyone of crime ( Deuteronomy 17:6 ;  Deuteronomy 19:2-13 ).  (3) Punishment for crime was not to be transferred or entailed ( Deuteronomy 24:16 ).  (4) A man's home was inviolate ( Deuteronomy 24:10, 11 ).  (5) One held to bondage but having acquired liberty through his own effort should be protected ( Deuteronomy 23:15, 16 ).  (6) One's homestead was inalienable ( Leviticus 25:23-28, 34 ).  (7) Slavery could not be made perpetual without the person's own consent ( Exodus 21:2-6 ).  3. Their Work:  Gradually a legal profession developed among the Hebrews, the members of which were designated as "Lawyers" or "Scribes" also known as "Doctors of the Law" ( Luke 2:46 ). Their business was threefold:  (1) to study and interpret the law;  (2) to instruct the Hebrew youth in the law; and  (3) to decide questions of the law. The first two they did as scholars and teachers; the last either as judges or as advisers in some court, as, for instance, the Senate of Jerusalem or some inferior tribunal. No code can go into such details as to eliminate the necessity of subsequent legislation, and this usually, to a great extent, takes the form of judicial decisions founded on the code, rather than of separate enactment; and so it was among the Hebrews. The provisions of their code were for the most part quite general, thus affording large scope for casuistic interpretation. Regarding the points not explicitly covered by the written law, a substitute must be found either in the form of established custom or in the form of an inference drawn from the statute.  As a result of the industry with which this line of legal development was pursued during the centuries immediately preceding our era, Hebrew law became a most complicated science. For the disputed points, the judgments of the individual lawyers could not be taken as the standard; hence, the several disciples of the law must frequently meet for a discussion, and the opinion of the majority then prevailed. These were the meetings of the "Doctors." Whenever a case arose concerning which there had been no clear legal decision, the question was referred to the nearest lawyer; by him, to the nearest company of lawyers, perhaps the Sanhedrin, and the resultant decision was henceforth authority.  Before the destruction of Jerusalem technical knowledge of the law was not a condition of eligibility to the office of judge. Anyone who could command the confidence of his fellow-citizens might be elected, and many of the rural courts undoubtedly were conducted, as among us, by men of sterling quality, but limited knowledge. Such men would avail themselves of the legal advice of any "doctor" who might be within reach; and in the more dignified courts of a large municipality it was a standing custom to have a company of lawyers present to discuss and decide any new law points that might arise. Of course, frequently these men were themselves elected to the office of judge, so that practically the entire system of jurisprudence was in their hands.  4. Limitations under Roman Rule:  Though Judea at this time was a subject commonwealth, yet the Sanhedrin, which was the body of supreme legislative and judicial authority, exercised autonomous authority to such an extent that it not only administered civil cases in accordance with Jewish law-for without such a right a Jewish court would be impossible-but it also took part to a great extent in the punishment of crime. It exercised an independent police power, hence, could send out its own officers to make arrests ( Matthew 26:47   Mark 14:43   Acts 4:3 ;  Acts 5:17, 18 ). In cases that did not involve capital punishment, its judgments were final and untrammeled ( Acts 4:2-23 ;  Acts 5:21-40 ). Only in capital punishment cases must the consent of the procurator be secured, which is not only clearly stated in  John 18:31 , but is also evident in the entire course of Christ's trial, as reported by the Synoptic Gospels. In granting or withholding his consent in such cases, the procurator could follow his pleasure absolutely, applying either the Jewish or Roman law, as his guide. In one class of cases the right to inflict capital punishment even on Roman citizens was granted the Sanhedrin, namely, when a non-Jewish person overstepped the bounds and entered the interior holy place of the temple. Even in this case the consent of the procurator must be secured, but it appears that the Roman rulers were inclined to let the law take its course against such wanton outrage of the Jews' feelings. Criminal cases not involving capital punishment need not be referred to the procurator.  5. Time and Place of Sessions:  The city in which the Sanhedrin met was Jerusalem. To determine the particular building, and the spot on which the building stood, is interesting to the archaeologist, not to the student of law. The local courts usually held their sessions on the second and fifth day (Monday and Thursday) of the week, but we do not know whether the same custom was observed by the Great Sanhedrin. On feast days no court was held, much less on the Sabbath. Since the death penalty was not to be pronounced until the day after the trial, such cases were avoided also on the day preceding a Sabbath or other sacred day. The emphasis placed on this observance may be seen from the edicts issued by Augustus, absolving the Jews from the duty of attending court on the Sabbath.  See DOCTOR ;  LAWYER ; SANHEDRIN; SCRIBES.  Frank E. Hirsch  JUDICIAL COURTS  See  COURTS, JUDICIAL .
HOSTS|   LORD OF   A name or title of God frequently used in the Old Testament, always translated "Yahweh of Hosts" (Yahweh tsebha'oth) in the American Standard Revised Version, since Yahweh, never 'Adhonay, is used in this phrase. Evidently the meaning of the title is that all created agencies and forces are under the leadership or dominion of Yahweh, who made and maintains them ( Genesis 2:1   Isaiah 45:12 ). It is used to express Yahweh's great power.  See  GOD, NAMES OF, III, 8 .  HOSTS, LORD OF  hosts.  See  LORD OF HOSTS .
MIRACLES|   , GIFT OF  See  SPIRITUAL GIFTS ;  MIRACLE .
SHOBAB|Apostate.  (1.) One of David's sons by Bathseheba ( 2 Samuel 5:14 ). (2.) One of the sons of Caleb ( 1 Chronicles 2:18 ), the son of Hezron. 
KAPH|     kaf "k": The 11th letter of the Hebrew alphabet; transliterated in this Encyclopedia as "k", with daghesh, and "kh" (=German ch) without daghesh. It came also to be used for the number 20. For name, etc., see ALPHABET.
CRESCENTS|     kres'-ents (saharonim): Moon-shaped necklaces ( Judges 8:21, 26   Isaiah 3:18 ).f Paul, mentioned in  2 Timothy 4:10  as having gone to Galatia. That he was one of the Seventy, and that he founded the church in Vienna in Gaul, are traditions without any trustworthy basis.
SION|Elevated.  (1.) Denotes Mount Hermon in  Deuteronomy 4:48 ; called Sirion by the Sidonians, and by the Amorites Shenir ( Deuteronomy 3:9 ). (see  HERMON .) (2.) The Greek form of Zion (q.v.) in  Matthew 21:5 ;  John 12:15 . 
PE|     pa "p": The 17th letter of the Hebrew alphabet; transliterated in this Encyclopedia as "p" with daghesh and "ph" (equalsff) without. It came also to be used for the number 80. For name, etc., see ALPHABET.
JERAHMEELITES|   JERAHMEEL;   je-ra'-me-el, je-ra'-me-el-its (yerachme'el, "may God have compassion!"):  (1) In  1 Chronicles 2:9, 25, 26, 27, 33, 42 , he is described as the son of Hezron, the son of Perez, the son of Judah by Tamar his daughter-in-law ( Genesis 38 ). In  1 Samuel 27:10  is mentioned the neghebh of the (ha-yerach-me'eli, a collective noun), the Revised Version (British and American) "the South of the Jerahmeelites." The latter is a tribal name in use probably before the proper name, above; their cities are mentioned in  1 Samuel 30:29 . Cheyne has radical views on Jerahmeel. See  EB, under the word ;  also T . Witton Davies in Review of Theology and Philosophy, III, 689-708 (May, 1908); and Cheyne's replies in Hibbert Journal, VII, 132-51 (October, 1908), and Decline and Fall of the Kingdom of Judah.  (2) A Merarite Levite, son of Kish ( 1 Chronicles 24:29 ).  (3) "The king's son," the Revised Version (British and American) and the King James Version margin ( Jeremiah 36:26 ). the Revised Version margin, the King James Version have "son of Hammelech," taking the word ha-melek as a proper name. He was "probably a royal prince, one who had a king among his ancestors but not necessarily son of the ruling king; so 38:6;  1 Kings 22:26  b; especially Zechariah 1:8 written at a time when the reigning king, Josiah, could not have had a grown-up `son' " (Driver, Jeremiah, 224, note e). Jerahmeel was with two others commanded by Jehoiakim to arrest Jeremiah and Baruch.  David Francis Roberts
MELCHIZEDEK|King of righteousness, the king of Salem (q.v.). All we know of him is recorded in  Genesis 14:18 -20. He is subsequently mentioned only once in the Old Testament, in  Psalm 110:4 . The typical significance of his history is set forth in detail in the Epistle to the Hebrews, ch. 7. The apostle there points out the superiority of his priesthood to that of Aaron in these several respects, (1) Even Abraham paid him tithes; (2) he blessed Abraham; (3) he is the type of a Priest who lives for ever; (4) Levi, yet unborn, paid him tithes in the person of Abraham; (5) the permanence of his priesthood in Christ implied the abrogation of the Levitical system; (6) he was made priest not without an oath; and (7) his priesthood can neither be transmitted nor interrupted by death: "this man, because he continueth ever, hath an unchangeable priesthood." The question as to who this mysterious personage was has given rise to a great deal of modern speculation. It is an old tradition among the Jews that he was Shem, the son of Noah, who may have survived to this time. Melchizedek was a Canaanitish prince, a worshipper of the true God, and in his peculiar history and character an instructive type of our Lord, the great High Priest ( Hebrews 5:6 ,  7;  6:20 ). One of the Amarna tablets is from Ebed-Tob, king of Jerusalem, the successor of Melchizedek, in which he claims the very attributes and dignity given to Melchizedek in the Epistle to the Hebrews. 
JEHOSHUA|     je-hosh'-u-a (yehoshua`, "Yahweh is deliverance," or "is opulence"): The usual Hebrew form of the name "Joshua"; it occurs in the King James Version of  Numbers 13:16  (the American Standard Revised Version "Hoshea"); and in some editions of the King James Version in  1 Chronicles 7:27 , where others have the form "Jehoshuah" (h being wrongly added at the end).  See  JOSHUA .
HAMATH|Fortress, the capital of one of the kingdoms of Upper Syria of the same name, on the Orontes, in the valley of Lebanon, at the northern boundary of Palestine ( Numbers 13:21 ;  34:8 ), at the foot of Hermon ( Joshua 13:5 ) towards Damascus ( Zechariah 9:2 ;  Jeremiah 49:23 ). It is called "Hamath the great" in  Amos 6:2 , and "Hamath-zobah" in  2 Chronicles 8:3 . Hamath, now Hamah, had an Aramaean population, but Hittite monuments discovered there show that it must have been at one time occupied by the Hittites. It was among the conquests of the Pharaoh Thothmes III. Its king, Tou or Toi, made alliance with David ( 2 Samuel 8:10 ), and in B.C. 740 Azariah formed a league with it against Assyria. It was, however, conquered by the Assyrians, and its nineteen districts placed under Assyrian governors. In B.C. 720 it revolted under a certain Yahu-bihdi, whose name, compounded with that of the God of Israel (Yahu), perhaps shows that he was of Jewish origin. But the revolt was suppressed, and the people of Hamath were transported to Samaria ( 2 Kings 17:24 ,  30), where they continued to worship their god Ashima. Hamah is beautifully situated on the Orontes, 32 miles north of Emesa, and 36 south of the ruins of Assamea. The kingdom of Hamath comprehended the great plain lying on both banks of the Orontes from the fountain near Riblah to Assamea on the north, and from Lebanon on the west to the desert on the east. The "entrance of Hamath" ( Numbers 34:8 ), which was the north boundary of Palestine, led from the west between the north end of Lebanon and the Nusairiyeh mountains. 
HATITA|Exploration, one of the temple porters or janitors ( Ezra 2:42 ). He returned from Babylon with Zerubbabel. 
SHACHIA|     sha-ki'-a, shak'-i-a (sakheyah (so Baer, Ginsberg); some editions read sakheya', or sakheya'; also shakheyah, and shabheyah. This last reading is favored by the Syrian and the Septuagint (Codex Vaticanus Sabia; Codex Alexandrinus Sebia, but Lucian, Sechia); the forms in "kh" instead of "bh" have the support of the Vulgate, Sechia, "Yahweh has forgotten" (?)): A name in genealogy of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:10 ).
NEBAI|     ne'-bi, ne-ba'-i, neb'-a-i (nebhay).  See  NOBAI .
HELAH|Rust, ( 1 Chronicles 4:5 ,  7), one of the wives of Ashur. 
BALAC|     ba'-lak.  See  BALAK .
TOGARMAH| (1.) A son of Gomer, and grandson of Japheth ( Genesis 10:3 ). (2.) A nation which traded in horses and mules at the fairs of Tyre ( Ezek. 27:14 ;  38:6 ); probably an Armenian or a Scythian race; descendants of (1). 
MALELEEL|     ma-le'-le-el, mal'-e-lel (Maleleel, the King James Version): Greek form of "Mahalalel" ( Luke 3:37 ); the Revised Version (British and American) "Mahalaleel."
LORUHAMAH|Not pitied, the name of the prophet Hosea's first daughter, a type of Jehovah's temporary rejection of his people ( Hosea 1:6 ;  2:23 ). 
JEROBOAM|Increase of the people.  (1.) The son of Nebat ( 1 Kings 11:26 -39), "an Ephrathite," the first king of the ten tribes, over whom he reigned twenty-two years (B.C. 976-945). He was the son of a widow of Zereda, and while still young was promoted by Solomon to be chief superintendent of the "burnden", i.e., of the bands of forced labourers. Influenced by the words of the prophet Ahijah, he began to form conspiracies with the view of becoming king of the ten tribes; but these having been discovered, he fled to Egypt ( 1 Kings 11:29 -40), where he remained for a length of time under the protection of Shishak I. On the death of Solomon, the ten tribes, having revolted, sent to invite him to become their king. The conduct of Rehoboam favoured the designs of Jeroboam, and he was accordingly proclaimed "king of Israel" ( 1 Kings 12:1 -20). He rebuilt and fortified Shechem as the capital of his kingdom. He at once adopted means to perpetuate the division thus made between the two parts of the kingdom, and erected at Dan and Bethel, the two extremities of his kingdom, "golden calves," which he set up as symbols of Jehovah, enjoining the people not any more to go up to worship at Jerusalem, but to bring their offerings to the shrines he had erected. Thus he became distinguished as the man "who made Israel to sin." This policy was followed by all the succeeding kings of Israel. While he was engaged in offering incense at Bethel, a prophet from Judah appeared before him with a warning message from the Lord. Attempting to arrest the prophet for his bold words of defiance, his hand was "dried up," and the altar before which he stood was rent asunder. At his urgent entreaty his "hand was restored him again" ( 1 Kings 13:1 -6,  9; Comp.  2 Kings 23:15 ); but the miracle made no abiding impression on him. His reign was one of constant war with the house of Judah. He died soon after his son Abijah ( 1 Kings 14:1 -18). (2.) Jeroboam II., the son and successor of Jehoash, and the fourteenth king of Israel, over which he ruled for forty-one years, B.C. 825-784 ( 2 Kings 14:23 ). He followed the example of the first Jeroboam in keeping up the worship of the golden calves ( 2 Kings 14:24 ). His reign was contemporary with those of Amaziah ( 2 Kings 14:23 ) and Uzziah ( 15:1 ), kings of Judah. He was victorious over the Syrians ( 13:4 ;  14:26 ,  27), and extended Israel to its former limits, from "the entering of Hamath to the sea of the plain" ( 14:25 ;  Amos 6:14 ). His reign of forty-one years was the most prosperous that Israel had ever known as yet. With all this outward prosperity, however, iniquity widely prevailed in the land ( Amos 2:6 -8;  4:1 ;  6:6 ;  Hosea 4:12 -14). The prophets Hosea ( 1:1 ), Joel ( 3:16 ;  Amos 1:1 ,  2), Amos ( 1:1 ), and Jonah ( 2 Kings 14:25 ) lived during his reign. He died, and was buried with his ancestors ( 14:29 ). He was succeeded by his son Zachariah (q.v.). His name occurs in Scripture only in  2 Kings 13:13 ;  14:16 , 23, 27, 28, 29;  15:1 , 8;  1 Chronicles 5:17 ;  Hosea 1:1 ;  Amos 1:1 ;  7:9 , 10, 11. In all other passages it is Jeroboam the son of Nebat that is meant.
UMMAH|Vicinity, a town of Asher ( Joshua 19:30 ). 
SHIHON|Overturning, a town of Issachar ( Joshua 19:19 ). 
SHEMAAH|Rumour, a Benjamite whose sons "came to David to Ziklag" ( 1 Chronicles 12:3 ). 
PHENICIA|( Acts 21:2 ) = Phenice ( 11:19 ;  15:3 ; R.V.,  Phoenicia), Gr. phoinix, "a palm", the land of palm-trees; a strip of land of an average breadth of about 20 miles along the shores of the Mediterranean, from the river Eleutherus in the north to the promotory of Carmel in the south, about 120 miles in length. This name is not found in the Old Testament, and in the New Testament it is mentioned only in the passages above referred to. "In the Egyptian inscriptions Phoenicia is called Keft, the inhabitants being Kefa; and since Keft-ur, or `Greater Phoenicia,' was the name given to the delta of the Nile from the Phoenician colonies settled upon it, the Philistines who came from Caphtor or Keft-ur must have been of Phoenician origin" (Comp.  Deuteronomy 2:23 ;  Jeremiah 47:4 ;  Amos 9:7 )., Sayce's Bible and the Monuments. Phoenicia lay in the very centre of the old world, and was the natural entrepot for commerce with foreign nations. It was the "England of antiquity." "The trade routes from all Asia converged on the Phoenician coast; the centres of commerce on the Euphrates and Tigris forwarding their goods by way of Tyre to the Nile, to Arabia, and to the west; and, on the other hand, the productions of the vast regions bordering the Mediterranean passing through the Canaanite capital to the eastern world." It was "situate at the entry of the sea, a merchant of the people for many isles" ( Ezek. 27:3 ,  4). The far-reaching commercial activity of the Phoenicians, especially with Tarshish and the western world, enriched them with vast wealth, which introduced boundless luxury and developed among them a great activity in all manner of arts and manufactures. (see  TYRE .) The Phoenicians were the most enterprising merchants of the old world, establishing colonies at various places, of which Carthage was the chief. They were a Canaanite branch of the race of Ham, and are frequently called Sidonians, from their principal city of Sidon. None could "skill to hew timber like unto the Sidonians" ( 1 Kings 5:6 ). King Hiram rendered important service to Solomon in connection with the planning and building of the temple, casting for him all the vessels for the temple service, and the two pillars which stood in the front of the porch, and "the molten sea" ( 1 Kings 7:21 -23). Singular Marks have been found by recent exploration on the great stones that form the substructure of the temple. These Marks, both painted and engraved, have been regarded as made by the workmen in the quarries, and as probably intended to indicate the place of these stones in the building. "The Biblical account ( 1 Kings 5:17 ,  18) is accurately descriptive of the massive masonry now existing at the south-eastern angle (of the temple area), and standing on the native rock 80 feet below the present surface. The Royal Engineers found, buried deeply among the rubbish of many centuries, great stones, costly and hewed stones, forming the foundation of the sanctuary wall; while Phoenician fragments of pottery and Phoenician Marks painted on the massive blocks seem to proclaim that the stones were prepared in the quarry by the cunning workmen of Hiram, the king of Tyre." (see  TEMPLE .) The Phoenicians have been usually regarded as the inventors of alphabetic writing. The Egyptians expressed their thoughts by certain symbols, called "hieroglyphics", i.e., sacred carvings, so styled because used almost exclusively on sacred subjects. The recent discovery, however, of inscriptions in Southern Arabia (Yemen and Hadramaut), known as Hemyaritic, in connection with various philogical considerations, has led some to the conclusion that the Phoenician alphabet was derived from the Mineans (admitting the antiquity of the kingdom of Ma'in,   Judges 10:12 ;  2 Chronicles 26:7 ). Thus the Phoenician alphabet ceases to be the mother alphabet. Sayce thinks "it is more than possible that the Egyptians themselves were emigrants from Southern Arabia." (see  MOABITE STONE .) "The Phoenicians were renowned in ancient times for the manufacture of glass, and some of the specimens of this work that have been preserved are still the wonder of mankind...In the matter of shipping, whether ship-building be thought of or traffic upon the sea, the Phoenicians surpassed all other nations." "The name Phoenicia is of uncertain origin, though it may be derived from Fenkhu, the name given in the Egyptian inscriptions to the natives of Palestine. Among the chief Phoenician cities were Tyre and Sidon, Gebal north of Beirut, Arvad or Arados and Zemar." 
PAROSH|     pa'-rosh, par'-osh (par`osh, "flea" (leap)): a family that in part returned under Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:3   Nehemiah 7:8 ), and in part under Ezra ( Ezra 8:3 ; there spelt "Pharosh," the King James Version). Some of the family had foreign wives ( Ezra 10:25 ). One descendant, Pedaiah (see PEDAIAH, (3)), helped to rebuild the city walls ( Nehemiah 3:25 ), and others were among those who "sealed" the covenant of Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 10:1, 14 ). In 1 Esdras 5:9; 8:30; 9:26, "Phoros."
JEZLIAH|   IZLIAH;   iz-li'-a (yizli'ah, "Yah delivers"; the King James Version): A son of Elpaal, of the tribe of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:18 ).  JEZLIAH  jez-lia.  See  IZLIAH .
MALCHIAH|Jehovah's king.  (1.) The head of the fifth division of the priests in the time of David ( 1 Chronicles 24:9 ). (2.) A priest, the father of Pashur ( 1 Chronicles 9:12 ;  Jeremiah 38:1 ). (3.) One of the priests appointed as musicians to celebrate the completion of the walls of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 12:42 ). (4.) A priest who stood by Ezra when he "read in the book of the law of God" ( Nehemiah 8:4 ). (5.)  Nehemiah 3:11 . (6.)  Nehemiah 3:31 . (7.)  Nehemiah 3:14 . 
SHAMEFASTNESS|     sham'-fast-nes: The original the King James Version translation of aidos, in Sirach 41:16 and  1 Timothy 2:9 . Perhaps half a century later the spelling "shamefacedness" supplanted the better form, and continues in the ordinary editions of the King James Version. The Revised Version (British and American), however, rightly restores "shamefastness."
JEDIDAH|     je-di'-da (yedhidhah, "beloved"): Mother of King Josiah of Judah, daughter of Adaiah of Bozkath ( 2 Kings 22:1 ).
JOTHAM|Jehovah is perfect.  (1.) The youngest of Gideon's seventy sons. He escaped when the rest were put to death by the order of Abimelech ( Judges 9:5 ). When "the citizens of Shechem and the whole house of Millo" were gathered together "by the plain of the pillar" (i.e.,  the stone set up by Joshua,   24:26 ; Comp.  Genesis 35:4 ) "that was in Shechem, to make Abimelech king," from one of the heights of Mount Gerizim he protested against their doing so in the earliest parable, that of the bramble-king. His words then spoken were prophetic. There came a recoil in the feelings of the people toward Abimelech, and then a terrible revenge, in which many were slain and the city of Shechem was destroyed by Abimelech ( Judges 9:45 ). Having delivered his warning, Jotham fled to Beer from the vengeance of Abimelech ( 9:7 -21). (2.) The son and successor of Uzziah on the throne of Judah. As during his last years Uzziah was excluded from public life on account of his leprosy, his son, then twenty-five years of age, administered for seven years the affairs of the kingdom in his father's stead ( 2 Chronicles 26:21 ,  23;  27:1 ). After his father's death he became sole monarch, and reigned for sixteen years (B.C. 759-743). He ruled in the fear of God, and his reign was prosperous. He was contemporary with the prophets Isaiah, Hosea, and Micah, by whose ministrations he profited. He was buried in the sepulchre of the kings, greatly lamented by the people ( 2 Kings 15:38 ;  2 Chronicles 27:7 -9).
CALNO|   CALNEH;   kal'-ne, kal'-no (kalneh ( Amos 6:2 ), kalno ( Isaiah 10:9 )): "Probably the Kulnia (Kullani) associated with Arpad and Hadrach, Syrian cities, in the Assyrian `tribute' list (Western Asiatic Inscriptions, II, 53, number 3); Kullanhu about six miles from Arpad" (HDB, I, 344, and 1-vol HDB, 109).
SHALLUM|Retribution.  (1.) The son of Jabesh, otherwise unknown. He "conspired against Zachariah, and smote him before the people, and slew him, and reigned in his stead" ( 2 Kings 15:10 ). He reigned only "a month of days in Samaria" ( 15:13 ,  marg.). Menahem rose up against Shallum and put him to death ( 2 Kings 15:14 ,  15,  17), and became king in his stead. (2.) Keeper of the temple vestments in the reign of Josiah ( 2 Kings 22:14 ). (3.) One of the posterity of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:40 ,  41). (4.) A descendant of Simeon ( 1 Chronicles 4:25 ). (5.) One of the line of the high priests ( 1 Chronicles 6:13 ). (6.)  1 Chronicles 7:13 . (7.) A keeper of the gate in the reign of David ( 1 Chronicles 9:17 ). (8.) A Levite porter ( 1 Chronicles 9:19 ,  31;  Jeremiah 35:4 ). (9.) An Ephraimite chief ( 2 Chronicles 28:12 ). (10.) The uncle of the prophet Jeremiah ( Jeremiah 32:7 ). (11.) A son of king Josiah ( 1 Chronicles 3:15 ;  Jeremiah 22:11 ), who was elected to succeed his father on the throne, although he was two years younger than his brother Eliakim. He assumed the crown under the name of Jehoahaz (q.v.). He did not imitate the example of his father ( 2 Kings 23:32 ), but was "a young lion, and it learned to catch the prey; it devoured men" ( Ezek. 19:3 ). His policy was anti-Egyptian therefore. Necho, at that time at Riblah, sent an army against Jerusalem, which at once yielded, and Jehoahaz was carried captive to the Egyptian camp, Eliakim being appointed king in his stead. He remained a captive in Egypt till his death, and was the first king of Judah that died in exile. 
JAASIEL|Made by God, one of David's body-guard, the son of Abner ( 1 Chronicles 27:21 ), called Jasiel in  1 Chronicles 11:47 . 
LAWS|   AGRARIAN   a-gra'-ri-an loz: 1. The Sabbath Year 2. The Jubilee 3. Its Object 4. The Legal Rules 5. Ideas and Circumstances of the Legislation 6. Form of the Legislation 7. Its Operation and Extension 8. Other Laws Affecting the Land The Mosaic provisions on this subject form one of the most characteristic and interesting portions of the legislation. The main institutions are two, namely, the Sabbath year and the jubilee, and they are closely linked together.  1. The Sabbath Year:  In every seventh year the land was to lie fallow "that the poor of thy people may eat: and what they leave the beast of the field shall eat" ( Exodus 23:10 ; compare  Leviticus 25:2-7 ). `And the Sabbath of the land shall be for food for you; for thee, and for thy servant, and for thy maid, and for thy hired servant and for thy stranger that sojourn with thee; but for thy cattle, and for the beasts that are in thy land, shall all the increase thereof be for food' ( Leviticus 25:6 ). This has been quoted at length because the rendering of English Versions of the Bible is misleading. "The Sabbath of the land" does not mean that the natural increase thereof is to be eaten by the Israelite peasant. That interpretation is excluded by  Leviticus 25:3-5, 20-22 . What is intended is clearly shown by the latter of these two passages, "I will command my blessing upon you in the sixth year." The principle on which the manna had been provided for Sabbaths was to apply to the harvest of the sixth year, and this is the import of the phrase.  2. The Jubilee:  After "seven sabbaths of years, even forty and tone years" a trumpet was to be blown throughout the land on the tenth day of the seventh month (i.e. the Day of Atonement) and the fiftieth year was to be hallowed and celebrated as a "jubilee." No agricultural work of any kind was to be performed, but "ye may (so correct EVV) eat the increase thereof out of the field" ( Leviticus 25:12 ). God would so bless the land in the sixth year that it would bring forth enough for the Sabbath year, the ensuing jubilee and the subsequent period to the harvest of the ninth year ( Leviticus 25:20-22 ).  3. Its Object:  In addition to being a period in which the land was left fallow, the jubilee was intended to meet the economic evils that befell peasants in ancient societies. Wars or unfavorable seasons would soon reduce a farmer to a condition in which he would have to borrow. But money is rarely to be had without interest and security, and in early communities the rates of interest were very high indeed, while the only security the farmer could offer would consist of his land and the persons of himself and his children. Hence we find insolvency giving rise to the alienation of land and to slavery all over the world-sometimes with the retention of civil rights (as in Rome and Israel), at others in a more unalloyed form. The jubilee aims at both these evils. It is provided that in that year the peasants who had lost their full freedom through insolvency should be free (see Wiener, Studies in Biblical Law, 5) and all lands that had been sold should return to the original owner or his family. "And the land shall not be sold in perpetuity; for the land is mine: for ye are strangers and sojourners with me" ( Leviticus 25:23 ). To this theory there are parallels elsewhere, e.g. in Togoland (Heinrici, Zeitschrift fur vergleichende Rechtswissenschaft, XI, 138).  4. The Legal Rules:    Leviticus 25  containing the land laws gives effect to this view by enacting that when an Israelite was compelled to part with his land there was to be a "redemption" of land, and that in default of redemption the land should return to its original owner in the jubilee year. This "redemption" covers two ideas-a right of preemption by the next of kin the first instance, and if that were not exercised, a right on the part of the original owner to buy back the land before the jubilee ( Leviticus 25:24-28 ). The theory did not apply to houses in walled cities. Those might be redeemed within a year of sale: in default the property passed for ever and was unaffected by the jubilee ( Leviticus 25:29 ). Villages were reckoned as country ( Leviticus 25:31 ). The Levitical cities were subject to the rules of land, not of walled cities ( Leviticus 25:32 ; read with the Vulgate in the American Revised Version, margin, "if they have not been redeemed" in  Leviticus 25:32 ), and their fields were not to be sold ( Leviticus 25:34 ). All sales of lands to which the jubilee applied were to be made on the basis of the number of crops ( Leviticus 25:14 ); in fact, what was sold was not the property itself but the usufruct (i.e. the right of using, reaping, etc.) till the year of the jubilee. Similarly with the laws of  Leviticus 27:16-25 , where the general principle is that if a field be sanctified the value shall be estimated according to the number of years to the jubilee. Unfortunately the text is corrupt and it is impossible to make out the exact circumstances in which no further redemption was allowed ( Leviticus 27:20 ).  5. Ideas and Circumstances of the Legislation:  "The land laws are the product of many independent ideas and circumstances.. First such a system as that expounded in the 25th chapter of Leviticus could only be put forward by one who had to work on what is so very rare in history-a clean slate. In other words, the system of land tenure here laid down could only be introduced in this way by men who had no preexisting system to reckon with. Secondly, there is (mutatis mutandis) a marked resemblance between the provisions of Leviticus and the system introduced in Egypt by Joseph ( Genesis 47 ). The land is the Lord's as it is Pharaoh's; but the towns which are built on that land are not subject to the same theory or the same rules. Perhaps the explanation is that Joseph's measures had affected only those who gained their living by agriculture, i.e. the dwellers in the country. Thirdly, the system shows the enormous power that the conception of family solidarity possessed in the Mosaic age.. And fourthly, the enactment is inspired and illuminated by the humanitarian and religious convictions to which reference has already been made" (Journal of Transactions of the Victoria Institute, XLI, 160). Undoubtedly the most striking feature of the enactment is to be found in these religious convictions with the absolute reliance on constant Divine intervention to secure the working of the law ( Genesis 47:20 ).  6. Form of the Legislation:    Leviticus 26  shows clearly that this legislation was conceived as the terms of a covenant made between God and the children of Israel, and it appears from  Leviticus 26:42-45  that this of the covenant was regarded as being connected with the covenants with the patriarchs though it is also a covenant made with the generation that came forth from Egypt. The land was originally promised to Abraham in a covenant ( Genesis 17 ) and it would seem that these laws are regarded as attaching to that covenant which had been renewed with his descendants. Indeed the laws appear to be presented as terms of the sworn agreement (covenant) under which God was about to give Israel the possession of Canaan.  7. Its Operation and Extension:  As respects the operation of these laws we have no information as to the observance of any fallow years before the Exile:  2 Chronicles 36:21  is rather unfavorable, but so obviously echoes  Leviticus 26:43  that it scarcely seems to be meant as a historical statement. But traces are to be found of the operation of other parts of the system.  Ruth 4  shows us the law of redemption working, but with two notable extensions. Widows have acquired a right of property in their husbands' estates, and when the next of kin refuses to redeem, the right passes to the kinsman who is nearest in succession. Neither of these cases is contemplated by the Pentateuch: both appear to be fresh applications of the Levitical law which, like all other legislations, had to be adapted to meet new sets of facts as they arose. Similarly  Jeremiah 32  illustrates the law of preemption, but here a small difficulty arises, for  Leviticus 25:34  forbids the sale of the suburbs of the Levitical cities. Probably however this refers only to sale outside the family and not as here to the nearest kinsman and heir presumptive. Similarly Ezekiel twice refers to the jubilee ( Ezekiel 7:12  and  Ezekiel 46:17 ) in terms that seem to show that he knew it as an existing institution (see SBL, 96; Churchman, May, 1906, 292). Historical traces of the Levitical cities are mentioned in the article LEVITICAL CITIES. It should be added that under the monarchy a rule seems to have been introduced that derelict lands fell to the king (see  2 Samuel 9:9   1 Kings 21:16   2 Kings 8:3, 6 ).  In later times there are several references to the fallow of the Sabbatical year (1 Maccabees 6:49, 53; Ant, XIII, viii, 1, XIV, x, 6, etc.).  8. Other Laws Affecting the Land:  In addition to these laws Moses enacted provisions favoring gleaning, on which see POOR. He also prohibited sowing a field or vineyard with two kinds of seed ( Leviticus 19:19   Deuteronomy 22:9 ) and prescribed that for three years the fruit of trees should not be eaten, while in the fourth it should be holy, and in the fifth it was to be available for ordinary purposes ( Leviticus 19:23 ).  Harold M. Wiener  LAND LAWS  See  AGRARIAN LAWS .
STARGAZERS|( Isaiah 47:13 ), those who pretend to tell what will occur by looking upon the stars. The Chaldean astrologers "divined by the rising and setting, the motions, aspects, colour, degree of light, etc., of the stars." 
BAKBUKIAH|     bak-bu-ki'-a baqbuqyah, ("the Lord pours out"):  (1) A Levite who "dwelt in Jerusalem" after the return from Babylon ( Nehemiah 11:17 ).  (2) A Levite who returned with Zerubbabel to Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 12:9 ).  (3) A Levite and porter keeping "the watch at the store-houses of the gates" ( Nehemiah 12:25 ).
ELTOLAD|     el-to'-lad ('eltoladh, "kindred of God"):  A city of Judah in the Negeb near Edom ( Joshua 15:30 ); in  Joshua 19:4  ascribed to Simeon. Probably the same as Tolad ( 1 Chronicles 4:29 ), the Arabic article "el" being omitted. Site unknown.
SERGIUS|Sergius Paulus  A "prudent man" (R.V.,  "man of understanding"), the deputy (R.V.,  "proconsul") of Cyprus ( Acts 13:6 -13). He became a convert to Christianity under Paul, who visited this island on his first mission to the heathen. A remarkable memorial of this proconsul was recently (1887) discovered at Rome. On a boundary stone of Claudius his name is found, among others, as having been appointed (A.D. 47) one of the curators of the banks and the channel of the river Tiber. After serving his three years as proconsul at Cyprus, he returned to Rome, where he held the office referred to. As he is not saluted in Paul's letter to the Romans, he probably died before it was written. 
SHESHAI|Whitish, one of the sons of Anak ( Numbers 13:22 ). When the Israelites obtained possession of the country the sons of Anak were expelled and slain ( Joshua 15:14 ;  Judges 1:10 ). 
KIRJATHARBA|City of Arba, the original name of Hebron (q.v.), so called from the name of its founder, one of the Anakim ( Genesis 23:2 ;  35:27 ;  Joshua 15:13 ). It was given to Caleb by Joshua as his portion. The Jews interpret the name as meaning "the city of the four", i.e., of Abraham, Isaac, Jacob, and Adam, who were all, as they allege, buried there. 
DREGS|( Psalm 75:8 ;  Isaiah 51:17 ,  22), the lees of wine which settle at the bottom of the vessel. 
SARDIS|The metropolis of Lydia in Asia Minor. It stood on the river Pactolus, at the foot of mount Tmolus. Here was one of the seven Asiatic churches ( Revelation 3:1 -6). It is now a ruin called Sert-Kalessi. 
TANHUMETH|Consolation, a Netophathite; one of the captains who supported Gedaliah ( 2 Kings 25:23 ;  Jeremiah 40:8 ). 
NODAB|Noble, probably a tribe descended from one of the sons of Ishmael, with whom the trans-Jordanic tribes made war ( 1 Chronicles 5:19 ). 
TEMAH|     te'-ma (temach, Codex Alexandrinus and Codex Vaticanus Thema; Lucian, Themaa;  Nehemiah 7:55 ; Codex Vaticanus Hemath; Codex Alexandrinus Thema; Lucian, Themaa; the King James Version, Thamah): The family name of a company of Nethinim ( Ezra 2:53 ).
SHEBER|     she'-ber (shebher; Codex Vaticanus Saber, Codex Alexandrinus Seber): A son of Caleb by his concubine Maacah ( 1 Chronicles 2:48 ).
ZALAPH|     za'-laf (tsalaph, "caper-plant"): Father of Hanun, one of the repairers of the wall ( Nehemiah 3:30 ).
SHIMROM|Watchman, the fourth son of Issachar ( Genesis 46:13 ;  1 Chronicles 7:1 ; R.V.,  correctly,  "Shimron"). 
MANAEN|Consoler, a Christian teacher at Antioch. Nothing else is known of him beyond what is stated in  Acts 13:1 , where he is spoken of as having been brought up with (Gr. syntrophos; rendered in R.V. "foster brother" of) Herod, i.e., Herod Antipas, the tetrach, who, with his brother Archelaus, was educated at Rome. 
JUDITH|Jewess, the daughter of Beeri the Hittite, and one of Esau's wives ( Genesis 26:34 ), elsewhere called Aholibamah ( 36:2 -14). 
ITALY|Acts 18:2; 27:1, 6;  Hebrews 13:24  ), like most geographical names, was differently used at different periods of history. As the power of Rome advanced, nations were successively conquered and added to it till it came to designate the whole country to the south of the Alps. There was constant intercourse between Palestine and Italy in the time of the Romans. 
STOICS|A sect of Greek philosophers at Athens, so called from the Greek word stoa i.e., a "porch" or "portico," where they have been called "the Pharisees of Greek paganism." The founder of the Stoics was Zeno, who flourished about B.C. 300. He taught his disciples that a man's happiness consisted in bringing himself into harmony with the course of the universe. They were trained to bear evils with indifference, and so to be independent of externals. Materialism, pantheism, fatalism, and pride were the leading features of this philosophy. 
GREEKS|   GRECIANS;   gre'-shanz, greks: In the Old Testament the word "Grecians" occurs but once (Joel 3 (4):6). For references to Greece in the Old Testament see JAVAN. In the King James Version of the Old Testament Apocrypha "Grecians" and "Greeks" are used without distinction, e.g. 1 Maccabees 1:10; 6:02; 8:09; 2 Maccabees 4:15, 36. Thus, in 1 Maccabees 1:1, Alexander the Great is spoken of as king of Greece, and in 1 Maccabees 1:10 the Macedonian empire is called "the kingdom of the Greeks" (basileia Hellenon). In 2 Maccabees 13:2 the army of Antiochus, king of Syria, is called "Grecian" (dunamis Hellenike), and in 2 Maccabees 6:8 the "Greek cities" (poleis Hellenides) are Macedonian colonies. Reference is made in 2 Maccabees 6:1 to an aged Athenian who was sent by Antiochus the king charged with the duty of Hellenizing the Jews; in 2 Maccabees 9:15 Antiochus vows that he will make the Jews equal to the Athenians; in 1 Maccabees 12-14, reference is made to negotiations of Jonathan, the high priest, with the Spartans, whom he calls brethren, seeking the renewal of a treaty of alliance and amity against the Syrians. With the spread of Greek power and influence, everything not specifically Jewish was called Greek; thus in 2 Maccabees 4:36; 11:02; 3 Maccabees 3:3, 1 the "Greeks" contrasted with the Jews are simply non-Jews, so called because of the prevalence of Greek institutions and culture, and "Greek" even came to be used in the sense of "anti-Jewish" (2 Maccabees 4:10, 15; 6:09; 11:24).  In  Isaiah 9:12  the Septuagint reads tous Hellenas, for Pelishtim, "Philistines"; but we are not therefore justified in assuming a racial connection between the Philistines and the Greeks. Further light on the ethnography of the Mediterranean  basin may in time show that there was actually such a connection; but the rendering in question proves nothing, since "the oppressing sword" of  Jeremiah 46:16  and 50:16 is likewise rendered in the Septuagint with "the sword of the Greeks" (machaira Hellenike). In all these cases the translators were influenced by the conditions existing in their own day, and were certainly not disclosing obscure relations long forgotten and newly discovered.  In the New Testament, English Versions of the Bible attempts to distinguish between (Hellenes), which is rendered "Greeks," and (Hellenistai), which is rendered "Grecians" or "Grecian Jews," or in the Revised Version, margin "Hellenists," e.g.  Acts 6:1 ;  Acts 9:29 . These latter were Jews of the Dispersion, who spoke Greek (see HELLENISM; HELLENIST), as distinguished from Palestinian Jews; but since many of the latter also spoke Greek by preference, the distinction could in no sense be absolute. Indeed in  John 7:35 , "the Dispersion among (the Revised Version, margin, Greek "of") the Greeks," can hardly refer to any but "Grecian Jews" (Hellenistai), although Hellenes is used, and in  John 12:20  the "Greeks" (Hellenes) who went up to worship at the feast of the Passover were almost certainly "Grecian Jews" (Hellenistai). Thus, while English Versions of the Bible consistently renders Hellenes with "Greeks," we are not by that rendering apprised of the real character of the people so designated. This difficulty is aggravated by the fact, already noted in connection with the Old Testament Apocrypha, that, in consequence of the spread of Hellenism, the term Hellenes was applied not only to such as were of Hellenic descent, but also to all those who had appropriated the language of Greece, as the universal means of communication, and the ideals and customs collectively known as Hellenism. The latter were thus in the strict sense Hellenists, differing from the "Grecians" of English Versions of the Bible only in that they were not of Jewish descent. In other words, Hellenes (except perhaps in  John 7:35  and 12:20, as noted above) is, in general, equivalent to ta ethne, "Gentiles" (see GENTILES). The various readings of the manuscripts (and hence the difference between the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American)) in  1 Corinthians 1:23  well illustrate this. There is consequently much confusion, which it is quite impossible, with our limited knowledge of the facts in particular cases, to clear up. In general, it would seem probable that where "Greeks" are comprehensively contrasted with "Jews," the reference is to "Gentiles," as in  Acts 14:1 ;  Acts 17:4 ;  Acts 18:4 ; 19:10, 17; 20:21  Romans 1:16 ;  Romans 10:12   1 Corinthians 1:22-24  (the Revised Version (British and American) "Gentiles," representing ethnesin;  Galatians 3:28   Colossians 3:11 . In  Mark 7:26  the woman of Tyre, called "a Greek (the Revised Version, margin "Gentile") a Syrophoenician," was clearly not of Hellenic descent. Whether Titus ( Galatians 2:3 ) and the father of Timothy; ( Acts 16:1, 3 ) were in the strict sense "Greeks," we have no means of knowing. In  Romans 1:14 , "I am debtor both to Greeks and to Barbarians," there is an undoubted reference to Greeks strictly so called; possibly, though by no means certainly, the "Greeks" of  Acts 21:28 , alluding to Trophimus the Ephesian ( Acts 21:29 ), are to be taken in the same sense. References to the Greek language occur in  John 19:20  ( Luke 23:38  is properly omitted in the Revised Version (British and American));  Acts 21:37   Revelation 9:11 .  In  Acts 11:20  the manuscripts vary between Hellenistas, and Hellenas (the King James Version "Grecians," the Revised Version (British and American) "Greeks"), with the preponderance of authority in favor of the former; but even if one adopts the latter, it is not clear whether true Greeks or Gentiles are intended.  William Arthur Heidel  GREEKS  See  GRECIANS .
TYCHICUS|Chance, an Asiatic Christian, a "faithful minister in the Lord" ( Ephesians 6:21 ,  22), who, with Trophimus, accompanied Paul on a part of his journey from Macedonia to Jerusalem ( Acts 20:4 ). He is alluded to also in  Colossians 4:7 ,  Titus 3:12 , and  2 Timothy 4:12  as having been with Paul at Rome, whence he sent him to Ephesus, probably for the purpose of building up and encouraging the church there. 
PORCIUS|Festus, Porcius  The successor of Felix (A.D. 60) as procurator of Judea ( Acts 24:27 ). A few weeks after he had entered on his office the case of Paul, then a prisoner at Caesarea, was reported to him. The "next day," after he had gone down to Caesarea, he heard Paul defend himself in the presence of Herod Agrippa II. and his sister Bernice, and not finding in him anything worthy of death or of bonds, would have set him free had he not appealed unto Caesar ( Acts 25:11 ,  12). In consequence of this appeal Paul was sent to Rome. Festus, after being in office less than two years, died in Judea. (see  AGRIPPA .) 
TIRAS|The youngest of the sons of Japheth ( Genesis 10:2 ;  1 Chronicles 1:5 ). 
THOMAS|Twin, one of the twelve ( Matthew 10:3 ;  Mark 3:18 ,  etc.). He was also called Didymus ( John 11:16 ;  20:24 ), which is the Greek equivalent of the Hebrew name. All we know regarding him is recorded in the fourth Gospel ( John 11:15 ,  16;  14:4 ,  5;  20:24 ,  25,  26-29). From the circumstance that in the lists of the apostles he is always mentioned along with Matthew, who was the son of Alphaeus ( Mark 3:18 ), and that these two are always followed by James, who was also the son of Alphaeus, it has been supposed that these three, Matthew, Thomas, and James, were brothers. 
JEREMY|   , THE EPISTLE OF  jer'-e-mi, (Epistole Ieremiou):  1. Name  2. Canonicity and Position  3. Contents  4. Original Language  5. Authorship, Date and Aim  6. Text and Versions  LITERATURE  1. Name:  In manuscripts Vaticanus and Alexandrinus the title is simply "An Epistle of Jeremiah." But in Codex Vaticanus, etc., there is a superscription introducing the letter: "Copy of a letter which Jeremiah sent to the captives about to be led to Babylon by (Peshitta adds Nebuchadnezzar) the king of the Babylonians, to make known to them what had been commanded him by God." What follows is a satirical exposure of the folly of idolatry, and not a letter. The idea of introducing this as a letter from Jeremiah was probably suggested by  Jeremiah 29:1 ;.  2. Canonicity and Position:  The early Greek Fathers were on the whole favorably disposed toward this tract, reckoning it to be a part of the Canon. It is therefore included in the lists of Canonical writings of Origen, Epiphanius, Cyril of Jerusalem and Athanasius, and it was so authoritatively recognized by the Council of Laodicea (360 A.D.).  In most Greek manuscripts of the Septuagint (Codices Alexandrinus and Vaticanus. March, Chisl, in the Syriac Hexateuch), it follows Lamentations as an independent piece, closing the supposed writings of Jeremiah. In the bestknown printed of the Septuagint (Tischendorf, Swete, etc.), the order is Jeremiah, Baruch, Lain, Epistle of Jeremy. In Fritzsche, Lib. Apocrypha VT Graece, Epistle Jeremiah stands between Baruch and Tobit. But in Latin manuscripts, including those of the Vulgate, it is appended to Baruch, of which it forms chapter 6, though it really has nothing to do with that book. This last is the case with Protestant editions (English versions of the Bible, etc.) of the Apocrypha, a more intelligible arrangement, since Jeremiah and Lamentations do not occur in the Apocrypha, and the Biblical Baruch was Jeremiah's amanuensis.  3. Contents:  In the so-called letter (see 1, above) the author shows the absurdity and wickedness of heathen worship. The Jews, for their sins, will be removed to Babylon, where they will remain 7 generations. In that land they will be tempted to worship the gods of the people. The writer's aim is ostensibly to warn them beforehand by showing how helpless and useless the idols worshipped are, and how immoral as well as silly the rites of the Bah religion are. For similar polemics against idolatry, see  Isaiah 44:9-19  (which in its earnestness resembles the Epistle Jeremiah closely);  Jeremiah 10:3-9   Psalm 115:4-8 ;  Psalm 135:15-18 ; The Wisdom of Solomon 13:10-19; 15:13-17.  4. Original Language:  That the Epistle Jeremiah was composed in Greek is the opinion of practically all scholars. There are no marks of translation; the Greek is on the whole good, and abounds in such rhetorical terms as characterized the Greek of Northern Egypt about the be ginning of our era. There is no trace of a Hebrew original, though Origen has been mistakenly understood to say there was one in his day (see Schurer, GJV4, III, 467). Romanist writers defend a Hebrew original, and point to some Hebraisms (verse 44 and the use of the fut. for the past), but these can be matched in admittedly Hellenistic Greek writings.  5. Authorship, Date and Aim:  The writer was almost certainly a resident in Alexandria toward the close of the last century B.C. The Greek of the book, the references to Egyptian religion (verse 19, where the Feast of Lights at Sais-Herod. ii.62-is referred to), and the allusion to the Epistle Jeremiah in 2 Maccabees 2:2, denied by Schurer, etc., make the above conclusion very probable. The author had in mind the dangers to the religion of his fellow-countrymen presented by the fascinating forms of idolatry existing at Alexandria. Certainly Jeremiah is not the author, for the book was written in Greek and never formed part of the Hebrew Canon. Besides, the treatment is far below the level of the genuine writings of that prophet.  6. Text and Versions:  (1) The Greek.  This epistle occurs in the principal manuscripts of the Septuagint uncials (Codices Vaticanus, Alexandrinus, Q, Gamma, contain 7b-24a, etc.) and cursives (except 70, 96, 229).  (2) The Syriac.  P follows the Greek, but very freely. The Syriac H follows the text of Codex Vaticanus closely, often at the expense of Syriac idioms.  (3) The Latin.  The Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) is made direct from the Greek. There is a different Latin version published by Sabatier in his Biblical Sacr. Latin Versiones Antiquas, II, 734;. It is freer than the Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.)  (4) The Arabic.  There are also Arabic (following A), Coptic (ed Quatremere, 1810), and Ethiopic (ed Dillmann, 1894)versions.  LITERATURE.  See under APOCRYPHA for commentary and various editions. But note in addition to the literature mentioned the article the following: Reusch, Erklar. des B. Baruch, 1853; Daubanton, "Het Apok boek Epistole Ieremiou," Theol. Studien, 1888, 126-38.  T. Witton Davies  JEREMY  jer'-e-mi.  See  JEREMIAH (general article) .
LEHI|A jawbone, a place in the tribe of Judah where Samson achieved a victory over the Philistines ( Judges 15:9 ,  14,  16), slaying a thousand of them with the jawbone of an ass. The words in 15:19, "a hollow place that was in the jaw" (A.V.), should be, as in Revised Version, "the hollow place that is in Lehi." 
JAHAZIEL|Beheld by God.  (1.) The third son of Hebron ( 1 Chronicles 23:19 ). (2.) A Benjamite chief who joined David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:4 ). (3.) A priest who accompanied the removal of the ark to Jerusalem ( 1 Chronicles 16:6 ). (4.) The son of Zechariah, a Levite of the family of Asaph ( 2 Chronicles 20:14 -17). He encouraged Jehoshaphat against the Moabites and Ammonites. 
BEZER|Ore of gold or silver.  (1.) A city of the Reubenites; one of the three cities of refuge on the east of Jordan ( Deuteronomy 4: 43 ;  Joshua 20:8 ). It has been identified with the modern ruined village of Burazin, some 12 miles north of Heshbon; also with Kasur-el-Besheir, 2 miles south-west of Dibon. (2.) A descendant of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 7:37 ). 
BITHRON|The broken or divided place, a district in the Arabah or Jordan valley, on the east of the river ( 2 Samuel 2:29 ). It was probably the designation of the region in general, which is broken and intersected by ravines. 
HORI|     ho'-ri (chori, "cave-dweller"):  (1) A Horite descendant of Esau ( Genesis 36:22   1 Chronicles 1:39 ).  (2) A Simonite, father of Shaphat, one of the twelve spies ( Numbers 13:5 ).
HODESH|     ho'-desh (chodhesh, "new moon"): One of the wives of Shaharaim, a Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 8:9 ).
LETUSHIM|     le-too'-shim, le-tu'-shim (leTushim): A Dedanite tribe in North Arabia ( Genesis 25:3 ). With it are connected the ASSHURIM and LEUMMIM (which see).
COZBI|     koz'-bi (kozbi, "deceitful"): A Midianite woman, distinguished as the daughter of Zur, "head of the people of a fathers' house in Midian." She was slain by Phinehas at Shittim in company with "Zimri, the son of Salu, a prince of a fathers' house among the Simeonites" ( Numbers 25:6-18 ).
KENATH|Possession, a city of Gilead. It was captured by Nobah, who called it by his own name ( Numbers 32:42 ). It has been identified with Kunawat, on the slopes of Jebel Hauran (Mount Bashan), 60 miles east from the south end of the Sea of Galilee. 
BOWELS|( Philippians 1:8 ;  2:1 ;  Colossians 3:12 ), compassionate feelings; R.V., "tender mercies." 
REZON|Prince, son of Eliadah. Abandoning the service of Hadadezer, the king of Zobah, on the occasion of his being defeated by David, he became the "captain over a band" of marauders, and took Damascus, and became king of Syria ( 1 Kings 11:23 -25;  2 Samuel 8:3 -8). For centuries after this the Syrians were the foes of Israel. He "became an adversary to Israel all the days of Solomon." 
HASHABNAH|     ha-shab'-na (chashabhnah): One who helped to seal the covenant under Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 10:25 ).
UZZAH|Strength, a son of Abinadab, in whose house the men of Kirjath-jearim placed the ark when it was brought back from the land of the Philistines ( 1 Samuel 7:1 ). He with his brother Ahio drove the cart on which the ark was placed when David sought to bring it up to Jerusalem. When the oxen stumbled, Uzzah, in direct violation of the divine law ( Numbers 4:15 ), put forth his hand to steady the ark, and was immediately smitten unto death. The place where this occurred was henceforth called Perez-uzzah ( 1 Chronicles 13:11 ). David on this feared to proceed further, and placed the ark in the house of Obed-edom the Gittite ( 2 Samuel 6:2 -11;  1 Chronicles 13:6 -13). 
TREES|   CITY OF PALM   pam'-trez (`ir ha-temarim).  See  JERICHO  ( Deuteronomy 34:3   Judges 1:16 ;  Judges 3:13   2 Chronicles 28:15 ).  GOODLY TREES  (peri`ets hadhar, "the fruit (the King James Version "boughs") of goodly (= beautiful or noble) trees"): One of the four species of plants used in the Feast of Tabernacles ( Leviticus 23:40 ). In the Talmud (Cukkdh 35a) this is explained to be the citron (Citrus medica) known in Hebrew as 'ethrogh. This tradition is ancient, at least as old as the Maccabees. Josephus (Ant., XIII, xiii, 5) records that Alexander Janneus, while serving at the altar during this feast, was pelted by the infuriated Jews with citrons. This fruit also figures on coins of this period. It is probable that the citron tree (Malum Persica) was imported from Babylon by Jews returning from the captivity. A citron is now carried in the synagogue by every orthodox Jew in one hand, and the lalabh (of myrtle, willow, and palm branch) in the other, on each day of the Feast of Tabernacles.  Originally the "goodly trees" had a much more generic sense, and the term is so interpreted by the Septuagint and Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.)  See  FEASTS AND FASTS ;  BOOTH .  E. W. G. Masterman  LOTUS TREES  lo'-tus (tse'elim; the King James Version shady trees): The trees under which behemoth (the "hippopotams") rests; "He lieth under the lotus-trees," "The lotus-trees cover him with their shade" ( Job 40:21, 22 ). The Arabic equivalent is the dom tree, Zizyphus lotus, a species of jujube tree (Natural Order Rhamneae); it has many spines and small globular fruit a little bigger than a pea. It is common in the Jordan valley. This plant has nothing to do with the Egyptian lotus.  See  LILY .
TIKVATH|   TIKVAH;   tik'-va, tik'-vath (tiqwah, "hope"):->/cS, the Greek equivalent of the Hebrew CS:HebrewIT+chiddeqelIT-/cS): One of the rivers of Eden going "eastward to Assyria" ( Genesis 2:14  margin), called the Great River ( Daniel 10:4 ), elsewhere mentioned in the apocryphal books, as in Tob 6:1; Judith 1:6; Ecclesiasticus 24:25, called Diglath in Josephus, and Diglit in Pliny, now called in Mesopotamia Dijleh, generally supposed to be a Semitic corruption of Tigra, meaning originally an arrow, which from its rapidity of motion is symbolized. The Tigris rises in the mountains of Armenia, latitude 38 degrees 10 minutes, longitude 39 degrees 20 minutes, only a few miles from the main branch of the Euphrates. After pursuing a tortuous southeasterly course for 150 miles, it is joined by the east branch at Osman Kieui, some distance below Diarbekr. Here the stream is 450 ft. wide and 3 or 4 ft. deep. Passing through numerous mountain gorges for another 150 miles, it emerges into the region of low hills about Nineveh, and a little below into the great alluvial plain of Mesopotamia. Thence in its course to Bagdad it is joined by the Great Zab, the Lesser Zab, the Adhem, and the Diyaleh rivers, bringing a large amount of water from the Zagros Mountains. At Bagdad the overflows from the Euphrates in high water often increase the inundations. The flood season begins early in the month of March, reaching its climax about May 1, declining to its natural level by midsummer. In October and November, the volume of water increases considerably, but not so much as to overflow its banks. Below Bagdad, throughout the region of Babylonia proper, the Tigris joins with the Euphrates in furnishing the water for irrigation so successfully used in ancient times. English engineers are at present with great promise of success aiming to restore the irrigating systems of the region and the prosperity of ancient times. The total length of the river is 1,146 miles. It now joins the Euphrates about 40 miles Northwest of the Persian Gulf, the two streams there forming the Shat el Arab, but in early historical times they entered the Persian Gulf by separate mouths, the Gulf then extending a considerable distance above the present junction of the rivers, the sediment of the streams having silted up the head of the Gulf to that distance.  (1) The father-in-law of Huldah the prophetess ( 2 Kings 22:14 ) (Codex Vaticanus Thekkouau; Codex Alexandrinus Thekkoue; Lucian Thekoue), called in  2 Chronicles 34:22  "Tokhath" (Qere Kethibh Codex Vaticanus Kathoual; Codex Alexandrinus Thakouath, Lucian Thekoe). The reading of 2 Kings is to be preferred.  (2) The father of Jahzeiah ( Ezra 10:15 ) (Codex Vaticanus Helkeia; Codex Alexandrinus Thekoue, called "Theocanus," Revised Version "Thocanus" in 1 Esdras 9:14).
JEHOVAHSHALOM|Jehovah send peace, the name which Gideon gave to the altar he erected on the spot at Ophrah where the angel appeared to him ( Judges 6:24 ). 
BORASHAN|   BOR-ASHAN  bor-ash'-an: A correction of the Massoretic Text in the American Standard Revised Version in  1 Samuel 30:30  for the King James Version "Chor-ashan" and the English Revised Version "Cor-ashan." Probably the same as ASHAN ( Joshua 15:42   1 Chronicles 4:32 ;  1 Chronicles 6:59 ), which see.
ELMADAM|     el-ma'-dam (WH Elmadam; Textus Receptus of the New Testament Elmodam; the King James Version Elmodam):  An ancestor of Jesus, according to Luke's genealogy, in the 6th generation before Zerubbabel ( Luke 3:28 ).
HIGGAION|In  Psalm 92:3  means the murmuring tone of the harp. In  Psalm 9:16  it is a musical sign, denoting probably a pause in the instrumental interlude. In  Psalm 19:14  the word is rendered "meditation;" and in  Lamentations 3:62 , "device" (R.V.,  "imagination"). 
SMYRNA|Myrrh, an ancient city of Ionia, on the western coast of Asia Minor, about 40 miles to the north of Ephesus. It is now the chief city of Anatolia, having a mixed population of about 200,000, of whom about one-third are professed Christians. The church founded here was one of the seven addressed by our Lord ( Revelation 2:8 -11). The celebrated Polycarp, a pupil of the apostle John, was in the second century a prominent leader in the church of Smyrna. Here he suffered martyrdom, A.D. 155. 
ELPAAL|     el-pa'-al ('elpa`al, "God has wrought" (compare el`asah,  Jeremiah 29:3 )):  The name of a descendant of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:11, 12, 18 ).
KEDAR|Dark-skinned, the second son of Ishmael ( Genesis 25:13 ). It is the name for the nomadic tribes of Arabs, the Bedouins generally ( Isaiah 21:16 ;  42:11 ;  60:7 ;  Jeremiah 2:10 ;  Ezek. 27:21 ), who dwelt in the north-west of Arabia. They lived in black hair-tents (Cant. 1:5). To "dwell in the tents of Kedar" was to be cut off from the worship of the true God ( Psalm 120:5 ). The Kedarites suffered at the hands of Nebuchadnezzar ( Jeremiah 49:28 ,  29). 
DIBRI|     dib'-ri (dibhri, "eloquent" (?)): A Danite, whose daughter Shelomith married an Egyptian. Their son was "cut off" (stoned) for blasphemy ( Leviticus 24:11 ).
JEEZER|     je-e'-zer (the King James Version) ('i`ezer; the Revised Version (British and American) IEZER): The name of a elan of Gilead ( Numbers 26:30 ), but read la-'abhi`ezer, i.e. "of Abiezer" (compare  Joshua 17:2 ).  See  ABIEZER .
CHUSHANRISHATHAIM|Cush of double wickedness, or governor of two presidencies, the king of Mesopotamia who oppressed Israel in the generation immediately following Joshua ( Judges 3:8 ). We learn from the Tell-el-Amarna tablets that Palestine had been invaded by the forces of Aram-naharaim (A.V.,  "Mesopotamia") more than once, long before the Exodus, and that at the time they were written the king of Aram-naharaim was still intriguing in Canaan. It is mentioned among the countries which took part in the attack upon Egypt in the reign of Rameses III. (of the Twentieth Dynasty), but as its king is not one of the princes stated to have been conquered by the Pharaoh, it would seem that he did not actually enter Egypt. As the reign of Rameses III. corresponds with the Israelitish occupation of Canaan, it is probable that the Egyptian monuments refer to the oppression of the Israelites by Chushan-rishathaim. Canaan was still regarded as a province of Egypt, so that, in attacking it Chushan-rishathaim would have been considered to be attacking Egypt. 
JOTBATHAH|     jot'-ba-tha (yoTbathah): A desert camp of the Israelites between Hor-hagidgad and Abronah ( Numbers 33:33, 34   Deuteronomy 10:7 ). It was "a land of brooks of water" ( Deuteronomy 10:7 ). Site is unknown.  See  WANDERINGS OF ISRAEL .
GOMORRAH|Submersion, one of the five cities of the plain of Siddim (q.v.) which were destroyed by fire ( Genesis 10:19 ;  13:10 ;  19:24 ,  28). These cities probably stood close together, and were near the northern extremity of what is now the Dead Sea. This city is always mentioned next after Sodom, both of which were types of impiety and wickedness ( Genesis 18:20 ;  Romans 9:29 ). Their destruction is mentioned as an "ensample unto those that after should live ungodly" ( 2 Peter 2:6 ;  Jude 1:4 -7). Their wickedness became proverbial ( Deuteronomy 32:32 ;  Isaiah 1:9 ,  10;  Jeremiah 23:14 ). But that wickedness may be exceeded ( Matthew 10:15 ;  Mark 6:11 ). (see  DEAD SEA ). 
BEROTHITE|   BEEROTHITE;   be-e'-roth-it, be'-er-oth-it (be'erothi;  2 Samuel 4:5, 9   2 Samuel 23:37 ; shortened form,  1 Chronicles 11:39 ).  See  BEEROTH .  BEROTHITE  be'-roth-it.  See  BEEROTHITE .
PROGNOSTICATORS|   MONTHLY;   munth'-li, prog-nos'-ti-ka-terz.  See  ASTROLOGY, sec . I, 6.  PROGNOSTICATORS, MONTHLY  prog-nos'-ti-ka-terz.  See  ASTROLOGY, 6 .
HANOCHITES|   HANOCH;   ha'-nok, ha'-nok-its (chanokh, "initiation," "dedication"):  (1) A grandson of Abraham by Keturah, and an ancestral head of a clan of Midian ( Genesis 25:4   1 Chronicles 1:33 , the King James Version "Henoch").  (2) The eldest son of Reuben ( Genesis 46:9   Exodus 6:14   1 Chronicles 5:3 ).  The descendants of Hanoch were known as Hanochites ( Numbers 26:5 ).
SHIPHI|     shi'fi (shiph`i; Codex Vaticanus Saphal, Codex Alexandrinus Sephein, Lucian, Sophei): A Simeonite prince ( 1 Chronicles 4:37 (36 )).
HAZARGADDAH|Village of fortune, a city on the south border of Judah ( Joshua 15:27 ), midway between the Mediterranean and the Dead Sea. 
CHEMOSH|The destroyer, subduer, or fish-god, the god of the Moabites ( Numbers 21:29 ;  Jeremiah 48:7 ,  13,  46). The worship of this god, "the abomination of Moab," was introduced at Jerusalem by Solomon ( 1 Kings 11:7 ), but was abolished by Josiah ( 2 Kings 23:13 ). On the "Moabite Stone" (q.v.), Mesha ( 2 Kings 3:5 ) ascribes his victories over the king of Israel to this god, "And Chemosh drove him before my sight." 
GEBIM|Cisterns, (rendered "pits, "  Jeremiah 14:3 ; "locusts,  Isaiah 33:4 ), a small place north of Jerusalem, whose inhabitants fled at the approach of the Assyrian army ( Isaiah 10:31 ). It is probably the modern el-Isawiyeh. 
FINES|     finz.  See  PUNISHMENTS .
NOE|     no'-e (Noe): the King James Version of  Matthew 24:37, 38   Luke 3:36 ;  Luke 17:26, 27 ; Tobit 4:12. Greek form of NOAH (which see) (thus the Revised Version (British and American)).
HOBAH|Hiding-place, a place to the north of Damascus, to which Abraham pursued Chedorlaomer and his confederates ( Genesis 14:15 ). 
FIRSTBEGOTTEN|   FIRST-BEGOTTEN  furst-be-got'-'-n (prototokos):  This Greek word is translated in two passages in the King James Version by "first-begotten" ( Hebrews 1:6   Revelation 1:5 ), but in all other places in the King James Version, and always in the Revised Version (British and American), by "firstborn." It is used in its natural literal sense of Jesus Christ as Mary's firstborn ( Luke 2:7   Matthew 1:25  the King James Version); it also bears the literal sense of Jesus Christ as Mary's firstborn ( Luke 2:7   Matthew 1:25  the King James Version); it also bears the literal sense of the firstborn of the firstborn of men and animals ( Hebrews 11:28 ). It is not used in the New Testament or Septuagint of an only child, which is expressed by monogenes (see below).  Metaphorically, it is used of Jesus Christ to express at once His relation to man and the universe and His difference from them, as both He and they are related to God. The laws and customs of all nations show that to be "firstborn" means, not only priority in time, but a certain superiority in privilege and authority. Israel is Yahweh's firstborn among the nations ( Exodus 4:22 ; compare  Jeremiah 31:9 ). The Messianic King is God's firstborn Septuagint prototokos), "the highest of the kings of the earth" ( Psalm 89:27 ). Philo applies the word to the Logos as the archetypal and governing idea of creation. Similarly Christ, as "the firstborn of all creation" ( Colossians 1:15 ), is not only prior to it in time, but above it in power and authority. "All things have been created through him, and unto him" ( Colossians 1:16 ).  He is "sovereign Lord over all creation by virtue of primo-geniture" (Lightfoot). It denotes His status and character and not His origin; the context does not admit the idea that He is a part of the created universe. So in His incarnation He is brought into the world as "firstborn," and God summons all His angels to worship Him ( Hebrews 1:6 ). In His resurrection He is "firstborn from the dead" ( Colossians 1:18 ) or "of the dead" ( Revelation 1:5 ), the origin and prince of life. And finally He is "firstborn among many brethren" in the consummation of God's purpose of grace, when all the elect are gathered home. Not only is He their Lord, but also their pattern, God's ideal Son and men are "foreordained to be conformed to (his) image" ( Romans 8:29 ). Therefore the saints themselves, as growing in His likeness, and as possessing all the privileges of eldest sons, including the kingdom and the priesthood, may be called the "church of the firstborn who are enrolled in heaven" ( Hebrews 12:23 ).  See also  BEGOTTEN , and Lightfoot on  Colossians 1:15 .  T. Rees
UZZIEL|Strength of God.  (1.) One of the sons of Kohath, and uncle of Aaron ( Exodus 6:18 ;  Leviticus 10:4 ). (2.) A Simeonite captain ( 1 Chronicles 4:39 -43). (3.) A son of Bela, and grandson of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 7:7 ). (4.) One of the sons of Heman ( 1 Chronicles 25:4 ); called also Azareel (18). (5.) A son of Jeduthan ( 2 Chronicles 29:14 ). (6.) The son of Harhaiah ( Nehemiah 3:8 ). 
BERNICE|Bearer of victory, the eldest daughter of Agrippa I., the Herod Agrippa of  Acts 12:20 . After the early death of her first husband she was married to her uncle Herod, king of Chalcis. After his death (A.D. 40) she lived in incestuous connection with her brother Agrippa II. ( Acts 25:13 ,  23;  26:30 ). They joined the Romans at the outbreak of the final war between them and the Jews, and lived afterwards at Rome. 
SIDONIANS|     si-do'-ni-anz: Natives or inhabitants of Sidon ( Deuteronomy 3:9   Joshua 13:4, 6   Judges 3:3   1 Kings 5:6 ).
CAREAH|     ka-re'-a.  See  KAREAH .
BETHBARAH|House of crossing, a place south of the scene of Gideon's victory ( Judges 7:24 ). It was probably the chief ford of the Jordan in that district, and may have been that by which Jacob crossed when he returned from Mesopotamia, near the Jabbok ( Genesis 32:22 ), and at which Jephthah slew the Ephraimites ( Judges 12:4 ). Nothing, however, is certainly known of it. (see  BETHABARA .) 
SODOM|Burning; the walled, a city in the vale of Siddim ( Genesis 13:10 ;  14:1 -16). The wickedness of its inhabitants brought down upon it fire from heaven, by which it was destroyed ( 18:16 -33;  19:1 -29;  Deuteronomy 23:17 ). This city and its awful destruction are frequently alluded to in Scripture ( Deuteronomy 29:23 ;  32:32 ;  Isaiah 1:9 ,  10;  3:9 ;  13:19 ;  Jeremiah 23:14 ;  Ezek. 16:46 -56;  Zephaniah 2:9 ;  Matthew 10:15 ;  Romans 9:29 ;  2 Peter 2:6 ,  etc.). No trace of it or of the other cities of the plain has been discovered, so complete was their destruction. Just opposite the site of Zoar, on the south-west coast of the Dead Sea, is a range of low hills, forming a mass of mineral salt called Jebel Usdum, "the hill of Sodom." It has been concluded, from this and from other considerations, that the cities of the plain stood at the southern end of the Dead Sea. Others, however, with much greater probability, contend that they stood at the northern end of the sea. [in 1897]. 
REPHAIAH|     re-fa'-ya, re-fi'-a (rephayah, probably "Yah is healing"; Septuagint Rhaphaia(s)):  (1) In David's family, Septuagint also Rhaphal ( 1 Chronicles 3:21 ).  (2) A captain of Simeon ( 1 Chronicles 4:42 ).  (3) A grandson of Issachar, Septuagint also Rhaphara ( 1 Chronicles 7:2 ).  (4) A descendant of Saul ( 1 Chronicles 9:43 ; in  1 Chronicles 8:37  called "Raphah" (raphah); Septuagint also Raphai).  (5) One of the repairers of the wall under Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 3:9 ).
MEM|     mam, mem "m": The 13th letter of the Hebrew alphabet, transliterated in this Encyclopedia as "m". It came also to be used for the number 40.  See  ALPHABET, for name, etc .
NICOLAS|The victory of the people, a proselyte of Antioch, one of the seven deacons ( Acts 6:5 ). 
KITTIM|( Genesis 10:4 ). (see  CHITTIM .) 
CHEMARIM|Black, ( Zephaniah 1:4 ; rendered "idolatrous priests" in  2 Kings 23:5 ,  and "priests" in  Hosea 10:5 ). Some derive this word from the Assyrian Kamaru, meaning "to throw down," and interpret it as describing the idolatrous priests who prostrate themselves before the idols. Others regard it as meaning "those who go about in black," or "ascetics." 
DOTHAN|Two wells, a famous pasture-ground where Joseph found his brethren watching their flocks. Here, at the suggestion of Judah, they sold him to the Ishmaelite merchants ( Genesis 37:17 ). It is mentioned on monuments in B.C. 1600. It was the residence of Elisha ( 2 Kings 6:13 ), and the scene of a remarkable vision of chariots and horses of fire surrounding the mountain on which the city stood. It is identified with the modern Tell-Dothan, on the south side of the plain of Jezreel, about 12 miles north of Samaria, among the hills of Gilboa. The "two wells" are still in existence, one of which bears the name of the "pit of Joseph" (Jubb Yusuf). 
HAMMEAH|   , THE TOWER OF  ha-me'-a, ham'-e-a (ha-me'ah ( Nehemiah 3:1 ); the King James Version Meah): The origin of the name is obscure; in the margin the meaning is given "Tower of the hundred"; it has been suggested that it may have been 100 cubits high or had 100 steps. It was the most important point on the walls of Jerusalem in going West from the Sheep Gate, and is mentioned along with the T. of HANANEL (which see) ( Nehemiah 3:1 ), and was therefore near the Northeast corner, and probably stood where the Baris and Antonia afterward were, near the Northwest corner of the charam where are today the Turkish barracks.  See  JERUSALEM .  E. W. G. Masterman
HESHBON|Intelligence, a city ruled over by Sihon, king of the Amorites ( Joshua 3:10 ;  13:17 ). It was taken by Moses ( Numbers 21:23 -26), and became afterwards a Levitical city ( Joshua 21:39 ) in the tribe of Reuben ( Numbers 32:37 ). After the Exile it was taken possession of by the Moabites ( Isaiah 15:4 ;  Jeremiah 48:2 ,  34,  45). The ruins of this town are still seen about 20 miles east of Jordan from the north end of the Dead Sea. There are reservoirs in this district, which are probably the "fishpools" referred to in Cant. 7:4. 
HOTHIR|     ho'-thir (hothir, "abundance"): Mentioned in  1 Chronicles 25:4, 28  among the sons of Heman, and one of those set apart by David for the musical service of the house of God (compare 25:6).
CAUDA|     ko'-da (Kauda; also called Klauda; the King James Version Clauda; the modern Greek name Gaudho supports the form Cauda): An island 23 miles West of Cape Matala. It is a small island, and can never have supported a large population, or have been of any importance. Its elevation to the rank of a bishopric in Byzantine times must have been due to its association with the voyage of Paul. The ship with Paul on board was driven under the lee of Cauda ( Acts 27:16 ); in the calm water south of the island the crew succeeded in hauling in the boat, undergirding the ship and slackening sail.  W. M. Calder
EBAL|Stony.  (1.) A mountain 3,076 feet above the level of the sea, and 1,200 feet above the level of the valley, on the north side of which stood the city of Shechem (q.v.). On this mountain six of the tribes ( Deuteronomy 27:12 , 13) were appointed to take their stand and respond according to a prescribed form to the imprecations uttered in the valley, where the law was read by the Levites ( 11:29 ;  29:4 ,  13). This mountain was also the site of the first great altar erected to Jehovah ( Deuteronomy 27:5 -8;  Joshua 8:30 -35). After this the name of Ebal does not again occur in Jewish history. (see  GERIZIM .) (2.) A descendant of Eber ( 1 Chronicles 1:22 ), called also Obal ( Genesis 10:28 ). (3.) A descendant of Seir the Horite ( Genesis 36:23 ). 
HELEM|A stroke, great-grandson of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 7:35 ). 
SHUNI|   ; SHUNITES  shoo'-ni, shoo'-nits. (shuni): One of the sons of Gad and his descendants ( Genesis 46:16   Numbers 26:15 ).
BOOKS|   ADAM,  OF  Books pretending to give the life and deeds of Adam and other Old Testament worthies existed in abundance among the Jews and the early Christians. The Talmud speaks of a Book of Adam, which is now lost, but which probably furnished some of the material which appears in early Christian writings. The Vita Adami was translated from the Ethiopic by Dillmann (1853), and into English by Malan (The Book of Adam and Eve, London, 1882). The Testament of Adam is a portion of the Vita Adami (published by Renan in 1853) and so probably is the Diatheke ton Protoplaston (Fabricius, II, 83). See  APOCALYPTIC LITERATURE ;  APOCRYPHA .  M. O. Evans  BOOKS OF ADAM  See  APOCALYPTIC LITERATURE ;  ADAM, BOOKS OF .  CHRONICLES, BOOKS OF  kron'-i-k'-ls (dibhere ha-yamim), "The Words of the Days"; Septuagint paraleipomenon:   1. The Name   2. The Position of Chronicles in the Old Testament   3. Two Books, or One?   4. The Contents   5. Sources Biblical and Extra-Biblical   6. Nehemiah's Library   7. The Way of Using the Biblical Sources   8. Additions by the Chronicler   9. Omissions by the Chronicler   10. The Extra-Biblical Sources   11. The Object in Writing the Books of Chronicles   12. The Text   13. Critical Estimates   14. Date and Authorship   15. Evidence as to Date and Authorship  Arguments for a Later Date   16. Truthfulness and Historicity  (1) Alleged Proofs of Untruthfulness  (2) Truthfulness in the Various Parts   17. The Values of the Chronicles  LITERATURE   1. The Name:  The analogy of this title to such English words as diary, journal, chronicle, is obvious. The title is one which frequently appears in the Hebrew of the Old Testament. It is used to denote the records of the Medo-Persian monarchy ( Esther 2:23 ;  Esther 6:1 ;  Esther 10:2 ), and to denote public records, either Persian or Jewish, made in late postexilian times ( Nehemiah 12:23 ), and to denote public records of King David ( 1 Chronicles 27:24 ). But its most common use is to denote the Judahite and Israelite records referred to in the Books of Kings as sources ( 1 Kings 14:19 ;  1 Kings 15:7  and about 30 other places). The references in Kings are not to our present Books of Chronicles, for a large proportion of them are to matters not mentioned in these. Either directly or indirectly they refer the reader to public archives.  As applied to our present Books of Chronicles this title was certainly not intended to indicate that they are strictly copies of public documents, though it may indicate that they have a certain official character distinguishing them from other contemporary or future writings. The Greek title is Paraleipomenon, "Of Things that have been Left Untold." Some copies add "concerning the kings of Judah," and this is perhaps the original form of the title. That is, the Greek translators thought of Chronicles as a supplement to the other narrative Scriptural books. Jerome accepted the Greek title, but suggested that the Hebrew title would be better represented by a derivative from the Greek word chronos, and that this would fit the character of the book, which is a chronicle of the whole sacred history. Jerome's suggestion is followed in the title given to the book in the English and other languages.   2. The Position of Chronicles in the Old Testament:  In most of the VSS, as in the English, the Books of Chronicles are placed after the Books of Kings, as being a later account of the matters narrated in Kings; and Ezra and Nehemiah follow Chronicles as being continuations of the narrative. In the Hebrew Bibles the Books of Ezra and Nehemiah and 1 and 2 Chronicles are placed last. By common opinion, based on proof that is entirely sufficient, the three books constitute a single literary work or group of works, by one author or school of authors. It is co nvenient to use the term "the Chronicler" to designate the author, or the authors if there were more than one.   3. Two Books, or One?:  It is the regulation thing to say that 1 and 2 Chronicles were originally one book, which has been divided into two. The fact is that Chronicles is counted as one book in the count which regards the Old Testament as 22 or 24 books, and as two books in the count which regards the whole number of books as 39; and that both ways of counting have been in use as far back as the matter can be traced. Both ways of counting appear in the earliest Christian lists, those of Origen and Melito, for example. 1 Chronicles closes with a summary which may naturally be regarded as the closing of a book.   4. The Contents:  With respect to their contents the Books of Chronicles are naturally divided into three parts. The first part is preliminary, consisting mostly of genealogical matters with accompanying facts and incidents (1 Chronicles 1-9). The second part is an account of the accession and reign of David (1 Chronicles 10-29). The third part is an account of the events under David's successors in the dynasty (2 Chronicles).  The genealogies begin with Adam ( 1 Chronicles 1:1 ) and extend to the latest Old Testament times ( 1 Chronicles 9 ; compare  Nehemiah 11 , and the latest names in the genealogical lines, e.g.  1 Chronicles 3:19 ). The events incidentally mentioned in connection with them are more numerous and of more importance than the casual reader would imagine. They are some dozens in number. Some of them are repeated from the parts of the Old Testament from which the Chronicler draws as sources-for example, such statements as that Nimrod was a mighty one, or that in the time of Peleg the earth was divided, or the details concerning the kings of Edom ( 1 Chronicles 1:10, 19, 43 ; compare  Genesis 10:8, 25 ;  Genesis 36:31 ). Others are instances which the Chronicler has taken from other sources than the Old Testament-for instance, the story of Jabez, or the accounts of the Simeonite conquests of the Meunim and of Amalek ( 1 Chronicles 4:9, 10, 38-43 ).  The account in Chronicles of the reign of David divides itself into three parts. The first part (1 Chronicles 10-21) is a series of sections giving a general view, including the death of Saul, the crowning of David over the twelve tribes, his associates, his wars, the bringing of the ark to Jerusalem, the great Davidic promise, the plague that led to the purchase of the threshing-floor of Ornan the Jebusite. The second part ( 1 Chronicles 22-29:22 ) deals with one particular event and the preparations for it. The event is the making Solomon king, at a great public assembly ( 1 Chronicles 23:1 ;  1 Chronicles 28:1 ). The preparations for it include arrangements for the site and materials and labor for the temple that is to be built, and the organizing of Levites, priests, singers, doorkeepers, captains, for the service of the temple and the kingdom. The third part ( 1 Chronicles 29:22-30 ) is a brief account of Solomon's being made king "a second time" (compare  1 Kings 1 ), with a summary and references for the reign of David.  The history of the successors of David, as given in 2 Chronicles, need not here be commented upon.   5. Sources Biblical and Extra-Biblical:  The sources of the Books of Chronicles classify themselves as Biblical and extra-Biblical. Considerably more than half the contents come from the other Old Testament books, especially from Sam and Ki. Other sources mentioned in the Books of Chronicles are the following:  (1) The Book of the Kings of Judah and Israel ( 2 Chronicles 16:11 ;  2 Chronicles 25:26 ;  2 Chronicles 28:26 ;  2 Chronicles 32:32 ).  (2) The Book of the Kings of Israel and Judah ( 2 Chronicles 27:7 ;  2 Chronicles 35:27 ;  2 Chronicles 36:8 ).  (3) The Book of the Kings of Israel ( 2 Chronicles 20:34 ).  (4) The Book of the Kings ( 2 Chronicles 24:27 ).  It is possible that these may be four variant forms of the same title. It is also possible that they may be references to our present Books of Ki, though in that case we must regard the formulas of reference as conventional rather than exact.  (5) The Book of the Kings of Israel ( 1 Chronicles 9:1 ), a genealogical work.  (6) The Midrash of the Book of the Kings ( 2 Chronicles 24:27 ).  (7) The Words of the Kings of Israel ( 2 Chronicles 33:18 ), referred to for details concerning Manasseh.  Observe that these seven are books of Kings, and that the contents of the last three do not at all correspond with those of our Biblical books. In the seventh title and in several of the titles that are yet to be mentioned it is commonly understood that "Words" is the equivalent of "acts" or "history"; but it is here preferred to retain the form "Words," as lending itself better than the others to the syntactical adjustments.  (8) The Words of Samuel the Man of Vision and the Words of Nathan the Prophet and the Words of Gad the Seer ( 1 Chronicles 29:29 ) are perhaps to be counted as one work, and identified with our Books of Judges and Samuel.  (9) The Words of Nathan the Prophet ( 2 Chronicles 9:29 ; compare  1 Kings 11:41-43 ). Source concerning Solomon.  (10) The Prophecy of Ahijah the Shilonite ( 2 Chronicles 9:29 ; compare  1 Kings 11:29 ;  1 Kings 14:2 , etc.). Solomon.  (11) The Visions of Jedo the Seer ( 2 Chronicles 9:29 ; compare  1 Kings 13 ). Solomon.  (12) The Words of Shemaiah the Prophet ( 2 Chronicles 12:15 ; compare  1 Kings 12:22 ). Rehoboam.  (13) "Shemaiah wrote" ( 1 Chronicles 24:6 ). David.  (14) Iddo the Seer in Reckoning Genealogies ( 2 Chronicles 12:15 ). Rehoboam.  (15) "The Words (The History) of Jehu the son of Hanani, which is inserted in the Book of the Kings of Israel" ( 2 Chronicles 20:34 ; compare  1 Kings 16:1, 7, 12 ). Jehoshaphat.  (16) "The rest of the acts of Uzziah, first and last, did Isaiah the Prophet, the son of Amoz, write" ( 2 Chronicles 26:22 ; compare  Isaiah 1:1 ;  Isaiah 6 ).  (17) "The Vision of Isaiah. in the Book of the Kings of Judah and Israel" ( 2 Chronicles 32:32 ; compare 2 Kings 18-20; Isaiah 36-39, etc.). Hezekiah.  (18) The Words of the Seers ( 2 Chronicles 33:19  margin). Manasseh.  (19) References to "Lamentations," and to "Jeremiah" etc. ( 2 Chronicles 35:25 ). Josiah.  (20) The Midrash of the Prophet Iddo ( 2 Chronicles 13:22 ). Abijah. These numbers, from 12 to 20, are referred to as works of prophets. At first thought there is plausibility in the idea that the references may be to the sections in Samuel and Kings where these several prophets are mentioned; but in nearly all the cases this explanation fades out on examination. The Chronicler had access to prophetic writings not now known to be in existence.  (21) Liturgical writings of David and Solomon ( 2 Chronicles 35:4 ; compare  Ezra 3:10 ). Josiah.  (22) Commandments of David and Gad and Nathan ( 2 Chronicles 29:25 ). Hezekiah.  (23) The Commandment of David and Asaph and Heman and Jeduthun ( 2 Chronicles 35:15 ). Josiah.  (24) Chronicles of King David ( 1 Chronicles 27:24 ).  (25) Last Words of David ( 1 Chronicles 23:27 ).  Add to these many mentions of genealogical works, connected with particular times, those for example of David, Jotham, Jeroboam II ( 1 Chronicles 9:22 ;  1 Chronicles 5:17 ), and mentions of matters that imply record-keeping, from Samuel and onward (e.g.  1 Chronicles 26:26-28 ). Add also the fact that the Chronicler had a habit, exhibited in Ezra and Nehemiah, of using and quoting what he represents to be public documents, for example, letters to and from Cyrus and Artaxerxes and Darius and Artaxerxes Longimanus ( Ezra 1:1 ;  Ezra 6:3 ;  Ezra 4:7, 17 ; 5:06; 6:06; 7:11  Nehemiah 2:7 ). It is no exaggeration to say that the Chronicler claims to have had a considerable library at his command.   6. Nehemiah's Library:  If such a library as this existed we should perhaps expect to find some mention of it somewhere. Such a mention I think there is in the much discussed passage in 2 Maccabees 2:13-15. It occurs in what purports to be a letter written after 164 B.C. by the Maccabean leaders in Jerusalem to Aristobulus in Egypt. The letter has a good deal to say concerning Nehemiah, and among other things this: "And how he, founding a library, gathered together the books about the kings and prophets, and the (books) of David, and letters of kings about sacred gifts." It says that these writings have been scattered by reason of the war, but that Judas has now gathered them again, and that they may be at the service of Aristobulus and his friends.  This alleged letter contains statements that seem fabulous to most modern readers, though they may not have seemed so to Judas and his compatriots. Leaving out of view, however, the intrinsic credibility of the witness, the fitting of the statement into certain other traditions and into the phenomena presented in Chronicles is a thing too remarkable to neglect. In the past, men have cited this passage as an account of the framing of a canon of Scripture-the canon of the Prophets, or of the Prophets and the Hagiographa. But it purports to be an account of a library, not of a body of Scripture; and its list of contents does not appear to be that of either the Prophets or the Hagiographa or both. But it is an exact list of the sources to which the author (or authors) of Chronicles and Ezra and Nehemiah claim to have access-"books about the kings" (see above, Numbers 1-7), "and prophets" (Numbers 8-20), "and of David" (Numbers 21-25), "and letters of kings about sacred gifts" (those cited in Ezra and Nehemiah). The library attributed to Nehemiah corresponds to the one which the Chronicler claims to have used; and the two independent pieces of evidence strongly confirm each the other.   7. The Way of Using the Biblical Sources:  The method in which the Biblical sources are used in Chronicles presents certain remarkable features. As a typical instance study  1 Chronicles 10  in comparison with  1 Samuel 31 .  1 Chronicles 10:1-12  is just a transcription, with slight changes, of the passage in Samuel. A large part of Chronicles is thus made up of passages transcribed from Samuel and Kings. The alternative is that the Chronicler transcribed from sources which had earlier been transcribed in Samuel and Kings, and this alternative may in some cases be the true one.  This phenomenon is interesting for many reasons. It has its bearings on the trustworthiness of the information given; a copy of an ancient document is of higher character as evidence than a mere report of the contents of the document. It has a bearing on questions concerning the text; are the texts in Kings and Chronicles to be regarded as two recensions? It is especially interesting as illustrating the literary processes in use among the writers of our Scriptures.  It is sometimes said that they used their sources not by restating the contents as a modern compiler would do, but by just copying. It would be more correct to say that they do this part of the time. In  1 Chronicles 10  the copying process ceases with  1 Chronicles 10:12 . In  1 Chronicles 10:13, 14  the Chronicler condenses into a sentence a large part of the contents of 1 Samuel; one clause in particular is a condensation of  1 Samuel 28 . So it is with other parts.  1 Chronicles 1:1-4  is abridged from  Genesis 5  at the rate of a name for a section; so is  1 Chronicles 1:24-27  from  Genesis 11:10-26 . In the various parts of Chronicles we find all the methods that are used by any compiler; the differentiating fact is simply that the method of transcribing is more used than it would be by a modern compiler.  In the transcribed passages, almost without exception, there has been a systematic editorial revision. Words and clauses have been pruned out, and grammatical roughness smoothed away. Regularly the text in Chronicles is somewhat briefer, and is more fluent than in Samuel or Kings. If we give the matter careful attention we will be sure that this revisional process took place, and that it accounts for most of the textual differences between Chronicles and the earlier writings, not leaving many to be accounted for as corruptions.   8. Additions by the Chronicler:  Of course the most significant changes made by the Chronicler are those which consist in additions and omissions. It is a familiar fact that the added passages in Chronicles which bulk largest are those which deal with the temple and its Worship and its attendants-its priests, Levites, musicians, singers, doorkeepers. Witness for example the added matter in connection with the bringing of the ark to Jerusalem, the preparations for the temple, the priests' joining Rehoboam, the war between Abijah and Jeroboam, the reforms under Asa and Jehoshaphat, details concerning Uzziah, Hezekiah's passover, the reform of Manasseh, the passover of Josiah (1 Chronicles 15-16; 22-29;  2 Chronicles 11:13-17 ; 13; 14; 15; 17; 19; 20; 26:16-21; 29-31; 33:10-20; 35). It has been less noticed than it should be that while the Chronicler in these passages magnifies the ceremonial laws of Moses, he magnifies those of David yet more.  Next in bulk comes the added genealogical and statistical matter, for example, the larger part of the preliminary genealogies, details as to David's followers, Rehoboam's fortified cities and family affairs with details concerning the Shishak invasion, Asa's military preparations and the invasion by Zerah, with numbers and dates, Jehoshaphat's military arrangements, with numbers, Jehoram's brothers and other details concerning him, Uzziah's army and his business enterprises (1 Chronicles 2-9; 12; 27;  2 Chronicles 11:5-12, 18-23 ;  2 Chronicles 12:3-9 ; 14:3-15; 17:1-5, 10-19; 26:6-15).  The Chronicler is sometimes spoken of as interested in priestly affairs, and not in the prophets. That is a mistake. He takes particular pains to magnify the prophets (e.g.  2 Chronicles 20:20 ;  2 Chronicles 36:12, 16 ). He uses the word "prophet" 30 times, and the two words for "seer" (chozeh and ro'eh) respectively 5 and 11 times. He gives us additional information concerning many of the prophets-for example, Samuel, Gad, Nathan, Ahijah, Shemaiah, Hanani, Jehu, Elijah, Isaiah, Jeremiah. He has taken pains to preserve for us a record of many prophets concerning whom we should otherwise be ignorant-Asaph, Heman, Jeduthun, Jedo ( 2 Chronicles 9:29 ), Iddo, the Oded of Asa's time, Jahaziel the son of Zechariah, Eliezer the son of Dodavah, two Zechariahs ( 2 Chronicles 24:20 ;  2 Chronicles 26:5 ), unnamed prophets of the time of Amaziah ( 2 Chronicles 25:5-10, 15, 16 ), Oded of the time of Ahaz ( 2 Chronicles 28:9 ).  In addition, however, to the materials that can be thus classified, it is the method of the Chronicler to preserve interesting incidents of all kinds by working them into his narrative. When he reaches Jair in his genealogical list, he finds himself in possession of a bit of information not contained in the older writings, and he inserts it ( 1 Chronicles 2:21 ). He is interested to keep alive the memory of the "families of scribes which dwelt at Jabez" ( 1 Chronicles 2:55 ). He has found items concerning craftsmen, and concerning a linen industry, and a potters' industry, and he connects these with names in his list ( 1 Chronicles 4:14, 21, 23 ). He has come across a bit of a hymn in the name of Jabez, and he attaches the hymn to his list of names as an annotation ( 1 Chronicles 4:9, 10 ). There are matters concerning the sickness and the burial of Asa, and concerning the bad conduct of Joash after the death of Jehoiada, and concerning constructions by Hezekiah ( 2 Chronicles 16:12, 13 ;  2 Chronicles 24:15-27 ; 32:27-30), that seem to the Chronicler worth preserving, though they are not recorded in the earlier writings. The fruits of the habit appear, in many scores of instances, in all parts of the Books of Chronicles.   9. Omissions by the Chronicler:  As the Books of Chronicles thus add matters not found in the older books, so they leave out much that is contained in the Books of Samuel and Kings. Here, however, the question should rather be as to what the Chronicler has retained from his sources than as to what he has omitted. He writes for readers whom he assumes to be familiar with the earlier books, and he retains so much of the older narrative as seems to him necessary for defining the relations of his new statements of fact to that narrative. From the point where the history of David begins he has omitted everything that is not strictly connected with David or his dynasty-the history of northern Israel as such, the long narratives concerning the prophets, such distressing affairs as those of Amnon and Absalom and Adonijah and the faithlessness of Solomon, and a multitude of minor particulars. We have already noticed his systematic shortening of the passages which he transcribes.   10. The Extra-Biblical Sources:  There are two marked phenomena in the parts of Chronicles which were not taken from the other canonical books. They are written in later Hebrew of a pretty uniform type; many parts of them are fragmentary. The Hebrew of the parts that were copied from Samuel and Kings is of course the classical Hebrew of those books, generally made more classical by the revision to which it has been subjected. The Hebrew of the other parts is presumably that of the Chronicler himself. The difference is unmistakable. An obvious way of accounting for it is by supposing that the Chronicler treated his Scriptural sources with especial respect, and his other sources with more freedom. We will presently consider whether this is the true account.  There are indications that some of the non-Biblical sources were in a mutilated or otherwise fragmentary condition when the Chronicler used them. Broken sentences and passages and constructions abound. In the translations these are largely concealed, the translators having guessed the meanings into shape, but the roughnesses are palpable in the Hebrew. They appear less in the long narratives than in the genealogies and descriptive passages. They are sometimes spoken of as if they were characteristic of the later Hebrew, but there is no sense in that.  For example, most of the genealogies are incomplete. The priestly genealogies omit some of the names that are most distinguished in the history, such names as those of Jehoiada and two Azariahs ( 2 Kings 11:9 , etc.;  2 Chronicles 26:17 ;  2 Chronicles 31:10 ). Many of the genealogies are given more than once, and in variant forms, but with their incompleteness still palpable. There are many breaks in the lists. We read the names of one group, and we suddenly find ourselves in the midst of names that belong to another group, and with nothing to call attention to the transition. The same phenomena appear in the sections in  1 Chronicles 23:2-27 . These contain a succession of matters arranged in absolutely systematic order in classes and subclasses, while many of the statements thus arranged are so fragmentary as to be hardly intelligible. The most natural explanation of these phenomena assumes that the writer had a quantity of fragments in writing-clay tablets, perhaps, or pottery or papyrus, or what not, more or less mutilated, and that he copied them as best he could, one after another. A modern writer, doing such work, would indicate the lacunae by dots or dashes or other devices. The ancient copyist simply wrote the bits of text one after another, without such indications. In regard to many of the supposable lacunae in Chronicles scholars would differ, but there are a large number in regard to which all would agree. If someone would print a text of Chronicles in which these should be indicated, he would make an important contribution to the intelligibility of the books.   11. The Object in Writing the Books of Chronicles:  On the basis of these phenomena what judgment can we form as to the purposes for which the books of Chronicles were written? There are those who find the answer to this question a very simple one. They say that the interests of the writer were those of the temple priesthood, that it seemed to him that the older histories did not emphasize these interests as they ought, and that he therefore wrote a new history, putting into it the views and facts which he thought should be there. If this statement were modified so as not to impugn the good faith of the Chronicler, it would be nearly correct as a statement of part of his purpose. His purpose was to preserve what he regarded as historical materials that were in danger of being lost, materials concerning the temple-worship, but also concerning a large variety of other matters. He had the historian's instinct for laying hold of all sorts of details, and putting them into permanent form. His respiration from God (we do not here discuss the nature of that inspiration) led him this way. He wanted to save for the future that which he regarded as historical fact. The contents of the book, determined in part by his enthusiasm for the temple, were also determined in part by the nature of the materials that were providentially at his disposal. There seems also to have been present in his consciousness the idea of bringing to completion the body of sacred writings which had then been accumulating for centuries.  As we have seen, the Greek translators gave to the Books of Chronicles a title which expressed the idea they had of the work. They regarded it as the presentation of matters which had been omitted in the earlier Scriptures, as written not to supersede the older books, but to supplement them, as being, along with Ezra and Nehemiah, a work that brought the Scriptures up to date, and made them complete.   12. The Text:  The text of the Books of Chronicles has been less carefully preserved than that of some other parts of the Old Testament. Witness for example the numbers 42 and 8 for the ages of Ahaziah and Jehoiachin ( 2 Chronicles 22:2 ; compare  2 Kings 8:26   2 Chronicles 36:9 ; compare  2 Kings 24:8 ). There is no proof, however, of important textual corruption. As we have seen, the fragmentary character of certain parts is probably in the main due to exactness in following fragmentary sources, and not to bad text; and the differences between Samuel or Kings and Chronicles, in the transcribed passages, are mostly due to intended revision rather than to text variations.   13. Critical Estimates:  In critical discussions less semblance of fair play has been accorded to Chronicles than even to most of the other Scriptures. It is not unusual to assume that the Chronicler's reference to sources is mere make-believe, that he "has cited sources simply to produce the impression that he is writing with authority." Others hurry to the generalization that the Books of Kings mentioned in Chronicles (see Numbers 1-7 above) are all one work, which must therefore have been an extensive Midrash (commentary, exe getical and anecdotal) on the canonical Books of Kings; and that the references to prophetic writings are to sections in this Midrash; so that practically the Chronicler had only two sources, the canonical books and this midrashic history of Israel; and that "it is impossible to determine" whether he gathered any bits of information from any other sources.  Into the critical theories concerning Chronicles enters a hypothesis of an earlier Book of Ki that was more extensive than our present canonical books. And in recent publications of such men as Buchler, Benzinger and Kittel are theories of an analysis of Chronicles into documents-for example, an earlier writing that made no distinction between priests and Levites, or an earlier writing which dealt freely with the canonical books; and the later writing of the Chronicler proper.  Read Complete Article...  
IRIJAH|     i-ri'-ja (yir'iyayh, "Yah sees"): A captain at the gate of Benjamin in Jerusalem, who arrested Jeremiah the prophet on suspicion of intending to desert to the Chaldeans ( Jeremiah 37:13, 14 ).
PHENICE|Properly Phoenix a palm-tree (as in the R.V.), a town with a harbour on the southern side of Crete ( Acts 27:12 ), west of the Fair Havens. It is now called Lutro. 
HAZERIM|Villages, probably the name of the temporary villages in which the nomad Avites resided ( Deuteronomy 2:23 ). 
HOR|Mountain.  (1.) One of the mountains of the chain of Seir or Edom, on the confines of Idumea ( Numbers 20:22 -29;  33:37 ). It was one of the stations of the Israelites in the wilderness ( 33:37 ), which they reached in the circuitous route they were obliged to take because the Edomites refused them a passage through their territory. It was during the encampment here that Aaron died ( Numbers 33:37 -41). (see  AARON .) The Israelites passed this mountain several times in their wanderings. It bears the modern name of Jebel Harun, and is the highest and most conspicious of the whole range. It stands about midway between the Dead Sea and the Elanitic gulf. It has two summits, in the hallow between which it is supposed that Aaron died. Others, however, suppose that this mountain is the modern Jebel Madurah, on the opposite, i.e., the western, side of the Arabah. (2.) One of the Marks of the northern boundary of Palestine ( Numbers 34:7 ,  8). Nowhere else mentioned. Perhaps it is one of the peaks of Lebanon. 
LETHECH|     le'-thek (lethekh): A liquid measure equivalent to half a homer ( Hosea 3:2  margin) and containing about 5 1/2 bushels.  See  WEIGHTS AND MEASURES .
TYRANNUS|Prince, a Greek rhetorician, in whose "school" at Ephesus Paul disputed daily for the space of two years with those who came to him ( Acts 19:9 ). Some have supposed that he was a Jew, and that his "school" was a private synagogue. 
JOSHUA|Jehovah is his help, or Jehovah the Saviour. The son of Nun, of the tribe of Ephraim, the successor of Moses as the leader of Israel. He is called Jehoshua in  Numbers 13:16  (A.V.), and Jesus in  Acts 7:45  and  Hebrews 4:8  (R.V.,  Joshua). He was born in Egypt, and was probably of the age of Caleb, with whom he is generally associated. He shared in all the events of the Exodus, and held the place of commander of the host of the Israelites at their great battle against the Amalekites in Rephidim ( Exodus 17:8 -16). He became Moses' minister or servant, and accompanied him part of the way when he ascended Mount Sinai to receive the two tables ( Exodus 32:17 ). He was also one of the twelve who were sent on by Moses to explore the land of Canaan ( Numbers 13:16 ,  17), and only he and Caleb gave an encouraging report. Under the direction of God, Moses, before his death, invested Joshua in a public and solemn manner with authority over the people as his successor ( Deuteronomy 31:23 ). The people were encamped at Shittim when he assumed the command ( Joshua 1:1 ); and crossing the Jordan, they encamped at Gilgal, where, having circumcised the people, he kept the Passover, and was visited by the Captain of the Lord's host, who spoke to him encouraging words ( 1:1 -9). Now began the wars of conquest which Joshua carried on for many years, the record of which is in the book which bears his name. Six nations and thirty-one kings were conquered by him ( Joshua 11:18 -23;  12:24 ). Having thus subdued the Canaanites, Joshua divided the land among the tribes, Timnath-serah in Mount Ephraim being assigned to himself as his own inheritance. (see  SHILOH ; PRIEST.) His work being done, he died, at the age of one hundred and ten years, twenty-five years after having crossed the Jordan. He was buried in his own city of Timnath-serah ( Joshua 24 ); and "the light of Israel for the time faded away." Joshua has been regarded as a type of Christ ( Hebrews 4:8 ) in the following particulars: (1) In the name common to both; (2) Joshua brings the people into the possession of the Promised Land, as Jesus brings his people to the heavenly Canaan; and (3) as Joshua succeeded Moses, so the Gospel succeeds the Law. The character of Joshua is thus well sketched by Edersheim:, "Born a slave in Egypt, he must have been about forty years old at the time of the Exodus. Attached to the person of Moses, he led Israel in the first decisive battle against Amalek ( Exodus 17:9 ,  13), while Moses in the prayer of faith held up to heaven the God-given `rod.' It was no doubt on that occasion that his name was changed from Oshea, `help,' to Jehoshua, `Jehovah is help' ( Numbers 13:16 ). And this name is the key to his life and work. Alike in bringing the people into Canaan, in his wars, and in the distribution of the land among the tribes, from the miraculous crossing of Jordan and taking of Jericho to his last address, he was the embodiment of his new name, `Jehovah is help.' To this outward calling his character also corresponded. It is Marked by singleness of purpose, directness, and decision...He sets an object before him, and unswervingly follows it" (Bible Hist.,  iii. 103)  Joshua, The Book of Contains a history of the Israelites from the death of Moses to that of Joshua. It consists of three parts:  (1.) The history of the conquest of the land (1-12).  (2.) The allotment of the land to the different tribes, with the appointment of cities of refuge, the provision for the Levites (13-22), and the dismissal of the eastern tribes to their homes. This section has been compared to the Domesday Book of the Norman conquest.  (3.) The farewell addresses of Joshua, with an account of his death (23,  24). This book stands first in the second of the three sections, (1) the Law, (2) the Prophets, (3) the "other writings" = Hagiographa, into which the Jewish Church divided the Old Testament. There is every reason for concluding that the uniform tradition of the Jews is correct when they assign the authorship of the book to Joshua, all except the concluding section; the last verses ( 24:29 -33) were added by some other hand. There are two difficulties connected with this book which have given rise to much discussion,  (1.) The miracle of the standing still of the sun and moon on Gibeon. The record of it occurs in Joshua's impassioned prayer of faith, as quoted ( Joshua 10:12 -15) from the "Book of Jasher" (q.v.). There are many explanations given of these words. They need, however, present no difficulty if we believe in the possibility of God's miraculous interposition in behalf of his people. Whether it was caused by the refraction of the light, or how, we know not. (2.) Another difficulty arises out of the command given by God utterly to exterminate the Canaanites. "Shall not the Judge of all the earth do right?" It is enough that Joshua clearly knew that this was the will of God, who employs his terrible agencies, famine, pestilence, and war, in the righteous government of this world. The Canaanites had sunk into a state of immorality and corruption so foul and degrading that they had to be rooted out of the land with the edge of the sword. "The Israelites' sword, in its bloodiest executions, wrought a work of mercy for all the countries of the earth to the very end of the world." This book resembles the Acts of the Apostles in the number and variety of historical incidents it records, and in its many references to persons and places; and as in the latter case the epistles of Paul (see Paley's Horae Paul.) confirm its historical accuracy by their incidental allusions and "undesigned coincidences," so in the former modern discoveries confirm its historicity. The Amarna tablets (see  ADONIZEDEC ) are among the most remarkable discoveries of the age. Dating from about B.C. 1480 down to the time of Joshua, and consisting of official communications from Amorite, Phoenician, and Philistine chiefs to the king of Egypt, they afford a glimpse into the actual condition of Palestine prior to the Hebrew invasion, and illustrate and confirm the history of the conquest. A letter, also still extant, from a military officer, "master of the captains of Egypt," dating from near the end of the reign of Rameses II., gives a curious account of a journey, probably official, which he undertook through Palestine as far north as to Aleppo, and an insight into the social condition of the country at that time. Among the things brought to light by this letter and the Amarna tablets is the state of confusion and decay that had now fallen on Egypt. The Egyptian garrisons that had held possession of Palestine from the time of Thothmes III., some two hundred years before, had now been withdrawn. The way was thus opened for the Hebrews. In the history of the conquest there is no mention of Joshua having encountered any Egyptian force. The tablets contain many appeals to the king of Egypt for help against the inroads of the Hebrews, but no help seems ever to have been sent. Is not this just such a state of things as might have been anticipated as the result of the disaster of the Exodus? In many points, as shown under various articles, the progress of the conquest is remarkably illustrated by the tablets. The value of modern discoveries in their relation to Old Testament history has been thus well described: "The difficulty of establishing the charge of lack of historical credibility, as against the testimony of the Old Testament, has of late years greatly increased. The outcome of recent excavations and explorations is altogether against it. As long as these books contained, in the main, the only known accounts of the events they mention, there was some plausibility in the theory that perhaps these accounts were written rather to teach moral lessons than to preserve an exact knowledge of events. It was easy to say in those times men had not the historic sense. But the recent discoveries touch the events recorded in the Bible at very many different points in many different generations, mentioning the same persons, countries, peoples, events that are mentioned in the Bible, and showing beyond question that these were strictly historic. The point is not that the discoveries confirm the correctness of the Biblical statements, though that is commonly the case, but that the discoveries show that the peoples of those ages had the historic sense, and, specifically, that the Biblical narratives they touch are narratives of actual occurrences." 
BEERSHEBA|Well of the oath, or well of seven, a well dug by Abraham, and so named because he and Abimelech here entered into a compact ( Genesis 21:31 ). On re-opening it, Isaac gave it the same name ( Genesis 26:31 -33). It was a favourite place of abode of both of these patriarchs ( 21:33 - 22:1 ,  19;  26:33 ;  28:10 ). It is mentioned among the "cities" given to the tribe of Simeon ( Joshua 19:2 ;  1 Chronicles 4:28 ). From Dan to Beersheba, a distance of about 144 miles ( Judges 20:1 ;  1 Chronicles 21:2 ;  2 Samuel 24:2 ), became the usual way of designating the whole Promised Land, and passed into a proverb. After the return from the Captivity the phrase is narrowed into "from Beersheba unto the valley of Hinnom" ( Nehemiah 11:30 ). The kingdom of the ten tribes extended from Beersheba to Mount Ephraim ( 2 Chronicles 19:4 ). The name is not found in the New Testament. It is still called by the Arabs Bir es-Seba, i.e., "well of the seven", where there are to the present day two principal wells and five smaller ones. It is nearly midway between the southern end of the Dead Sea and the Mediterranean. 
SALMONE|A promontory on the east of Crete, under which Paul sailed on his voyage to Rome ( Acts 27:7 ); the modern Cape Sidero. 
MAHLITES|     ma'-lits (machli): Descendants of Mahli, son of Merari ( Numbers 3:33 ;  Numbers 26:58 ). These Mahlites appear to have followed the example of the daughters of Zelophehad, mutatis mutandis. (See  MAHLAH ; had the name become the description of a practice?) They married the daughters of their uncle Eleazar ( 1 Chronicles 23:21, 22 ).
STRINGS|   TEN   (`asor).  See  MUSIC, I, 1, (2), (c) .
HIVITE|     hi'-vit (chiwwni; Heuaios):  1. Name:  A son of Canaan ( Genesis 10:17 ), i.e. an inhabitant of the land of Canaan along with the Canaanite and other tribes ( Exodus 3:17 , etc.). In the list of Canaanite peoples given in  Genesis 15:19-21 , the Hivites are omitted in the Hebrew text, though inserted in Septuagint and S. Gesenius suggests that the name is descriptive, meaning "villagers." The difficulty of explaining it is increased by the fact that it has been confused with "Horite" in some passages of the Hebrew text. In  Joshua 9:7  the Septuagint reads "Horite" as also does Codex A in  Genesis 34:2 , and in  Genesis 36:2  a comparison with 36:24, 25 shows that "Horite" must be substituted for "Hivite."  2. Geographical Situation:  In  Judges 3:3  the Hittites are described as dwelling "in Mount Lebanon, from Mount Baal-hermon unto the entrance of Hamath," and in accordance with this the Hivite is described in  Joshua 11:3  as being "under Hermon in the land of Mizpeh," and in  2 Samuel 24:7  they are mentioned immediately after "the stronghold of Tyre." Hence, the Septuagint (Codex Alexandrinus) reading must be right in  Genesis 34:2  and  Joshua 9:7 , which makes the inhabitants of Shechem and Gibeon Horites instead of Hivites; indeed, in  Genesis 48:22  the people of Shechem are called Amorite, though this was a general name for the population of Canaan in the patriarchal period. No name resembling Hivite has yet been found in the Egyptian or Babylonian inscriptions.  A. H. Sayce
MICHAL|Rivulet, or who as God?, the younger of Saul's two daughters by his wife Ahinoam ( 1 Samuel 14:49 ,  50). "Attracted by the graces of his person and the gallantry of his conduct, she fell in love with David and became his wife" ( 18:20 -28). She showed her affection for him by promoting his escape to Naioth when Saul sought his life ( 1 Samuel 19:12 -17. Comp.  Psalm 59 . See TERAPHIM). After this she did not see David for many years. Meanwhile she was given in marriage to another man, Phalti or Phaltiel of Gallim ( 1 Samuel 25:44 ), but David afterwards formally reclaimed her as his lawful wife ( 2 Samuel 3:13 -16). The relation between her and David soon after this was altered. They became alienated from each other. This happened on that memorable day when the ark was brought up in great triumph from its temporary resting-place to the Holy City. In David's conduct on that occasion she saw nothing but a needless humiliation of the royal dignity ( 1 Chronicles 15:29 ). She remained childless, and thus the races of David and Saul were not mixed. In  2 Samuel 21:8  her name again occurs, but the name Merab should probably be here substituted for Michal (Comp.  1 Samuel 18:19 ). 
POMMELS|( 2 Chronicles 4:12 ,  13), or bowls ( 1 Kings 7:41 ), were balls or "rounded knobs" on the top of the chapiters (q.v.). 
IRAM|Citizen, chief of an Edomite tribe in Mount Seir ( Genesis 36:43 ). 
ZAREPHATH|Smelting-shop, "a workshop for the refining and smelting of metals", a small Phoenician town, now Surafend, about a mile from the coast, almost midway on the road between Tyre and Sidon. Here Elijah sojourned with a poor widow during the "great famine," when the "heaven was shut up three years and six months" ( Luke 4:26 ;  1 Kings 17:10 ). It is called Sarepta in the New Testament ( Luke 4:26 ). 
BETHCAR|Sheep-house, a place to which the Israelites pursued the Philistines west from Mizpeh ( 1 Samuel 7:11 ). 
HOSHEA|Salvation.  (1.) The original name of the son of Nun, afterwards called Joshua ( Numbers 13:8 ,  16;  Deuteronomy 32:44 ). (2.)  1 Chronicles 27:20 . The ruler of Ephraim in David's time. (3.) The last king of Israel. He conspired against and slew his predecessor, Pekah ( Isaiah 7:16 ), but did not ascend the throne till after an interregnum of warfare of eight years ( 2 Kings 17:1 ,  2). Soon after this he submitted to Shalmaneser, the Assyrian king, who a second time invaded the land to punish Hoshea, because of his withholding tribute which he had promised to pay. A second revolt brought back the Assyrian king Sargon, who besieged Samaria, and carried the ten tribes away beyond the Euphrates, B.C. 720 ( 2 Kings 17:5 ,  6;  18:9 -12). No more is heard of Hoshea. He disappeared like "foam upon the water" ( Hosea 10:7 ;  13:11 ). 
GALAL|     ga'-lal (galal):  The name of two Levites, one mentioned in  1 Chronicles 9:15 , the other in  1 Chronicles 9:16  and  Nehemiah 11:17 .
WINDS|Blowing from the four quarters of heaven ( Jeremiah 49:36 ;  Ezek. 37:9 ;  Dan. 8:8 ;  Zechariah 2:6 ). The east wind was parching ( Ezek. 17:10 ;  19:12 ), and is sometimes mentioned as simply denoting a strong wind ( Job 27:21 ;  Isaiah 27:8 ). This wind prevails in Palestine from February to June, as the west wind ( Luke 12:54 ) does from November to February. The south was a hot wind ( Job 37:17 ;  Luke 12:55 ). It swept over the Arabian peninsula. The rush of invaders is figuratively spoken of as a whirlwind ( Isaiah 21:1 ); a commotion among the nations of the world as a striving of the four winds ( Dan. 7:2 ). The winds are subject to the divine power ( Psalm 18:10 ;  135:7 ). 
SHAMMA|     sham'-a (shamma'; Codex Vaticanus Sema; Codex Alexandrinus Samma): An Asherite ( 1 Chronicles 7:37 ).
SHELOMOTH|     she-lo'-moth, shel'-o-moth, -moth (shelomoth):  (1) An Izharite ( 1 Chronicles 24:22 , Codex Vaticanus and Codex Alexandrinus Salomoth; Lucian, Salomith = "Shelomith" of  1 Chronicles 23:18 ).  (2) A Levite descended from Eliezer ben Moses ( 1 Chronicles 26:25 , Qere shelomith;  1 Chronicles 26:28 ).  (3) A Gershonite ( 1 Chronicles 23:9 , Qere Shelomith; Codex Vaticanus Alotheim, Codex Alexandrinus Salomeith).
QUAILS|The Israelites were twice relieved in their privation by a miraculous supply of quails, (1) in the wilderness of Sin ( Exodus 16:13 ), and (2) again at Kibroth-hattaavah (q.v.),  Numbers 11:31 . God "rained flesh upon them as dust, and feathered fowls like as the sand of the sea" ( Psalm 78:27 ). The words in  Numbers 11:31 , according to the Authorized Version, appear to denote that the quails lay one above another to the thickness of two cubits above the ground. The Revised Version, however, reads, "about two cubits above the face of the earth", i.e., the quails flew at this height, and were easily killed or caught by the hand. Being thus secured in vast numbers by the people, they "spread them all abroad" ( 11:32 ) in order to salt and dry them. These birds (the Coturnix vulgaris of naturalists) are found in countless numbers on the shores of the Mediterranean, and their annual migration is an event causing great excitement. 
MISHAL|A city of the tribe of Asher ( Joshua 21:30 ;  1 Chronicles 6:74 ). It is probably the modern Misalli, on the shore near Carmel. 
THISTLES|     this'-'-lz.  See  THORNS .
MEMUCAN|Dignified, one of the royal counsellors at the court of Ahasuerus, by whose suggestion Vashti was divorced ( Esther 1:14 ,  16,  21). 
CAINAN|Possession; smith.  (1.) The fourth antediluvian patriarch, the eldest son of Enos. He was 70 years old at the birth of his eldest son Mahalaleel, after which he lived 840 years ( Genesis 5:9 -14), and was 910 years old when he died. He is also called Kenan ( 1 Chronicles 1:2 ). (2.) The son of Arphaxad ( Luke 3:36 ). He is nowhere named in the Old Testament. He is usually called the "second Cainan." 
BARABBAS|I.e., son of Abba or of a father, a notorious robber whom Pilate proposed to condemn to death instead of Jesus, whom he wished to release, in accordance with the Roman custom ( John 18:40 ;  Mark 15:7 ;  Luke 23:19 ). But the Jews were so bent on the death of Jesus that they demanded that Barabbas should be pardoned ( Matthew 27:16 -26;  Acts 3:14 ). This Pilate did. 
GARMITE|     gar'-mit (garmi):  A gentilic name applied to Keilah in  1 Chronicles 4:19 .  The reason for this is not known.
SYROPHENICIAN|"a Greek, a Syrophenician by nation" ( Mark 7:26 ), i.e., a Gentile born in the Phoenician part of Syria. (see  PHENICIA .) When our Lord retired into the borderland of Tyre and Sidon ( Matthew 15:21 ), a Syro-phoenician woman came to him, and earnestly besought him, in behalf of her daughter, who was grievously afflicted with a demon. Her faith in him was severely tested by his silence ( Matthew 15:23 ), refusal (24), and seeming reproach that it was not meet to cast the children's bread to dogs (26). But it stood the test, and her petition was graciously granted, because of the greatness of her faith (28). 
MEHIDA|     me-hi'-da (mechidha', "renowned"; "Meeda" (1 Esdras 5:32)): Ancestor and patronymic of a family of Nethinim who came back from Babylon with Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:52   Nehemiah 7:54 ).
SUBURBS|The immediate vicinity of a city or town ( Numbers 35:3 ,  7;  Ezek. 45:2 ). In  2 Kings 23:11  the Hebrew word there used (parvarim) occurs nowhere else. The Revised Version renders it "precincts." The singular form of this Hebrew word (parvar) is supposed by some to be the same as Parbar (q.v.), which occurs twice in  1 Chronicles 26:18 . 
ZEBULUN|Dwelling, the sixth and youngest son of Jacob and Leah ( Genesis 30:20 ). Little is known of his personal history. He had three sons ( 46:14 ).  Zebulun, Lot of In Galilee, to the north of Issachar and south of Asher and Naphtali ( Joshua 19:10 -16), and between the Sea of Galilee and the Mediterranean. According to ancient prophecy this part of Galilee enjoyed a large share of our Lord's public ministry ( Isaiah 9:1 ,  2;  Matthew 4:12 -16).  Zebulun, Tribe of Numbered at Sinai ( Numbers 1:31 ) and before entering Canaan ( 26:27 ). It was one of the tribes which did not drive out the Canaanites, but only made them tributary ( Judges 1:30 ). It took little interest in public affairs. It responded, however, readily to the summons of Gideon ( 6:35 ), and afterwards assisted in enthroning David at Hebron ( 1 Chronicles 12:33 ,  40). Along with the other northern tribes, Zebulun was carried away into the land of Assyria by Tiglath-pileser ( 2 Kings 15:29 ). In Deborah's song the words, "Out of Zebulun they that handle the pen of the writer" ( Judges 5:14 ) has been rendered in the R.V., "They that handle the marshal's staff." This is a questionable rendering. "The word sopher (`scribe' or 'writer') defines the word shebhet (`rod' or `pen') with which it is conjoined. The `rod of the scribe' on the Assyrian monuments was the stylus of wood or metal, with the help of which the clay tablet was engraved, or the papyrus inscribed with characters. The scribe who wielded it was the associate and assistant of the `lawgivers.'" (Sayce). 
TELASSAR|Or Thelasar, ( Isaiah 37:12 ;  2 Kings 19:12 ), a province in the south-east of Assyria, probably in Babylonia. Some have identified it with Tel Afer, a place in Mesopotamia, some 30 miles from Sinjar. 
LUD| (1.) The fourth son of Shem ( Genesis 10:22 ;  1 Chronicles 1:17 ), ancestor of the Lydians probably. (2.) One of the Hamitic tribes descended from Mizraim ( Genesis 10:13 ), a people of Africa ( Ezek. 27:10 ;  30:5 ), on the west of Egypt. The people called Lud were noted archers ( Isaiah 66:19 ; Comp.  Jeremiah 46:9 ). 
JAHATH|Union.  (1.) A son of Shimei, and grandson of Gershom ( 1 Chronicles 23:10 ). (2.) One of the sons of Shelomoth, of the family of Kohath ( 1 Chronicles 24:22 ). (3.) A Levite of the family of Merari, one of the overseers of the repairs of the temple under Josiah ( 2 Chronicles 34:12 ). 
HELKAI|Smooth-tongued, one of the chief priests in the time of Joiakim ( Nehemiah 12:15 ). 
BAANA|Son of affliction.  (1.) One of Solomon's purveyors ( 1 Kings 4:12 ). (2.) Son of Hushai, another of Solomon's purveyors ( 1 Kings 4:16 ). (3.) Father of Zadok ( Nehemiah 3:4 ). 
IDALAH|Snares(?), a city near the west border of Zebulun ( Joshua 19:15 ). It has been identified with the modern Jeida, in the valley of Kishon. 
BELTESHAZZAR|Beltis protect the king!, the Chaldee name given to Daniel by Nebuchadnezzar ( Dan. 1:7 ). 
HANAMEL|     han'-a-mel (hanam'el; the King James Version Hanameel, ha-nam'el): The son of Shallum, Jeremiah's uncle, of whom the prophet, while in prison, during the time when Jerusalem was besieged by the Chaldeans, bought a field with due formalities, in token that a time would come when house and vineyards would once more be bought in the land ( Jeremiah 32:6-15 ).
COLHOZEH|   COL-HOZEH  kol-ho'-ze (kol-chozeh, "all seeing"; Septuagint omits): A man whose son Shallum rebuilt the fountain gate of Jerusalem in the days of Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 3:15 ). The Col-hozeh of  Nehemiah 11:5  is probably another man.
POTTERS|Potters field  The name given to the piece of ground which was afterwards bought with the money that had been given to Judas. It was called the "field of blood" ( Matthew 27:7 -10). Tradition places it in the valley of Hinnom. (see  ACELDAMA .) 
SEAMEW|   SEA-MEW  se'-mu (shachaph; laros; Latin, Larus canus): The sea-gull. Used by modern translators in the list of abominations in the place of the cuckoo ( Leviticus 11:16   Deuteronomy 14:15 ). It is very probable that the sea-gull comes closer to the bird intended than the CUCKOO (which see). The sea-gull is a "slender" bird, but not "lean" as the root shachaph implies. However, with its stretch of wing and restless flight it gives this impression. Gulls are common all along the Mediterranean coast and around the Sea of Galilee. They are thought to have more intelligence than the average bird, and to share with some eagles, hawks, vultures and the raven the knowledge that if they find mollusk they cannot break they can carry it aloft and drop it on the rocks. Only a wise bird learns this. Most feathered creatures pick at an unyielding surface a few times and then seek food elsewhere. There are two reasons why these birds went on the abomination lists. To a steady diet of fish they add carrion. Then they are birds of such nervous energy, so exhaustless in flight, so daring in flying directly into the face of fierce winds, that the Moslems believed them to be tenanted with the souls of the damned. Moses was reared and educated among the Egyptians, and the laws he formulated often are tinged by traces of his early life. History fails to record any instance of a man reared in Egypt who permitted the killing of a gull, ibis, or hoopoe.  Gene Stratton-Porter
ZITHRI|The Lord protects, a Levite, son of Uzziel ( Exodus 6:22 ). 
CAPPADOCIA|The easternmost and the largest province of Asia Minor. Christianity very early penetrated into this country ( 1 Peter 1:1 ). On the day of Pentecost there were Cappadocians at Jerusalem ( Acts 2:9 ). 
MEONOTHAI|     me-on'-o-thi, me-o'-no-thi, me-o-no'-thi (me`onothai, "my dwellings"): A son of Othniel, nephew of Caleb ( 1 Chronicles 4:14 ). Possibly, as the King James Version margin suggests, and the Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) and Complutensian Septuagint say,  1 Chronicles 4:13, 14  should read "the sons of Othniel, Hathath and Meonothai; and Meonothai begat Ophrah," etc. The latter may be founder of the town of that name.
PENIEL|     pe-ni'-el, pen'-i-el, pe'-ni-el (peni'el, "face of God"; Eidos theou): This is the form of the name in  Genesis 32:30 . In the next verse and elsewhere it appears as "Penuel." The name is said to have been given to the place by Jacob after his night of wrestling by the Jabbok, because, as he said, "I have seen God face to face, and my life is preserved." It was a height evidently close by the stream over which Jacob passed in the morning. Some have thought it might be a prominent cliff, the contour of which resembled a human face. Such a cliff on the seashore to the South of Tripoli was called theou prosopon, "face of God" (Strabo xvi.2, 15). In later times a city with a strong tower stood upon it. This lay in the line of Gideon's pursuit of the Midianites. When he returned victorious, he beat down the place because of the churlishness of the inhabitants ( Judges 8:8, 9, 17 ). It was one of the towns "built" or fortified by Jeroboam ( 1 Kings 12:25 ). Merrill would identify it with Telul edh-Dhahab, "hills of gold," two hills with ruins that betoken great antiquity, and that speak of great strength, on the South of the Jabbok, about 10 miles East of Jordan (for description see Merrill, East of the Jordan, 390 if). A difficulty that seems fatal to this identification is that here the banks of the Jabbok are so precipitous as to be impassable. Conder suggests Jebel 'Osha. The site was clearly not far from Succoth; but no certainty is yet possible.  W. Ewing
SHALMAI|     shal'-mi, shal'-ma-i: the King James Version form in  Ezra 2:46  for "Shamlai";  Nehemiah 7:48  "Salmai" (which see).
NAGGE|Illuminating, one of the ancestors of Christ in the maternal line ( Luke 3:25 ). 
LUCIUS|Of Cyrene, a Christian teacher at Antioch ( Acts 13:1 ), and Paul's kinsman ( Romans 16:21 ). His name is Latin, but his birthplace seems to indicate that he was one of the Jews of Cyrene, in North Africa. 
PARMASHTA|Strong-fisted, a son of Haman, slain in Shushan ( Esther 9:9 ). 
STRIPES|As a punishment were not to exceed forty ( Deuteronomy 25:1 -3), and hence arose the custom of limiting them to thirty-nine ( 2 Corinthians 11:24 ). Paul claimed the privilege of a Roman citizen in regard to the infliction of stripes ( Acts 16:37 ,  38;  22:25 -29). Our Lord was beaten with stripes ( Matthew 27:26 ). 
FEATURES|   NATURAL   fe'-turz: As has been pointed out by various authors (compare HGHL), the principal physical features of Palestine run in North and South lines, or rather about from South-Southwest to North-Northeast.  The lowland or Shephelah (the King James Version "vale, valley, plain, or low country") includes the maritime plain and the western foothills.  The hill country consists of the mountains of Judea, and its features are continued northward to the plain of Esdraelon and southward to the Sinaitic peninsula. It is rocky and has very little water. Except for the few fountains, the scanty population depends upon rain water collected during the winter months.  The Arabah (Revised Version) includes the Jordan valley from the Sea of Galilee to the Dead Sea, as well as the depression running from the Dead Sea to the Gulf of Akabah. It is to the latter depression that the name Wady-ul-`Arabah is now applied by the Arabs. It is bounded on the East by Mt. Seir or Edom, and on the West by the mountains of the Sinaitic peninsula. Its highest point, about halfway between the Dead Sea and the Gulf of Akabah, is a few hundred ft. higher than the level of the Mediterranean, but nearly 2,000 ft. above the level of the Dead Sea. From this point the valley slopes southward to the Gulf of Akabah, and northward to the Dead Sea. The lower Jordan valley slopes from about 600 ft. below ocean-level at the Sea of Galilee to about 1,300 ft. below ocean-level at the Dead Sea.  To the East are the highlands of Gilead and Moab rising abruptly from the valley, as does the hill country of Judea on the West. The country to the East of the Jordan-Dead Sea-Arabah depression, to the whole of which the name Ghaur (Ghor) is applied by the Arabs, is a great table-land sloping gradually to the East from the sharp edge which overlooks the Ghaur. It has no conspicuous peaks. What appear to be peaks when viewed from the Ghaur are irregularities of its western contour, which are invisible or appear as slight mounds to the observer who looks westward from any point some miles to the East Mt. Nebo, for instance, when seen from Medeba is not readily distinguishable. This is because it really does not rise above the general level of the table-land. The small annual rainfall on the heights near the Ghaur diminishes eastward, and the desert begins within from 20 to 40 miles.  Another term much used by Old Testament writers is South or Negeb, which embraces the southernmost portion of the promised land, and was never effectively occupied by the Israelites. Its uttermost boundary was the "river of Egypt" (al-`Arish), and coincides roughly with the present boundary between the Ottoman territory on the East and the Anglo-Egyptian territory of Sinai on the West.  The term slopes, 'ashedhoth, the King James Version "springs," occurs in  Joshua 10:40 , "So Joshua smote all the land, the hill country.... and the lowland, and the slopes, and all their kings"; and again in  Joshua 12:7, 8 , "And Joshua gave it.... for a possession according to their divisions; in the hill-country, and in the lowland, and in the Arabah, and in the slopes, and in the wilderness, and in the South." In the former passage, it seems to refer to the foothills which form the eastern or higher part of the lowland or Shephelah. In the latter passage, it might mean the same, or it might mean the descent from the Judean hills to the Ghaur. In  Deuteronomy 3:17 ;  Deuteronomy 4:49   Joshua 12:3 ;  Joshua 13:20 , we have "the slopes of Pisgah" ('ashdoth-ha-pisgah, "springs of Pisgah"), which denotes the descent from the heights of Moab to the Ghaur. The same word occurs in the sing in  Numbers 21:15 , referring to the descent to the Arnon. "Slopes," therefore, does not seem to be a term applied to any particular region.  The wilderness is usually the desert of the wandering, including the central part of the Sinaitic peninsula, but it is by no means always used in this sense,. e.g.  Joshua 8:15, 20, 24 , where it clearly refers to a region near Ai. "The wilderness" of  Matthew 4:1  is thought to be the barren portion of Judea between Jerusalem and the Jordan.  See  CHAMPAIGN ;  COUNTRY ; DESERT; EAST; HILL; LOWLAND; SOUTH.  Alfred Ely Day
JETHER|Surplus; excellence.  (1.) Father-in-law of Moses ( Exodus 4:18  marg.), called elsewhere Jethro (q.v.). (2.) The oldest of Gideon's seventy sons ( Judges 8:20 ). (3.) The father of Amasa, David's general ( 1 Kings 2:5 ,  32); called Ithra ( 2 Samuel 17:25 ). (4.)  1 Chronicles 7:38 . (5.)  1 Chronicles 2:32 ; one of Judah's posterity. (6.)  1 Chronicles 4:17 . 
LAKKUM|     lak'-um (laqqum; the King James Version, Lakum): A town on the border of Naphtali, named with Adami, Nekeb and Jabneel, apparently nearer the Jordan ( Joshua 19:33 ).
WEAPONS|     wep'-unz.  See  ARMOR .
TEKEL|Weighed ( Dan. 5:27 ). 
CANA|Reedy, a town of Galilee, near Capernaum. Here our Lord wrought his first miracle, the turning of water into wine ( John 2:1 -11;  4:46 ). It is also mentioned as the birth-place of Nathanael ( 21:2 ). It is not mentioned in the Old Testament. It has been identified with the modern Kana el-Jelil, also called Khurbet Kana, a place 8 or 9 miles north of Nazareth. Others have identified it with Kefr Kenna, which lies on the direct road to the Sea of Galilee, about 5 miles north-east of Nazareth, and 12 in a direct course from Tiberias. It is called "Cana of Galilee," to distinguish it from Cana of Asher ( Joshua 19:28 ). 
BULRUSHES|   ARK OF   ark, bool'-rush-iz (tebhah; Egyptian tebt; Septuagint thibis, "a chest," "a vessel to float").  1. Definitions:  The Hebrew word here translated "ark" is used in the Old Testament only of the ark of Noah ( Genesis 6:14 ) and of the ark of bulrushes ( Exodus 2:3 ), and always in the secondary meaning, a vessel to float. The Septuagint translates it of Noah's ark by kibotos, "a casket," and of the ark of bulrushes by thibis, a little basket made of osiers or flags. For the Ark of the Covenant, the Hebrew employed a different word ('aron, "a chest"). Bulrushes (gome', "papyrus"): This species of reed was used by the Egyptians for many different vessels, some of which were intended to float or even to be used as a skiff. Slime (chemar, "bitumen"), pitch (zepheth, "pitch") was probably the sticky mud of the Nile with which to this day so many things in Egypt are plastered. In this case it was mixed with bitumen. Flags (cuph, "sedge") were reeds of every kind and tall grass growing in the shallow water at the edge of the river.  2. History:  Thus the ark of bulrushes was a vessel made of papyrus stalks and rendered fit to float by being covered with a mixture of bitumen and mud. Into this floating vessel the mother of Moses placed the boy when he was three months old, and put the vessel in the water among the sedge along the banks of the Nile at the place where the ladies from the palace were likely to come to bathe. The act was a pathetic imitation of obedience to the king's command to throw boy babies into the river, a command which she had for three months braved and which now she so obeyed as probably to bring the cruelty of the king to the notice of the royal ladies in such way as to arouse a womanly sympathy, A similar story is related of Sargon I of Babylonia (Records of the Past, 1st series, V, 1-4; Rogers, Hist. Babylonian and Assyrian, I, 362).  The one story in no wise discredits the other. That method of abandoning children, either willingly or by necessity, is as natural along the Nile and the Euphrates, where the river is the great artery of the land and where the floating basket had been used from time immemorial, as is the custom in our modern cities of placing abandoned infants in the streets or on door-steps where they are likely to be found, and such events probably occurred then as often as now.  M. G. Kyle  BULRUSHES, ARK OF  See  ARK OF BULRUSHES .
SHOBAI|Captors ( Ezra 2:42 ). 
NETOPHAH|Distillation; dropping, a town in Judah, in the neighbourhood, probably, of Bethlehem ( Nehemiah 7:26 ;  1 Chronicles 2:54 ). Two of David's guards were Netophathites ( 1 Chronicles 27:13 ,  15). It has been identified with the ruins of Metoba, or Um Toba, to the north-east of Bethlehem. 
JOAH|Jehovah his brother; i.e., helper.  (1.) One of the sons of Obed-edom ( 1 Chronicles 26:4 ), a Korhite porter. (2.) A Levite of the family of Gershom ( 1 Chronicles 6:21 ), probably the same as Ethan (42). (3.) The son of Asaph, and "recorder" (q.v.) or chronicler to King Hezekiah ( 2 Kings 18:18 ,  26,  37). (4.) Son of Joahaz, and "recorder" (q.v.) or keeper of the state archives under King Josiah ( 2 Chronicles 34:8 ). 
EPHRAIMITE|     e'-fra-im-it ('ephrayim; singular 'ephrathi):  A member of the tribe of Ephraim ( Joshua 16:10 , etc.).  See also  EPHRATHITE .
GAIUS| (1.) A Macedonian, Paul's fellow-traveller, and his host at Corinth when he wrote his Epistle to the Romans ( 16:23 ). He with his household were baptized by Paul ( 1 Corinthians 1:14 ). During a heathen outbreak against Paul at Ephesus the mob seized Gaius and Aristarchus because they could not find Paul, and rushed with them into the theatre. Some have identified this Gaius with No. (2). (2.) A man of Derbe who accompanied Paul into Asia on his last journey to Jerusalem (3.) A Christain of Asia Minor to whom John addressed his third epistle (3  John 1:1 ). 
SENEH|The acacia; rock-thorn, the southern cliff in the Wady es-Suweinit, a valley south of Michmash, which Jonathan climbed with his armour-bearer ( 1 Samuel 14:4 ,  5). The rock opposite, on the other side of the wady, was called Bozez. 
NAILS|   PARE, (THE )  par (`asah, "to fix," "manipulate"): The word, which in Hebrew has a very wide range of application, and which is of very frequent occurrence in the Hebrew Bible, is found in the above meaning in but one passage of English Versions of the Bible ( Deuteronomy 21:12 ; see NAIL). In a similar sense it is found in  2 Samuel 19:24 , where it is used to express the dressing of the feet anti the trimming of the beard.
WATCHINGS|( 2 Corinthians 6:5 ), lit. "sleeplessnesses," the result of "manual labour, teaching, travelling, meditating, praying, cares, and the like" (Meyer's Com.). 
GIDOM|     gi'-dom (gidh`om): The limit eastward, from Gibeah toward the wilderness, of the pursuit of Benjamin by Israel ( Judges 20:45 ). No name suggesting this has yet been recovered. It is not mentioned elsewhere.
MERCYSEAT|(Hebrews kapporeth,  a "covering;" LXX. and N.T.,  hilasterion; Vulg.,  propitiatorium), the covering or lid of the ark of the covenant (q.v.). It was of acacia wood, overlaid with gold, or perhaps rather a plate of solid gold, 2 1/2 cubits long and 1 1/2 broad ( Exodus 25:17 ;  30:6 ;  31:7 ). It is compared to the throne of grace ( Hebrews 9:5 ;  Ephesians 2:6 ). The holy of holies is called the "place of the mercy-seat" ( 1 Chronicles 28:11 :  Leviticus 16:2 ). It has been conjectured that the censer (thumiaterion,  meaning "anything having regard to or employed in the burning of incense") mentioned in  Hebrews 9:4  was the "mercy-seat," at which the incense was burned by the high priest on the great day of atonement, and upon or toward which the blood of the goat was sprinkled ( Leviticus 16:11 -16; Comp.  Numbers 7:89  and  Exodus 25:22 ). 
ELEPH|     e'-lef (ha-'eleph, "the ox"):  A place in the lot of Benjamin not far from Jerusalem ( Joshua 18:28 ). The name is omitted by Septuagint, unless, indeed, it is combined with that of Zelah. It may be identical with Lifta, a village W. of Jerusalem (Conder, HDB, under the word).  Others identify Lifta with Nephtoah.
TAV|     See  TAW .
KESIL|     ke'-zil (Orion).  See  ASTRONOMY .
GETHSEMANE|Oil-press, the name of an olive-yard at the foot of the Mount of Olives, to which Jesus was wont to retire ( Luke 22:39 ) with his disciples, and which is specially memorable as being the scene of his agony ( Mark 14:32 ;  John 18:1 ;  Luke 22:44 ). The plot of ground pointed out as Gethsemane is now surrounded by a wall, and is laid out as a modern European flower-garden. It contains eight venerable olive-trees, the age of which cannot, however, be determined. The exact site of Gethsemane is still in question. Dr. Thomson (The Land and the Book) says: "When I first came to Jerusalem, and for many years afterward, this plot of ground was open to all whenever they chose to come and meditate beneath its very old olivetrees. The Latins, however, have within the last few years succeeded in gaining sole possession, and have built a high wall around it...The Greeks have invented another site a little to the north of it...My own impression is that both are wrong. The position is too near the city, and so close to what must have always been the great thoroughfare eastward, that our Lord would scarcely have selected it for retirement on that dangerous and dismal night...I am inclined to place the garden in the secluded vale several hundred yards to the north-east of the present Gethsemane." 
TIBNI|Building of Jehovah, the son of Ginath, a man of some position, whom a considerable number of the people chose as monarch. For the period of four years he contended for the throne with Omri ( 1 Kings 16:21 ,  22), who at length gained the mastery, and became sole monarch of Israel. 
HENA|One of the cities of Mesopotamia destroyed by sennacherib ( 2 Kings 18:34 ;  19:13 ). It is identified with the modern Anah, lying on the right bank of the Euphrates, not far from Sepharvaim. 
CUSH|Black.  (1.) A son, probably the eldest, of Ham, and the father of Nimrod ( Genesis 10:8 ;  1 Chronicles 1:10 ). From him the land of Cush seems to have derived its name. The question of the precise locality of the land of Cush has given rise to not a little controversy. The second river of Paradise surrounded the whole land of Cush ( Genesis 2:13 ,  R.V.). The term Cush is in the Old Testament generally applied to the countries south of the Israelites. It was the southern limit of Egypt ( Ezek. 29:10 ,  A.V. "Ethiopia, " Hebrews Cush), with which it is generally associated ( Psalm 68:31 ;  Isaiah 18:1 ;  Jeremiah 46:9 ,  etc.). It stands also associated with Elam ( Isaiah 11:11 ), with Persia ( Ezek. 38:5 ), and with the Sabeans ( Isaiah 45:14 ). From these facts it has been inferred that Cush included Arabia and the country on the west coast of the Red Sea. Rawlinson takes it to be the country still known as Khuzi-stan, on the east side of the Lower Tigris. But there are intimations which warrant the conclusion that there was also a Cush in Africa, the Ethiopia (so called by the Greeks) of Africa. Ezekiel speaks ( 29:10 ; Comp.  30:4 -6) of it as lying south of Egypt. It was the country now known to us as Nubia and Abyssinia ( Isaiah 18:1 ;  Zephaniah 3:10 ,  Hebrews Cush). In ancient Egyptian inscriptions Ethiopia is termed Kesh. The Cushites appear to have spread along extensive tracts, stretching from the Upper Nile to the Euphrates and Tigris. At an early period there was a stream of migration of Cushites "from Ethiopia, properly so called, through Arabia, Babylonia, and Persia, to Western India." The Hamite races, soon after their arrival in Africa, began to spread north, east, and west. Three branches of the Cushite or Ethiopian stock, moving from Western Asia, settled in the regions contiguous to the Persian Gulf. One branch, called the Cossaeans, settled in the mountainous district on the east of the Tigris, known afterwards as Susiana; another occupied the lower regions of the Euphrates and the Tigris; while a third colonized the southern shores and islands of the gulf, whence they afterwards emigrated to the Mediterranean and settled on the coast of Palestine as the Phoenicians. Nimrod was a great Cushite chief. He conquered the Accadians, a Tauranian race, already settled in Mesopotamia, and founded his kingdom, the Cushites mingling with the Accads, and so forming the Chaldean nation. (2.) A Benjamite of this name is mentioned in the title of  Psalm 7 . "Cush was probably a follower of Saul, the head of his tribe, and had sought the friendship of David for the purpose of 'rewarding evil to him that was at peace with him.'" 
MAHLAH|Disease, one of the five daughters of Zelophehad ( Numbers 27:1 -11) who had their father's inheritance, the law of inheritance having been altered in their favour. 
NEMUEL|Day of God.  (1.) One of Simeon's five sons ( 1 Chronicles 4:24 ), called also Jemuel ( Genesis 46:10 ).  (2.) A Reubenite, a son of Eliab, and brother of Dathan and Abiram ( Numbers 26:9 ). 
TALMON|Oppressed.  (1.) A Levite porter ( 1 Chronicles 9:17 ;  Nehemiah 11:19 ). (2.) One whose descendants returned with Zerubbabel to Jerusalem ( Ezra 2:42 ;  Nehemiah 7:45 ); probably the same as (1). 
TELABIB|Hill of corn, a place on the river Chebar, the residence of Ezekiel ( Ezek. 3:15 ). The site is unknown. 
JAHLEEL|     ja'-le-el (yachle'el, "wait for God!"): In  Genesis 46:14   Numbers 26:26 , a "son" (i.e. clan) of Zebulun.
JESHANAH|A city of the kingdom of Israel ( 2 Chronicles 13:19 ). 
BAHURIM|Young men, a place east of Jerusalem ( 2 Samuel 3:16 ;  19:16 ), on the road to the Jordan valley. Here Shimei resided, who poured forth vile abuse against David, and flung dust and stones at him and his party when they were making their way down the eastern slopes of Olivet toward Jordan ( 16:5 ); and here Jonathan and Ahimaaz hid themselves ( 17:18 ). With the exception of Shimei, Azmaveth, one of David's heroes, is the only other native of the place who is mentioned ( 2 Samuel 23:31 ;  1 Chronicles 11:33 ). 
GESHAN|     ge'-shan (geshan, "firm," "strong"): A descendant of Judah through Caleb ( 1 Chronicles 2:47 ). The King James Version has "Gesham," but not in the original 1611 edition.
RIPHATH|A crusher, Gomer's second son ( Genesis 10:3 ), supposed to have been the ancestor of the Paphlagonians. 
NERIAH|     ne-ri'-a (neriyah, "whose lamp is Yah"): The father of Seraiah and of Baruch, Jeremiah's friend and secretary ( Jeremiah 32:12, 16 ;  Jeremiah 36:4, 8, 32 ; 43:3). In Baruch 1:1 the Greek form of the name, Ner(e)ias, is given, and this shortened, Neri, occurs in the genealogy of Jesus Christ.
KARKA|     kar'-ka (ha-qarqa`ah-with the article and locale; the King James Version Karkaa): A place in the South of Judah, between Addar and Wady el-`Arish ( Joshua 15:3 ). Eusebius, Onomasticon speaks of a village in Judah lying toward the wilderness, named Akarka. It cannot now be identified. The name means "the pavement," or "ground."
JOKTAN|Little, the second of the two sons of Eber ( Genesis 10:25 ;  1 Chronicles 1:19 ). There is an Arab tradition that Joktan (Arab. Kahtan) was the progenitor of all the purest tribes of Central and Southern Arabia. 
ITURAEA|A district in the north-east of Palestine, forming, along with the adjacent territory of Trachonitis, the tetrarchy of Philip ( Luke 3:1 ). The present Jedur comprehends the chief part of Ituraea. It is bounded on the east by Trachonitis, on the south by Gaulanitis, on the west by Hermon, and on the north by the plain of Damascus. 
SHIMEATHITES|     shim'-e-ath-its shim`athim; Codex Vaticanus and Codex Alexandrinus Samathieim; Lucian, Samathein): A subdivision of the tribe of Caleb ( 1 Chronicles 2:55 ). In the three families mentioned in this passage Jerome saw three distinct classes of religious functionaries: Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) canentes atque resonantes et in tabernaculis commorantes. The Targum has a similar explanation, except that the "Sucathites" are those "covered" with a spirit of prophecy. Bertheau (Handbuch zum Altes Testament) accepts Jerome's explanation, except that he regards the first class as gate-keepers (Aramaic tera` = Hebrew sha`ar). Wellhausen (DGJ, 30) finds underlying the three names tir`ah, a technical term for sacred music-making, shim`ah, the Halacha or sacred tradition. Buhl (HWB13) derives Shimeathites and Sucathites from unknown places. Keil interprets as descendants from the unknown Shemei (compare Curtis, ICC). The passage is hopelessly obscure.  Horace J. Wolf
BAHARUMITE|   ; ?BARHUMITE  ba-ha'-rum-it; bar-hu'-mit ( 1 Chronicles 11:33   2 Samuel 23:31 ): A native of BAHURIM (which see).
RAMESES|"the land of" ( Genesis 47:11 ), was probably "the land of Goshen" (q.v.) 45:10. After the Hebrews had built Rameses, one of the "treasure cities," it came to be known as the "land" in which that city was built. The city bearing this name ( Exodus 12:37 ) was probably identical with Zoan, which Rameses II. ("son of the sun") rebuilt. It became his special residence, and ranked next in importance and magnificance to Thebes. Huge masses of bricks, made of Nile mud, sun-dried, some of them mixed with stubble, possibly moulded by Jewish hands, still Mark the site of Rameses. This was the general rendezvous of the Israelites before they began their march out of Egypt. Called also Raamses ( Exodus 1:11 ). 
SHEMIDA|   ; SHEMIDAH; SHEMIDAITES  she-mi'-da, she-mi'-da-its (shemidha): A Gileadite clan belonging to Manasseh ( Numbers 26:32   Joshua 17:2 , Codex Vaticanus Sumareim; Codex Alexandrinus Semirae; Lucian, Samidae;  1 Chronicles 7:19 , the King James Version "Shemidah," after whom the Shemidaites ( Numbers 26:32 ) were called).
HENADAD|Favour of Hadad, the name of a Levite after the Captivity ( Ezra 3:9 ). 
TARAH|Stopping; station, an encampment of the Hebrews in the wilderness ( Numbers 33:27 ,  28). 
SHEREZER|One of the messengers whom the children of the Captivity sent to Jerusalem "to pray for them before the Lord" ( Zechariah 7:2 ). 
POTIPHAR|Dedicated to Ra; i.e., to the sun-god, the Egyptian to whom the Ishmaelites sold Joseph ( Genesis 39:1 ). He was "captain of the guard", i.e., chief, probably, of the state police, who, while they formed part of the Egyptian army, were also largely employed in civil duties ( 37:36 ; marg.,  "chief of the executioners"). Joseph, though a foreigner, gradually gained his confidence, and became overseer over all his possessions. Believing the false accusation which his profligate wife brought against Joseph, Potiphar cast him into prison, where he remained for some years. (see  JOSEPH .) 
HAZARSUSIM|   HAZAR-ADDAR; HAZAR-ENAN; HAZAR-GADDAH; HAZAR-HATTICON; HAZAR-MAVETH; HAZAR-SHUAL; HAZAR-SUSA; HAZAR-SUSIM  ad'-ar; e'-nan; gad'-a; hat'-i-kon; ma'-veth; shoo'-al; su'-sa; su'-sim.  See  HAZAR .
WIDOWS|To be treated with kindness ( Exodus 22:22 ;  Deuteronomy 14:29 ;  16:11 ,  14;  24:17 ,  19-21;  26:12 ;  27:19 ,  etc.). In the New Testament the same tender regard for them is inculcated ( Acts 6:1 -6;  1 Timothy 5:3 -16) and exhibited. 
MASSA|A lifting up, gift, one of the sons of Ishmael, the founder of an Arabian tribe ( Genesis 25:14 ); a nomad tribe inhabiting the Arabian desert toward Babylonia. 
JASHUBILEHEM|   JASHUBI-LEHEM  ja-shoo-bi-le'-hem (yashubhi-lechem): A name in  1 Chronicles 4:22  where commentators insert beth, between the two words and translate "(and) returned to Bethlehem."
SEASONS|( Genesis 8:22 ). See AGRICULTURE; MONTH. 
GAMUL|Weaned the leader of one of the priestly courses ( 1 Chronicles 24:17 ). 
GAZATHITES|     ga'-zath-its (`azzathim):  The inhabitants of GAZA (which see) ( Joshua 13:3  the King James Version), rendered "Gazites" ( Judges 16:2 ).
MAGDALENE|A surname derived from Magdala, the place of her nativity, given to one of the Marys of the Gospels to distinguish her from the other Marys ( Matthew 27:56 ,  61;  28:1 ,  etc.). A mistaken notion has prevailed that this Mary was a woman of bad character, that she was the woman who is emphatically called "a sinner" ( Luke 7:36 -50). (see  MARY .) 
HEZION|Vision, the father of Tabrimon, and grandfather of Ben-hadad, king of Syria ( 1 Kings 15:18 ). 
DEBORAH|A bee.  (1.) Rebekah's nurse. She accompanied her mistress when she left her father's house in Padan-aram to become the wife of Isaac ( Genesis 24:59 ). Many years afterwards she died at Bethel, and was buried under the "oak of weeping", Allon-bachuth ( 35:8 ). (2.) A prophetess, "wife" (woman?) of Lapidoth. Jabin, the king of Hazor, had for twenty years held Israel in degrading subjection. The spirit of patriotism seemed crushed out of the nation. In this emergency Deborah roused the people from their lethargy. Her fame spread far and wide. She became a "mother in Israel" ( Judges 4:6 ,  14;  5:7 ), and "the children of Israel came up to her for judgment" as she sat in her tent under the palm tree "between Ramah and Bethel." Preparations were everywhere made by her direction for the great effort to throw off the yoke of bondage. She summoned Barak from Kadesh to take the command of 10,000 men of Zebulun and Naphtali, and lead them to Mount Tabor on the plain of Esdraelon at its north-east end. With his aid she organized this army. She gave the signal for attack, and the Hebrew host rushed down impetuously upon the army of Jabin, which was commanded by Sisera, and gained a great and decisive victory. The Canaanitish army almost wholly perished. That was a great and ever-memorable day in Israel. In  Judges 5  is given the grand triumphal ode, the "song of Deborah," which she wrote in grateful commemoration of that great deliverance. (see  LAPIDOTH ,  JABIN .) 
JONA|     jo'-na.  See  JONAH ;  JONAS .
EPHRATHITE|A citizen of Ephratah, the old name of Bethlehem ( Ruth 1:2 ;  1 Samuel 17:12 ), or Bethlehem-Judah. 
MEARAH|A cave, a place in the northern boundary of Palestine ( Joshua 13:4 ). This may be the cave of Jezzin in Lebanon, 10 miles east of Sidon, on the Damascus road; or probably, as others think, Mogheirizeh, north-east of Sidon. 
NEHUSHTA|Copper, the daughter of Elnathan of Jerusalem, and the wife of Jehoiakin ( 2 Kings 24:8 ), king of Judah. 
NAARAN|Boyish, juvenile, a town in Ephraim between Bethel and Jericho ( 1 Chronicles 7:28 ). 
STACHYS|Spike; an ear of corn, a convert at Rome whom Paul salutes ( Romans 16:9 ). 
PERGAMOS|The chief city of Mysia, in Asia Minor. One of the "seven churches" was planted here ( Revelation 1:11 ;  2:17 ). It was noted for its wickedness, insomuch that our Lord says "Satan's seat" was there. The church of Pergamos was rebuked for swerving from the truth and embracing the doctrines of Balaam and the Nicolaitanes. Antipas, Christ's "faithful martyr," here sealed his testimony with his blood. This city stood on the banks of the river Caicus, about 20 miles from the sea. It is now called Bergama, and has a population of some twenty thousand, of whom about two thousand profess to be Christians. Parchment (q.v.) was first made here, and was called by the Greeks pergamene, from the name of the city. 
FESTUS|Festus, Porcius The successor of Felix (A.D. 60) as procurator of Judea ( Acts 24:27 ). A few weeks after he had entered on his office the case of Paul, then a prisoner at Caesarea, was reported to him. The "next day," after he had gone down to Caesarea, he heard Paul defend himself in the presence of Herod Agrippa II. and his sister Bernice, and not finding in him anything worthy of death or of bonds, would have set him free had he not appealed unto Caesar ( Acts 25:11 ,  12). In consequence of this appeal Paul was sent to Rome. Festus, after being in office less than two years, died in Judea. (see  AGRIPPA .) 
HASHUM|Opulent.  (1.)  Ezra 2:19 ;  Nehemiah 7:22 .  (2.) Stood on Ezra's left hand while he read the law ( Nehemiah 8:4 ). 
DANNAH|Murmuring, a city ( Joshua 15:49 ) in the mountains of Judah about 8 miles south-west of Hebron. 
ESHAN|     e'-shan ('esh`an; Esan; the King James Version Eshean):  A town of Judah in the uplands of Hebron ( Joshua 15:52 ). No satisfactory identification has yet been suggested. Some think the name may be a corruption of Beersheba (Encyclopaedia Biblica, which see).
GIER|Gier eagle Hebrews raham = "parental affection,"  Leviticus 11:18 ;  Deuteronomy 14:17 ; R.V., "vulture"), a species of vulture living entirely on carrion. "It is about the size of a raven; has an almost triangular, bald, and wrinkled head, a strong pointed beak, black at the tip, large eyes and ears, the latter entirely on the outside, and long feet." It is common in Egypt, where it is popularly called "Pharaoh's chicken" (the Neophron percnopterus), and is found in Palestine only during summer. Tristram thinks that the Hebrew name, which is derived from a root meaning "to love," is given to it from the fact that the male and female bird never part company. 
VAV|     vav.  See  WAW .
SEATS|   CHIEF   chef sets (protokathedria): It was one of the reproaches urged by our Lord against the scribes and Pharisees that they loved the chief seats in the synagogues ( Matthew 23:6   Mark 12:39   Luke 11:43 ;  Luke 20:46 ). These were special seats set in front of the ark containing the Scriptures and of the reader's platform, and facing the congregation. They were specially reserved for those who were held in the highest honor in the congregation. There were seventy-one such seats in the great synagogue of Alexandria, which were occupied by the members of the great Council in that city (see SYNAGOGUE).  J. Macartney Wilson  SEATS, CHIEF  sets.  See  CHIEF SEATS .
NEARIAH|     ne-a-ri'-a (ne`aryah):  (1) A descendant of David ( 1 Chronicles 3:22 f ).  (2) A descendant of Simeon ( 1 Chronicles 4:42 ).  In both instances the Septuagint reads "Noadiah."
SECRETS|   ENOCH; THE BOOK OF THE  OF  See  APOCALYPTIC LITERATURE .
BARHUMITE|   BAHARUMITE; ?  ba-ha'-rum-it; bar-hu'-mit ( 1 Chronicles 11:33   2 Samuel 23:31 ): A native of BAHURIM (which see).  BARHUMITE  bar-hu'-mit.  See  BAHARUMITE .
BERACAH|     be-ra'-ka (berakhah, "blessing," the King James Version Berachah): A Benjamite who joined David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:3 ).  BERACAH, VALLEY OF  be-ra'-ka, ber'-a-ka (the King James Version Berachah; `emeq berkhah; koilas eulogias): After the victory of Jehoshaphat and his people over Moab and Ammon, "On the fourth day they assembled themselves in the valley of Beracah; for there they blessed Yahweh: therefore the name of that place was called The valley of Beracah (i.e. of blessing) unto this day" ( 2 Chronicles 20:26 ). In the Wady `Arrub there is a ruin called Breikut and the valley in its proximity receives the same name. This is on the main road from Hebron to Jerusalem and not far from Tekoa; it suits the narrative well (see PEF, III, 352).  E. W. G. Masterman
GIDDALTI|     gi-dal'-ti (giddalti, "I magnify (God)"): A son of Heman ( 1 Chronicles 25:4, 29 ), one of David's musicians.
PADDAN|     pad'-an ( Genesis 48:7 ; the King James Version Padan, padan). See next article.
HADAREZER|Adod is his help, the name given to Hadadezer ( 2 Samuel 8:3 -12) in  2 Samuel 10 . 
HEBER|Passing over.  (1.) Son of Beriah and grandson of Asher ( Genesis 46:17 ;  1 Chronicles 7:31 ,  32). (2.) The Kenite ( Judges 4:11 ,  17;  5:24 ), a descendant of Hobab. His wife Jael received Sisera (q.v.) into her tent and then killed him. (3.)  1 Chronicles 4:18 . (4.) A Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 8:17 ). (5.) A Gadite ( 5:13 ). (see  EBER .) 
ITHAMAR|Palm isle, the fourth and youngest son of Aaron ( 1 Chronicles 6:3 ). He was consecrated to the priesthood along with his brothers ( Exodus 6:23 ); and after the death of Nadab and Abihu, he and Eleazar alone discharged the functions of that office ( Leviticus 10:6 ,  12;  Numbers 3:4 ). He and his family occupied the position of common priest till the high priesthood passed into his family in the person of Eli ( 1 Kings 2:27 ), the reasons for which are not recorded. (see  ZADOK .) 
ELADAH|   ELEADAH;   el-e-a'-da, (the King James Version) ('el`adhah, "God has adorned"):  An Ephraimite ( 1 Chronicles 7:20 ).  ELADAH  el'-a-da.  See  ELEADAH .
ZAZA|Plenty, a descendant of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:33 ). 
SHUAL|Shual, The land of  Land of the fox, a district in the tribe of Benjamin ( 1 Samuel 13:17 ); possibly the same as Shalim ( 9:4 ), in the neighbourhood of Shaalabbin ( Joshua 19:42 ). 
BEASTS|   SWIFT   (kirkaroth ( Isaiah 66:20 )): the King James Version and the English Revised Version "swift beasts," the English Revised Version margin and the American Standard Revised Version "dromedaries." In  Micah 1:13  (rekhesh) a horse is meant, the Revised Version (British and American) "swift steed."  See  CAMEL ;  HORSE .  EXPOSURE, TO WILD BEASTS  eks-po'-zhur.  See  PUNISHMENTS .
MADON|Strife, a Canaanitish city in the north of Palestine ( Joshua 11:1 ;  12:19 ), whose king was slain by Joshua; perhaps the ruin Madin, near Hattin, some 5 miles west of Tiberias. 
BILGAH|Cheerful.  (1.) The head of the fifteenth sacerdotal course for the temple service ( 1 Chronicles 24:14 ).  (2.) A priest who returned from Babylon with Zerubbabel ( Nehemiah 12:5 ,  18). 
IPHDEIAH|     if-de'-ya (yiphdeyah, "Yah redeems"; the King James Version Iphedeiah): A descendant of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:25 ).
KIRIATH|     kir'-i-ath (qiryath, "city"; the King James Version Kirjath): Mentioned ( Joshua 18:28 ) as a city of Benjamin; has been identified with Kuriet el `Enab, "town of grapes," a prosperous town on the highroad between Jerusalem and Jaffa; it is sometimes spoken of by the inhabitants as Qurieh. It is, however, generally thought that Kiriath here stands for KIRIATH-JEARIM (which see). See P E F, III, 132, Sh XVII.
LONGSUFFERING|     long-suf'-er-ing ('erekh 'appayim; makrothumia): The words 'erekh 'appayim, translated longsuffering, mean literally, "long of nose" (or "breathing"), and, as anger was indicated by rapid, violent breathing through the nostrils, "long of anger," or "slow to wrath." The adjective is applied to God ( Exodus 34:6  the King James Version, in the name of Yahweh as proclaimed to Moses; Numbers 14:18 the King James Version; Psalm 86:15 the King James Version; the Revised Version (British and American) "slow to anger," which is also the translation in other places; the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American)  Nehemiah 9:17   Psalm 103:8 ;  Psalm 145:8   Proverbs 15:18 ;  Proverbs 16:32   Joel 2:13   Jonah 4:2 ;  Nahum 1:3 ); it is associated with "great kindness" and "plenteous in mercy." The substantive occurs in  Jeremiah 15:15 : "Take me not away in thy longsuffering." In  Ecclesiastes 7:8 , we have 'erekh ruach, the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American) "patient in spirit."  The word in the New Testament rendered "longsuffering," makrothumia (once makrothumeo, "to be longsuffering"), which is the rendering of 'erekh 'appayim in the Septuagint, is literally, "long of mind or soul" (regarded as the seat of the emotions), opposed to shortness of mind or soul, irascibility, impatience, intolerance. It is attributed to God ( Romans 2:4 ;  Romans 9:22   2 Peter 3:9 ), of His bearing long with sinners and slowness to execute judgment on them. It is, therefore, one of "the fruits of the Spirit" in man ( Galatians 5:22 ) which Christians are frequently exhorted to cherish and show one toward the other ( Ephesians 4:2   Colossians 1:11 ;  Colossians 3:12 , etc.); it belongs, Paul says, to the love, without which all else is nothing: "Love suffereth long (makrothumei), and is kind" ( 1 Corinthians 13:4 ); The verb makrothumeo is sometimes translated by "patience" ( Matthew 18:26, 29 , "Have patience with me").  Luke 18:7  has been variously rendered; the King James Version has "And shall not God avenge his own elect.... though he bear long with them"; the Revised Version (British and American) "and yet he is longsuffering over them," the American Revised Version margin "and is he slow to punish on their behalf?" Weymouth (New Testament in Modern Speech) has "although he seems slow in taking action on their behalf," which most probably gives the sense of the passage; in  James 5:7, 8  the verb occurs thrice, the King James Version "be patient," "hath long patience"; the Revised Version (British and American) also translates by "patient"; this, however, as in  Matthew 18:26, 29 , seems to lose the full force of the Greek word. According to Trench (Synonyms of the New Testament, 189), the difference between hupomone ("patience") and makrothumia is that the latter word expresses patience in respect to persons, and the former in respect to things; hence, hupomone is never ascribed to God; where He is called "the God of patience," it is as He gives it to His servants and saints. But in  James 5:7  it is used with reference to things, and in  Colossians 1:11  it is associated with patience (compare  Hebrews 6:12, 15 ), suggesting patient endurance of trials and sufferings. In  Colossians 1:11  it is also associated with "joy," indicating that it is not a mere submissiveness, but a joyful acceptance of the will of God, whatever it may be. In The Wisdom of Solomon 15:1; Ecclesiasticus 5:4, we have "longsuffering" (makrothumos) ascribed to God; also in Ecclesiasticus 2:11, the Revised Version (British and American) "mercy."  W. L. Walker
SHESHAN|     she'-shan (sheshan; Sosan): A Jerahmeelite whose daughter married his servant Jarha ( 1 Chronicles 2:31, 34, 35 ). The genealogical list which follows embraces some very early names (compare Curtis, ICC, at the place).
UZ|Fertile land.  (1.) The son of Aram, and grandson of Shem ( Genesis 10:23 ;  1 Chronicles 1:17 ). (2.) One of the Horite "dukes" in the land of Edom ( Genesis 36:28 ). (3.) The eldest son of Nahor, Abraham's brother ( Genesis 22:21 ,  R.V.).  Uz, The land of Where Job lived ( 1:1 ;  Jeremiah 25:20 ;  Lamentations 4:21 ), probably somewhere to the east or south-east of Palestine and north of Edom. It is mentioned in Scripture only in these three passages.
HAGRI|     hag'-ri (haghri, "wanderer"; the King James Version Haggeri): The father of Mibhar, one of the "mighty men" who rallied round David during his foreign wars. Mentioned only in  1 Chronicles 11:38 , whose parallel passage,  2 Samuel 23:36 , gives, instead, the name "Bani the Gadite."
HETH|Dread, a descendant of Canaan, and the ancestor of the Hittites ( Genesis 10:18 ;  Deuteronomy 7:1 ), who dwelt in the vicinity of Hebron ( Genesis 23:3 ,  7). The Hittites were a Hamitic race. They are called "the sons of Heth" ( Genesis 23:3 ,  5,  7,  10,  16,  18,  20). 
KADMIEL|Before God; i.e., his servant, one of the Levites who returned with Zerubbabel from the Captivity ( Nehemiah 9:4 ;  10:9 ;  12:8 ). 
NEBUZARADAN|"the captain of the guard," in rank next to the king, who appears prominent in directing affairs at the capture of Jerusalem ( 2 Kings 25:8 -20;  Jeremiah 39:11 ;  40:2 -5). He showed kindness toward Jeremiah, as commanded by Nebuchadnezzar ( 40:1 ). Five years after this he again came to Jerusalem and carried captive seven hundred and forty-five more Jews. 
JEHUDI|A Jew, son of Nethaniah. He was sent by the princes to invite Baruch to read Jeremiah's roll to them ( Jeremiah 36:14 ,  21). 
PERESH|     pe'-resh (peresh, "dung"): Son of Machir, grandson of Manasseh through his Aramitish concubine ( 1 Chronicles 7:14, 16 ).
CHERITH|A cutting; separation; a gorge, a torrent-bed or winter-stream, a "brook," in whose banks the prophet Elijah hid himself during the early part of the three years' drought ( 1 Kings 17:3 ,  5). It has by some been identified as the Wady el-Kelt behind Jericho, which is formed by the junction of many streams flowing from the mountains west of Jericho. It is dry in summer. Travellers have described it as one of the wildest ravines of this wild region, and peculiarly fitted to afford a secure asylum to the persecuted. But if the prophet's interview with Ahab was in Samaria, and he thence journeyed toward the east, it is probable that he crossed Jordan and found refuge in some of the ravines of Gilead. The "brook" is said to have been "before Jordan," which probably means that it opened toward that river, into which it flowed. This description would apply to the east as well as to the west of Jordan. Thus Elijah's hiding-place may have been the Jermuk, in the territory of the half-tribe of Manasseh. 
HARARITE|     ha'-ra-rit (ha-harari, or ha-'arari): Literally, "mountaineer," more particularly an inhabitant of the hill country of Judah. Thus used of two heroes:  (1) Shammah, the son of Agee ( 2 Samuel 23:11, 33 ). The parallel passage,  1 Chronicles 11:34 , has "Shage" in place of "Shammah."  (2) Ahiam, the son of Sharar the Ararite" ( 2 Samuel 23:33 ). In  1 Chronicles 11:35 , "Sacar" for Sharar as here.
MERATHAIM|Double rebellion, probably a symbolical name given to Babylon ( Jeremiah 50:21 ), denoting rebellion exceeding that of other nations. 
LICENCE|     li'-sens: This word is not found at all in the Revised Version (British and American) (except in Judith 11:14; Ecclesiasticus 15:20; 1 Maccabees 1:13), and twice only in the King James Version (except in 2 Maccabees 4:9), both times in Acts. In  Acts 21:40  (as translation of epitrepo) the American Standard Revised Version has "leave" where the King James Version has "licence." In  Acts 25:16 , "opportunity to make his defense" (as translation of topon apologias) takes the place of "have licence to answer for himself."
KESITAH|( Genesis 33:19 ,  R.V.,  marg.,  a Hebrew word,  rendered,  A.V.,  pl. "pieces of money, " marg.,  "lambs;"  Joshua 24:32 ,  "pieces of silver;"  Job 42:11 ,  "piece of money"). The kesitah was probably a piece of money of a particular weight, cast in the form of a lamb. The monuments of Egypt show that such weights were used. (see  PIECES .) 
SHETHARBOZNAI|Star of splendour, a Persian officer who vainly attempted to hinder the rebuilding of the temple ( Ezra 5:3 ,  6;  6:6 ,  13). 
ELAM|Highland, the son of Shem ( Genesis 10:22 ), and the name of the country inhabited by his descendants ( 14:1 ,  9;  Isaiah 11:11 ;  21:2 ,  etc.) lying to the east of Babylonia, and extending to the shore of the Mediterranean, a distance in a direct line of about 1,000 miles. The name Elam is an Assyrian word meaning "high." "The inhabitants of Elam, or `the Highlands,' to the east of Babylon, were called Elamites. They were divided into several branches, speaking different dialects of the same agglutinative language. The race to which they belonged was brachycephalic, or short-headed, like the pre-Semitic Sumerians of Babylonia. "The earliest Elamite kingdom seems to have been that of Anzan, the exact site of which is uncertain; but in the time of Abraham, Shushan or Susa appears to have already become the capital of the country. Babylonia was frequently invaded by the Elamite kings, who at times asserted their supremacy over it (as in the case of Chedorlaomer,  the Kudur-Lagamar,  or `servant of the goddess Lagamar, ' of the cuneiform texts). "The later Assyrian monarchs made several campaigns against Elam, and finally Assur-bani-pal (about B.C. 650) succeeded in conquering the country, which was ravaged with fire and sword. On the fall of the Assyrian Empire, Elam passed into the hands of the Persians" (A.H. Sayce). This country was called by the Greeks Cissia or Susiana. 
SHICRON|     shik'-ron (shikkeron).  See  SHIKKERON .
JABEZ|Affiction.  (1.) A descendant of Judah, of whom it is recorded that "God granted him that which he requested" ( 1 Chronicles 4:9 ,  10). (2.) A place inhabited by several families of the scribes ( 1 Chronicles 2:55 ). 
ZECHARIAH|Jehovah is renowned or remembered.  (1.) A prophet of Judah, the eleventh of the twelve minor prophets. Like Ezekiel, he was of priestly extraction. He describes himself ( 1:1 ) as "the son of Berechiah." In  Ezra 5:1  and  6:14  he is called "the son of Iddo," who was properly his grandfather. His prophetical career began in the second year of Darius (B.C. 520), about sixteen years after the return of the first company from exile. He was contemporary with Haggai ( Ezra 5:1 ). His book consists of two distinct parts, (1) chapters 1 to 8, inclusive, and (2) 9 to the end. It begins with a preface ( 1:1 -6), which recalls the nation's past history, for the purpose of presenting a solemn warning to the present generation. Then follows a series of eight visions ( 1:7 - 6:8 ), succeeding one another in one night, which may be regarded as a symbolical history of Israel, intended to furnish consolation to the returned exiles and stir up hope in their minds. The symbolical action, the crowning of Joshua ( 6:9 -15), describes how the kingdoms of the world become the kingdom of God's Christ. Chapters 7 and 8, delivered two years later, are an answer to the question whether the days of mourning for the destruction of the city should be any longer kept, and an encouraging address to the people, assuring them of God's presence and blessing. The second part of the book (ch. 9-14) bears no date. It is probable that a considerable interval separates it from the first part. It consists of two burdens. The first burden (ch. 9-11) gives an outline of the course of God's providential dealings with his people down to the time of the Advent. The second burden (ch. 12-14) points out the glories that await Israel in "the latter day", the final conflict and triumph of God's kingdom. (2.) The son or grandson of Jehoiada, the high priest in the times of Ahaziah and Joash. After the death of Jehoiada he boldly condemned both the king and the people for their rebellion against God ( 2 Chronicles 24:20 ), which so stirred up their resentment against him that at the king's commandment they stoned him with stones, and he died "in the court of the house of the Lord" ( 24:21 ). Christ alludes to this deed of murder in  Matthew 23:35 ,  Luke 11:51 . (see  ZACHARIAS  .) (3.) A prophet, who had "understanding in the seeing of God," in the time of Uzziah, who was much indebted to him for his wise counsel ( 2 Chronicles 26:5 ). Besides these, there is a large number of persons mentioned in Scripture bearing this name of whom nothing is known. (4.) One of the chiefs of the tribe of Reuben ( 1 Chronicles 5:7 ). (5.) One of the porters of the tabernacle ( 1 Chronicles 9:21 ). (6.)  1 Chronicles 9:37 . (7.) A Levite who assisted at the bringing up of the ark from the house of Obededom ( 1 Chronicles 15:20 -24). (8.) A Kohathite Levite ( 1 Chronicles 24:25 ). (9.) A Merarite Levite ( 1 Chronicles 27:21 ). (10.) The father of Iddo ( 1 Chronicles 27:21 ). (11.) One who assisted in teaching the law to the people in the time of Jehoshaphat ( 2 Chronicles 17:7 ). (12.) A Levite of the sons of Asaph ( 2 Chronicles 20:14 ). (13.) One of Jehoshaphat's sons ( 2 Chronicles 21:2 ). (14.) The father of Abijah, who was the mother of Hezekiah ( 2 Chronicles 29:1 ). (15.) One of the sons of Asaph ( 2 Chronicles 29:13 ). (16.) One of the "rulers of the house of God" ( 2 Chronicles 35:8 ). (17.) A chief of the people in the time of Ezra, who consulted him about the return from captivity ( Ezra 8:16 ); probably the same as mentioned in  Nehemiah 8:4 , (18.)  Nehemiah 11:12 . (19.)  Nehemiah 12:16 . (20.)  Nehemiah 12:35 ,41. (21.)  Isaiah 8:2 . 
ELIHU|Whose God is he.  (1.) "The son of Barachel, a Buzite" ( Job 32:2 ), one of Job's friends. When the debate between Job and his friends is brought to a close, Elihu for the first time makes his appearance, and delivers his opinion on the points at issue ( Job 32 -37). (2.) The son of Tohu, and grandfather of Elkanah ( 1 Samuel 1:1 ). He is called also Eliel ( 1 Chronicles 6:34 ) and Eliab ( 6:27 ). (3.) One of the captains of thousands of Manasseh who joined David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:20 ). (4.) One of the family of Obed-edom, who were appointed porters of the temple under David ( 1 Chronicles 26:7 ). 
ELISHAPHAT|Whom God has judged, one of the "captains of hundreds" associated with Jehoiada in the league to overthrow the usurpation of Athaliah ( 2 Chronicles 23:1 ). 
MEDAD|Love, one of the elders nominated to assist Moses in the government of the people. He and Eldad "prophesied in the camp" ( Numbers 11:24 -29). 
HANANI|God has gratified me, or is gracious.  (1.) One of the sons of Heman ( 1 Chronicles 25:4 ,  25).  (2.) A prophet who was sent to rebuke king Asa for entering into a league with Benhadad I., king of Syria, against Judah ( 2 Chronicles 16:1 -10). He was probably the father of the prophet Jehu ( 1 Kings 16:7 ).  (3.) Probably a brother of Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 1:2 ;  7:2 ), who reported to him the melancholy condition of Jerusalem. Nehemiah afterwards appointed him to have charge of the city gates. 
NOSTRILS|   NOSE;   noz, nos'-trilz ('aph, "nose," nechirayim, dual of nechir, "nostrils"): The former expression ('aph from 'anph, like Arabic 'anf) is often translated "face" (which see under the word) in the English Versions of the Bible. It is frequently referred to as the organ of breathing, in other words, as the receptacle of the breath or spirit of God: "Yahweh.... breathed into his nostrils the breath of life; and man became a living soul" ( Genesis 2:7 ; compare  Genesis 7:22 ); "My life is yet whole in me, and the spirit of God is in my nostrils" ( Job 27:3 ). Therefore a life which depends on so slight a thing as a breath is considered as utterly frail and of no great consequence: "Cease ye from man, whose breath is in his nostrils; for wherein is he to be accounted of?" ( Isaiah 2:22 ; compare Wis 2:2).  In poetical language such a breath of life is ascribed even to God, especially with regard to the mighty storm which is thought to proceed from His nostrils ( Exodus 15:8   2 Samuel 22:9   Psalm 18:8, 15 ).  The phrase, "a smoke in my nose, a fire that burneth all the day" ( Isaiah 65:5 ), is equivalent to a perpetual annoyance and cause of irritation. A cruel custom of war, in which the vanquished had their noses and ears cut off by their remorseless conquerors, is alluded to in  Ezekiel 23:25 . As a wild animal is held in check by having his nose pierced and a hook or ring inserted in it ( Job 40:24 ;  Job 41:2  (Hebrew 40:26)), so this expression is used to indicate the humbling and taming of an obstinate person ( 2 Kings 19:28   Isaiah 37:29 ; compare  Ezekiel 29:4 ;  Ezekiel 38:4 ). But men, and especially women, had their noses pierced for the wearing of jewelry ( Genesis 24:47   Isaiah 3:21   Ezekiel 16:12 ). In one passage the meaning is not quite clear, namely, in the enumeration of blemishes which disable a "son of Aaron" from the execution of the priest's office ( Leviticus 21:18 ), where English Versions of the Bible translates "flat (margin "slit") nose." The Hebrew word is charum, which is a hapax legomenon. It corresponds, however, to the Arabic charam, charman (kharam, kharman), which means "to open," "to pierce the nose," especially the bridge of the nose. We may accept this meaning as the one intended in the passage.  Another dark and much discussed passage must still be referred to: "And, lo, they put the branch to their nose" ( Ezekiel 8:17 ). The usual explanation (whereof the context gives some valuable hints) is that a rite connected with the worship of Baal (the sun) is here alluded to (see Smend and A.B. Davidson's commentaries on the passage). A similar custom is known from Persian sun-worship, where a bunch (baretsma) of dates, pomegranates or tamarisks was held to the nose by the worshipper, probably as an attempt to keep the Holy One (sun) from being contaminated by sinful breath (Spiegel, Eranische Altertamer, III, 571). Among modern Jews posies of myrtle and other fragrant herbs are held to the nose by the persons attending on the ceremony of circumcision, for the alleged reason of making the sight and smell of blood bearable. Another interpretation of the above passage would understand zemorah, in the sense of "male sexual member" (see Gesenius-Buhl, under the word; Levy, Nhb. Worterbuch, I, 544), and the whole passage as a reference to a sensuous Canaanite rite, such as is perhaps alluded to in  Isaiah 57:8 . In that case the 'appam, "their nose "of the Massoretic Text would have to be considered as tiqqun copherim (a correction of the scribes) for 'appi, "my face." Or read "They cause their stench (zemoratham) to come up to my face" (Kraetzschmar, at the place).  See  BRANCH .  H. L. E. Luering
JORAH|     jo'-ra (yorah meaning uncertain, perhaps "harvest-born"): A family which returned with Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:18 ) = "Chariph" of  Nehemiah 7:24  = "Arsiphurith" (the King James Version "Arzephurith") of 1 Esdras 5:16.
PORATHA|     po-ra'-tha, por'-a-tha (pora-tha'): One of the sons of Haman ( Esther 9:8 ). The etymology is uncertain; perhaps from the Persian purdata, "given by fate."
MEHUNIMS|Habitations, ( 2 Chronicles 26:7 ; R.V. "Meunim, " Vulg. Ammonitae), a people against whom Uzziah waged a successful war. This word is in Hebrew the plural of Ma'on, and thus denotes the Maonites who inhabited the country on the eastern side of the Wady el-Arabah. They are again mentioned in  1 Chronicles 4:41  (R.V.), in the reign of King Hezekiah, as a Hamite people, settled in the eastern end of the valley of Gedor, in the wilderness south of Palestine. In this passage the Authorized Version has "habitation," erroneously following the translation of Luther. They are mentioned in the list of those from whom the Nethinim were made up ( Ezra 2:50 ;  Nehemiah 7:52 ). 
CHRISTS|Christs, False: Our Lord warned his disciples that they would arise ( Matthew 24:24 ). It is said that no fewer than twenty-four persons have at different times appeared (the last in 1682) pretending to be the Messiah of the prophets. 
DALETH|     da'-leth (.): The 4th letter of the Hebrew alphabet, and as such used in  Psalm 119  to designate the 4th section; transliterated in this Encyclopedia with the dagesh as d, and, without, as dh (= th in "the"). It came also to be used for the number four (4), and with the dieresis for 4,000. With the apostrophe it is sometimes used as abbreviation for the tetragrammaton. For name, etc., see ALPHABET.
METALS|     met'-alz (Latin metallum, "metal," "mine"; Greek metallon, "mine"): The metals known by the ancients were copper, gold, iron, lead, silver and tin. Of these copper, gold and silver were probably first used, because, occurring in a metallic state, they could be separated easily from earthy materials by mechanical processes. Evidence is abundant of the use of these three metals by the people of remotest antiquity. Lead and tin were later separated from their ores. Tin was probably used in making bronze before it was known as a separate metal, because the native oxide, cassiterite, was smelted together with the copper ore to get bronze. Because of the difficulties in getting it separated from its compounds, iron was the last in the list to be employed. In regard to the sources of these metals in Bible times we have few Biblical references to guide us. Some writers point to  Deuteronomy 8:9 , "a land whose stones are iron," etc., as referring to Palestine. Palestine can be disregarded, however, as a source of metals, for it possesses no mineral deposits of any importance. If it was expected that Israel would possess Lebanon also, then the description would be more true. There is some iron ore which was in ancient times worked, although present-day engineers have declared it not to be extensive enough to pay for working. There is a little copper ore (chalcopyrite, malachite, azurite). In the Anti-Lebanon and Northern Syria, especially in the country East of Aleppo now opened up by the Bagdad Railroad and its branches, there are abundant deposits of copper. This must have been the land of Nuhasse referred to in the Tell el-Amarna Letters. If  Zechariah 6:1  is really a reference to copper, which is doubtful, then the last-mentioned source was probably the one referred to. No doubt Cyprus (Alasia in Tell el-Amarna Letters (?)) furnished the ancients with much copper, as did also the Sinaitic peninsula.  Tarshish is mentioned ( Ezekiel 27:12 ) as a source of silver, iron, tin, and lead. This name may belong to Southern Spain. If so it corresponds to the general belief that the Phoenicians brought a considerable proportion of the metals used in Palestine from that country. Havilah ( Genesis 2:11 ), Ophir ( 1 Kings 10:11 ), Sheba ( Psalm 72:15 ) are mentioned as sources of gold. These names probably refer to districts of Arabia. Whether Arabia produced all the gold or simply passed it on from more remote sources is a question.  See  GOLD .  From the monuments in Egypt we learn that that country was a producer of gold and silver. In fact, the ancient mines and the ruins of the miners' huts are still to be seen in the desert regions of upper Egypt. In the Sinaitic peninsula are deposits of copper, lead, gold, and silver. The most remarkable of the ancient Egyptian mines are situated here (J. Sarabit el Khadim, U. Sidreh, W. Magharah). The early Egyptian kings (Sneferu, Amenemhat II, and others) not only mined the metals, but cut on the walls of the mines inscriptions describing their methods of mining. Here, as in upper Egypt, are remains of the buildings where miners lived or carried out their metallurgical operations. It is hardly to be conceived that the large deposits of lead (galena) in Asia Minor were unworked by the ancients. No nearer deports of tin than those in Southeastern Europe have yet been found. (For further information on metals see separate articles.)  James A. Patch
SOPHERETH|     so-fe'-reth, sof'-e-reth, so'-fe-reth (cophereth): One of the remnant returning from captivity ( Ezra 2:55  the King James Version;  Nehemiah 7:57 ). In the Revised Version (British and American) of  Ezra 2:55  it is "Hassophereth," the definite article being transliterated.
PALLUITES|   PALLU,   pal'-u, pal'-u-its (pallu', "distinguished"): A son of Reuben ( Genesis 46:9  ("Phallu");  Exodus 6:14   Numbers 26:5, 8   1 Chronicles 5:3 ). Perhaps Peleth of  Numbers 16:1  is the same. Palluites, the patronymic, occurs in  Numbers 26:5 .
ELIASHIB|Whom God will restore.  (1.) A priest, head of one of the courses of the priests of the time of David ( 1 Chronicles 24:12 ). (2.) A high priest in the time of Ezra and Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 12:22 ,  23). He rebuilt the eastern city wall ( 3:1 ), his own mansion being in that quarter, on the ridge Ophel ( 3:20 ,  21). His indulgence of Tobiah the Ammonite provoked the indignation of Nehemiah ( 13:4 ,  7). 
GOVERNMENTS|( 1 Corinthians 12:28 ), the powers which fit a man for a place of influence in the church; "the steersman's art; the art of guiding aright the vessel of church or state." 
TYRUS|     ti'-rus.  See  TYRE .
CLEOPHAS|(in the spelling of this word h is inserted by mistake from Latin MSS.), rather Cleopas, which is the Greek form of the word, while Clopas is the Aramaic form. In  John 19:25  the Authorized Version reads, "Mary, the wife of Clopas." The word "wife" is conjecturally inserted here. If "wife" is rightly inserted, then Mary was the mother of James the Less, and Clopas is the same as Alphaeus ( Matthew 10:3 ;  27:56 ). 
EVI|     e'-vi ('ewi, "desire"; Euei):  One of the five kings, or chiefs of the Midianites, slain by Israel during their sojourn in the plains of Moab ( Numbers 31:8   Joshua 13:21 ).
CHEBAR|Length, a river in the "land of the Chaldeans" ( Ezek. 1:3 ), on the banks of which were located some of the Jews of the Captivity ( Ezek. 1:1 ;  3:15 ,  23;  10:15 ,  20,  22). It has been supposed to be identical with the river Habor, the Chaboras, or modern Khabour, which falls into the Euphrates at Circesium. To the banks of this river some of the Israelites were removed by the Assyrians ( 2 Kings 17:6 ). An opinion that has much to support it is that the "Chebar" was the royal canal of Nebuchadnezzar, the Nahr Malcha, the greatest in Mesopotamia, which connected the Tigris with the Euphrates, in the excavation of which the Jewish captives were probably employed. 
GADI|     ga'-di (gadhi, "fortunate"):  The father of Menahem, one of the kings of Israel who reached the throne through blood ( 2 Kings 15:14, 17 ).
HODEVAH|     ho-de'-va, ho'-de-va (hodhewah, hodheyah, "splendor of Yah"): A Levite and founder of a Levite family, seventy-four of whom returned from exile with Zerubbabel, 538 B.C. ( Nehemiah 7:43 ). the American Revised Version, margin gives as another reading "Hodeiah." In  Ezra 2:40  he is called Hodaviah, of which Hodevah and Hodeiah are slight textual corruptions, and in  Ezra 3:9  Judah, a name practically synonymous.
JEZIEL|Assembled by God, a son of Azmaveth. He was one of the Benjamite archers who joined David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:3 ). 
HOHAM|Jehovah impels, the king of Hebron who joined the league against Gibeon. He and his allies were defeated ( Joshua 10:3 ,  5,  16-27). 
TEHAPHNEHES|     te-haf'-ne-hez  See  TAHPANHES .
SODOMA|( Romans 9:29 ; R.V.,  "Sodom"), the Greek form for Sodom. 
BEERI|Illustrious, or the well-man.  (1.) The father of Judith, one of the wives of Esau ( Genesis 26:34 ), the same as Adah ( Genesis 36:2 ).  (2.) The father of the prophet Hosea ( 1:1 ). 
HAMMELECH|The king's, the father of Jerahmeel, mentioned in  Jeremiah 36:26 . Some take this word as a common noun, "the king", and understand that Jerahmeel was Jehoiakim's son. Probably, however, it is to be taken as a proper name. 
HADID|Pointed, a place in the tribe of Benjamin near Lydda, or Lod, and Ono ( Ezra 2:33 ;  Nehemiah 7:37 ). It is identified with the modern el-Haditheh, 3 miles east of Lydda. 
PHYGELLUS|Fugitive, a Christian of Asia, who "turned away" from Paul during his second imprisonment at Rome ( 2 Timothy 1:15 ). Nothing more is known of him. 
ENDOR|Fountain of Dor; i.e., "of the age", a place in the territory of Issachar ( Joshua 17:11 ) near the scene of the great victory which was gained by Deborah and Barak over Sisera and Jabin (Comp.  Psalm 83:9 ,  10). To Endor, Saul resorted to consult one reputed to be a witch on the eve of his last engagement with the Philistines ( 1 Samuel 28:7 ). It is identified with the modern village of Endur, "a dirty hamlet of some twenty houses, or rather huts, most of them falling to ruin," on the northern slope of Little Hermon, about 7 miles from Jezreel. 
LEUMMIM|Peoples; nations, the last mentioned of the three sons of Dedan, and head of an Arabian tribe ( Genesis 25:3 ). 
NEPHTHALIM|     nef'-tha-lim ( Matthew 4:13 ): The Greek form of NAPHTALI (which see).
HEBERITES|     he'-ber-its (ha-chebhri): Descendants of Heber, a prominent clan of Asher, ( Numbers 26:45 ). Supposed by some to be connected with the Chabiri of the Tell el-Amarna Letters.
KORATHITES|     ko'-rath-its: In the King James Version for "Korabites,"  Numbers 26:58 .  See  KORAH, 4 .
WINEVAT|   WINEFAT; WINE PRESS;   win'-fat, win'-pres, win'-vat.  See  CRAFTS, II, 19 ;  VINE ; WINE.  WINEVAT  See  WINEFAT, WINEVAT .
STUMBLINGSTONE|   STUMBLING-BLOCK; STUMBLING-STONE  stum'-bling-blok, (mikhshol, makhshelah; proskomma, skandalon): These are the most important of the varied renderings of either of two cognate Hebrew words, or of two different Greek words. Sometimes the Greek word for "stone" (lithos) accompanies the principal word. There is no important difference in the meaning of the words or of their renderings. the Revised Version (British and American) generally substitutes "stumbling" for "offence" of the King James Version.  The literal meaning of the Hebrew words-an object which causes one to stumble or fall-appears in such passages as  Leviticus 19:14 : "Thou shalt not.... put a stumblingblock (mikhshol) before the blind" (compare  Jeremiah 6:21 ). But the expression is ordinarily figurative, referring to that which causes material ruin or spiritual downfall, which were closely connected in Old Testament thought ( Psalm 119:165   Ezekiel 21:15 ). The things that lead astray are silver and gold ( Ezekiel 7:19 ); idols ( Ezekiel 14:3   Zephaniah 1:3 , etc.).  One of the New Testament words, skandalon, literally means the stick of a trap to which the bait is attached, and which when touched springs the trap. Figuratively either word refers to a thing or a person that leads one to fall into error, into sin or into destruction: the cross of Christ ( Galatians 5:11   Romans 11:9 ); another's liberty ( 1 Corinthians 8:9 ); Peter in  Matthew 16:23 ; Christ, whose life and character were so different from Jewish expectation ( Romans 9:33 ).  See also  OFFENCE .  George Rice Hovey
HOMAM|     ho'-mam (chomam, "destruction"): A Horite descendant of Esau ( 1 Chronicles 1:39 ). The name appears in  Genesis 36:22  as "Heman."
JEWS|   KING OF THE   The title applied in mockery of Jesus, and put by Pilate on His cross ( Matthew 27:29, 37  parallel  Mark 15:26 , etc.).  See  JESUS CHRIST ;  KING, CHRIST AS .  JEWS  juz, jooz.  See  JEW .
TIMNAH|A portion.  (1.) A town of Judah ( Joshua 15:10 ). The Philistines took possession of it in the days of Ahaz ( 2 Chronicles 28:18 ). It was about 20 miles west of Jerusalem. It has been identified with Timnatha of Dan ( Joshua 19:43 ), and also with Timnath ( Judges 14:1 , 5). (2.) A city in the mountains of Judah ( Joshua 15:57 )= Tibna near Jeba'. (3.) A "duke" or sheik of Edom ( Genesis 36:40 ). 
JAMLECH|     jam'-lek (yamlekh, "may he (God) cause to reign"): A "prince" or chief of the tribe of Simeon ( 1 Chronicles 4:34 ). If 4:41 refers to the preceding list, he lived in the time of Hezekiah.
SABEANS|Descendants of Seba ( Genesis 10:7 ); Africans ( Isaiah 43:3 ). They were "men of stature," and engaged in merchandise ( Isaiah 45:14 ). Their conversion to the Lord was predicted ( Psalm 72:10 ). This word, in  Ezek. 23:42 , should be read, as in the margin of the Authorized Version, and in the Revised Version, "drunkards." Another tribe, apparently given to war, is mentioned in  Job 1:15 . 
BUZI|The father of the prophet Ezekiel ( 1:3 ). 
JERIAH|     je-ri'-a (yeriyahu, "founded of Yahweh"): In  1 Chronicles 23:19 ;  1 Chronicles 24:23  = "Jerijah" (yeriyah), 26:31, head of a Levitical house: called chief of the Hebronites in 24:23 (compare 24:30).
KISHON|Winding, a winter torrent of Central Palestine, which rises about the roots of Tabor and Gilboa, and passing in a northerly direction through the plains of Esdraelon and Acre, falls into the Mediterranean at the north-eastern corner of the bay of Acre, at the foot of Carmel. It is the drain by which the waters of the plain of Esdraelon and of the mountains that surround it find their way to the sea. It bears the modern name of Nahr el-Mokattah, i.e., "the river of slaughter" (Comp.  1 Kings 18:40 ). In the triumphal song of Deborah ( Judges 5:21 ) it is spoken of as "that ancient river," either (1) because it had flowed on for ages, or (2), according to the Targum, because it was "the torrent in which were shown signs and wonders to Israel of old;" or (3) probably the reference is to the exploits in that region among the ancient Canaanites, for the adjoining plain of Esdraelon was the great battle-field of Palestine. This was the scene of the defeat of Sisera ( Judges 4:7 ,  13), and of the destruction of the prophets of Baal by Elijah ( 1 Kings 18:40 ). "When the Kishon was at its height, it would be, partly on account of its quicksands, as impassable as the ocean itself to a retreating army." (see  DEBORAH .) 
ISHBIBENOB|My seat at Nob, one of the Rephaim, whose spear was three hundred shekels in weight. He was slain by Abishai ( 2 Samuel 21:16 ,  17). 
ENOSH|   ENOS;   e'-nos, e'-nosh ('enosh, "mortal"; 'Enos):  In the New Testament (the Revised Version (British and American) and the King James Version) and the Old Testament (the King James Version except  1 Chronicles 1:1 ), the form is Enos; in the Old Testament (the Revised Version (British and American) and  1 Chronicles 1:1  the King James Version), the form is Enosh. The son of Seth and grandson of Adam ( Genesis 4:26 ;  Genesis 5:6   1 Chronicles 1:1   Luke 3:38 ). Enosh denotes man as frail and mortal. With Enosh a new religious development began, for "then began men to call upon the name of Yahweh" ( Genesis 4:26 ). There seems to be an implied contrast to  Genesis 4:17  which records a development in another department of life, represented by Enoch the son of Cain.  S. F. Hunter
HAMUEL|     ham'-u-el, ha-mu'-el.  See  HAMMUEL .
ZEBEDEE|A Galilean fisherman, the husband of Salome (q.v.), and the father of James and John, two of our Lord's disciples ( Matthew 4:21 ;  27:56 ;  Mark 15:40 ). He seems to have been a man of some position in Capernaum, for he had two boats ( Luke 5:4 ) and "hired servants" ( Mark 1:20 ) of his own. No mention is made of him after the call of his two sons by Jesus. 
CANAANITES|The descendants of Canaan, the son of Ham. Migrating from their original home, they seem to have reached the Persian Gulf, and to have there sojourned for some time. They thence "spread to the west, across the mountain chain of Lebanon to the very edge of the Mediterranean Sea, occupying all the land which later became Palestine, also to the north-west as far as the mountain chain of Taurus. This group was very numerous, and broken up into a great many peoples, as we can judge from the list of nations ( Genesis 10 ), the `sons of Canaan.'" Six different tribes are mentioned in  Exodus 3:8 , 17;  23:23 ;  33:2 ;  34:11 . In  Exodus 13:5  the "Perizzites" are omitted. The "Girgashites" are mentioned in addition to the foregoing in  Deuteronomy 7:1 ;  Joshua 3:10 . The "Canaanites," as distinguished from the Amalekites, the Anakim, and the Rephaim, were "dwellers in the lowlands" ( Numbers 13:29 ), the great plains and valleys, the richest and most important parts of Palestine. Tyre and Sidon, their famous cities, were the centres of great commercial activity; and hence the name "Canaanite" came to signify a "trader" or "merchant" ( Job 41:6 ;  Proverbs 31:24 ,  lit. "Canaanites;" Comp.  Zephaniah 1:11 ;  Ezek. 17:4 ). The name "Canaanite" is also sometimes used to designate the non-Israelite inhabitants of the land in general ( Genesis 12:6 ;  Numbers 21:3 ;  Judges 1:10 ). The Israelites, when they were led to the Promised Land, were commanded utterly to destroy the descendants of Canaan then possessing it ( Exodus 23:23 ;  Numbers 33:52 ,  53;  Deuteronomy 20:16 ,  17). This was to be done "by little and little," lest the beasts of the field should increase ( Exodus 23:29 ;  Deuteronomy 7:22 ,  23). The history of these wars of conquest is given in the Book of Joshua. The extermination of these tribes, however, was never fully carried out. Jerusalem was not taken till the time of David ( 2 Samuel 5:6 ,  7). In the days of Solomon bond-service was exacted from the fragments of the tribes still remaining in the land ( 1 Kings 9:20 ,  21). Even after the return from captivity survivors of five of the Canaanitish tribes were still found in the land. In the Tell-el-Amarna tablets Canaan is found under the forms of Kinakhna and Kinakhkhi. Under the name of Kanana the Canaanites appear on Egyptian monuments, wearing a coat of mail and helmet, and distinguished by the use of spear and javelin and the battle-axe. They were called Phoenicians by the Greeks and Poeni by the Romans. By race the Canaanites were Semitic. They were famous as merchants and seamen, as well as for their artistic skill. The chief object of their worship was the sun-god, who was addressed by the general name of Baal, "lord." Each locality had its special Baal, and the various local Baals were summed up under the name of Baalim, "lords." 
THEBEZ|Brightness, a place some 11 miles north-east of Shechem, on the road to Scythopolis, the modern Tabas. Abimelech led his army against this place, because of its participation in the conspiracy of the men of Shechem; but as he drew near to the strong tower to which its inhabitants had fled for safety, and was about to set fire to it, a woman cast a fragment of millstone at him, and "all to brake his skull" i.e., "altogether brake," etc. His armourbearer thereupon "thrust him through, and he died" ( Judges 9:50 -55). 
QUIRINIUS|     kwi-rin'-i-us.  See  CHRONOLOGY OF THE NEW TESTAMENT, sec . I, 1, (2); LUKE, THE GOSPEL OF, sec. 5.
PUHITES|     pu'-hits (puthi).  See  PUTHITES .
CREATOR|     kre-a'-ter (ktistes,  1 Peter 4:19 ): The distinctive characteristic of Deity, as the Creator, is that He is the Cause of the existent universe-Cause of its being, not merely of its evolution or present arrangements.  1. God as Creator:  The doctrine of His being the Creator implies, that is to say, that He is the real and the exclusive Agent in the production of the world. For, as Herder remarked, the thought of the Creator is the most fruitful of all our ideas. As Creator, He is the Unconditioned, and the All-conditioning, Being. The universe is thus dependent upon Him, as its causative antecedent. He calls it, as Aquinas said, "according to its whole substance," into being, without any presupposed basis. His power, as Creator, is different in kind from finite power. But the creative process is not a case of sheer almightiness, creating something out of nothing, but an expression of God, as the Absolute Reason, under the forms of time and space, causality and finite personality. In all His work, as Creator, there is no incitement from without, but it rather remains an eternal activity of self-manifestation on the part of a God who is Love.  2. Purpose in Creation:  God's free creative action is destined to realize archetypal ends and ideals, which are peculiar to Himself. For thought cannot be content with the causal category under which He called the world into being, but must run on to the teleological category, wherein He is assumed to have created with a purpose, which His directive agency will see at last fulfilled. As Creator, He is distinct from the universe, which is the product of the free action of His will. This theistic postulation of His freedom, as Creator, rules out all theories of necessary emanation. His creative action was in no way necessarily eternal-not even necessary to His own blessedness or perfection, which must be held as already complete in Himself. To speak, as Professor James does, of "the stagnant felicity of the Absolute's own perfection" is to misconceive the infinite plenitude of His existence, and to place Him in a position of abject and unworthy dependence upon an eternal activity of world-making.  3. Relation to Time:  God's action, as Creator, does not lower our conception of His changelessness, for it is a gratuitous assumption to suppose either that the will to create was a sudden or accidental thing, or that He could not will a change, without, in any proper sense, changing His will. Again, grave difficulties cluster around the conception of His creative thought or purpose as externalized in time, the chief source of the trouble being, as is often imperfectly realized, that, in attempting to view things as they were when time began, we are really trying to get out of, and beyond, experience, to the thinking of which time is an indispensable condition. God's work as Creator must have taken place in time, since the world must be held as no necessary element in the Absolute Life.  4. Christ in Creation:  The self-determined action of the Divine Will, then, is to be taken as the ultimate principle of the cosmos. Not to any causal or meta-physical necessity, but to Divine or Absolute Personality, must the created world be referred. "Of him, and through him, and unto him, are all things" ( Romans 11:36 ). This creative action of God is mediated by Christ-by whom "were all things created, in the heavens and upon the earth, things visible and things invisible, whether thrones or dominions or principalities or powers; all things have been created through him, and unto him" ( Colossians 1:16 ).  See  CREATION .  James Lindsay
BIGTHA|Garden, or gift of fortune, one of the seven eunuchs or chamberlains who had charge of the harem of Ahasuerus ( Esther 1:10 ). 
HALAK|Smooth; bald, a hill at the southern extremity of Canaan ( Joshua 11:17 ). It is referred to as if it were a landmark in that direction, being prominent and conspicuous from a distance. It has by some been identified with the modern Jebel el-Madura, on the south frontier of Judah, between the south end of the Dead Sea and the Wady Gaian. 
REMMON|     rem'-on (rimmon,  Joshua 19:7 ).  See  RIMMON .
CAPHTHORIM|     kaf'-tho-rim (kaphtorim).  See  CAPHTORIM .
SHISHAK|=Sheshonk I., king of Egypt. His reign was one of great national success, and a record of his wars and conquests adorns the portico of what are called the "Bubastite kings" at Karnak, the ancient Thebes. Among these conquests is a record of that of Judea.
DRUSILLA|Third and youngest daughter of Herod Agrippa I. ( Acts 12:1 -4,  20-23). Felix, the Roman procurator of Judea, induced her to leave her husband, Azizus, the king of Emesa, and become his wife. She was present with Felix when Paul reasoned of "righteousness, temperance, and judgment to come" ( Acts 24:24 ). She and her son perished in the eruption of Mount Vesuvius, A.D. 79. 
HAGAR|Flight, or, according to others, stranger, an Egyptian, Sarah's handmaid ( Genesis 16:1 ;  21:9 ,  10), whom she gave to Abraham (q.v.) as a secondary wife ( 16:2 ). When she was about to become a mother she fled from the cruelty of her mistress, intending apparently to return to her relatives in Egypt, through the desert of Shur, which lay between. Wearied and worn she had reached the place she distinguished by the name of Beer-lahai-roi ("the well of the visible God"), where the angel of the Lord appeared to her. In obedience to the heavenly visitor she returned to the tent of Abraham, where her son Ishmael was born, and where she remained (16) till after the birth of Isaac, the space of fourteen years. Sarah after this began to vent her dissatisfaction both on Hagar and her child. Ishmael's conduct was insulting to Sarah, and she insisted that he and his mother should be dismissed. This was accordingly done, although with reluctance on the part of Abraham ( Genesis 21:14 ). They wandered out into the wilderness, where Ishmael, exhausted with his journey and faint from thirst, seemed about to die. Hagar "lifted up her voice and wept," and the angel of the Lord, as before, appeared unto her, and she was comforted and delivered out of her distresses ( Genesis 21:18 ,  19). Ishmael afterwards established himself in the wilderness of Paran, where he married an Egyptian ( Genesis 21:20 , 21). "Hagar" allegorically represents the Jewish church ( Galatians 4:24 ), in bondage to the ceremonial law; while "Sarah" represents the Christian church, which is free. 
OBIL|A keeper of camels, an Ishmaelite who was "over the camels" in the time of David ( 1 Chronicles 27:30 ). 
JEHOSHEBA|Jehovah-swearing, the daughter of Jehoram, the king of Israel. She is called Jehoshabeath in  2 Chronicles 22:11 . She was the only princess of the royal house who was married to a high priest, Jehoiada ( 2 Chronicles 22:11 ). 
MIGDALGAD|Tower of fortune, a town in the plains of Judah, probably the modern el-Mejdel, a little to the north-east of Ascalon ( Joshua 15:37 ). 
BETHSHAN|   BETH-SHEAN; BETH-SHAN  beth-she'-an, beth'-shan (beth-shan, or [beth-she'an]; in Apocrypha Baithsan or Bethsa): A city in the territory of Issachar assigned to Manasseh, out of which the Canaanites were not driven ( Joshua 17:11   Judges 1:27 ); in the days of Israel's strength they were put to taskwork ( Judges 1:28 ). They doubtless were in league with the Philistines who after Israel's defeat on Gilboa exposed the bodies of Saul and his sons on the wall of the city ( 1 Samuel 31:7 ), whence they were rescued by the men of Jabesh, who remembered the earlier kindness of the king ( 1 Samuel 31:7   2 Samuel 21:12 ). In  1 Kings 4:12  the name applies to the district in which the city stands. It was called Scythopolis by the Greeks. This may be connected with the invasion of Palestine by the Scythians who, according to George Syncellus, "overran Palestine and took possession of Beisan." This may be the invasion noticed by Herodotus, circa 600 B.C. (i.104-6). Here Tryphon failed in his first attempt to take Jonathan by treachery (1 Maccabees 12:40). It fell to John Hyrcanus, but was taken from the Jews by Pompey. It was rebuilt by Gabinius (Ant., XIV, v, 3), and became an important member of the league of the "ten cities" (BJ, III, ix, 7). The impiousness of the inhabitants is painted in dark colors by Josephus (Vita, 6; BJ, II, xviii, 3); and the Mishna speaks of it as a center of idol worship (`Abhodhah Zarah, i.4). Later it was the seat of a bishop.  It is represented by the modern Beisan, in the throat of the Vale of Jezreel where it falls into the Jordan valley, on the southern side of the stream from `Ain Jalud. The ruins of the ancient city are found on the plain, and on the great mound where probably stood the citadel. Between the town and the stretch of marsh land to the South runs the old road from East to West up the Vale of Jezreel, uniting in Esdraelon with the great caravan road from North to South.  W. Ewing
GADDIEL|Fortune (i.e.,  sent) of God, the representative of the tribe of Zebulum among the twelve spies ( Numbers 13:10 ). 
MILLO|(Hebrews always with the article,  "the" Millo).  (1.) Probably the Canaanite name of some fortification, consisting of walls filled in with earth and stones, which protected Jerusalem on the north as its outermost defence. It is always rendered Akra i.e., "the citadel", in the LXX. It was already existing when David conquered Jerusalem ( 2 Samuel 5:9 ). He extended it to the right and left, thus completing the defence of the city. It was rebuilt by Solomon ( 1 Kings 9:15 ,  24;  11:27 ) and repaired by Hezekiah ( 2 Chronicles 32:5 ). (2.) In  Judges 9:6 , 20 it is the name of a rampart in Shechem, probably the "tower of Shechem" ( 9:46 ,  49). 
CAULS|In Isaiah 3:18 this word (Hebrews shebisim), in the marg. "networks," denotes network caps to contain the hair, worn by females. Others explain it as meaning "wreaths worn round the forehead, reaching from one ear to the other." 
SONGS|Of Moses ( Exodus 15 ;  Numbers 21:17 ;  Deuteronomy 32 ;  Revelation 15:3 ), Deborah ( Judges 5 ), Hannah ( 1 Samuel 2 ), David ( 2 Samuel 22 ,  and Psalms), Mary ( Luke 1:46 -55), Zacharias ( Luke 1:68 -79), the angels ( Luke 2:13 ), Simeon ( Luke 2:29 ), the redeemed ( Revelation 5:9 ; 19), Solomon (see  SOLOMON ,   OF). 
ISAIAH|(Hebrews Yesh'yahu,  i.e.,  "the salvation of Jehovah").  (1.) The son of Amoz ( Isaiah 1:1 ;  2:1 ), who was apparently a man of humble rank. His wife was called "the prophetess" ( 8:3 ), either because she was endowed with the prophetic gift, like Deborah ( Judges 4:4 ) and Huldah ( 2 Kings 22:14 -20), or simply because she was the wife of "the prophet" ( Isaiah 38:1 ). He had two sons, who bore symbolical names. He exercised the functions of his office during the reigns of Uzziah (or Azariah), Jotham, Ahaz, and Hezekiah ( 1:1 ). Uzziah reigned fifty-two years (B.C. 810-759), and Isaiah must have begun his career a few years before Uzziah's death, probably B.C. 762. He lived till the fourteenth year of Hezekiah, and in all likelihood outlived that monarch (who died B.C. 698), and may have been contemporary for some years with Manasseh. Thus Isaiah may have prophesied for the long period of at least sixty-four years. His first call to the prophetical office is not recorded. A second call came to him "in the year that King Uzziah died" ( Isaiah 6:1 ). He exercised his ministry in a spirit of uncompromising firmness and boldness in regard to all that bore on the interests of religion. He conceals nothing and keeps nothing back from fear of man. He was also noted for his spirituality and for his deep-toned reverence toward "the holy One of Israel." In early youth Isaiah must have been moved by the invasion of Israel by the Assyrian monarch Pul (q.v.),  2 Kings 15:19 ; and again, twenty years later, when he had already entered on his office, by the invasion of Tiglath-pileser and his career of conquest. Ahaz, king of Judah, at this crisis refused to co-operate with the kings of Israel and Syria in opposition to the Assyrians, and was on that account attacked and defeated by Rezin of Damascus and Pekah of Samaria ( 2 Kings 16:5 ;  2 Chronicles 28:5 ,  6). Ahaz, thus humbled, sided with Assyria, and sought the aid of Tiglath-pileser against Israel and Syria. The consequence was that Rezin and Pekah were conquered and many of the people carried captive to Assyria ( 2 Kings 15:29 ;  16:9 ;  1 Chronicles 5:26 ). Soon after this Shalmaneser determined wholly to subdue the kingdom of Israel. Samaria was taken and destroyed (B.C. 722). So long as Ahaz reigned, the kingdom of Judah was unmolested by the Assyrian power; but on his accession to the throne, Hezekiah (B.C. 726), who "rebelled against the king of Assyria" ( 2 Kings 18:7 ), in which he was encouraged by Isaiah, who exhorted the people to place all their dependence on Jehovah ( Isaiah 10:24 ;  37:6 ), entered into an alliance with the king of Egypt ( Isaiah 30:2 -4). This led the king of Assyria to threaten the king of Judah, and at length to invade the land. Sennacherib (B.C. 701) led a powerful army into Palestine. Hezekiah was reduced to despair, and submitted to the Assyrians ( 2 Kings 18:14 -16). But after a brief interval war broke out again, and again Sennacherib (q.v.) led an army into Palestine, one detachment of which threatened Jerusalem ( Isaiah 36:2 -22;  37:8 ). Isaiah on that occasion encouraged Hezekiah to resist the Assyrians ( 37:1 -7), whereupon Sennacherib sent a threatening letter to Hezekiah, which he "spread before the Lord" ( 37:14 ). The judgement of God now fell on the Assyrian host. "Like Xerxes in Greece, Sennacherib never recovered from the shock of the disaster in Judah. He made no more expeditions against either Southern Palestine or Egypt." The remaining years of Hezekiah's reign were peaceful ( 2 Chronicles 32:23 ,  27-29). Isaiah probably lived to its close, and possibly into the reign of Manasseh, but the time and manner of his death are unknown. There is a tradition that he suffered martyrdom in the heathen reaction in the time of Manasseh (q.v.). (2.) One of the heads of the singers in the time of David ( 1 Chronicles 25:3 , 15,  "Jeshaiah"). (3.) A Levite ( 1 Chronicles 26:25 ).  (4.)  Ezra 8:7 .  (5.)  Nehemiah 11:7 .  Isaiah, The Book of Consists of prophecies delivered ( Isaiah 1 ) in the reign of Uzziah (1-5), (2) of Jotham (6), (3) Ahaz (7- 14:28 ), (4) the first half of Hezekiah's reign ( 14:28 -35), (5) the second half of Hezekiah's reign (36-66). Thus, counting from the fourth year before Uzziah's death (B.C. 762) to the last year of Hezekiah (B.C. 698), Isaiah's ministry extended over a period of sixty-four years. He may, however, have survived Hezekiah, and may have perished in the way indicated above. The book, as a whole, has been divided into three main parts:  (1.) The first thirty-five chapters, almost wholly prophetic, Israel's enemy Assyria, present the Messiah as a mighty Ruler and King.  (2.) Four chapters are historical (36-39), relating to the times of Hezekiah.  (3.) Prophetical (40-66), Israel's enemy Babylon, describing the Messiah as a suffering victim, meek and lowly. The genuineness of the section Isaiah 40-66 has been keenly opposed by able critics. They assert that it must be the production of a deutero-Isaiah, who lived toward the close of the Babylonian captivity. This theory was originated by Koppe, a German writer at the close of the last century. There are other portions of the book also (e.g.,  ch. 13; 24-27; and certain verses in ch. 14 and 21) which they attribute to some other prophet than Isaiah. Thus they say that some five or seven, or even more, unknown prophets had a hand in the production of this book. The considerations which have led to such a result are various:  (1.) They cannot, as some say, conceive it possible that Isaiah, living in B.C. 700, could foretell the appearance and the exploits of a prince called Cyrus, who would set the Jews free from captivity one hundred and seventy years after.  (2.) It is alleged that the prophet takes the time of the Captivity as his standpoint, and speaks of it as then present; and (3) that there is such a difference between the style and language of the closing section (40-66) and those of the preceding chapters as to necessitate a different authorship, and lead to the conclusion that there were at least two Isaiahs. But even granting the fact of a great diversity of style and language, this will not necessitate the conclusion attempted to be drawn from it. The diversity of subjects treated of and the peculiarities of the prophet's position at the time the prophecies were uttered will sufficiently account for this. The arguments in favour of the unity of the book are quite conclusive. When the LXX. version was made (about B.C. 250) the entire contents of the book were ascribed to Isaiah, the son of Amoz. It is not called in question, moreover, that in the time of our Lord the book existed in the form in which we now have it. Many prophecies in the disputed portions are quoted in the New Testament as the words of Isaiah ( Matthew 3:3 ;  Luke 3:4 -6;  4:16 -41;  John 12:38 ;  Acts 8:28 ;  Romans 10:16 -21). Universal and persistent tradition has ascribed the whole book to one author. Besides this, the internal evidence, the similarity in the language and style, in the thoughts and images and rhetorical ornaments, all points to the same conclusion; and its local colouring and allusions show that it is obviously of Palestinian origin. The theory therefore of a double authorship of the book, much less of a manifold authorship, cannot be maintained. The book, with all the diversity of its contents, is one, and is, we believe, the production of the great prophet whose name it bears.
NAAMITE|     na'-a-mit (ha-na`ami, "the Naamite"): A family which traced its descent from Naaman ( Numbers 26:40 ).  See  NAAMAN, (2) .
BIGTHAN|One of the eunuchs who "kept the door" in the court of Ahasuerus. With Teresh he conspired against the king's life. Mordecai detected the conspiracy, and the culprits were hanged ( Esther 2:21 -23;  6:1 -3). 
ISHIJAH|     i-shi'-ja.  See  ISSHIJAH .
ISMAIAH|     is-ma'-ya.  See  ISHMAIAH .
JOGLI|     jog'-li (yoghli, perhaps = "led into exile"): Father of Bukki, a Danite chief ( Numbers 34:22 ).
VESSELS|   EARTHEN   urth'-'-n, (cheres, yetser; ostrakinos):  These vessels were heat-resisting and were used for cooking and for boiling clothes ( Leviticus 6:28 ;  Leviticus 11:33 ;  Leviticus 14:5, 50 ). They were probably non-porous and took the place of the kidri or ma'ajin used in Syria today. A traveler in the interior of Palestine may still meet with the hospitality showed to David ( 2 Samuel 17:28 ). The generous natives brought not only gifts of food but the necessary vessels in which to cook it. An earthen vessel was used to preserve a land deed ( Jeremiah 32:14 ).  Figurative: In  Jeremiah 19:1  breaking of an earthen vessel was symbolical of the destruction of Jerusalem. These vessels were also used to symbolize the commonness ( Lamentations 4:2 ) and frailness of our bodies ( 2 Corinthians 4:7 ).  See  POTTERY .  James A. Patch  PAPYRUS, VESSELS OF  See  SHIPS AND BOATS, II, 2, (1) .
SENIR|=Shenir, the name given to Hermon by the Amorites ( Deuteronomy 3:9 ). It means "coat of mail" or "breastplate," and is equivalent to "Sirion." Some interpret the word as meaning "the prominent" or "the snow
CARCAS|     kar'-kas (karkac): One of seven chamberlains, ordered to summon Queen Vashti before King Ahasuerus ( Esther 1:10 ). The Targum allegorizes the first five of the names.
IMMER|Talkative.  (1.) The head of the sixteenth priestly order ( 1 Chronicles 24:14 ).  (2.)  Jeremiah 20:1 .  (3.)  Ezra 2:37 ;  Nehemiah 7:40 .  (4.)  Ezra 2:59 ;  Nehemiah 7:61 .  (5.) The father of Zadok ( Nehemiah 3:29 ). 
TERAH|The wanderer; loiterer, for some unknown reason emigrated with his family from his native mountains in the north to the plains of Mesopotamia. He had three sons, Haran, Nahor, and Abraham, and one daughter, Sarah. He settled in "Ur of the Chaldees," where his son Haran died, leaving behind him his son Lot. Nahor settled at Haran, a place on the way to Ur. Terah afterwards migrated with Abraham (probably his youngest son) and Lot (his grandson), together with their families, from Ur, intending to go with them to Canaan; but he tarried at Haran, where he spent the remainder of his days, and died at the age of two hundred and five years ( Genesis 11:24 -32;  Joshua 24:2 ). What a wonderful part the descendants of this Chaldean shepherd have played in the history of the world! 
MATTATHA|     mat'-a-tha (Mattatha): Son of Nathan the son of David in the genealogy of Jesus ( Luke 3:31 ).
EPISTLES|The apostolic letters. The New Testament contains twenty-one in all. They are divided into two classes.  (1.) Paul's Epistles, fourteen in number, including Hebrews. These are not arranged in the New Testament in the order of time as to their composition, but rather according to the rank of the cities or places to which they were sent. Who arranged them after this manner is unknown. Paul's letters were, as a rule, dictated to an amanuensis, a fact which accounts for some of their peculiarities. He authenticated them, however, by adding a few words in his own hand at the close. (see  GALATIANS ,  EPISTLE TO.) The epistles to Timothy and Titus are styled the Pastoral Epistles. (2.) The Catholic or General Epistles, so called because they are not addressed to any particular church or city or individual, but to Christians in general, or to Christians in several countries. Of these, three are written by John, two by Peter, and one each by James and Jude. It is an interesting and instructive fact that a large portion of the New Testament is taken up with epistles. The doctrines of Christianity are thus not set forth in any formal treatise, but mainly in a collection of letters. "Christianity was the first great missionary religion. It was the first to break the bonds of race and aim at embracing all mankind. But this necessarily involved a change in the mode in which it was presented. The prophet of the Old Testament, if he had anything to communicate, either appeared in person or sent messengers to speak for him by word of mouth. The narrow limits of Palestine made direct personal communication easy. But the case was different when the Christian Church came to consist of a number of scattered parts, stretching from Mesopotamia in the east to Rome or even Spain in the far west. It was only natural that the apostle by whom the greater number of these communities had been founded should seek to communicate with them by letter."  Catholic epistles: The epistles of James, Peter, John, and Jude; so called because they are addressed to Christians in general, and not to any church or person in particular. 
ZUR|Rock.  (1.) One of the five Midianite kings whom the Israelites defeated and put to death ( Numbers 31:8 ). (2.) A Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 8:30 ). 
FULFIL|     fool-fil' (male; pleroo, teleo, with other words): "Fulfill" is used  (1) in a sense more or less obsolete, "to fill up," complete ( Genesis 29:21, 28   Exodus 23:26   Job 36:17 , the Revised Version (British and American) "full," margin "filled up";  Matthew 3:15 , "to fulfill all righteousness";  Philippians 2:2 , "Fulfil ye my joy," the American Standard Revised Version "make full"; compare  2 Corinthians 10:6 );  (2) in the sense of "to accomplish," "to carry into effect," as to fulfill the word of Yahweh ( 1 Kings 2:27 ;  1 Kings 8:15, 24   2 Chronicles 36:21 , etc.); in the New Testament very frequently used of the fulfillment of prophetic Scripture ( Matthew 1:22 ;  Matthew 2:15 , etc.). Love is declared to be "the fulfillment (pleroma, "fullness") of the law" ( Romans 13:10 ). For "fulfill" the Revised Version (British and American) has "do" ( Revelation 17:17 ); for "fulfilled" has "performed" ( 2 Samuel 14:22 ), "accomplished" ( Ezra 1:1   Matthew 5:18 ;  Matthew 24:34   Luke 21:32   John 19:28 ), with numerous other changes.  W. L. Walker
HAAHASHTARI|     ha-a-hash'-ta-ri (ha'-achashtari, possibly a corruption of ha'-ashchuri): A descendant of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:6 ). The name is probably corrupt. If the emendation suggested above is accepted, it means the Ashurites, and is a description of the preceding names.
HARORITE|     ha'-ro-rit.  See  HARODITE .
JEZREELITESS|     jez'-re-el-it-es, jez'-rel-it-es (yizre`e'lith, "of Jezreel," feminine): Applied to Ahinoam, one of David's first two wives, a native of Jezreel in Judah ( 1 Samuel 27:3 ;  1 Samuel 30:5   2 Samuel 2:2 ;  2 Samuel 3:2   1 Chronicles 3:1 ).
JAEL|Mountain-goat, the wife of Heber the Kenite ( Judges 4:17 -22). When the Canaanites were defeated by Barak, Sisera, the captain of Jabin's army, fled and sought refuge with the friendly tribe of Heber, beneath the oaks of Zaanaim. As he drew near, Jael invited him to enter her tent. He did so, and as he lay wearied on the floor he fell into a deep sleep. She then took in her left hand one of the great wooden pins ("nail") which fastened down the cords of the tent, and in her right hand the mallet, or "hammer," used for driving it into the ground, and stealthily approaching her sleeping guest, with one well-directed blow drove the nail through his temples into the earth ( Judges 5:27 ). She then led Barak, who was in pursuit, into her tent, and boastfully showed him what she had done. (see  SISERA ; DEBORAH.) 
ELA|     e'-la (Ela, APC 1Esdras 9:27):  (1) Same as Elam ( Ezra 10:26 ).  (2) Father of Shimei ( 1 Kings 4:18 , the King James Version "Elah").  See  ELAH, 2 .
LENTILS|     len'-tilz ('adhashim; phakos;  Genesis 25:34   2 Samuel 17:28 ;  2 Samuel 23:11 ;  Ezekiel 4:9 ; the King James Version Lentiles): These are undoubtedly identical with the Arabic `adas, a small, reddish bean, the product of Ervum lens, a dwarf leguminous plant, half a foot high, which is extensively cultivated in Palestine as a summer crop. The flour is highly nutritious, and the well-known food, Revalenta arabica, is simply one form, specially prepared; `adas are highly esteemed in Palestine, and are used in soup and as a "pottage" known as mujedderah. This last is of a reddish-brown color and is without doubt the "pottage" of  Genesis 25:34 . Lentils were part of the provisions brought to David when fleeing from Absalom ( 2 Samuel 17:28 ) and were used in the making of the bread for the prophet Ezekiel (4:9). In a "plot of ground full of lentils," Shammah, one of David's "mighty men," stood and defended it and slew the marauding Philistines ( 2 Samuel 23:11, 12 ).  E. W. G. Masterman
MEHUJAEL|Smitten by God, the son of Irad, and father of Methusael ( Genesis 4:18 ). 
PHICOL|Great, the chief captain of the army of Abimelech, the Philistine king of Gerar. He entered into an alliance with Abraham with reference to a certain well which, from this circumstance, was called Beersheba (q.v.), "the well of the oath" ( Genesis 21:22 ,  32;  26:26 ). 
HORSES|    OF THE SUN  ( 2 Kings 23:11 ): In connection with the sun-worship practiced by idolatrous kings in the temple at Jerusalem ( 2 Kings 23:5 ; compare  Ezekiel 8:16 ), horses dedicated to the sun, with chariots, had been placed at the entrance of the sacred edifice. These Josiah, in his great reformation, "took away," and burned the chariots with fire. Horses sacred to the sun were common among oriental peoples (Bochart, Heiroz., I, 2, 10).  SUN, HORSES OF THE  See  HORSES OF THE SUN .
ZEBAH|Man-killer, or sacrifice, one of the two kings who led the vast host of the Midianites who invaded the land of Israel, and over whom Gideon gained a great and decisive victory ( Judges 8 ). Zebah and Zalmunna had succeeded in escaping across the Jordan with a remnant of the Midianite host, but were overtaken at Karkor, probably in the Hauran, and routed by Gideon. The kings were taken alive and brought back across the Jordan; and confessing that they had personally taken part in the slaughter of Gideon's brothers, they were put to death (Comp.  1 Samuel 12:11 ;  Isaiah 10:26 ;  Psalm 83:11 ). 
SHUHITE|A designation of Bildad ( Job 2:11 ), probably because he was a descendant of Shuah. 
GEZER|A precipice, an ancient royal Canaanitish city ( Joshua 10:33 ;  12:12 ). It was allotted with its suburbs to the Kohathite Levites ( 21:21 ;  1 Chronicles 6:67 ). It stood between the lower Beth-horon and the sea ( Joshua 16:3 ;  1 Kings 9:17 ). It was the last point to which David pursued the Philistines ( 2 Samuel 5:25 ;  1 Chronicles 14:16 ) after the battle of Baal-perazim. The Canaanites retained possession of it till the time of Solomon, when the king of Egypt took it and gave it to Solomon as a part of the dowry of the Egyptian princess whom he married ( 1 Kings 9:15 -17). It is identified with Tell el-Jezer, about 10 miles south-west of Beth-horon. It is mentioned in the Amarna tablets. 
HASSHUB|     hash'-ub (chashshubh, "considerate"; the King James Version everywhere Hashub except  1 Chronicles 9:14 ):  (1) A builder of the wall ( Nehemiah 3:11 ).  (2) Another builder of the same name ( Nehemiah 3:23 ).  (3) One of the signers of the covenant ( Nehemiah 10:23 ).  (4) A Levite chief ( Nehemiah 11:15   1 Chronicles 9:14 ). BDB makes (1) and (3) identical.
DANJAAN|Woodland Dan, a place probably somewhere in the direction of Dan, near the sources of the Jordan ( 2 Samuel 24:6 ). The LXX. and the Vulgate read "Dan-ja'ar", i.e., "Dan in the forest." 
JAHZEEL|Allotted by God, the first of the sons of Naphtali ( Genesis 46:24 ). 
GADARENES|The inhabitants of Gadara, in Revised Version "Gerasenes" ( Mark 5:1 ;  Luke 8:26 ,  37). In  Matthew 8:28  they are called Gergesenes, Revised Version "Gadarenes." 
NADAB|Liberal, generous.  (1.) The eldest of Aaron's four sons ( Exodus 6:23 ;  Numbers 3:2 ). He with his brothers and their father were consecrated as priests of Jehovah ( Exodus 28:1 ). He afterwards perished with Abihu for the sin of offering strange fire on the altar of burnt-offering ( Leviticus 10:1 , 2;  Numbers 3:4 ;  26:60 ). (2.) The son and successor of Jeroboam, the king of Israel ( 1 Kings 14:20 ). While engaged with all Israel in laying siege to Gibbethon, a town of southern Dan ( Joshua 19:44 ), a conspiracy broke out in his army, and he was slain by Baasha ( 1 Kings 15:25 -28), after a reign of two years (B.C. 955-953). The assassination of Nadab was followed by that of his whole house, and thus this great Ephraimite family became extinct ( 1 Kings 15:29 ). (3.) One of the sons of Shammai in the tribe of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:28 ,  30). 
HORAM|     ho'-ram (horam, "height"): a king of Gezer defeated by Joshua when he came to the help of Lachish, which Joshua was besieging ( Joshua 10:33 ).
EZEKIAS|Grecized form of Hezekiah ( Matthew 1:9 ,  10). 
NAHOR|Snorting.  (1.) The father of Terah, who was the father of Abraham ( Genesis 11:22 -25;  Luke 3:34 ). (2.) A son of Terah, and elder brother of Abraham ( Genesis 11:26 ,  27;  Joshua 24:2 ,  R.V.). He married Milcah, the daughter of his brother Haran, and remained in the land of his nativity on the east of the river Euphrates at Haran ( Genesis 11:27 -32). A correspondence was maintained between the family of Abraham in Canaan and the relatives in the old ancestral home at Haran till the time of Jacob. When Jacob fled from Haran all intercourse between the two branches of the family came to an end ( Genesis 31:55 ). His grand-daughter Rebekah became Isaac's wife ( 24:67 ). 
UNCHANGEABLENESS|   UNCHANGEABLE;   un-chanj'-a-bl, un-chanj'-a-bl-nes:  I. UNCHANGEABLENESS OF GOD A TRUTH OF NATURAL THEOLOGY  II. SCRIPTURAL DOCTRINE OF THE UNCHANGEABLENESS OF GOD  1. Not Lifeless Immobility  2. As Contrasted with the Finite  3. God's Knowledge, Will and Purpose  4. In His Relation to the World  5. His Relations to Men  LITERATURE  The unchangeablehess or immutability of God is that divine attribute which expresses the truth that in His nature and perfections, in His knowledge, will and purpose, He always remains the same in the fullness of His infinite and perfect Being; infinitely exalted above change, becoming and development, which are the specific characteristics of all finite existence. This is one of what theologians have called the incommunicable attributes of God, that is, one of those specific characteristics of the divine nature which make God to be God in distinction from all that is finite. These attributes have also been called negative attributes. By calling them negative, however, it is not meant that they express the nature of God in so far as He is unknowable and incomprehensible by the finite mind, while the positive attributes, such as love and righteousness, express God's nature as revealed and known. Both kinds of attributes can be known only in so far as God reveals Himself, and furthermore the so-called negative attributes involve a positive idea, while the positive ones in turn imply the negation of all finite limitations. Moreover, since the finite mind cannot comprehend the infinite God, back of all that God has revealed of Himself, back even of His absoluteness, eternity and unchangeability, lies the fullness of His infinite Being, unsearchable, unknowable, and incomprehensible alike in His nature and attributes ( Psalm 145:3 ;  Psalm 147:5   Job 11:7-9   Isaiah 40:28 ).  It is these incommunicable attributes, including unchangeableness, which make God to be God, and mark the specific difference between Him and all finite existence. Unchangeableness is, therefore, the characteristic of God's entire nature and of all His attributes. It cannot be limited to His ethical nature or to His love, and, while it is true that these incommunicable attributes are revealed with especial richness in God's saving activity, they cannot be limited to marks of God's saving action or purpose. It is true that God is unchangeable in His love and grace and power to save, but that is only because it is the love and grace and power of the absolute, infinite and immutable God.  I. Unchangeableness of God a Truth of Natural Theology.  As the One infinitely perfect and absolute or self-existent Being, God is exalted far above the possibility of change, because He is independent, self-existent and unlimited by all the causes of change. As uncaused and self-existent, God cannot be changed from without; as infinitely perfect, He cannot suffer change from within; and as eternal and independent of time, which is the "form" of change and mutability, He cannot be subject to any change at all. God's unchangeablehess, therefore, follows from His self-existence and eternity.  II. Scriptural Doctrine of the Unchangeableness of God.  The Scripture doctrine of God reaffirms this truth. It conceives of God as a living Person in relation to the world and man, and at the same time as absolutely unlimited by the world and man, and as absolutely unchangeable. The God who has revealed Himself in the Old Testament and the New Testament is never identified with, or merged in, the processes of Nature. He is complete and perfect in Himself, and is not the result of any process of self-realization. He is so great that His relations to the created universe cannot begin to exhaust His Being, and yet He stands in the closest relations to man and the world as Creator, Preserver, Governor, and Saviour.  1. Not Lifeless Immobility:  On the one hand, then, the Bible never represents the unchangeableness of God as a dead immobility out of all relation to man and the world. This tendency of thought, fearing anthropomorphism, proceeds on the principle that to make any definite predications about God is to limit Him. The logical result of this is to conceive of God as abstract Being or Substance, so that the word "God" becomes only a name for the Unknowable. Over against this error, the Scripture represents God concretely as a Person in relation to the world and man. In the beginning He created the heavens and the earth, and from that time on He is the life of the world, especially of Israel, His chosen people. To bring out this truth anthropomorphisms are employed. God comes and goes, reveals Himself and hides Himself. He repents ( Genesis 6:6   1 Samuel 15:11   Amos 7:3   Joel 2:13 ); He becomes angry ( Numbers 11:1   Psalm 106:40 ); and lays aside His anger ( Deuteronomy 13:17   Hosea 14:4 ). He sustains a different relation to the godly and the wicked ( Proverbs 11:20 ;  Proverbs 12:22 ). In the fullness of time He became incarnate through the Son, and He dwells in His people by His Spirit, their experience of His grace being greater at some times than at others.  But on the other hand, the Scripture always asserts in unmistakable terms the unchangeableness of God. He is unchangeable in His nature. Although the name 'El Shadday, by which He made Himself known in the patriarchal period of revelation, denotes especially God's power, this name by no means exhausts the revelation of God in that period. His unchangeableness is involved in His eternity as made known to Abraham ( Genesis 21:33 ). This attribute finds its clearest expression in the name Yahweh as revealed to Moses, the significance of which is unfolded in the passage  Exodus 3:13-15 . God here reveals Himself to His people as "I AM THAT I AM," using the future tense of the verb "to be," which, as the context shows, is given as the meaning of the name Yahweh. Some recent writers would derive these words from the Hiphil stem of the verb, and affirm that it signifies that God is the giver of life. The verb, however, is in the Qal stem, the tense denoting the changeless continuity of the life and nature of God. The idea expressed is not merely that of self-existence, but also of unchangeableness, and this unchangeableness, as the context clearly indicates (especially  Exodus 3:15 ), is here set forth not simply as belonging to the nature of God in Himself, but is brought into closest connection with His covenant relation to His people, so that the religious value of God's unchangeableness is most clearly implied in this fundamental assertion of the attribute. The same idea of God's immutability is reaffirmed in the prophecy of Isaiah. It is connected with the name Yahweh ( Isaiah 41:4 ; compare also 48:12), where Yahweh affirms that He is the first and, with the last, the same God, thereby asserting not merely His eternity, but also that He is the same in His divine existence throughout all ages. This attribute, moreover, is claimed by Yahweh, and set forth as an especial mark of His Godhead in  Isaiah 44:6 . The unchangeableness of the divine nature is also asserted by the prophet Malachi in a difficult passage (3:6). This is a clear affirmation of the unchangeableness of God, the only question being whether it is set forth as the ground of Israel's confidence, or in contrast with their fickleness, a question which depends partly on that of the text.  In the New Testament the thought of the passage in Exodus 3 is reiterated in the Apocalypse where God is described as He who is and was and is to come ( Revelation 1:4 ). This is an expansion of the covenant name Yahweh in  Exodus 3:13-15 , denoting not merely eternity but also immutability. The phrases "the Alpha and the Omega" ( Revelation 1:8 ;  Revelation 21:6 ;  Revelation 22:13 ); and "the first and the last" ( Revelation 1:17 ;  Revelation 22:13 ); and "the beginning and the end" ( Revelation 21:6 ;  Revelation 22:13 ) bring out the same idea, and are applied to Christ as well as to God, which is a clear indication of our Lord's Deity. The apostle Paul likewise asserts the incorruptibility, eternity and immortality of the divine nature, all of which ideas imply the unchangeableness of God ( Romans 1:23   1 Timothy 1:17 ;  1 Timothy 6:16 ).  2. As Contrasted with the Finite:  Not only is the unchangeableness of God's nature asserted in Scripture, and placed in relation to His dealings with men, but also it is declared to be the distinctive characteristic of God's nature as contrasted with the entire universe of finite being. While the heavens and the earth change and are passing away, God endures forever and forever the same God ( Psalm 102:26-28  (Hebrew versification, 27-29)). The application of the language of this psalm to Christ by the author of the Epistle to the  Hebrews 1:10-12  involves the unchangeableness of Christ, which is again explicitly asserted in this Epistle ( Hebrews 13:8 ), being another clear indication of the way in which the Deity of Jesus Christ pervades the New Testament. This idea of God's immutability, as contrasted with the mutability of finite existence which is His creation, is given expression in the New Testament by the apostle James. As Creator of the heavenly bodies, God is called the Father of lights. While their lights, however, are intermittent, God's light is subject to neither change nor obscuration ( James 1:17 ).  In accordance with this idea of the unchangeableness of God's nature, the Scripture, in ascribing life and personality to Him, never regards God as subject to any process of becoming or self-realization, and the views which so conceive of God are unscriptural whether they proceed upon a unitarian or a trinitarian basis.  3. God's Knowledge, Will and Purpose:  God is also represented in Scripture as unchangeable in His knowledge, will and purpose. He is not a man that He should repent ( 1 Samuel 15:29 ). His purposes, therefore, are unchangeable ( Numbers 23:19   Isaiah 46:11   Proverbs 19:21 ); and His decrees are accordingly likened to "mountains of brass" ( Zechariah 6:1 ). His righteousness is as immutable as mountains ( Psalm 36:6 (Hebrew 7 )); and His power also is unchangeable ( Isaiah 26:4 ). Hence, while the Scripture represents God as sustaining living relations to His creatures, it does not conceive of Him as conditioned or determined in any way by men's acts, in either His knowledge, will, purpose or power. God knows eternally the changing course of events, and He acts differently upon different occasions, but all events, including human actions, are determined by God's unchangeable purpose, so that God's knowledge and actions are not contingent upon anything outside Himself.  Although, therefore, the idea of God as pure abstract Being, out of all relation to the world, is unscriptural, it is no less true that conception of God which represents a reaction from this, and which conceives of God anthropomorphically and as conditioned and determined by the world and man, is also quite contradictory to the Scripture conception of God. This latter tendency goes too far in the opposite direction, and falls into the error of conceiving God's knowledge, will, purpose and power too anthropomorphically, and as limited by the free acts of man. While the opposite tendency kept God out of all relation to the world, this one erects God's relation to the world into something which limits Him. This way of conceiving of God, which is the error of Rationalism, Socinianism and Arminianism, is as unscriptural as that which conceives of God as abstract Being, unknowable, and entirely out of relation to the world.  4. In His Relation to the World:  Unchangeable in His nature and attributes, God is likewise unchangeable in His relation to the world, which relation the Scripture represents as creation and providence, and not as emanation. Hence while everything finite changes, God remains ever the same ( Psalm 102:26-28 ). Consequently, the pantheistic idea is also unscriptural, which idea, going farther than the anthropomorphic and dualistic conception which places the world over against God, completely merges God's Being in the world and its processes of change, affirming that God comes to self-realization in the evolution of the world and man. In its reaction from the denial of God's living relation to the world, this view does not stop with limiting God by reason of this relation, but merges Him completely in the world-development. The Scripture, on the contrary, always conceives of God as immutably free and sovereign in His relation to all the creation.  In accordance with this idea of the unchangeableness of God's nature and attributes, the Bible always maintains God's absoluteness and transcendence of Nature and her processes in all of the relations which He sustains to the finite universe. It came into being by His creative fiat, not by any process of emanation from His Being. He sustains it in existence, and governs it, not by any process of Self-realization in the series of second causes, but from without, by His sovereign will and power. And He intrudes into the series of finite causes miraculously, producing events in Nature which are due solely to His power. When for man's salvation the Son of God became incarnate, it was not by any change of His nature in laying aside some or all of the attributes of Deity, but by assuming a human nature into personal union with the divine nature. The Scripture passages which speak of the incarnation of our Lord clearly indicate that the Son retained His full Deity in "becoming flesh" (compare especially the prologue to John's Gospel and  Philippians 2:6-8 ). Moreover, the Old Testament doctrine of the Spirit of God as the source of life to the world is always at pains to avoid any mingling of the Spirit with the processes of Nature, and the same thing is true of the New Testament doctrine of the indwelling of the Spirit in the believer, always keeping the Spirit distinct from the spirit of man ( Romans 8:16 ).  5. His Relations to Men:  Finally, God is unchangeable not only in relation to the universe, but in His relations to men and especially to His people. This follows from His unchangeable ethical nature. The Scripture often connects the unchangeableness of God with His goodness ( Psalm 100:5   James 1:17 ); with His truthfulness and mercy ( Psalm 100:5 ;  Psalm 117:2 ); and with His covenant promises ( Exodus 3:13 ). In connection with His covenant promises, God's unchangeableness gives the idea of His faithfulness which is emphasized in the Old Testament to awaken trust in God ( Deuteronomy 7:9   Psalm 36:5 (Hebrew 6 );  Psalm 92:2  (Hebrew 3);  Isaiah 11:5   Lamentations 3:23 ). This idea of God's unchangeableness in His covenant promises or His faithfulness is repeated and emphasized in the New Testament. His gifts or graces and election are without repentance ( 1 Thessalonians 5:24   Romans 11:29 ); He is faithful toward men because unchangeably true to His own nature ( 2 Timothy 2:13 ); His faithfulness abides in spite of men's lack of faith ( Romans 3:5 ), and is in many places represented as the basis of our confidence in God who is true to His election and gracious promises ( 1 Corinthians 1:9 ;  1 Corinthians 10:13   2 Thessalonians 3:3   Hebrews 10:23 ;  Hebrews 11:11   1 Peter 4:19   1 John 1:9 ). See FAITHFULNESS . It is thus the religious significance and value of God's unchangeableness which is especially emphasized throughout the Scripture. Because He is unchangeably true to His promises, He is the secure object of religious faith and trust, upon whom alone we can rely in the midst of human change and decay. It is this idea to which expression is given by calling God a rock, the rock of our strength and of our salvation ( Deuteronomy 32:15   Psalm 18:2 (Hebrew 3 ); 42:9 (Hebrew 10); 71:03:00;  Isaiah 17:10 ). God is even eternally a rock, the never-failing object of confidence and trust ( Isaiah 26:4 ).  It appears, therefore, that the Scripture idea of the unchangeableness of God lays emphasis upon four points. First, it is not lifeless immobility, but the unchangeableness of a living Person. Second, it is, however, a real unchangeableness of God's nature, attributes and purpose. Third, this unchangeableness is set forth as one of the specific characteristics of Deity in distinction from all that is finite. Fourth, God's unchangeableness is not dealt with in an abstract or merely theoretic manner, but its religious value is invariably emphasized as constituting God the one true object of religious faith.  LITERATURE.  Besides the commentaries on appropriate passages, and the discussion of the divine attributes in the general works on systematic theology, see Dillmann, Handbuch der alttest. Theol., 1895, 215-20, 243-44; Oehler, Theology of the Old Testament, English translation, 1883, 95, 100; Schultz, Alttest. Theol., 1896, 419; Davidson, The Theology of the Old Testament, 1904, 45-58, 165. For a fuller discussion see Charhock, "The Immutability of God," Works, volume I, 374-419; Dorner, Ueber die richtige Fassung des dogmatischen Begrifts der Unverdnderlichkeit Gottea, u.s.w.; Article I, "Die neueren Laugnungen der Unveranderlichkeit des personlichen Gottes, u.s.w.," JDT, I, 201-77; II, "Die Geschichte der Lehre von der Unveranderlichkeit Gottea bis auf Schleiermacher," JDT, II, 440-500; III, "Dogmatische Erorterung der Lehre von der Unveranderlichkeit Gottes," JDT, III, 579-660; H. Cremer, Die christliche Lehre von den Eigenschaften Gottea, 1897, pub. in the Beitrage zur Forderung christlicher Theol., I, 7-111; see pp. 10;, and especially pp. 102-9.  Caspar Wistar Hodge
GEDEROTH|     ged'-e-roth, ge-de'-roth (gedheroth): A town in the Shephelah of Judah, named with Kithlish, Beth-dagon, Naamah and Makkedah ( Joshua 15:41 ). It is mentioned along with Bethshemesh and Aijalon as taken by the Philistines in the reign of Ahaz ( 2 Chronicles 28:18 ). It possibly corresponds with the "Kidron" of 1 Maccabees 15:39, 41; 16:09. Eusebius, Onomasticon places a very large village named Gedrom 10 Roman miles from Lydda on the road to Eleutheropolis. This points to Katrah, Southeast of Yebnah.
GIBEATHITE|     gib'-e-ath-it.  See  SHEMAAH .
ELIPHELET|God his deliverance.  (1.) One of David's distinguished warriors ( 2 Samuel 23:34 ); called also Eliphal in  1 Chronicles 11:35 . (2.) One of the sons of David born at Jerusalem ( 1 Chronicles 3:6 ;  14:5 ); called Elpalet in  1 Chronicles 14:5 . Also another of David's sons ( 1 Chronicles 3:8 ); called Eliphalet in  2 Samuel 5:16 ;  1 Chronicles 14:7 . (3.) A descendant of king Saul through Jonathan ( 1 Chronicles 8:39 ). 
SHUNITES|   SHUNI;   shoo'-ni, shoo'-nits. (shuni): One of the sons of Gad and his descendants ( Genesis 46:16   Numbers 26:15 ).
BIRDS|   ABOMINATION,  OF    Leviticus 11:13-19 : "And these ye shall have in abomination among the birds; they shall not be eaten, they are an abomination: the eagle, and the gier-eagle, and the osprey, and the kite, and the falcon after its kind, every raven after its kind, and the ostrich, and the night-hawk, and the sea-mew, and the hawk after its kind, and the little owl, and the cormorant, and the great owl, and the horned owl, and the pelican, and the vulture, and the stork, the heron after its kind, and the hoopoe, and the bat."  Deuteronomy 14:12-18  gives the glede in addition.  Each of these birds is treated in order in this work. There are two reasons why Moses pronounced them an abomination for food. Either they had rank, offensive, tough flesh, or they were connected with religious superstition. The eagle, gier-eagle, osprey, kite, glede, falcon, raven, night-hawk, sea-mew, hawk, little owl, cormorant, great owl, horned owl, pelican and vulture were offensive because they were birds of prey or ate carrion or fish until their flesh partook of the odor of their food. Young ostriches have sweet, tender flesh and the eggs are edible also. In putting these birds among the abominations Moses must have been thinking of grown specimens. (Ostriches live to a remarkable age and on account of the distances they cover, and their speed in locomotion, their muscles become almost as hard as bone.)  There is a trace of his early Egyptian training when he placed the stork and the heron on this list. These birds, and the crane as well, abounded in all countries known at that time and were used for food according to the superstitions of different nations. These three were closely related to the ibis which was sacred in Egypt and it is probable that they were protected by Moses for this reason, since they were eaten by other nations at that time and cranes are used for food today by natives of our southeastern coast states and are to be found in the markets of our western coast. The veneration for the stork that exists throughout the civilized world today had its origin in Palestine. Noting the devotion of mated pairs and their tender care for the young the Hebrews named the bird chacidhah, which means kindness. Carried down the history of ages with additions by other nations, this undoubtedly accounts for the story now universal, that the stork delivers newly-born children to their homes; so the bird is loved and protected.  One ancient Roman writer, Cornelius Nepos, recorded that in his time both crane and storks were eaten; storks were liked the better. Later, Pliny wrote that no one would touch a stork, but everyone was fond of crane. In Thessaly it was a capital crime to kill a stork. This change from regarding the stork as a delicacy to its protection by a death penalty merely indicates the hold the characteristics of the bird had taken on people as it became better known, and also the spread of the regard in which it was held throughout Palestine. The hoopoe (which see) was offensive to Moses on account of extremely filthy nesting habits, but was considered a great delicacy when captured in migration by residents of southern Europe.  See also  ABOMINATION ;  BIRDS, UNCLEAN .  Gene Stratton-Porter  BIRDS  burds (`ayiT; Greek variously ta peteina ( Matthew 13:4 ) ta ornea tou ouranou ( Revelation 19:17 ) ornis ( Matthew 23:37   Luke 13:34 ) Latin, avis; Old English "brid"):  I. Meaning of the Word.  All authorities agree that the exact origin of the word bird, as we apply it to feathered creatures, is unknown.  1. In Early Hebrew:  The Hebrew `ayiT means to "tear and scratch the face," and in its original form undoubtedly applied to birds of prey. It is probable that no spot of equal size on the face of the globe ever collected such numbers of vultures, eagles and hawks as ancient Palestine. The land was so luxuriant that flocks and herds fed from the face of Nature. In cities, villages, and among tent-dwellers incessant slaughter went on for food, while the heavens must almost have been obscured by the ascending smoke from the burning of sacrificed animals and birds, required by law of every man and woman. From all these slain creatures the offal was thrown to the birds. There were no guns; the arrows of bowmen or "throw sticks" were the only protection against them, and these arms made no noise to frighten feathered creatures, and did small damage. So it easily can be seen that the birds would increase in large numbers and become so bold that men were often in actual conflict with them, and no doubt their faces and hands were torn and scratched.  2. In Later Usage:  Later, as birds of song and those useful for food came into their lives, the word was stretched to cover all feathered creatures. In the King James Version `ayiT is translated "fowl," and occurs several times: "And when the fowls came down upon the carcasses, Abram drove them away" ( Genesis 15:11 ). "They shall be left together unto the fowls of the mountains, and to the beasts of the earth; and the fowls shall summer upon them, and all the beasts of the earth shall winter upon them" ( Isaiah 18:6 ). "There is a path which no fowl knoweth, and which the vulture's eye hath not seen" ( Job 28:7 ). The American Standard Revised Version changes these and all other references to feathered creatures to "birds," making a long list. The Hebrew `ayiT in its final acceptance was used in Palestine as "bird" is with us.  3. In Old English:  Our earliest known form of the word is the Old English "brid," but they applied the term to the young of any creature. Later its meaning was narrowed to young produced from eggs, and the form changed to "bird."  II. Natural History of Birds.  The first known traces of birds appear in the formation of the Triassic period, and are found in the shape of footprints on the red sandstone of the Connecticut valley.  1. Earliest Traces and Specimens:  This must have been an ancient sea bed over which stalked large birds, leaving deeply imprinted impressions of their feet. These impressions baked in the sun, and were drifted full of fine wind-driven sand before the return of the tide. Thus were preserved to us the traces of 33 species of birds all of which are proven by their footprints to have been much larger than our birds of today. The largest impressions ever found measured 15 inches in length by 10 in width, and were set from 4 to 6 ft. apart. This evidence would form the basis for an estimate of a bird at least four times as large as an ostrich. That a bird of this size ever existed was not given credence until the finding of the remains of the dinornis in New Zealand. The largest specimen of this bird stood 10 1/2 ft. in height. The first complete skeleton of a bird was found in the limestone of the Jurassic period in Solenhofen, Bavaria. This bird had 13 teeth above and 3 below, each set in a separate socket, wings ending in three-fingered claws much longer than the claws of the feet, and a tail of 20 vertebrae, as long as the body, having a row of long feathers down each side of it, the specimen close to the size of a crow. The first preserved likeness of a bird was found frescoed on the inside of a tomb of Maydoon, and is supposed to antedate the time of Moses 3,000 years. It is now carefully preserved in the museum of Cairo. The painting represents six geese, four of which can be recognized readily as the ancestors of two species known today. Scientists now admit that Moses was right in assigning the origin of birds to the water, as their structure is closer reptilian than mammalian, and they reproduce by eggs. To us it seems a long stretch between the reptile with a frame most nearly bird-like and a feathered creature, but there is a possibility that forms making closer connection yet will be found.  2. Structural Formation:  The trunk of a bird is compact and in almost all instances boat-shaped. Without doubt prehistoric man conceived his idea of navigation and fashioned his vessel from the body of a water bird, and then noticed that a soaring bird steered its course with its tail and so added the rudder. The structural formation of a bird is so arranged as to give powerful flight and perfect respiration. In the case of a few birds that do not fly, the wings are beaten to assist in attaining speed in running, as the ostrich, or to help in swimming under the water, as the auk. The skull of a young bird is made up of parts, as is that of man or animal; but with age these parts join so evenly that they appear in a seamless formation. The jaws extend beyond the face, forming a bill that varies in length and shape with species, and it is used in securing food, in defense, feather dressing, nest building-in fact it is a combination of the mouth and hand of man. The spine is practically immovable, because of the ribs attached to the upper half and the bony structure supporting the pelvic joints of the lower. In sharp contrast with this the neck is formed of from 10 to 23 vertebrae, and is so flexible that a bird can turn its head completely around, a thing impossible to man or beast. The breast bone is large, strong, and provided with a ridge in the middle, largest in birds of strong flight, smallest in swimmers, and lacking only in birds that do not fly, as the ostrich. The wings correspond to the arms of man, and are now used in flight and swimming only. Such skeletons as the Archeopteryx prove that the bones now combined in the tip of the wing were once claws. This shows that as birds spread over land and developed wing power in searching longer distances for food or when driven by varying conditions of climate, the wings were used more in flight, and the claws gradually joined in a tip and were given covering that grew feathers, while the bill became the instrument for taking food and for defense. At the same time the long tail proving an encumbrance, it gradually wore away and contracted to the present form. Studied in detail of bony structure, muscle, and complicated arrangement of feathers of differing sizes, the wing of a bird proves one of Nature's marvels. The legs are used in walking or swimming, the thigh joint being so enveloped in the body that the true leg is often mistaken for it. This makes the knee of a man correspond to the heel of a bird, and in young birds of prey especially, the shank or tarsus is used in walking, until the bones harden and the birds are enabled to bear their weight on the feet and straighten the shank. The toes vary with species. Pliny classified birds by them: "The first and principal difference and distinction in birds is taken from their feet; for they have either hooked talons, as Hawkes, or long round claws as Hens, or else they be broad, flat and whole-footed as Geese." Flight is only possible to a bird when both wings are so nearly full-feathered that it balances perfectly. In sleep almost every bird places its head under its wing and stands on one foot. The arrangement by which this is accomplished, without tiring the bird in the least, is little short of miraculous and can be the result only of slow ages of evolution. In the most finished degree this provision for the comfort of the bird is found among cranes and other long-legged water birds. The bone of one part of the leg fits into the bone of the part above, so that it is practically locked into place with no exertion on the part of the bird. At the same time the muscles that work the claws, cross the joints of the leg so that they are stretched by the weight of the bird, and with no effort, it stands on earth or perches on a branch. This explains the question so frequently asked as to why the feet of a perching bird do not become so cramped and tired that it falls.  3. Birds' Food, Blood, etc.:  Birds feed according to their nature, some on prey taken alive, some on the carrion of dead bodies, some on fish and vegetable products of the water, some on fruit seed, insects and worms of the land. Almost every bird indulges in a combination of differing foods. Their blood is from 12 degrees to 16 degrees warmer than that of the rest of the animal kingdom, and they exhibit a corresponding exhilaration of spirits. Some indulge in hours of sailing and soaring, some in bubbling notes of song, while others dart near earth in playful dashes of flight. Birds are supposed to be rather deficient in the senses of taste and touch, and to have unusually keen vision. They reproduce by eggs that they deposit in a previously selected and prepared spot, and brood for a length of time varying with the species. The young of birds of prey, song birds, and some water birds, remain in the nests for differing lengths of time and are fed by the old birds; while others of the water birds and most of the game birds leave the nest as soon as the down is dry, and find food as they are taught by their elders, being sheltered at night so long as needful.  III. Birds of the Bible.  The birds of the Bible were the same species and form as exist in Palestine today. Because of their wonderful coloring, powerful flight, joyous song, and their similarity to humanity in home-making and the business of raising their young, birds have been given much attention, and have held conspicuous place since the dawn of history. When the brain of man was young and more credulous than today he saw omens, signs and miracles in the characteristic acts of birds, and attributed to them various marvelous powers: some were considered of good omen and a blessing, and some were bad and a curse.  1. Earliest Mention:  The historians of the Bible frequently used birds in comparison, simile, and metaphor. They are first mentioned in  Genesis 7:14, 15 , "They, and every beast after its kind, and all the cattle after their kind, and every creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth after its kind, and every bird after its kind, every bird of every sort." This is the enumeration of the feathered creatures taken into the ark to be preserved for the perpetuation of species after the flood abated. They are next found in the description of the sacrifice of Abram, where it was specified that he was to use, with the animals slaughtered, a turtle dove and a young pigeon, the birds not to be divided. It is also recorded that the birds of prey were attracted by the carcasses as described in  Genesis 15:9-11 , "And he said unto him, Take me a heifer three years old, and a she-goat three years old, and a ram three years old, and a turtle-dove, and a young pigeon. And he took him all these, and divided them in the midst, and laid each half over against the other: but the birds divided he not. And the birds of prey came down upon the carcasses, and Abram drove them away." Palestine abounded in several varieties of "doves" (which see) and their devotion to each other, and tender, gentle characteristics had marked them as a loved possession of the land; while the clay cotes of pigeons were reckoned in establishing an estimate of a man's wealth.  2. Used in Sacrifice:  In an abandon of gratitude to God these people offered of their best-loved and most prized possessions as sacrifice; and so it is not surprising to find the history of burnt offerings frequently mentioning these birds which were loved and prized above all others. Their use is first commanded in  Leviticus 1:14-17 , "And if his oblation to Yahweh be a burnt-offering of birds, then he shall offer his oblation of turtle-doves, or of young pigeons. And the priest shall bring it unto the altar, and wring off its head, and burn it on the altar; and the blood thereof shall be drained out on the side of the altar; and he shall take away its crop with the filth thereof, and cast it beside the altar on the east part, in the place of the ashes." Again in  Leviticus 5:7-10 , we read: "And if his means suffice not for a lamb, then he shall bring his trespass-offering for that wherein he hath sinned, two turtle-doves, or two young pigeons, unto Yahweh; one for a sin-offering, and the other for a burnt-offering." Throughout the Bible these birds figure in the history of sacrifice ( Leviticus 12:8 ;  Leviticus 14:4-8   Numbers 6:10 , etc.).  3. Other References:  The custom of weaving cages of willow wands, in which to confine birds for pets, seems to be referred to when Job asks ( Job 41:5 ): + "Wilt thou play with him as with a bird? Or wilt thou bind him for thy maidens?" - See Job 12:7 : + "But ask now the beasts, and they shall teach thee; And the birds of the heavens, and they shall tell thee." David was thinking of the swift homeward flight of an eagle when he wrote: "In Yahweh do I take refuge: How say ye to my soul, Flee as a bird to your mountain?" ( Psalm 11:1 ).  His early days guarding the flocks of his father no doubt suggested to him the statement found in  Psalm 50:11 : "I know all the birds of the mountains; And the wild beasts of the field are mine" (the Revised Version margin, "in my mind"). In describing Lebanon, the Psalmist wrote of its waters: "By them the birds of the heavens have their habitation; They sing among the branches" ( Psalm 104:12 ). - He mentioned its trees: + "Where the birds make their nests: As for the stork, the fir-trees are her house" ( Psalm 104:17 ). - See also  Psalm 78:27 ;  Psalm 148:10 .  The origin of the oft-quoted phrase, "A little bird told me," can be found in  Ecclesiastes 10:20 : "Revile not the king, no, not in thy thought; and revile not the rich in thy bedchamber: for a bird of the heavens shall carry the voice, and that which hath wings shall tell the matter." In a poetical description of spring in the So of Solomon, we read: + "The flowers appear on the earth; The time of the singing of birds is come, And the voice of the turtle-dove is heard in our land" ( Songs 2:12 ). - In his prophecy concerning Ethiopia, Isaiah wrote, "They shall be left together unto the ravenous birds of the mountains, and to the beasts of the earth; and the ravenous birds shall summer upon them, and all the beasts of the earth shall winter upon them" ( Isaiah 18:6 ). In foretelling God's judgment upon Babylon, Isaiah ( Isaiah 46:11 ) refers to Cyrus as "a ravenous bird (called) from the east, the man of my counsel from a far country"; "probably in allusion to the fact that the griffon was the emblem of Persia; and embroidered on its standard" (HDB, I, 632); (see EAGLE).  Jeremiah 4:25  describes the habit of birds, which invariably seek shelter before an approaching storm. In His denunciation of Israel, Yahweh questions, in  Jeremiah 12:9 , "Is my heritage unto me as a speckled bird of prey? are the birds of prey against her round about?" When Jeremiah threatened the destruction of Jerusalem, he wrote that Yahweh would "cause them to fall by the sword before their enemies, and by the hand of them that seek their life: and their dead bodies will I give to be food for the birds of the heavens" ( Jeremiah 19:7 ): that is, He would leave them for the carrion eaters. Ezekiel threatens the same fate to the inhabitants of Gog ( Ezekiel 39:4, 17 ). Hosea ( Hosea 9:11 ) prophesies of Ephraim, "Their glory shall fly away like a bird." In the Sermon on the Mount, Jesus mentions the birds, as recorded by  Matthew 6:26 : "Behold the birds of the heaven, that they sow not, neither do they reap, nor gather into barns; and your heavenly Father feedeth them. Are not ye of much more value than they?" In the sermon from the boat where He spoke the parable of the Sower He again mentioned the birds: "As he sowed, some seeds fell by the way side, and the birds came and devoured them" ( Matthew 13:4 ). Mark describes the same sermon in  Mark 4:4 , and  Mark 4:32  quotes the parable of the Mustard Seed: "Yet when it is sown, (it) groweth up, and becometh greater than all the herbs, and putteth out great branches; so that the birds of the heaven can lodge under the shadow thereof." In  Luke 8:5 , Luke gives his version of the parable of the Sower, and in  Luke 13:19  of the Mustard Seed. See also  Revelation 19:17, 21 . These constitute all the important references to birds in the Bible, with the exception of a few that seem to belong properly under such subjects as TRAP; NET; CAGE, etc.  Gene Stratton-Porter  BIRDS OF PREY  pra: They were undoubtedly the first birds noticed by the compilers of Biblical records. They were camp followers, swarmed over villages and perched on the walls of cities. They were offensive in manner and odor, and of a boldness unknown to us in birds. They flocked in untold numbers, there was small defense against them, and the largest and strongest not only carried away meat prepared for food and sacrifice, but also preyed upon the much-prized house pigeons, newly born of the smaller animals, and even at times attacked young children. See  Genesis 15:11 , "And the birds of prey came down upon the carcasses, and Abram drove them away." Because they were attracted from above the clouds by anything suitable for food, people recognized that these were birds of unusual vision. When Job wanted to tell how perfectly the path to the gold mine was concealed, he wrote, "That path no bird of prey knoweth" ( Job 28:7 ). The inference is, that, if it were so perfectly concealed that it escaped the piercing eyes of these birds, it was not probable that man would find it. These birds were so strong, fierce and impudent that everyone feared them, and when the prophets gave warning that people would be left for birds of prey to ravage, they fully understood what was meant, and they were afraid ( Isaiah 18:6 ). In His complaint against His heritage, Yahweh questions, "Is my heritage unto me as a speckled bird of prey? are the birds of prey against her round about?" ( Jeremiah 12:9 ). And when he prophesied the destruction of Jerusalem, Jeremiah painted a dreadful picture, but one no doubt often seen in that land of pillage and warfare: "Their dead bodies will I give to be food for the birds of the heavens, and for the beasts of the earth" ( Jeremiah 19:7 ).  Gene Stratton-Porter
BAKBAKKAR|     bak-bak'-ar baqbaqqar, "investigator": A Levite ( 1 Chronicles 9:15 ).
HOBAB|Beloved, the Kenite, has been usually identified with Jethro (q.v.),  Exodus 18:5 , 27; comp.  Numbers 10:29 , 30. In  Judges 4:11 , the word rendered "father-in-law" means properly any male relative by marriage (Comp.  Genesis 19:14 ,  "son-in-law, " A.V.), and should be rendered "brother-in-law," as in the R.V. His descendants followed Israel to Canaan ( Numbers 10:29 ), and at first pitched their tents near Jericho, but afterwards settled in the south in the borders of Arad ( Judges 1:8 -11,  16). 
SAPH|Extension, the son of the giant whom Sibbechai slew ( 2 Samuel 21:18 ); called also Sippai ( 1 Chronicles 20:4 ). 
HEZRO|A Carmelite, one of David's warriors ( 1 Chronicles 11:37 ). 
SHUSHANCHITES|     shoo-shan'-kits (shushanekhaye' (Aramaic); Codex Vaticanus Sousunachaioi; the King James Version Susanchites): Colonists in Samaria whose original home was in Shushan ( Ezra 4:9 ).
PUDENS|Bashful, a Christian at Rome, who sent his greetings to Timothy ( 2 Timothy 4:21 ). (see  CLAUDIA .) 
HEMDAN|     hem'-dan (chemdan, pleasant): A descendant of Seir, the Horite (Genesis 36:26). Wrongly translated Amram by the King James Version in 1 Chronicles 1:41 (the Revised Version (British and American) Hamran), where the transcribers made an error in one vowel and one consonant, writing (chamran), instead of (chemdan). 
CHANAAN|   ; CHANAANITE  ka'-nan, ka'-na-an, ka'-nan-it (Chanaan), the King James Version in the Apocrypha (Judith 5:3, 16) and New Testament ( Acts 7:11 ;  Acts 13:19 ) for the Revised Version (British and American) CANAAN, CANAANITE (which see).
ZAMZUMMIM|     zam-zum'-im (zam-zummim): A race of giants who inhabited the region East of the Jordan afterward occupied by the Ammonites who displaced them. They are identified with the Rephaim ( Deuteronomy 2:20 ). They may be the same as the Zuzim mentioned in connection with the Rephaim in  Genesis 14:5 .  See  REPHAIM .
UNTEMPERED|     un-tem'-perd (taphel): Used of mortar in  Ezekiel 13:10-15 ;  Ezekiel 22:28 . Taphel probably refers to mortar made with clay instead of slaked lime. In the interior of Palestine and Syria walls are still commonly built of small stones or mud bricks, and then smeared over with clay mortar. The surface is rubbed smooth and is attractive in appearance. This coating prolongs the life of the wall but requires yearly attention if the wall is to stand.  Ezekiel uses the practice to typify the work of false prophets. They build up stories and make them plausible by an outward semblance to truth, while, in fact, they are flimsy, unreliable prophecies, resembling the walls described above, which can be broken down by a push or a heavy rain storm.  James A. Patch
BLOODGUILTINESS|     blud-gilt'-i-nes: Found in the King James Version only in  Psalm 51:14 . The Revised Version (British and American) adds  Exodus 22:2, 3   1 Samuel 25:26, 33 .  Ezekiel 18:13  seems to indicate that the phrase does not necessarily signify bloodshed, but any grievous sin which, if it remains, will block God's favor to His land and people (compare  Deuteronomy 21:8   Isaiah 1:15 ).  Psalm 51  is to be interpreted in this light.
MEHETABEL|Wife of Hadad, one of the kings of Edom ( Genesis 36:39 ). 
MILALAI|     mil-a-la'-i, mil'-a-li (milalay): A Levite musician ( Nehemiah 12:36 ).
PETHAHIAH|Loosed of the Lord.  (1.) The chief of one of the priestly courses (the nineteenth) in the time of David ( 1 Chronicles 24:16 ).  (2.) A Levite ( Ezra 10:23 ).  (3.)  Nehemiah 9:5 .  (4.) A descendant of Judah who had some office at the court of Persia ( Nehemiah 11:24 ). 
BINNUI|     bin'-u-i (binnuy, a proper name, "a building up"):  (1) A Levite, living in the time of Ezra ( Ezra 8:33   Nehemiah 10:9 ;  Nehemiah 12:8 ).  (2) One of the bene Pachath-mo'abh who had taken foreign wives ( Ezra 10:30  -Balnuus of 1 Esdras 9:31) and one of the bene Bani ( Ezra 10:38 ) who had also intermarried.  (3) The son of Henadad, who built part of the wall of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 3:24 ), and sealed the covenant with Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 10:9 ). In all probability he is identical with "Bavvai, the son of Henadad" mentioned in  Nehemiah 3:18 . "Bavvai" is either a corruption of "Binnui," or is the name of the Levitical house of which Bavvai was the chief representative. Binnui is mentioned in  Nehemiah 10:9  as a leading Levite, and, besides, the names in these verses are obviously those of priests and Levites; so the former theory is probably correct. (4) Head of a family who returned with Zerubbabel ( Nehemiah 7:15   Ezra 2:10 ).  H. J. Wolf
KADMONITES|Orientals, the name of a Canaanitish tribe which inhabited the north-eastern part of Palestine in the time of Abraham ( Genesis 15:19 ). Probably they were identical with the "children of the east," who inhabited the country between Palestine and the Euphrates. 
JESIAH|     je-si'-a ( 1 Chronicles 23:20  the King James Version).  See  ISSHIAH .
HAMMOLEKETH|The queen, the daughter of Machir and sister of Gilead ( 1 Chronicles 7:17 ,  18). Abiezer was one of her three children. 
ZAAVAN|Terror, one of the "dukes of Edom" ( Genesis 36:27 ); called also Zavan ( 1 Chronicles 1:42 ). 
THINGS|   DETESTABLE,   de-tes'-ta-b'-l, (shiqquts; sheqets, synonymous with to`ebhah, "abomination," "abominable thing"): The translation of shiqqutsim in  Jeremiah 16:18   Ezekiel 5:11 ;  Ezekiel 7:20 ;  Ezekiel 11:18, 21 ; 37:23:00; a term always applied to idol-worship or to objects connected with idolatry; often also translated "abomination," as in  1 Kings 11:5, 7  (bis);  Jeremiah 4:1   Ezekiel 20:7, 8, 30 . Sheqets, translated "abomination," is applied in the Scriptures to that which is ceremonially unclean ( Leviticus 7:21 ), creatures forbidden as food, as water animals without fins or scales in  Leviticus 11:10-12 , birds of prey and the like (verse 18), winged creeping things (verses 20, 23), creeping vermin (verses 41). Compare also  Isaiah 66:17 . By partaking of the food of the animals in question one makes himself detestable ( Leviticus 11:43 ;  Leviticus 20:25 ). Similarly the idolatrous appurtenances are to be held in detestation; nothing of the kind should be appropriated for private use ( Deuteronomy 7:26 ). See  ABOMINATION .  Max L. Margolis  DEVOTED, THINGS  de-vot'-ed, (cherem).  See  CURSE ;  DEDICATE .  HIGH THINGS  The translation of hupselos, "high," "lofty," "elevated" ( Romans 12:16 , "Mind not high things, but condescend to men of low estate," the King James Version margin "be contented with mean things," the Revised Version (British and American) "Set not your mind on high things, but condescend to (margin "Greek: be carried away with") things (margin "them") that are lowly"); high things are proud things, things regarded by the world as high.  High thing is hupsoma, "a high place," "elevation," etc. ( 2 Corinthians 10:5 , "casting down every high thing that is exalted against the knowledge of God," "like a lofty tower or fortress built up proudly by the enemy"). In APC Judith 10:8; 13:4, hupsoma is rendered "exaltation."  W. L. Walker
GRIEVOUSLY|   GRIEVOUS; ; GREIEVOUSNESS  grev'-us; grev'-us-li; grev'-us-nes: In addition to several of the words mentioned under GRIEF (which see), we have kabhedh ("heavy") 8 t, e.g.  Genesis 12:10 , "The famine was grievous in the land," the Revised Version (British and American) "sore"; marats ("powerful"), "a grievous curse" ( 1 Kings 2:8 ); cur, "to turn aside" ( Jeremiah 6:28 ), "grievous revolters"; qasheh, "to make sharp" ( 1 Kings 12:4   2 Chronicles 10:4 ); tachalu'im ( Jeremiah 16:4 ), "They shall die grievous deaths," the Revised Version, margin "deaths of sicknesses"; `athaq ( Psalm 31:18 ), "which speak grievous things proudly," the Revised Version (British and American) "against the righteous insolently"; cheT, "sin" ( Lamentations 1:8 ), "Jerus hath grievously sinned" (literally, "hath sinned a sin"); ma`al, "trespass" ( Ezekiel 14:13 ), "trespassing grievously" (literally, "trespassing a trespass") the Revised Version (British and American) "committing a trespass"; kobhedh, "weight" ( Isaiah 21:15 ), "grievousness"; barus, "heavy," "grievous wolves" ( Acts 20:29 ), "grievous charges" ( Acts 25:7 ), "His commandments are not grievous" (1  John 5:3 ); okneros, the Revised Version (British and American) "irksome" ( Philippians 3:1 ); poneros, "evil" ( Revelation 16:2 ), "a grievous sore"; dusbastaktos, "grievous to be borne" ( Matthew 23:4   Luke 11:46 ); deinos, "greatly," "grievously tormented" ( Matthew 8:6 ); kakos, "badly," "grievously vexed" ( Matthew 15:22 ).  W. L. Walker
BILDAD|Son of contention, one of Job's friends. He is called "the Shuhite," probably as belonging to Shuah, a district in Arabia, in which Shuah, the sixth son of Abraham by Keturah, settled ( Genesis 25:2 ). He took part in each of the three controversies into which Job's friends entered with him ( Job 8:1 ;  18:1 ;  25:1 ), and delivered three speeches, very severe and stern in their tone, although less violent than those of Zophar, but more so than those of Eliphaz. 
CHIMHAM|Pining, probably the youngest son of Barzillai the Gileadite ( 2 Samuel 19:37 -40). The "habitation of Chimham" ( Jeremiah 41:17 ) was probably an inn or khan, which is the proper meaning of the Hebrew geruth, rendered "habitation", established in later times in his possession at Bethlehem, which David gave to him as a reward for his loyalty in accompanying him to Jerusalem after the defeat of Absalom ( 1 Kings 2:7 ). It has been supposed that, considering the stationary character of Eastern institutions, it was in the stable of this inn or caravanserai that our Saviour was born ( Luke 2:7 ). 
STONESQUARERS|   STONE-SQUARERS  ston'-skwar-erz: the King James Version in  1 Kings 5:18 ; the Revised Version (British and American) "the Gebalites" (which see).
JARED|Descent.  (1.) The fourth antediluvian patriarch in descent from Seth ( Genesis 5:15 -20;  Luke 3:37 ), the father of Enoch; called Jered in  1 Chronicles 1:2 . (2.) A son of Ezra probably ( 1 Chronicles 4:18 ). 
BETHARAM|House of the height; i.e., "mountain-house", one of the towns of Gad, 3 miles east of Jordan, opposite Jericho ( Joshua 13:27 ). Probably the same as Beth-haran in  Numbers 32:36 . It was called by king Herod, Julias, or Livias, after Livia, the wife of Augustus. It is now called Beit-haran. 
SECACAH|Enclosure, one of the six cities in the wilderness of Judah, noted for its "great cistern" ( Joshua 15:61 ). It has been identified with the ruin Sikkeh, east of Bethany. 
MEHUMAN|Faithful, one of the eunchs whom Ahasuerus (Xerxes) commanded to bring in Vashti ( Esther 1:10 ). 
SENAAH|Thorny, a place many of the inhabitants of which returned from Babylon with Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:35 ;  Nehemiah 7:38 ). 
BAALHANAN|Lord of grace.  (1.) A king of Edom, son of Achbor ( Genesis 36:38 ,  39;  1 Chronicles 1:49 ,  50). (2.) An overseer of "the olive trees and sycomore trees in the low plains" (the Shephelah) under David ( 1 Chronicles 27:28 ). 
DIKLAH|     dik'-la (diqlah, "place of palms"): One of the "sons" of Joktan ( Genesis 10:27   1 Chronicles 1:21 ). Perhaps a south-Arabian tribal or place-name connected with a palm-bearing district.
GATHHEPHER|Wine-press of the well, a town of Lower Galilee, about 5 miles from Nazareth; the birthplace of Jonah ( 2 Kings 14:25 ); the same as Gittah-hepher ( Joshua 19:13 ). It has been identified with the modern el-Meshed, a village on the top of a rocky hill. Here the supposed tomb of Jonah, Neby Yunas, is still pointed out. 
HORITE|   ; HORIM  ho'-rit, ho'-rim (chori, chorim; Chorraioi): Denoted the inhabitants of Mt. Seir before its occupation by the Edomites ( Deuteronomy 2:12 ). Seir is accordingly called Horite in  Genesis 36:20, 30 , where a list of his descendants is given, who afterward mixed with the invading Edomites. Esau himself married the daughter of the Horite chieftain Anah ( Genesis 36:25 ; see 36:2, where "Hivite" must be corrected into "Horite"). The "Horites" in their "Mt. Seir" were among the nations defeated by the army of Chedorlaomer in the age of Abraham ( Genesis 14:6 ). The Hebrew Horitc, however, is the Khar of the Egyptian inscriptions, a name given to the whole of Southern Palestine and Edom as well as to the adjacent sea. In accordance with this we find in the Old Testament also traces of the existence of the Horites in other parts of the country besides Mt. Seir. In  Genesis 34:2   Joshua 9:7 , the Septuagint (Cod. A) more correctly reads "Horite" instead of "Hivite" for the inhabitants of Shechem and Gibeon, and Caleb is said to be "the son of Hur, the first-born of Ephratah" or Bethlehem ( 1 Chronicles 2:50 ;  1 Chronicles 4:4 ). Hor or Horite has sometimes been explained to mean "cave-dweller"; it more probably, however, denotes the "white" race. The Horites were Semites, and consequently are distinguished in  Deuteronomy 2:12  from the tall race of Rephaim.  A. H. Sayce
SHUPHAM|   ; SHUPHAMITES  shoo'-fam, shoo'-fam-its.  See  SHEPHUPHAM .
TACHMONITE|=Hach'monite, a name given to Jashobeam ( 2 Samuel 23:8 ; Comp.  1 Chronicles 11:11 ). 
SAREPTA|( Luke 4:26 ). See ZAREPHATH. 
SHAMSHERAI|     sham'-she-ri, sham-she-ra'-i (shamsheray): A Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 8:26 ).
BETHPAZZEZ|   BETH-PAZZEZ  beth-paz'-ez (beth patstsets; Bersaphes, Baithphrasee): A town in the territory of Issachar, named with En-gannim and En-haddah ( Joshua 19:21 ). The site has not been discovered; it probably lay near the modern Jenin.
GIBEONITES|     gib'-e-un-its. Inhabitants of GIBEON (which see).
SHELOMI|     she-lo'-mi, shel'-o-mi (shelomi): An Asherite ( Numbers 34:27 ).
ISHBAAL|     ish'-ba-al.  See  ISH-BOSHETH .
ZAANANNIM|=Zaanaim, ( Joshua 19:33 ). 
HAREPH|     ha'-ref (chareph, "scornful"): A chief of Judah, one of the sons of Caleb and father of Beth-gader ( 1 Chronicles 2:51 ). A quite similar name, Hariph, occurs in  Nehemiah 7:24 ;  Nehemiah 10:19 , but it is probably that of another individual.
SUSANNA|Lily, with other pious women, ministered to Jesus ( Luke 8:3 ). 
SCHOOLS|Schools of the Prophets ( 1 Samuel 19:18 -24;  2 Kings 2:3 ,  5,  7,  12,  15) were instituted for the purpose of training young men for the prophetical and priestly offices. (see  PROPHET ; SAMUEL.) 
ISHMA|     ish'-ma (yishma', from the root yasham, "to lie waste," therefore meaning "desolate"): A brother of Jezreel and Idbash, "the sons of the father of Etam" ( 1 Chronicles 4:3 ). They were brothers of Hazzelelponi.
CHARASHIM|Craftsmen, a valley named in  1 Chronicles 4:14 . In  Nehemiah 11:35  the Hebrew word is rendered "valley of craftsmen" (R.V. marg.,  Geha-rashim). Nothing is known of it. 
HAMONAH|Multitude, a name figuratively assigned to the place in which the slaughter and burial of the forces of Gog were to take place ( Ezek. 39:16 ). 
CAIAPHAS|The Jewish high priest (A.D. 27-36) at the beginning of our Lord's public ministry, in the reign of Tiberius ( Luke 3:2 ), and also at the time of his condemnation and crucifixion ( Matthew 26:3 , 57;  John 11:49 ;  18:13 ,  14). He held this office during the whole of Pilate's administration. His wife was the daughter of Annas, who had formerly been high priest, and was probably the vicar or deputy (Hebrews sagan) of Caiaphas. He was of the sect of the Sadducees ( Acts 5:17 ), and was a member of the council when he gave his opinion that Jesus should be put to death "for the people, and that the whole nation perish not" ( John 11:50 ). In these words he unconsciously uttered a prophecy. "Like Saul, he was a prophet in spite of himself." Caiaphas had no power to inflict the punishment of death, and therefore Jesus was sent to Pilate, the Roman governor, that he might duly pronounce the sentence against him ( Matthew 27:2 ;  John 18:28 ). At a later period his hostility to the gospel is still manifest ( Acts 4:6 ). (see  ANNAS .) 
JEHOADDAH|   ; JEHOADAH  je-ho-ad'-a (Revised Version (British and American)), je-ho'-a-da (the King James Version) (yeho`addah, "Yah has deposed" or "numbered"): A descendant of King Saul ( 1 Chronicles 8:36 ), called "Jarah" in  1 Chronicles 9:42 , where the Septuagint has Iada = ya`dah.  See  JARAH .
LUBIMS|The inhabitants of a thirsty or scorched land; the Lybians, an African nation under tribute to Egypt ( 2 Chronicles 12:3 ;  16:8 ). Their territory was apparently near Egypt. They were probably the Mizraite Lehabim. 
FRIENDS|   CHIEF ; GOOD MEN  See  CHIEF FRIENDS ;  GOOD, CHIEF ; CHIEF.  FRIENDS; CHIEF FRIENDS  (hoi philoi proton): Expressions used in 1 and 2 Maccabees to designate the favored courtiers of the Antiochi. Mattathias is promised enrollment among the king's Friends, to tempt him to apostatize (1 Maccabees 2:18); Alexander Balas writes Jonathan among his Chief Friends (1 Maccabees 10:65). Compare also 1 Maccabees 3:38; 6:10, 14; 0.458333333; 11:26, 27; 2 Maccabees 8:9.
RAKKATH|Shore-town, a "fenced city" of the tribe of Naphtali ( Joshua 19:35 ). The old name of Tiberias, according to the Rabbins. 
KOHATH|Assembly, the second son of Levi, and father of Amram ( Genesis 46:11 ). He came down to Egypt with Jacob, and lived to the age of one hundred and thirty-three years ( Exodus 6:18 ). 
SODI|     so'-di (codhi): One of the spies, representing the tribe of Zebulun ( Numbers 13:10 ).
SHIHOR|Dark, ( 1 Chronicles 13:5 ), the southwestern boundary of Canaan, the Wady el-`Arish. (see  SIHOR ; NILE.) 
MALCHIELITES|     mal'-ki-el-its (malki'eli): Descendants of Malchiel ( Numbers 26:45 ).
NERI|     ne'-ri ((Nerei (Tisch., Treg., Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek), Textus Receptus of the New Testament, Neri; for Hebrew neriyah): The name of an ancestor of Jesus, the grandfather of Zerubbabel ( Luke 3:27 ).  See  NERIAH .
MISREPHOTHMAIM|Burning of waters, supposed to be salt-pans, or lime-kilns, or glass-factories, a place to which Joshua pursued a party of Canaanites after the defeat of Jabin ( Joshua 11:8 ). It is identified with the ruin Musheirifeh, at the promontory of en-Nakhurah, some 11 miles north of Acre. 
JAHZEELITES|   , THE  ja'-ze-el-its (hayachtse'eli, coll. with article): In  Numbers 26:48 , descendants of the clan of Jahzeel.
THIMNATHAH|     thim'-na-tha, thim-na'-tha (timnathah): the King James Version in  Joshua 19:43 . It is correctly "Timnah" with Heb locale meaning "towed Timnah."  See  TIMNAH .
WAW|     waw "w": The sixth letter of the Hebrew alphabet; transliterated in this Encyclopedia "w" (or "v"). It came also to be used for the number 6. For name, etc., see ALPHABET.
SOTAI|     so'-ti, so'-ta-i, so-ta'-i (coTay): One of those who returned from captivity, being descendants of Solomon's servants ( Ezra 2:55   Nehemiah 7:57 ).
LUBIM|     lu'-bim (lubhim): A people mentioned in the Old Testament ( 2 Chronicles 12:3 ;  2 Chronicles 16:8   Daniel 11:43   Nahum 3:9 ). In all these cases the word is translated in the King James Version "Libyans"; in the Revised Version (British and American) only in  Daniel 11:43 . The people so named had their seat in North Africa, West of Egypt (compare  Acts 2:10 , "the parts of Libya about Cyrene"). See  LIBYA . On three different occasions the Libyans invaded Egypt, and at length, in the 10th century B.C., succeeded in founding an Egyptian dynasty under SHISHAK (which see).
TAMAH|     ta'-ma.  See  TEMAH .
HUZ|     huz ( Genesis 22:21  the King James Version).  See  UZ .
ZARTHAN|A place near Succoth, in the plain of the Jordan, "in the clay ground," near which Hiram cast the brazen utensils for the temple ( 1 Kings 7:46 ); probably the same as Zartan. It is also called Zeredathah ( 2 Chronicles 4:17 ). (see  ZEREDA .) 
RODANIM|     rod'-a-nim: The reading of Massoretic Text in  1 Chronicles 1:7  for the DODANIM (which see) of  Genesis 10:4 , corresponding to the Rhodioi of the Septuagint in both passages. The Rodanim are generally identified as inhabitants of the island of RHODES (which see), well known to the ancient Phoenicians (Homer's Iliad).
BAALIS|King of the Ammonites at the time of the Babylonian captivity ( Jeremiah 40:14 ). He hired Ishmael to slay Gedaliah who had been appointed governor over the cities of Judah. 
HEBRON|A community; alliance.  (1.) A city in the south end of the valley of Eshcol, about midway between Jerusalem and Beersheba, from which it is distant about 20 miles in a straight line. It was built "seven years before Zoan in Egypt" ( Genesis 13:18 ;  Numbers 13:22 ). It still exists under the same name, and is one of the most ancient cities in the world. Its earlier name was Kirjath-arba ( Genesis 23:2 ;  Joshua 14:15 ;  15:3 ). But "Hebron would appear to have been the original name of the city, and it was not till after Abraham's stay there that it received the name Kirjath-arba, who [i.e., Arba] was not the founder but the conqueror of the city, having led thither the tribe of the Anakim, to which he belonged. It retained this name till it came into the possession of Caleb, when the Israelites restored the original name Hebron" (Keil,  Com.). The name of this city does not occur in any of the prophets or in the New Testament. It is found about forty times in the Old. It was the favorite home of Abraham. Here he pitched his tent under the oaks of Mamre, by which name it came afterwards to be known; and here Sarah died, and was buried in the cave of Machpelah ( Genesis 23:17 -20), which he bought from Ephron the Hittite. From this place the patriarch departed for Egypt by way of Beersheba ( 37:14 ;  46:1 ). It was taken by Joshua and given to Caleb ( Joshua 10:36 ,  37;  12:10 ;  14:13 ). It became a Levitical city and a city of refuge ( 20:7 ;  21:11 ). When David became king of Judah this was his royal residence, and he resided here for seven and a half years ( 2 Samuel 5:5 ); and here he was anointed as king over all Israel ( 2 Samuel 2:1 -4,  11;  1 Kings 2:11 ). It became the residence also of the rebellious Absalom ( 2 Samuel 15:10 ), who probably expected to find his chief support in the tribe of Judah, now called el-Khulil. In one part of the modern city is a great mosque, which is built over the grave of Machpelah. The first European who was permitted to enter this mosque was the Prince of Wales in 1862. It was also visited by the Marquis of Bute in 1866, and by the late Emperor Frederick of Germany (then Crown-Prince of Prussia) in 1869. One of the largest oaks in Palestine is found in the valley of Eshcol, about 3 miles north of the town. It is supposed by some to be the tree under which Abraham pitched his tent, and is called "Abraham's oak." (see  OAK .) (2.) The third son of Kohath the Levite ( Exodus 6:18 ;  1 Chronicles 6:2 ,  18). (3.)  1 Chronicles 2:42 , 43. (4.) A town in the north border of Asher ( Joshua 19:28 ). 
MAKTESH|Mortar, a place in or near Jerusalem inhabited by silver merchants ( Zephaniah 1:11 ). It has been conjectured that it was the "Phoenician quarter" of the city, where the traders of that nation resided, after the Oriental custom. 
PHURAH|     fu'-ra (purah, "branch").  See  PURAH .
KEDEMOTH|Beginnings; easternmost, a city of Reuben, assigned to the Levites of the family of Merari ( Joshua 13:18 ). It lay not far north-east of Dibon-gad, east of the Dead Sea. 
DAVID|Beloved, the eighth and youngest son of Jesse, a citizen of Bethlehem. His father seems to have been a man in humble life. His mother's name is not recorded. Some think she was the Nahash of  2 Samuel 17:25 . As to his personal appearance, we only know that he was red-haired, with beautiful eyes and a fair face ( 1 Samuel 16:12 ;  17:42 ). His early occupation was that of tending his father's sheep on the uplands of Judah. From what we know of his after history, doubtless he frequently beguiled his time, when thus engaged, with his shepherd's flute, while he drank in the many lessons taught him by the varied scenes spread around him. His first recorded exploits were his encounters with the wild beasts of the field. He mentions that with his own unaided hand he slew a lion and also a bear, when they came out against his flock, beating them to death in open conflict with his club ( 1 Samuel 17:34 ,  35). While David, in the freshness of ruddy youth, was thus engaged with his flocks, Samuel paid an unexpected visit to Bethlehem, having been guided thither by divine direction ( 1 Samuel 16:1 -13). There he offered up sacrifice, and called the elders of Israel and Jesse's family to the sacrificial meal. Among all who appeared before him he failed to discover the one he sought. David was sent for, and the prophet immediately recognized him as the chosen of God, chosen to succeed Saul, who was now departing from the ways of God, on the throne of the kingdom. He accordingly, in anticipation, poured on his head the anointing oil. David went back again to his shepherd life, but "the Spirit of the Lord came upon David from that day forward," and "the Spirit of the Lord departed from Saul" ( 1 Samuel 16:13 ,  14). Not long after this David was sent for to soothe with his harp the troubled spirit of Saul, who suffered from a strange melancholy dejection. He played before the king so skilfully that Saul was greatly cheered, and began to entertain great affection for the young shepherd. After this he went home to Bethlehem. But he soon again came into prominence. The armies of the Philistines and of Israel were in battle array in the valley of Elah, some 16 miles south-west of Bethlehem; and David was sent by his father with provisions for his three brothers, who were then fighting on the side of the king. On his arrival in the camp of Israel, David (now about twenty years of age) was made aware of the state of matters when the champion of the Philistines, Goliath of Gath, came forth to defy Israel. David took his sling, and with a well-trained aim threw a stone "out of the brook," which struck the giant's forehead, so that he fell senseless to the ground. David then ran and slew him, and cut off his head with his own sword ( 1 Samuel 17 ). The result was a great victory to the Israelites, who pursued the Philistines to the gates of Gath and Ekron. David's popularity consequent on this heroic exploit awakened Saul's jealousy ( 1 Samuel 18:6 -16), which he showed in various ways. He conceived a bitter hatred toward him, and by various stratagems sought his death ( 1 Samuel 18 -30). The deep-laid plots of the enraged king, who could not fail to observe that David "prospered exceedingly," all proved futile, and only endeared the young hero the more to the people, and very specially to Jonathan, Saul's son, between whom and David a life-long warm friendship was formed. A fugitive. To escape from the vengeance of Saul, David fled to Ramah ( 1 Samuel 19:12 -18) to Samuel, who received him, and he dwelt among the sons of the prophets, who were there under Samuel's training. It is supposed by some that the sixth, seventh, and eleventh Psalms were composed by him at this time. This place was only 3 miles from the residence of Saul, who soon discovered whither the fugitive had gone, and tried ineffectually to bring him back. Jonathan made a fruitless effort to bring his father to a better state of mind toward David ( 1 Samuel 20 ), who, being made aware of the fact, saw no hope of safety but in flight to a distance. We accordingly find him first at Nob ( 21:1 -9) and then at Gath, the chief city of the Philistines. The king of the Philistines would not admit him into his service, as he expected that he would, and David accordingly now betook himself to the stronghold of Adullam ( 22:1 -4;  1 Chronicles 12:8 -18). Here in a short time 400 men gathered around him and acknowledged him as their leader. It was at this time that David, amid the harassment and perils of his position, cried, "Oh that one would give me drink of the water of the well of Bethlehem;" when three of his heroes broke through the lines of the Philistines and brought him the water for which he longed ( 2 Samuel 23:13 -17), but which he would not drink. In his rage at the failure of all his efforts to seize David, Saul gave orders for the massacre of the entire priestly family at Nob, "persons who wore a linen ephod", to the number of eighty-five persons, who were put to death by Doeg the Edomite. The sad tidings of the massacre were brought to David by Abiathar, a son of Ahimelech, the only one who escaped. Comp.  Psalm 52 . Hearing that Keilah, a town on the western frontier, was harassed by the Philistines, David with his men relieved it ( 1 Samuel 23:1 -14); and then, for fear of Saul, he fled to the strongholds in the "hill country" of Judah. Comp.  Psalm 31 . While encamped there, in the forest in the district of Ziph, he was visited by Jonathan, who spoke to him words of encouragement ( 23:16 -18). The two now parted never to meet again. Saul continued his pursuit of David, who narrowly escaped from him at this time, and fled to the crags and ravines of Engedi, on the western shore of the Dead Sea ( 1 Samuel 23:29 ). Here Saul, who still pursued him with his army, narrowly escaped, through the generous forbearance of David, and was greatly affected by what David had done for him. He returned home from pursuing him, and David betook himself to Maon, where, with his 600 men, he maintained himself by contributions gathered from the district. Here occurred the incident connected with Nabal and his wife Abigail ( 1 Samuel 25 ), whom David married after Nabal's death. Saul again went forth ( 1 Samuel 26 ) in pursuit of David, who had hid himself "in the hill Hachilah, which is before Jeshimon," in the wilderness of Ziph, and was a second time spared through his forbearance. He returned home, professing shame and penitence for the way in which he had treated David, and predicting his elevation to the throne. Fighting against Israel. Harassed by the necessity of moving from place to place through fear of Saul, David once more sought refuge among the Philistines ( 1 Samuel 27 ). He was welcomed by the king, who assigned him Ziklag as his residence. Here David lived among his followers for some time as an independent chief engaged in frequent war with the Amalekites and other tribes on the south of Judah. Achish summoned David with his men to join his army against Saul; but the lords of the Philistines were suspicious of David's loyalty, and therefore he was sent back to Ziklag, which he found to his dismay may had been pillaged and burnt during his brief absence. David pursued after the raiders, the Amalekites, and completely routed them. On his return to Ziklag tidings reached him of Saul's death ( 2 Samuel 1 ). An Amalekite brought Saul's crown and bracelet and laid them at his feet. David and his men rent their clothes and mourned for Saul, who had been defeated in battle near Mount Gilboa. David composed a beautiful elegy, the most beautiful of all extant Hebrew odes, a "lamentation over Saul and over Jonathan his son" ( 2 Samuel 1:18 -27). It bore the title of "The Bow," and was to be taught to the children, that the memory of Saul and Jonathan might be preserved among them. "Behold, it is written in the book of Jasher" (q.v.). David king over Judah. David and his men now set out for Hebron under divine direction ( 2 Samuel 2:1 -4). There they were cordially welcomed, and he was at once anointed as king. He was now about thirty years of age. But his title to the throne was not undisputed. Abner took Ish-bosheth, Saul's only remaining son, over the Jordan to Mahanaim, and there crowned him as king. Then began a civil war in Israel. The first encounter between the two opposing armies, led on the one side by Abner, and on the other by Joab, took place at the pool of Gibeon. It resulted in the defeat of Abner. Other encounters, however, between Israel and Judah followed ( 2 Samuel 3:1 ,  5), but still success was on the side of David. For the space of seven and a half years David reigned in Hebron. Abner now sided with David, and sought to promote his advancement; but was treacherously put to death by Joab in revenge for his having slain his brother Asahel at Gibeon ( 3:22 -39). This was greatly to David's regret. He mourned for the death of Abner. Shortly after this Ish-bosheth was also treacherously put to death by two Canaanites of Beeroth; and there being now no rival, David was anointed king over all Israel ( 4:1 -12). David king over all Israel ( 2 Samuel 5:1 -5;  1 Chronicles 11:1 -3). The elders of Israel now repaired to Hebron and offered allegiance to David in name of all the people, among whom the greatest enthusiasm prevailed. He was anointed king over all Israel, and sought out a new seat of government, more suitable than Hebron, as the capital of his empire. At this time there was a Jebusite fortress, "the stronghold", on the hill of Zion, called also Jebus. This David took from the Jebusites, and made it Israel's capital, and established here his residence, and afterwards built for himself a palace by the aid of Tyrian tradesmen. The Philistines, who had for some time observed a kind of truce, now made war against David; but were defeated in battle at a place afterwards called, in remembrance of the victory, Baal-perazim. Again they invaded the land, and were a second time routed by him. He thus delivered Israel from their enemies. David now resolved to bring up the ark of the covenant to his new capital ( 2 Samuel 6 ). It was in the house of Abinadab at Kirjath-jearim, about 7 miles from Jerusalem, where it had been for many years, from the time when the Philistines had sent it home ( 1 Samuel 6 ; 7). In consequence of the death of Uzzah (for it was a divine ordinance that only the Levites should handle the ark,   Numbers 4 ), who had put forth his hand to steady the ark when the cart in which it was being conveyed shook by reason of the roughness of the road, David stayed the procession, and conveyed the ark into the house of Obed-edom, a Philistine from Gath. After three months David brought the ark from the house of Obed-edom up to Jerusalem. Comp.  Psalm 24 . Here it was placed in a new tent or tabernacle which David erected for the purpose. About seventy years had passed since it had stood in the tabernacle at Shiloh. The old tabernacle was now at Gibeah, at which Zadok ministered. David now ( 1 Chronicles 16 ) carefully set in order all the ritual of divine worship at Jerusalem, along with Abiathar the high priest. A new religious era began. The service of praise was for the first time introduced into public worship. Zion became henceforth "God's holy hill." David's wars. David now entered on a series of conquests which greatly extended and strengthened his kingdom ( 2 Samuel 8 ). In a few years the whole territory from the Euphrates to the river of Egypt, and from Gaza on the west to Thapsacus on the east, was under his sway ( 2 Samuel 8:3 -13; 10). David's fall. He had now reached the height of his glory. He ruled over a vast empire, and his capital was enriched with the spoils of many lands. But in the midst of all this success he fell, and his character became stained with the sin of adultery ( 2 Samuel 11:2 -27). It has been noted as characteristic of the Bible that while his military triumphs are recorded in a few verses, the sad story of his fall is given in detail, a story full of warning, and therefore recorded. This crime, in the attempt to conceal it, led to anoter. He was guilty of murder. Uriah, whom he had foully wronged, an officer of the Gibborim, the corps of heros ( 23:39 ), was, by his order, "set in the front of the hottest battle" at the siege of Rabbah, in order that he might be put to death. Nathan the prophet ( 2 Samuel 7:1 -17;  12:1 -23) was sent by God to bring home his crimes to the conscience of the guilty monarch. He became a true penitent. He bitterly bewailed his sins before God. The thirty-second and fifty-first Psalms reveal the deep struggles of his soul, and his spiritual recovery. Bathsheba became his wife after Uriah's death. Her first-born son died, according to the word of the prophet. She gave birth to a second son, whom David called Solomon, and who ultimately succeeded him on the throne ( 2 Samuel 12:24 ,  25). Peace. After the successful termination of all his wars, David formed the idea of building a temple for the ark of God. This he was not permitted to carry into execution, because he had been a man of war. God, however, sent Nathan to him with a gracious message ( 2 Samuel 7:1 -16). On receiving it he went into the sanctuary, the tent where the ark was, and sat before the Lord, and poured out his heart in words of devout thanksgiving (18-29). The building of the temple was reserved for his son Solomon, who would be a man of peace ( 1 Chronicles 22:9 ;  28:3 ). A cloudy evening. Hitherto David's carrer had been one of great prosperity and success. Now cloudy and dark days came. His eldest son Amnon, whose mother was Ahinoam of Jezreel, was guilty of a great and shameful crime ( 2 Samuel 13 ). This was the beginning of the disasters of his later years. After two years Absalom terribly avenged the crime against Tamar, and put Amnon to death. This brought sore trouble to David's heart. Absalom, afraid of the consequences of his guilt, fled to Geshur beyond Jordan, where he remained for three years, when he was brought back through the intrigue of Joab ( 2 Samuel 14 ). After this there fell upon the land the calamity of three years' famine ( 2 Samuel 21:1 -14). This was soon after followed by a pestilence, brought upon the land as a punishment for David's sinful pride in numbering the people ( 2 Samuel 24 ), in which no fewer than 70,000 perished in the space of three days. Rebellion of Absalom. The personal respect for David was sadly lowered by the incident of Bathsheba. There was a strong popular sentiment against the taking of the census, and the outburst of the plague in connection with it deepened the feeling of jealously that had begun to manifest itself among some of the tribes against David. Absalom, taking full advantage of this state of things, gradually gained over the people, and at length openly rebelled against his father, and usurped the throne. Ahithophel was Absalom's chief counsellor. The revolt began in Hebron, the capital of Judah. Absalom was there proclaimed king. David was now in imminent danger, and he left Jerusalem ( 2 Samuel 15:13 -20), and once more became a fugitive. It was a momentous day in Israel. The incidents of it are recorded with a fulness of detail greater than of any other day in Old Testament history. David fled with his followers to Mahanarm, on the east of Jordan. An unnatural civil war broke out. After a few weeks the rival armies were mustered and organized. They met in hostile array at the wood of Ephraim ( 2 Samuel 18:1 -8). Absalom's army was defeated, and himself put to death by the hand of Joab (9-18). The tidings of the death of his rebellious son filled the heart of David with the most poignant grief. He "went up to the chamber over the gate, and wept" (33), giving utterance to the heart-broken cry, "Would God I had died for thee, O Absalom, my son, my son!" Peace was now restored, and David returned to Jerusalem and resumed the direction of affairs. An unhappy dispute arose between the men of Judah and the men of Israel ( 19:41 -43). Sheba, a Benjamite, headed a revolt of the men of Israel. He was pursued to Abelbeth-maachah, and was there put to death, and so the revolt came to an end. The end. After the suppression of the rebellion of Absalom and that of Sheba, ten comparatively peaceful years of David's life passed away. During those years he seems to have been principally engaged in accumulating treasures of every kind for the great temple at Jerusalem, which it was reserved to his successor to build ( 1 Chronicles 22 ; 28; 29), a house which was to be "exceeding magnifical, of fame and of glory throughout all countries" ( 22:5 ). The exciting and laborious life he had spent, and the dangers and trials through which he had passed, had left him an enfeebled man, prematurely old. It became apparent that his life was now drawing to its close. A new palace conspiracy broke out as to who should be his successor. Joab favoured Adonijah. The chiefs of his party met at the "Fuller's spring," in the valley of Kidron, to proclaim him king; but Nathan hastened on a decision on the part of David in favour of Solomon, and so the aim of Adonijah's party failed. Solomon was brought to Jerusalem, and was anointed king and seated on his father's throne ( 1 Kings 1:11 -53). David's last words are a grand utterance, revealing his unfailing faith in God, and his joyful confidence in his gracious covenant promises ( 2 Samuel 23:1 -7). After a reign of forty years and six months ( 2 Samuel 5:5 ;  1 Chronicles 3:4 ) David died (B.C. 1015) at the age of seventy years, "and was buried in the city of David." His tomb is still pointed out on Mount Zion. Both in his prophetical and in his regal character David was a type of the Messiah ( 1 Samuel 16:13 ). The book of Psalms commonly bears the title of the "Psalms of David," from the circumstance that he was the largest contributor (about eighty psalms) to the collection. (see  PSALMS .) "The greatness of David was felt when he was gone. He had lived in harmony with both the priesthood and the prophets; a sure sign that the spirit of his government had been throughly loyal to the higher aims of the theocracy. The nation had not been oppressed by him, but had been left in the free enjoyment of its ancient liberties. As far as his power went he had striven to act justly to all ( 2 Samuel 8:15 ). His weak indulgence to his sons, and his own great sin besides, had been bitterly atoned, and were forgotten at his death in the remembrance of his long-tried worth. He had reigned thirty-three years in Jerusalem and seven and a half at Hebron ( 2 Samuel 5:5 ). Israel at his accession had reached the lowest point of national depression; its new-born unity rudely dissolved; its territory assailed by the Philistines. But he had left it an imperial power, with dominions like those of Egypt or Assyria. The sceptre of Solomon was already, before his father's death, owned from the Mediterranean to the Euphrates, and from the Orontes to the Red Sea.", Geikie's Hours etc., iii. David, City of (1.) David took from the Jebusites the fortress of Mount Zion. He "dwelt in the fort, and called it the city of David" ( 1 Chronicles 11:7 ). This was the name afterwards given to the castle and royal palace on Mount Zion, as distinguished from Jerusalem generally ( 1 Kings 3:1 ;  8:1 ), It was on the south-west side of Jerusalem, opposite the temple mount, with which it was connected by a bridge over the Tyropoeon valley. (2) Bethlehem is called the "city of David" ( Luke 2:4 ,  11), because it was David's birth-place and early home ( 1 Samuel 17:12 ).
KERIOTH|Cities.  (1.) A town in the south of Judah ( Joshua 15:25 ). Judas the traitor was probably a native of this place, and hence his name Iscariot. It has been identified with the ruins of el-Kureitein, about 10 miles south of Hebron. (see  HAZOR  ). (2.) A city of Moab ( Jeremiah 48:24 ,  41), called Kirioth ( Amos 2:2 ). 
SHIMEAM|     shim'-e-am.  See  SHIMEAH .
JUNIA|( Romans 16:7 ), a Christian at Rome to whom Paul sends salutations along with Andronicus. 
MAADIAH|     ma-a-di'-a (ma`adhyah, "whose ornament is Jah"): A priest who returned with Zerubbabel ( Nehemiah 12:5 ). The name also occurs in the form "Moadiah" ( Nehemiah 12:17 ).
SINAI|Of Sin (the moon god), called also Horeb, the name of the mountain district which was reached by the Hebrews in the third month after the Exodus. Here they remained encamped for about a whole year. Their journey from the Red Sea to this encampment, including all the windings of the route, was about 150 miles. The last twenty-two chapters of Exodus, together with the whole of Leviticus and  Numbers 1 -11, contain a record of all the transactions which occurred while they were here. From Rephidim ( Exodus 17:8 -13) the Israelites journeyed forward through the Wady Solaf and Wady esh-Sheikh into the plain of er-Rahah, "the desert of Sinai," about 2 miles long and half a mile broad, and encamped there "before the mountain." The part of the mountain range, a protruding lower bluff, known as the Ras Sasafeh (Sufsafeh), rises almost perpendicularly from this plain, and is in all probability the Sinai of history. Dean Stanley thus describes the scene:, "The plain itself is not broken and uneven and narrowly shut in, like almost all others in the range, but presents a long retiring sweep, within which the people could remove and stand afar off. The cliff, rising like a huge altar in front of the whole congregation, and visible against the sky in lonely grandeur from end to end of the whole plain, is the very image of the `mount that might be touched,' and from which the voice of God might be heard far and wide over the plain below." This was the scene of the giving of the law. From the Ras Sufsafeh the law was proclaimed to the people encamped below in the plain of er-Rahah. During the lengthened period of their encampment here the Israelites passed through a very memorable experience. An immense change passed over them. They are now an organized nation, bound by covenant engagement to serve the Lord their God, their ever-present divine Leader and Protector. At length, in the second month of the second year of the Exodus, they move their camp and march forward according to a prescribed order. After three days they reach the "wilderness of Paran," the "et-Tih", i.e., "the desert", and here they make their first encampment. At this time a spirit of discontent broke out amongst them, and the Lord manifested his displeasure by a fire which fell on the encampment and inflicted injury on them. Moses called the place Taberah (q.v.),  Numbers 11:1 -3. The journey between Sinai and the southern boundary of the Promised Land (about 150 miles) at Kadesh was accomplished in about a year. (See MAP facing page 204.) 
SHEMA|Rumour.  (1.) A Reubenite ( 1 Chronicles 5:8 ). (2.) A Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 8:13 ). (3.) One who stood by Ezra when he read the law ( Nehemiah 8:4 ). (4.) A town in the south of Judah ( Joshua 15:26 ); the same as Sheba (ver. 5). 
TELMELAH|Hill of salt, a place in Babylon from which the Jews returned (id.). 
SHASHAK|     sha'-shak (shashak): Eponym of a Benjamite family ( 1 Chronicles 8:14, 25 ).
JOSHIBIAH|     josh-i-bi'-a (yoshibhyah, "Yahweh sets," or "causes to dwell"; the King James Version Josibiah): A Simeonite ( 1 Chronicles 4:35 ).
ELIZUR|     e-li'-zur ('elitsur; Septuagint Eleiour, Elisour, "My God is a rock"; compare Zuriel "my rock is God" ( Numbers 3:35 )):  A chief or prince of the tribe of Reuben ( Numbers 1:5 ;  Numbers 2:10 ;  Numbers 7:30, 35 ; 10:18).
SHOBACH|Poured out, the "captain of the host of Hadarezer" when he mustered his vassals and tributaries from beyond "the river Euphrates" ( 2 Samuel 10:15 -18); called also Shophach ( 1 Chronicles 19:16 ). 
MORESHETHGATH|   MORESHETH-GATH  mo'-resh-eth-gath, mo-resh'-eth-gath (moresheth gath, "inheritance or possession of Gath"; Septuagint kleronomias Geth): A place mentioned only in  Micah 1:14 . It must have been in the vicinity of Gath as the meaning of the name would indicate, and was the home of the prophet Micah ( Micah 1:1   Jeremiah 26:18 ). It was probably in the vicinity of Mareshah ( Micah 1:15 ). Jerome, in his preface to his work on Micah, places it a little to the East of Eleutheropolis (Beit Jibrin), and it would be natural to find it there if the latter place was Gath as some think. Robinson (BR, II, 68) found ruins of a village between one and two miles East of Beit Jibrin. It must have been among the foot-hills of Judah between the hill country and the Philistine plain on the route from Jerusalem to Lachish, Gaza and Egypt. Mareshah was certainly in that region, and the prophecy of Micah mentions towns and villages in the Shephelah and the Philistine country as though they were familiar to him (see HGHL and G. A. Smith, "Micah," in his Minor Prophets).  H. Porter
SUR|     sur (Codex Vaticanus Assour, Codex Alexandrinus Sour): Those that dwelt in Sur are mentioned along with the inhabitants of Sidon, Tyre, Ocina, etc., as dreading the approach of Holofernes and the Assyrian any (Judith 2:28). The names run from North to South, and Sur immediately follows Tyre (modern Sur), with which, therefore, it can hardly be identified. No probable identification has been suggested.  See also  JERUSALEM .  GATE, CORNER, FOUNTAIN, HORSE, SUR  See  JERUSALEM .
PHARES|     fa'-rez (Phares): the King James Version; Greek form of "Perez" (thus the Revised Version (British and American)) ( Matthew 1:3   Luke 3:33 ).
BEREA|A city of Macedonia to which Paul with Silas and Timotheus went when persecuted at Thessalonica ( Acts 17:10 ,  13), and from which also he was compelled to withdraw, when he fled to the sea-coast and thence sailed to Athens (14,  15). Sopater, one of Paul's companions belonged to this city, and his conversion probably took place at this time ( Acts 20:4 ). It is now called Verria. 
SHEPHUPHAM|   , SHEPHUPHAN  she-fu'-fam or she-fu'-fan (shephupham; Codex Vaticanus and Codex Alexandrinus Sophan; Lucian, Sophan ( Numbers 26:39 (43 )); or Shephuphan, shephuphan; Codex Vaticanus Sopharphak, Codex Alexandrinus Sophan, Lucian, Seppham ( 1 Chronicles 8:5 ), "a kind of serpent," Gray, HPN, 95): Eponym of a Benjamite family. The name occurs in  Genesis 46:21  as "Muppim" and in  1 Chronicles 7:12, 15 ;  1 Chronicles 26:16  as "Shuppim." It is almost impossible to arrive at the original form; the gentilic "Shuphamites" appears in  Numbers 26:39  (43).
PHASEAH|   , PASEAH  (1) A descendant of Judah, son of Eshton ( 1 Chronicles 4:12 ).  (2) Name of a family of Nethinim ( Ezra 2:49   Nehemiah 7:51  (King James Version "Phaseah"); "Phinoe" of 1 Esdras 5:31 Revised Version).  (3) Father of Joiada (King James Version "Jehoiada"), the repairer of the "old gate" in Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 3:6 ).
MICHMAS|     mik'-mas (mikhmac; Codex Vaticanus Machmas; Codex Alexandrinus Chammas): The form of the name "Michmash" found in  Ezra 2:27   Nehemiah 7:31 . In 1 Esdras 5:21 it appears as MACALON (which see).
MACHI|     ma'-ki (makhi; Peshitta and some manuscripts of Septuagint read "Machir"): A Gadite, father of Geuel, one of the 12 spies ( Numbers 13:15 ).
NAASSON|   NAASHON; NAASON;   na'-a-shon, na-ash'-on, na'-a-son, na-as'-on (Naasson): the King James Version Greek form of "Nahshon" (thus, the Revised Version (British and American)) ( Matthew 1:4   Luke 3:32 ).
BENAIAH|Built up by Jehovah.  (1.) The son of Jehoiada, chief priest ( 1 Chronicles 27:5 ). He was set by David over his body-guard of Cherethites and Pelethites ( 2 Samuel 8:18 ;  1 Kings 1:32 ;  1 Chronicles 18:17 ). His exploits are enumerated in  2 Samuel 23:20 , 21, 22;  1 Chronicles 11:22 . He remained faithful to Solomon ( 1 Kings 1:8 ,  10,  26), by whom he was raised to the rank of commander-in-chief ( 1 Kings 2:25 ,  29,  30,  34,  35;  4:4 ). (2.)  2 Samuel 23:30 ;  1 Chronicles 11:31 . (3.) A musical Levite ( 1 Chronicles 15:18 ,  20). (4.) A priest ( 1 Chronicles 15:24 ;  16:6 ). (5.) The son of Jeiel ( 2 Chronicles 20:14 ). 
HANUN|Graciously given.  (1.) The son and successor of Nahash, king of Moab. David's messengers, sent on an embassy of condolence to him to Rabbah Ammon, his capital, were so grossly insulted that he proclaimed war against Hanun. David's army, under the command of Joab, forthwith crossed the Jordan, and gained a complete victory over the Moabites and their allies ( 2 Samuel 10:1 -14) at Medeba (q.v.). (2.)  Nehemiah 3:13 .  (3.) 3:30. 
WAFERS|Thin cakes ( Exodus 16:31 ;  29:2 ,  23;  Leviticus 2:4 ;  7:12 ;  8:26 ;  Numbers 6:15 ,  19) used in various offerings. 
OPHRAH|A fawn.  1 Chronicles 4:14 .  (1.) A city of Benjamin ( Joshua 18:23 ); probably identical with Ephron ( 2 Chronicles 13:19 ) and Ephraim ( John 11:54 ). (2.) "Of the Abi-ezrites." A city of Manasseh, 6 miles south-west of Shechem, the residence of Gideon ( Judges 6:11 ;  8:27 ,  32). After his great victory over the Midianites, he slew at this place the captive kings ( 8:18 -21). He then assumed the function of high priest, and sought to make Ophrah what Shiloh should have been. This thing "became a snare" to Gideon and his house. After Gideon's death his family resided here till they were put to death by Abimelech ( Judges 9:5 ). It is identified with Ferata. 
PASEAH|     pa-se'-a, pas'-e-a (paceach "limping"):  (1) A son of Eshton, descendant of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:12 ).  (2) The eponym of a family of Nethinim ( Ezra 2:49   Nehemiah 7:51 , the King James Version "Phaseah" equals "Phinoe" (1 Esdras 5:31).  (3) Father of Joiada, who helped to repair the old gate ( Nehemiah 3:6 ).  PHASEAH, PASEAH  (1) A descendant of Judah, son of Eshton ( 1 Chronicles 4:12 ).  (2) Name of a family of Nethinim ( Ezra 2:49   Nehemiah 7:51  (King James Version "Phaseah"); "Phinoe" of 1 Esdras 5:31 Revised Version).  (3) Father of Joiada (King James Version "Jehoiada"), the repairer of the "old gate" in Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 3:6 ).
PITHOM|Egyptian, Pa-Tum, "house of Tum," the sun-god, one of the "treasure" cities built for Pharaoh Rameses II. by the Israelites ( Exodus 1:11 ). It was probably the Patumos of the Greek historian Herodotus. It has now been satisfactorily identified with Tell-el-Maskhuta, about 12 miles west of Ismailia, and 20 east of Tel-el-Kebir, on the southern bank of the present Suez Canal. Here have recently (1883) been discovered the ruins of supposed grain-chambers, and other evidences to show that this was a great "store city." Its immense ruin-heaps show that it was built of bricks, and partly also of bricks without straw. Succoth ( Exodus 12:37 ) is supposed by some to be the secular name of this city, Pithom being its sacred name. This was the first halting-place of the Israelites in their exodus. It has been argued (Dr. Lansing) that these "store" cities "were residence cities, royal dwellings, such as the Pharaohs of old, the Kings of Israel, and our modern Khedives have ever loved to build, thus giving employment to the superabundant muscle of their enslaved peoples, and making a name for themselves." 
HANOCH|   ; HANOCHITES  ha'-nok, ha'-nok-its (chanokh, "initiation," "dedication"):  (1) A grandson of Abraham by Keturah, and an ancestral head of a clan of Midian ( Genesis 25:4   1 Chronicles 1:33 , the King James Version "Henoch").  (2) The eldest son of Reuben ( Genesis 46:9   Exodus 6:14   1 Chronicles 5:3 ).  The descendants of Hanoch were known as Hanochites ( Numbers 26:5 ).
BEERLAHAIROI|I.e., "the well of him that liveth and seeth me," or, as some render it, "the well of the vision of life", the well where the Lord met with Hagar ( Genesis 16:7 -14). Isaac dwelt beside this well ( 24:62 ;  25:11 ). It has been identified with `Ain Muweileh, or Moilahhi, south-west of Beersheba, and about 12 miles W. from Kadesh-barnea. 
JADAU|     ja'-do, ja-da'-u (yiddo, Kethibh; yadday, Qere the King James Version; but the Revised Version (British and American) IDDO): In  Ezra 10:43 , one of those who had married foreign wives. the Revised Version margin has "Jaddai" (= "Edos," 1 Esdras 9:35).  See  IDDO .
SIDDIM|Siddim, Vale of  Valley of the broad plains, "which is the salt sea" ( Genesis 14:3 ,  8,  10), between Engedi and the cities of the plain, at the south end of the Dead Sea. It was "full of slime-pits" (R.V.,  "bitumen pits"). Here Chedorlaomer and the confederate kings overthrew the kings of Sodom and the cities of the plain. God afterwards, on account of their wickedness, "overthrew those cities, and all the plain, and all the inhabitants of the cities;" and the smoke of their destruction "went up as the smoke of a furnace" ( 19:24 -28), and was visible from Mamre, where Abraham dwelt. Some, however, contend that the "cities of the plain" were somewhere at the north of the Dead Sea. (see  SODOM .) 
JOZACAR|     joz'-a-kar, jo-za'-kar (yozakhar, "Yahweh has remembered"; the King James Version Jozachar): Servant and murderer (with Jehozabad)of Joash, king of Judah ( 2 Kings 12:21  (Hebrew 22)); called "Zabad" in  2 Chronicles 24:26 . Many manuscripts have "Jozabad" in 2 Kings.
ORDINANCES|   APOSTOLICAL CHURCH   See  DIDACHE .  HEAVEN, ORDINANCES OF  See  ASTRONOMY, sec . I, 1; II, 13.  ORDINANCES OF HEAVEN  See  ASTRONOMY, sec . I, 1.
GIBEATH|    (1)  gib'e-ath (gibh`ath): This is the status constructus of the foregoing (Gibeah). It is found in several compound place-names.  (1) Gibeath-ha-araloth (gibh`ath ha`araloth). English Versions of the Bible tanslations literally, "hill of the foreskins"; but the margins suggest the proper name. Here the Israelites were circumcised after the passage of the Jordan ( Joshua 5:3 ). The place was therefore between that river and Jericho.  (2) Gibeath Phinehas (gibh`ath pinechac), the burial place of Eleazar the son of Aaron in Mt. Ephraim ( Joshua 24:33  the King James Version "a hill that pertained to Phinehas," the Revised Version (British and American) "the hill of Phinehas," the Revised Version, margin "Gibeah of Phinehas"). Conder would identify it with 'Awertah in the plain of Makhneh, not far from Nablus, where "the Samaritans show the tombs of Phinehas and Eleazar, Abishuah and Ithamar" (Tent Work, 41). The "tomb of Eleazar" is 18 ft. long, plastered all over and shaded by a splendid terebinth." Guerin places it at Jibia, 3 miles North of Qaryat el-`Anab (Judee, III, 37; Samarie, 106). There is no certainty.  (3) Gibeath hammoreh (gibh`ath hamoreh), a hill on the North side of the valley from the camp of Gideon, beside. which lay the Midianites ( Judges 7:1 , English Versions of the Bible "the hill of Moreh"; the Hebrew is literally, "hill of the teacher"). It is probably identical with Jebel Duchy, which rises on the North of the Vale of Jezreel. Moore (Judges, 200) mistakenly calls the mountain Nabi Dachi. This is, of course, the name of the "prophet" whose shrine crowns the hill.  See  MOREH .  (4) Gibeath ha-Elohim (gibh`ath ha-'elohim), the place where Saul, after leaving Samuel, met the company of prophets, and prophesied with them ( 1 Samuel 10:5, 10 ). It is defined as the place "where is the garrison (or pillar) of the Philistines." This may be intended to distinguish it from GIBEAH (2), with which it is often identified. In this case it may be represented by the modern Ramallah, about 10 miles North of Jerusalem.  See also  TABOR .  (5) Gibeath ha-Hachilah ( 1 Samuel 23:19 ;  1 Samuel 26:1 ) is identical with HACHILAH (which see).  (6) Gibeath Ammah ( 2 Samuel 2:24 ) is identical with AMMAH (which see).  (7) Gibeath Gareb ( Jeremiah 31:39 ) is identical with GAREB (which see).  W. Ewing  GIBEATH (2)  ( Joshua 18:28 ).  See  GIBEAH (2) .
OCHRAN|     ok'-ran (`okhran, from `akhar, "trouble"; the King James Version Ocran): The father of Pagiel, the prince of the tribe of Asher ( Numbers 1:13 ;  Numbers 2:27 ;  Numbers 7:72, 77 ; 10:26).
GESHURITES| (1.) The inhabitants of Geshur. They maintained friendly relations with the Israelites on the east of Jordan ( Joshua 12:5 ;  13:11 ,  13). (2.) Another aboriginal people of Palestine who inhabited the south-west border of the land. Geshuri in  Joshua 13:2  should be "the Geshurite," not the Geshurites mentioned in ver. 11, 13, but the tribe mentioned in  1 Samuel 27:8 . 
SHUAH|Prostration; a pit.  (1.) One of Abraham's sons by Keturah ( Genesis 25:2 ;  1 Chronicles 1:32 ).  (2.)  1 Chronicles 4:11 . 
NOBAI|     no'-bi, nob'-a-i (nobhay, or nebhay): One of those who took part in sealing the covenant ( Nehemiah 10:19 ).
BENEJAAKAN|Children of Jaakan ( Numbers 33:31 ,  32), the same as Beeroth. 
HELKATHHAZZURIM|Plot of the sharp blades, or the field of heroes, ( 2 Samuel 2:16 ). After the battle of Gilboa, so fatal to Saul and his house, David, as divinely directed, took up his residence in Hebron, and was there anointed king over Judah. Among the fugitives from Gilboa was Ish-bosheth, the only surviving son of Saul, whom Abner, Saul's uncle, took across the Jordan to Mahanaim, and there had him proclaimed king. Abner gathered all the forces at his command and marched to Gibeon, with the object of wresting Judah from David. Joab had the command of David's army of trained men, who encamped on the south of the pool, which was on the east of the hill on which the town of Gibeon was built, while Abner's army lay on the north of the pool. Abner proposed that the conflict should be decided by twelve young men engaging in personal combat on either side. So fiercely did they encounter each other that "they caught every man his fellow by the head, and thrust his sword in his fellow's side; so they fell down together: wherefore that place was called Helkath-hazzurim." The combat of the champions was thus indecisive, and there followed a severe general engagement between the two armies, ending in the total rout of the Israelites under Abner. The general result of this battle was that "David waxed stronger and stronger, and the house of Saul waxed weaker and weaker" ( 2 Samuel 3:1 ). (see  GIBEON .) 
ITHIEL|     ith'-i-el ('ithi'el, "God is"):  (1) A son of Jeshaiah of the tribe of Benjamin, mentioned among the inhabitants of Jerusalem in Nehemiah's day ( Nehemiah 11:7 ).  (2) The name is perhaps also found in the oracle of Agur ( Proverbs 30:1 ).  See  ITHIEL AND UCAL .  ITHIEL AND UCAL  ('ithi'el we'ukhal): Names of the two men to whom Agur the son of Jakeh spoke his words ( Proverbs 30:1 ). The purport of introducing these persons is strange and obscure; the margin proposes therefore, by the use of a different pointing, to read the verse, "The man said, I have wearied myself, O God, I have wearied myself, O God, and am consumed," thus doing away with the proper names; a reading which corresponds not inaptly with the tone of the succeeding verses.  See  AGUR ;  PROVERBS, THE BOOK OF, II, 6 .  John Franklin Genung
SILVANUS|     sil-va'-nus (Silouanos ( 2 Corinthians 1:19 )).  See  SILAS .
JAVAN| (1.) The fourth "son" of Japheth ( Genesis 10:2 ), whose descendants settled in Greece, i.e., Ionia, which bears the name of Javan in Hebrew. Alexander the Great is called the "king of Javan" (rendered "Grecia, "  Dan. 8:21 ;  10:20 ; Comp.  11:2 ;  Zechariah 9:13 ). This word was universally used by the nations of the East as the generic name of the Greek race. (2.) A town or district of Arabia Felix, from which the Syrians obtained iron, cassia, and calamus ( Ezek. 27:19 ). 
BETHDAGON|House of Dagon.  (1.) A city in the low country or plain of Judah, near Philistia ( Joshua 15:41 ); the modern Beit Degan, about 5 miles from Lydda. (2.) A city near the south-east border of Asher ( Joshua 19:27 ). It was a Philistine colony. It is identical with the modern ruined village of Tell D'auk. 
HANDS|   ; HANDS, IMPOSITION, LAYING ON OF  im-po-zish'-un (epithesis cheiron,  Acts 8:18   1 Timothy 4:14 ;  2 Timothy 1:6   Hebrews 6:2 ): The act or ceremony of the imposition of hands appears in the Old Testament in various connections: in the act of blessing ( Genesis 48:14 ); in the ritual of sacrifice (hands of the offerer laid on head of victim,  Exodus 29:10, 15, 19   Leviticus 1:4 ;  Leviticus 3:2, 8, 13 ;  Leviticus 4:4, 24, 29 ; 8:14; 16:21); in witness-bearing in capital offenses ( Leviticus 24:14 ). The tribe of Levi was set apart by solemn imposition of hands ( Numbers 8:10 ); Moses appointed Joshua to be his successor by a similar act ( Numbers 27:18, 23   Deuteronomy 34:9 ). The idea in these cases varies with the purpose of the act. The primary idea seems to be that of conveyance or transference (compare  Leviticus 16:21 ), but, conjoined with this, in certain instances, are the ideas of identification and of devotion to God.  In the New Testament Jesus laid hands on the little children ( Matthew 19:13, 15  parallel  Mark 10:16 ) and on the sick ( Matthew 9:18   Mark 6:5 , etc.), and the apostles laid hands on those whom they baptized that they might receive the Holy Spirit ( Acts 8:17, 19 ;  Acts 19:6 ), and in healing ( Acts 12:17 ). Specially the imposition of hands was used in the setting apart of persons to a particular office or work in the church. This is noticed as taking place in the appointment of the Seven ( Acts 6:6 ), in the sending out of Barnabas and Saul ( Acts 13:3 ), at the ordination of Timothy ( 1 Timothy 4:14   2 Timothy 1:6 ), but though not directly mentioned, it seems likely that it accompanied all acts of ordination of presbyters and deacons (compare  1 Timothy 5:22   Hebrews 6:2 ). The presbyters could hardly convey what they had not themselves received ( 1 Timothy 1:14 ). Here again the fundamental idea is communication. The act of laying on of hands was accompanied by prayer ( Acts 6:6 ;  Acts 8:15 ;  Acts 13:3 ), and the blessing sought was imparted by God Himself. No ground is afforded by this symbolical action for a sacrament of "Orders."  See  SACRIFICE ;  MINISTRY ; ORDINATION.  James Orr  IMPOSITION OF HANDS  im-po-zish'-un.  See  HANDS, IMPOSITION (LAYING ON) OF .
REUBEN|Behold a son!, the eldest son of Jacob and Leah ( Genesis 29:32 ). His sinful conduct, referred to in  Genesis 35:22 , brought down upon him his dying father's malediction ( 48:4 ). He showed kindness to Joseph, and was the means of saving his life when his other brothers would have put him to death ( 37:21 , 22). It was he also who pledged his life and the life of his sons when Jacob was unwilling to let Benjamin go down into Egypt. After Jacob and his family went down into Egypt ( 46:8 ) no further mention is made of Reuben beyond what is recorded in ch. 49:3,4.  Reuben, Tribe of  At the Exodus numbered 46,500 male adults, from twenty years old and upwards ( Numbers 1:20 ,  21), and at the close of the wilderness wanderings they numbered only 43,730 ( 26:7 ). This tribe united with that of Gad in asking permission to settle in the "land of Gilead," "on the other side of Jordan" ( 32:1 -5). The lot assigned to Reuben was the smallest of the lots given to the trans-Jordanic tribes. It extended from the Arnon, in the south along the coast of the Dead Sea to its northern end, where the Jordan flows into it ( Joshua 13:15 -21,  23). It thus embraced the original kingdom of Sihon. Reuben is "to the eastern tribes what Simeon is to the western. `Unstable as water,' he vanishes away into a mere Arabian tribe. `His men are few;' it is all he can do `to live and not die.' We hear of nothing beyond the multiplication of their cattle in the land of Gilead, their spoils of `camels fifty thousand, and of asses two thousand' ( 1 Chronicles 5:9 ,  10,  20,  21). In the great struggles of the nation he never took part. The complaint against him in the song of Deborah is the summary of his whole history. `By the streams of Reuben,' i.e., by the fresh streams which descend from the eastern hills into the Jordan and the Dead Sea, on whose banks the Bedouin chiefs met then as now to debate, in the `streams' of Reuben great were the `desires'", i.e., resolutions which were never carried out, the people idly resting among their flocks as if it were a time of peace ( Judges 5:15 ,  16). Stanley's Sinai and Palestine. All the three tribes on the east of Jordan at length fell into complete apostasy, and the time of retribution came. God "stirred up the spirit of Pul, king of Assyria, and the spirit of Tiglath-pileser, king of Assyria," to carry them away, the first of the tribes, into captivity ( 1 Chronicles 5:25 ,  26). 
BOZRAH|Enclosure; fortress.  (1.) The city of Jobab, one of the early Edomite kings ( Genesis 36:33 ). This place is mentioned by the prophets in later times ( Isaiah 34:6 ;  Jeremiah 49:13 ;  Amos 1:12 ;  Micah 2:12 ). Its modern representative is el-Busseireh. It lies in the mountain district of Petra, 20 miles to the south-east of the Dead Sea. (2.) A Moabite city in the "plain country" ( Jeremiah 48:24 ), i.e., on the high level down on the east of the Dead Sea. It is probably the modern Buzrah. 
BARACHEL|Whom God has blessed, a Buzite, the father of Elihu, one of Job's friends ( Job 32:2 ,  6). 
EZEKIEL|God will strengthen.  (1.)  1 Chronicles 24:16 , "Jehezekel." (2.) One of the great prophets, the son of Buzi the priest ( Ezek. 1:3 ). He was one of the Jewish exiles who settled at Tel-Abib, on the banks of the Chebar, "in the land of the Chaldeans." He was probably carried away captive with Jehoiachin ( 1:2 ;  2 Kings 24:14 -16) about B.C. 597. His prophetic call came to him "in the fifth year of Jehoiachin's captivity" (B.C. 594). He had a house in the place of his exile, where he lost his wife, in the ninth year of his exile, by some sudden and unforeseen stroke ( Ezek. 8:1 ;  24:18 ). He held a prominent place among the exiles, and was frequently consulted by the elders ( 8:1 ;  11:25 ;  14:1 ;  20:1 ). His ministry extended over twenty-three years ( 29:17 ), B.C. 595-573, during part of which he was contemporary with Daniel ( 14:14 ;  28:3 ) and Jeremiah, and probably also with Obadiah. The time and manner of his death are unknown. His reputed tomb is pointed out in the neighbourhood of Bagdad, at a place called Keffil.  Ezekiel, Book of Consists mainly of three groups of prophecies. After an account of his call to the prophetical office (1- 3:21 ), Ezekiel (1) utters words of denunciation against the Jews ( 3:22 -24), warning them of the certain destruction of Jerusalem, in opposition to the words of the false prophets ( 4:1 -3). The symbolical Acts, by which the extremities to which Jerusalem would be reduced are described in ch. 4,5, show his intimate acquaintance with the Levitical legislation. (See  Exodus 22:30 ;  Deuteronomy 14:21 ;  Leviticus 5:2 ;  7:18 , 24;  17:15 ;  19:7 ;  22:8 ,  etc.) (2.) Prophecies against various surrounding nations: against the Ammonites ( Ezek. 25:1 -7), the Moabites (8-11), the Edomites (12-14), the Philistines (15-17), Tyre and Sidon (26-28), and against Egypt (29-32). (3.) Prophecies delivered after the destruction of Jerusalem by Nebuchadnezzar: the triumphs of Israel and of the kingdom of God on earth ( Ezek. 33 -39); Messianic times, and the establishment and prosperity of the kingdom of God (40;48). The closing visions of this book are referred to in the book of Revelation ( Ezek. 38  = Revelation 20:8;  Ezek. 47:1 -8=Revelation 22:1, 2). Other references to this book are also found in the New Testament. (Comp.  Romans 2:24  with  Ezek. 36:2 ;  Romans 10:5 ,   Galatians 3:12  with  Ezek. 20:11 ;  2 Peter 3:4  with  Ezek. 12:22. ) It may be noted that Daniel, fourteen years after his deportation from Jerusalem, is mentioned by Ezekiel ( 14:14 ) along with Noah and Job as distinguished for his righteousness, and some five years later he is spoken of as pre-eminent for his wisdom ( 28:3 ). Ezekiel's prophecies are characterized by symbolical and allegorical representations, "unfolding a rich series of majestic visions and of colossal symbols." There are a great many also of "symbolcal actions embodying vivid conceptions on the part of the prophet" ( 4:1 -4;  5:1 -4;  12:3 -6;  24:3 -5;  37:16 ,  etc.) "The mode of representation, in which symbols and allegories occupy a prominent place, gives a dark, mysterious character to the prophecies of Ezekiel. They are obscure and enigmatical. A cloudy mystery overhangs them which it is almost impossible to penetrate. Jerome calls the book `a labyrith of the mysteries of God.' It was because of this obscurity that the Jews forbade any one to read it till he had attained the age of thirty." Ezekiel is singular in the frequency with which he refers to the Pentateuch (e.g.,   Ezek. 27 ;  28:13 ;  31:8 ;  36:11 ,  34;  47:13 ,  etc.). He shows also an acquaintance with the writings of Hosea ( Ezek. 37:22 ), Isaiah ( Ezek. 8:12 ;  29:6 ), and especially with those of Jeremiah, his older contemporary ( Jeremiah 24:7 ,  9;  48:37 ). 
HESHMON|Fatness, a town in the south of Judah ( Joshua 15:27 ). 
PONTIUS|Pilate, Pontius  Probably connected with the Roman family of the Pontii, and called "Pilate" from the Latin pileatus, i.e., "wearing the pileus", which was the "cap or badge of a manumitted slave," as indicating that he was a "freedman," or the descendant of one. He was the sixth in the order of the Roman procurators of Judea (A.D. 26-36). His headquarters were at Caesarea, but he frequently went up to Jerusalem. His reign extended over the period of the ministry of John the Baptist and of Jesus Christ, in connection with whose trial his name comes into prominent notice. Pilate was a "typical Roman, not of the antique, simple stamp, but of the imperial period, a man not without some remains of the ancient Roman justice in his soul, yet pleasure-loving, imperious, and corrupt. He hated the Jews whom he ruled, and in times of irritation freely shed their blood. They returned his hatred with cordiality, and accused him of every crime, maladministration, cruelty, and robbery. He visited Jerusalem as seldom as possible; for, indeed, to one accustomed to the pleasures of Rome, with its theatres, baths, games, and gay society, Jerusalem, with its religiousness and ever-smouldering revolt, was a dreary residence. When he did visit it he stayed in the palace of Herod the Great, it being common for the officers sent by Rome into conquered countries to occupy the palaces of the displaced sovereigns." After his trial before the Sanhedrin, Jesus was brought to the Roman procurator, Pilate, who had come up to Jerusalem as usual to preserve order during the Passover, and was now residing, perhaps, in the castle of Antonia, or it may be in Herod's palace. Pilate came forth from his palace and met the deputation from the Sanhedrin, who, in answer to his inquiry as to the nature of the accusation they had to prefer against Jesus, accused him of being a "malefactor." Pilate was not satisfied with this, and they further accused him (1) of sedition, (2) preventing the payment of the tribute to Caesar, and (3) of assuming the title of king ( Luke 23:2 ). Pilate now withdrew with Jesus into the palace ( John 18:33 ) and examined him in private (37, 38); and then going out to the deputation still standing before the gate, he declared that he could find no fault in Jesus ( Luke 23:4 ). This only aroused them to more furious clamour, and they cried that he excited the populace "throughout all Jewry, beginning from Galilee." When Pilate heard of Galilee, he sent the accused to Herod Antipas, who had jurisdiction over that province, thus hoping to escape the difficulty in which he found himself. But Herod, with his men of war, set Jesus at nought, and sent him back again to Pilate, clad in a purple robe of mockery ( 23:11 ,  12). Pilate now proposed that as he and Herod had found no fault in him, they should release Jesus; and anticipating that they would consent to this proposal, he ascended the judgment-seat as if ready to ratify the decision ( Matthew 27:19 ). But at this moment his wife (Claudia Procula) sent a message to him imploring him to have nothing to do with the "just person." Pilate's feelings of perplexity and awe were deepened by this incident, while the crowd vehemently cried out, "Not this man, but Barabbas." Pilate answered, "What then shall I do with Jesus?" The fierce cry immediately followed. "Let him be crucified." Pilate, apparently vexed, and not knowning what to do, said, "Why, what evil hath he done?" but with yet fiercer fanaticism the crowd yelled out, "Away with him! crucify him, crucify him!" Pilate yielded, and sent Jesus away to be scourged. This scourging was usually inflicted by lictors; but as Pilate was only a procurator he had no lictor, and hence his soldiers inflicted this terrible punishment. This done, the soldiers began to deride the sufferer, and they threw around him a purple robe, probably some old cast-off robe of state ( Matthew 27:28 ;  John 19:2 ), and putting a reed in his right hand, and a crowd of thorns on his head, bowed the knee before him in mockery, and saluted him, saying, "Hail, King of the Jews!" They took also the reed and smote him with it on the head and face, and spat in his face, heaping upon him every indignity. Pilate then led forth Jesus from within the Praetorium ( Matthew 27:27 ) before the people, wearing the crown of thorns and the purple robe, saying, "Behold the man!" But the sight of Jesus, now scourged and crowned and bleeding, only stirred their hatred the more, and again they cried out, "Crucify him, crucify him!" and brought forth this additional charge against him, that he professed to be "the Son of God." Pilate heard this accusation with a superstitious awe, and taking him once more within the Praetorium, asked him, "Whence art thou?" Jesus gave him no answer. Pilate was irritated by his continued silence, and said, "Knowest thou not that I have power to crucify thee?" Jesus, with calm dignity, answered the Roman, "Thou couldest have no power at all against me, except it were given thee from above." After this Pilate seemed more resolved than ever to let Jesus go. The crowd perceiving this cried out, "If thou let this man go, thou art not Caesar's friend." This settled the matter. He was afraid of being accused to the emperor. Calling for water, he washed his hands in the sight of the people, saying, "I am innocent of the blood of this just person." The mob, again scorning his scruples, cried, "His blood be on us, and on our children." Pilate was stung to the heart by their insults, and putting forth Jesus before them, said, "Shall I crucify your King?" The fatal moment had now come. They madly exclaimed, "We have no king but Caesar;" and now Jesus is given up to them, and led away to be crucified. By the direction of Pilate an inscription was placed, according to the Roman custom, over the cross, stating the crime for which he was crucified. Having ascertained from the centurion that he was dead, he gave up the body to Joseph of Arimathea to be buried. Pilate's name now disappears from the Gospel history. References to him, however, are found in the Acts of the Apostles ( 3:13 ;  4:27 ;  13:28 ), and in  1 Timothy 6:13 . In A.D. 36 the governor of Syria brought serious accusations against Pilate, and he was banished to Vienne in Gaul, where, according to tradition, he committed suicide. 
SHELUMIEL|     she-lu'-mi-el (shelumi'el; both the punctuation and interpretation are in doubt. Massoretic Text punctuates the first element as a passive participle; the use of the participle in compounds is common in Assyrian but rare in Heb (compare Gray, HPN, 200). The meaning of the present form, if it be correct, is "at peace with God" (Hommel, Ancient Hebrew Tradition, 200, "my friend is God"). Septuagint reads Salamiel: Prince of the tribe of Simeon ( Numbers 1:6 ;  Numbers 2:12 ;  Numbers 7:36, 41 ; 10:19). The genealogy of Judith (8:1) is carried back to this Shelumiel or Shelamiel, called there "Salamiel."  Horace J. Wolf
JOKNEAM|Gathered by the people, ( Joshua 19:11 ;  21:34 ), a city "of Carmel" ( 12:22 ), i.e., on Carmel, allotted with its suburbs to the Merarite Levites. It is the modern Tell Kaimon, about 12 miles south-west of Nazareth, on the south of the river Kishon. 
NEBUSHASBAN|Adorer of Nebo, or Nebo saves me, the "Rabsaris," or chief chamberlain, of the court of Babylon. He was one of those whom the king sent to release Jeremiah from prison in Jerusalem ( Jeremiah 39:13 ). 
UPHARSIN|And they divide, one of the words written by the mysterious hand on the wall of Belshazzar's palace ( Dan. 5:25 ). It is a pure Chaldean word. "Peres" is only a simple form of the same word. 
FEATHERS|     feth'-erz (notsah; Latin penna): "Gavest thou the goodly wings unto the peacocks? or wings (the Revised Version (British and American) "pinions") and feathers (the American Standard Revised Version "plumage") unto the ostrich?" ( Job 39:13  the King James Version); "He shall cover thee with his feathers, and under his wings shalt thou trust; his truth shall be thy shield and buckler" ( Psalm 91:4  the King James Version). In the Revised Version (British and American) this is again changed to pinions. in  Daniel 4:33  the word "feathers" is left. The wonderful plumage of birds was noted and prized in those days, just as now. Old ostriches were too tough and rank of flesh for food. They were pursued for their feathers, which were used for the headdressing and shield ornaments of desert princes. No one doubts that the ships of Solomon introduced peacocks because of their wonderful feathers. Those of the eagle were held in superstitious reverence as late as the days of Pliny, who was ten years old at the time of the crucifixion of Christ. Pliny wrote that the eagle was so powerful that if its feathers be laid in a box with those of other birds, the eagle feathers would "devour and consume all the rest."  Gene Stratton-Porter
PHILIPPI| (1.) Formerly Crenides, "the fountain," the capital of the province of Macedonia. It stood near the head of the Sea, about 8 miles north-west of Kavalla. It is now a ruined village, called Philibedjik. Philip of Macedonia fortified the old Thracian town of Crenides, and called it after his own name Philippi (B.C. 359-336). In the time of the Emperor Augustus this city became a Roman colony, i.e., a military settlement of Roman soldiers, there planted for the purpose of controlling the district recently conquered. It was a "miniature Rome," under the municipal law of Rome, and governed by military officers, called duumviri, who were appointed directly from Rome. Having been providentially guided thither, here Paul and his companion Silas preached the gospel and formed the first church in Europe. (see  LYDIA .) This success stirred up the enmity of the people, and they were "shamefully entreated" ( Acts 16:9 -40;  1 Thessalonians 2:2 ). Paul and Silas at length left this city and proceeded to Amphipolis (q.v.). (2.) When Philip the tetrarch, the son of Herod, succeeded to the government of the northern portion of his kingdom, he enlarged the city of Paneas, and called it Caesarea, in honour of the emperor. But in order to distinguish it from the Caesarea on the sea coast, he added to it subsequently his own name, and called it Caesarea-Philippi (q.v.).
NIMRAH|Pure, a city on the east of Jordan ( Numbers 32:3 ); probably the same as Beth-nimrah ( Joshua 13:27 ). It has been identified with the Nahr Nimrin, at one of the fords of Jordan, not far from Jericho. 
JIDLAPH|     jid'-laf (yidhlaph perhaps "he weeps"): A "son" of Nahor ( Genesis 22:22 ).
IPHTAHEL|   IPHTAH-EL  if'-ta-el (yiphtach-'el; the King James Version Jiphtah-el): The valley of Iphtah-el lay on the North border of Zebulun ( Joshua 19:14, 27 ). Northwest of the plain of el-Battauf stands a steep hill, connected only by a low saddle with the hills on the North. The name Tell Jefat suggests the Jotapata of Josephus (BJ, III, vi, i; vii, i, etc.), and the place answers well to his description. It probably corresponds to the ancient Iphtah-el. In that case the valley is most probably that which begins at Tell Jefat, passes round the South of Jebel Kaukab, and, as Wady 'Abellin, opens on the plain of Acre.  W. Ewing
UZAI|     u'-zi, u'-za-i ('uzay, meaning unknown): Father of Palal ( Nehemiah 3:25 ).
IGAL|Avengers.  (1.)  Numbers 13:7 , one of the spies of the tribe of Issachar.  (2.) Son of Nathan of Zobah, and one of David's warriors ( 2 Samuel 23:36 ).  (3.)  1 Chronicles 3:22 . 
SHIMRON|Watch-post, an ancient city of the Canaanites; with its villages, allotted to Zebulun ( Joshua 19:15 ); now probably Semunieh, on the northern edge of the plain of Esdraelon, 5 miles west of Nazareth. 
SEPULCHRES|   KINGS'   ( 2 Chronicles 21:20 ).  See  JERUSALEM, VIII .
NYMPHAS|Nymph, saluted by Paul in his Epistle to the Colossians as a member of the church of Laodicea ( Colossians 4:15 ). 
LAISH|A lion.  (1.) A city of the Sidonians, in the extreme north of Palestine ( Judges 18:7 ,  14); called also Leshem ( Joshua 19:47 ) and Dan ( Judges 18:7 ,  29;  Jeremiah 8:16 ). It lay near the sources of the Jordan, about 4 miles from Paneas. The restless and warlike tribe of Dan (q.v.), looking out for larger possessions, invaded this country and took Laish with its territory. It is identified with the ruin Tell-el-Kady, "the mound of the judge," to the north of the Waters of Merom ( Joshua 11:5 ). (2.) A place mentioned in  Isaiah 10:30 . It has been supposed to be the modern el-Isawiyeh, about a mile north-east of Jerusalem. (3.) The father of Phalti ( 1 Samuel 25:44 ). 
JEHIELI|   JEHIEL;   je-hi'-el, je-hi'-e-li (yechi'el, "may God live!"):  (1) A Levite, one of the musicians appointed to play upon instruments at the bringing up of the ark by David ( 1 Chronicles 15:18, 20 ;  1 Chronicles 16:5 ); (yechi'eli): A patronymic of this name ( 1 Chronicles 26:21, 22 ), but Curtis (Chronicles, 286-87) reads "Jehiel ( 1 Chronicles 26:21 ) and he is brethren Zetham and Joel" ( 1 Chronicles 26:22 ); compare  1 Chronicles 23:8 , where the three seem to be brothers. See (2) above.  (2) A Gershonite, head of a Levitical house ( 1 Chronicles 23:8 ;  1 Chronicles 29:8 ).  (3) Son of a Hachmonite; he was "with the king's (David's) sons," i.e. their tutor ( 1 Chronicles 27:32 ).  (4) A son of King Jehoshaphat ( 2 Chronicles 21:2 ).  (5) In  2 Chronicles 29:14  the King James Version, where Qere is yechu'el, the Revised Version (British and American) "Jehuel," a Hermanite Levite who took part in cleansing the temple in Hezekiah's reign.  (6) An overseer in Hezekiah's reign ( 2 Chronicles 31:13 ).  (7) One of the three "rulers" of the temple in Hezekiah's reign ( 2 Chronicles 35:8 ).  (8) Father of Obadiah, a returned exile ( Ezra 8:9 ) = "Jezelus" of 1 Esdras 8:35.  (9) Father of Shecaniah ( Ezra 10:2 ) = "Jeelus" of 1 Esdras 8:92. He was a "son" of Elam, and so probably the same as "Jehiel" in  Ezra 10:26 , one of those who had married foreign wives = "Jezrielus" of 1 Esdras 9:27.  (10) A "son" of Harim, and one of those who had married foreign wives ( Ezra 10:21 ) = "Hiereel" of 1 Esdras 9:21.  (11) The King James Version in  1 Chronicles 9:35  = JEIEL (q.v. (2)).  (12) The King James Version in  1 Chronicles 11:44  = JEIEL (q.v. (3)).  David Francis Roberts
LYDDA|A town in the tribe of Ephraim, mentioned only in the New Testament ( Acts 9:32 ,  35,  38) as the scene of Peter's miracle in healing the paralytic AEneas. It lay about 9 miles east of Joppa, on the road from the sea-port to Jerusalem. In the Old Testament ( 1 Chronicles 8:12 ) it is called Lod. It was burned by the Romans, but was afterwards rebuilt, and was known by the name of Diospolis. Its modern name is Ludd. The so-called patron saint of England, St. George, is said to have been born here. 
MELITA|( Acts 27:28 ), an island in the Mediterranean, the modern Malta. Here the ship in which Paul was being conveyed a prisoner to Rome was wrecked. The bay in which it was wrecked now bears the name of "St. Paul's Bay", "a certain creek with a shore." It is about 2 miles deep and 1 broad, and the whole physical condition of the scene answers the description of the shipwreck given in  Acts 28 . It was originally colonized by Phoenicians ("barbarians,  28:2 ). It came into the possession of the Greeks (B.C. 736), from whom it was taken by the Carthaginians (B.C. 528). In B.C. 242 it was conquered by the Romans, and was governed by a Roman propraetor at the time of the shipwreck ( Acts 28:7 ). Since 1800, when the French garrison surrendered to the English force, it has been a British dependency. The island is about 17 miles long and 9 wide, and about 60 in circumference. After a stay of three months on this island, during which the "barbarians" showed them no little kindness, Julius procured for himself and his company a passage in another Alexandrian corn-ship which had wintered in the island, in which they proceeded on their voyage to Rome ( Acts 28:13 ,  14). 
SHILHI|     shil'-hi (shilchi): Father of Jehoshaphat's mother ( 1 Kings 22:42  =  2 Chronicles 20:31 ; Codex Vaticanus and Codex Alexandrinus in 2 Chronicles, Salei, Codex Vaticanus in 1 Kings, Semeei; Codex Alexandrinus in 1 Kings, Salala; Lucian in both, Seleei). Cheyne (Encyclopaedia Biblica, article "Shilhi") ventures the supposition that "Shilhi" is a misreading for "Shilhim" ( Joshua 15:32 ), and is therefore the name of place rather than that of a person; he holds it to be the name of the birthplace of Azubah, the king's mother.
EPHESDAMMIM|Boundary of blood, a place in the tribe of Judah where the Philistines encamped when David fought with Goliath ( 1 Samuel 17:1 ). It was probably so called as having been the scene of frequent sanguinary conflicts between Israel and the Philistines. It is called Pas-dammim ( 1 Chronicles 11:13 ). It has been identified with the modern Beit Fased, i.e., "house of bleeding", near Shochoh (q.v.). 
RACES|     ras'-iz.  See  TABLE OF NATIONS .
JEHOZADAK|Jehovah-justified, the son of the high priest Seraiah at the time of the Babylonian exile ( 1 Chronicles 6:14 ,  15). He was carried into captivity by Nebuchadnezzar, and probably died in Babylon. He was the father of Jeshua, or Joshua, who returned with Zerubbabel. 
MAARATH|Desolation, a place in the mountains of Judah ( Joshua 15:59 ), probably the modern village Beit Ummar, 6 miles north of Hebron. 
JOSHAVIAH|     josh-a-vi'-a (yoshawyah, allied form to JOSHAH (which see)): Son of Elnaam, one of the band of braves who served David ( 1 Chronicles 11:46 ), omitted from the list of  2 Samuel 23 , which is less complete and differs in detail.
DARA|     dar'-a (dara`). See  DARDA .
LYSANIAS|Tetrarch of Abilene ( Luke 3:1 ), on the eastern slope of Anti-Lebanon, near the city of Damascus. 
MICHMASH|Something hidden, a town of Benjamin ( Ezra 2:27 ), east of Bethel and south of Migron, on the road to Jerusalem ( Isaiah 10:28 ). It lay on the line of march of an invading army from the north, on the north side of the steep and precipitous Wady es-Suweinit ("valley of the little thorn-tree" or "the acacia"), and now bears the name of Mukhmas. This wady is called "the passage of Michmash" ( 1 Samuel 13:23 ). Immediately facing Mukhmas, on the opposite side of the ravine, is the modern representative of Geba, and behind this again are Ramah and Gibeah. This was the scene of a great battle fought between the army of Saul and the Philistines, who were utterly routed and pursued for some 16 miles towards Philistia as far as the valley of Aijalon. "The freedom of Benjamin secured at Michmash led through long years of conflict to the freedom of all its kindred tribes." The power of Benjamin and its king now steadily increased. A new spirit and a new hope were now at work in Israel. (see  SAUL .) 
ETHNAN|     eth'-nan ('ethnan, "gift" or "hire"; Ethnadi):  A Judahite ( 1 Chronicles 4:7 ).
SHELAH|Petition.  (1.) Judah's third son ( Genesis 38:2 ,  5,  11,  14). (2.) A son of Arphaxad ( 1 Chronicles 1:18 ). 
ZELEK|Cleft, an Ammonite; one of David's valiant men ( 2 Samuel 23:37 ). 
CHOENIX|     ke'-niks (choinix): A Greek dry measure, almost equal to one quart. Mentioned in the New Testament only in  Revelation 6:6 , where the Revised Version, margin would read "choenix" instead of the indefinite translation "measure." The verse is then obviously a threat of famine.
TAHPENES|The wife of Pharaoh, who gave her sister in marriage to Hadad the Edomite ( 1 Kings 11:19 ,  20). 
SISAMAI|     sis'-a-mi.  See  SISMAI .
DOORS|Moved on pivots of wood fastened in sockets above and below ( Proverbs 26:14 ). They were fastened by a lock ( Judges 3:23 ,  25; Cant. 5:5) or by a bar ( Judges 16:3 ;  Job 38:10 ). In the interior of Oriental houses, curtains were frequently used instead of doors. The entrances of the tabernacle had curtains ( Exodus 26:31 -33,  36). The "valley of Achor" is called a "door of hope," because immediately after the execution of Achan the Lord said to Joshua, "Fear not," and from that time Joshua went forward in a career of uninterrupted conquest. Paul speaks of a "door opened" for the spread of the gospel ( 1 Corinthians 16:9 ;  2 Corinthians 2:12 ;  Colossians 4:3 ). Our Lord says of himself, "I am the door" ( John 10:9 ). John ( Revelation 4:1 ) speaks of a "door opened in heaven." 
NEPHISH|   ; NEPHISIM; NEPHISHESIM; NEPHUSIM  ne'-fish, ne-fi'-sim, ne-fish'-e-sim, ne-fusim (nephicim, nephucim): The former is the Kethibh (Hebrew: "written") form of the name adopted in the Revised Version (British and American); the latter the Qere (Hebrew "read") form, adopted in the King James Version and the Revised Version margin ( Ezra 2:50 ).  See  NAPHISH ;  NEPHUSHESIM .
RHODA|A rose, the damsel in the house of Mary, the mother of John Mark. She came to hearken when Peter knocked at the door of the gate ( Acts 12:12 -15). 
SHARONITE|     shar'-un-it (ha-sharoni; ho Saroneites): Applied in Scripture only to Shitrai ( 1 Chronicles 27:29 ).  See  SHARON .
MILCAH|     mil'-ka (milkah; Melcha):  (1) Daughter of Haran, wife of Nahor, and grandmother of Rebekah ( Genesis 11:29 ;  Genesis 22:20-23 ; 24:15, 24, 47).  (2) Daughter of Zelophehad ( Numbers 26:33 ;  Numbers 27:1 ;  Numbers 36:11   Joshua 17:3 ). Many recent authorities are of opinion that Milcah is an abbreviation of Bethmilcah, and is a geographical rather than a personal name.
SHIMRONMERON|The same, probably, as Shimron ( Joshua 12:20 ). 
FIREPAN|( Exodus 27:3 ;  38:3 ), one of the vessels of the temple service (rendered "snuff-dish"  Exodus 25:38 ;  37:23 ; and "censer"  Leviticus 10:1 ;  16:12 ). It was probably a metallic cinder-basin used for the purpose of carrying live coal for burning incense, and of carrying away the snuff in trimming the lamps. 
HELON|Strong, father of Eliab, who was "captain of the children of Zebulun" ( Numbers 1:9 ;  2:7 ). 
LINUS|     li'-nus (Linos ( 2 Timothy 4:21 )): One of Paul's friends in Rome during his second and last imprisonment in that city. He was one of the few who remained faithful to the apostle, even when most of the Christians had forsaken him. And writing to Timothy when he realized that his execution could not be very far distant-for he was now ready to be offered, and the time of his departure was at hand ( 2 Timothy 4:6 )-he sends greeting to Timothy from four friends whom he names, and Linus is one of them. There is a tradition that Linus was bishop of the church at Rome. "It is perhaps fair to assume, though of course there is no certainty of this, that the consecration of Linus to the government of the Roman church as its first bishop was one of the dying acts of the apostle Paul" (H.D.M. Spence, in Ellicott's New Testament Commentary on 2 Tim).  Irenaeus-bishop of Lyons about 178 A.D.-in his defense of orthodox doctrine against the Gnostics "appeals especially to the bishops of Rome, as depositories of the apostolic tradition." The list of Irenaeus commences with Linus, whom he identifies with the person of this name mentioned by Paul, and whom he states to have been "entrusted with the office of the bishopric by the apostles..... With the many possibilities of error, no more can safely be assumed of Linus.... than that he held some prominent position in the Roman church" (Lightfoot's "Dissertation on the Christian Ministry," in Commentary on Phil, 220).  "Considering the great rarity of this Greek mythological name as a proper name for persons, we can hardly doubt that here, as Irenaeus has directly asserted, the same Roman Christian is meant who, according to ancient tradition, became after Peter and Paul the first bishop of Rome. Among the mythical characters in Apostolical Constitutions, vii, 46 occurs Linos ho Klaudias, who is declared to have been ordained by Paul as the first bishop of Rome. He is thus represented as the son or husband of the Claudia whose name comes after his in  2 Timothy 4:21 .  "These meager statements have been enlarged upon by English investigators. The Claudia mentioned here is, they hold, identical with the one who, according to Martial, married a certain Pudens (85-90 A.D.), and she, in turn, with the Claudia Rufina from Britain, who is then made out to be a daughter of the British king, Cogidumnus, or Titus Claudius Cogidubnus. For a refutation of these assumptions, which, even chronologically considered, are impossible, see Lightfoot, Clement, I, 76-79" (Zahn, Introduction to the New Testament, 20).  John Rutherfurd
JAHDIEL|     ja'-di-el (yachdi'el, "God gives joy"): In  1 Chronicles 5:24 , head of a Manassite family.
MANASSES|     ma-nas'-ez (Manasses; Codex Vaticanus Manasse):  (1) One who had married a "strange wife" (1 Esdras 9:33) equals "Manasseh" of  Ezra 10:33 .  (2) The wealthy husband of Judith; died of sunstroke when employed at the barley harvest (Judith 8:2, 7; 10:03; 16:22;).  (3) A person mentioned in Tobit 14:10, who "gave alms, and escaped the snare of death." It must be admitted that Manasses here is an awkward reading and apparently interrupts the sense, which would run more smoothly if Manasses were omitted or Achiacharus read. There is great variety of text in this verse. Codex Sinaiticus (followed by Fritzsche, Libri apoc. vet. Test Greek, 1871) reads en to poiesai me eleemosunen exelthen, where Manasses is omitted and Achiacharus is understood as the subject. Itala and Syriac go a step further and read Achiacharus as subject. But Codex Vaticanus (followed by Swete, the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American)) reads Manasses, which must be the correct reading on the principle of being the most difficult. Explanations have been offered  (1) that Manasses is simply the Hebrew name for Achiacharus, it not being uncommon for a Jew to have a Greek and a Hebrew name;  (2) that on reading Amon, Manasses was inserted for Achiacharus according to  2 Chronicles 33:22 ;;  (3) that Manasses here is an incorrect reading for Nasbas (Tobit 11:18), identified by Grotius with Achiacharus: "It seems impossible at present to arrive at a satisfactory explanation" (Fuller, Speaker's Commentary).  There is as great uncertainty as to the person who conspired against Manasses: Aman, in Codex Alexandrinus, followed by the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American), who is by some identified with the Haman of Esther and Achiacharus with Mordecai; Adam, in Codex Vaticanus, followed by Swete; Itala Nadab; Syriac Ahab (Acab).  (4) A king of Judah ( Matthew 1:10  the King James Version, Greek form, the Revised Version (British and American) "Manasseh"), whose prayer forms one of the apocryphal books.  See  MANASSES, THE PRAYER OF .  (5) The elder son of Joseph ( Revelation 7:6 , the King James Version Greek form, the Revised Version (British and American) "Manasseh").  S. Angus  MANASSES, THE PRAYER OF  1. Name  2. Canonicity and Position  3. Contents  4. Original Language  5. Authenticity  6. Author and Motive  7. Date  8. Text and Versions  (1) Greek  (2) Latin  LITERATURE  The Prayer of Manasses purports to be, and may in reality be, the prayer of that king mentioned in  2 Chronicles 33:13, 18  f.  1. Name:  In Cod.  A. it is called simply "A Prayer of Manasses," in the London Polyglot "A Prayer of Manasses, King of the Jews." Its title in the Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) is "A Prayer of Manasses, King of Judah, when He Was Held Captive in Babylon." In Baxter's Apocrypha, Greek and English this Prayer appears at the end with the heading "A Prayer of Manasses, son of Ezekias" (equals Hezekiah).  2. Canonicity and Position:  The Greek church is the only one which has consistently reckoned this Prayer as a part of its Bible. Up to the time of the Council of Trent (1545-1563 A.D.), it formed a part of the Vulgate, but by that council it was relegated with 3 and 4 (1 and 2) Esdras to the appendix (which included uncanonical scriptures), "lest they should become wholly lost, since they are occasionally, cited by the Fathers and are found in printed copies. Yet it is wholly absent from the Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) of Sixtus V, though it is in the Appendix of the Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) of Clement VIII. Its position varies in manuscripts, versions and printed editions of the Septuagint. It is most frequently found among the odes or canticles following the Psalter, as in Codices Alexandrinus, T (the Zurich Psalter) and in Ludolf's Ethiopic Psalter. In Swete's Septuagint the Psalter of Solomon followed by the odes (Odai), of which The Prayer of Manasseh is the 8th, appear as an Appendix after 4 Maccabees in volume III. It was placed after 2 Chronicles in the original Vulgate, but in the Romanist Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) it stands first, followed by 3 and 4 (1 and 2) Esdras in the apocryphal Appendix. It is found in all manuscripts of the Armenian Bible, where, as in Swete's Septuagint, it is one of many odes. Though not included in Coverdale's Bible or the Geneva VS, it was retained (at the close of the Apocrypha) in Luther's translation, in Mathew's Bible and in the Bishops' Bible, whence it passed into our English Versions of the Bible.  3. Contents:  According to  2 Chronicles 33  (compare  2 Kings 21 ) Manasseh was exiled by the Assyrians to Babylon as a punishment for his sins. There he became penitent and earnestly prayed to God for pardon and deliverance. God answered his prayer and restored him to Jerusalem and to the throne. Though the prayer is mentioned in  2 Chronicles 33:13, 18 , it is not given, but this lack has been supplied in the The Prayer of Manasseh of the Apocrypha. After an opening invocation to the God of Abraham, Isaac, Judah and their righteous seed, the Creator of all things, most high, yet compassionate, who has ordained repentance, not for perfect ones like the patriarchs who did not need it, but for the like of the person praying, there follows a confession of sin couched for the most part in general terms, a prayer for pardon and a vow to praise God forever if this prayer is answered.  4. Original Language:  The bulk of scholars (Fritzsche, Reuss, Schurer, Ryssel, etc.) agree that this Prayer was composed in Greek. The Greek recension is written in a free, flowing and somewhat rhetorical style, and it reads like an original work, not like a translation. Though there are some Hebraisms, they are not more numerous or striking than usually meet us in Hellenistic Greek. It is of some importance also that, although Jewish tradition adds largely to the legends about Manasseh, it has never supplied a Hebrew version of the Prayer (see VERSIONS; TEXT OF THE OLD TESTAMENT). On the other hand, Ewald (Hist. Isr, I, 186; IV, 217, note 5, German edition, IV, 217), Furst (Gesch. der bibl. Lit., II, 399), Budde (ZAW, 1892, 39;), Ball (Speaker's Apocrypha) and others argue for a Hebrew original, perhaps existing in the source named of  2 Chronicles 33:18  (see Ryssel in Kautzsch, Die Apocrypha des Altes Testament, 167).  5. Authenticity:  Have we here the authentic prayer of Manasseh offered under the circumstances described in  2 Chronicles 33  ? Ewald and the other scholars named (see foregoing section), who think the Prayer was composed in Hebrew, say that we have probably here a Greek rendering of the Hebrew original which the Chronicler saw in his source. Ball, on the other hand, though not greatly opposed to this view, is more convinced that the Hebrew original is to be sought in a haggadic narrative concerning Manasseh. Even if we accept the view of Ewald or of Ball, we still desiderate evidence that this Hebrew original is the very prayer offered by the king in Babylon. But the arguments for a Greek original are fairly conclusive. Many Old Testament scholars regard the narrative of the captivity, prayer and penitence of Manasseh as a fiction of the Chronicler's imagination, to whom it seemed highly improper that this wicked king should escape the punishment (exile) which he richly deserved. So De Wette (Einleitung), Graf (Stud. u. Krit., 1859, 467-94, and Gesch. Bucher des Altes Testament, 174) and Noldeke (Schenkel's Bibelwerk, "Manasse"). Nothing corresponding to it occurs in the more literal narrative of  2 Kings 21 , an argument which, however, has but little weight. Recent discoveries of cuneiform inscriptions have taken off the edge of the most important objections to the historicity of this part of Chronicles. See Ball (op. cit., 361;) and Bissell (Lange's Apocrypha, 468). The likeliest supposition is that the author of the Prayer was an Alexandrian Jew who, with  2 Chronicles 33  before him, desired to compose such a prayer as Manasseh was likely to offer under the supposed circumstances. This prayer, written in excellent Alexandrian Greek, is, as Fritzsche points out, an addition to  2 Chronicles 33 , corresponding to the prayers of Mordecai and Esther added to the canonical Esther (Additions to Esther 13:8-14:19), and also to the prayer of Azarias (The So of the Three Children (Azariah) 1:2-22) and the So of the Three Young Men (The So of the Three Children (Azariah) 1:29-68) appended to the canonical Book of Daniel.  6. The Author and His Motive:  That the author was an Alexandrian Jew is made probable by the (Greek) language he employs and by the sentiments he expresses. It is strange to find Swete (Expository Times, II, 38) defending the Christian authorship of this Prayer. What purpose could the writer seek to realize in the composition and publication of the penitential psalm? In the absence of definite knowledge, one may with Reuss (Das Altes Testament, VI, 436) suppose that the Jewish nation was at the time given up to great unfaithfulness to God and to gross moral corruption. The lesson of the Prayer is that God will accept the penitent, whatever his sins, and remove from the nation its load of sufferings, if only it turns to God.  7. Date:  Ewald and Furst (op. cit.) hold that the prayer is at least as old as the Book of Chronicles (300 B.C.), since it is distinctly mentioned, they say, in  2 Chronicles 33:13, 18  f. But the original form was, as seen (compare 4 above), Greek, not Hebrew. Moreover, the teaching of the Prayer is post-Biblical. The patriarchs are idealized to the extent that they are thought perfect and therefore not needing forgiveness (33:8); their merits avail for the sinful and undeserving (33:1) (see Weber, Jud. Theologie, 292). The expressions "God of the Just" (33:8), "God of those who repent" (33:13), belong to comparatively late Judaism. A period about the beginning of the Christian era or (Fritzsche) slightly earlier would suit the character (language and teaching) of the Prayer. The similarity between the doctrines implied in The Prayer of Manasseh and those taught in apocryphal writings of the time confirms this conclusion. There is no need with Bertholdt to bring down the writing to the 2nd or 3rd century A.D. Fabricius (Liber Tobit, etc., 208) dates the Prayer in the 4th or 5th century A.D., because, in his opinion, its author is the same as that of the Apostolical Constitutions which has that date. But the source of this part of the Apostolical Constitutions is the Didaskalia (3rd century), and moreover both these treatises are of Christian origin, the Prayer being the work of an Alexandrian Jew.  8. Text and Versions:  (1) Greek:  The Greek text occurs in Codices Alexandrinus, T (Psalterium Turicence 262, Parsons). Swete (OLD TESTAMENT in Greek, III, 802-4) gives the text of Codex Alexandrinus with the variations of T. It is omitted from the bulk of ancient manuscripts and editions of the Septuagint, as also from several modern editions (Tischendorf, etc.). Nestle (Septuaginta Studien, 1899, 3) holds that the Greek text of Codices Alexandrinus, T, etc., has been taken from the Apostolical Constitutions or from the Didaskalia. The common view is that it was extracted by the latter from the Septuagint.  (2) Latin:  The Latin text in Sabatier (Bib. Sac. Latin, III, 1038) is not by Jerome, nor is it in the manner of the Old Latin; its date is later.  LITERATURE.  The outstanding literature has been cited in the foregoing article. Reference may be made to Howorth ("Some Unconventional Views on the Text of the Bible," PSBA, XXXI, 89;: he argues that the narrative concerning Manasseh, including the Prayer in the Apostolical Constitutions, represents a portion of the true Septuagint of  2 Chronicles 33 ).  T. Witton Davies  PRAYER OF MANASSES  See  MANASSES, THE PRAYER OF .
WINGS|     wingz (kanaph; pterux): Biblical references to the wings of birds are common, especially in Psalms, many of them exquisitely poetical. Often the wings of an eagle are mentioned because they are from 7 to 9 feet in sweep, of untiring flight, and have strength to carry heavy burdens: so they became the symbol of strength and endurance. Ancient monuments and obelisks are covered with the heads of bulls, lions, different animals, and men even, to which the wings of an eagle were added to symbolize strength. Sometimes the wings of a stork are used to portray strong flight, as in the vision of Zechariah: "Then lifted I up mine eyes, and saw, and, behold, there came forth two women, and the wind was in their wings; now they had wings like the wings of a stork; and they lifted up the ephah between earth and heaven" (5:9). The wings of a dove symbolized love. Wings in the abstract typified shelter, strength or speed, as a rule, while in some instances their use was ingenious and extremely poetical, as when Job records that the Almighty used wings to indicate migration: "And stretcheth her wings toward the south" (39:26). In  Psalm 17:8  there is a wonderful poetical imagery in the plea, "Hide me under the shadow of thy wings." In  Psalm 18:10  there is a reference to "the wings of the wind." And in 55:6 the Psalmist cries, "Oh that I had wings like a dove!" The brightness and peace of prosperous times are beautifully described in  Psalm 68:13 , the wings of a dove covered with silver, and her pinions with pale green gold.' The first rays of dawn are compared to "the wings of the morning" (139:9). Solomon was thinking of the swiftness of wings when he said, "For riches' certainly make themselves wings, like an eagle that flieth toward heaven" ( Proverbs 23:5 ). So also was Isaiah in 40:31, "They that wait for Yahweh shall renew their strength; they shall mount up with wings as eagles; they shall run, and not be weary; they shall walk, and not faint." In  Malachi 4:2  the King James Version, there is a beautiful reference, "But unto you that fear my name shall the Sun of righteousness arise with healing in his wings." the Revised Version (British and American) changes "his" to "its." Wings as an emblem of love were used by Jesus in the cry, "O Jerusalem.... how often would I have gathered thy children.... as a hen gathereth her chickens under her wings" ( Matthew 23:37 ).  Gene Stratton-Porter  MORNING, WINGS OF  See  ASTRONOMY, sec . I, 4.
HAGGAI|Festive, one of the twelve so-called minor prophets. He was the first of the three (Zechariah,  his contemporary,  and Malachi,  who was about one hundred years later,  being the other two) whose ministry belonged to the period of Jewish history which began after the return from captivity in Babylon. Scarcely anything is known of his personal history. He may have been one of the captives taken to Babylon by Nebuchadnezzar. He began his ministry about sixteen years after the Return. The work of rebuilding the temple had been put a stop to through the intrigues of the Samaritans. After having been suspended for fifteen years, the work was resumed through the efforts of Haggai and Zechariah ( Ezra 6:14 ), who by their exhortations roused the people from their lethargy, and induced them to take advantage of the favourable opportunity that had arisen in a change in the policy of the Persian government. (see  DARIUS  .) Haggai's prophecies have thus been characterized:, "There is a ponderous and simple dignity in the emphatic reiteration addressed alike to every class of the community, prince, priest, and people, `Be strong, be strong, be strong' ( 2:4 ). `Cleave, stick fast, to the work you have to do;' or again, `Consider your ways, consider, consider, consider' ( 1:5 ,  7; 2:15 ,  18). It is the Hebrew phrase for the endeavour, characteristic of the gifted seers of all times, to compel their hearers to turn the inside of their hearts outwards to their own view, to take the mask from off their consciences, to `see life steadily, and to see it wholly.'", Stanley's Jewish Church. (see  SIGNET .)  Haggai, Book of Consists of two brief, comprehensive chapters. The object of the prophet was generally to urge the people to proceed with the rebuilding of the temple. Chapter first comprehends the first address (2-11) and its effects (12-15). Chapter second contains, (1.) The second prophecy (1-9), which was delivered a month after the first. (2.) The third prophecy (10-19), delivered two months and three days after the second; and (3.) The fourth prophecy (20-23), delivered on the same day as the third. These discourses are referred to in  Ezra 5:1 ;  6:14 ;  Hebrews 12:26 . (Comp.  Haggai 2:7 ,  8,  22.) 
JARHA|     jar'-ha (yarcha`, meaning unknown): An Egyptian slave of Shesham, about Eli's time (compare HPN, 235), who married his master's daughter, and became the founder of a house of the Jerahmeelites ( 1 Chronicles 2:34 ).
HORSELEECH|Occurs only in  Proverbs 30:15  (Hebrews `alukah); the generic name for any blood-sucking annelid. There are various species in the marshes and pools of Palestine. That here referred to, the Hoemopis, is remarkable for the coarseness of its bite, and is therefore not used for medical purposes. They are spoken of in the East with feelings of aversion and horror, because of their propensity to fasten on the tongue and nostrils of horses when they come to drink out of the pools. The medicinal leech (Hirudo medicinalis), besides other species of leeches, are common in the waters of Syria. 
HATACH|Verity, one of the eunuchs or chamberlains in the palace of Ahasuerus ( Esther 4:5 ,  6,  9,  10). 
CHENAANAH|Merchant.  (1.) A Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 7:10 ).  (2.) The father of Zedekiah ( 1 Kings 22:11 ,  24). 
ETHIOPIA|Easton's Bible Dictionary 
HAROSHETH|Harosheth of the Gentiles  ( Judges 4:2 ) or nations, a city near Hazor in Galilee of the Gentiles, or Upper Galilee, in the north of Palestine. It was here that Jabin's great army was marshalled before it went forth into the great battlefield of Esdraelon to encounter the army of Israel, by which it was routed and put to flight ( Judges 4 ). It was situated "at the entrance of the pass to Esdraelon from the plain of Acre" at the base of Carmel. The name in the Hebrew is Harosheth ha Gojim, i.e., "the smithy of the nations;" probably, as is supposed, so called because here Jabin's iron war-chariots, armed with scythes, were made. It is identified with el-Harithiyeh. 
SHESHACH|( Jeremiah 25:26 ), supposed to be equivalent to Babel (Babylon), according to a secret (cabalistic) mode of writing among the Jews of unknown antiquity, which consisted in substituting the last letter of the Hebrew alphabet for the first, the last but one for the second, and so on. Thus the letters sh, sh, ch become b, b, l, i.e., Babel. This is supposed to be confirmed by a reference to  Jeremiah 51:41 , where Sheshach and Babylon are in parallel clauses. There seems to be no reason to doubt that Babylon is here intended by this name. (see  Streane's Jeremiah ,  l.c.) 
MISGAB|Height, a town of Moab, or simply, the height=the citadel, some fortress so called; or perhaps a general name for the highlands of Moab, as some think ( Jeremiah 48:1 ). In Isaiah 25:12, the word is rendered "high fort." 
CHEZIB|Deceitful, a town where Shelah, the son of Judah, was born ( Genesis 38:5 ). Probably the same as Achzib (q.v.). 
LAPPIDOTH|     lap'-i-doth, -doth (lappidhoth, "flames," "torches"; the King James Version, Lapidoth): Deborah's husband ( Judges 4:4 ). The Hebrew name is a feminine plural like Jeremoth ( 1 Chronicles 7:8 ), Naboth ( 1 Kings 21:1 ). The plural is probably intensive. Jewish interpreters have identified Lappidoth ("flames") with Barak ("lightning"). Some have taken the words rendered "wife of Lappidoth" ('esheth lappidhoth) as a description of Deborah, and have translated them, "woman of lights," i.e. maker of wicks for the sanctuary; or "woman of flames," referring to her prophetic zeal. These explanations are more interesting than probable.  John A. Lees
JETUR|An enclosure, one of the twelve sons of Ishmael ( Genesis 25:15 ). 
JABESH|Dry.  (1.) For Jabesh-Gilead ( 1 Samuel 11:3 , 9, 10). (2.) The father of Shallum ( 2 Kings 15:10 ,  13,  14), who usurped the throne of Israel on the death of Zachariah. 
ETAM|Eyrie.  (1.) A village of the tribe of Simeon ( 1 Chronicles 4:32 ). Into some cleft ("top, " A.V., ; R.V.,  "cleft") of a rock here Samson retired after his slaughter of the Philistines ( Judges 15:8 ,  11). It was a natural stronghold. It has been identified with Beit 'Atab, west of Bethlehem, near Zorah and Eshtaol. On the crest of a rocky knoll, under the village, is a long tunnel, which may be the "cleft" in which Samson hid. (2.) A city of Judah, fortified by Rehoboam ( 2 Chronicles 11:6 ). It was near Bethlehem and Tekoah, and some distance apparently to the north of (1). It seems to have been in the district called Nephtoah (or Netophah), where were the sources of the water from which Solomon's gardens and pleasure-grounds and pools, as well as Bethlehem and the temple, were supplied. It is now `Ain 'Atan, at the head of the Wady Urtas, a fountain sending forth a copious supply of pure water. 
TOAH|     to'-a.  See  NAHATH .
SHILLEMITES|   SHILLEM,   shil'-em, shil'-em-its (shillem, ha-shillemi): Shillem is found in  Genesis 46:24 , a son of Naphtali; Shillemites, his descendants, are mentioned in  Numbers 26:49 ; SHALLUM (which see) is found in  1 Chronicles 7:13 .
BAALMEON|Lord of dwelling, a town of Reuben ( Numbers 32:38 ), called also Beth-meon ( Jeremiah 48:23 ) and Beth-baal-meon ( Joshua 13:17 ). It is supposed to have been the birth-place of Elisha. It is identified with the modern M'ain, about 3 miles south-east of Heshbon. 
ERECH|(LXX.,  "Orech"), length, or Moon-town, one of the cities of Nimrod's kingdom in the plain of Shinar ( Genesis 10:10 ); the Orchoe of the Greeks and Romans. It was probably the city of the Archevites, who were transplanted to Samaria by Asnapper ( Ezra 4:9 ). It lay on the left bank of the Euphrates, about 120 miles south-east of Babylon, and is now represented by the mounds and ruins of Warka. It appears to have been the necropolis of the Assyrian kings, as the whole region is strewed with bricks and the remains of coffins. "Standing on the summit of the principal edifice, called the Buwarizza, a tower 200 feet square in the centre of the ruins, the beholder is struck with astonishment at the enormous accumulation of mounds and ancient relics at his feet. An irregular circle, nearly 6 miles in circumference, is defined by the traces of an earthen rampart, in some places 40 feet high." 
BETHHOGLAH|   BETH-HOGLAH  beth-hog'-la (beth-choghlah; Septuagint Baithaglaam, "house of partridge"): Mentioned in  Joshua 15:6 ;  Joshua 18:19 , identified with Ain Haijab ("partridge spring") lying between Jericho and the Jordan, where in 1874 there was still a ruined Greek monastery called Kasr Hajlah, dating from the 12th century. The ruins are now destroyed. In  Joshua 15:5 ;  Joshua 18:19  it is said to be at the mouth of the Jordan on a Tongue (Lisan) of the Salt Sea. But it is now several miles inland, probably because the Jordan has silt edition up a delta to that extent.  See  DEAD SEA .  George Frederick Wright
BACA|Baca, Valley of ( Psalm 84:6 ; R.V.,  "valley of weeping, " marg.,  "or balsam trees"), probably a valley in some part of Palestine, or generally some one of the valleys through which pilgrims had to pass on their way to the sanctuary of Jehovah on Zion; or it may be figuratively "a valley of weeping." 
ENAM|   ENAIM  e-na'-im (`enayim, "place of a fountain"; Ainan;  Genesis 38:14  (the King James Version "in an open place";  Genesis 38:21  the King James Version "openly")):  A place which lay between Adullam and Timnath; probably the same as Enam ( Joshua 15:34 ). Also mentioned in close connection with Adullam. It was in the Shephelah of Judah. The Talmud (Pesik. Rab. 23) mentions a Kephar Enaim. Conder proposes Khurbet Wady `Alin, which is an ancient site, evidently of great strength and importance, lying between Kh. `Ain Shems and the village of Deir Aban. The ruins crown a lofty and almost isolated hill; the greatest objection to the identification is that there is no fountain at all in the immediate neighborhood. There may have been one in earlier times. See  PEF, III, 128 .  E. W. G. Masterman
BEDAD|     be'-dad (bedhadh, "alone"): Father of Hadad, king of Edom "before there reigned any king over the children of Israel" ( Genesis 36:35   1 Chronicles 1:46 ).
HERMON|A peak, the eastern prolongation of the Anti-Lebanon range, reaching to the height of about 9,200 feet above the Mediterranean. It Marks the north boundary of Palestine ( Deuteronomy 3:8 ,   4:48 ;  Joshua 11:3 ,  17;  13:11 ;  12:1 ), and is seen from a great distance. It is about 40 miles north of the Sea of Galilee. It is called "the Hermonites" ( Psalm 42:6 ) because it has more than one summit. The Sidonians called it Sirion, and the Amorites Shenir ( Deuteronomy 3:9 ; Cant. 4:8). It is also called Baal-hermon ( Judges 3:3 ;  1 Chronicles 5:23 ) and Sion ( Deuteronomy 4:48 ). There is every probability that one of its three summits was the scene of the transfiguration (q.v.). The "dew of Hermon" is referred to ( Psalm 89:12 ). Its modern name is Jebel-esh-Sheikh, "the chief mountain." It is one of the most conspicuous mountains in Palestine or Syria. "In whatever part of Palestine the Israelite turned his eye northward, Hermon was there, terminating the view. From the plain along the coast, from the Jordan valley, from the heights of Moab and Gilead, from the plateau of Bashan, the pale, blue, snow-capped cone forms the one feature in the northern horizon." Our Lord and his disciples climbed this "high mountain apart" one day, and remained on its summit all night, "weary after their long and toilsome ascent." During the night "he was transfigured before them; and his face did shine as the sun." The next day they descended to Caesarea Philippi. 
EKER|     e'-ker ('eqer, "root"):  A Jerahmeelite ( 1 Chronicles 2:27 ).
BESAI|     be'-si (becay, "downtrodden"): The descendants of Besai (Nethinim) returned with Zerubbabel to Jerusalem ( Ezra 2:49   Nehemiah 7:52  = Basthai, 1 Esdras 5:31).
CHORAZIN|Named along with Bethsaida and Capernaum as one of the cities in which our Lord's "mighty works" were done, and which was doomed to woe because of signal privileges neglected ( Matthew 11:21 ;  Luke 10:13 ). It has been identified by general consent with the modern Kerazeh, about 2 1/2 miles up the Wady Kerazeh from Capernaum; i.e., Tell Hum. 
JOSE|     jo'-se (Iose): the King James Version form for "Jesus" (Iesous) in Luke's genealogy ( Luke 3:29 ), the Revised Version (British and American) Greek
JEHIAH|     je-hi'-a (yechiyah, "may Yahweh live!"): Keeper of the ark with Obed-edom ( 1 Chronicles 15:24 ), but in verse 18 the name is ye`i'el, JEIEL (which see)
ELIATHAH|To whom God will come, one of the foureen sons of the Levite Heman, and musician of the temple in the time of David ( 1 Chronicles 25:4 ). 
LASAEA|A city in the island of Crete ( Acts 27:8 ). Its ruins are still found near Cape Leonda, about 5 miles east of "Fair Havens." 
JEHOSHABEATH|     je-ho-shab'-e-ath (yehoshabh`ath, "Yahweh is an oath"): In  2 Chronicles 22:11  = JEHOSHEBA (which see) Compare  2 Kings 11:2 .
CHILION|The pining one, the younger son of Elimelech and Naomi, and husband of Orpah, Ruth's sister ( Ruth 1:2 ;  4:9 ). 
HELEZ|Strong, or loin (?)  (1.) One of Judah's posterity ( 1 Chronicles 2:39 ). (2.) One of David's warriors ( 2 Samuel 23:26 ). 
PHILETUS|Amiable, with Hymenaeus, at Ephesus, said that the "resurrection was past already" ( 2 Timothy 2:17 ,  18). This was a Gnostic heresy held by the Nicolaitanes. (see  ALEXANDER  .) 
MAGOG|Region of Gog, the second of the "sons" of Japheth ( Genesis 10:2 ;  1 Chronicles 1:5 ). In Ezekiel ( 38:2 ;  39:6 ) it is the name of a nation, probably some Scythian or Tartar tribe descended from Japheth. They are described as skilled horsemen, and expert in the use of the bow. The Latin father Jerome says that this word denotes "Scythian nations, fierce and innumerable, who live beyond the Caucasus and the Lake Maeotis, and near the Caspian Sea, and spread out even onward to India." Perhaps the name "represents the Assyrian Mat Gugi, or `country of Gugu,' the Gyges of the Greeks" (Sayce's Races,  etc.). 
TISHBITE|Elijah the prophet was thus named ( 1 Kings 17:1 ;  21:17 ,  28,  etc.). In  1 Kings 17:1  the word rendered "inhabitants" is in the original the same as that rendered "Tishbite," hence that verse may be read as in the LXX., "Elijah the Tishbite of Tishbi in Gilead." Some interpret this word as meaning "stranger," and read the verse, "Elijah the stranger from among the strangers in Gilead." This designation is probably given to the prophet as denoting that his birthplace was Tishbi, a place in Upper Galilee (mentioned in the apocryphal book of Tobit), from which for some reason he migrated into Gilead. Josephus, the Jewish historian (Ant. 8:13,  2), however, supposes that Tishbi was some place in the land of Gilead. It has been identified by some with el-Ishtib, a some place 22 miles due south of the Sea of Galilee, among the mountains of Gilead. 
SARID|     sa'-rid (saridh; Codex Vaticanus Esedekgola, Seddouk; Codex Alexandrinus Sarthid, Sarid): A place on the southern border of Zebulun to the West of Chisloth-tabor ( Joshua 19:10, 12 ). It is mentioned but not identified in Eusebius, Onomasticon. Probably we should read "Sadid," and in that case may with Conder locate it at Tell Shaddu, an artificial mound with some modern ruins and good springs, which stands on the plain, about 5 miles West of Iksal.
TITUS|Honourable, was with Paul and Barnabas at Antioch, and accompanied them to the council at Jerusalem ( Galatians 2:1 -3;  Acts 15:2 ), although his name nowhere occurs in the Acts of the Apostles. He appears to have been a Gentile, and to have been chiefly engaged in ministering to Gentiles; for Paul sternly refused to have him circumcised, inasmuch as in his case the cause of gospel liberty was at stake. We find him, at a later period, with Paul and Timothy at Ephesus, whence he was sent by Paul to Corinth for the purpose of getting the contributions of the church there in behalf of the poor saints at Jerusalem sent forward ( 2 Corinthians 8:6 ;  12:18 ). He rejoined the apostle when he was in Macedonia, and cheered him with the tidings he brought from Corinth ( 7:6 -15). After this his name is not mentioned till after Paul's first imprisonment, when we find him engaged in the organization of the church in Crete, where the apostle had left him for this purpose ( Titus 1:5 ). The last notice of him is in  2 Timothy 4:10 , where we find him with Paul at Rome during his second imprisonment. From Rome he was sent into Dalmatia, no doubt on some important missionary errand. We have no record of his death. He is not mentioned in the Acts.  Titus, Epistle to Was probably written about the same time as the first epistle to Timothy, with which it has many affinities. "Both letters were addressed to persons left by the writer to preside in their respective churches during his absence. Both letters are principally occupied in describing the qualifications to be sought for in those whom they should appoint to offices in the church; and the ingredients of this description are in both letters nearly the same. Timothy and Titus are likewise cautioned against the same prevailing corruptions, and in particular against the same misdirection of their cares and studies. This affinity obtains not only in the subject of the letters, which from the similarity of situation in the persons to whom they were addressed might be expected to be somewhat alike, but extends in a great variety of instances to the phrases and expressions. The writer accosts his two friends with the same salutation, and passes on to the business of his letter by the same transition (Comp.  1 Timothy 1:2 ,  3 with  Titus 1:4 ,  5;  1 Timothy 1:4  with  Titus 1:13 ,  14;  3:9 ;  1 Timothy 4:12  with  Titus 2:7 ,  15).", Paley's Horae Paulinae. The date of its composition may be concluded from the circumstance that it was written after Paul's visit to Crete ( Titus 1:5 ). That visit could not be the one referred to in  Acts 27:7 , when Paul was on his voyage to Rome as a prisoner, and where he continued a prisoner for two years. We may warrantably suppose that after his release Paul sailed from Rome into Asia and took Crete by the way, and that there he left Titus "to set in order the things that were wanting." Thence he went to Ephesus, where he left Timothy, and from Ephesus to Macedonia, where he wrote First Timothy, and thence to Nicopolis in Epirus, from which place he wrote to Titus, about A.D. 66 or 67. In the subscription to the epistle it is said to have been written from "Nicopolis of Macedonia," but no such place is known. The subscriptions to the epistles are of no authority, as they are not authentic. 
FELLOES|     fel'-oz ( 1 Kings 7:33 ).  See  WHEEL .
CHETH|     See  CHETH .
MIZPAH|Or Miz'peh, watch-tower; the look-out.  (1.) A place in Gilead, so named by Laban, who overtook Jacob at this spot ( Genesis 31:49 ) on his return to Palestine from Padan-aram. Here Jacob and Laban set up their memorial cairn of stones. It is the same as Ramath-mizpeh ( Joshua 13:26 ). (2.) A town in Gilead, where Jephthah resided, and where he assumed the command of the Israelites in a time of national danger. Here he made his rash vow; and here his daughter submitted to her mysterious fate ( Judges 10:17 ;  11:11 ,  34). It may be the same as Ramoth-Gilead ( Joshua 20:8 ), but it is more likely that it is identical with the foregoing, the Mizpeh of  Genesis 31:23 , 25, 48, 49. (3.) Another place in Gilead, at the foot of Mount Hermon, inhabited by Hivites ( Joshua 11:3 ,  8). The name in Hebrew here has the article before it, "the Mizpeh," "the watch-tower." The modern village of Metullah, meaning also "the look-out," probably occupies the site so called. (4.) A town of Moab to which David removed his parents for safety during his persecution by Saul ( 1 Samuel 22:3 ). This was probably the citadel known as Kir-Moab, now Kerak. While David resided here he was visited by the prophet Gad, here mentioned for the first time, who was probably sent by Samuel to bid him leave the land of Moab and betake himself to the land of Judah. He accordingly removed to the forest of Hareth (q.v.), on the edge of the mountain chain of Hebron. (5.) A city of Benjamin, "the watch-tower", where the people were accustomed to meet in great national emergencies ( Joshua 18:26 ;  Judges 20:1 ,  3;  21:1 ,  5;  1 Samuel 7:5 -16). It has been supposed to be the same as Nob ( 1 Samuel 21:1 ;  22:9 -19). It was some 4 miles north-west of Jerusalem, and was situated on the loftiest hill in the neighbourhood, some 600 feet above the plain of Gibeon. This village has the modern name of Neby Samwil, i.e., the prophet Samuel, from a tradition that Samuel's tomb is here. (see  NOB .) Samuel inaugurated the reformation that characterized his time by convening a great assembly of all Israel at Mizpeh, now the politico-religious centre of the nation. There, in deep humiliation on account of their sins, they renewed their vows and entered again into covenant with the God of their fathers. It was a period of great religious awakening and of revived national life. The Philistines heard of this assembly, and came up against Israel. The Hebrews charged the Philistine host with great fury, and they were totally routed. Samuel commemorated this signal victory by erecting a memorial-stone, which he called "Ebenezer" (q.v.), saying, "Hitherto hath the Lord helped us" ( 1 Samuel 7:7 -12). 
MACHBANAI|Clad with a mantle, or bond of the Lord, one of the Gadite heroes who joined David in the wilderness ( 1 Chronicles 12:13 ). 
BOUNDS|     boundz: gabhal = "to twist" (as a rope), "to make an enclosure" (as by a line) occurs in  Exodus 19:12, 23   Psalm 104:9 ; gebhul = "a cord," hence, "a boundary," "territory" ( Exodus 23:31  the King James Version), with its feminine form gebhulah ( Deuteronomy 32:8   Isaiah 10:13 ); choq = "enactment," "appointment" (of time, space, quantity, labor, or usage), hence, "commandment," "decree," "ordinance" ( Job 14:5 ;  Job 26:10  the King James Version); in the Greek, horothesia, in the sense of "a limit," "boundary line," occurs in  Acts 17:26 .
LANGUAGES|    OF THE OLD TESTAMENT  lan'-gwaj-es  I. THE SEMITIC LANGUAGES  1. Members of Semitic Family  2. The Name Hebrew  3. Old Hebrew Literature  II. HISTORY OF THE HEBREW LANGUAGE  1. Oldest Form of Language  2. The Hebrew of the Old Testament  3. Its Uniformity  4. The Cause Thereof  5. Differences Due to Age  6. Differences of Style  7. Foreign Influences  8. Poetry and Prose  9. Home of the Hebrew Language  10. Its Antiquity  11. When Hebrew Became a Dead Language  III. CHIEF CHARACTERISTICS OF HEBREW  1. Characteristic Sounds  2. Letters Representing Two Sounds  3. Consonants Representing Vowels  4. The Syllable  5. Three-Letter Roots  6. Conjugations or Derived Stems  7. Absence of Tenses  8. The Pronouns  9. Formation of Nouns  10. Internal Inflexion  11. Syntax of the Verb  12. Syntax of the Noun  13. Poverty of Adjectives  IV. BIBLICAL ARAMAIC  1. Aramaic Portions of the Old Testament  2. Phonology  3. Grammar  4. Syntax  5. Aramaic More Decadent than Hebrew  V. LITERARY CHARACTERISTICS OF THE SEMITES  1. Concrete and Abstract  2. View of Nature  3. Pictorial Imagination  4. Prose and Poetry  5. Hebrew Easy of Translation  LITERATURE  There were only two languages employed in the archetypes of the Old Testament books (apart from an Egyptian or Persian or Greek word here and there), namely, Hebrew and Biblical Aramaic, both of which belong to the great family of languages known as Semitic.  I. The Semitic Languages.  The languages spoken in Southwestern Asia during the historical period dealt with in the Bible have been named Shemitic, after the son of Noah from whom the majority of peoples speaking these languages-Arabs, Hebrews, Arameans and Assyrians ( Genesis 10:21 )-were descended. To show, however, that the description does not fit exactly the thing described-the Elamites and Lydians having probably not spoken a Shemitic language, and the Canaanites, including Phoenicians, with the colonists descended from those at Carthage and elsewhere in the Mediterranean coast lands, as well as the Abyssinians (Ethiopians), who did, being reckoned descendants of Ham ( Genesis 9:18 ;  Genesis 10:6 )-the word is now generally written "Semitic," a term introduced by Eichhorn (1787). These languages were spoken from the Caspian Sea to the South of Arabia, and from the Mediterranean to the valley of the Tigris.  1. Members of Semitic Family:  The following list shows the chief members of this family:  (1) South Semitic or Arabic:  Including the language of the Sabean (Himyaritic) inscriptions, as well as Ge'ez or Ethiopic. Arabic is now spoken from the Caucasus to Zanzibar, and from the East Indies to the Atlantic.  (2) Middle Semitic or Canaanitish:  Including Hebrew, old and new, Phoenician, with Punic, and Moabite (language of MS).  (3) North Semitic or Aramaic:  Including  (a) East Aramaic or Syrian (language of Syrian Christians), language of Babylonian Talmud, Mandean;  (b) West or Palestinian Aramaic of the Targums, Palestinian Talmud (Gemara), Biblical Aramaic ("Chaldee"), Samaritan, language of Nabatean inscriptions.  (4) East Semitic:  Language of Assyria-Babylonian inscriptions.  2. The Name Hebrew:  With the exception of a few chapters and fragments mentioned below, the Old Testament is written entirely in Hebrew. In the Old Testament itself this language is called "the Jews' " ( 2 Kings 18:26, 28 ). In  Isaiah 19:18  it is called poetically, what in fact it was, "the language (Hebrew `lip') of Canaan." In the appendix to the Septuagint of Job it is called Syriac; and in the introduction to Ecclesiasticus it is for the first time-that is, in 130 B.C.-named Hebrew. The term Hebrew in the New Testament denotes the language of the Old Testament in  Revelation 9:11 , but in  John 5:2 ;  John 19:13, 17  this term means the vernacular Aramaic. In other passages it is doubtful which is meant. Josephus uses the same name for both. From the time of the Targums, Hebrew is called "the sacred tongue" in contrast to the Aramaic of everyday use. The language of the Old Testament is called Old Hebrew in contrast to the New Hebrew of the Mishna, the rabbinic, the Spanish poetry, etc.  3. Old Hebrew Literature: Of Old Hebrew the remains are contained almost entirely in the Old Testament. A few inscriptions have been recovered, i.e., the Siloam Inscriptions, a Hebrew calendar, a large number of ostraka from Samaria, a score of pre-exilic seals, and coins of the Maccabees and of the time of Vespasian and Hadrian.  LITERATURE.  E. Renan, Histoire generale et systeme compare des langues semitiques; F. Hommel, Die semit. Volker u. Sprachen; the comparative grammars of Wright and Brockelmann; CIS; article "Semitic Languages" in Encyclopedia Brit, and Murray's Illustrated Bible Dictionary.  II. History of the Hebrew Language.  Hebrew as it appears to us in the Old Testament is in a state of decadence corresponding to the present position of spoken Arabic. In the earliest period it no doubt resembled the classical Arabic of the 7th and following centuries. The variations found between the various strata of the language occurring in the Old Testament are slight compared with the difference between modern and ancient Arabic.  1. Oldest Form of Language:  Hebrew was no doubt originally a highly inflected language, like classical Arabic. The noun had three cases, nominative, genitive, and accusative, ending in -um', -im, -am, respectively, as in the Sabean inscriptions. Both verbs and nouns had three numbers (singular, dual and plural) and two genders, masculine and feminine In the noun the dual and plural had two cases. The dual and 2nd and 3rd person plural and 2nd person singular feminine of the imperfect of the verb ended in nun. In certain positions the "m" of the endings -um, -im, -am in the noun was dropped. The verb had three moods, indicative, subjunctive, and jussive, ending in -u, -a, and -, respectively; as well as many forms or stems, each of which had an active and passive voice.  2. The Hebrew of the Old Testament:  In the Hebrew of the Old Testament most of these inflexions have disappeared. Of the three cases of the noun only the accusative -am has survived in a few adverbial forms, such as 'omnam, "truly." The dual has entirely disappeared from the verb, and also from the noun, with the exception of things that occur in pairs, such as hand, eye, which have no plural. The nom. case of the dual and plural of the noun has disappeared, and the oblique case is used for both. Except in cases of poetic archaism the final nun of the verb has been lost, and, as the final vowels have fallen away in verbs, as well as in nouns, the result is that the jussive forms serve for indicative and subjunctive also. Many of the forms or stems have fallen into desuetude, and the passive forms of two alone are used.  3. Its Uniformity:  One of the most remarkable facts connected with the Hebrew of the Old Testament is that although that literature extends through a period of over 1,000 years, there is almost no difference between the language of the oldest parts and that of the latest. This phenomenon is susceptible of several explanations. In the first place, nearly the whole of the Old Testament literature is religious in character, and as such the earliest writings would become the model for the later, just as the Koran-the first prose work composed in Arabic which has survived-has become the pattern for all future compositions. The same was true for many centuries of the influence of Aristophanes and Euripides upon the language of educated Greeks, and, it is said, of the influence of Confucius upon that of the learned Chinese.  4. The Cause Thereof:  But a chief cause is probably the fact that the Semitic languages do not vary with time, but with place. The Arabic vocabulary used in Morocco differs from that of Egypt, but the Arabic words used in each of these countries have remained the same for centuries-in fact, since Arabic began to be spoken in them. Similarly, the slight differences which are found in the various parts of the Old Testament are to be ascribed, not to a difference of date, but to the fact that some writers belonged to the Southern Kingdom, some to the Northern, some wrote in Palestine, some in Babylonia (compare  Nehemiah 13:23, 24   Judges 12:6 ;  Judges 18:3 ).  5. Differences Due to Age:  The Old Testament literature falls into two main periods: that composed before and during the Babylonian exile, and that which falls after the exile. But even between these two periods the differences of language are comparatively slight, so that it is often difficult or impossible to say on linguistic grounds alone whether a particular chapter is pre-exilic or post-exilic, and scholars of the first rank often hold the most contrary opinions on these points. For instance, Dillmann places the so-called Document P (Priestly Code) before Document D (Deuteronomic Code) in the regal period, whereas most critics date D about 621 and P about 444 B.C.  6. Differences of Style:  It is needless to add that the various writers differ from one another in point of style, but these variations are infinitesimal compared with those of Greek and Latin authors, and are due, as has been said above, largely to locality and environment. Thus the style of Hosea is quite different from that of his contemporary Amos, and that of Deutero-Isaiah shows very distinctly the mark of its place of composition.  7. Foreign Influences:  A much more potent factor in modifying the language was the influence of foreign languages upon Hebrew, especially in respect to vocabulary. The earliest of these was probably Egyptian but of much greater importance was Assyrian, from which Hebrew gained a large number of loan words. It is well known that the Babylonian script was used for commercial purposes throughout Southwestern Asia, even before the Hebrews entered Canaan (see TEXT AND MANUSCRIPTS OF THE NEW TESTAMENT; TEXT OF THE OLD TESTAMENT), but the influence of Babylon upon Palestine seems to have been greatly exaggerated. The main point of contact is in the mythology, which may have been common to both peoples. In the later, especially post-exilic stages of the language, many Aramaisms are found in respect to syntax as well as vocabulary; and in later phases still, Persian and even Greek words are found.  8. Poetry and Prose:  As in other languages, so in Hebrew, the vocabulary of the poetical literature differs from that of the prose writers. In Hebrew, however, there is not the hard-and-fast distinction between these two which obtains in the classics. Whenever prose becomes elevated by the importation of feeling, it falls into a natural rhythm which in Hebrew constitutes poetry. Thus most of the so-called prophetical books are poetical in form. Another mark of poetry is a return to archaic grammatical forms, especially the restoration of the final nun in the verb.  9. Home of the Hebrew Language:  The form of Semitic which was indigenous in the land of Canaan is sometimes called Middle Semitic. Before the Israelites entered the country, it was the language of the Canaanites from whom the Hebrews took it over. That Hebrew was not the language of Abraham before his migration appears from the fact that he is called an Aramean ( Deuteronomy 26:5 ), and that Laban's native language was Aramaic ( Genesis 31:47 ). A further point is that the word "Sea" is used for the West and "Negeb" for the South, indicating Palestine as the home of the language (so  Isaiah 19:18 ).  10. Its Antiquity:  As the aboriginal inhabitants of the land of Canaan were not Semites, we cannot infer the existence of the Hebrew language any earlier than the first immigrations of Semites into Palestine, that is, during the third millennium B.C. It would thus be a much younger member of the Semitic family than Assyrian-Babylonian, which exhibits all the marks of great antiquity long before the Hebrew language is met with.  11. When Hebrew Became a Dead Language:  The Babylonian exile sounded the death-knell of the Hebrew language. The educated classes were deported to Babylon or fled to Egypt, and those who remained were not slow to adopt the language used by their conquerors. The old Hebrew became a literary and sacred tongue, the language of everyday life being probably Aramaic. Whatever may be the exact meaning of  Nehemiah 8:8 , it proves that the people of that time had extreme difficulty in understanding classical Hebrew when it was read to them. Yet for the purpose of religion, the old language continued to be employed for several centuries. For patriotic reasons it was used by the Maccabees, and by Bar Cochba (135 A.D.).  LITERATURE.  Gesenius, Geschichte der hebr. Sprache und Schrift; Bertheau, "Hebr. Sprache" in RE, 2nd edition; see also "Literature" in the following section.  III. Chief Characteristics of Hebrew.  The special marks which particularly distinguish a language may be found in its alphabet, in its mode of inflection, or in its syntax.  1. Characteristic Sounds:  The Hebrew alphabet is characterized by the large number of guttural sounds which it contains, and these are not mere palatals like the Scotch or German chapter, but true throat sounds, such as are not found in the Aryan languages. Hence, when the Phoenician alphabet passed over into Greece, these unpronounceable sounds, " ` " (`ayin), "ch" (cheth), "h" (he), " ' " ('aleph) were changed into vowels, A, E, H, O. In Hebrew the guttural letters predominate. "In the Hebrew dictionaries the four gutturals occupy considerably more than a fourth part of the volume; the remaining eighteen letters occupying considerably less than three-fourths." Besides the guttural, there are three strong consonants "m" (mem), "q" (qoph), and "ts" (tsade), which are sounded with compression of the larynx, and are quite different from our "t," "k" and "s." In Greek, the first was softened into a "th" (theta), the other two were dropped as letters but retained as numerals.  2. Letters Representing Two Sounds:  Though the Hebrew alphabet comprises no more than 22 letters, these represent some 30 different sounds, for the 6 letters b, g, d, k, p and t, when they fall immediately after a vowel, are pronounced bh(v), gh, dh, kh, ph (f) and th. Moreover, the gutturals "ch" (cheth) and " ` " (`ayin) each represent two distinct sounds, which are still in use in Arabic. The letter "h" is sometimes sounded at the end of a word as at the beginning.  3. Consonants Representing Vowels:  A peculiarity of the Hebrew alphabet is that the letters are all consonants. Four of these, however, were very early used to represent vowel and diphthong sounds, namely, " ' ", "h", "w" and "y". So long as Hebrew was a spoken language no other symbols than these 22 letters were used. It was not until the 7th century A.D. at the earliest that the well-known elaborate system of signs to represent the vowels and other sounds was invented (see TEXT AND MANUSCRIPTS OF THE NEW TESTAMENT; TEXT OF THE OLD TESTAMENT).  4. The Syllable:  A feature of the Hebrew language is that no word or syllable may begin with a vowel: every syllable begins with a consonant. This is also true of the other Semitic languages, except Assyrian-Babylonian. When in the course of word-formation a syllable would begin with a vowel, the slight consonant ' ('aleph) is prefixed. Moreover, more than two consonants may not stand without vowels intervening, as in the English word "strength." At most, two consonants may begin a syllable, and even so a slight vowel is sounded between them, as qero'. A word may end in two consonants without vowels, as 'amart, but no word or syllable ends in more than two.  5. Three-Letter Roots:  The outstanding feature of the Semitic family of languages is the root, consisting of three consonants. Practically, the triliteral root is universal. There are a few roots with more than three letters, but many of the quadriliteral roots are formed by reduplication, as kabkab in Arabic. Many attempts have been made to reduce three-letter stems to two-letter by taking the factors common to several roots of identical meaning. Thus duwm, damah, damam, "to be still," seem all to come from a root d-m. It is more probable, however, that the root is always triliteral, but may appear in various forms.  6. Conjugations or Derived Stems:  From these triliteral roots all parts of the verbs are formed. The root, which, it ought to be stated, is not the infinitive, but the 3rd singular masculine perfect active, expresses the simple idea without qualification, as shabhar, "he broke." The idea of intensity is obtained by doubling the middle stem letter, as shibber, "he broke in fragments"; the passive is expressed by the u-vowel in the first place and the a-vowel in the last, as shubbar, "it was broken in fragments." The reflexive sense prefixes an "n" to the simple root, or a "t" (taw) to the intensive, but the former of these is often used as a passive, as nishbar, "it was broken," hithqaddesh, "he sanctified himself." The causative meaning is given by prefixing the letter "h", as malakh, "he was king," himlikh, "he caused (one) to be king." A somewhat similar method of verb building is found outside the Semitic language, for example, in Turkish. In some of these Semitic languages the number of formations is very numerous. In Hebrew also there are traces of stems other than those generally in use.  7. Absence of Tenses:  There are no tenses in Hebrew, in our sense of the word. There are two states, usually called tenses, the perfect and the imperfect. In the first the action is regarded as accomplished, whether in the past or future, as shabhar, "he broke," "he has broken," "he will have broken," or (in prophetic narrative) "he will break"; in the second, the action is regarded as uncompleted, "he will break," "he was breaking," "he is breaking," etc. The present is often expressed by the participle.  8. The Pronouns:  The different persons, singular and plural, are expressed by affixing to the perfect, and by prefixing to the imperfect, fragments of the personal pronouns, as shabharti, "I broke," shabharnu, "we broke," nishbor, "we will break," and so on. The fragments which are added to the perfect to express the nominative of the pronouns are, with some modification, especially the change of "t" into "k", added to the verb to express the accusative, and to the noun to express the genitive; for example, shabharta, "you broke," shebharekha, "he broke you," bethekha, "your house"; capharnu, "we counted," cepharanu, "he counted us," ciphrenu, "our book."  9. Formation of Nouns:  The same principles are followed in regard to the noun as to the verb. Many nouns consist solely of the three stem-letters articulated with one or with two vowels, except that monosyllables generally become dissyllabic, owing to the difficulty of pronouncing two vowelless consonants together: thus, melekh, "king," cepher, "book," goren, "threshingfloor" (instead of malk, ciphr, gorn), dabhar, "a word or thing," qarobh, "near." Nouns denoting place, instrument, etc., are often formed by prefixing the letter "m" to the root, as mishpat, "justice" from shaphat, "he judged," mazlegh, "a fork." Intensity is, given to the root idea, as in the verb, by doubling the middle consonant: thus, choresh "working," charash (for charrash), "workman"; gonebh, "stealing," gannabh, "a thief." Similarly, words denoting incurable physical defects, 'illem, "dumb," `iwwer, "blind," cheresh (for chirresh), "deaf and dumb." The feminine of nouns, as of the 3rd person of verbs, is formed by adding the letter "t", which when final is softened to "h", gebhirah, "queen-mother," "mistress," but gebhirtekh, "your mistress."  10. Internal Inflexion:  The inflexion of both verbs and nouns is accompanied by a constant lengthening or shortening of the vowels of the word, and this according to two opposite lines. In verbs with vowel-affixes the penultimate vowel disappears, as halakh, "he went," halekhu, "they went"; in the noun the ante-penultimate vowel disappears, as dabhar, "a word," plural debharim. As the vowel system, as stated above, is very late, the vocalization cannot be accepted as that of the living tongue. It represents rather the cantillation of the synagogue; and for this purpose, accents, which had a musical as well as an interpunctional value, have been added.  11. Syntax of the Verb:  Hebrew syntax is remarkable for its simplicity. Simple sentences predominate and are usually connected by the conjunction "and." Subordinate sentences are comparatively rare, but descriptive and temporal clauses are not uncommon. In the main narrative, the predicates are placed at the beginning of the sentence, first simply in the root form (3rd singular masculine), and then only when the subject has been mentioned does the predicate agree with it. Descriptive and temporal clauses may be recognized by their having the subject at the beginning (e.g.  Genesis 1:2 ). A curious turn is given to the narrative by the fact that in the main sentences, if the first verb is perfect, those which follow are imperfect, and vice versa, the conjunction which coordinates them receiving a peculiar vocalization-that of the definite article. In the English Bible, descriptive and temporal clauses are often rendered as if they were parts of the main sentence, for example, in the first verses of Genesis of which the literal translation is somewhat as follows: "At the beginning of God's creating heaven and earth, when the earth was without form and void, and God's spirit (or, a great wind) moved upon the face of the water, God said, Let there be light." It will thus be seen that the structure of Hebrew narrative is not so simple as it appears.  12. Syntax of the Noun:  In the Semitic languages, compound words do not occur, but this deficiency is made up by what is called the construct state. The old rule, that the second of two nouns which depend on one another is put in the genitive, becomes, in Hebrew, the first of two such nouns is put in the construct state. The noun in the construct state loses the definite article, and all its vowels are made as short as possible, just as if it were the beginning of a long word: for example, ha-bayith, "the house," but beth ha-melekh, "the house of the king," "the palace"; dabhar, "a word," but dibhere ruach, "words of wind," "windy words."  13. Poverty of Adjectives:  The Hebrew language is very poor in adjectives, but this is made up for by a special use of the construct state just mentioned. Thus to express magnitude the word "God" is added in the gen. case, as in the example above ( Genesis 1:2 ), "a mighty wind" = a wind of God;  Psalm 36:6 , "the lofty mountains" = the mountains of God (so 68:15); 80:10, "goodly cedars" = cedars of God; so "a holy man" = a man of God; "the sacred box" = the ark of God, and so on; compare in the New Testament,  Matthew 27:54 , "the son of God" =  Luke 23:47 , "a righteous (man)." Matthew was thinking in Aramaic, Luke in Greek. A similar use is made of other words, e.g. "stubborn" = hard of neck; "impudent" = hard of face; "extensive" = broad of hands; "miserable" = bitter of soul.  LITERATURE.  The articles on the Hebrew Language in Schenkel's Bibel-Lexikon, 1875, by Noldeke; in Encyclopedia Brit, 9th edition, by Robertson Smith; 11th edition by Noldeke; in the Imperial Bible Dict., 1866, by T. H. Weir; also those in HDB, EB.  Grammars:  A. B. Davidson's Elementary Hebrew Grammar and Syntax; Gesenius, Hebrew Grammar, English translation by Cowley, 2nd edition.  Dictionaries:  Brown, Briggs and Driver, Hebrew and English Lexicon; Gesenius, Handworterbuch, 15th edition; Feyerabend, Hebrew-English Pocket Dictionary; Breslau, English and Hebrew Dictionary.  IV. Biblical Aramaic.  1. Aramaic Portions of the Old Testament:  The Aramaic portions of the Old Testament are the following:  Ezra 4:8-6:18 ;  Ezra 7:11-26   Daniel 2:4-7:28   Genesis 31:47  (two words);  Jeremiah 10:11 . The language in which they are written used to be called Chaldee, but is now generally known simply as Biblical Aramaic. It represents a further declension from classical Semitic as compared with the Hebrew. The following are the principal points in which Biblical Aramaic differs from Hebrew.  2. Phonology:  The accent is placed on the last syllable, the first vowel disappearing, e.g. `abhadh for Hebrew `abhadh. It is curious that the same feature is found in Algerene and Moroccan Arabic: thus qacr becomes qcar. Dentals take the place of sibilants: dehabh for zahabh; telath for shalosh. The strong Hebrew "ts" (tsade) frequently becomes " ` " (`ayin), and Hebrew " ` " (`ayin) becomes " ' " ('aleph): thus, 'ar`a' for 'erets; `uq for tsuq.  3. Grammar:  In Hebrew the definite article is the prefix hal (ha-); in Aramaic the affix a'; the latter, however, has almost lost its force. The dual is even more sparingly used than in Hebrew. The passive forms of verbs and those beginning with nun ("n") are practically wanting; the passive or reflexive forms are made by prefixing the letter "t" to the corresponding active forms, and that much more regularly than in Hebrew, there being three active and three passive forms.  4. Syntax:  In regard to syntax there is to be noted the frequent use of the participle instead of a finite verb, as in Hebrew; the disuse of the conjunction "and" with the vocalization of the article; and the disuse of the construct state in nouns, instead of which a circumlocution with the relative di is employed, e.g. tselem di dhehabh, "an image of gold." The same periphrasis is found also in West African Arabic.  5. Aramaic More Decadent than Hebrew:  It will thus be seen that if Hebrew represents a decadent form of an original classical language which was very similar to classical Arabic, Biblical Arabic stands on a still lower level. It is not to be supposed that Hebrew passed into Aramaic, though on the analogy of Arabic that view is not untenable. Rather, the different Semitic languages became fixed at different epochs. Arabic as a literary language crystallized almost at the source; Hebrew and the spoken Arabic of the East far down the stream; and Aramaic and Moroccan Arabic farthest down of all.  LITERATURE.  Kautzsch, Grammatik; Strack, Abriss des bibl. Aramaisch; Marti, Bibl. aram. Sprache; the articles on "Aramaic" or "Chaldee" in the Biblical Dicts. cited under III, and article ARAMAIC LANGUAGE in this Encyclopedia; the Hebrew text of Ezra, Nehemiah, Daniel, edition by Baer. Hebrew Dictionaries. generally include Biblical Aramaic.  V. Literary Characteristics of the Semites.  1. Concrete and Abstract:  The thinking of the Hebrews, like that of other Semites, was done, not in the abstract, but in the concrete. Thus, we find the material put for the immaterial, the expression for the thought, the instrument for the action, the action for the feeling. This mode of expression frequently gives rise to striking anthropomorphisms. Thus we have the eye for watchfulness or care ( Psalm 33:18 ); the long hand for far-reaching powers ( Isaiah 59:1 ); broken teeth for defeated malice ( Psalm 3:7 ); the sword for slaughter ( Psalm 78:62 ); haughty eyes for superciliousness ( Proverbs 6:17 ); to say in the heart for to think ( Psalm 10:6 ). It would be an interesting study to examine to what extent these expressions have been taken over from Hebrew into English.  2. View of Nature:  The Hebrew does not know the distinction between animate and inanimate Nature. All Nature is animate ( Psalm 104:29 ). The little hills rejoice ( Psalm 65:12 ); the mountains skip ( Psalm 114:4 ); the trees clap their hands ( Isaiah 55:12 ); even the stones may cry out ( Luke 19:40 ). Such expressions are not to be taken as mere poetical figures of speech; they are meant quite literally. All Nature is one: man is merely a part of Nature ( Psalm 104:23 ), even if he be the highest part ( Psalm 8:5 ). Hence, perhaps, it arises that there is no neuter gender in the Semitic languages.  3. Pictorial Imagination:  The highly imaginative nature of the Hebrew comes into play when he is recounting past events or writing history. To his mind's eye all past events are present. He sees history taking place before his eyes as in a picture. Thus the perfect may generally be translated by the English past tense with "have," the imperfect by the English present tense with "is" or "is going to." In livelier style the participle is used: "They are entering the city, and behold Samuel is coming out to meet them" ( 1 Samuel 9:14 ). Hence, the oratio recta is always used in preference to the oratio obliqua. Moreover, the historian writes exactly as the professional story-teller narrates. Hence, he is always repeating himself and returning upon his own words ( 1 Samuel 5:1, 2 ).  4. Prose and Poetry:  A result of the above facts is that there is no hard-and-fast distinction in Hebrew between prose and poetry. Neither is there in Hebrew, or in the Semitic language generally, epic or dramatic poetry, because their prose possesses these qualities in a greater degree than does the poetry of other races. All Hebrew poetry is lyric or didactic. In it there is no rhyme nor meter. The nearest approach to meter is what is called the qinah strophe, in which each verse consists of two parallel members, each member having five words divided into three and then two. The best example of this is to be found in  Psalm 19:7-9 , and also in the Book of LAMENTATIONS (which see), from which the verse has received its name.  Read Complete Article...    OLD TESTAMENT LANGUAGES  See  LANGUAGES OF THE OLD TESTAMENT .
JEZRAHIAH|     jez-ra-hi'-a.  See  IZRAHIAH .
ENHAKKORE|Fountain of the crier, the name of the spring in Lehi which burst forth in answer to Samson's prayer when he was exhausted with the slaughter of the Philistines ( Judges 15:19 ). It has been identified with the spring `Ayun Kara, near Zoreah. 
ZOPHAR|Chirping, one of Job's friends who came to condole with him in his distress ( Job 2:11 . The LXX. render here "king of the Mineans" = Ma'in,  Maonites,   Judges 10:12 ,  in Southern Arabia). He is called a Naamathite, or an inhabitant of some unknown place called Naamah. 
ELAMITES|   ELAM;   e'-lam, e'-lam-its (`elam; Ailam;  Jeremiah 49:36 . Codex Sinaiticus 'the original scribe' reads Elam)  The scene of the events of  1 Samuel 17:2 , referred to also in  1 Samuel 21:9 . There can be no doubt that this is the Wady ec Cun ("valley of the tercbinth"), or part of it. This is the southernmost of the great valleys which cut through the Shephelah. Commencing near Hebron, close to Beit Sur, it descends under the name Wady es Sur in a more or less northerly direction until near Beit Nettif where it turns abruptly west and receives the name Wady ec CunT. Here it is joined by the Wady en Najil, coming from the North, and from the East by the Wady el-Jindy, down which descends an ancient road from Bethlehem. Where all these valleys coalesce the Wady ec CunT expands into a wide and level bottom, half a mile across. On a steep hill to the southern side and a little Southeast of the wide expanse is Kh. esh-Shuweikeh, the site of Socoh. That the great events of  1 Samuel 17:2  took place here there can be no doubt: the Philistines ranged themselves upon the southern hills; the Israelites to the North or Northeast. Upon the wide level valley the contest with Goliath occurred. The exact position of Saul's forces may be a matter of speculation, but the late Principal Miller of Madras, who made a special study of the locality (Least of All Lands, chapter v), considered that the little valley ascending Northeast from Wady ec CunT to Belt Nettif was probably the actual Vale of Elah and that here the Israelites had their fortifications. His elucidation of the whole story is most convincing.  Contents  1. Geographical Position and Names 2. Surface Configuration 3. Mountain Ranges 4. Rivers 5. Climate 6. Vegetation 7. Fauna 8. The Population 9. The Principal Cities 10. Apirti and the "Bandit Nations" 11. The Languages of Elam 12. History (1) The Earliest Period (2) Sargon of Agade and His Successors (3) The Suzerainty of the Kings of Ur (4) Elam Becomes Predominant 2280 Years B.C. (5) The Extension of Elamite Authority Westward (6) Babylonia Again Supreme (7) Hurbatila's Challenge to Kuri-galzu (8) Elam Again Supreme (9) Elam Again Defeated, but Recovers (10) The Conflict between Elam and Assyria (11) Sennacherib against Chaldea and Elam (12) Assyrian Friendship and Elamite Ingratitude (13) Te-umman and the Elamite See d-royal; Assyria's Triumph (14) Elamite Ingratitude and Treachery (15) Elam's Further Changes of Rulers (16) King Tammaritu's Treachery (17) Dominion Passes from Assyria (18) The Later State of Elam 13. Elamite Religion 14. Elam's Importance; Her Literature 15. Art during the 1st and 2nd Prehistoric Periods 16. Art in the Archaic Period, That of the Viceroys, and That of the Kings 17. Temperament of the Inhabitants of Elam  LITERATURE  1. Geographical Position and Names:  A well-known tract, partly mountainous, whose western boundary, starting on the Northeast side of the Persian Gulf, practically followed the course of the lower Tigris. It was bounded on the North by Media, on the East by Persia and on the West by Babylonia. The Assyro-Babylonians called the tract Elamtu, expressed ideographically by the Sumerian characters for Nimma or Numma, which seems to have been its name in that language. As Numma or Elam apparently means "height," or the like, these names were probably applied to it on account of its mountainous nature. Another name by which it was known in early times was Ashshan, for Anshan or Anzan (Anzhan), one of its ancient cities. The great capital of the tract, however, was Susa (Shushan), whence its Greek name of Susiana, interchanging with Elymais, from the Semitic Elam.  2. Surface Configuration:  Elam consisted of a plain occupying a depression in the mountains of Iran or Persia. Of this the smaller part-which, however, was also the most ancient historically-lay between the Pusht-e-Kuh on the West, the Lur mountains on the North, the Bakhtiari heights to the East and Southeast, and the hills of Ahwaz to the South. The larger plain has as its northern boundary these same Ahwaz hills, and reaches to the sea on the South.  3. Mountain Ranges:  The Pusht-e-Kuh mountains are a series of very high parallel ranges described as "a veritable wall" between Mesopotamia and the elevated depression of the Kerkha. Its principal peak is in the Kebir-Kuh (2,500 meters = 8,200 ft.)-a difficult range of surprising regularity. The valleys on the Southwest slope belong properly to Babylonia, and could be invaded on that side with ease, but Northeast of the Kebir-Kuh the country is well protected not only against Mesopotamia, on the West, but also against Persia on the East. The nomad Lurs of the present day are practically independent of Persia. The mountain ranges of Luristan increase in height as one approaches the Persian plain, the loftiest summits of the principal range attaining a height of 5,000 meters (= 16,400 ft.).  4. Rivers:  From these mountain ranges descend large rivers which flow through Elam to the sea. The Kerkha (Gamas-ab) rises in the Persian plain near Nehavend, and is practically a torrent until it reaches Susa, below which it becomes less rapid, and loses itself in the Hawizeh marshes. The Ab-e-Diz, a river with a greater volume of water, is formed by the uniting of two streams above Dizful. It is so violent that it carries down boulders and even tree-trunks from the mountains, and after a winding course joins the Karun at Kut-e-Bende-Kir. The Belad-Rud, between the Ab-e-Diz and the Kerkha, rises in the mountains of Luristan, and varies greatly as to its volume, being sometimes a mere brook, and at others a large river. The Karun, with which a number of small streams unite, rises in the Bakhtiari mountains. After receiving the Ab-e-Diz and the Belad-Rud at Kut-e-Bende-Kir, it becomes an important waterway, navigable as far as Shuster. This is identified with the Biblical Ulai (Assyrian Ulaa, classical Eulaeus). In ancient times emptying itself into the Persian Gulf, which in past centuries extended much farther inland than now, it at present joins the Shattel-Arab at Mohammerah.  5. Climate:  The climate is a variable one. Between November 1 and 15 the rains begin, with Southeast and South winds, and the mountains are covered with snow. In January and February there are violent storms, and the night brings 8 degrees or 10 degrees of frost. Spring begins at the end of February, and vegetation advances so rapidly that harvest takes place about the end of April. The wind then turns South and Southwest, bringing with it a heat rising sometimes to 140 degree F., destroying all the verdure of the country. Notwithstanding the rigors of the climate, however, it was in ancient times a well-populated district, and exceedingly fruitful, as now. That the district of Arabistan is poor and barren is due to the carelessness and improvidence of the people, who, like the people of the Turkish province of Bagdad, have neglected the ancient irrigation canals which fertilized the land.  6. Vegetation:  The vegetation of Susiana is said not to be very varied. On the river banks are to be found willows, tamarisks and many kinds of acacias. Apparently there are no forests-the sacred groves referred to by Assur-bani-apli are thought by De Morgan to have been artificial plantations. Oranges and lemons, which are at present cultivated there, are late importations. The date palm has been brought from the banks of the Shatt-el-Arab, and the pomegranate and other fruit trees from the Iranian plain. Wheat and barley, sown in October and November, are harvested in April. Sorghum remains in the ground all through the dry season, and is watered artificially until October, and cut in November. Castor beans, indigo, lentils, haricots, etc., are less cultivated.  7. Fauna:  The fauna is said at present to be less numerous than formerly. It contains species both of central Asia, Europe, and, to a certain extent, Africa. The elephant, wild ass, wild ox and ostrich are no longer to be found on the Chaldeo-Elamite plain, but a few examples of the lion still exist there. Bears, panthers, wild boars, wolves, wild cats, foxes, jackals, and several species of wild dogs, however, still exist. Numbers of porcupines inhabit the brushwood by the rivers and marshes. Among the birds which do not leave the country are the eagle, vulture, falcon, raven, francolin, martin, sparrow, tomtit, wagtail, etc. The winter birds of passage are the pelican, stork, crane, cormorant, sea gull, many species of wild duck, the wild goose, bustard, woodcock, snipe, pigeon, turtledove, and numerous brilliantly colored waders. The water-courses are full of fish, among them being the barbel, silurus, carp (sometimes of great size), and gurnards similar to those of the Nile. Some of the rivers being salt, sea fish are also to be found, and it is not rare to see sharks at Shuster, and eels in the lower Karun.  8. The Population:  The population is naturally not homogeneous. Arab tribes, who are in reality Semites, occupy the plains, while Iranians inhabit the cities and dwell at the mountain bases. According to De Morgan, the original population was mainly negritic, and has mingled with the Arab stock to such an extent that mulattoes among them are not rare. He regards this type as being represented among the soldiers as well as among the people conquered by Naram-Sin about 3000 B.C. Nevertheless pure Semites had settled in the country at a very early date, and it is probably on account of this that Elam is called ( Genesis 10:22 ) a son of Shem-indeed, the many Sere inscriptions found by the French explorers at Susa show how strong their influence was. It was to all appearance during the 2nd millennium B.C. that certain Kassites overran West Mesopotamia, and settled in the northern part of Elam, which was thereafter called by the Assyrians mat Kassi, "the land of the Cosseans." As these people seem to have spoken an Aryan language, there was apparently no really new race introduced in consequence of their invasion.  9. The Principal Cities:  The two principal cities were Susa or Shushan, called Susun in the native texts, and regarded as the old capital, situated on the Ulai (Karkha); and Anzan (Ashshan, Anshan), more to the Southwest. This latter was the capital of Cyrus the Great and his immediate predecessors, the tract having been conquered apparently by Sispis (Teispes), his ancestor, at the end of the 6th century B.C. Susa, an important commercial center in the 3rd millennium B.C., became again one of the three capitals of the Pets empire during the rule of the Achemenians.  10. Apirti and the "Bandit Nations":  From the inscriptions of Mal-Amir, to the East, we learn that that was the place of another kingdom called Apirti, the land of the Apharsites of  Ezra 4:9 . In the 2nd (so-called Median or Scythian) version of the late Persian inscriptions this name is given as Hapirti, Halpirti, and Haltupirti, and appears as the equivalent of the Babylonian Elammat (Elamtu) or Elam without the nominative ending. In the Persian version this appears as (H)uwaja or (H)uwazha, whence the modern Huz or Khuzistan. This implies that the kings of Apirti at one time held dominion over Susa, and perhaps the whole of Elam. Strabo (xi.13, 1, 6), quoting Nearchus, speaks of "four bandit nations" who occupied the mountains East of the Euphrates-the Amardians or Mardians on the Persian border, the Uxians, and Elymeans on the borders of Persia and Susa, and the Cosseans (Kassites) by the Medes. The Amardians would seem to have been the Apirti (Hapirti), the Uxians were probably from (H)uwaja, while the Elymeans (compare 1 Maccabees 6:1) were the Elamites. Among the tribes who made the history of the country, therefore, were probably the Uxians, who seem not to be mentioned in the early inscriptions.  11. The Languages of Elam:  The dialects of Susa, the second Achemenian VSS, and of Apirti, differ but slightly from each other. They are variants of an agglutinative tongue, and are apparently not related to any other known language. The statement in  Genesis 10:22 , therefore, applies only to the Semitic section of the population, as it is unlikely that the people speaking Apirtian could be described as "sons of Shem."  12. History:  (1) The Earliest Period.  Beginning with the semi-mythical period, we have the story of the fight of the Babylonian hero Gilgames with the Elamite tyrant Humbaba, who was defeated by the hero and his helper Enki-du, and beheaded. The earliest really historical reference to the Elamites as the foes of Babylonia, however, is apparently that contained in a letter from the priest Lu-enna to the priest En-e-tarzi announcing that the Elamites had invaded Lagas and carried off considerable booty. The writer, however, had attacked the Elamites, and taken plunder from them in his turn. As there seems to be a reference to division of spoil, this is an excellent parallel to the Elamite expedition, made in alliance with the Babylonians, against the cities of the plain ( Genesis 14 ).  (2) Sargon of Agade and His Successors.  Sargon of Agade, early in his reign, attacked the Elamites, but apparently Elam only fell under the dominion of the Babylonians during the time of Naram-Sin, his son, who is seemingly shown leading his troops in that region on the splendid stele bearing his name that was found at Susa. Elam apparently regained its independence, however, during the time of Uruwus king of Kis, who invaded the country, and brought back considerable spoil. One of the chiefs of Susa about this time was Simbi-ishak. Chaldean domination, however, did not last long, for Dungi, king of Ur of the Chaldees, about 2500 B.C., invaded the country, accompanied by his vassal Gudea, viceroy of Lagas. Dungi has left evidences of his conquests in the buildings which he erected at Susa, but the principal buildings of this period were constructed by Ba-sa-Susinak, son of Simbi-ishak, viceroy of Susa and potentate in Elam. He built a temple to the god Sugu, reservoirs, the gate of Susinak, and dug the Sidur canal. He was evidently one of the great rulers of the land.  (3) The Suzerainty of the Kings of Ur.  Somewhat later came Idadu I, his son Kal-Ruhuratir, and his grandson Idadu II, who in turn occupied the throne during the time of Bur-Sin, king of Ur. Elam was at this time still under Babylonian suzerainty, which continued under his successor, Gimil-Sin, who also built at Susa, his vassal being Ebarti-kin-Daddu, viceroy of Susa. Gimil-Sin was succeeded by his son Ibi-Sin as overlord in Elam, who invaded and devastated the country, probably to suppress a a revolt. There was apparently no ill-will between the two nations, however, for the viceroy of Susa is said to have married a daughter of Ibi-Sin. Another and possibly later viceroy seems to have married Mekubi, daughter of Billama, viceroy of Asnunnak, who, as Elamite princess, erected buildings at Susa.  (4) Elam Becomes Predominant 2280 Years B.C.  It was probably shortly after this that Kudur-Nahhunte threw off the Semitic yoke, and, invading Babylonia, brought back much spoil to Elam. The date indicated for this ruler by the inscriptions of Assurbani-apli is 2280 B.C. The positions of the rulers of Elam and Babylonia were now changed, and the kings of Babylon had to acknowledge Elamite suzerainty. As Elamite and Babylonian sovereign, Kudur-Nahhunte entrusted Susa to a feudatory ruler, and among the viceroys who governed Elam may be mentioned Sirukdu', who constructed at Susa, and Temti-Agun, his sister's son, who built in that city the temple to Isme-karab, "for the health of Kutir-Nahhunte and his family." After passing to other rulers, the government of Susa fell to Ebari, father of Silhaha, during whose reign Simti-Silhak ruled in Babylonia. Nur-Addi and Rim-Anum, kings of Larsa (Elassar), were his vassals.  (5) The Extension of Elamite Authority Westward.  Attapaksu (or Attahusu), Silhaha's sister's son, then became "shepherd of Susa." Among the temples which he built was one dedicated to the goddess Narute, and he erected a bridge near his residence. Kudur-mabuk, son of Simti-Silhak, was at this time adda ("father," probably meaning protector) of Emutbalu and the West-Amurru, the land of the Amorites, whither marched Chedorlaomer and Amraphel, with their allies, in the time of Abraham ( Genesis 14 ). Kudur-mabuk of Larsa was succeeded by his son Eri-Aku (probably the Iri-Agun of Larsa of the Elamite texts), and if he be really, as seems probable, the Arioch of  Genesis 14:1, 9 , then this is also the period when Chedorlaomer ruled in Elam. The strange thing, however, is, that the name of this last does not occur in any recognizable form, unless it be the Kudurlahgumal of certain half-legendary inscriptions (see CHEDORLAOMER). The Elamite line in Larsa was continued after the death of Eri-Aku by Rim-Sin, his brother, who succeeded him.  (6) Babylonia Again Supreme.  What the history of Elam during this period was remains to be discovered, but Hammurabi, who is identified with the Amraphel of  Genesis 14:1, 9 , seems to have invaded the country in his 30th year. In his 31st he defeated Rim-Sin of Larsa, following this up, in his 32nd, by overthrowing the army of Asnunnak. All these successes in Elam and its dependencies probably made the kingdom of Babylon supreme in the land. But more details bearing upon this period are needed. It is thought probable that the Elamite king Sadi(?) or Taki (?) came into conflict with, and was defeated by, Ammi-caduga, the 4th in descent from Hammurabi, who reigned about 1890 B.C. Apparently the Elamite ruler had tried to regain his independence, but failed.  (7) Hurbatila's Challenge to Kuri-galzu.  Omitting the names of rulers concerning whom but little or nothing is known, we come to the reign of Untas-Gal, patron of the articles Numerous temples were built by him, and sanctuaries at Susa dedicated. He has left a magnificent bronze statue representing his queen Napir-Asu. He seems to have been overthrown by Untahas-Gal, of a more legitimate line, who was likewise a builder of temples. After the apparently short reign of Kidin-Hutran came that of Hurpatila (Hurbatila), who, desiring to throw off the Babylonian yoke, challenged Kuri-galzu, king of Babylon, to battle at Dur-Dungi. The challenge was accepted, with disastrous results, for Hurbatila was captured by the Babylonian king at the place named. This, however, did not put an end to the strife, and in the end Kidin-Hutrudas was victorious over Belnadin-sum, king of Babylon, about 1180 B.C.  (8) Elam Again Supreme.  Later came the military exploits of Sutruk-Nahhunte, who invaded Babylonia, slew the king Zagaga-sum-iddina, and helped by his son Kutir-Nahhunte, destroyed Sippar, and took away the stele of Naram-Sin, the code of Hammurabi, and several other monuments, which were carefully preserved at Susa. He also defeated the king of Asnunnak. It is this collection of spoils which has contributed to make the success of the French excavations at Susa what it is.  (9) Elam Again Defeated, but Recovers.  The war between Babylonia and Elam recorded for the reign of Nebuchadrezzar I (circa 1020 B.C.) probably took place, according to Scheil, during the reign of Silbina-hamru-Laqamar. The Elamite king was defeated on the banks of the Ulai, Elam was ravaged, and much spoil taken. The principality called Namar was detached from Susian territory and reunited to the domain of Babylonia. Apparently the Elamites now turned their attention to regaining their military prestige, the result being that an Elamite king occupied the Babylonian throne from 939 to 934 B.C. The history of this period has still to be discovered, but the Babylonians apparently soon shook off the Elamite yoke. It is about this time, however, that another power-Assyria-appeared on the scene, and took the field-not only against Babylon, but also on the borders of Elam. An Elamite contemporary of Nabonassar of Babylon was Humbanigas, 742 B.C.  (10) The Conflict between Elam and Assyria.  At this time, however, the Assyrians became dominant in Babylonia (see TIGLATH-PILESER and SHALMANESER), but it was probably not until the reign of Sargon of Assyria (see SARGON) that Elam came into conflict with Assyria. Merodach-baladan, a pretender to the throne of Babylon, made common cause with Humbanigas, who fought with the Assyrian army at Der. Naturally the Assyrians claim the victory, but the Babylonians say that they were defeated. After the death of Humbanigas, his successor, Sutur-Nahhundi or Ishtar-hundu (Babylonian), still befriended Merodach-baladan, and advanced to his help. Sargon first attacked the Chaldeans and defeated them at Dur-Athara, and, entering Elam, stormed and captured the cities of the land. The Elamite king took refuge in the mountains, and Merodach-baladan had to resist the Assyrians unaided.  (11) Sennacherib against Chaldea and Elam.  As Sargon had his attention fully occupied elsewhere, he made no attempt to follow up his success, and it seems not to have been until the reign of Sennacherib that any serious invasion of the country on the part of the Assyrians was made. In 697 B.C. that king marched again against Merodach-baladan, who had taken refuge at Nagitu and other places on the Elamite side of then elongated Persian Gulf. Here the Chaldeans, with their Elamite allies, were defeated, and the Elamite cities plundered and destroyed. Hallusu, king of Elam, on the retirement of the Assyrian troops, invaded Babylonia as being part of the territories of the Assyrian king, and having captured Assur-nadin-sum, Sennacherib's son, who had ruled in Babylon 6 years, carried him off to Elam, setting Nergal-usezib on the throne of Babylonia. On the arrival of the Assyrian avenging host in Baby1onia, Nergal-usezib fled to Elam, but was captured near Niffer. The Elamites were evidently very dissatisfied with their king-possibly owing to his policy-and killed him in a revolt after a reign of six years. This action on the part of the Elamites, however, did not save the people from Assyrian vengeance, for Sennacherib invaded and ravaged the country from Ras to Bit-Burnaki. Apparently the Elamites had expected their new ruler, Kudurru (Kudur-Nahhunte), to save them from the reprisals of the Assyrians, but as he had failed to do this, he, in his turn, was deposed and killed after a reign of 10 months. The new king of Elam was Umman-Menanu, who espoused the cause of Musezib-Marduk, the new king of Babylon, and gathering a force of Babylonians and Elamites at Halule, fought a battle there, in which the Babylonians record success for the allies. Sennacherib, however, himself claims the victory, and describes with great wealth of detail the horrors of the fight. Next year (689 B.C.) Sennacherib marched into Babylonia to complete the work, and Musezib-Marduk, having been captured, was sent prisoner to Assyria. Umman-Menanu died at the end of the year, after a 4 years' reign, and was succeeded by Humba-haldasu I (689-682 B.C.), of whom nothing is known. In 682 B.C. Humba-haldasu II mounted the throne. The death of Sennacherib and the troubles attending the accession of Esarhaddon encouraged Nabuzer-napisti-Itsir, son of Merodach-baladan, again to raise the standard of revolt. Defeat was the result, and he fled to Elam, there to be captured by Humba-haldasu and put to death.  (12) Assyrian Friendship and Elamite Ingratitude.  Friendship with Assyria was a complete reversal of Elamite policy, and to all appearance peace, though probably unpopular, persisted between the two countries for several years. Humba-haldasu's two brothers revolted against him and assassinated him, and Urtaku, one of the murderers, took the Elamite throne. Not daring to be openly hostile to Assyria, however, he sent his brother Te-umman to intrigue in Chaldea in favor of a man named Nabuusallim, but the Chaldean chiefs answered that Na'id-Marduk, their lord, lived, and they were the servants of the king of Assyria. Also, during a famine in Elam, certain Elamite tribes migrated into Assyria to escape the scarcity, and were kindly treated by Assur-bani-apli, who had succeeded his father on the Assyrian throne. Notwithstanding this, however, Urtaku invaded Babylonia as ally of certain Chaldean tribes. Overtaken by the Assyrian army, he fought with them near his own border, but was defeated and fled. He died prematurely (by his own hand) the same year, and was succeeded by his brother Te-umman (Tepti-Humban).  (13) Te-umman and the Elamite See d-royal; Assyria's Triumph.  This king, who is described by Assur-bani-apli as being in the likeness of an evil spirit, immediately set to work to secure the death of all the sons of Urtaku and Umman-aldase (Humba-Haldasu II), his brother; and these princes, five in number, with 60 of the royal seed of Elam, fled and sought refuge with the Assyrian king. Te-umman immediately sent two messengers to Assur-bani-apli demanding the surrender of the fugitives. This was refused, and war broke out between the two countries immediately after. The Assyrians came up with the Elamites at Der, but Te-umman feared to join issue there, and retreating, took up a strong position near his capital, Susa, with his front protected by the river Ulai. Defections from his army now so weakened the forces of Te-umman that he endeavored to treat with Assur-bani-apli, who naturally refused to listen to terms, and ordered his troops to attack. The defeat of the Elamites was a foregone conclusion, and Te-umman perished, with his son, in the thick of the battle, as is dramatically depicted by the sculptors of Assur-bani-apli in the bas-reliefs which adorned the walls of his palace. An Assyrian general was now sent to Susa with Umman-igas, the prince chosen to succeed Te-umman, and he was proclaimed while the bodies of the fallen Elamites covered the battlefield, and the waters of the Ulai carried others down to the place of its outflow. Tammaritu, the new king's youngest brother, was at the same time made king of Hidalu, in the mountain region. In the triumphal procession at Nineveh which took place on the Assyrian army's return, the head of Te-umman and his son Tamritu figured, the former hanging from the neck of Dunanu, king of Gambulu, and the latter from the neck of Samgunu, Dunanu's brother.  (14) Elamite Ingratitude and Treachery.  For a time there was peace in Elam, but soon the discontent of Samas-sum-ukin, king of Babylon, Assur-bani-apli's brother, sought to break it. Urged by him, Umman-igas forgot the benefits which he had received at the hands of Assur-bani-apli, and sent an army into Babylonia under the command of Undasi, son of Te-umman, telling him to avenge upon Assyria the killing of his father. Notwithstanding the great strength of the allied army, they did not succeed in making headway against the Assyrians. Tammaritu, nephew of Umman-igas, after the defeat of the Elamite forces in Chaldea, revolted against him, and having defeated him, cut off his head, and took the crown. Samas-sum-ukin immediately turned his attention to the new ruler, and induced him by fresh presents to come likewise to his aid. Tammaritu therefore marched at the head of an army into Babylonia, but in his absence Indabigas, one of his servants, headed a revolt against him, and proclaimed himself king in Susa. In the battle which ensued between the two pretenders, Tammaritu was defeated, and fled to the seacoast with a part of the Elamite royal family. He ultimately embarked in a ship on the Persian Gulf with the intention of escaping, but was wrecked, and gave himself up to an Assyrian officer, who sent him to Assyria.  (15) Elam's Further Changes of Rulers.  Indabigas, the new Elamite king, now sent an embassy to make peace with Assur-bani-apli, who at once demanded the surrender of Nabu-bel-sumati, son of Merodach-baladan, and the Assyrians whom he had enticed and taken with him. Before this demand could reach Indabigas, however, his people had revolted against him and put him to death, and Umman-aldasu, son of Attametu, sat on the throne, after defeating Indabigas on the banks of the Huthut. The same demand was made to Ummanaldasu as had been made to Indabigas, but Nabubel-sumati, not wishing to fall into the hands of the Assyrians, called on his armor-bearer to dispatch him, and the two ran each other through with their swords.  (16) King Tammaritu's Treachery.  Nevertheless Assur-bani-apli decided to replace Tammaritu, the former Elamite king, on the throne, and to this end invaded Elam. The Assyrians were, as usual, successful, and on learning this, Umman-aldas fled to the mountains. Entering Susa, Tammaritu was once more proclaimed king of Elam, he, in return, promising to regard Assur-bani-apli as his lord, and to pay tribute. No sooner had the Assyrian army departed, than the new king of Elam began to plot against the power which had raised him. To all appearance his intentions to revolt were reported to the Assyrian king, who at once sent an army and plundered the country, and Tammaritu again fell into Assur-bani-apli's hands. Umman-aldas now returned and resumed the government. Unwilling to regard his former efforts as fruitless, the Assyrian king decided to finally subdue the land, and to this end invaded it, the pretext being that the Elamites refused to deliver up the image of the goddess Nana, which had been carried off from Erech 1,635 years before, in the time of Kudur-Nahhunte (see (4) above). The two armies faced each other on the banks of the Itite, and after an attack in which the Assyrians were at a disadvantage, the Elamites gave way, and Umman-aldas fled to the mountains. According to the Assyrian king's record, an enormous booty was taken, including many sacred and ancient royal statues preserved at Susa. The image of Nana was restored to its shrine at Erech with great rejoicing. In the triumphal celebrations at Nineveh, Tammaritu was one of the captive kings who drew the Assyrian king's chariot to the temple of Ishtar, when he rendered the goddess thanks for his victories.  (17) Dominion Passes from Assyria.  To all appearance Elam now became a province of the Assyrian empire, though not for long, as this collapsed in the year 606 B.C., and the center of government was shifted to Babylon, under Nabopolassar, who became its ruler. Nebuchadrezzar (604), Evil-Merodach (561), Neriglissar (559), and Nabonidus (555-538 B.C.), were successively masters of Elam. The mention of the kings of Elam in  Jeremiah 25:25 , however, suggests that the old states of the country had practically resumed their independence; though 49:35-39 prophesies the dismemberment of the country, and the destruction of its king and princes. This is thought to refer to the annexation of the country by Teispes, and its passing, through his line-Cyrus, Cambyses, and Cyrus the Great, who were all kings of Anzan-to Darius Hystaspis. In  Isaiah 21:2  it is apparently the later Cyrus who is referred to when Elam, with Media, is called upon "to go up" to the siege of Babylon.  (18) The Later State of Elam.  After Cyrus, the history of Elam was that of Persia, of which it henceforth formed a part. In all probability, however, the Elamites were as warlike and as intractable as ever. During the reign of the little-known Kharacenian king, Aspasine, they made incursions into Babylonia, one of the opponents of this king's generals being Pittit, "the enemy, the Elamite"-a phrase of old standing, apparently.  Read Complete Article...  
ELEMENTS|In its primary sense, as denoting the first principles or constituents of things, it is used in  2 Peter 3:10 : "The elements shall be dissolved." In a secondary sense it denotes the first principles of any art or science. In this sense it is used in  Galatians 4:3 , 9;  Colossians 2:8 , 20, where the expressions, "elements of the world," "week and beggarly elements," denote that state of religious knowledge existing among the Jews before the coming of Christ, the rudiments of religious teaching. They are "of the world," because they are made up of types which appeal to the senses. They are "weak," because insufficient; and "beggarly," or "poor," because they are dry and barren, not being accompanied by an outpouring of spiritual gifts and graces, as the gospel Isaiah 
MACHNADEBAI|     mak-nad'-e-bi, mak-na-de'-bi (makhnaddebhay): Son of Bani, one of those who married foreign wives ( Ezra 10:40 ).
JIMNITES|   , THE  jim'-nits, (same as "Jimna," only collective with the definite article;  Numbers 26:44  the King James Version, where the Revised Version (British and American) has "Imnites"): Descendants of Jimna or Imna.
SALAMIS|A city on the south-east coast of Cyprus ( Acts 13:5 ), where Saul and Barnabas, on their first missionary journey, preached the word in one of the Jewish synagogues, of which there seem to have been several in that place. It is now called Famagusta. 
PERES|Divided, one of the mysterious words "written over against the candlestick upon the plaster of the wall" of king Belshazzar's palace ( Dan. 5:28 ). (see  MENE .) 
GIHON|A stream.  (1.) One of the four rivers of Eden ( Genesis 2:13 ). It has been identified with the Nile. Others regard it as the Oxus, or the Araxes, or the Ganges. But as, according to the sacred narrative, all these rivers of Eden took their origin from the head-waters of the Euphrates and the Trigris, it is probable that the Gihon is the ancient Araxes, which, under the modern name of the Arras, discharges itself into the Caspian Sea. It was the Asiatic and not the African "Cush" which the Gihon compassed ( Genesis 10:7 -10). (see  EDEN .) (2.) The only natural spring of water in or near Jerusalem is the "Fountain of the Virgin" (q.v.), which rises outside the city walls on the west bank of the Kidron valley. On the occasion of the approach of the Assyrian army under Sennacherib, Hezekiah, in order to prevent the besiegers from finding water, "stopped the upper water course of Gihon, and brought it straight down to the west side of the city of David" ( 2 Chronicles 32:30 ;  33:14 ). This "fountain" or spring is therefore to be regarded as the "upper water course of Gihon." From this "fountain" a tunnel cut through the ridge which forms the south part of the temple hill conveys the water to the Pool of Siloam, which lies on the opposite side of this ridge at the head of the Tyropoeon ("cheesemakers'") valley, or valley of the son of Hinnom, now filled up by rubbish. The length of this tunnel is about 1,750 feet. In 1880 an inscription was accidentally discovered on the wall of the tunnel about nineteen feet from where it opens into the Pool of Siloam. This inscription was executed in all probability by Hezekiah's workmen. It briefly narrates the history of the excavation. It may, however, be possible that this tunnel was executed in the time of Solomon. If the "waters of Shiloah that go softly" ( Isaiah 8:6 ) refers to the gentle stream that still flows through the tunnel into the Pool of Siloam, then this excavation must have existed before the time of Hezekiah. In the upper part of the Tyropoeoan valley there are two pools still existing, the first, called Birket el-Mamilla, to the west of the Jaffa gate; the second, to the south of the first, called Birket es-Sultan. It is the opinion of some that the former was the "upper" and the latter the "lower" Pool of Gihon ( 2 Kings 18:17 ;  Isaiah 7:3 ;  36:2 ;  22:9 ). (see  CONDUIT ; SILOAM.) 
MUTHLABBEN|Occurring only in the title of Psalm 9. Some interpret the words as meaning "on the death of Labben," some unknown person. Others render the word, "on the death of the son;" i.e., of Absalom ( 2 Samuel 18:33 ). Others again have taken the word as the name of a musical instrument, or as the name of an air to which the psalm was sung. 
BERIAH|A gift, or in evil.  (1.) One of Asher's four sons, and father of Heber ( Genesis 46:17 ). (2.) A son of Ephraim ( 1 Chronicles 7:20 -23), born after the slaughter of his brothers, and so called by his father "because it went evil with his house" at that time. (3.) A Benjamite who with his brother Shema founded Ajalon and expelled the Gittites ( 1 Chronicles 8:13 ). 
ELPALET|     el-pa'-let: (the Revised Version (British and American) ELPELET):  The name of a son of David ( 1 Chronicles 14:5 ).  See  ELIPHALAT .
MALACHI|Messenger or angel, the last of the minor prophets, and the writer of the last book of the Old Testament canon ( Malachi 4:4 ,  5,  6). Nothing is known of him beyond what is contained in his book of prophecies. Some have supposed that the name is simply a title descriptive of his character as a messenger of Jehovah, and not a proper name. There is reason, however, to conclude that Malachi was the ordinary name of the prophet. He was contemporary with Nehemiah (Comp.  Malachi 2:8  with  Nehemiah 13:15 ;  Malachi 2:10 -16 with  Nehemiah 13:23 ). No allusion is made to him by Ezra, and he does not mention the restoration of the temple, and hence it is inferred that he prophesied after Haggai and Zechariah, and when the temple services were still in existence ( Malachi 1:10 ;  3:1 ,  10). It is probable that he delivered his prophecies about B.C. 420, after the second return of Nehemiah from Persia ( Nehemiah 13:6 ), or possibly before his return.  Malachi, Prophecies of The contents of the book are comprised in four chapters. In the Hebrew text the third and fourth chapters (of the A.V.) form but one. The whole consists of three sections, preceded by an introduction ( Malachi 1:1 -5), in which the prophet reminds Israel of Jehovah's love to them. The first section ( 1:6 - 2:9 ) contains a stern rebuke addressed to the priests who had despised the name of Jehovah, and been leaders in a departure from his worship and from the covenant, and for their partiality in administering the law. In the second ( 2:9 -16) the people are rebuked for their intermarriages with idolatrous heathen. In the third ( 2:17 - 4:6 ) he addresses the people as a whole, and warns them of the coming of the God of judgment, preceded by the advent of the Messiah. This book is frequently referred to in the New Testament ( Matthew 11:10 ;  17:12 ;  Mark 1:2 ;  9:11 ,  12;  Luke 1:17 ;  Romans 9:13 ). 
EPHPHATHA|The Greek form of a Syro-Chaldaic or Aramaic word, meaning "Be opened," uttered by Christ when healing the man who was deaf and dumb ( Mark 7:34 ). It is one of the characteristics of Mark that he uses the very Aramaic words which fell from our Lord's lips. (See 3:17;  5:41 ;  7:11 ;  14:36 ;  15:34. ) 
CARSHENA|     kar'-she-na, kar-she'-na (karshena'): The first named among the "seven princes of Persia and Media" under Ahasuerus ( Esther 1:14 ).  See  PRINCES, THE SEVEN .
MAASIAI|Work of Jehovah, one of the priests resident at Jerusalem at the Captivity ( 1 Chronicles 9:12 ). 
SHARON|A plain, a level tract extending from the Mediterranean to the hill country to the west of Jerusalem, about 30 miles long and from 8 to 15 miles broad, celebrated for its beauty and fertility ( 1 Chronicles 27:29 ;  Isaiah 33:9 ;  35:2 ;  65:10 ). The "rose of Sharon" is celebrated (Cant. 2:1). It is called Lasharon (the article la being here a part of the word) in  Joshua 12:18 . 
SHEN|A tooth, probably some conspicuous tooth-shaped rock or crag ( 1 Samuel 7:12 ), a place between which and Mizpeh Samuel set up his "Ebenezer." In the Hebrew the word has the article prefixed, "the Shen." The site is unknown. 
CUTH|   ; CUTHAH  kuth, ku'-tha (kuth, kuthah; Choua, Chountha): The longer writing is the better of the two, and gives the Hebrew form of the name of one of the cities from which Sargon of Assyria brought colonists to fill the places of the Israelites which he deported from Samaria in 772 B.C. ( 2 Kings 17:24, 30 ). Probably in consequence of their predominating numbers, the inhabitants of Samaria in general were then called kuthiyim, or Cutbeans. 1. The Ruins of Cuthah:  From contract-tablets found at Tel-Ibrahim by the late Hormuzd Hassam, on which the ancient name of the place is given as Gudua or Kutu, it would seem that that is the site which has to be identified with the Biblical Cuthah. It lies to the Northeast of Babylon, and was one of the most important cities of the Babylonian empire. The explorer describes the ruins as being about 3,000 ft. in circumference and 280 ft. high, and adjoining them on the West lies a smaller mound, crowned with a sanctuary dedicated to Ibrahim (Abraham). From the nature of the ruins, Rassam came to the conclusion that the city was much more densely populated after the fall of Babylon than in earlier times. A portion of the ruins were in a very perfect state, and suggested an unfinished building.  2. The Temple:  The great temple of the city was called E-mes-lam, and was dedicated to Nergal (compare  2 Kings 17:30 ), one of whose names was Meslam-ta-ea. Both city and temple would seem to have been old Sumerian foundations, as the name Gudua and its later Sere form, Kutu, imply.  LITERATURE.  See Rassam, Asshur and the Land of Nimrod, 396, 409, and, for details of the worship of Nergal, PSBA, December, 1906, 203-18.  T. G. Pinches
LOCKS|     loks  ((1) tsitsith,  (2) pera';  (3) machlaphah,  (4) qewutstsah):  See in general the article on HAIR.  (1) The first word, tsitsith, means really a tassel, such as is worn by the Jews on the four corners of the prayer-shawl or Tallith and on the 'arba` kanephoth ( Deuteronomy 22:12 ), translated in the New Testament by kraspedon ( Matthew 9:20 ;  Matthew 14:36 ;  Matthew 23:5   Mark 6:56   Luke 8:44 ). Once it is applied to a forelock of hair. The prophet Ezekiel, describing his sensations which accompanied his vision of Jerusalem, says: "He put forth the form of a hand, and took me by a lock of my head; and the Spirit lifted me up between earth and heaven, and brought me in the visions of God to Jerus" ( Ezekiel 8:3 ).  (2) The word pera` signifies the uncut and disheveled locks of the Nazirite ( Numbers 6:5 ) or of the priests, the sons of Zadok ( Ezekiel 44:20 ).  (3) The Book of Judges employs the word machlaphah when speaking of the "seven locks" of Samson ( Judges 16:13, 19 ), which really represent the plaited (etymologically, "interwoven") strands of hair still worn in our days by youthful Bedouin warriors.  (4) Qewutstsah ( Songs 5:2, 11 ) means the luxuriant hair of the Hebrew youth, who was careful of his exterior. It is called bushy (the Revised Version margin "curling") and black as a raven. the King James Version translations also the word tsammah with "locks" ( Songs 4:1 ;  Songs 6:7   Isaiah 47:2 ), but the Revised Version (British and American) has corrected this into "veil," leaving the word "locks" in  Songs 4:1  margin.  H. L. E. Luering
ZIV|     ziv (ziw; the King James Version Zif): The 2nd month of the old Hebrew calendar, corresponding to Iyyar of the Jewish reckoning in later times. It is mentioned in  1 Kings 6:1, 37 .  See  CALENDAR .
MAKAZ|     ma'-kaz (maqats): One of the cities of the 2nd of the 12 districts or prefectures which supplied victuals for Solomon ( 1 Kings 4:9 ). It is associated with Shaalbim, Beth-shemesh and Elon-beth-hanan, all three probably identical with cities mentioned ( Joshua 19:41, 42 ) as on the border of Dan. Cheyne (EB, II, col. 2906) suggests that Makaz may bc identical with MEJARGON (which see) in the latter list.
CAPH|     See  KAPH .
SODOMITES|Those who imitated the licentious wickedness of Sodom ( Deuteronomy 23:17 ;  1 Kings 14:24 ;  Romans 1:26 ,  27). Asa destroyed them "out of the land" ( 1 Kings 15:12 ), as did also his son Jehoshaphat ( 22:46 ). 
TIMNATH|Genesis 38:12,14.  (1.) Hebrews Timnathah, which is appropriately rendered in the Revised Version, Timnah, a town in Judah. (2.) The town where Samson sojourned, probably identical with "Timnah" (1) ( Judges 14:1 -18). 
BIRZAITH|     bur-za'-ith, bur-za'-vith the King James Version Birzavith, (birzawith or birzayith; Bezaith, or Berzaie): The name of a town in Asher founded by Malchiel ( 1 Chronicles 7:31 ). It probably corresponds to the modern Bir ez-Zait, "well of olive oil," near Tyre.
JAANAI|Mourner, one of the chief Gadites ( 1 Chronicles 5:12 ). 
TIPHSAH|Passing over; ford, one of the boundaries of Solomon's dominions ( 1 Kings 4:24 ), probably "Thapsacus, a great and wealthy town on the western bank of the Euphrates," about 100 miles north-east of Tadmor. All the land traffic between the east and the west passed through it. Menahem undertook an expedition against this city, and "smote Tiphsah and all that were therein" ( 2 Kings 15:16 ). This expedition implied a march of some 300 miles from Tirzah if by way of Tadmor, and about 400 if by way of Aleppo; and its success showed the strength of the Israelite kingdom, for it was practically a defiance to Assyria. Conder, however, identifies this place with Khurbet Tafsah, some 6 miles west of Shechem. 
MYRA|One of the chief towns of Lycia, in Asia Minor, about 2 1/2 miles from the coast ( Acts 27:5 ). Here Paul removed from the Adramyttian ship in which he had sailed from Caesarea, and entered into the Alexandrian ship, which was afterwards wrecked at Melita ( 27:39 -44). 
PEDAHZUR|Rock of redemption, the father of Gamaliel and prince of Manasseh at the time of the Exodus ( Numbers 1:10 ;  2:20 ). 
NAHASH|Serpent.  (1.) King of the Ammonites in the time of Saul. The inhabitants of Jabesh-Gilead having been exposed to great danger from Nahash, sent messengers to Gibeah to inform Saul of their extremity. He promptly responded to the call, and gathering together an army he marched against Nahash. "And it came to pass that they which remained were scattered, so that two of them [the Ammonites] were not left together" ( 1 Samuel 11:1 -11). (2.) Another king of the Ammonites of the same name is mentioned, who showed kindness to David during his wanderings ( 2 Samuel 10:2 ). On his death David sent an embassy of sympathy to Hanun, his son and successor, at Rabbah Ammon, his capital. The grievous insult which was put upon these ambassadors led to a war against the Ammonites, who, with their allies the Syrians, were completely routed in a battle fought at "the entering in of the gate," probably of Medeba ( 2 Samuel 10:6 -14). Again Hadarezer rallied the Syrian host, which was totally destroyed by the Israelite army under Joab in a decisive battle fought at Helam ( 2 Samuel 10:17 ), near to Hamath ( 1 Chronicles 18:3 ). "So the Syrians feared to help the children of Ammon any more" ( 2 Samuel 10:19 ). (3.) The father of Amasa, who was commander-in-chief of Abasolom's army ( 2 Samuel 17:25 ). Jesse's wife had apparently been first married to this man, to whom she bore Abigail and Zeruiah, who were thus David's sisters, but only on the mother's side ( 1 Chronicles 2:16 ). 
GILEAD|Hill of testimony, ( Genesis 31:21 ), a mountainous region east of Jordan. From its mountainous character it is called "the mount of Gilead" ( Genesis 31:25 ). It is called also "the land of Gilead" ( Numbers 32:1 ), and sometimes simply "Gilead" ( Psalm 60:7 ;  Genesis 37:25 ). It comprised the possessions of the tribes of Gad and Reuben and the south part of Manasseh ( Deuteronomy 3:13 ;  Numbers 32:40 ). It was bounded on the north by Bashan, and on the south by Moab and Ammon ( Genesis 31:21 ;  Deuteronomy 3:12 -17). "Half Gilead" was possessed by Sihon, and the other half, separated from it by the river Jabbok, by Og, king of Bashan. The deep ravine of the river Hieromax (the modern Sheriat el-Mandhur) separated Bashan from Gilead, which was about 60 miles in length and 20 in breadth, extending from near the south end of the Lake of Gennesaret to the north end of the Dead Sea. Abarim, Pisgah, Nebo, and Peor are its mountains mentioned in Scripture.  Gilead, Balm of The region of Gilead abounded in spices and aromatic gums, which were exported to Egypt and Tyre ( Genesis 37:25 ;  Jeremiah 8:22 ;  46:11 ;  Ezek. 27:17 ). The word "balm" is a contracted form of "balsam," a word derived from the Greek balsamon, which was adopted as the representative of the Hebrew words baal shemen, meaning "lord" or "chief of oils." The Hebrew name of this balm was tsori. The tree yielding this medicinal oil was probably the Balsamodendron opobalsamum of botanists, and the Amyris opobalsamum of Linnaeus. It is an evergreen, rising to the height of about 14 feet. The oil or resin, exuding through an orifice made in its bark in very small quantities, is esteemed of great value for its supposed medicinal qualities. (see  BALM .) It may be noted that Coverdale's version reads in  Jeremiah 8:22 , "There is no triacle in Galaad." The word "triacle" = "treacle" is used in the sense of ointment. 
JATTIR|Pre-eminent, a city in the mountains of Judah ( Joshua 15:48 ;  21:14 ). 
CHELUHI|     kel'-oo-hi (keluhi, Kt.; keluhu, Qere; the Revised Version, margin Cheluhu; the King James Version Chelluh): Mentioned in the list of persons with foreign wives ( Ezra 10:35  = 1 Esdras 9:34).
SHEPHATIAH|Judged of the Lord.  (1.) A son of David by Abital ( 2 Samuel 3:4 ). (2.) A Benjamite who joined David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:5 ). (3.) A Simeonite prince in David's time ( 1 Chronicles 27:16 ). (4.) One of Jehoshaphat's sons ( 2 Chronicles 21:2 ). (5.)  Ezra 2:4 . (6.)  Ezra 2:57 ;  Nehemiah 7:59 . (7.) One of the princes who urged the putting of Jeremiah to death ( Jeremiah 38:1 -4). 
GAREB|Scabby; itch.  (1.) One of David's warriors ( 2 Samuel 23:38 ), an Ithrite. (2.) A hill near Jerusalem ( Jeremiah 31:39 ), probably the hill of lepers, and consequently a place outside the boundary of the city. 
CALNEH|Fort, one of the four cities founded by Nimrod ( Genesis 10:10 ). It is the modern Niffer, a lofty mound of earth and rubbish situated in the marshes on the left, i.e., the east, bank of the Euphrates, but 30 miles distant from its present course, and about 60 miles south-south-east from Babylon. It is mentioned as one of the towns with which Tyre carried on trade. It was finally taken and probably destroyed by one of the Assyrian kings ( Amos 6:2 ). It is called Calno ( Isaiah 10:9 ) and Canneh ( Ezek. 27:23 ). 
TARSHISH|A Sanscrit or Aryan word, meaning "the sea coast."  (1.) One of the "sons" of Javan ( Genesis 10:4 ;  1 Chronicles 1:7 ). (2.) The name of a place which first comes into notice in the days of Solomon. The question as to the locality of Tarshish has given rise to not a little discussion. Some think there was a Tarshish in the East, on the Indian coast, seeing that "ships of Tarshish" sailed from Eziongeber, on the Red Sea ( 1 Kings 9:26 ;  22:48 ;  2 Chronicles 9:21 ). Some, again, argue that Carthage was the place so named. There can be little doubt, however, that this is the name of a Phoenician port in Spain, between the two mouths of the Guadalquivir (the name given to the river by the Arabs,  and meaning "the great wady" or water-course). It was founded by a Carthaginian colony, and was the farthest western harbour of Tyrian sailors. It was to this port Jonah's ship was about to sail from Joppa. It has well been styled "the Peru of Tyrian adventure;" it abounded in gold and silver mines. It appears that this name also is used without reference to any locality. "Ships of Tarshish" is an expression sometimes denoting simply ships intended for a long voyage ( Isaiah 23:1 ,  14), ships of a large size (sea-going ships), whatever might be the port to which they sailed. Solomon's ships were so styled ( 1 Kings 10:22 ;  22:49 ). 
PHILIPPIANS|Philippians, Epistle to Was written by Paul during the two years when he was "in bonds" in Rome ( Philippians 1:7 -13), probably early in the year A.D. 62 or in the end of 61. The Philippians had sent Epaphroditus, their messenger, with contributions to meet the necessities of the apostle; and on his return Paul sent back with him this letter. With this precious communication Epaphroditus sets out on his homeward journey. "The joy caused by his return, and the effect of this wonderful letter when first read in the church of Philippi, are hidden from us. And we may almost say that with this letter the church itself passes from our view. To-day, in silent meadows, quiet cattle browse among the ruins which Mark the site of what was once the flourishing Roman colony of Philippi, the home of the most attractive church of the apostolic age. But the name and fame and spiritual influence of that church will never pass. To myriads of men and women in every age and nation the letter written in a dungeon at Rome, and carried along the Egnatian Way by an obscure Christian messenger, has been a light divine and a cheerful guide along the most rugged paths of life" (Professor Beet). The church at Philippi was the first-fruits of European Christianity. Their attachment to the apostle was very fervent, and so also was his affection for them. They alone of all the churches helped him by their contributions, which he gratefully acknowledges ( Acts 20:33 -35;  2 Corinthians 11:7 -12;  2 Thessalonians 3:8 ). The pecuniary liberality of the Philippians comes out very conspicuously ( Philippians 4:15 ). "This was a characteristic of the Macedonian missions, as  2 Corinthians 8  and  9  amply and beautifully prove. It is remarkable that the Macedonian converts were, as a class, very poor ( 2 Corinthians 8:2 ); and the parallel facts, their poverty and their open-handed support of the great missionary and his work, are deeply harmonious. At the present day the missionary liberality of poor Christians is, in proportion, really greater than that of the rich" (Moule's Philippians,  Introd.). The contents of this epistle give an interesting insight into the condition of the church at Rome at the time it was written. Paul's imprisonment, we are informed, was no hindrance to his preaching the gospel, but rather "turned out to the furtherance of the gospel." The gospel spread very extensively among the Roman soldiers, with whom he was in constant contact, and the Christians grew into a "vast multitude." It is plain that Christianity was at this time making rapid advancement in Rome. The doctrinal statements of this epistle bear a close relation to those of the Epistle to the Romans. Compare also  Philippians 3:20  with  Ephesians 2:12 , 19, where the church is presented under the idea of a city or commonwealth for the first time in Paul's writings. The personal glory of Christ is also set forth in almost parallel forms of expression in  Philippians 2:5 -11, compared with  Ephesians 1:17 -23;  2:8 ; and  Colossians 1:15 -20. "This exposition of the grace and wonder of His personal majesty, personal self-abasement, and personal exaltation after it," found in these epistles, "is, in a great measure, a new development in the revelations given through St. Paul" (Moule). Other minuter analogies in forms of expression and of thought are also found in these epistles of the Captivity. 
CAPHTOR|A chaplet, the original seat of the Philistines ( Deuteronomy 2:23 ;  Jeremiah 47:4 ;  Amos 9:7 ). The name is found written in hieroglyphics in the temple of Kom Ombos in Upper Egypt. But the exact situation of Caphtor is unknown, though it is supposed to be Crete, since the Philistines seem to be meant by the "Cherethites" in  1 Samuel 30:14  (see also  2 Samuel 8:18 ). It may, however, have been a part of Egypt, the Caphtur in the north Delta, since the Caphtorim were of the same race as the Mizraite people ( Genesis 10:14 ;  1 Chronicles 1:12 ). 
SALECAH|   ; SALCAH, SALCHAH  sal'-e-ka, sal'-ka (calekhah; Codex Vaticanus Sekchai, Acha, Sela Codex Alexandrinus Elcha, Aselcha, Selcha): This place first appears in  Deuteronomy 3:10  as marking the eastern boundary of Bashan. It is named as one of the cities in which Og, king of Bashan, ruled ( Joshua 12:5 ). It must certainly have been included in the portion given to the half-tribe of Manasseh, "all the kingdom of Og king of Bashan," although it is not named among the cities that fell to him ( Joshua 13:29 ). At a later time we are told that Gad dwelt over against the Reubenites in the land of Bashan unto Salecah ( 1 Chronicles 5:11 ). The boundaries of the tribes probably changed from time to time.  The ancient city is represented by the modern Qalkhad, a city in a high and strong position at the southern end of Jebel ed-Druze (the Mountain of Bashan). On a volcanic hill rising some 300 ft. above the town, in what must have been the crater, stands the castle. The view from the battlements, as the present writer can testify, is one of the finest East of the Jordan, including the rich hollow of the Chauran, Mt. Hermon, and all the intervening country to the mountains of Samaria, with vast reaches of the desert to the South and to the East. The old Roman roads are still clearly seen running without curve or deviation across the country to Bozrah and Der'ah, away to the Southeast over the desert to Kal`at el-`Azraq, and eastward to the Persian Gulf. The castle was probably built by the Romans. Restored by the Arabs, it was a place of strength in Crusading times. It has now fallen on evil days. The modern town, containing many ancient houses, lies mainly on the slopes Southeast of the castle. The inhabitants are Druzes, somewhat noted for turbulence.  In the recent rising of the Druzes (1911) the place suffered heavily from bombardment by the Turks. For water-supply it is entirely dependent on cisterns filled during the rainy season. W. Ewing
DEFENCED|     See  FORTIFICATION .
JERED|     je'-red (yeredh, "descent"): A Judahite, father of Gedor ( 1 Chronicles 4:18 ).  See also  JARED .
JAHMAI|     ja'-ma-i, ja'-mi (yachmay, perhaps = yachmeyah, "may Yahweh protect!"): In  1 Chronicles 7:2 , head of a clan of Issachar.
OZNITES|     oz'-nits (with the article ha'ozni (collective), "the Oznites"): Of the clan of Ozni ( Numbers 26:16 ).  See  OZNI .
SAMARIA|A watch-mountain or a watch-tower. In the heart of the mountains of Israel, a few miles north-west of Shechem, stands the "hill of Shomeron," a solitary mountain, a great "mamelon." It is an oblong hill, with steep but not inaccessible sides, and a long flat top. Omri, the king of Israel, purchased this hill from Shemer its owner for two talents of silver, and built on its broad summit the city to which he gave the name of "Shomeron", i.e., Samaria, as the new capital of his kingdom instead of Tirzah ( 1 Kings 16:24 ). As such it possessed many advantages. Here Omri resided during the last six years of his reign. As the result of an unsuccessful war with Syria, he appears to have been obliged to grant to the Syrians the right to "make streets in Samaria", i.e., probably permission to the Syrian merchants to carry on their trade in the Israelite capital. This would imply the existence of a considerable Syrian population. "It was the only great city of Palestine created by the sovereign. All the others had been already consecrated by patriarchal tradition or previous possession. But Samaria was the choice of Omri alone. He, indeed, gave to the city which he had built the name of its former owner, but its especial connection with himself as its founder is proved by the designation which it seems Samaria bears in Assyrian inscriptions, Beth-khumri (`the house or palace of Omri').", Stanley. Samaria was frequently besieged. In the days of Ahab, Benhadad II. came up against it with thirty-two vassal kings, but was defeated with a great slaughter ( 1 Kings 20:1 -21). A second time, next year, he assailed it; but was again utterly routed, and was compelled to surrender to Ahab ( 20:28 -34), whose army, as compared with that of Benhadad, was no more than "two little flocks of kids." In the days of Jehoram this Benhadad again laid siege to Samaria, during which the city was reduced to the direst extremities. But just when success seemed to be within their reach, they suddenly broke up the seige, alarmed by a mysterious noise of chariots and horses and a great army, and fled, leaving their camp with all its contents behind them. The famishing inhabitants of the city were soon relieved with the abundance of the spoil of the Syrian camp; and it came to pass, according to the word of Elisha, that "a measure of fine flour was sold for a shekel, and two measures of barely for a shekel, in the gates of Samaria" ( 2 Kings 7:1 -20). Shalmaneser invaded Israel in the days of Hoshea, and reduced it to vassalage. He laid siege to Samaria (B.C. 723), which held out for three years, and was at length captured by Sargon, who completed the conquest Shalmaneser had begun ( 2 Kings 18:9 -12;  17:3 ), and removed vast numbers of the tribes into captivity. (see  SARGON .) This city, after passing through various vicissitudes, was given by the emperor Augustus to Herod the Great, who rebuilt it, and called it Sebaste (Gr. form of Augustus) in honour of the emperor. In the New Testament the only mention of it is in  Acts 8:5 -14, where it is recorded that Philip went down to the city of Samaria and preached there. It is now represented by the hamlet of Sebustieh, containing about three hundred inhabitants. The ruins of the ancient town are all scattered over the hill, down the sides of which they have rolled. The shafts of about one hundred of what must have been grand Corinthian columns are still standing, and attract much attention, although nothing definite is known regarding them. (Comp.  Micah 1:6. ) In the time of Christ, Western Palestine was divided into three provinces, Judea, Samaria, and Galilee. Samaria occupied the centre of Palestine ( John 4:4 ). It is called in the Talmud the "land of the Cuthim," and is not regarded as a part of the Holy Land at all. It may be noticed that the distance between Samaria and Jerusalem, the respective capitals of the two kingdoms, is only 35 miles in a direct line. 
EZRAHITE|A title given to Ethan ( 1 Kings 4:31 ;  Psalm 89 ,  title) and Heman ( Psalm 88 ,  title). They were both sons of Zerah ( 1 Chronicles 2:6 ). 
HIRAM|High-born.  (1.) Generally "Huram," one of the sons of Bela ( 1 Chronicles 8:5 ). (2.) Also "Huram" and "Horam," king of Tyre. He entered into an alliance with David, and assisted him in building his palace by sending him able workmen, and also cedar-trees and fir-trees from Lebanon ( 2 Samuel 5:11 ;  1 Chronicles 14:1 ). After the death of David he entered into a similar alliance with Solomon, and assisted him greatly in building the temple ( 1 Kings 5:1 ;  9:11 ;  2 Chronicles 2:3 ). He also took part in Solomon's traffic to the Eastern Seas ( 1 Kings 9:27 ;  10:11 ;  2 Chronicles 8:18 ;  9:10 ). (3.) The "master workman" whom Hiram sent to Solomon. He was the son of a widow of Dan, and of a Tyrian father. In  2 Chronicles 2:13  "Huram my father" should be Huram Abi, the word "Abi" (rendered here "my father") being regarded as a proper name, or it may perhaps be a title of distinction given to Huram, and equivalent to "master." (Comp.  1 Kings 7:14 ;  2 Chronicles 4:16. ) He cast the magnificent brazen works for Solomon's temple in clay-beds in the valley of Jordan, between Succoth and Zarthan. 
HELEPH|Exchange, a city on the north border of Naphtali ( Joshua 19:33 ). 
SHEMARIAH|Whom Jehovah guards.  (1.) One who joined David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:5 ). (2.)  Ezra 10:32 , 41. 
HAGARITES|   HAGARENES;   See  HAGRITES .
JIMNA|   , JIMNAH  jim'-na (yimnah, perhaps equals "good fortune"): A "son" of Asher ( Genesis 46:17 , the King James Version "Jimnah";  Numbers 26:44 , the King James Version "Jimna"), whereas the Revised Version (British and American) has IMNAH (which see).
MERODACH|Death; slaughter, the name of a Babylonian god, probably the planet Mars ( Jeremiah 50:2 ), or it may be another name of Bel, the guardian divinity of Babylon. This name frequently occurs as a surname to the kings of Assyria and Babylon. 
RUMAH|Elevation, probably the same as Arumah ( Judges 9:41 ;  2 Kings 23:36 ), near Shechem. Others identify it with Tell Rumeh, in Galilee, about 6 miles north of Nazareth. 
BUZITE|   BUZ; BUZI;   (1) Second son of Nahor ( Genesis 22:21 ). The word occurs again in  Jeremiah 25:23 , by the side of Dedan ( Genesis 10:7 ) and Tema ( Genesis 25:15 ), and is probably, therefore, the name of a people living in the neighborhood of Edom. Buz and Hazo ( Genesis 22:22 ) are probably the countries of Bazu and Chazu (the former described as full of snakes and scorpions), which Esarhaddon invaded (KB, II, 131).  (2) A Gadite (( 1 Chronicles 5:14 ) (buzi), "an inhabitant of Buz"), a title given to Elihu, the fourth speaker in the Book of Job ( Job 32:2 ).  Horace J. Wolf
NAUM|     na'-um: the King James Version form, NAHUM (which see), the name of an ancestor of Jesus ( Luke 3:25 ).
SHAMMOTH|     sham'-oth, sham'-oth.  See  SHAMMAH, (4) .
TATTENAI|     tat'-e-ni (tattenay, various forms in the Septuagint; the King James Version Tatnai, tat'ni, tat'na-i'): A Persian governor, who was the successor of Rehum in Samaria and some other provinces belonging to Judah, bordering on Samaria. He governed the provinces during the reign of Darius Hystaspis and Zerubbabel ( Ezra 5:3, 6 ;  Ezra 6:6, 13 ). He was friendly to the Jews, and when he heard adverse reports from Jerusalem he suspended judgment till he had investigated the matter on the ground, and then reported to the Persian government in a very moderate manner. In 1 Esdras 6:3, 7, 27; 7:1 he is called "Sisinnes."  S. L. Umbach
HARIPH|Autumnal rain.  (1.)  Nehemiah 7:24 .  (2.) 10:19. 
ZARAH|     za'-ra.  See  ZERAH (1) .
HOGLAH|Partridge, one of the daughters of Zelophehad the Gileadite, to whom portions were assigned by Moses ( Numbers 26:33 ;  27:1 ;  36:11 ). 
RAPHA|Tall.  (1.) A Benjamite, the son of Binea ( 1 Chronicles 8:2 ,  37), a descendant of Saul.  (2.) Margin of  1 Chronicles 20:4 , 6, where "giant" is given in the text. 
BOHAN|     bo'-han (bohan, "thumb," "stumpy"): A son of Reuben according to  Joshua 15:6 ;  Joshua 18:17 . No mention is made of Bohan in the genealogies of Reuben. "The stone of Bohan" ('ebhen bohan) was a boundary mark on the Northeast frontier of Judah, separating it from Benjamin. Site unidentified.
MASHAL|Entreaty, a levitical town in the tribe of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 6:74 ); called Mishal ( Joshua 21:30 ). 
KIDRON|= Kedron = Cedron, turbid, the winter torrent which flows through the Valley of Jehoshaphat, on the eastern side of Jerusalem, between the city and the Mount of Olives. This valley is known in Scripture only by the name "the brook Kidron." David crossed t
ELIKA|God is his rejector, one of David's thirty-seven distinguished heros ( 2 Samuel 23:25 ). 
PIRAM|Like a wild ass, a king of Jarmuth, a royal city of the Canaanites, who was conquered and put to death by Joshua ( 10:3 ,  23,  26). 
MORASHTITE|     mo-rash'-tit (hamorashti; the King James Version, Morasthite, mo-ras'-thit): Gentilic designation of the prophet Micah ( Jeremiah 26:18   Micah 1:1 ).  See also  MORESHETH-GATH .
MEJARKON|Waters of yellowness, or clear waters, a river in the tribe of Dan ( Joshua 19:46 ). It has been identified with the river `Aujeh, which rises at Antipatris. 
TOLAD|Productive, a town of Simeon, in the south of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:29 ). 
SNUFFDISHES|   SNUFFERS;   snuf'-erz, snuf'-dish-ez (melqachayim, machtoth): These two utensils are thrice mentioned in connection with the wilderness tabernacle ( Exodus 25:38 ;  Exodus 37:23   Numbers 4:9 ). the American Standard Revised Version prefers to read "snuffers and snuffdishes" in place of "tongs and snuffdishes" (compare  2 Chronicles 4:22 ), the connection between the two utensils being indicated by the fact that both are said to belong to the seven lamps, and were to be made out of the talent of gold which was specified as the weight of the whole ( Exodus 25:37-39 ).  The seven-branched candlestick which stood in the holy place of both tabernacle and temple was surmounted, in each of its arms, by a removable lamp in which olive oil was burnt. From the requirement of keeping these lights brilliantly burning throughout each night of the year, arose the need for snuffers and snuffdishes. By the former, the burnt portions of the wick were removed; in the latter they were deposited previous to removal. The lamps may have required to be trimmed as often as every half-hour. For this purpose a priest would enter the outer chamber "accomplishing the services" ( Hebrews 9:6 ).  In the time of Solomon's Temple another word than melqachayim was used to describe this utensil. It is mezammeroth, from a verb meaning "to prune" or "trim," and is found in  1 Kings 7:50   2 Kings 12:13 ;  2 Kings 25:14 ;  2 Chronicles 4:22   Jeremiah 52:18 . In 4 of these passages, the English text reads, "the snuffers and the basins"; the 5th is merely a summary of things taken to Babylon ( 2 Kings 25:14 ). In this constant later association of "basins" and "snuffers" it is seen that the basins referred to were used for the reception of the cast-off portions of the wicks of the seven lamps, and took the place of the snuffdishes of an earlier age.  See  TONGS .  W. Shaw Caldecott
SHIBAH|     shi'-ba (shibh`ah, "seven"; horkos; Swete reads Phrear horkou, literally, "well of oath"; the King James Version Shebah): The name of the original well of Beer-sheba according to  Genesis 26:33 .  See  BEERSHEBA .
ELIAKIM|Whom God will raise up.  (1.) The son of Melea ( Luke 3:30 ), and probably grandson of Nathan. (2.) The son of Abiud, of the posterity of Zerubbabel ( Matthew 1:13 ). (3.) The son of Hilkiah, who was sent to receive the message of the invading Assyrians and report it to Isaiah ( 2 Kings 18:18 ;  19:2 ;  Isaiah 36:3 ;  37:2 ). In his office as governor of the palace of Hezekiah he succeeded Shebna ( Isaiah 22:15 -25). He was a good man ( Isaiah 22:20 ;  2 Kings 18:37 ), and had a splendid and honourable career. (4.) The original name of Jehoiakim, king of Judah ( 2 Kings 23:34 ). He was the son of Josiah. 
GEBA|The hill, ( 2 Samuel 5:25  [1 Chronicles 14:16,  "Gibeon"];  2 Kings 23:8 ;  Nehemiah 11:31 ), a Levitical city of Benjamin ( 1 Kings 15:22 ;  1 Samuel 13:16 ;  14:5 ,  wrongly "Gibeah" in the A.V.), on the north border of Judah near Gibeah ( Isaiah 10:29 ;  Joshua 18:24 ,  28). "From Geba to Beersheba" expressed the whole extent of the kingdom of Judah, just as "from Dan to Beersheba" described the whole length of Palestine ( 2 Kings 23:8 ). It has been identified with Gaba ( Joshua 18:24 ;  Ezra 2:26 ;  Nehemiah 7:30 ), now Jeb'a, about 5 1/2 miles north of Jerusalem. 
WEIGHTS|Reduced to English troy-weight, the Hebrew weights were:  (1.) The gerah ( Leviticus 27:25 ;  Numbers 3:47 ), a Hebrew word, meaning a grain or kernel, and hence a small weight. It was the twentieth part of a shekel, and equal to 12 grains. (2.) Bekah ( Exodus 38:26 ), meaning "a half" i.e., "half a shekel," equal to 5 pennyweight. (3.) Shekel, "a weight," only in the Old Testament, and frequently in its original form ( Genesis 23:15 ,  16;  Exodus 21:32 ;  30:13 ,  15;  38:24 -29,  etc.). It was equal to 10 pennyweight. (4.) Ma'neh, "a part" or "portion" ( Ezek. 45:12 ), equal to 60 shekels, i.e., to 2 lbs. 6 oz. (5.) Talent of silver ( 2 Kings 5:22 ), equal to 3,000 shekels, i.e., 125 lbs. (6.) Talent of gold ( Exodus 25:39 ), double the preceding, i.e., 250 lbs. 
MANASSITES|     ma-nas'-its (menashshi; ho Manasse): Members of the tribe of Manasseh (Deuteronomy 4:43; Judges 12:4 the King James Version; 2 Kings 10:33). 
CHALDEES|Or Chaldeans, the inhabitants of the country of which Babylon was the capital. They were so called till the time of the Captivity ( 2 Kings 25 ;  Isaiah 13:19 ;  23:13 ), when, particularly in the Book of Daniel ( 5:30 ;  9:1 ), the name began to be used with special reference to a class of learned men ranked with the magicians and astronomers. These men cultivated the ancient Cushite language of the original inhabitants of the land, for they had a "learning" and a "tongue" ( 1:4 ) of their own. The common language of the country at that time had become assimilated to the Semitic dialect, especially through the influence of the Assyrians, and was the language that was used for all civil purposes. The Chaldeans were the learned class, interesting themselves in science and religion, which consisted, like that of the ancient Arabians and Syrians, in the worship of the heavenly bodies. There are representations of this priestly class, of magi and diviners, on the walls of the Assyrian palaces.
INSECTS|     in'-sekts: In English Versions of the Bible, including the marginal notes, we find at least 23 names of insects or words referring to them: ant, bald locust, bee, beetle, cankerworm, caterpillar, creeping thing, cricket, crimson, flea, fly, gnat, grasshopper, honey, hornet, locust, louse, (lice), moth, palmer-worm, sandfly, scarlet-worm, silk-worm. These can be referred to about 12 insects, which, arranged systematically, are: Hymenoptera, ant, bee, hornet; Lepidoptera, clothes-moth, silk-worm; Siphonaptera, flea; Diptera, fly; Rhynchota, louse, scarletworm; Orthoptera, several kinds of grasshoppers and locusts.  The word "worm" refers not only to the scarletworm, but to various larvae of Lepidoptera, Coleoptera, and Diptera. "Creeping things" refers indefinitely to insects, reptiles, and beasts. In the list of 23 names given above honey and bee refer to one insect, as do crimson and scarlet. Sandfly has no place if "lice" be retained in  Exodus 8:16 . Bald locust, beetle, canker-worm, cricket, and palmerworm probably all denote various kinds of grasshoppers and locusts. When the translators of English Versions of the Bible had to do with two or more Hebrew words for which there was only one well-recognized English equivalent, they seem to have been content with that alone, if the two Hebrew words occurred in different passages; e.g. zebhubh, "fly" ( Ecclesiastes 10:1   Isaiah 7:18 ), and `arobh, "fly" ( Exodus 8:21 ). On the other hand, they were put to it to find equivalents for the insect names in  Leviticus 11:22   Joel 1:4 , and elsewhere. For cale'am ( Leviticus 11:22 ) they evidently coined "bald locust," following a statement of the Talmud that it had a smooth head. For gazam and yeleq they imported "palmer-worm" and "canker-worm," two old English names of caterpillars, using "caterpillar" for chasil. The King James Version "beetle" for chargol is absolutely inappropriate, and the Revised Version (British and American) "cricket," while less objectionable, is probably also incorrect. The English language seems to lack appropriate names for different kinds of grasshoppers and locusts, and it is difficult to suggest any names to take the places of those against which these criticisms are directed. See under the names of the respective insects. See also  SCORPION and SPIDER , which are not included here because they are not strictly insects.  Alfred Ely Day
JAAZIAH|Comforted by Jehovah, a descendant of Merari the Levite ( 1 Chronicles 24:26 , 27). 
TIRSHATHA|A word probably of Persian origin, meaning "severity," denoting a high civil dignity. The Persian governor of Judea is so called ( Ezra 2:63 ;  Nehemiah 7:65 ,  70). Nehemiah is called by this name in  Nehemiah 8:9 ;  10:1 , and the "governor" (pehah) in 5:18. Probably, therefore, tirshatha=pehah=the modern pasha. 
BELAITES|     be'-la-its (bal`i, "belonging to Bela"): The descendants of Bela ( Numbers 26:38 ). Compare BELA (2).
BEERAH|     be-e'-ra, be'-er-a (be'erah; "expounder"): A prince of the house of Reuben whom Tiglath-pileser carried away captive ( 1 Chronicles 5:6 ). Compare  2 Kings 15:29 ;  2 Kings 16:7 .
HIZKIAH|An ancestor of the prophet Zephaniah ( 1:1 ). 
SPICES|Aromatic substances, of which several are named in  Exodus 30 . They were used in the sacred anointing oil ( Exodus 25:6 ;  35:8 ;  1 Chronicles 9:29 ), and in embalming the dead ( 2 Chronicles 16:14 ;  Luke 23:56 ;  24:1 ;  John 19:39 ,  40). Spices were stored by Hezekiah in his treasure-house ( 2 Kings 20:13 ;  Isaiah 39:2 ). 
SHIMEAH| (1.) One of David's brothers ( 2 Samuel 13:3 ); same as Shimea (4). (2.) A Benjamite, a descendant of Gibeon ( 1 Chronicles 8:32 ); called also Shimeam ( 9:38 ). 
WINTERHOUSE|   WINTER-HOUSE  (beth ha-choreph ( Jeremiah 36:22   Amos 3:15 )): See under SUMMER-HOUSE. The "winter-house" in Jeremiah is that of King Jehoiakim; mention is made of the fire burning in the brazier.
TELEM|Oppression.  (1.) A porter of the temple in the time of Ezra ( 10:24 ). (2.) A town in the southern border of Judah ( Joshua 15:24 ); probably the same as Telaim. 
SABBATHS|   , OF YEARS  sab'-aths, (shabbethoth shanim; anapauseis eton ( Leviticus 25:8 )): The seven sabbatic years preceding the Year of Jubilee.  See  SABBATICAL YEAR ;  JUBILEE YEAR ; ASTRONOMY, sec. I, 5.
SIMEON|Hearing.  (1.) The second son of Jacob by Leah ( Genesis 29:33 ). He was associated with Levi in the terrible act of vengeance against Hamor and the Shechemites ( 34:25 ,  26). He was detained by Joseph in Egypt as a hostage ( 42:24 ). His father, when dying, pronounced a malediction against him ( 49:5 -7). The words in the Authorized Version ( 49:6 ), "they digged down a wall," ought to be, as correctly rendered in the Revised Version, "they houghed an ox." (2.) An aged saint who visited the temple when Jesus was being presented before the Lord, and uttered lofty words of thankgiving and of prophecy ( Luke 2:29 -35). (3.) One of the ancestors of Joseph ( Luke 3:30 ). (4.) Surnamed Niger, i.e., "black," perhaps from his dark complexion, a teacher of some distinction in the church of Antioch ( Acts 13:1 -3). It has been supposed that this was the Simon of Cyrene who bore Christ's cross. Note the number of nationalities represented in the church at Antioch. (5.) James ( Acts 15:14 ) thus designates the apostle Peter (q.v.).  Simeon, The tribe of  Was "divided and scattered" according to the prediction in  Genesis 49:5 -7. They gradually dwindled in number, and sank into a position of insignificance among the other tribes. They decreased in the wilderness by about two-thirds (Comp.  Numbers 1:23 ;  26:14 ). Moses pronounces no blessing on this tribe. It is passed by in silence ( Deuteronomy 33 ). This tribe received as their portion a part of the territory already allotted to Judah ( Joshua 19:1 -9). It lay in the south-west of the land, with Judah on the east and Dan on the north; but whether it was a compact territory or not cannot be determined. The subsequent notices of this tribe are but few ( 1 Chronicles 4:24 -43). Like Reuben on the east of Jordan, this tribe had little influence on the history of Israel. 
NEPHISIM|   NEPHISH; ; NEPHISHESIM; NEPHUSIM  ne'-fish, ne-fi'-sim, ne-fish'-e-sim, ne-fusim (nephicim, nephucim): The former is the Kethibh (Hebrew: "written") form of the name adopted in the Revised Version (British and American); the latter the Qere (Hebrew "read") form, adopted in the King James Version and the Revised Version margin ( Ezra 2:50 ).  See  NAPHISH ;  NEPHUSHESIM .
HAHIROTH|   HA-HIROTH  ha-hi'-roth.  See  PI- .
ISLES|    OF THE GENTILES  ( Genesis 10:5 ): the American Standard Revised Version "isles (margin "coast-lands") of the nations," said of the territories of the sons of Japheth. The reference is to the coasts of the Western Mediterranean, with their islands (compare "isles of the sea,"  Esther 10:1   Ezekiel 26:18 , etc.).  See  TABLE OF NATIONS .  GENTILES, ISLES OF THE  See  ISLES OF THE GENTILES .
IZZIAH|     iz-i'-a (yizziyah, "Yah unites"; the King James Version Jeziah): One of the faithful Jews who put away their foreign wives. He belonged to the family of Parosh ( Ezra 10:25 ; 1 Esdras 9:26, "Ieddias").
JEHOSHAPHAT|Jehovah-judged.  (1.) One of David's body-guard ( 1 Chronicles 11:43 ). (2.) One of the priests who accompanied the removal of the ark to Jerusalem ( 1 Chronicles 15:24 ). (3.) Son of Ahilud, "recorder" or annalist under David and Solomon ( 2 Samuel 8:16 ), a state officer of high rank, chancellor or vizier of the kingdom. (4.) Solomon's purveyor in Issachar ( 1 Kings 4:17 ). (5.) The son and successor of Asa, king of Judah. After fortifying his kingdom against Israel ( 2 Chronicles 17:1 ,  2), he set himself to cleanse the land of idolatry ( 1 Kings 22:43 ). In the third year of his reign he sent out priests and Levites over the land to instruct the people in the law ( 2 Chronicles 17:7 -9). He enjoyed a great measure of peace and prosperity, the blessing of God resting on the people "in their basket and their store." The great mistake of his reign was his entering into an alliance with Ahab, the king of Israel, which involved him in much disgrace, and brought disaster on his kingdom ( 1 Kings 22:1 -33). Escaping from the bloody battle of Ramoth-gilead, the prophet Jehu ( 2 Chronicles 19:1 -3) reproached him for the course he had been pursuing, whereupon he entered with rigour on his former course of opposition to all idolatry, and of deepening interest in the worship of God and in the righteous government of the people ( 2 Chronicles 19:4 -11). Again he entered into an alliance with Ahaziah, the king of Israel, for the purpose of carrying on maritime commerce with Ophir. But the fleet that was then equipped at Ezion-gaber was speedily wrecked. A new fleet was fitted out without the co-operation of the king of Israel, and although it was successful, the trade was not prosecuted ( 2 Chronicles 20:35 -37;  1 Kings 22:48 -49). He subsequently joined Jehoram, king of Israel, in a war against the Moabites, who were under tribute to Israel. This war was successful. The Moabites were subdued; but the dreadful act of Mesha in offering his own son a sacrifice on the walls of Kir-haresheth in the sight of the armies of Israel filled him with horror, and he withdrew and returned to his own land ( 2 Kings 3:4 -27). The last most notable event of his reign was that recorded in  2 Chronicles 20 . The Moabites formed a great and powerful confederacy with the surrounding nations, and came against Jehoshaphat. The allied forces were encamped at Engedi. The king and his people were filled with alarm, and betook themselves to God in prayer. The king prayed in the court of the temple, "O our God, wilt thou not judge them? for we have no might against this great company that cometh against us." Amid the silence that followed, the voice of Jahaziel the Levite was heard announcing that on the morrow all this great host would be overthrown. So it was, for they quarrelled among themselves, and slew one another, leaving to the people of Judah only to gather the rich spoils of the slain. This was recognized as a great deliverance wrought for them by God (B.C. 890). Soon after this Jehoshaphat died, after a reign of twenty-five years, being sixty years of age, and was succeeded by his son Jehoram ( 1 Kings 22:50 ). He had this testimony, that "he sought the Lord with all his heart" ( 2 Chronicles 22:9 ). The kingdom of Judah was never more prosperous than under his reign. (6.) The son of Nimshi, and father of Jehu, king of Israel ( 2 Kings 9:2 ,  14).  Jehoshaphat, Valley of Mentioned in Scripture only in  Joel 3:2 , 12. This is the name given in modern times to the valley between Jerusalem and the Mount of Olives, and the Kidron flows through it. Here Jehoshaphat overthrew the confederated enemies of Israel ( Psalm 83:6 -8); and in this valley also God was to overthrow the Tyrians, Zidonians, etc. ( Joel 3:4 ,  19), with an utter overthrow. This has been fulfilled; but Joel speaks of the final conflict, when God would destroy all Jerusalem's enemies, of whom Tyre and Zidon, etc., were types. The "valley of Jehoshaphat" may therefore be simply regarded as a general term for the theatre of God's final judgments on the enemies of Israel. This valley has from ancient times been used by the Jews as a burial-ground. It is all over paved with flat stones as tombstones, bearing on them Hebrew inscriptions. 
GENNESARET|A garden of riches.  (1.) A town of Naphtali, called Chinnereth ( Joshua 19:35 ), sometimes in the plural form Chinneroth ( 11:2 ). In later times the name was gradually changed to Genezar and Gennesaret ( Luke 5:1 ). This city stood on the western shore of the lake to which it gave its name. No trace of it remains. The plain of Gennesaret has been called, from its fertility and beauty, "the Paradise of Galilee." It is now called el-Ghuweir. (2.) The Lake of Gennesaret, the Grecized form of CHINNERETH (q.v.). (see  GALILEE ,  SEA OF.) 
HOSHAMA|     hosh'-a-ma, ho-sha'-ma (hoshama`, abbreviated from yehoshama`, "whom Yahweh heareth"): One of the sons or descendants of Jeconiah, the captive king of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 3:18 ).
SHIMON|     shi'-mon (shimon; Codex Vaticanus Semion, Codex Alexandrinus Semeion; Lucian, Sami): A name in the Judahite genealogy ( 1 Chronicles 4:20 ).
JOGBEHAH|     jog'-be-ha (yoghbechah): A city in Gilead assigned to Gad and fortified by that tribe ( Numbers 32:35 ). It lay on the line along which Gideon chased the Midianites ( Judges 8:11 ), and the indication there leaves no doubt that it is represented today by Ajbeihat. The name attaches to 3 groups of ruins which date from Roman times. The position is about 7 miles Northwest of `Amman, and about midway between that city and the town of es-SalT. It stands 3,468 ft. above the level of the Mediterranean.  LITERATURE.  Oliphant, Land of Gilead, 232; Baedeker-Socin, Palestine.
KENITES|Smiths, the name of a tribe inhabiting the desert lying between southern Palestine and the mountains of Sinai. Jethro was of this tribe ( Judges 1:16 ). He is called a "Midianite" ( Numbers 10:29 ), and hence it is concluded that the Midianites and the Kenites were the same tribe. They were wandering smiths, "the gipsies and travelling tinkers of the old Oriental world. They formed an important guild in an age when the art of metallurgy was confined to a few" (Sayce's Races,  etc.). They showed kindness to Israel in their journey through the wilderness. They accompanied them in their march as far as Jericho ( Judges 1:16 ), and then returned to their old haunts among the Amalekites, in the desert to the south of Judah. They sustained afterwards friendly relations with the Israelites when settled in Canaan ( Judges 4:11 ,  17-21;  1 Samuel 27:10 ;  30:29 ). The Rechabites belonged to this tribe ( 1 Chronicles 2:55 ) and in the days of Jeremiah ( 35:7 -10) are referred to as following their nomad habits. Saul bade them depart from the Amalekites ( 1 Samuel 15:6 ) when, in obedience to the divine commission, he was about to "smite Amalek." And his reason is, "for ye showed kindness to all the children of Israel when they came up out of Egypt." Thus "God is not unrighteous to forget the kindnesses shown to his people; but they shall be remembered another day, at the farthest in the great day, and recompensed in the resurrection of the just" (M. Henry's Commentary). They are mentioned for the last time in Scripture in  1 Samuel 27:10 ; comp. 30:20. 
BETHHANAN|   BETH-HANAN; ELON-BETH-HANAN  beth-ha'-nan ( 1 Kings 4:9 ).  See  ELON .
HANAMEEL|Whom God has graciously given, the cousin of Jeremiah, to whom he sold the field he possessed in Anathoth, before the siege of Jerusalem ( Jeremiah 32:6 -12). 
HOSAH|Refuge.  (1.) A place on the border of the tribe of Asher ( Joshua 19:29 ), a little to the south of Zidon. (2.) A Levite of the family of Merari ( 1 Chronicles 16:38 ). 
REPHAIM|Lofty men; giants, ( Genesis 14:5 ;  2 Samuel 21:16 ,  18,  marg. A.V.,  Rapha,  marg. R.V.,  Raphah;  Deuteronomy 3:13 ,  R.V.; A.V.,  "giants"). The aborigines of Palestine, afterwards conquered and dispossessed by the Canaanite tribes, are classed under this general title. They were known to the Moabites as Emim, i.e., "fearful", ( Deuteronomy 2:11 ), and to the Ammonites as Zamzummim. Some of them found refuge among the Philistines, and were still existing in the days of David. We know nothing of their origin. They were not necessarily connected with the "giants" (R.V.,  "Nephilim") of  Genesis 6:4 . (see  GIANTS .)  Rephaim, Valley of ( Joshua 15:8 ;  18:16 ,  R.V.). When David became king over all Israel, the Philistines, judging that he would now become their uncompromising enemy, made a sudden attack upon Hebron, compelling David to retire from it. He sought refuge in "the hold" at Adullam ( 2 Samuel 5:17 -22), and the Philistines took up their position in the valley of Rephaim, on the west and south-west of Jerusalem. Thus all communication between Bethlehem and Jerusalem was intercepted. While David and his army were encamped here, there occurred that incident narrated in  2 Samuel 23:15 -17. Having obtained divine direction, David led his army against the Philistines, and gained a complete victory over them. The scene of this victory was afterwards called Baalperazim (q.v.). A second time, however, the Philistines rallied their forces in this valley ( 2 Samuel 5:22 ). Again warned by a divine oracle, David led his army to Gibeon, and attacked the Philistines from the south, inflicting on them another severe defeat, and chasing them with great slaughter to Gezer (q.v.). There David kept in check these enemies of Israel. This valley is now called el-Bukei'a. 
JAAR|     ja'-ar (ya`ar, "forest" or "wood"): Is only once taken as a proper name ( Psalm 132:6  the Revised Version margin), "We found it in the field of Jaar." It may be a shortened form of the name Kiriath-jearim, where the ark had rested 20 years.  See  KIRIATH-JEARIM .
PARSHANDATHA|An interpreter of the law, the eldest of Haman's sons, slain in Shushan ( Esther 9:7 ). 
NETHANIAH|Given of Jehovah.  (1.) One of Asaph's sons, appointed by David to minister in the temple ( 1 Chronicles 25:2 ,  12). (2.) A Levite sent by Jehoshaphat to teach the law ( 2 Chronicles 17:8 ). (3.)  Jeremiah 36:14 . (4.)  2 Kings 25:23 , 25. 
ITTAI|Near; timely; or, with the Lord.  (1.) A Benjamite, one of David's thirty heroes ( 2 Samuel 23:29 ). (2.) A native of Gath, a Philistine, who had apparently the command of the six hundred heroes who formed David's band during his wanderings ( 2 Samuel 15:19 -22; Comp.  1 Samuel 23:13 ;  27:2 ;  30:9 ,  10). He is afterwards with David at Mahanaim, holding in the army equal rank with Joab and Abishai ( 2 Samuel 18:2 ,  5,  12). He then passes from view. 
MARCHES|   MARCH;   march, march'-iz.  See  ARMY ;  WAR .
SALAH|   SALA,   sa'-la (shelach, "a missile," "petition"; Sala): A son of Arpachshad (the King James Version  Genesis 10:24 ;  Genesis 11:13 ;;  1 Chronicles 1:18, 24 ).  Luke 3:35, 36  follows the Septuagint of  Genesis 10:24 ;  Genesis 11:12  = SHELAH (which see).
HALHUL|Full of hollows, a town in the highlands of Judah ( Joshua 15:58 ). It is now a small village of the same name, and is situated about 5 miles north-east of Hebron on the way to Jerusalem. There is an old Jewish tradition that Gad, David's seer ( 2 Samuel 24:11 ), was buried here. 
PILDASH|     pil'-dash (pildash, "steely"): Nephew of Abram ( Genesis 22:22 ).
TANACH|     See  TAANACH .
BAALSHALISHA|Lord of Shalisha, a place from which a man came with provisions for Elisha, apparently not far from Gilgal ( 2 Kings 4:42 ). It has been identified with Sirisia, 13 miles north of Lydda. 
CEDRON|The black torrent, the brook flowing through the ravine below the eastern wall of Jerusalem ( John 18:1 ). (see  KIDRON .) 
MAADAI|     ma-a-da'-i, ma'-a-di (ma`adhay): Son of Bani; one of those who married foreign wives ( Ezra 10:34 ).
IZHAR|Oil, one of the sons of Kohath, and grandson of Levi ( Exodus 6:18 ,  21;  Numbers 16:1 ). 
SETHUR|Hidden, one of the spies sent to search the Promised Land. He was of the tribe of Asher ( Numbers 13:13 ). 
STARS|The eleven stars ( Genesis 37:9 ); the seven ( Amos 5:8 ); wandering ( Jude 1:13 ); seen in the east at the birth of Christ, probably some luminous meteors miraculously formed for this specific purpose ( Matthew 2:2 -10); stars worshipped ( Deuteronomy 4:19 ;  2 Kings 17:16 ;  21:3 ;  Jeremiah 19:13 ); spoken of symbolically ( Numbers 24:17 ;  Revelation 1:16 ,  20;  12:1 ). (see  ASTROLOGERS .) 
JAASAU|Fabricator, an Israelite who renounced his Gentile wife after the Return ( Ezra 10:37 ). 
DARDA|Pearl of wisdom, one of the four who were noted for their wisdom, but whom Solomon excelled ( 1 Kings 4:31 ). 
KARTAN|Double city, a town of Naphali, assigned to the Gershonite Levites, and one of the cities of refuge ( Joshua 21:32 ). It was probably near the north-western shore of the Sea of Tiberias, identical with the ruined village el-Katanah. 
HARAN| (1.) Hebrews haran; i.e., "mountaineer." The eldest son of Terah, brother of Abraham and Nahor, and father of Lot, Milcah, and Iscah. He died before his father ( Genesis 11:27 ), in Ur of the Chaldees. (2.) Hebrews haran, i.e., "parched;" or probably from the Accadian charana, meaning "a road." A celebrated city of Western Asia, now Harran, where Abram remained, after he left Ur of the Chaldees, till his father Terah died ( Genesis 11:31 ,  32), when he continued his journey into the land of Canaan. It is called "Charran" in the LXX. and in  Acts 7:2 . It is called the "city of Nahor" ( Genesis 24:10 ), and Jacob resided here with Laban ( 30:43 ). It stood on the river Belik, an affluent of the Euphrates, about 70 miles above where it joins that river in Upper Mesopotamia or Padan-aram, and about 600 miles northwest of Ur in a direct line. It was on the caravan route between the east and west. It is afterwards mentioned among the towns taken by the king of Assyria ( 2 Kings 19:12 ;  Isaiah 37:12 ). It was known to the Greeks and Romans under the name Carrhae. (3.) The son of Caleb of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:46 ) by his concubine Ephah. 
JESURUN|     je-su'-run, jes'-u-run.  See  JESHURUN .
HASHABIAH|Regarded by Jehovah.  (1.) Merarite Levite ( 1 Chronicles 6:45 ;  9:14 ).  (2.) A son of Jeduthun ( 25:3 ,  19).  (3.) Son of Kemuel ( 26:30 ).  (4.) One of the chief Levites ( 2 Chronicles 35:9 ).  (5.) A Levite ( Nehemiah 11:22 ).  (6.) One of the chief priests in the time of Ezra ( Ezra 8:24 ).  (7.) A chief of the Levites ( Nehemiah 12:24 ).  (8.)  Ezra 8:19 .  (9.)  Nehemiah 3:17 . 
JARMUTH|Height.  (1.) A town in the plain of Judah ( Joshua 15:35 ), originally the residence of one of the Canaanitish kings ( 10:3 ,  5,  23). It has been identified with the modern Yarmuk, a village about 7 miles north-east of Beit-Jibrin. (2.) A Levitical city of the tribe of Issachar ( Joshua 21:29 ), supposed by some to be the Ramah of Samuel ( 1 Samuel 19:22 ). 
QUARTUS|Fourth, a Corinthian Christian who sent by Paul his salutations to friends at Rome ( Romans 16:23 ). 
PELETH|Swiftness.  (1.) A Reubenite whose son was one of the conspirators against Moses and Aaron ( Numbers 16:1 ). (2.) One of the sons of Jonathan ( 1 Chronicles 2:33 ). 
RAHEL|     ra'-hel ( Jeremiah 31:15  the King James Version).  See  RACHEL .
NAHAMANI|     na-ha-ma'-ni, na-ham'-a-ni (nachamani "compassionate"): One of the twelve heads who returned with Zerubbabel ( Nehemiah 7:7 ). The name is wanting in the parallel list ( Ezra 2:2 ). In 1 Esdras 5:8 he is called "Eneneus" (the Revised Version margin "Enenis").
JEKAMEAM|     jek-a-me'-am, je-kam'-e-am (yeqam`-am probably "may kinsman establish"): Head of a Levitical house ( 1 Chronicles 23:19 ;  1 Chronicles 24:23 ). The meaning of the name depends upon that of (`am) in compound names; see H P N, 46, 51;.
SEORIM|Barley, the chief of the forth priestly course ( 1 Chronicles 24:8 ). 
WARS|Wars of the Lord, The Book of the ( Numbers 21:14 ,  15), some unknown book so called (Comp.  Genesis 14:14 -16;  Exodus 17:8 -16;  Numbers 14:40 -45;  21:1 -3,  21-25,  33-35; 31. The wars here recorded might be thus designated). 
POTIPHERA|   POTI-PHERA  po-tif'-e-ra (poTi phera`; Egyptian Padipara, "the (one) given of the sun-god"; compare Hebrew Nathaniel, "the gift of God,"  Genesis 41:45, 50 ;  Genesis 46:20 ): There is no certain evidence from Egypt that this name was in existence until the XXIInd Dynasty, about 950 B.C. But names of the Hyksos period, and, indeed, any kind of Hyksos inscriptions, are so scarce on account of the destruction of Hyksos monuments by the Egyptians of later times that the absence of such names is really no evidence on the subject. The fact that this name has not been discovered earlier than 950 B.C. does not give any warrant for the claim that the narrative is of a late date.  M. G. Kyle
HIERAPOLIS|Sacred city, a city of Phrygia, where was a Christian church under the care of Epaphras ( Colossians 4:12 ,  13). This church was founded at the same time as that of Colosse. It now bears the name of Pambuk-Kalek, i.e., "Cotton Castle", from the white appearance of the cliffs at the base of which the ruins are found. 
TOKHATH|     tok'-hath.  See  TIKVAH .
DIDYMUS|(Gr. twin = Hebrews Thomas,  q.v.),  John 11:16 ;  20:24 ;  21:2 . 
CHESALON|Strength; confidence, a place on the border of Judah, on the side of Mount Jearim ( Joshua 15:10 ); probably identified with the modern village of Kesla, on the western mountains of Judah. 
DISCERNINGS|    OF SPIRITS  di-zurn'-inz, (diakriseis pneumaton, "judicial estimation," "through judgment or separation"): Occurs in  1 Corinthians 12:10  as being one of the gifts of the Spirit. The Greek word occurs in  Hebrews 5:14 ; and  Romans 14:1 : "But him that is weak in faith receive ye, yet not for decision of scruples." This translation scarcely expresses the meaning, which Thayer has freely rendered, "not for the purpose of passing judgment on opinions, as to which one is to be preferred as the more correct." Taking these three passages together it is evident that the Greek term which is rendered "discerning" means a distinguishing or discriminating between things that are under consideration; hence, the one who possessed the gift of "discernings of spirits" was able to make distinction between the one who spoke by the Spirit of God and the one who was moved by a false spirit. This gift seems to have been exercised chiefly upon those who assumed the role of teachers, and it was especially important in those days, because there were many false teachers abroad (see  2 John 1:7   Acts 20:29, 30 ). See also  SPIRITUAL GIFTS .  A. W. Fortune  SPIRITS, DISCERNINGS OF  See  DISCERNINGS OF SPIRITS ;  SPIRITUAL GIFTS .
DABBESHETH|     dab'-e-sheth (dabbesheth; Dabasthai; the King James Version Dabbasheth, dab'a-sheth): A town on the western boundary of Zebulun ( Joshua 19:11 ). It is probably identical with the modern Dabsheh, a ruined site to the East of Acre.
HANANEEL|God has graciously given, a tower in the wall of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 3:1 ;  12:39 ). It is mentioned also in  Jeremiah 31:38 ;  Zechariah 14:10 . 
DINHABAH|Robbers' den, an Edomitish city, the capital of king Bela ( Genesis 36:32 ). It is probably the modern Dibdiba, a little north-east of Petra. 
SHIMEA|The hearing prayer.  (1.) One of David's sons by Bathsheba ( 1 Chronicles 3:5 ); called also Shammua ( 14:4 ). (2.) A Levite of the family of Merari ( 1 Chronicles 6:30 ). (3.) Another Levite of the family of Gershon ( 1 Chronicles 6:39 ). (4.) One of David's brothers ( 1 Samuel 16:9 ,  marg.). 
PHALLU|Separated, the second son of Reuben ( Genesis 46:9 ). 
KOZ|Thorn.  (1.) A descendant of Judah.  1 Chronicles 4:8 , "Coz;" R.V., "Hakkoz." (2.) A priest, the head of the seventh division of the priests ( Ezra 2:61 ;  Nehemiah 3:4 ,  21;  7:63 ). In  1 Chronicles 24:10  the word has the article prefixed, and it is taken as a part of the word "Hakkoz." 
TARPELITES|     tar'-pel-its (Tarpelaye' ( Ezra 4:9 )): Various theories have been advanced as to the identity of the Tarpelites. Rawlinson suggested the Tuplai, which name appears in the inscriptions as equivalent to the Greek Tibarenoi, a tribe on the coast of Pontus. Hitzig located them in Tripolis in Northern Phoenicia. The latest theory emends the text to Tiphceraya', "tablet-writers" (from the Assyrian dup sarru); compare Schrader, Schrader, The Cuneiform Inscriptions and the Old Testament, on  Jeremiah 51:27 .
MISHMANNAH|Fatness, one of the Gadite heroes who gathered to David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:10 ). 
CHITLISH|     kit'-lish (kithlish, "separation"; the King James Version Kithlish, the English Revised Version "Chithlish," kith'lish): A town named with Lahman and Gederoth in the Shephelah of Judah ( Joshua 15:40 ).
NINEVITES|     nin'-e-vits (Nineu(e)itai): Only in  Luke 11:30 . The parallel passage ( Matthew 12:41 ), with  Luke 11:32 , has the fuller form, "men of Nineveh," which gives the meaning.
GIBEA|     gib'-e-a (gibh`a', "hill"): A grandson of Caleb ( 1 Chronicles 2:49 ). His father was Sheva, whose mother was Maacah, Caleb's concubine ( 1 Chronicles 2:48 ).
HAZAR|     ha'-zar (chatsar, construct of chatser, "an enclosure," "settlement," or "village"): Is frequently the first element in Hebrew place-names.  1. Hazar-addar:  Hazar-addar (Hebrew chatsar 'addar), a place on the southern boundary of Judah ( Numbers 34:4 ), is probably identical with Hazron ( Joshua 15:3 ), which, in this case, however, is separated from Addar (the King James Version "Adar"). It seems to have lain somewhere to the Southwest of Kadesh-barnea.  2. Hazar-enan:  Hazar-enan (Hebrew chatsar 'enan, "village of springs": enan is Aramaic; Once ( Ezekiel 47:17 ) it is called Enon), a place, unidentified, at the junction of the northern and eastern frontiers of the land promised to Israel ( Numbers 34:9 ; compare  Ezekiel 47:17 ;  Ezekiel 48:1 ). To identify it with the sources of the Orontes seems to leave too great a gap between this and the places named to the South. Buhl (GAP, 66) would draw the northern boundary from Nahr el-Qasimiyeh to the foot of Hermon, and would locate Hazar-enan at Banias. The springs there lend fitness to the name; a condition absent from el-Chadr, farther east, suggested by von Kesteren. But there is no certainty.  3. Hazar-gaddah:  Hazar-gaddah (Hebrew hatsar-gaddah), a place in the territory of Judah "toward the border of Edom in the South" ( Joshua 15:21, 27 ). Eusebius, Onomasticon (s.v. "Gadda") places it in the uttermost parts of the Daroma, overlooking the Dead Sea. This might point to the site of Masada, or to the remarkable ruins of Umm Bajjaq farther south (GAP, 185).  4. Hazar-hatticon:  Hazar-hatticon (the Revised Version (British and American) HAZER-HATTICON; Hebrew chatser ha-tikhon, "the middle village"), a place named on the ideal border of Israel ( Ezekiel 47:16 ). The context shows that it is identical with Hazar-enan, for which this is apparently another name. Possibly, however, it is due to a scribal error. 5. Hazarmaveth:  Hazarmaveth (Hebrew chatsarmaweth), the name of a son of Joktan attached to a clan or district in South Arabia ( Genesis 10:26   1 Chronicles 1:20 ). It is represented by the modern Chadramaut, a broad and fruitful valley running nearly parallel with the coast for about 100 miles, north of el-Yemen. The ruins and inscriptions found by Glaser show that it was once the home of a great civilization, the capital being Sabata ( Genesis 10:7 ) (Glaser, Skizze, II, 20, 423).  6. Hazar-shual:  Hazar-Shual (Hebrew chatsar shu`al), a place in the South of Judah ( Joshua 15:28 ) assigned to Simeon ( Joshua 19:3   1 Chronicles 4:28 ). It was reoccupied after the exile ( Nehemiah 11:27 ). Sa`weh on a hill East of Beersheba has been suggested; but there is no certainty.  7. Hazar-susah:  Hazar-susah (Hebrew chatsar cucah,  Joshua 19:5 ), Hazar-susim (Hebrew chatsar cucim,  1 Chronicles 4:31 ). As it stands, the name means "station of a mare" or "of horses," and it occurs along with Beth-marcaboth, "place of chariots," which might suggest depots for trade in chariots and horses. The sites have not been identified.  W. Ewing
ISCARIOT|(see  JUDAS .) 
ETHAM|Perhaps another name for Khetam, or "fortress," on the Shur or great wall of Egypt, which extended from the Mediterranean to the Gulf of Suez. Here the Israelites made their third encampment ( Exodus 13:20 ;  Numbers 33:6 ). The camp was probably a little to the west of the modern town of Ismailia. Here the Israelites were commanded to change their route ( Exodus 14:2 ), and "turn" towards the south, and encamp before Pi-hahiroth. (see  EXODUS ; PITHOM.) 
ESHBAN|     esh'-ban ('eshban; perhaps "thoughtful," "intelligent"; Asban):  Name of a chief of the Horites ( Genesis 36:26   1 Chronicles 1:41 ).
SHAALBONITE|     sha-al-bo'-nit, sha-al'-bo-nit (ha-sha`alboni; ho Salaboneites ( 2 Samuel 23:32 ) Codex Vaticanus ho Homei; Codex Alexandrinus ho Salaboni): Eliahba, one of David's heroes, a native of Shaalbon.  See  SHAALBIM .
BECHER|First-born; a youth, the second son of Benjamin ( Genesis 46:21 ), who came down to Egypt with Jacob. It is probable that he married an Ephraimitish heiress, and that his descendants were consequently reckoned among the tribe of Ephraim ( Numbers 26:35 ;  1 Chronicles 7:20 ,  21). They are not reckoned among the descendants of Benjamin ( Numbers 26:38 ). 
ELIPHALET|God his deliverance, one of David's sons ( 2 Samuel 5:16 ); called also Eliphelet ( 1 Chronicles 3:8 ). 
NIGER|Black, a surname of Simeon ( Acts 13:1 ). He was probably so called from his dark complexion. 
EBENEZER|Stone of help, the memorial stone set up by Samuel to commemorate the divine assistance to Israel in their great battle against the Philistines, whom they totally routed ( 1 Samuel 7:7 -12) at Aphek, in the neighbourhood of Mizpeh, in Benjamin, near the western entrance of the pass of Beth-horon. On this very battle-field, twenty years before, the Philistines routed the Israelites, "and slew of the army in the field about four thousand men" ( 4:1 , 2; here,  and at 5:1,  called "Eben-ezer" by anticipation). In this extremity the Israelites fetched the ark out of Shiloh and carried it into their camp. The Philistines a second time immediately attacked them, and smote them with a very great slaughter, "for there fell of Israel thirty thousand footmen. And the ark of God was taken" ( 1 Samuel 4:10 ). And now in the same place the Philistines are vanquished, and the memorial stone is erected by Samuel (q.v.). The spot where the stone was erected was somewhere "between Mizpeh and Shen." Some have identified it with the modern Beit Iksa, a conspicuous and prominent position, apparently answering all the necessary conditions; others with Dier Aban, 3 miles east of `Ain Shems. 
IRSHEMESH|   IR-SHEMESH  ur-she'-mesh, ir-she'-mesh (`ir shemesh, "city of the sun").  See  BETH-SHEMESH ;  HERES .
TIMNATHHERES|Portion of the sun, where Joshua was buried ( Judges 2:9 ). It was "in the mount of Ephraim, in the north side of the hill Gaash," 10 miles south-west of Shechem. The same as the following. 
CHIUN|Occurs only in  Amos 5:26  (R.V. marg.,  "shrine"). The LXX. translated the word by Rhephan, which became corrupted into Remphan, as used by Stephen ( Acts 7:43 ; but R.V.,  "Rephan"). Probably the planet Saturn is intended by the name. Astrologers represented this planet as baleful in its influences, and hence the Phoenicians offered to it human sacrifices, especially children. 
ELISHA|God his salvation, the son of Shaphat of Abel-meholah, who became the attendant and disciple of Elijah ( 1 Kings 19:16 -19). His name first occurs in the command given to Elijah to anoint him as his successor ( 1 Kings 19:16 ). This was the only one of the three commands then given to Elijah which he accomplished. On his way from Sinai to Damascus he found Elisha at his native place engaged in the labours of the field, ploughing with twelve yoke of oxen. He went over to him, threw over his shoulders his rough mantle, and at once adopted him as a son, and invested him with the prophetical office (Comp.  Luke 9:61 ,  62). Elisha accepted the call thus given (about four years before the death of Ahab), and for some seven or eight years became the close attendant on Elijah till he was parted from him and taken up into heaven. During all these years we hear nothing of Elisha except in connection with the closing scenes of Elijah's life. After Elijah, Elisha was accepted as the leader of the sons of the prophets, and became noted in Israel. He possessed, according to his own request, "a double portion" of Elijah's spirit ( 2 Kings 2:9 ); and for the long period of about sixty years (B.C. 892-832) held the office of "prophet in Israel" ( 2 Kings 5:8 ). After Elijah's departure, Elisha returned to Jericho, and there healed the spring of water by casting salt into it ( 2 Kings 2:21 ). We next find him at Bethel ( 2:23 ), where, with the sternness of his master, he cursed the youths who came out and scoffed at him as a prophet of God: "Go up, thou bald head." The judgment at once took effect, and God terribly visited the dishonour done to his prophet as dishonour done to himself. We next read of his predicting a fall of rain when the army of Jehoram was faint from thirst ( 2 Kings 3:9 -20); of the multiplying of the poor widow's cruse of oil ( 4:1 -7); the miracle of restoring to life the son of the woman of Shunem ( 4:18 -37); the multiplication of the twenty loaves of new barley into a sufficient supply for an hundred men ( 4:42 -44); of the cure of Naaman the Syrian of his leprosy ( 5:1 -27); of the punishment of Gehazi for his falsehood and his covetousness; of the recovery of the axe lost in the waters of the Jordan ( 6:1 -7); of the miracle at Dothan, half-way on the road between Samaria and Jezreel; of the siege of Samaria by the king of Syria, and of the terrible sufferings of the people in connection with it, and Elisha's prophecy as to the relief that would come ( 2 Kings 6:24 - 7:2 ). We then find Elisha at Damascus, to carry out the command given to his master to anoint Hazael king over Syria ( 2 Kings 8:7 -15); thereafter he directs one of the sons of the prophets to anoint Jehu, the son of Jehoshaphat, king of Israel, instead of Ahab. Thus the three commands given to Elijah ( 9:1 -10) were at length carried out. We do not again read of him till we find him on his death-bed in his own house ( 2 Kings 13:14 -19). Joash, the grandson of Jehu, comes to mourn over his approaching departure, and utters the same words as those of Elisha when Elijah was taken away: "My father, my father! the chariot of Israel, and the horsemen thereof." Afterwards when a dead body is laid in Elisha's grave a year after his burial, no sooner does it touch the hallowed remains than the man "revived, and stood up on his feet" ( 2 Kings 13:20 -21). 
JEHONATHAN|Whom Jehovah gave.  (1.) One of the stewards of David's store-houses ( 1 Chronicles 27:25 ). (2.) A Levite who taught the law to the people of Judah ( 2 Chronicles 17:8 ). (3.)  Nehemiah 12:18 . 
STEPHEN|One of the seven deacons, who became a preacher of the gospel. He was the first Christian martyr. His personal character and history are recorded in  Acts 6 . "He fell asleep" with a prayer for his persecutors on his lips ( 7:60 ). Devout men carried him to his grave ( 8:2 ). It was at the feet of the young Pharisee, Saul of Tarsus, that those who stoned him laid their clothes (Comp.  Deuteronomy 17:5 -7) before they began their cruel work. The scene which Saul then witnessed and the words he heard appear to have made a deep and lasting impression on his mind ( Acts 22:19 ,  20). The speech of Stephen before the Jewish ruler is the first apology for the universalism of the gospel as a message to the Gentiles as well as the Jews. It is the longest speech contained in the Acts, a place of prominence being given to it as a defence. 
SERVANTS|   SOLOMON'S   ('adbhedhe shelomoh; douloi Salomon): "The children of Solomon's servants" constituted a company or guild of the Jewish exiles who returned with Zerubbabel from Babylonia to Jerusalem in 537 B.C., pursuant to the decree of Cyrus; they are mentioned 5 times ( Ezra 2:55, 58  parallel  Nehemiah 7:57, 60   Nehemiah 11:3 ). As the prime purpose of the returning exiles was the rebuilding of the Temple and the restoration of Yahweh's worship ( Ezra 1:2, 3 ), it was important that those who held the privileges of sanctuary service as a family heritage should go back to their duties. This included, besides priests and Levites, the NETHINIM (which see) and Solomon's Servants. In every reference to them, Solomon's Servants are connected with the Nethinim, who had been "given" or dedicated (nethinim or nethunim is pass. participle of nathan, "to give," "to appoint") by David "for the service of the Levites ( Ezra 8:20 ); so Solomon's Servants traced their official beginning back to Solomon's appointment, as their name indicates. In the joint references they always fall into the natural chronological order, i.e. following the Nethinim. It is possible, therefore, that they are referred to in  Ezra 7:24  also, under the title "servants of this house of God," which immediately follows "Nethinim" in the list of those exempt from taxation and tolls.  What their duties in the house of God may have been is not stated in the records. These must have been more or less menial, the more formal and honorable duties being reserved for "the priests and Levites, the singers, (and) porters" ( Ezra 7:24 ). When the ark was brought to Jerusalem by David and the ceremonial of the sacrificial system was more strictly observed, the services of priests and Levites were greatly increased, and to meet the needs of the new order David appointed the Nethinim ( Ezra 8:20 ; compare  1 Chronicles 9:2 ). Likewise the much greater increase in such duties on the completion of Solomon's Temple was the occasion for the dedication of an additional number of these assistants to the Levites.  The number of those who returned with Zerubbabel was not great, together with the Nethinim being only 392. This does not appear to have been sufficient for the needs of the sanctuary, since Ezra, in preparation for his expedition in 458 B.C., made special appeal for Nethinim to go with him, of whom 220 responded ( Ezra 8:15-20 ). No doubt at the first their service was considered to be lowly; but by the time of the exile, certainly after it, their position had developed into one of considerable honor and constituted them a privileged class in the nation. While many of the people were required by Nehemiah to live in Jerusalem, they were allowed to dwell in their possessions "in the cities of Judah" ( Nehemiah 11:3 ).  A question of some interest and of difference of opinion is whether Solomon's Servants were Levites or non-Israelites. The latter view is the more generally held, for the following reasons; (1) After the completion of the Temple and his other great buildings a large body of workmen, whom Solomon had drafted from the non-Israelite population, were without occupation, and might well have been assigned to the menial duties of the Temple ( 1 Kings 9 ), their name in Septuagint (douloi) properly indicating such a class; (2) Ezekiel excludes non-Israelites from the service of his ideal temple, as though they had been allowed in the preexilic Temple (44:9); (3) they are always clearly distinguished from the Levites in the lists of religious bodies.  But, on the other hand, equally strong arguments favor their Levitical descent:  (1) Levites also are called douloi in 1 Esdras; (2) it is more probable that Ezekiel refers to the abuses of Athaliah, Ahaz and Manasseh than to the institutions of David and Solomon;  (3) Ezra specifically classifies the Nethinim as Levites (8:15-20);  (4) there is not the slightest intimation in the text of  1 Kings 9:15-22  that the Gentilebondservants were assigned to temple-service after completion of the great building operations; such an interpretation is wholly inferential, while, on the contrary, it is more probable that such an innovation would have been mentioned in the narrative; and  (5) it is not probable that Ezra and Nehemiah, or Zerubbabel, with their strict views of Israelite privilege (compare  Ezra 2:62 ), would have admitted non-Israelites to sacred functions, the less so in view of Ezekiel's prohibition. There is more ground, then, for holding that Solomon's Servants, like the porters and singers, were an order of Levites.  Edward Mack  TEMPLE KEEPERS (SERVANTS)  After the conquest of Midian, "Moses took one drawn out of every fifty, both of man and of beast, and gave them unto the Levites, that kept the charge of the tabernacle of Yahweh" ( Numbers 31:47 ; compare 31:30). Similarly, after the deception of Joshua by the Gibeonites, "Joshua made them that day hewers of wood and drawers of water for the congregation, and for the altar of Yahweh, unto this day" ( Joshua 9:27 ). The object of these notices, evidently, is to explain how a non-Israelitish class of sanctuary servants had taken their origin. Their existence at the time of Ezekiel, however, is the object of one of the latter's severest denunciations: "Ye have brought in foreigners, uncircumcised in heart and uncircumcised in flesh, to be in my sanctuary, to profane it..... And ye have not kept the charge of my holy things; but ye have set keepers of my charge in my sanctuary for yourselves" ( Ezekiel 44:7 f ). In place of these servants or "keepers" Ezekiel directs that such Levites are to be employed as have been degraded from priestly privileges for participating in idolatrous worship. On them shall devolve all the various duties of the temple except the actual offering of sacrifices, which is reserved for "the priests the Levites, the sons of Zadok" (44:10-15). For the use of this deposed class, "the priests, the keepers of the charge of the house," is reserved a special room in the inner court of the temple (40:44).  See , further, NETHINIM.  Burton Scott Easton  SERVANTS, SOLOMON'S  See  SOLOMON'S SERVANTS .
SALA|A shoot, a descendant of Arphaxed ( Luke 3:35 ,  36); called also Shelah ( 1 Chronicles 1:18 ,  24). 
JAIRUS|A ruler of the synagogue at Capernaum, whose only daughter Jesus restored to life ( Mark 5:22 ;  Luke 8:41 ). Entering into the chamber of death, accompanied by Peter and James and John and the father and mother of the maiden, he went forward to the bed whereon the corpse lay, and said, Talitha cumi, i.e., "Maid, arise," and immediately the spirit of the maiden came to her again, and she arose straightway; and "at once to strengthen that life which had come back to her, and to prove that she was indeed no ghost, but had returned to the realities of a mortal existence, he commanded to give her something to eat" ( Mark 5:43 ). 
REHABIAH|Enlargement of the Lord, the son of Eliezer, and grandson of Moses ( 1 Chronicles 23:17 ;  24:21 ). 
SHISHA|     shi'-sha (shisha'): One of Solomon's officers of state ( 1 Kings 4:3 ).
ZORITES|     zo'-rits (tsor`i; Codex Vaticanus ho Hesarsei; Codex Alexandrinus ho Hesaraei): In  1 Chronicles 2:54  for "Zorites" we should probably read ZORATHITES (which see). These formed a half of the inhabitants of MANAHATH (which see).
CIS|     sis (Keis): The form given in  Acts 13:21  the King James Version for Kish, the father of Saul the first king of Israel ( 1 Samuel 9:1 f ).
BENINU|     be-ni'-nu (beninu, "our son"): A Levite who with Nehemiah sealed the covenant ( Nehemiah 10:13 ).
LIBYA|The country of the Ludim ( Genesis 10:13 ), Northern Africa, a large tract lying along the Mediterranean, to the west of Egypt ( Acts 2:10 ). Cyrene was one of its five cities. 
SPIRITS|   DISCERNINGS OF   di-zurn'-inz, (diakriseis pneumaton, "judicial estimation," "through judgment or separation"): Occurs in  1 Corinthians 12:10  as being one of the gifts of the Spirit. The Greek word occurs in  Hebrews 5:14 ; and  Romans 14:1 : "But him that is weak in faith receive ye, yet not for decision of scruples." This translation scarcely expresses the meaning, which Thayer has freely rendered, "not for the purpose of passing judgment on opinions, as to which one is to be preferred as the more correct." Taking these three passages together it is evident that the Greek term which is rendered "discerning" means a distinguishing or discriminating between things that are under consideration; hence, the one who possessed the gift of "discernings of spirits" was able to make distinction between the one who spoke by the Spirit of God and the one who was moved by a false spirit. This gift seems to have been exercised chiefly upon those who assumed the role of teachers, and it was especially important in those days, because there were many false teachers abroad (see  2 John 1:7   Acts 20:29, 30 ). See also  SPIRITUAL GIFTS .  A. W. Fortune  PRISON, SPIRITS IN  The phrase occurs in the much-disputed passage,  1 Peter 3:18-20 , where the apostle, exhorting Christians to endurance under suffering for well-doing, says: "Because Christ also suffered for sins once, the righteous for the unrighteous, that he might bring us to God; being put to death in the flesh, but made alive in the spirit; in which also he went and preached unto the spirits in prison, that aforetime were disobedient, when the longsuffering of God waited in the days of Noah, while the ark was a preparing, wherein few, that is, eight souls, were saved through water." It is plain that in this context "the spirits in prison" (tois en phulake pneumasin) denote the generation who were disobedient in the days of Noah, while the words "spirits" and "in prison" refer to their present disembodied condition in a place of judgment in the unseen world (compare  2 Peter 2:4-9 ). The crucial point in the passage lies in what is said of Christ's preaching to these spirits in prison. The interpretation which strikes one most naturally is that Christ, put to death in the flesh, and made alive again in the spirit, went in this spiritual (disembodied) state, and preached to these spirits, who once had been disobedient, but are viewed as now possibly receptive of His message This is the idea of the passage taken by the majority of modern exegetes, and it finds support in what is said in  1 Peter 4:6 , "For unto this end was the gospel preached even to the dead, that they might be judged indeed according to men in the flesh, but live according to God in the spirit." On this basis is now often reared a mass of doctrine or conjecture respecting "second probation," "restoration," etc.-in part going back to patristic times-for which the passage, even so taken, affords a very narrow foundation (see on this view, Plumptre, The Spirits in Prison; Dorner, System of Christian Doctrine, IV, 130-32; E. White, Life in Christ, chapter xxii). It must be admitted, however, that, on closer examination, the above plausible explanation is compassed with many difficulties. A preaching of Christ in Hades is referred to in no other passage of Scripture, while Peter appears to be speaking to his readers of something with which they are familiar; it seems strange that these antediluvians should be singled out as the sole objects of this preaching in the spiritual world; the word "made alive" does not exegetically refer to a disembodied state, but to the resurrection of Christ in the body, etc. Another line of interpretation is therefore preferred by many, who take the words "in which also he went," to refer, not to a disembodied manifestation, but to the historical preaching to the antediluvian generation through Noah while they yet lived. In favor of this view is the fact that the apostle in  1 Peter 1:11  regards the earlier prophetic preaching as a testifying of "the Spirit of Christ," that God's long-suffering with Noah's generation is described in  Genesis 6:5 , which Peter has doubtless in his mind, as a striving of God's Spirit, and that in  2 Peter 2:5  there is another allusion to these events, and Noah is described as "a preacher of righteousness." The passage,  1 Peter 4:6 , may have the more general meaning that Christians who have died are at no disadvantage in the judgment as compared with those who shall be alive at the Parousia (compare  1 Thessalonians 4:15-18 ). (For an exposition of this view, with a full account of the interpretations and literature on the subject, compare Salmond's Christian Doctrine of Immortality, 4th edition, 364-87.)  See also  ESCHATOLOGY OF THE NEW TESTAMENT .  James Orr  SPIRITS, DISCERNINGS OF  See  DISCERNINGS OF SPIRITS ;  SPIRITUAL GIFTS .
PIRATHON|Prince, or summit, a place "in the land of Ephraim" ( Judges 12:15 ), now Fer'on, some 10 miles south-west of Shechem. This was the home of Abdon the judge. 
PAI|     pa'-i (pa`i; Phogor): The royal city of Hadad or Hadar, king of Edom ( 1 Chronicles 1:50 ). The name is given as "Pau" (pa`u) in  Genesis 36:39 . There is no indication of its position. It is not identified.
RIMMONPAREZ|A pomegranate breach, or Rimmon of the breach, one of the stations of the Israelites in the wilderness ( Numbers 33:19 ,  20). 
IMRI|     im'-ri ('imri):  (1) A Judahite ( 1 Chronicles 9:4 ).  (2) Father of Zaccur who helped to rebuild the walls of Jerusalem under Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 3:2 ).
JESIMIEL|     je-sim'-i-el (yesimi'el, "God establishes"): A prince of Simeon ( 1 Chronicles 4:36 ).
MARSENA|     mar-se'-na, mar'-se-na (marcena'; derivation unknown but probably of Persian origin ( Esther 1:14 )): One of "the seven princes of Persia and Media, who saw the king's face, and sat first in the kingdom."
KAMON|     ka'-mon (qamon; the King James Version Camon): The place where Jair was buffed ( Judges 10:3-5 ). It is possibly represented either by Kamm or Kumeim, ruins which lie about 6 and 7 miles respectively to the South-Southeast of Umm Keis. See further HAVVOTH-JAIR. The ruins of Kamm, about 200 yds. square, crown a small elevation, and point to an important place in the past. There are large rock-hewn cisterns to the South. Among the ruins of Kumein, which are not considerable, a few mud huts are built, occupied today by about 200 souls (Schumacher, Northern 'Ajlun, 137).
DIZAHAB|Region of gold, a place in the desert of Sinai, on the western shore of the Elanitic gulf ( Deuteronomy 1:1 ). It is now called Dehab. 
JAPHETH|Wide spreading: "God shall enlarge Japheth" (Hebrews Yaphat Elohim le-Yephet,   Genesis 9:27 . Some,  however,  derive the name from yaphah,  "to be beautiful;" hence white), one of the sons of Noah, mentioned last in order ( Genesis 5:32 ;  6:10 ;  7:13 ), perhaps first by birth ( 10:21 ; Comp.  9:24 ). He and his wife were two of the eight saved in the ark ( 1 Peter 3:20 ). He was the progenitor of many tribes inhabiting the east of Europe and the north of Asia ( Genesis 10:2 -5). An act of filial piety ( 9:20 -27) was the occasion of Noah's prophecy of the extension of his posterity. After the Flood the earth was re-peopled by the descendants of Noah, "the sons of Japheth" ( Genesis 10:2 ), "the sons of Ham" (6), and "the sons of Shem" (22). It is important to notice that modern ethnological science, reasoning from a careful analysis of facts, has arrived at the conclusion that there is a three-fold division of the human family, corresponding in a remarkable way with the great ethnological chapter of the book of Genesis (10). The three great races thus distinguished are called the Semitic, Aryan, and Turanian (Allophylian). "Setting aside the cases where the ethnic names employed are of doubtful application, it cannot reasonably be questioned that the author [of  Genesis 10 ] has in his account of the sons of Japheth classed together the Cymry or Celts (Gomer), the Medes (Madai), and the Ionians or Greeks (Javan), thereby anticipating what has become known in modern times as the `Indo-European Theory,' or the essential unity of the Aryan (Asiatic) race with the principal races of Europe, indicated by the Celts and the Ionians. Nor can it be doubted that he has thrown together under the one head of 'children of Shem' the Assyrians (Asshur), the Syrians (Aram), the Hebrews (Eber), and the Joktanian Arabs (Joktan), four of the principal races which modern ethnology recognizes under the heading of `Semitic.' Again, under the heading of `sons of Ham,' the author has arranged `Cush', i.e., the Ethiopians; `Mizraim,' the people of Egypt; `Sheba and Dedan,' or certain of the Southern Arabs; and `Nimrod,' or the ancient people of Babylon, four races between which the latest linguistic researches have established a close affinity" (Rawlinson's Hist. Illustrations).
HANANIAH|Jehovah has given.  (1.) A chief of the tribe of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:24 ).  (2.) One of the sons of Heman ( 1 Chronicles 25:4 , 23).  (3.) One of Uzziah's military officers ( 2 Chronicles 26:11 ).  (4.) Grandfather of the captain who arrested Jeremiah ( Jeremiah 37:13 ).  (5.)  Jeremiah 36:12 .  (6.)  Nehemiah 10:23 .  (7.) Shadrach, one of the "three Hebrew children" ( Dan. 1 ;  6:7 ).  (8.) Son of Zerubbabel ( 1 Chronicles 3:19 ,  21).  (9.)  Ezra 10:28 .  (10.) The "ruler of the palace; he was a faithful man, and feared God above many" ( Nehemiah 7:2 ).  (11.)  Nehemiah 3:8 .  (12.)  Nehemiah 3:30   (13.) A priest, son of Jeremiah ( Nehemiah 12:12 ).  (14.) A false prophet contemporary with Jeremiah ( 28:3 ,  17). 
ROMANS|Romans, Epistle to the This epistle was probably written at Corinth. Phoebe ( Romans 16:1 ) of Cenchrea conveyed it to Rome, and Gaius of Corinth entertained the apostle at the time of his writing it ( 16:23 ;  1 Corinthians 1:14 ), and Erastus was chamberlain of the city, i.e., of Corinth ( 2 Timothy 4:20 ). The precise time at which it was written is not mentioned in the epistle, but it was obviously written when the apostle was about to "go unto Jerusalem to minister unto the saints", i.e., at the close of his second visit to Greece, during the winter preceding his last visit to that city ( Romans 15:25 ; Comp.  Acts 19:21 ;  20:2 ,  3,  16;  1 Corinthians 16:1 -4), early in A.D. 58. It is highly probable that Christianity was planted in Rome by some of those who had been at Jerusalem on the day of Pentecost ( Acts 2:10 ). At this time the Jews were very numerous in Rome, and their synagogues were probably resorted to by Romans also, who in this way became acquainted with the great facts regarding Jesus as these were reported among the Jews. Thus a church composed of both Jews and Gentiles was formed at Rome. Many of the brethren went out to meet Paul on his approach to Rome. There are evidences that Christians were then in Rome in considerable numbers, and had probably more than one place of meeting ( Romans 16:14 ,  15). The object of the apostle in writing to this church was to explain to them the great doctrines of the gospel. His epistle was a "word in season." Himself deeply impressed with a sense of the value of the doctrines of salvation, he opens up in a clear and connected form the whole system of the gospel in its relation both to Jew and Gentile. This epistle is peculiar in this, that it is a systematic exposition of the gospel of universal application. The subject is here treated argumentatively, and is a plea for Gentiles addressed to Jews. In the Epistle to the Galatians, the same subject is discussed, but there the apostle pleads his own authority, because the church in Galatia had been founded by him. After the introduction ( 1:1 -15), the apostle presents in it divers aspects and relations the doctrine of justification by faith ( 1:16 - 11:36 ) on the ground of the imputed righteousness of Christ. He shows that salvation is all of grace, and only of grace. This main section of his letter is followed by various practical exhortations ( 12:1 - 15:13 ), which are followed by a conclusion containing personal explanations and salutations, which contain the names of twenty-four Christians at Rome, a benediction, and a doxology ( Romans 15:14 -ch. 16). 
MADIAN|     ma'-i-an (the King James Version Judith 2:26;  Acts 7:29  the King James Version).  See  MIDIAN .
NEGEV|   NEGEB  neg'-eb (ha-neghebh, "the negeb" or simply, neghebh, from a root meaning "to be dry," and therefore in the first instance implying the "dry" or "parched regions," hence, in the Septuagint it is usually translated eremos, "desert," also nageb):  1. Meaning:  As the Negeb lay to the South of Judah, the word came to be used in the sense of "the South," and is so used in a few passages (e.g.  Genesis 13:14 ) and in such is translated lips (see GEOGRAPHY). The English translation is unsuitable in several passages, and likely to lead to confusion. For example, in  Genesis 13:1  Abram is represented as going "into the South" when journeying northward from Egypt toward Bethel; in  Numbers 13:22  the spies coming from the "wilderness of Zin" toward Hebron are described as coming "by the South," although they were going north. The difficulty in these and many other passages is at once obviated if it is recognized that the Negeb was a geographical term for a definite geographical region, just as Shephelah, literally, "lowland," was the name of another district of Palestine. In the Revised Version (British and American) "Negeb" is given in margin, but it would make for clearness if it were restored to the text.  2. Description:  This "parched" land is generally considered as beginning South of edition Dahariyeb-the probable site of DEBIR (which see)-and as stretching South in a series of rolling hills running in a general direction of East to West until the actual wilderness begins, a distance of perhaps 70 miles (see NATURAL FEATURES). To the East it is bounded by the Dead Sea and the southern Ghor, and to the West there is no defined boundary before the Mediterranean. It is a land of sparse and scanty springs and small rainfall; in the character of its soil it is a transition from the fertility of Canaan to the wilderness of the desert; it is essentially a pastoral land, where grazing is plentiful in the early months and where camels and goats can sustain life, even through the long summer drought. Today, as through most periods of history, it is a land for the nomad rather than the settled inhabitant, although abundant ruins in many spots testify to better physical conditions at some periods (see I, 5, below). The direction of the valleys East or West, the general dryness, and the character of the inhabitants have always made it a more or less isolated region without thoroughfare. The great routes pass along the coast to the West or up the Arabah to the East. It formed an additional barrier to the wilderness beyond it; against all who would lead an army from the South, this southern frontier of Judah was always secure. Israel could not reach the promised land by this route, through the land of the Amalekites ( Numbers 13:29 ;  Numbers 14:43-45 ).  3. Old Testament References:  The Negeb was the scene of much of Abram's wanderings ( Genesis 12:9 ;  Genesis 13:1, 3 ; 20:1); it was in this district that Hagar met with the angel ( Genesis 16:7, 14 ); Isaac ( Genesis 24:62 ) and Jacob ( Genesis 37:1 ;  Genesis 46:5 ) both dwelt there. Moses sent the spies through this district to the hill country ( Numbers 13:17, 22 ); the Amalekites then dwelt there ( Numbers 13:29 ) and apparently, too, in some parts of it, the Avvim ( Joshua 13:3, 4 ). The inheritance of the children of Simeon, as given in  Joshua 19:1-9 , was in the Negeb, but in  Joshua 15:21-32  these cities are credited to Judah (see SIMEON). Achish allotted to David, in response to his request, the city of ZIKLAG (q.v) in the Negeb ( 1 Samuel 27:5 f ); the exploits of David were against various parts of this district described as the Negeb of Judah, the Negeb of the Jerahmeelites, and the Negeb of the Kenites, while in  1 Samuel 30:14  we have mention of the Negeb of the Cherethites and the Negeb of Caleb. To this we may add the Negeb of Arad ( Judges 1:16 ). It is impossible to define the districts of these various clans (see separate articles under these names). The, Negeb, together with the "hill-country" and the "Shephelah," was according to Jeremiah (17:26; 32:44:00; 33:13) to have renewed prosperity after the captivity of Judah was ended.  4. Later History:  When Nebuchadnezzar took Jerusalem the Edomites sided with the Babylonians (compare  Lamentations 4:21 ;  Ezekiel 35:3-15   Obadiah 1:10-16 ), and during the absence of the Jews they advanced north and occupied all the Negeb and Southern Judea as far as Hebron (see JUDAEA). Here they annoyed the Jews in Maccabean times until Judas expelled them from Southern Judea (164 B.C.) and John Hyrcanus conquered their country and compelled them to become Jews (109 B.C.). It was to one of the cities here-Malatha-that Herod Agrippa withdrew himself (Josephus, Ant, XVIII, vi, 2).  The palmy days of this district appear to have been during the Byzantine period: the existing ruins, so far as they can be dated at all, belong to this time. Beersheba was an important city with a bishop, and Elusa (mentioned by Ptolemy in the 2nd century) was the seat of a bishop in the 4th, 5th and 6th centuries. After the rise of Mohammedanism the land appears to have lapsed into primitive conditions. Although lawlessness and want of any central control may account for much of the retrogression, yet it is probable that Professor Ellsworth Huntington (loc. cit.) is right in his contention that a change of climate has had much to do with the rise and fall of civilization and settled habitation in this district. The district has long been given over to the nomads, and it is only quite recently that the Turkish policy of planting an official with a small garrison at Beersheba and at `Aujeh has produced some slight change in the direction of a settled population and agricultural pursuits.  5. Its Ancient Prosperity:  It is clear that in at least two historic periods the Negeb enjoyed a very considerable prosperity. What it may have been in the days of the Patriarchs it is difficult to judge; all we read of them suggests a purely nomadic life similar to the Bedouin of today but with better pasturage. In the division of the land among the tribes mention is made of many cities-the Hebrew mentions 29 ( Joshua 15:21-32 ;  Joshua 19:1-9   1 Chronicles 4:28-33 )-and the wealth of cattle evidently was great (compare  1 Samuel 15:9 ;  1 Samuel 27:9 ;  1 Samuel 30:16   2 Chronicles 14:14 ). The condition of things must have been far different from that of recent times.  The extensive ruins at Bir es Seba` (Beersheba) Khalasa (Elusa), Ruheibeh (REHOBOTH, which see), `Aujeh and other cities, together with the signs of orchards, vineyards and gardens scattered widely around these and other sites, show how comparatively well populated this area was in Byzantine times in particular. Professor Huntington (loc. cit.) concludes from these ruins that the population of the large towns of the Negeb alone at this period must have amounted to between 45,000 and 50,000. The whole district does not support 1,000 souls today.  LITERATURE.  Robinson, BR (1838); Wilton, The Negeb, or "South Country" of Scripture (1863); E.H. Palmer, The Desert of the Exodus, II (1871); Trumbull, Kadesh-Barnea (1884); G. A. Smith, HGHL, chapter xiii (1894); E. Huntington, Palestine and Its Transformation, chapter vi, etc.  E. W. G. Masterman
PETHOR|Interpretation of dreams, identified with Pitru, on the west bank of the Euphrates, a few miles south of the Hittite capital of Carchemish ( Numbers 22:5 ,  "which is by the river of the land of the children of [the god] Ammo"). (see  BALAAM .) 
BETONIM|     bet'-o-nim, be-to'-nim (beTonim; Botanei or Botanin): A town East of the Jordan in the territory of Gad ( Joshua 13:26 ). It may be identical with BaTneh, about 3 miles Southwest of es-SalT.
TOBADONIJAH|Good is Jehovah, my Lord, a Levite sent out by Jehoshaphat to instruct the people of Judah in the law ( 2 Chronicles 17:8 ). 
PILHA|     pil'-ha (pilcha', "ploughman" (plowman); the King James Version Pileha): One of those who signed Nehemiah's covenant ( Nehemiah 10:24 ).
EDOMITES|   EDOM;   e'-dum, e'-dum-its 'edhom, "red"; Edom:  1. Boundaries:  The boundaries of Edom may be traced with some approach to accuracy. On the East of the `Arabah the northern border ran from the Dead Sea, and was marked by Wady el-Kurachi, or Wady el-Chasa. On the East it marched with the desert. The southern border ran by Elath and Ezion-geber ( Deuteronomy 2:8 ). On the West of the `Arabah the north boundary of Edom is determined by the south border of Israel, as indicated in  Numbers 34:3  f: a line running from the Salt Sea southward of the Ascent of Akrabbim to Zin and Kadesh-barnea. This last, we are told, lay in the "uttermost" of the border of Edom ( Numbers 20:16 ). The line may be generally indicated by the course of Wady el-Fiqrah. How much of the uplands West of the `Arabah southward to the Gulf of `Aqaba was included in Edom it is impossible to say.  2. Character and Features:  The land thus indicated varies greatly in character and features. South of the Dead Sea in the bottom of the valley we have first the stretch of salt marsh land called es-Sebkha; then, beyond the line of white cliffs that crosses the valley diagonally from Northwest to Southeast, a broad depression strewn with stones and sandhills, the debris of an old sea bottom, rises gradually, and 60 miles to the South reaches a height of about 700 ft. above the level of the Red Sea, 2,000 ft. above that of the Dead Sea. From this point it sinks until it reaches the shore of the Gulf of `Aqaba, 45 miles farther South. The whole depression is known today as Wady el-`Arabah (compare Hebrew ha-`arabhah,  Deuteronomy 2:8  the Revised Version (British and American), etc.). On either side the mountains rise steeply from the valley, their edges carved into many fantastic shapes by the deep wadys that break down from the interior (see ARABAH). The northern part of the plateau on the West forms the spacious grazing ground of the `Azdzimeh Arabs. The mountains rise to a height of from about 1,500 ft. to a little over 2,000 ft. This district was traversed by the ancient caravan road to South Palestine; and along the eastern side traces of the former civilization are still to be seen. The desert region to the South is higher, reaching to as much as 2,600 ft. The mountain range East of the `Arabah is generally higher in the South than in the North. Jebel Harun beside Petra, is 4,780 ft. above sea-level; while East of `Aqaba, Jebel el-Chisma may be as much as 5,900 ft. in height.  Limestone, porphyry and Nubian sandstone are the prevailing formation; but volcanic rocks are also found. The range consists mainly of rough rocky heights with many almost inaccessible peaks separated by deep gorges. But there are also breadths of fertile land where wheat, grapes, figs, pomegranates and olives are grown to advantage. The northern district is known today by the name el-Jebal, corresponding to the ancient Gebal. Seir is the name applied to the eastern range in  Genesis 36:8   Deuteronomy 2:1, 5   2 Chronicles 20:23 . It is also called Edom, and the Mount of Esau ( Obadiah 1:8 f ). Seir, however, is used for the western highlands in  Deuteronomy 33:2 . This seems to be its meaning also in  Judges 5:4 , where it appears as the equivalent of "the field of Edom." With this same phrase, however, in  Genesis 32:3  it may more fitly apply to the eastern range.  See illustration under DESERT.  3. Origin of Name:  The name Edom, "red," may have been derived from the red sandstone cliffs characteristic of the country. It was applied to Esau because of the color of his skin ( Genesis 25:25 ), or from the color of the pottage for which he sold his birthright ( Genesis 25:30 ). In  Genesis 36:8  Esau is equated with Edom as dwelling in Mt. Seir; and he is described as the father of Edom (36:9, Hebrew). The name however is probably much older. It may be traced in the records of the Twelfth Dynasty in Egypt. In the Tell el-Amarna Letters (Brit Mus No. 64) Udumu, or Edom, is named; and in Assyrian inscriptions the name Udumu occurs of a city and of a country. The latter may have been named from the former: this again may have been derived from a deity, Edom, who may be traced in such a name as Obed-edom ( 2 Samuel 6:10 ).  4. History:  The children of Esau are said to have "destroyed" the Horites who dwelt in Seir before them ( Genesis 14:6   Deuteronomy 2:22 ). This only means that the Horites were subdued. Esau married the daughter of Anah, a Horite ( Genesis 36:20  -in verse 2 he is called a Hivite); and the lists in this chapter show that the races intermingled. The Horite government was in the hands of "dukes" ( Genesis 36:29 , the Revised Version (British and American) "chiefs"). They were succeeded by dukes of the house of Esau ( Genesis 36:40 ). This form of government gave way to that of an elective monarchy ( Genesis 36:31 ); and this had existed some time before Israel left the wilderness. The then reigning king would not permit Israel to pass through the land ( Numbers 20:14 ;  Numbers 21:4 ). Israel was forbidden to "abhor an Edomite," on the ground that he was a brother; and children of the third generation might enter the assembly of the Lord ( Deuteronomy 23:7 f ). War with Edom was out of the question.  Some thirty years after the Exodus, Ramses III "smote the people of Seir." The Israelites could not have been far off. We first hear of war between Israel and Edom under Saul ( 1 Samuel 14:47 ). David prosecuted the war with terrific energy, slaying 18,000 Edomites (so read instead of "Syrians") in the Valley of Salt ( 2 Samuel 8:13 f ); Joab remaining for six months in the country, which was garrisoned by Israelites, "until he had cut off every male in Edom" ( 1 Kings 11:15 f ). Hadad of the blood royal of Edom escaped to Egypt, and later became a source of trouble to Solomon ( 1 Kings 11:14, 25 ). The conquest of Edom opened to Israel the ports of the Red Sea, whence the expeditions of Solomon and Jehoshaphat set out. In Jehoshaphat's time the king is called a "deputy" ( 1 Kings 22:47 ). Its king acknowledged the supremacy of Judah ( 2 Kings 3:9 , etc.). Under Jehoram son of Jehoshaphat, Edom revolted. Jehoram defeated them at Zair, but was unable to quell the rebellion ( 2 Kings 8:20 ). Amaziah invaded the country, slew 10,000 in the Valley of Salt, and took Sela which he named Joktheel ( 2 Kings 14:7 ). Uzziah restored the Edomite port of Elath ( 2 Kings 14:22 ). In the Syrian war Rezin regained Elath for Syria, and cast out the Jews. It was then permanently occupied by Syrians-here also probably we should read Edomites ( 2 Kings 16:6 ). From the cuneiform inscriptions we learn that when Tiglath-pileser subdued Rezin, among the kings from whom he received homage at Damascus was Qaus-malaka of Edom (736 B.C.). Later Malik-ram paid homage to Sennacherib. To Ezarhaddon also they were compelled to render service. They gave what help they could to Nebuchadnezzar, and exulted in the destruction of Jerusalem, stirring the bitterest indignation in the hearts of the Jews ( Lamentations 4:21   Ezekiel 25:12 ;  Ezekiel 35:3   Obadiah 1:10 ). The Edomites pressed into the now empty lands in the South of Judah. In 300 B.C. Mt. Seir with its capital Petra fell into the hands of the Nabateans.  5. Idumaea and the Idumeans:  West of the `Arabah the country they occupied came to be known by the Greek name Idumaea, and the people as Idumeans. Hebron, their chief city, was taken by Judas Maccabeus in 165 B.C. (1 Maccabees 4:29, 61; 5:65). In 126 B.C. the country was subdued by John Hyrcanus, who compelled the people to become Jews and to submit to circumcision. Antipater, governor of Idumaea, was made procurator of Judea, Samaria and Galilee by Julius Caesar. He paved the way to the throne for his son Herod the Great. With the fall of Judah under the Romans, Idumaea disappears from history.  The names of several Edomite deities are known: Hadad, Qaus, Koze, and, possibly, Edom; but of the religion of Edom we are without information. The language differed little from Hebrew.  W. Ewing
REPETITIONS|     rep-e-tish'-unz: In  Matthew 6:7  only, "Use not vain repetitions," for battalogeo (so Codex Sinaiticus and Codex Vaticanus), a word found nowhere else and spelled variously in the manuscripts, battologeo in Codices K, L, M; etc., batologeo in Codices F G, blattologeo in Codex Bezae (probably influenced by the Latin blatero, "talk idly"); presumably connected with battarizo, "stammer," and perhaps formed under the influence of the Aramaic beta', "speak carelessly," or baTel, "useless." Whether, however battalogeo means the constant repetition of the same phrase or the mechanical recitation of a long series of obscure or meaningless formulas (if, indeed, a distinction between the acts was thought of) cannot be determined. Either practice is abundantly evidenced as a "heathen" custom of the day, and either can be classed as "much speaking."  See  PRAYER .  Burton Scott Easton
JOEZER|Jehovah is his help, one of the Korhites who became part of David's body-guard ( 1 Chronicles 12:6 ). 
GAZA|Called also Azzah, which is its Hebrew name ( Deuteronomy 2:23 ;  1 Kings 4:24 ;  Jeremiah 25:20 ), strong, a city on the Mediterranean shore, remarkable for its early importance as the chief centre of a great commercial traffic with Egypt. It is one of the oldest cities of the world ( Genesis 10:19 ;  Joshua 15:47 ). Its earliest inhabitants were the Avims, who were conquered and displaced by the Caphtorims ( Deuteronomy 2:23 ;  Joshua 13:2 ,  3), a Philistine tribe. In the division of the land it fell to the lot of Judah ( Joshua 15:47 ;  Judges 1:18 ). It was the southernmost of the five great Philistine cities which gave each a golden emerod as a trespass-offering unto the Lord ( 1 Samuel 6:17 ). Its gates were carried away by Samson ( Judges 16:1 -3). Here he was afterwards a prisoner, and "did grind in the prison house." Here he also pulled down the temple of Dagon, and slew "all the lords of the Philistines," himself also perishing in the ruin ( Judges 16:21 -30). The prophets denounce the judgments of God against it ( Jeremiah 25:20 ;  47:5 ;  Amos 1:6 ,  7;  Zephaniah 2:4 ). It is referred to in  Acts 8:26 . Philip is here told to take the road from Jerusalem to Gaza (about 6 miles south-west of Jerusalem), "which is desert", i.e., the "desert road," probably by Hebron, through the desert hills of Southern Judea. (see  SAMSON .) It is noticed on monuments as early as B.C. 1600. Its small port is now called el-Mineh. 
JESUI|     jes'-u-i.  See  ISHVI .
MURMURINGS|   MURMUR;   mur'-mur, mur'-mur-ingz: The Hebrew word (lun) denotes the semi-articulated mutterings of disaffected persons. It is used in connection with the complaints of the Israelites in the desert against Yahweh on the one hand, and against Moses and Aaron on the other hand ( Exodus 16:7, 8   Numbers 14:27, 36 ;  Numbers 16:11 ;  Numbers 17:5 ). In three places ( Deuteronomy 1:27   Psalm 106:25   Isaiah 29:24 ), "murmur" translates a Hebrew word (raghan) which suggests the malicious whispering of slander.  In the New Testament "murmur" renders two different words, namely, gogguzo, and embrimaomai. The latter word suggests indignation and fault-finding ( Mark 14:4  the King James Version). The former word (or a compound of it) is generally used in connection with the complainings of the Pharisees and scribes ( Matthew 20:11   Luke 5:30 ;  Luke 15:2 ;  Luke 19:7 ).  T. Lewis
ZABDI|Gift of Jehovah.  (1.) An ancestor of Achan ( Joshua 7:1 ,  17,  18). He is probably the "Zimri" of  1 Chronicles 2:6 . (2.) A Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 8:19 ). (3.) Called "the Shiphmite," one of David's officers, who had charge of his vineyards ( 1 Chronicles 27:27 ). (4.) A Levite, one of the sons of Asaph ( Nehemiah 11:17 ); probably the same as Zichri ( 1 Chronicles 9:15 ), and Zaccur ( Nehemiah 12:35 ). 
FLESHHOOK|A many-pronged fork used in the sacrificial services ( 1 Samuel 2:13 ,  14;  Exodus 27:3 ;  38:3 ) by the priest in drawing away the flesh. The fat of the sacrifice, together with the breast and shoulder ( Leviticus 7:29 -34), were presented by the worshipper to the priest. The fat was burned on the alter ( 3:3 -5), and the breast and shoulder became the portion of the priests. But Hophni and Phinehas, not content with this, sent a servant to seize with a flesh-hook a further portion. 
SHAPHAT|Judge.  (1.) One of the spies. He represented the tribe of Simeon ( Numbers 13:5 ). (2.) The father of Elisha ( 1 Kings 19:16 -19). (3.) One of David's chief herdsmen ( 1 Chronicles 27:29 ). 
SEIRATH|Woody district; shaggy, a place among the mountains of Ephraim, bordering on Benjamin, to which Ehud fled after he had assassinated Eglon at Jericho ( Judges 3:26 ,  27). 
VASHNI|     vash'-ni (washni, see below; the Septuagint's Codex Vaticanus Sanei; Codex Alexandrinus Sani): Read in  1 Chronicles 6:28  the King James Version (Hebrew 13) as the name of the firstborn son of Samuel. According to  1 Chronicles 6:33  (Hebrew 18) and  1 Samuel 8:2 , Samuel's oldest son was Joel, and the second Abijah. The explanation of this is that in  1 Chronicles 6:28  the word taken then as a proper name is really "and second"; so following Septuagint, Lucian, and Syriac we read (as the Revised Version (British and American)), "And the sons of Samuel: the first-born, Joel, and the second Abijah."
JANUM|Slumber, a town in the mountains of Judah ( Joshua 15:53 ). 
SELAHAMMAHLEKOTH|Cliff of divisions the name of the great gorge which lies between Hachilah and Maon, south-east of Hebron. This gorge is now called the Wady Malaky. This was the scene of the interview between David and Saul mentioned in  1 Samuel 26:13 . Each stood on an opposing cliff, with this deep chasm between. 
BAALATH|A town of the tribe of Dan ( Joshua 19:44 ). It was fortified by Solomon ( 1 Kings 9:18 ;  2 Chronicles 8:6 ). Some have identified it with Bel'ain, in Wady Deir Balut. 
HAKKOZ|The thorn, the head of one of the courses of the priests ( 1 Chronicles 24:10 ). 
KOHATHITES|The descendants of Kohath. They formed the first of the three divisions of the Levites ( Exodus 6:16 ,  18;  Numbers 3:17 ). In the journeyings of the Israelites they had the charge of the most holy portion of the vessels of the tabernacle, including the ark ( Numbers 4 ). Their place in the marching and encampment was south of the tabernacle ( Numbers 3:29 ,  31). Their numbers at different times are specified ( 3:28 ;  4:36 ;  26:57 ,  62). Samuel was of this division. 
CHESULLOTH|Fertile places; the loins, a town of Issachar, on the slopes of some mountain between Jezreel and Shunem ( Joshua 19:18 ). It has been identified with Chisloth-tabor, 2 1/2 miles to the west of Mount Tabor, and north of Jezreel; now Iksal. 
EPICUREANS|Followers of Epicurus (who died at Athens B.C. 270), or adherents of the Epicurean philosophy ( Acts 17:18 ). This philosophy was a system of atheism, and taught men to seek as their highest aim a pleasant and smooth life. They have been called the "Sadducees" of Greek paganism. They, with the Stoics, ridiculed the teaching of Paul ( Acts 17:18 ). They appear to have been greatly esteemed at Athens. 
JUDEA|After the Captivity this name was applied to the whole of the country west of the Jordan ( Haggai 1:1 ,  14;  2:2 ). But under the Romans, in the time of Christ, it denoted the southernmost of the three divisions of Palestine ( Matthew 2:1 ,  5;  3:1 ;  4:25 ), although it was also sometimes used for Palestine generally ( Acts 28:21 ). The province of Judea, as distinguished from Galilee and Samaria, included the territories of the tribes of Judah, Benjamin, Dan, Simeon, and part of Ephraim. Under the Romans it was a part of the province of Syria, and was governed by a procurator. 
BELSHAZZAR|Bel protect the king!, the last of the kings of Babylon ( Dan. 5:1 ). He was the son of Nabonidus by Nitocris, who was the daughter of Nebuchadnezzar and the widow of Nergal-sharezer. When still young he made a great feast to a thousand of his lords, and when heated with wine sent for the sacred vessels his "father" ( Dan. 5:2 ), or grandfather, Nebuchadnezzar had carried away from the temple in Jerusalem, and he and his princes drank out of them. In the midst of their mad revelry a hand was seen by the king tracing on the wall the announcement of God's judgment, which that night fell upon him. At the instance of the queen (i.e.,  his mother) Daniel was brought in, and he interpreted the writing. That night the kingdom of the Chaldeans came to an end, and the king was slain ( Dan. 5:30 ). (see  NERGAL -SHAREZER.) The absence of the name of Belshazzar on the monuments was long regarded as an argument against the genuineness of the Book of Daniel. In 1854 Sir Henry Rawlinson found an inscription of Nabonidus which referred to his eldest son. Quite recently, however, the side of a ravine undermined by heavy rains fell at Hillah, a suburb of Babylon. A number of huge, coarse earthenware vases were laid bare. These were filled with tablets, the receipts and contracts of a firm of Babylonian bankers, which showed that Belshazzar had a household, with secretaries and stewards. One was dated in the third year of the king Marduk-sar-uzur. As Marduk-sar-uzar was another name for Baal, this Marduk-sar-uzur was found to be the Belshazzar of Scripture. In one of these contract tablets, dated in the July after the defeat of the army of Nabonidus, we find him paying tithes for his sister to the temple of the sun-god at Sippara. 
ROTTENNESS|   ROT;   rot, rot'-'-n-nes (verb raqebh, noun raqabh (riqqabhon,  Job 41:27 ), with maq, "decay" ( Isaiah 5:24 ), and `abhash, "shrivel" (so  Joel 1:17  the Revised Version margin)): "Rottenness of the bones" ( Proverbs 12:4 ;  Proverbs 14:30   Habakkuk 3:16 ) is ulceration (caries) of the bones, used as an example of an intensely painful disease. the King James Version, in addition, has "rot" in  Numbers 5:21, 22, 27 , where the Revised Version (British and American) has "fall away" (naphal), but a euphemistic paraphrase is in point (see the comms.). In  Jeremiah 38:11, 12  the King James Version has "old rotten rags" for melach, "rag" (the Revised Version (British and American) "wornout garments," a translation that specializes too far).
PURAH|     pu'-ra (purah, "branch"): Gideon's "servant," literally, "young man," i.e. armor-bearer ( Judges 7:10 , the King James Version "Phurah").
JOKTHEEL|Subdued by God.  (1.) A city of Judah near Lachish ( Joshua 15 ,  38). Perhaps the ruin Kutlaneh, south of Gezer. (2.) Amaziah, king of Judah, undertook a great expedition against Edom ( 2 Chronicles 25:5 -10), which was completely successful. He routed the Edomites and slew vast numbers of them. So wonderful did this victory appear to him that he acknowledged that it could have been achieved only by the special help of God, and therefore he called Selah (q.v.), their great fortress city, by the name of Joktheel ( 2 Kings 14:7 ). 
KAREAH|Bald, the father of Johanan and Jonathan, who for a time were loyal to Gedaliah, the Babylonian governor of Jerusalem ( Jeremiah 40:8 ,  13,  15,  16). 
BETEN|     be'-ten (beTen; Batne): A city of Asher mentioned between Hall and Achshaph ( Joshua 19:25 ). Eusebius, Onomasticon places it 8 Roman miles East of Ptolemais, giving it the name Bethseten. It may be identical with the modern village el-B`aneh, but no certainty is possible.
ESHTAULITES|   ESHTAOLITES;   esh'-ta-ol-its, eshta-u'-lits (ha'eshta'uli, literally, "the Eshtaolite"; the King James Version):  Inhabitants of Eshtaol, named among the descendants of Shobal, the son of Caleb ( 1 Chronicles 2:53 ).
CHALCOL|     kal'-kol.  See  CALCOL .
GIDEONI|     gid-e-o'-ni (gidh`oni): The father of Abidan who was prince of Benjamin, mentioned only in connection with the son ( Numbers 1:11 ;  Numbers 2:22 ;  Numbers 7:60, 65 ; 10:24).
JAZIZ|     ja'-ziz (yaziz, meaning uncertain): The Hagrite who was over David's flocks ( 1 Chronicles 27:30  (Hebrew 31)).
JERAHMEEL|Loving God.  (1.) The son of Hezron, the brother of Caleb ( 1 Chronicles 2:9 ,  25,  26,  etc.). (2.) The son of Kish, a Levite ( 1 Chronicles 24:29 ). (3.) Son of Hammelech ( Jeremiah 36:26 ). 
NETOPHATHITES|   NETOPHATHI;   ne-tof'-a-thi, ne-tof'-a-thits.  See  NETOPHAH .
RESH|     resh, rash "r": The 20th letter of the Hebrew alphabet; transliterated in this Encyclopedia as "r". It came also to be used for the number 200. For name, etc., see ALPHABET.
KIRHARESETH|   QIR-HARESETH; KIR-HERES  kur-har'-seth, -ha-re'-seth> (qir-charesh,  Isaiah 16:7 ; in  2 Kings 3:25  the King James Version reads Kir-haraseth (pausal form)); (qir cheres,  Jeremiah 48:31, 36 ; in  Isaiah 16:11  the King James Version reads Kir-haresh (pausal form)): Modern scholars unanimously identify this city with Kir of Moab. In Jehoram's invasion of Moab it alone withstood his attack; and on the city wall the king of Moab sacrificed his son ( 2 Kings 3:25 ). It was obviously the capital, i.e. Kir Moab. The name is generally taken to mean "city of the sun." Cheyne, however, points out (EB, under the word):  (1) that this explanation was unknown to the ancients;  (2) that"kir" is nowhere suposed to mean "city," except in the compound names Kir-heres, Kir-hareseth, and Kir Moab;  (3) that cheres, "sun," nowhere has a feminine ending, and  (4) that  Isaiah 16:7  Septuagint and Aquila.) indicates "d" and not "r" in the second part of the name (Deseth). He suggests, therefore, that we should possibly read qiryath chadhdshah, "new city."  W. Ewing
HATTUSH|Assembled.  (1.) A priest who returned with Zerubbabel ( Nehemiah 12:2 ).  (2.)  Ezra 8:2 .  (3.)  Nehemiah 3:10 .  (4.)  Nehemiah 10:4 .  (5.)  1 Chronicles 3:22 . 
JAAZER|He (God) helps, a city of the Amorites on the east of Jordan, and assigned, with neighbouring places in Gilead, to Gad ( Numbers 32:1 ,  35;  Joshua 13:25 ). It was allotted to the Merarite Levites ( 21:39 ). In David's time it was occupied by the Hebronites, i.e., the descendants of Kohath ( 1 Chronicles 26:31 ). It is mentioned in the "burdens" proclaimed over Moab ( Isaiah 16:8 ,  9;  Jeremiah 48:32 ). Its site is Marked by the modern ruin called Sar or Seir, about 10 miles west of Amman, and 12 from Heshbon. "The vineyards that once covered the hill-sides are gone; and the wild Bedawin from the eastern desert make cultivation of any kind impossible." 
EZER|Treasure.  (1.) One of the sons of Seir, the native princes, "dukes," of Mount Hor ( Genesis 36:21 ,  27).  (2.)  1 Chronicles 7:21 ;  (3.) 4:4.  (4.) One of the Gadite champions who repaired to David at Ziklag ( 12:9 ).  (5.) A Levite ( Nehemiah 3:19 ).  (6.) A priest ( 12:42 ). 
ZACCHUR|     zak'-ur.  See  ZACCUR .
CIELED|   ; CIELING  seld, sel'-ing.  See  CEILED ;  CEILING .
HUSHAM|     hu'-sham (chusham,  Genesis 36:34 ; chusham,  1 Chronicles 1:45-46 , "alert"): According to the former reference, Husham was one of the kings of Edom, and according to the latter he was "of the land of the Temanites" and ( 1 Chronicles 1:35 f ) descended from Esau.
KEZIA|Cassia, the name of Job's second daughter ( 42:14 ), born after prosperity had returned to him. 
SHEBA|An oath, seven.  (1.) Hebrews shebha, the son of Raamah ( Genesis 10:7 ), whose descendants settled with those of Dedan on the Persian Gulf. (2.) Hebrews id. A son of Joktan ( Genesis 10:28 ), probably the founder of the Sabeans. (3.) Hebrews id. A son of Jokshan, who was a son of Abraham by Keturah ( Genesis 25:3 ). (4.) Hebrews id. A kingdom in Arabia Felix. Sheba, in fact, was Saba in Southern Arabia, the Sabaeans of classical geography, who carried on the trade in spices with the other peoples of the ancient world. They were Semites, speaking one of the two main dialects of Himyaritic or South Arabic. Sheba had become a monarchy before the days of Solomon. Its queen brought him gold, spices, and precious stones ( 1 Kings 10:1 -13). She is called by our Lord the "queen of the south" ( Matthew 12:42 ). (5.) Hebrews shebha', "seven" or "an oak." A town of Simeon ( Joshua 19:2 ). (6.) Hebrews id. A "son of Bichri," of the family of Becher, the son of Benjamin, and thus of the stem from which Saul was descended ( 2 Samuel 20:1 -22). When David was returning to Jerusalem after the defeat of Absalom, a strife arose between the ten tribes and the tribe of Judah, because the latter took the lead in bringing back the king. Sheba took advantage of this state of things, and raised the standard of revolt, proclaiming, "We have no part in David." With his followers he proceeded northward. David seeing it necessary to check this revolt, ordered Abishai to take the gibborim, "mighty men," and the body-guard and such troops as he could gather, and pursue Sheba. Joab joined the expedition, and having treacherously put Amasa to death, assumed the command of the army. Sheba took refuge in Abel-Bethmaachah, a fortified town some miles north of Lake Merom. While Joab was engaged in laying siege to this city, Sheba's head was, at the instigation of a "wise woman" who had held a parley with him from the city walls, thrown over the wall to the besiegers, and thus the revolt came to an end. 
ZABULON|( Matthew 4:13 ,  15;  Revelation 7:8 ). See ZEBULUN. 
SERUG|Branch, the father of Nahor ( Genesis 11:20 -23); called Saruch in  Luke 3:35 . 
NEBUCHADREZZAR|=Nebuchadnezzar ( Jeremiah 21:2 ,  7;  22:25 ;  24:1 ,  etc.), a nearer approach to the correct spelling of the word
TIMNATHSERAH|Remaining portion, the city of Joshua in the hill country of Ephraim, the same as Timnath-heres ( Joshua 19:50 ;  24:30 ). "Of all sites I have seen," says Lieut. Colossians Conder, "none is so striking as that of Joshua's home, surrounded as it is with deep valleys and wild, rugged hills." Opposite the town is a hill, on the northern side of which there are many excavated sepulchres. Among these is the supposed tomb of Joshua, which is said to be "the most striking monument in the country." It is a "square chamber with five excavations in three of its sides, the central one forming a passage leading into a second chamber beyond. A great number of lamp-niches cover the walls of the porch, upwards of two hundred, arranged in vertical rows. A single cavity with a niche for a lamp has been thought to be the resting-place of the warrior-chief of Israel." The modern Kefr Haris, 10 miles south-west of Shechem. 
TILGATHPILNESER|   TILGATH-PILNESER  til'-gath-pil-ne'-zer, til'-gath-pil-ne'-ser.  See  TIGLATH-PILESER .
HUKKOK|Decreed, a town near Zebulun, not far from Jordan, on the border of Naphtali ( Joshua 19:34 ). (see  HELKATH .) 
PERGA|The capital of Pamphylia, on the coast of Asia Minor. Paul and his companions landed at this place from Cyprus on their first missionary journey ( Acts 13:13 ,  14), and here Mark forsook the party and returned to Jerusalem. Some time afterwards Paul and Barnabas again visited this city and "preached the word" ( 14:25 ). It stood on the banks of the river Cestrus, some 7 miles from its mouth, and was a place of some commercial importance. It is now a ruin, called Eski Kalessi. 
HUZZAB|     huz'-ab (hutstsabh, only in  Nahum 2:7  the King James Version and the Revised Version margin): Its meaning is doubtful. According to Gesenius, it is a verb, Hoph. of tsabhabh, "flow," hence, to be rendered with preceding verse, "The palace is dissolved and made to flow down." Wordsworth made it Pual of natsabh, "fix": "The palace is dissolved, though established." Septuagint renders with the next word, he hupostasis apokaluphthe, "The foundation (or treasure) is uncovered." the King James Version, the Revised Version margin and the American Standard Revised Version text make it Hoph. of natsabh, "fix," hence, "It is decreed." Perhaps more probably, with the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American) text and the American Revised Version margin, it is a name, or noun with the article (or the corruption of such a word), referring either to the Assyrian queen, or personifying Nineveh. No such queen is now known, but Assyriology may throw light. The "name" interpretation accords best with the general trend of the passage, which describes the discomfiture of a royal personage. BDB calls it "perhaps textual error." The Massoretic vocalization may be at fault.  Philip Wendell Crannell
SILOAH|Siloah, The pool of Hebrews shelah; i.e., "the dart",  Nehemiah 3:15 ; with the art. shiloah, "sending, Isaiah 8:6  (Comp.  7:3 )=Siloam (q.v.) 
PASACH|Clearing, one of the sons of Japhlet, of the tribe of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 7:33 ). 
SINGERS|   ; SINGING  sing'-erz, sing'-ing: Singing seems to have become a regular profession at quite early date among the Hebrews. David had his troupe of "singing men and singing women" at Jerusalem ( 2 Samuel 19:35 ), and no doubt Solomon added to their numbers.  Isaiah 23:16  suggests that it was not uncommon for foreign female minstrels of questionable character to be heard making "sweet melody," singing songs along the streets and highways of Judea. Nor was the worship of the temple left to the usually incompetent and inconstant leadership of amateur choristers. The elaborate regulations drawn up for the constitution of the temple orchestra and chorus are referred to under MUSIC (which see). It has been inferred from  Ezra 2:65  that women were included among the temple singers, but this is erroneous, as the musicians there mentioned were of the class employed at banquets, festivals, etc. The temple choir consisted exclusively of Levites, one essential qualification of an active member of that order being a good voice.  Of the vocal method of the Hebrews we know nothing. Wellhausen imagines that he can detect one of the singers, in the portrayal of an Assyrian band, compressing his throat in order to produce a vibrato; and it is quite possible that in other respects as well as this, ancient and modern oriental vocalization resembled each other. But that is about all that can be said.  On the other hand, we cannot repeat too often that we are quite unable to identify any intervals, scales, or tunes as having been used in ancient Israel. Even those who hold that the early church took the Gregorian "tones" from the synagogue, confess that it was "certainly not without considerable modifications." And, of course, there was not the slightest affinity between the Hebrew and the Anglican chant.  See  MUSIC ;  PRAISE ; SONG; TEMPLE.  James Millar
PARAN|Abounding in foliage, or abounding in caverns, ( Genesis 21:21 ), a desert tract forming the north-eastern division of the peninsula of Sinai, lying between the `Arabah on the east and the wilderness of Shur on the west. It is intersected in a north-western direction by the Wady el-`Arish. It bears the modern name of Badiet et-Tih, i.e., "the desert of the wanderings." This district, through which the children of Israel wandered, lay three days' march from Sinai ( Numbers 10:12 ,  33). From Kadesh, in this wilderness, spies (q.v.) were sent to spy the land ( 13:3 ,  26). Here, long afterwards, David found refuge from Saul ( 1 Samuel 25:1 ,  4).  Paran, Mount Probably the hilly region or upland wilderness on the north of the desert of Paran forming the southern boundary of the Promised Land ( Deuteronomy 33:2 ;  Habakkuk 3:3 ). 
BOOZ|     bo'-oz (TR, Booz; Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek, Boes): the King James Version, Greek form of Boaz (thus, the Revised Version (British and American)) ( Matthew 1:5   Luke 3:32 ).
HOREB|Desert or mountain of the dried-up ground, a general name for the whole mountain range of which Sinai was one of the summits ( Exodus 3:1 ;  17:6 ;  33:6 ;  Psalm 106:19 ,  etc.). The modern name of the whole range is Jebel Musa. It is a huge mountain block, about 2 miles long by about 1 in breadth, with a very spacious plain at its north-east end, called the Er Rahah, in which the Israelites encamped for nearly a whole year. (see  SINAI .) 
SIHON|Striking down. The whole country on the east of Jordan, from the Arnon to the Jabbok, was possessed by the Amorites, whose king, Sihon, refused to permit the Israelites to pass through his territory, and put his army in array against them. The Israelites went forth against him to battle, and gained a complete victory. The Amorites were defeated; Sihon, his sons, and all his people were smitten with the sword, his walled towns were captured, and the entire country of the Amorites was taken possession of by the Israelites ( Numbers 21:21 -30;  Deuteronomy 2:24 -37). The country from the Jabbok to Hermon was at this time ruled by Og, the last of the Rephaim. He also tried to prevent the progress of the Israelites, but was utterly routed, and all his cities and territory fell into the hands of the Israelites (Comp.  Numbers 21:33 -35;  Deuteronomy 3:1 -14;  Psalm 135:10 -12;  136:17 -22). These two victories gave the Israelites possession of the country on the east of Jordan, from the Arnon to the foot of Hermon. The kingdom of Sihon embraced about 1,500 square miles, while that of Og was more than 3,000 square miles. 
SHETHAR|A star, a prince at the court of Ahasuerus ( Esther 1:14 ). 
ISHTOB|Man of Tob, one of the small Syrian kingdoms which together constituted Aram ( 2 Samuel 10:6 , 8). 
PISHON|   ; PISON  pi'-shon pi'-son (pishon; the King James Version): A river of EDEN (which see), said to compass the whole land of Havilah where there is gold, bdellium and onyx stone ( Genesis 2:11 ), most probably identified with the Karun River which comes down from the mountains of Media and formerly emptied into the Persian Gulf.
RIVERS|Rivers of Babylon ( Psalm 137:1 ), i.e., of the whole country of Babylonia, e.g., the Tigris, Euphrates, Chalonas, the Ulai, and the numerous canals.  Rivers of Damascus The Abana and Pharpar ( 2 Kings 5:12 ).  Rivers of Judah ( Joel 3:18 ), the watercourses of Judea. 
FENCED|Fenced cities There were in Palestine (1) cities, (2) unwalled villages, and (3) villages with castles or towers ( 1 Chronicles 27:25 ). Cities, so called, had walls, and were thus fenced. The fortifications consisted of one or two walls, on which were towers or parapets at regular intervals ( 2 Chronicles 32:5 ;  Jeremiah 31:38 ). Around ancient Jerusalem were three walls, on one of which were ninety towers, on the second fourteen, and on the third sixty. The tower of Hananeel, near the north-east corner of the city wall, is frequently referred to ( Nehemiah 3:1 ;  12:39 ;  Zechariah 14:10 ). The gateways of such cities were also fortified ( Nehemiah 2:8 ;  3:3 ,  6;  Judges 16:2 ,  3;  1 Samuel 23:7 ). The Hebrews found many fenced cities when they entered the Promised Land ( Numbers 13:28 ;  32:17 ,  34-42;  Joshua 11:12 ,  13;  Judges 1:27 -33), and we may estimate the strength of some of these cities from the fact that they were long held in possession by the Canaanites. The Jebusites, e.g., were enabled to hold possession of Jerusalem till the time of David ( 2 Samuel 5:6 ,  7;  1 Chronicles 11:5 ). Several of the kings of Israel and Judah distinguished themselves as fortifiers or "builders" of cities. 
GITTITES|     git'-its (gittim, plural of gittiy): The inhabitants of Gath. They are mentioned along with the inhabitants of the other chief Philistine cities in  Joshua 13:3 . It would seem that numbers of them emigrated to Judah, for we find 600 of them acting as a bodyguard to David with Ittai at their head ( 2 Samuel 15:18 ;  2 Samuel 18:2 ). Obed-edom, to whom David entrusted the ark when he was frustrated in bringing it into the city of David, was a Gittite ( 2 Samuel 6:11   1 Chronicles 13:13 ). The Gittites seem to have been remarkable for their great stature ( 2 Samuel 21:19   1 Chronicles 20:5 ).
EURAQUILO|     u-rak'-wi-lo (the Revised Version (British and American) eurakulon; the King James Version eurokludon; the King James Version Euroclydon, u-rok'-li-don):  The east or northeast wind which drove Paul's ship to shipwreck at Melita ( Acts 27:14 ). The term seems to have been the sailor's term for that particular wind, and Paul uses the word which was used by them on that occasion. The difference in the text is explained by the fact that the term was not in general use and was therefore subject to being changed. The precise name is doubtful, but "the Euraquilo" is more easily explained as a compound of Greek euros, "east wind," and Latin aquilo, "northeast wind," hence, euraquilo, "east northeast wind." This agrees with the experience of navigators in those waters. For a summary of the various readings see Sanday, Appendices ad New Testament, 140. Full discussion of the circumstances are given in the Lives of Paul by various writers.  Alfred H. Joy
OPHEL|Hill; mound, the long, narrow, rounded promontory on the southern slope of the temple hill, between the Tyropoeon and the Kedron valley ( 2 Chronicles 27:3 ;  33:14 ;  Nehemiah 3:26 ,  27). It was surrounded by a separate wall, and was occupied by the Nethinim after the Captivity. This wall has been discovered by the engineers of the Palestine Exploration Fund at the south-eastern angle of the temple area. It is 4 feet below the present surface. In  2 Kings 5:24  this word is translated "tower" (R.V.,  "hill"), denoting probably some eminence near Elisha's house. 
BABYLONIANS|     bab-i-lo'-ni-anz: The inhabitants of BABYLONIA (which see). They were among the colonists planted in Samaria by the Assyrians ( Ezra 4:9 ). "The likeness of the Babylonians in Chaldea" ( Ezekiel 23:15 ) refers to the pictures which were common on the walls of Babylonian palaces, and the reports of them being heard in Jerusalem, or copies of them seen there, awakened the nation's desire for these unknown lovers, which Judah had ample occasion to repent of ( Ezekiel 23:17, 23 ; compare  2 Kings 24 ).
NOPHAH|Blast, a city of Moab which was occupied by the Amorites ( Numbers 21:30 ). 
HASHEM|     ha'-shem (hashem): The "sons of Hashem" are mentioned ( 1 Chronicles 11:34 ) among David's mighty men. The parallel passage ( 2 Samuel 23:32 ) has "sons of Jashen."
MADMENAH|Ibid., a town in Benjamin, not far from Jerusalem, towards the north ( Isaiah 10:31 ). The same Hebrew word occurs in Isaiah 25:10, where it is rendered "dunghill." This verse has, however, been interpreted as meaning "that Moab will be trodden down by Jehovah as teben [broken straw] is trodden to fragments on the threshing-floors of Madmenah." 
MIBZAR|Fortress, one of the Edomitish "dukes" descended from Esau ( Genesis 36:42 ;  1 Chronicles 1:53 ). 
CHESNUT|     ches'-nut.  See  CHESTNUT .
JERIOTH|     jer'-i-oth, jer'-i-oth (yeri`oth, "(tent-) curtains"): In  1 Chronicles 2:18 , where Massoretic Text is corrupt, Kittel in his commentary and in Biblical Hebrew reads "Caleb begat (children) of Azubah his wife, Jerioth." Wellhausen (De Gent. et Fam. Jud., 33) reads, "Caleb begat (children) of Azubah his wife, the daughter of Jerioth." According to English Versions of the Bible, Caleb had two wives, but the context does not bear this out. J. H. Michaelis regarded Jerioth as another name for Azubah. See  Curtis, Commentary on Chronicles, 92 .
CHERAN|     ke'-ran (keran): A Horite clan-name, occurring in the genealogy of Seir, the Horite ( Genesis 36:26 ), and in the parallel list in  1 Chronicles 1:41 . Dillmann derives it from kar, "a lamb."
ELKOSH|God my bow, the birth-place of Nahum the prophet ( Nahum 1:1 ). It was probably situated in Galilee, but nothing definite is known of it. 
JOCHEBED|Jehovah is her glory, the wife of Amram, and the mother of Miriam, Aaron, and Moses ( Numbers 26:59 ). She is spoken of as the sister of Kohath, Amram's father ( Exodus 6:20 ; Comp. 16,  18;  2:1 -10). 
JALAM|     ja'-lam (ya`lam, according to BDB following Septuagint Ieglom, in Genesis, from `alam, meaning "to conceal"; according to Gunkel, Gen3, 390, from ya`el, "mountain-goat"; see HPN, 90, note 5; King James Version Jaalam): In  Genesis 36:5, 14, 18   1 Chronicles 1:35 , a son of Esau, mentioned as the 2nd son by Oholibamah; probably an Edomite clan.
HARETH|Thicket, a wood in the mountains of Judah where David hid when pursued by Saul ( 1 Samuel 22:5 ). It was possibly while he was here that the memorable incident narrated in  2 Samuel 23:14 -17,  1 Chronicles 11:16 -19 occurred. This place has not been identified, but perhaps it may be the modern Kharas, on the borders of the chain of mountains some 3 miles east of Keilah. 
ZORATHITES|     zo'-rath-its (tsor`athi; Sarathaioi ( 1 Chronicles 2:53 , the King James Version "Zareathites"), Codex Vaticanus ho Arathei; Codex Alexandrinus ho Sarathi (4 2)): The inhabitants of Zorah, who are said to be descended from Kiriath-jearim families.
DARIUS|The holder or supporter, the name of several Persian kings.  (1.) Darius the Mede ( Dan. 11:1 ), "the son of Ahasuerus, of the seed of the Medes" ( 9:1 ). On the death of Belshazzar the Chaldean he "received the kingdom" of Babylon as viceroy from Cyrus. During his brief reign (B.C. 538-536) Daniel was promoted to the highest dignity ( Dan. 6:1 ,  2); but on account of the malice of his enemies he was cast into the den of lions. After his miraculous escape, a decree was issued by Darius enjoining "reverence for the God of Daniel" ( 6:26 ). This king was probably the "Astyages" of the Greek historians. Nothing can, however, be with certainty affirmed regarding him. Some are of opinion that the name "Darius" is simply a name of office, equivalent to "governor," and that the "Gobryas" of the inscriptions was the person intended by the name. (2.) Darius, king of Persia, was the son of Hystaspes, of the royal family of the Achaemenidae. He did not immediately succeed Cyrus on the throne. There were two intermediate kings, viz., Cambyses (the Ahasuerus of Ezra), the son of Cyrus, who reigned from B.C. 529-522, and was succeeded by a usurper named Smerdis, who occupied the throne only ten months, and was succeeded by this Darius (B.C. 521-486). Smerdis was a Margian, and therefore had no sympathy with Cyrus and Cambyses in the manner in which they had treated the Jews. He issued a decree prohibiting the restoration of the temple and of Jerusalem ( Ezra 4:17 -22). But soon after his death and the accession of Darius, the Jews resumed their work, thinking that the edict of Smerdis would be now null and void, as Darius was in known harmony with the religious policy of Cyrus. The enemies of the Jews lost no time in bringing the matter under the notice of Darius, who caused search to be made for the decree of Cyrus (q.v.). It was not found at Babylon, but at Achmetha ( Ezra 6:2 ); and Darius forthwith issued a new decree, giving the Jews full liberty to prosecute their work, at the same time requiring the Syrian satrap and his subordinates to give them all needed help. It was with the army of this king that the Greeks fought the famous battle of Marathon (B.C. 490). During his reign the Jews enjoyed much peace and prosperity. He was succeeded by Ahasuerus, known to the Greeks as Xerxes, who reigned for twenty-one years. (3.) Darius the Persian ( Nehemiah 12:22 ) was probably the Darius II. (Ochus or Nothus) of profane history, the son of Artaxerxes Longimanus, who was the son and successor of Ahasuerus (Xerxes). There are some, however, who think that the king here meant was Darius III. (Codomannus), the antagonist of Alexander the Great (B.C. 336-331). 
SHIMSHAI|The shining one, or sunny, the secretary of Rehum the chancellor, who took part in opposing the rebuilding of the temple after the Captivity ( Ezra 4:8 ,  9,  17-23). 
MASREKAH|Vineyard of noble vines, a place in Idumea, the native place of Samlah, one of the Edomitish kings ( Genesis 36:36 ;  1 Chronicles 1:47 ). 
SERAH|Abundance; princess, the daughter of Asher and grand-daughter of Jacob ( Genesis 46:17 ); called also Sarah ( Numbers 26:46 ; R.V.,  "Serah"). 
HALLOHESH|     ha-lo'-hesh (ha-lochesh, "the whisperer," "the slanderer"): A post-exilic chief whose son Shallum assisted in repairing the walls of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 3:12 , the King James Version "Halohesh"). He was also one of the leaders who signed the national covenant ( Nehemiah 10:24  (Hebrew 25)).
PISIDIA|A district in Asia Minor, to the north of Pamphylia. The Taurus range of mountains extends through it. Antioch, one of its chief cities, was twice visited by Paul ( Acts 13:14 ;  14:21 -24). 
KELITA|Dwarf, a Levite who assisted Ezra in expounding the law to the people ( Nehemiah 8:7 ;  10:10 ). 
PINON|     pi'-non (pinon, "darkness"): One of the "chiefs of Edom" ( Genesis 36:41   1 Chronicles 1:52 ).
NICANOR|Conqueror, one of the seven deacons appointed in the apostolic Church ( Acts 6:1 -6). Nothing further is known of him. 
PROPHETS|   PROPHECY;   prof'-e-si, prof'-e-si, prof'-ets:  I. THE IDEA OF BIBLICAL PROPHECY  1. The Seer and Speaker of God  2. Prophetical Inspiration  3. Relation to Dreams  4. Freedom of Inspiration  5. Supernatural Visions of the Future  6. The Fulfillment  II. HISTORICAL DEVELOPMENT OF THE PROPHETIC OFFICE  1. Abraham  2. Moses  3. Period of the Judges  4. Schools of Prophets  5. Period of the Kings  6. Literary Prophets, Amos, Hosea  7. Poetical Form of Prophecy  8. Prophets of Judah, Isaiah, and Others Down to Jeremiah  9. During the Exile, Ezekiel, Deutero-Isaiah, Daniel  10. After the Exile, Haggai, Zechariah, Malachi  11. Cessation of Prophecy  12. Prophecy in the New Testament  III. HISTORICAL DEVELOPMENT OF PROPHECY  1. Contents of Prophecy  2. Conception of the Messiah  3. Before the Exile (through Judgment to Deliverance)  4. Analogous Ideas among Heathen Peoples  5. During the Exile (Ezekiel, Deutero-Isaiah)  6. After the Exile (Haggai, Zechariah, Malachi)  7. Contemporaneous Character of Prophecy  8. Partial Character of Prophecy  9. Perspective Character of Prophecy  IV. ANALOGOUS PHENOMENA AMONG THE GENTILES  1. Necromancy and Technical Witchcraft  2. The Mantle Art  3. Contents of Extra-Biblical Oracles  LITERATURE  I. The Idea of Biblical Prophecy.  1. The Seer and Speaker of God:  According to the uniform teaching of the Bible the prophet is a speaker of or for God. His words are not the production of his own spirit, but come from a higher source. For he is at the same time, also, a seer, who sees things that do not lie in the domain of natural sight, or who hears things which human ears do not ordinarily receive; compare  1 Samuel 9:9 , where nabhi', "speaker," and ro'eh, "seer," are used as synonymous terms.  Jeremiah 23:16  and  Ezekiel 13:2  are particularly instructive in this regard. In these passages a sharp distinction is made between those persons who only claim to be prophets but who prophesy "out of their own heart," and the true prophets who declare the word which the Lord has spoken to them. In the latter case the contents of the prophecy have not originated in their own reflection or calculation; and just as little is this prophecy the product of their own feelings, fears or hopes, but, as something extraneous to man and independent of him, it has with a divine certainty entered the soul of the prophet. The prophet has seen that which he prophesies, although he need not have seen it in the form of a real vision. He can also "see" words with his inner eyes ( Isaiah 2:1 , and often). It is only another expression for this when it is frequently said that God has spoken to the prophet. In this case too it is not necessary that there must have been a voice which he could hear phonetically through his natural ear. The main thing is that he must have been able sharply to distinguish the contents of this voice from his own heart, i.e. from his personal consciousness. Only in this way is he capable of speaking to the people in the name of God and able to publish his word as that of Yahweh. In this case he is the speaker of Yahweh (nabhi'), or the mouth of the Lord (compare  Ezekiel 7:1  with 4:16). Under these conditions he then regards it as absolute compulsion to speak, just as a person must be filled with fear when he hears a lion roar nearby ( Amos 3:8 ). The words burn in his soul until he utters them ( Jeremiah 20:7, 9 ).  2. Prophetical Inspiration:  The divine power, which comes over a human being and compels him to see or to hear things which otherwise would be hidden from him, is called by various terms expressive of inspiration. It is said that the Spirit of God has come over someone ( Numbers 24:2 ); or has fallen upon him ( Ezekiel 11:5 ); or that the hand of Yahweh has come over him and laid hold of him ( 2 Kings 3:15   Ezekiel 1:3 ;  Ezekiel 3:14, 22 , and often); or that the Holy Spirit has been put on him as a garment, i.e. has been incorporated in him ( 1 Chronicles 12:18   2 Chronicles 24:20 ); or that the Spirit of revelation has permanently descended upon him ( Numbers 11:25   2 Kings 2:15   Isaiah 11:2 ;  Isaiah 61:1 ); or that God has given this Spirit of His ( Numbers 11:29   Isaiah 42:1 ); or pours Him out upon man ( Joel 2:28   Hebrews 3:1 f ). But this inspiration is not such that it suppresses the human consciousness of the recipient, so that he would receive the word of God in the state of sleep or trance. But rather the recipient is in possession of his full consciousness, and is able afterward to give a clear account of what happened. Nor is the individuality of the prophet eliminated by this divine inspiration; unconsciously this individuality cooperates in the formal shaping of that which has been seen and heard. In accordance with the natural peculiarity of the prophet and with the contents of the message, the psychological condition of the recipient may be that of intense excitement or of calmness. As a rule the inspiration that takes possession of the prophets is evidenced also by an exalted and poetical language, which assumes a certain rhythmical character, but is not bound to a narrow and mechanical meter. It is, however, also possible that prophetical utterances find their expression in plain prose. The individual peculiarity of the prophet is a prime factor also in the form in which the revelation comes to him. In the one prophet we find a preponderance of visions; another prophet has no visions. But the visions of the future which he sees are given in the forms and the color which have been furnished by his own consciousness. All the more the form in which the prophet gives expression to his word of God is determined by his personal talents and gifts as also by his experiences.  3. Relation to Dreams:  In a certain respect the dream can be cited as an analogous phenomenon, in which also the ideas that are slumbering in the soul uninvited put in their appearance without being controlled by consciousness and reason. On the other hand, prophecy differs pecifically from dreams, first, because the genuine prophetical utterance is received when the prophet is clearly conscious, and, secondly, because such an utterance brings with it a much greater degree of certainty and a greater guaranty of its higher origin than is done even by a dream that seems to be prophetical. In  Jeremiah 23:25 ; it is declared that these two are entirely dissimilar, and the relation between the two is compared to straw and wheat. The Moslem Arabs also put a much lower estimate on the visionary dream than on the prophetic vision in a waking condition.  4. Freedom of Inspiration:  Because this Spirit of God acts with full freedom, He can select His organs at will from among every station, age, or sex. The Spirit is not confined to any priestly class or organization. It indeed was the case at times that a prophet gathered disciples around himself, who could themselves in turn also be seized by his spirit, although the transmission of this spirit was a difficult matter ( 2 Kings 2:10 ). Yet genuine prophecies continued to be at all times a free gift of the sovereign God. Amos (7:14) appeals expressly to this fact, that he did not himself choose the prophet's calling nor was the pupil of a prophetic school, but that he had been directly called by Yahweh from his daily occupation as a shepherd and workman. In the same way we indeed find prophets who belonged to the priestly order (Jeremiah, Ezekiel, and others), but equally great is the number of those who certainly did not so belong. Further, age made no difference in the call to the prophetic office. Even in his earliest youth Samuel was called to be a prophet ( 1 Samuel 3:1 ), and it did not avail Jeremiah anything when he excused himself because of his youth ( Jeremiah 1:6 ). Then, too, a woman could be seized by this Spirit. From time to time prophetesses appeared, although the female sex is by no means so prominent here as it is in the sorcery of the heathen. See  PROPHETESS . As an exceptional case the Spirit of God could lay hold even of a person who inwardly was entirely estranged from Him and could make an utterance through him (compare Saul,  1 Samuel 10:11 ;  1 Samuel 19:24 ; Balaam,  Numbers 23 ; Caiaphas,  John 11:51 ). As a rule, however, God has selected such prophetic organs for a longer service. These persons are called and dedicated for this purpose by Him through a special act (compare Moses  Exodus 3:1 ;;  1 Kings 19:16, 19 ;;  Isaiah 6   Jeremiah 1   Ezekiel 1 ). This moment was decisive for their whole lives and constituted their authorization as far as they themselves and others were concerned. Yet for each prophetic appearance these men receive a special enlightenment. The prophet does not at all times speak in an inspired state; compare Nathan ( 2 Samuel 7:3 ), who afterward was compelled to take back a word which he had spoken on his own authority. Characteristic data on the mental state of the prophets in the reception and in the declaration of the divine word are found in  Jeremiah 15:16 ; 20:7;. Originally Jeremiah felt it as a joy that Yahweh spoke to him (compare  Ezekiel 3:3 ), but then he lost all pleasure in life and would have preferred not to have uttered this word, but he could not do as he desired.  5. Supernatural Visions of the Future:  The attempt has often been made to explain prophecy as a natural product of purely human factors. Rationalistic theologians regarded the prophets as enthusiastic teachers of religion and morals, as warm patriots and politicians, to whom they ascribed nothing but a certain ability of guessing the future. But this was no explanation of the facts in the case. The prophets were themselves conscious of this, that they were not the intellectual authors of their higher knowledge. This consciousness is justified by the fact that they were in a condition to make known things which lay beyond their natural horizon and which were contrary to all probability. Those cases are particularly instructive in this respect which beyond a doubt were recorded by the prophets themselves. Ezekiel could indeed, on the basis of moral and religious reflections, reach the conviction that Zedekiah of Jerusalem would not escape his punishment for his political treachery and for his disobedience to the word of Yahweh; but he could never from this source have reached the certainty that this king, as the prophet describes the case in 12:8;, was to be taken captive while trying to escape from the besieged city and was then to be blinded and taken to Babylon. Just as little could he in Babylon know the exact day when the siege of Jerusalem began (24:2). If this prophet had learned of these things in a natural way and had afterward clothed them in the form of prophecy, he would have been guilty of a deception, something unthinkable in the case of so conscientious a preacher of morality. But such cases are frequently met with. Jeremiah predicts to Hananiah that he would die during the year (28:16), but it is not only such matters of detail that presuppose an extraordinary vision of the prophet. The whole way also in which Jeremiah predicts the destruction of Jerusalem as inevitable, in direct contrast to the hopes of the Jerusalemites and to the desires of his own heart, shows that he was speaking under divine compulsion, which was more powerful than his own reflections and sympathies. On any other presupposition his conduct would have been reprehensible cowardice. The case of Isaiah is exactly the same. When he gives to Ahaz the word of God as a guaranty that the Syrians and the Ephraimites would not capture Jerusalem (7:4;), and when he promises Hezekiah that the Assyrians would not shoot an arrow into the city, but would return without having accomplished their purpose (37:22, 33), these things were so much in contradiction to all the probabilities of the course events would take that he would have been a frivolous adventurer had he not received his information from higher sources. Doubtless it was just these predictions which established and upheld the influence of the prophets. Thus in the case of Amos it was his prediction of a great earthquake, which did occur two years later (1:1); in the case of Elijah, the prediction of the long dearth ( 1 Kings 17:1 ); in the case of Elisha the undertakings of the enemies ( 2 Kings 6:12 ), and in other cases. It is indeed true that the contents of the prophetic discourses are not at all confined to the future. Everything that God has to announce to mankind, revelations concerning His will, admonitions, warnings, He is able to announce through the mouth of the prophet. But His determinations with reference to the future as a rule are connected with prophetical utterances of the latter kind. The prophets are watchmen, guardians of the people, who are to warn the nation, because they see the dangers and the judgments approaching, which must put in their appearance if the divine will is disregarded. The prophets interpret also for the people that which is happening and that which has occurred, e.g. the defeats which they have suffered at the hands of their enemies, or the grasshopper plague (Joel), or a famine. They lay bare the inner reason for external occurrences and explain such events in their connection with the providential government of God. This gives to prophecy a powerful inner unity, notwithstanding the great differences of times and surrounding circumstances. It is prophecy which the Hebrew people must thank for their higher conception of history. This people know of a Highest Author of all things and of a positive end, which all things that transpire must serve. God's plan has for its purpose to bring about the complete supremacy of His will among the children of men.  6. The Fulfillment:  In genuine prophecy, according to Biblical conceptions, the fulfillment constitutes an integral part. This is set up by  Deuteronomy 18:21  as a proof of the genuineness of a prophetic utterance. The prophetic word "falls to the ground" ( 1 Samuel 3:19 ) if it is not "raised up" (heqim, "fulfil," for which we more rarely find mille', but regularly in the New Testament plerousthai "being fulfilled") by the course of events. It would remain an empty word if it did not attain to its full content through its realization. In fact, in the word spoken by the prophet itself there dwells a divine power, so that at the moment when he speaks the event takes place, even if it is not yet visible to man. This realization is also not infrequently represented symbolically by the prophet in confirmation of his prediction. Thus in a certain sense it is the prophet himself who through his word builds up and pulls down, plants and roots out ( Jeremiah 1:10 ;  Jeremiah 25:15 ). But the fulfillment can be judged by the contemporaries in the sense of  Deuteronomy 18:22  only when this fulfillment refers to the near future and when special emphasis is laid on external events. In these cases the prediction of certain events assumes the significance of a "sign" (compare  Jeremiah 28:16   Isaiah 8:1 ;; 37:30, and elsewhere). In other cases it is only later generations who can judge of the correctness of a prediction or of a threat. In this way in  Zechariah 1:6  the fulfillment of a threat is declared, and in the New Testament often the fulfillment of a promise is after a long time pointed out. But it is not the case that a genuine prophecy must be fulfilled like an edict of fate. Such prophecy is not an inevitable decree of fate, but is a word of the living God to mankind, and therefore conditioned ethically, and God can, if repentance has followed, withdraw a threat ( Jeremiah 18:2 ; case of Jonah), or the punishment can be mitigated ( 1 Kings 21:29 ). A prediction, too, Yahweh can recall if the people prove unworthy ( Jeremiah 18:9 f ). A favorable or an unfavorable prediction can also be postponed, as far as its realization is concerned, to later times, if it belongs to the ultimate counsels of God, as e.g. the final judgment and deliverance on the last day. This counsel also may be realized successively. In this case the prophet already collects into one picture what is realized gradually in a longer historical development. The prophet in general spoke to his hearers in such a way as could be understood by them and could be impressed on them. It is therefore not correct to demand a fulfillment pedantically exact in the form of the historical garb of the prophecy. The main thing is that the divine thought contained in the prophecy be entirely and completely realized. But not infrequently the finger of God can be seen in the entirely literal fulfillment of certain prophecies. This is especially the case in the New Testament in the appearance of the Son of Man, in whom all the rays of Old Testament prophecy have found their common center.  II. Historical Development of the Prophetic Office.  1. Abraham:  It is a characteristic peculiarity of the religion of the Old Testament that its very elementary beginnings are of a prophetical nature. The fathers, above all Abraham, but also Isaac and Jacob, are the recipients of visions and of divine revelations. Especially is this true of Abraham, who appeared to the foreigners, to whom he was neither kith or kin, to be indeed a prophet (nabhi') ( Genesis 20:7 ; compare  Psalm 105:15 ), although in his case the command to preach the word was yet absent.  2. Moses:  Above all, the creative founder of the Israelite national religion, Moses, is a prophet in the eminent sense of the word. His influence among the people is owing neither to his official position, nor to any military prowess, but solely and alone to the one circumstance, that since his call at the burning bush God has spoken to him. This intercourse between God and Moses was ever of a particularly intimate character. While other men of God received certain individual messages only from time to time and through the mediation of dreams and visions, Yahweh spoke directly and "face to face" with Moses ( Numbers 12:6   Deuteronomy 34:10 ; compare  Exodus 33:11 ). Moses was the permanent organ through whom Yahweh brought about the Egyptian plagues and through whom He explained what these meant to His people, as also through whom He led and ruled them. The voice of Moses too had to explain to them the divine signs in the desert and communicate to them the commandments of God. The legislation of Moses shows that he was not only filled with the Spirit of God occasionally, but that he abode with God for longer periods of time and produced something that is a well-ordered whole. A production such as the Law is the result of a continuous association with God.  3. Period of the Judges:  Since that time revelation through prophecy was probably never entirely wanting in Israel ( Deuteronomy 18:15 ). But this fountain did not always flow with the same fullness or clearness. During the period of the Judges the Spirit of God urged the heroes who served Yahweh rather to deeds than to words. Yet Deborah enjoyed a high rank as a prophetess, and for a long time pronounced decisions of justice in the name of the Lord before she, through her prophetical utterances, aroused the people to rise up against their oppressors. What is said in  1 Samuel 3:1  concerning the times of Eli can be applied to this whole period, namely that the word and vision of the prophet had become rare in the land. All the more epoch-making was the activity of Samuel, who while yet a boy received divine revelations ( 1 Samuel 3:1 ). He was by the whole people regarded as a "seer" whose prophecies were always fulfilled (3:19). The passage  1 Samuel 9:6 ; shows that the people expected of such a man of God that he should also as a clairvoyant come to the assistance of the people in the troubles of life. Such a professional clairvoyant, indeed, Samuel was not, as he was devoted entirely to the service of his God and of his people and obeyed the Divine Spirit, even in those cases when he was compelled to act contrary to his personal inclinations, as was the case when the kingdom was established in Israel (8:6;).  4. Schools of Prophets:  Since the days of Samuel we hear of schools of prophets, or "sons of prophets." These associations probably originated in this way, that an experienced prophet attracted to himself bands of youths, who sought to receive a measure of his spirit. These disciples of the prophets, together with their families, lived in colonies around the master. Possibly Samuel was the first who founded such a school of prophets. For in or near the city of Ramah we first find nayoth, or colonies of such disciples ( 1 Samuel 19:18 ;  1 Samuel 20:1 ). Among these pupils is found to a much greater extent than among the teachers a certain ecstatic feature. They arouse their feelings through music and induce a frantic condition which also affects others in the same way, in which state they "prophesy" and, throwing off their garments, fall to the ground. In later times too we find traces of such ecstatic phenomena. Thus e.g. in  Zechariah 13:6   1 Kings 20:37, 38 , the "wounds" on the breast or on the forehead recall the self-mutilation of the priests of Baal ( 1 Kings 18:28 ). The deeds, suggestive of what the dervishes of our own day do, probably were phenomena quite similar to the action of the prophets of the surrounding tribes. But that prophecy in Israel was not, as is now not infrequently claimed, merely a less crude form of the heathen prophetic institution, is proved by such men as Moses and Samuel, who even in their times represent something much higher. Also in the colonies of prophets there was assuredly not to be found merely an enthusiasm without the Spirit of God. Proof for this is Samuel, the spiritual father of this colony, as Elijah was for the later colonies of this kind. These places were rather the centers of a religious life, where communion with God was sought by prayer and meditation, and where the recollection of the great deeds of God in the past seemed to prepare for the reception of new revelations. From such centers of theocratic ideas and ideals without a doubt there came forth also corresponding influences that affected the people. Perhaps not only was sacred music cultivated at these places but also sacred traditions, which were handed down orally and in writing. Certain it is that at these colonies the religion of Yahweh prevailed.  5. Period of the Kings:  During the period of the kings prophetically inspired men frequently appeared, who demanded even of the kings that they should submit to their divinely-inspired word. Saul, who refused such submission, perished as the result of this conflict. David owed much to the support of the prophets Samuel, Nathan, Gad ( 1 Samuel 16:1   2 Samuel 7   2 Chronicles 29:25 , and elsewhere). But David also bowed in submission when these prophets rebuked him because of his transgression of the divine commands ( 2 Samuel 12 ;  2 Samuel 24 ). His son Solomon was educated by the prophet Nathan. But the destruction of his kingdom was predicted by the prophet Abijah, the Shilonite ( 1 Kings 11:29 ). Since Yahweh, as the supreme Sovereign, has the right to enthrone or to dethrone kings, this is often done through the mouths of the prophets (compare  1 Kings 14:7 ;; 16:1;). After the division of the kingdom we find Shemaiah forbidding Rehoboam to begin a war with his brethren of Israel ( 1 Kings 12:21 ; compare  2 Chronicles 11:2 ; compare another mission of the same prophet,  2 Chronicles 12:5 ). On the other hand in the Northern Kingdom the prophetic word is soon turned against the untheocratic rule of Jeroboam ( 1 Kings 13 ;  1 Kings 14 ). It is in this very same Northern Kingdom that the prophets unfolded their full activity and generally in opposition to the secular rulers, although there was no lack of accommodating "prophets," who were willing to sanction everything that the king wanted. The opposition of the true prophets to these false representatives of prophecy is illustrated in the story of Micaiah, the son of Imlah ( 1 Kings 22 ). But a still higher type of prophecy above the ordinary is found in Elijah, whose historic mission it was to fight to the finish the battle between the followers of Yahweh and the worship of the Tyrian Baal. He was entirely a man of action; every one of his words is a deed on a grand scale (compare concerning Elijah and Elisha the article ISRAEL, RELIGION OF). His successor Elisha inherited from him not only his mantle, but also a double measure of his spiritual gifts. He exhibits the prophetic office more from its loving side. He is accustomed to visit the schools of prophets found scattered throughout the land, calls the faithful together around himself on the Sabbaths and the new moons ( 2 Kings 4:23 ), and in this way establishes centers of a more spiritual culture than was common elsewhere among the people. We read that first-fruits were brought to him as to the priests ( 2 Kings 4:42 ). But while the activity of Elijah was entirely in antagonism to the ruling house in the kingdom, this feature is not entirely lacking in the work of Elisha also. He has even been charged with wicked conspiracies against the dynasty of Omri and the king of Syria ( 2 Kings 8 ;  2 Kings 9 ). His conduct in connection with these events can be excused only on the ground that he was really acting in the name of a higher Master. But in general it was possible for Elisha, after the radical change in public sentiment that had followed upon the work of Elijah, in later time to assume a more friendly attitude toward the government and the people. He often assisted the kings in their arduous contests with the Syrians (compare  2 Kings 6:8 ;; 13:14;). His deeds are generally of a benevolent character. In connection with these he exhibits to a remarkable degree the gift of prophetic foresight ( 2 Kings 4:16 ;  2 Kings 5:26 ;  2 Kings 6:8 ; 7:1 ; 8:10, 12; 9:6 ; 13:19). Jonah, too, the son of Amittai, had at that time a favorable message for the Northern Kingdom ( 2 Kings 14:25 ).  6. Literary Prophets, Amos, Hosea:  However, the flourishing condition of the kingdom under Jeroboam II had an unfavorable influence on its spiritual development. Soon Amos and Hosea were compelled to announce to this kingdom its impending destruction through a great world-power. These two prophets have left us books. To put prophetic utterances into written form had already been introduced before this. At any rate, many scholars are of the conviction that the prophecies of Obadiah and Joel belong to an earlier period, although others place them in the post-exilic period. In any case, the expectation of a day of settlement by Yahweh with His people was already in the days of Amos common and current (5:18;). As the writing of individual prophecies ( Isaiah 8:1 ;  Isaiah 30:8   Habakkuk 2:2 f ) had for its purpose the preserving of these words in permanent authentic form and later to convince the reader of their wonderful fulfillment, thus too the writing down of larger collections of prophecies had for its purpose to intensify the power of the prophetic word and to secure this as a permanent possession of the people ( Jeremiah 30:2 ;  Jeremiah 36:1 ). Pupils of the prophets assisted them in this writing and in preserving their books (compare  Jeremiah 36:4   Isaiah 8:16 ).  7. Poetical Form of Prophecy:  It is to this custom that we owe our knowledge of the very words of the utterances of many of the prophets of a later period.  Read Complete Article...    SCHOOLS OF THE PROPHETS  See  EDUCATION ;  PROPHETS .  FALSE PROPHETS  See  PROPHESYINGS, FALSE .
LADAN|     la'-dan (la`dan, the King James Version, Laadan):  (1) A descendant of Ephraim, and an ancestor of Joshua ( 1 Chronicles 7:26 ).  (2) A Levite of the family of Gershon ( 1 Chronicles 23:7, 8, 9 ;  1 Chronicles 26:21 ), also called LIBNI (which see).
JOSABAD|     jos'-a-bad.  See  JOZABAD .
OFFICES|   CHRIST,  OF  of'-is-is.  General Titles of our Lord   I. CHRIST'S MEDIATION EXPRESSED IN THE SPECIFIC OFFICES  Historical Review of the Theory   II. THE THREEFOLD OFFICE IN THE OLD TESTAMENT  The Failure of the Offices to Secure Their Desired Ends   III. THE PROPHET  The Forecast of the True Prophet   IV. CHRIST THE PROPHET  1. Christ's Manner of Teaching  2. Christ as Prophet in His Church   V. THE PRIESTHOOD OF CHRIST  1. Judaic Priesthood  2. Sacrificial Relations of Christ in the Gospels  3. Christ's Ethical Teaching Affected by Sacrificial Ideas  4. Mutual Confirmations of the Synoptics  5. The Dual Outgrowth of Sacrifice, the Victim and Sacrificer  6. Christ's Priesthood in the Apostolic Ministry and Epistles  7. The Crowning Testimony of the Epistle to the Hebrews  8. Christ's Relation to Sin Expressed in Sacrificial Terms   VI. CHRIST'S KINGLY OFFICE  The Breakdown of the Secular Monarchy   VII. THE MESSIANIC BASIS OF THE THREEFOLD OFFICE OF THE LORD  LITERATURE  General Titles of our Lord:  This term has been used by theologians to describe the various characters of our Lord's redemptive work. Many appellative and metaphorical titles are found in Scripture for Christ, designative of His Divine and human natures and His work: God ( John 20:28 ); Lord ( Matthew 22:43, 14 ); Word ( John 1:1, 14 ); Son of God ( Matthew 3:17   Luke 1:35   Colossians 1:15   1 John 5:20 ); Firstborn from the dead ( Colossians 1:18 ); Beginning of the Creation of God ( Revelation 3:14 ); Image of God ( 2 Corinthians 4:4 ); Express Image of His Person ( Hebrews 1:3  the King James Version); Alpha and Omega ( Revelation 1:8 ;  Revelation 22:13 ); Son of Man ( Matthew 8:20   John 1:51   Acts 7:56 ); Son of David ( Matthew 9:27 ;  Matthew 21:9 ); Last Adam ( 1 Corinthians 15:45, 47 ); Captain of Salvation ( Hebrews 2:10  margin); Saviour ( Luke 2:11   John 4:42   Acts 5:31 ); Redeemer ( Isaiah 59:20   Titus 2:14 ); Author and Perfecter of Faith ( Hebrews 12:2 ); Light of the World ( John 8:12 ); Lamb of God ( John 1:29, 36 ); Creator of all things ( John 1:3, 10 ); Mediator ( 1 Timothy 2:5 ); Prophet ( Deuteronomy 18:15   Luke 24:19 ); Great High Priest ( Hebrews 4:14 ); King ( Luke 1:33   Revelation 17:14 ;  Revelation 19:16 ); Way, Truth and Life ( John 14:6 ). These and many others express the mediatorial office of the Lord. As mediator, He stands between God and Man, revealing the Father to man, and expressing the true relation of man to God. The term (Greek mesites), moreover, signifies messenger, interpreter, advocate, surety or pledge in  Galatians 3:19, 20 , where a covenant is declared to be assured by the hand of one who intervenes. Thus the covenant is confirmed and fulfilled by Him who secures that its stipulations should be carried out, and harmony is restored where before there had been difference and separation ( 1 Timothy 2:5   Hebrews 8:6 ;  Hebrews 9:15 ;  Hebrews 12:24 ). Thus is expressed the purpose of God to redeem mankind by mediation.   I. Christ's Mediation Expressed in the Specific Offices.  In presenting a systematic idea of this Redemptive Work of Christ by Mediation, Christian thought gave to it a harmonious character by choosing the most general and familiar titles of the Lord as the most inclusive categories expressive of the mode of Redemption. These were prophetic, priestly and regal.  Historical Review of the Theory:  The first trace of this division is found in Eusebius, Historia Ecclesiastica, I, 3, and his Demonstratio Evangelica, IV, 15. It was accepted very largely in the Greek church, and continues to be used by Russian ecclesiastical writers. The Roman church has not so generally followed it, though it is found in the writings of many Roman theologians. The earlier reformers, especially Lutheran, ignored it. But Gerhard employed it and the Lutheran theologians followed his example, although some of these repudiated it, as Ernesti, Doderlein and Knapp. Calvin employed the division in his Institutes, II, 15. It was incorporated in the Heidelberg Catechism and has been adopted by most theologians of the Reformed church and by English and American divines. In Germany most theological writers, such as De Wette, Schleiermacher, Tholuck, Nitzsch, Ebrard, adopt it, affirming it as expressive of the essential quality of the work of redemption, and the most complete presentment of its contents. The justification of this position is found in the important place occupied in the progress of revelation by those to whom were entrusted the duties of teaching and leading men in relation to God in the offices of priest, prophet and king. Even the modern development of Christian thought which extends the view of Divine dealing with man over the entire race and its religious history, not excluding those who would find in the most recent conditions of the world's life the outworking of the will of God in the purposes of human salvation, cannot discover any better form of expressing Christ's relation to man than in terms of the prophetic, the priestly and the governmental offices. The prophet is the instrument of teaching: the priest expresses the ethical relation of man to God; while the king furnishes the typical form of that exercise of sovereign authority and Providential direction which concerns the practical life of the race.   II. The Threefold Office in the Old Testament.  From the close relation which Jesus in both His person and work bore to the Old Testament dispensation, it is natural to turn to the preparatory history of the early Scriptures for the first notes of these mediatorial offices. That the development of the Jewish people and system ever moved toward Christ as an end and fulfillment is universally acknowledged. The vague and indeterminate conditions of both the religious and national life of Israel manifest a definite movement toward a clearer apprehension of man's relationship to God. Nothing is more clear in Israel's history than the gradual evolution of official service both of church and state, as expressed in the persons and duties of the prophet, the priest and the king. The early patriarch contained in himself the threefold dignity, and discharged the threefold duty. As the family became tribal, and the tribe national, these duties were divided. The order of the household was lost for a while in the chaos of the larger and less homogeneous society. The domestic altar was multiplied in many "high places." Professional interpreters of more or less religious value began to be seers, and here and there, prophets. The leadership of the people was occasional, ephemeral and uncertain. But the men of Divine calling appeared from time to time; the foundation work of Moses was built on; the regular order of the worship of Yahweh, notwithstanding many lapses, steadily prevailed. Samuel gave dignity to his post as judge, and he again beheld the open vision of the Lord; he offered the appointed sacrifices; he established the kingly office; and although he was not permitted to see the family of David on the throne, like Moses he beheld afar off the promised land of a Divinely appointed kingdom. With the accession of the Davidic house, the three orders of God's service were completely developed. The king was seated on the throne, the priest was ministering at the one altar of the nation, the prophet with the Divine message was ever at hand to teach, to guide and to rebuke.  The Failure of the Offices to Secure Their Desired Ends:  Notwithstanding this growth of the special institutions-prophet, priest and king-the religious and national condition was by no means satisfactory. The kingdom was divided; external foes threatened the existence of the nation; idolatry was not extinguished, and the prophets who were true to Yahweh were compelled to warn and rebuke the sins of the rulers and the people, and even to testify against the priests for their unfaithfulness to the truth and purity of the religion which they professed. The best hopes of Israel and the Divine promises seem thus to be contradicted by the constant failure of the people to realize their best ideals. Hence, slowly arose a vague expectation of reform. The idea of the better condition which was coming grew ever more distinct, and settled down at length to Israel's Messianic hope, expressed in various forms, finally converging to the looking for of one who should in some mysterious way gather into himself the ideas which belonged especially to the three great offices.   III. The Prophet.  In this article we are concerned only with the offices as they tend to their fulfillment in Christ. For the more general treatment of each office, reference must be made to the special articles.  The Forecast of the True Prophet:  The first appearance of the idea of the special prophet of Yahweh is in  Deuteronomy 18:15 . Moses had been sent by the people to hear the Lord's words on their behalf ( Exodus 20:19   Deuteronomy 5:27 ); and this incident in the later passage of  Deuteronomy 18:15-22  is connected with the promise of a prophet, while at the same time reference is made to the general fact of prophecy and the conditions of its validity and acceptance. Here we find the germ of the expectation of the Prophet, which occupied so large a place in the mind of Israel. In the act of the people sending Moses to receive the word, and Yahweh's promise to send a prophet whom they would accept, we see also the suggestion of a distinction between the first dispensation and the latter. The Divine promise was to the effect that what was given by Moses God would consummate in a prophetic revelation through a person. The conception of this personality is found in the second part of Isaiah (40-66). Isaiah's mission was vain,  Isaiah 49:4 , but the coming one shall prevail, 49-53 (passim). But the success of this servant of Yahweh was not to be only as a prophet, but by taking on himself the penalty of sin ( Isaiah 53:5 ), and by being made an offering for sin; and as Mighty Victor triumphing over all foes ( Isaiah 53:10-12 ), the dignities of whose kingship are set forth in various parts of the prophetic writings. Thus the general effect of the course of the earlier revelation may be summed up in this prophetic ministry with which has been combined a priestly and a royal character. It was an ever-advancing manifestation of the nature and will of God, delivered by inspired men who spake at sundry times and in divers manners, but whose message was perfected and extended by Jesus Christ ( Hebrews 1:1 ), who thus became the Prophet of the Lord.   IV. Christ the Prophet.  Christ's ministry illustrates the prophetic office in the most extensive and exalted sense of the term. He was designed and appointed by the Father ( Isaiah 61:1, 2 ; compare  Luke 4:16-21   Matthew 17:5 ). In  1 Corinthians 1:30 , Christ is declared to be made to us wisdom. His intimate knowledge of God ( John 1:18   Matthew 11:27   John 16:15 ), the qualities of His teaching dependent upon His nature, both Divine and human ( John 3:34 ); His authority ( John 1:9, 17, 18   Luke 4:18-21 ); His knowledge of God ( Mark 12:29   John 4:24   Matthew 11:25   John 17:11, 25   Matthew 18:35 )-these all peculiarly fitted Christ to be the Revealer of God. Besides His doctrine of God, His ministry included the truth concerning Himself, His nature, claims, mission, the doctrine of the Holy Spirit, and the religious life of man. He taught as none other the foundation of religion, the facts on which it was based, the essence of Divine service, the nature of sin, the grace of God, the means of atonement, the laws of the kingdom of God and the future state. By the acknowledgment of even those who have denied His Divine nature and redemptive work, He has been recognized as the Supreme Moral Teacher of the world. His claim to be the Prophet is seen in that He is the source of the ever-extending revelation of the eternal. His own words and works He declared were only part of the fuller knowledge which would be furnished by the system which He established ( Luke 9:45 ;  Luke 18:34   John 12:16 ;  John 14:26 ;  John 15:26 ;  John 16:12, 13, 14 ).  1. Christ's Manner of Teaching:  How remarkable was His method of teaching! Parable, proverb, absolute affirmation, suggestion, allusion to simple objects, practical life-these all made His teaching powerful, easily understood, living; sometimes His action was His word-and all with a commanding dignity and gracious winsomeness, that was felt by His hearers and has ever been recognized ( Matthew 7:29 ). So perfect and exalted was the teaching of Jesus that many have supposed that revelation ceased with Him, and the immediate followers whom He especially inspired to be His witnesses and interpreters. Certainly in Him the prophetic ministry culminated.  2. Christ as Prophet in His Church:  An important aspect of Christ's prophetic office is that of His relation to the church as the source, through the instrumentality of His Spirit, of ever-enlarging knowledge of Divine truth which it has been able to gain. This is the real significance of the claim which some churches make to be the custodians and interpreters of the tradition of faith, with which has also gone theory of development-not as a human act but as a ministration of the Lord through His Spirit, which is granted to the church. Even those who hold that all Divine truth is to be found in the sacred Scriptures have yet maintained that God has much truth still to bring out of His word by the leading and direction of the Spirit of Jesus. The Scripture itself declares that Christ was the light which lighteth every man that cometh into the world ( John 1:9 ). He Himself promised that the Spirit which He would give would guide His followers into all truth ( John 16:13 ). The apostles claimed to receive their teaching and direction of the church from the Lord ( 1 Corinthians 11:23 ). The testimony of Jesus is definitely declared to be the spirit of prophecy ( Revelation 19:10 ). Indeed, all the apostolic writings in almost every line affirm that what they teach is received from the Spirit, who is the Spirit of the Lord.   V. The Priesthood of Christ.  1. Judaic Priesthood:  For the history of the development of the priesthood of Israel on which our Lord's High-Priesthood is ideally based, reference must be made to the article especially dealing of with that subject. The bearings of that institution upon the work of Jesus as Redeemer alone fall under this section. Judaism like all religions developed an extensive system priestly service. As the moral sense of the people enlarged and became more distinct, the original simplicity of sacrifice, especially as a commensal act, in which the unity of the celebrants with each other and with God was expressed, was expanded into acts regularly performed by officials, in which worship, thanksgiving, covenant and priestly expiation and atonement were clearly and definitely expressed. The progress of sacrifice may be seen in the history of the Old Testament from Cain and Abel's ( Genesis 4:3, 4 ), Noah's ( Genesis 8:20 ), Abraham's covenant ( Genesis 15:9-18 ), etc., to the elaborate services of the Mosaic ritual set forth in Lev, the full development of which is found only in the later days of Israel. When Christ appeared, the entire sacerdotal system had become incorporated in the mind, customs and language of the people. They had learned more or less distinctly the truth of man's relation to God in its natural character, and especially in that aspect where man by his sin had separated himself from God and laid himself open to the penalty of law. The conception of priesthood had thus grown in the consciousness of Israel, as the necessary instrument of mediation between man and God. Priestly acts were performed on behalf of the worshipper. The priest was to secure for man the Divine favor. This could only be gained by an act of expiation. Something must be done in order to set forth the sin of man, his acknowledgment of guilt, the satisfaction of the law, and the assurance of the Divine forgiveness, the restored favor of God and finally the unity of man and God.  2. Sacrificial Relations of Christ in the Gospels:  That the work of Christ partook of the nature of priestly service is already indicated by references in the Gospels themselves. He was called "Jesus; for it is he that shall save his people from their sins" ( Matthew 1:21 ). Salvation from sin, in the habit of thought at which the Jew had arrived, must have expressed itself most clearly in the symbolic signification of the sacrifices in the temple. Thus in the very name which our Lord received His priesthood is suggested. The frankincense of the Magi's offering is not without its mystical meaning ( Matthew 2:11 ). Some may find in the Baptist's words, "baptize you in the Holy Spirit and in fire" ( Matthew 3:11 ), a suggestion of priestly action, for the understanding of John's declaration must be found in the conventional ideas of the Jewish thought of the period, determined as they undoubtedly were by the history of priestly service in the past and the fully developed ritual of the temple. The baptizing of the proselyte was not necessarily a priestly act, as indeed we cannot be certain that the baptism was always necessary at the introduction of a proselyte into the Jewish church. But the association of circumcision with the initiation of the proselyte certainly introduced the priest, and the sprinkling of the congregation by the priest was a familiar part of his official duties. It is quite probable therefore that John's use of the expression carried with it something of the sacerdotal idea.  3. Christ's Ethical Teaching Affected by Sacrificial Ideas:  The spirit of our Lord's teaching, as seen in the Sermon on the Mount, etc., as it reflects the thought of the Galilean ministry, may be regarded as prophetic rather than priestly. Still the end of the teaching was righteousness, and it was impossible for a Jew to conceive of the securing of righteousness without some reference to priestly administration and influence. The contrast of the effect of Christ's teaching with that of the scribes ( Matthew 7:29 ) keeps us in the vicinity of the law as applied through the sacerdotal service of which the scribes were the interpreters and teachers, and surely therefore a hint of our Lord's relation to priesthood may have found its way into the minds of His immediate hearers. He was careful to recognize the authority of the priest ( Matthew 8:4 ). The doctrine of sacrifice emerges somewhat more distinctly in the reference to the cross, which our Lord associates with the thought of finding life by losing it ( Matthew 16:24, 25 ), and when the taking up the cross is interpreted by following Christ, and this hint is soon followed by Christ's distinct reference to His coming sufferings ( Matthew 17:9, 12 ), more definitely referred to in  Matthew 17:22, 23 . Now the object of the work of the Lord takes clearer form. The Son of Man is come to save that which was lost ( Matthew 18:11  the American Revised Version, margin). As the time of the catastrophe drew nearer, the Lord became still more distinct in His references to His coming death ( Matthew 20:18, 19 ), and at length declares that "the Son of man came. to give his life a ransom for many" ( Matthew 20:28 ). our Lord's quotations ( Matthew 21:42 ;  Matthew 23:39 ) concerning the rejected "corner stone," and the Blessed One "that cometh in the name of the Lord" ( Psalm 118:22, 26 ), are drawn from a psalm filled with the spirit of the priestly service of the temple, and in their reference to Himself again illustrate the ever-increasing recognition of His priesthood. He also uses the official term "Christ" (Messiah, the anointed one) more frequently ( Matthew 24:5, 23, 14 ). On the eve of the betrayal and trial the crucifixion is clearly foretold ( Matthew 26:2 ); and the death ( Matthew 26:12 ). The full significance of the death is asserted at the institution of the Lord's Supper. The bread is "my body," the wine is "my blood of the new covenant," and it is declared to be "poured out for many unto remission of sins" ( Matthew 26:26-28  margin).  4. Mutual Confirmations of the Synoptics:  A similar succession of ideas of our Lord's priestly work may be found in the other gospels (see  Mark 1:8, 44 ;  Mark 8:29 ; see below on the significance of the term Christ;  Mark 8:31, 34 ;  Mark 9:9, 10 ). The inability of the disciples to understand the life that was to follow death here is indicated-the truth of the gospel of death and resurrection so closely bound up with the conception of sacrifice, where the blood is the life which given becomes the condition of the new union with God, being thus revealed by Christ as the initial doctrine to be continuously enlarged ( Mark 9:31 ;  Mark 10:21, 33, 14, 45 ; 11:09; 12:10; 13:21, 22; 14:8, 22-25, 61, 62). In Luke the priestly "atmosphere" is introduced in the earliest part of the narrative, the history of Zacharias and Elisabeth giving emphasis to the setting of John's own mission ( Luke 1 ). The name Jesus ( Luke 1:31 ); the special relation of the new kingdom to sin, necessarily connected with sacrifice in the mind of a priest, found in Zacharias' psalm ( Luke 1:77, 78 ); the subtle suggestion of the Suffering One in the "also" of  Luke 2:35  the King James Version (the American Standard Revised Version omits) shows that the third Gospel is quite in line with the two other Synoptics (see also  Luke 3:3 ;  Luke 5:14 ). The claim to forgive sins must have suggested the sacrificial symbol of remission ( Luke 5:24 ;  Luke 9:23 ;  Luke 13:35 ;  Luke 14:27 ;  Luke 18:31 ;  Luke 20:14 ;  Luke 22:19, 20 ; 24:7, 26, 46, 47). In the Fourth Gospel, we have the word of the Baptist, "Behold, the Lamb of God" ( John 1:29, 36 ), where Christ's relation to sin is distinctly expressed (see LAMB OF GOD)-the baptism in the Spirit ( John 1:33 ). It is highly probable that the apostle John was the "other" of the two disciples, ( John 1:40 ) and, having heard the Baptist's words, is the only evangelist who records them, thus introducing from his personal knowledge the sacrificial idea earlier into his history than the Synoptics. Christ declares that He will give His life for the life of the world ( John 6:51 ). The entire passage ( John 6:47-65 ) is suffused with the conception of "life for life," one of the elements constituting the conception of the sacrificial act. In  John 8:28  (compare  John 3:14 ;  John 12:32 ) Christ predicts His crucifixion. The Good Shepherd gives His life for the sheep ( John 10:15 ). In  John 10:17, 18 , Christ claims the power to lay down His life and to take it again. He is the sacrifice and the Sacrificer.  5. The Dual Outgrowth of Sacrifice, the Victim and Sacrificer:  Here appears for the first time the double relation of Christ to the sacrificial idea, worked out in the later thought of the church into the full significance of our Lord's priestly office. In  John 11:25, 26  Christ is the source of life, and life after death. It is hardly possible that this conception should not have, even if remotely suggested, some reference to the significance of sacrifice; for in the sacrifices the Divine claim for the blood, as specially to be set apart as the Divine portion, was ever present. God ever claimed the blood as His; for to Him the life was forfeited by sin. And moreover He alone possesses life and gives it. Of that forfeit and that Divine sovereignty of life, sacrifice is the expression. This is fully realized and made actual in Christ's life and death for man, in which man shares by His unity with Christ. Man at once receives the penalty of sin in dying with Christ, and rises again into the new life which our Lord opened, and of which He is the ceaseless energy and power through the spirit of God. The emergence of this idea is illustrated by the evangelist in the sayings of Caiaphas, where as the high priest of the nation he gives, though unconsciously, a significant expression to the truth that it was "expedient" that Jesus `should die for the nation and for the children of God everywhere scattered' ( John 11:47-52 ). Here the symbolic significance of sacrifice is practically realized: death in the place of another and the giving of life to those for whom the sacrifice was offered. The vitalizing power of Christ's death is asserted in the discourse following the visit of the Greeks ( John 12:24-33 ). The idea of life from the dying seed is associated with the conception of the power of attraction and union by the cross. The natural law of life through death is thus in harmony with the gift of life through sacrifice involving death. That sacrifice may be found much more widely than merely in death, is shown by the law of service illustrated in the washing of the disciples' feet (13:14-17); and this is declared to spring out of love ( John 15:13 ). For the priestly ideas of our Lord's prayer ( John 17 ) see INTERCESSION; INTERCESSION OF CHRIST; PRAYERS OF CHRIST.  6. Christ's Priesthood in the Apostolic Ministry and Epistles:  Christ's priestly office finds illustration in the Acts of the Apostles, in the apostolic declaration of Christ's Messianic office, not only Lord, but also Christ the Anointed One ( Acts 2:36 ). Peter's reference to the stone which completed the temple, the service of which was essentially sacrificial, as the Symbol of Christ, the Crown of that Spiritual Temple ( Acts 4:11 ); Philip's application of the passage in Isaiah of the sheep led to the slaughter ( Isaiah 53:7, 8 ) to our Lord ( Acts 8:32, 35 ); Peter's discourse to Cornelius, culminating in the remission of sins through Christ ( Acts 10:43 )-all indicates the steady growth in the apostolic ministry of the conception of our Lord's priestly office. The idea takes its most distinct form in Paul's sermon at Antioch ( Acts 13:38, 39 ).  Read Complete Article...    OFFICES OF CHRIST  See  CHRIST, OFFICES OF .
UNNI|Afficted.  (1.) A Levite whom David appointed to take part in bringing the ark up to Jerusalem from the house of Obed-edom by playing the psaltery on that occasion ( 1 Chronicles 15:18 ,  20). (2.) A Levite who returned with Zerubbabel from the Captivity ( Nehemiah 12:9 ). 
BAYITH|     ba'-yith (bayith; the King James Version Bajith, "house" ( Isaiah 15:2 )): A town in the country of Moab. The reading of the Revised Version, margin, "Bayith and Dibon are gone up to the high places to weep," seems to be the proper rendering of this passage. Duhm et al., by changing the text, read either "house of" or "daughter of." The construct of this word beth is frequently used in compound words.  See  BETH .
EPHRATHAH|   EPHRATH;   ef'-rath, e'-frath, ef'-ra-tha, ef-ra'-tha ('ephrath; Ephratha;  Genesis 35:16 ;  Genesis 48:7 ); ('ephrathah, in the other references:  Joshua 15:59  (in added verse of Septuagint only);  Ruth 4:11   1 Chronicles 2:19, 24, 50 ;  Psalm 132:6   Micah 5:2 , the King James Version "Ephratah"):  The name either of Bethlehem itself or of a district in which Bethlehem was situated. A man of this place was called an Ephrathite ( Ruth 1:2   1 Samuel 17:12 ). It is held by many authorities that the Ephrath where Rachel was buried ( Genesis 35:16 ;  Genesis 48:7 ) was a different place, the words "the same is Bethlehem" being a gloss. The reading in  Psalm 132:6  is doubtful; the Revised Version, margin has "Ephraim."  E. W. G. Masterman
HAZEZONTAMAR|Pruning of the palm, the original name of the place afterwards called ENGEDI (q.v.),  Genesis 14:7 ; called also HAZAZON-TAMAR ( 2 Chronicles 20:2 ). 
NEPHISHESIM|   NEPHISH; NEPHISIM; ; NEPHUSIM  ne'-fish, ne-fi'-sim, ne-fish'-e-sim, ne-fusim (nephicim, nephucim): The former is the Kethibh (Hebrew: "written") form of the name adopted in the Revised Version (British and American); the latter the Qere (Hebrew "read") form, adopted in the King James Version and the Revised Version margin ( Ezra 2:50 ).  See  NAPHISH ;  NEPHUSHESIM .  NEPHUSHESIM; NEPHISHESIM  ne-fush'-e-sim, ne-fish'-e-sim (nephushecim, nephishecim): The former is the Kethibh (Hebrew "written") form of the name adopted in the Revised Version (British and American); the latter the Qere (Hebrew "read") form adopted in the King James Version and the Revised Version margin ( Nehemiah 7:52 ).  See  NAPHISH ;  NEPHISIM .
SHILHIM|Aqueducts, a town in the south of Judah ( Joshua 15:32 ); called also Sharuhen and Shaaraim ( 19:6 ). 
ZABAD|Gift.  (1.) One of David's valiant men ( 1 Chronicles 11:41 ), the descendant of Ahlai, of the "children of Sheshan" ( 2:31 ). (2.) A descendant of Tahath ( 7:21 ). (3.) The son of Shemath. He conspired against Joash, king of Judah, and slew him ( 2 Chronicles 24:25 ,  26). He is called also Jozachar ( 2 Kings 12:21 ). (4.)  Ezra 10:27 . (5.)  Ezra 10:33 . (6.)  Ezra 10:43 . 
LOTS|     See  DIVINATION .  LOTS, FEAST OF  See  PURIM .
TOLAITES|Descendants of Tola ( Numbers 26:23 ;  1 Chronicles 7:1 ,  2). 
OLIVES|   MOUNT OF   See  OLIVES, MOUNT OF ;  JERUSALEM .  OLIVES, MOUNT OF  ol'-ivz, (har ha-zethim ( Zechariah 14:4 ), ma`aleh ha-zethim, "the ascent of the mount of Olives" ( 2 Samuel 15:30 , the King James Version "the ascent of (mount) Olivet"); to oros ton elaion, "the Mount of Olives" ( Matthew 21:1 ;  Matthew 24:3 ;  Matthew 26:30   Mark 11:1 ;  Mark 13:3 ;  Mark 14:26   Luke 19:37 ;  Luke 22:39   John 8:1 ), to oros to kaloumenon elaion, "the mount that is called Olivet" ( Luke 19:29 ;  Luke 21:37 ; in both references in the King James Version "the mount called (the mount) of Olives"), tou elaionos ( Acts 1:12 , English Versions of the Bible "Olivet" literally, "olive garden")):  1. Names  2. Situation and Extent  3. Old Testament Associations  (1) David's Escape from Absalom  (2) The Vision of Ezekiel  (3) The Vision of Zechariah  4. High Places  5. Olivet and Jesus  6. View of the City from Olivet  7. Churches and Ecclesiastical Traditions  LITERATURE  Olivet comes to us through the Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) Oliverum, "an oliveyard."  1. Names:  Josephus frequently uses the expression "Mount of Olives" (e.g. Ant, VII, ix, 2; XX, viii, 6; BJ, V, ii, 3; xii, 2), but later Jewish writings give the name har ha-mishchah, "Mount of Oil"; this occurs in some manuscripts in  2 Kings 23:13 , and the common reading har ha-mashchith, "Mount of Corruption," margin "destruction," may possibly be a deliberate alteration (see below). In later ages the Mount was termed "the mountain of lights," because here there used to be kindled at one time the first beacon light to announce throughout Jewry the appearance of the new moon.  To the natives of Palestine today it is usually known as Jebel et Tar ("mountain of the elevation," or "tower"), or, less commonly, as Jebel Tur ez zait ("mountain of the elevation of oil"). The name Jebel ez-zaitun ("Mount of Olives") is also well known. Early Arabic writers use the term Tur Zait, "Mount of Oil."  2. Situation and Extent:  The mountain ridge which lies East of Jerusalem leaves the central range near the valley of Sha`phat and runs for about 2 miles due South. After culminating in the mountain mass on which lies the "Church of the Ascension," it may be considered as giving off two branches: one lower one, which runs South-Southwest, forming the southern side of the Kidron valley, terminating at the Wady en Nar, and another, higher one, which slopes eastward and terminates a little beyond el-`Azareyeh (modern Bethany). The main ridge is considerably higher than the site of ancient Jerusalem, and still retains a thick cap of the soft chalky limestone, mixed with flint, known variously as Nari and Ka`kuli, which has been entirely denuded over the Jerusalem site (see JERUSALEM, II, 1). The flints were the cause of a large settlement of paleolithic man which occurred in prehistoric times on the northern end of the ridge, while the soft chalky stone breaks down to form a soil valuable for the cultivation of olives and other trees and shrubs. The one drawback to arboriculture upon this ridge is the strong northwest wind which permanently bends most trees toward the Southeast, but affects the sturdy, slow-growing olive less than the quicker-growing pine. The eastern slopes are more sheltered. In respect of wind the Mount of Olives is far more exposed than the site of old Jerusalem.  The lofty ridge of Olivet is visible from far, a fact now emphasized by the high Russian tower which can be seen for many scores of miles on the East of the Jordan. The range presents, from such a point of view particularly, a succession of summits. Taking as the northern limit the dip which is crossed by the ancient Anathoth (`anata) road, the most northerly summit is that now crowned by the house and garden of Sir John Gray Hill, 2,690 ft. above sea-level. This is sometimes incorrectly pointed out as Scopus, which lay farther to the Northwest. A second sharp dip in the ridge separates this northern summit from the next, a broad plateau now occupied by the great Kaiserin Augusta Victoria Stiftung and grounds. The road makes a sharp descent into a valley which is traversed from West to East by an important and ancient road from Jerusalem, which runs eastward along the Wady er Rawabeh. South of this dip lies the main mass of the mountain, that known characteristically as the Olivet of ecclesiastical tradition. This mass consists of two principal summits and two subsidiary spurs. The northern of the two main summits is that known as Karem es Sayyad, "the vineyard of the hunter," and also as "Galilee," or, more correctly, as Viri Galilaei (see below, 7). It reaches a height of 2,723 ft. above the Mediterranean and is separated from the southern summit by a narrow neck traversed today by the carriage road. The southern summit, of practically the same elevation, is the traditional "Mount of the Ascension," and for several years has been distinguished by a lofty, though somewhat inartistic, tower erected by the Russians. The two subsidiary spurs referred to above are:  (1) a somewhat isolated ridge running Southeast, upon which lies the squalid village of el `Azareyeh-Bethany;  (2) a small spur running South, covered with grass, which is known as "the Prophets," on account of a remarkable 4th-century Christian tomb found there, which is known as "the tomb of the Prophets"-a spot much venerated by modern Jews.  A further extension of the ridge as Batn el Hawa, "the belly of the wind," or traditionally as "the Mount of Offence" (compare  1 Kings 11:7   2 Kings 23:13 ), is usually included in the Mount of Olives, but its lower altitude-it is on a level with the temple-platform-and its position South of the city mark it off as practically a distinct hill. Upon its lower slopes are clustered the houses of Silwan (Siloam).  The notices of the Mount of Olives in the Old Testament are, considering its nearness to Jerusalem, remarkably scanty.  3. Old Testament Associations:  (1) David's Escape from Absalom:  David fleeing before his rebellious son Absalom ( 2 Samuel 15:16 ) crossed the Kidron and "went up by the ascent of the mount of Olives, and wept as he went up; and he had his head covered, and went barefoot: and all the people that were with him covered every man his head, and they went up, weeping as they went ( 2 Samuel 15:30 )..... And it came to pass, that, when David was come to the top of the ascent where he was wont to worship God, (m), behold, Hushai the Archite came to meet him with his coat rent, and earth upon his head ( 2 Samuel 15:32 ). And when David was a little past the top of the ascent, behold, Ziba the servant of Mephibosheth met him, with a couple of asses saddled, and upon them two hundred loaves of bread, and a hundred clusters of raisins, and a hundred of summer fruits, and a bottle of wine" ( 2 Samuel 16:1 ).  It is highly probable that David's route to the wilderness was neither by the much-trodden Anathoth road nor over the summit of the mountain, but by the path running Northeast from the city, which runs between the Viri Galilaei hill and that supporting the German Sanatorium and descends into the wilderness by Wady er Rawabi.  See BAHURIM .  (2) The Vision of Ezekiel:  Ezekiel in a vision (11:23) saw the glory of Yahweh go up from the midst of the city and stand "upon the mountain which is on the east side of the city" (compare 43:2). In connection with this the Rabbi Janna records the tradition that the shekhinah stood 3 1/2 years upon Olivet, and preached, saying, "Seek ye the Lord while he may be found, call ye upon him while he is near"-a strange story to come from a Jewish source, suggesting some overt reference to Christ.  (3) The Vision of Zechariah:  In  Zechariah 14:4  the prophet sees Yahweh in that day stand upon the Mount of Olives, "and the Mount of Olives shall be cleft in the midst thereof toward the east and toward the west, and there shall be a very great valley; and half of the mountain shall remove toward the north, and half of it toward the south."  In addition to these direct references, Jewish tradition associates with this mount-this "mount of Corruption"-the rite of the red heifer ( Numbers 19 ); and many authorities consider that this is also the mount referred to in  Nehemiah 8:15 , whence the people are directed to fetch olive branches, branches of wild olive, myrtle branches, palm branches and branches of thick trees to make their booths.  4. High Places:  It is hardly possible that a spot with such a wide outlook-especially the marvelous view over the Jordan valley and Dead Sea to the lands of Ammon and Moab-should have been neglected in the days when Semitic religion crowned such spots with their sanctuaries. There is Old Testament evidence that there was a "high place" here. In the account of David's flight mention is made of the spot on the summit "where he was wont to worship God" ( 2 Samuel 15:32  margin). This is certainly a reference to a sanctuary, and there are strong reasons for believing that this place may have been NOB (which see) (see  1 Samuel 21:1 ;  1 Samuel 22:9, 11, 19   Nehemiah 11:32 ; but especially  Isaiah 10:32 ). This last reference seems to imply a site more commanding in its outlook over the ancient city than Ras el Musharif proposed by Driver, one at least as far South as the Anathoth road, or even that from Wady er Rawabi. But besides this we have the definite statement ( 1 Kings 11:7 ): "Then did Solomon build a high place for Chemosh the abomination of Moab, in the mount that is before (i.e. East of) Jerusalem, and for Molech the abomination of the children of Ammon," and the further account that the "high places that were before (East of) Jerusalem, which were on the right hand (South) of the mount of corruption (margin "destruction") which Solomon the king of Israel had builded for Ashtoreth the abomination of the Sidonians, and for Chemosh the abomination of Moab, and for Milcom the abomination of the children of Ammon, did the king (Josiah) defile" ( 2 Kings 23:13 ). That these high places were somewhere upon what is generally recognized as the Mount of Olives, seems clear, and the most probable site is the main mass where are today the Christian sanctuaries, though Graetz and Dean Stanley favor the summit known as Viri Galilaei. It is the recognition of this which has kept alive the Jewish name "Mount of Corruption" for this mount to this day. The term Mons offensionis, given to the southeastern extension, South of the city, is merely an ecclesiastical tradidition going back to Quaresmius in the 17th century, which is repeated by Burckhardt (1823 A.D.).  5. Olivet and Jesus:  More important to us are the New Testament associations of this sacred spot. In those days the mountain must have been far different from its condition today. Titus in his siege of Jerusalem destroyed all the timber here as elsewhere in the environs, but before this the hillsides must have been clothed with verdure-oliveyards, fig orchards and palm groves, with myrtle and other shrubs. Here in the fresh breezes and among the thick foliage, Jesus, the country-bred Galilean, must gladly have taken Himself from the noise and closeness of the over-crowded city. It is to the Passion Week, with the exception of  John 8:1 , that all the incidents belong which are expressly mentioned as occurring on the Mount of Olives; while there would be a special reason at this time in the densely packed city, it is probable that on other occasions also our Lord preferred to stay outside the walls. Bethany would indeed appear to have been His home in Judea, as Capernaum was in Galilee. Here we read of Him as staying with Mary and Martha ( Luke 10:38-42 ); again He comes to Bethany from the wilderness road from Jericho for the raising of Lazarus ( John 11 ), and later He is at a feast, six days before the Passover ( John 12:1 ), at the house of Simon ( Matthew 26:6-12   Mark 14:3-9   John 12:1-9 ). The Mount of Olives is expressly mentioned in many of the events of the Passion Week. He approached Jerusalem, "unto Bethphage and Bethany, at the mount of Olives" ( Mark 11:1   Matthew 21:1   Luke 19:29 ); over a shoulder of this mount-very probably by the route of the present Jericho carriage road-He made His triumphal entry to the city ( Matthew 21   Mark 11   Luke 19 ), and on this road, when probably the full sight of the city first burst into view, He wept over Jerusalem ( Luke 19:41 ). During all that week "every day he was teaching in the temple; and every night he went out, and lodged in the mount that is called Olivet" ( Luke 21:37 )-the special part of the mount being Bethany ( Matthew 21:17   Mark 11:11 ). It was on the road from Bethany that He gave the sign of the withering of the fruitless fig tree ( Matthew 21:17-19   Mark 11:12-14, 20-24 ), and "as he sat on the mount of Olives" ( Matthew 24:3   Mark 13:3 f ) Jesus gave His memorable sermon with the doomed city lying below Him.  On the lower slopes of Olivet, in the Garden of Gethsemane (see GETHSEMANE), Jesus endured His agony, the betrayal and arrest, while upon one of its higher points-not, as tradition has it, on the inhabited highest summit, but on the secluded eastern slopes "over against Bethany" ( Luke 24:50-52 )-He took leave of His disciples (compare  Acts 1:12 ).  6. View of the City from Olivet:  The view of Jerusalem from the Mount of Olives must ever be one of the most striking impressions which any visitor to Jerusalem carries away with him. It has been described countless times. It is today a view but of ruin and departed glory compared with that over which Jesus wept. A modern writer with historic imagination has thus graphically sketched the salient features of that sight:  "We are standing on the road from Bethany as it breaks round the Mount of Olives and on looking northwest this is what we see..... There spreads a vast stone stage, almost rectangular, some 400 yards. North and South by 300 East and West, held up above Ophel and the Kidron valley by a high and massive wall, from 50 to 150 ft. and more in height, according to the levels of the rock from which it rises. Deep cloisters surround this platform on the inside of the walls..... Every gate has its watch and other guards patrol the courts. The crowds, which pour through the south gates upon the platform for the most part keep to the right; the exceptions, turning westward, are excommunicated or in mourning. But the crowd are not all Israelites. Numbers of Gentiles mingle with them; there are costumes and colors from all lands. In the cloisters sit teachers with groups of disciples about them. On the open pavement stand the booths of hucksters and money-changers; and from the North sheep and bullocks are being driven toward the Inner Sanctuary. This lies not in the center of the great platform, but in the northwest corner. It is a separately fortified, oblong enclosure; its high walls with their 9 gates rising from a narrow terrace at a slight elevation above the platform and the terrace encompassed by a fence within which none but Israelites may pass..... Upon its higher western end rises a house `like a lion broad in front and narrow behind.'.... From the open porch of this house stone steps descend to a great block of an altar perpetually smoking with sacrifices..... Off the Northwest of the Outer Sanctuary a castle (the Antonia) dominates the whole with its 4 lofty towers. Beyond.... the Upper City rises in curved tiers like a theater, while all the lower slopes to the South are a crowded mass of houses, girded by the eastern wall of the city. Against that crowded background the sanctuary with its high house gleams white and fresh. But the front of the house, glittering with gold plates, is obscured by a column of smoke rising from the altar; and the Priests' Court about the latter is colored by the slaughterers and sacrifices-a splash of red, as our imagination takes it, in the center of the prevailing white. At intervals there are bursts of music; the singing of psalms, the clash of cymbals and a great blare of trumpets, at which the people in their court in the Inner Sanctuary fall down and worship" (extracts from G.A. Smith's Jerusalem, II, 518-20).  7. Churches and Ecclesiastical Traditions:  To the Bible student the New Testament is the best guide to Olivet; tradition and "sites" only bewilder him. Once the main hilltop was a mass of churches. There was the "Church of the Ascension" to mark the spot whereby tradition (contrary to the direct statement of Luke) states that the Ascension occurred; now the site is marked by a small octagonal chapel, built in 1834, which is in the hands of the Moslems. There a "footprint of Christ" is shown in the rock. A large basilica of Helena was built over the place where it was said that Christ taught His disciples. In 1869 the Princess de Latour d'Auvergne, learning that there was a Moslem tradition that this site was at a spot called el Battaniyeh south of the summit, here erected a beautiful church known as the Church of the Pater Noster and around the courtyard she had the Lord's Prayer inscribed in 32 languages. When the church was in course of erection certain fragments of old walls and mosaics were found, but, in 1911, as a result of a careful excavation of the site, the foundations of a more extensive mass of old buildings, with some beautiful mosaic in the baptistry, were revealed in the neighborhood; there is little doubt but that these foundations belonged to the actual Basilica of Helena. It is proposed to rebuild the church.  Mention has been made of the name Viri Galilaei or Galilee as given to the northern summit of the main mass of Olivet. The name "Mount Galilee" appears to have been first given to this hill early in the 4th century and in 1573 A.D. Rawolf explains the name by the statement that here was in ancient times a khan where the Galileans lodged who came up to Jerusalem. In 1620 Quaresmius applies the names "Galilee" and Viri Galilaei to this site and thinks the latter name may be due to its having been the spot where the two angels appeared and addressed the disciples as "Ye men of Galilee" ( Acts 1:11 ). Attempts have been made, without much success, to maintain that this "Galilee" was the spot which our Lord intended ( Matthew 28:10, 16 ) to indicate to His disciples as the place of meeting.  The Russian enclosure includes a chapel, a lofty tower-from which a magnificent view is obtainable-a hospice and a pleasant pine grove. Between the Russian buildings to the North and the Church of the Ascension lies the squalid village of et tur, inhabited by a peculiarly turbulent and rapacious crowd of Moslems, who prey upon the passing pilgrims and do much to spoil the sentiment of a visit to this sacred spot. It is possible it may be the original site of BETHPHAGE (which see).  LITERATURE.  PEF, Memoirs, "Jerusalem" volume; G. A. Smith, Jerusalem; Robinson, BRP, I, 1838; Stanley, Sinai and Palestine; Baedeker's Palestine and Syria (by Socin and Bensinger); Tobler, Die Siloahquelle und der Oelberg, 1852; Porter, Murray's Palestine and Syria; R. Hofmann, Galilaea auf dem Oelberg, Leipzig, 1896; Schick, "The Mount of Olives," PEFS, 1889, 174-84; Warren, article "Mount of Olives," in HDB; Gauthier, in EB, under the word; Vincent (Pere), "The Tombs of the Prophets," Revue Biblique, 1901.  E. W. G. Masterman
NAOMI|The lovable; my delight, the wife of Elimelech, and mother of Mahlon and Chilion, and mother-in-law of Ruth ( 1:2 ,  20,  21;  2:1 ). Elimelech and his wife left the district of Bethlehem-Judah, and found a new home in the uplands of Moab. In course of time he died, as also his two sons Mahlon and Chilion, who had married women of Moab, and three widows were left mourning the loss of their husbands. Naomi longs to return now to her own land, to Bethlehem. One of her widowed daughters-in-law, Ruth, accompanies her, and is at length married to Boaz (q.v.). 
SHAPHIR|     sha'-fer (shaphir, "glittering"; kalos; the King James Version Saphir): One of a group of towns mentioned in  Micah 1:10-15 . From the association with Gath, Achzib (of Judah) and Mareshah, it would seem that the places mentioned were in Southwestern Palestine. According to Eusebius, in Onomasticon, there was a Sapheir, "in the hill country" (from a confusion with Shamir ( Joshua 15:48 ), where Septuagint A has Sapheir) between Eleutheropolis and Ascalon. The name probably survives in that of three villages called es-Suafir, in the plain, some 3 1/2 miles Southeast of Ashdod (PEF, II, 413, Sh XV). Cheyne (EB, col. 4282) suggests the white "glittering" hill Tell ec-Cafi, at the entrance to the Wady ec-Sunt, which was known to the Crusaders as Blanchegarde, but this site seems a more probable one for GATH (which see).  E. W. G. Masterman
GOSHEN| (1.) A district in Egypt where Jacob and his family settled, and in which they remained till the Exodus ( Genesis 45:10 ;  46:28 ,  29,  31,  etc.). It is called "the land of Goshen" ( 47:27 ), and also simply "Goshen" ( 46:28 ), and "the land of Rameses" ( 47:11 ;  Exodus 12:37 ), for the towns Pithom and Rameses lay within its borders; also Zoan or Tanis ( Psalm 78:12 ). It lay on the east of the Nile, and apparently not far from the royal residence. It was "the best of the land" ( Genesis 47:6 ,  11), but is now a desert. It is first mentioned in Joseph's message to his father. It has been identified with the modern Wady Tumilat, lying between the eastern part of the Delta and the west border of Palestine. It was a pastoral district, where some of the king's cattle were kept ( Genesis 47:6 ). The inhabitants were not exclusively Israelites ( Exodus 3:22 ;  11:2 ;  12:35 ,  36). (2.) A district in Palestine ( Joshua 10:41 ;  11:16 ). It was a part of the maritime plain of Judah, and lay between Gaza and Gibeon. (3.) A town in the mountains of Judah ( Joshua 15:51 ). 
TARALAH|     tar'-a-la (tar'alah; Codex Vaticanus Thareela; Codex Alexandrinus Tharala): A town in the territory of Benjamin named between Irpeel and Zelah ( Joshua 18:27 ). Eusebius, Onomasticon (s.v. "Therama") simply says it was in the tribe of Benjamin. In the times of Eusebius and Jerome, therefore, the site was already lost, and has not since been covered.
SUPHAH|( Numbers 21:14 ,  marg.; also R.V.), a place at the south-eastern corner of the Dead Sea, the Ghor es-Safieh. This name is found in an ode quoted from the "Book of the Wars of the Lord," probably a collection of odes commemorating the triumphs of God's people (Comp.  21:14 ,  17,  18,  27-30). 
ZUPH|Honeycomb, a Kohathite Levite, ancestor of Elkanah and Samuel ( 1 Samuel 1:1 ); called also Zophai ( 1 Chronicles 6:26 ).  Zuph, Land of ( 1 Samuel 9:5 ,  6), a district in which lay Samuel's city, Ramah. It was probably so named after Elkanah's son, Zuph ( 1 Chronicles 6:26 ,  marg.). 
RAMATHITE|The designation given to Shimei, the manager of David's vineyard ( 1 Chronicles 27:27 ). 
JUTTAH|Extended, a Levitical city in the mountains or hill-country of Judah ( Joshua 15:55 ;  21:16 ). Its modern name is Yutta, a place about 5 1/2 miles south of Hebron. It is supposed to have been the residence of Zacharias and Elisabeth, and the birthplace of John the Baptist, and on this account is annually visited by thousands of pilgrims belonging to the Greek Church ( Luke 1:39 ). (see  MARY .) 
GEDER|A walled place, ( Joshua 12:13 ), perhaps the same as Gederah or Gedor ( 15:58 ). 
GENUBATH|Theft, the son of Hadad, of the Edomitish royal family. He was brought up in Pharaoh's household. His mother was a sister of Tahpenes, the king of Egypt's wife, mentioned in  1 Kings 11:20 . 
RISSAH|Heap of ruins; dew, a station of the Israelites in the wilderness ( Numbers 33:21 ,  22). 
COOS|(written Cos in the R.V.), a small island, one of the Sporades in the Aegean Sea, in the north-west of Rhodes, off the coast of Caria. Paul on his return from his third missionary journey, passed the night here after sailing from Miletus ( Acts 21:1 ). It is now called Stanchio. 
MEPHAATH|Splendour, a Levitical city ( Joshua 21:37 ) of the tribe of Reuben ( 13:18 ). 
BALAK|Empty; spoiler, a son of Zippor, and king of the Moabites ( Numbers 22:2 ,  4). From fear of the Israelites, who were encamped near the confines of his territory, he applied to Balaam (q.v.) to curse them; but in vain ( Joshua 24:9 ). 
ESHEK|     e'-shek (`esheq, "oppressor"):  A descendant of Jonathan, son of Saul, first king of Israel ( 1 Chronicles 8:39 ).
LIPS|   CALVES, OF THE   kavz, (Septuagint: karpon cheileon): This is the King James Version rendering of a dubious Hebrew text in  Hosea 14:2  (parim sephathenu). The Revised Version (British and American) runs "So will we render as bullocks the offering of our lips." Strange as the text is, it may be retained, and it admits of at least a possible explanation. The prophet calls on his contemporaries to return in penitence to Yahweh. Their worship should consist not of meaningless dumb ritual, but of "words"-hymns and prayers, expressive of real gratitude and of actual needs-or perhaps pledges of repentance and reform. The people respond and undertake that their worship shall consist of "calves or bullocks of lips," i.e. not of animal offerings, but of promises of reform or vows of obedience. But this explanation is forced and most modern commentators follow the Septuagint, which presupposes a slightly different Hebrew text, and renders peri sephathenu, "fruit of our lips," i.e. adoring gratitude or, as the author of the Epistle to the He, who quotes this verse from the Septuagint, explains it, "sacrifice of praise" ( Hebrews 13:15 ). The same phrase occurs in  Isaiah 57:19 , where it signifies gladsome gratitude.  T. Lewis
SUCATHITES|     su'kath-its (sukhathim; Codex Vaticanus Sochathieim; Codex Alexandrinus Sokathieim; the King James Version Suchathites): These are named only once ( 1 Chronicles 2:55 ), a family of scribes living at Jabez.
SHILOAH|The waters of Shiloah
RAAMA|     ra'-a-ma (ra`ma'): Thus spelled only in  1 Chronicles 1:9 ; elsewhere "Raamah" (ra`mah). A son of Cush and father of Sheba and Dedan ( Genesis 10:7  =  1 Chronicles 1:9 ). In Ezekiel's lament over Tyre ( Ezekiel 27:22 ) the tribe of Raamah is mentioned along with Sheba as a mercantile people who provided the inhabitants of Tyre with spices, precious stones and gold. It has generally been identified with Regina, mentioned by Ptolemy and Steph. Byzantr. as a city in Southeastern Arabia on the shores of the Persian Gulf. The Septuagint (Rhegma) itself supposes this site. But the Arabic name of the city here indicated is spelled with a "g" and so gives rise to a phonological difficulty. A more probable identification has been found in the Sabean ra`mah in Southwestern Arabia near Me`in in the north of Marib. Me`in was the capital of the old Minaean kingdom.  A. S. Fulton
MIGDALEL|Tower of God, a fortified city of Naphtali ( Joshua 19:38 ), supposed by some to be identical with Magdala (q.v.). 
JUDGMENTS|Judgments of God (1.) The secret decisions of God's will ( Psalm 110:5 ;  36:6 ).  (2.) The revelations of his will ( Exodus 21:1 ;  Deuteronomy 6:20 ;  Psalm 119:7 -175).  (3.) The infliction of punishment on the wicked ( Exodus 6:6 ;  12:12 ;  Ezek. 25:11 ;  Revelation 16:7 ), such as is mentioned in  Genesis 7 ;  19:24 ,25;  Judges 1:6 ,7;  Acts 5:1 -10, etc. 
MILCOM|     mil'-kom, mil'-kom. See  MOLECH .
WORSHIPPER|(Gr. neocoros = temple-sweeper ( Acts 19:35 ) of the great goddess Diana). This name neocoros appears on most of the extant Ephesian coins 
RACAL|     ra'-kal (rakhal, "trader"): A place in Judah, enumerated among "the places where David himself and his men were wont to haunt," to the elders of which he sent a share of his spoils ( 1 Samuel 30:29 ). The Septuagint reading "Carmel" has been adopted, by many, because of the similarity of the words in Hebrew (rakal and karmel) and because there was a Carmel in the neighborhood of Hebron ( Joshua 15:55   1 Samuel 15:12 ), which figures in the story of David's adventures when pursued by Saul ( 1 Samuel 25 ) in a manner that makes it improbable that he would overlook the place in his good fortune (the King James Version "Rachal").  Nathan Isaacs
MALCAM|( 2 Samuel 12:30 ,  Hebrews,  R.V.,  "their king;"  Jeremiah 49:1 ,  3,  R.V.;  Zephaniah 1:5 ), the national idol of the Ammonites. When Rabbah was taken by David, the crown of this idol was among the spoils. The weight is said to have been "a talent of gold" (above 100 lbs.). The expression probably denotes its value rather than its weight. It was adorned with precious stones. 
GOZAN|A region in Central Asia to which the Israelites were carried away captive ( 2 Kings 17:6 ;  1 Chronicles 5:26 ;  2 Kings 19:12 ;  Isaiah 37:12 ). It was situated in Mesopotamia, on the river Habor ( 2 Kings 17:6 ;  18:11 ), the Khabur, a tributary of the Euphrates. The "river of Gozan" ( 1 Chronicles 5:26 ) is probably the upper part of the river flowing through the province of Gozan, now Kizzel-Ozan. 
SHILSHAH|     shil'-sha shilshah; Codex Vaticanus and Codex Alexandrinus Saleisa; Lucian, Selemsan): An Asherite ( 1 Chronicles 7:37 ).
HARADAH|Fright; fear, the twenty-fifth station of the Israelites in their wanderings ( Numbers 33:24 ). 
GIMEL|     ge'-mel, gim'-el ("g"): The 3rd letter of the Hebrew alphabet, and used as such to designate the 3rd part of  Psalm 119 ; transliterated in this Encyclopedia with the dagesh as "g", and without the dagesh as "gh" (aspirated "g"). It came also to be used for the number three (3), and with the dieresis for 3,000. For name, etc., see ALPHABET.
TABRIMON|Good is Rimmon, the father of Benhadad, king of Syria ( 1 Kings 15:18 ). 
IMAGES|     im'-aj-iz (tselem; eikon):  1. Definition  2. Origin  3. Historical Beginnings and Early Developments  4. Bible References and Palestinian Customs  5. Most Important Technical Terms  (1) Matstsebhah ("pillar")  (2) 'Asherah ("grove")  (3) Chamman ("sun-image")  6. Obscure Bible References  (1) Golden Calf  Jeroboam's Calves  (2) Brazen Serpent  (3) Teraphim  (4) Image of Jealousy  (5) Chambers of Imagery  (6) 'Ephod  LITERATURE  1. Definition:  Images, as used here, are visible representations of supposedly supernatural or divine beings or powers. They may be  (1) themselves objects of worship,  (2) pictures, embodiments or dwelling-places (temple, ark, pillar, priests) of deities worshipped,  (3) empowered instruments (amulets, charms, etc.) of object or objects worshipped,  (4) pictures or symbols of deities reverenced though not worshipped.  These images may be shapeless blocks, or symmetrically carved figures, or objects of Nature, such as animals, sun, moon, stars, etc. These visible objects may sometimes be considered, especially by the uninstructed, as deities, while by others in the small community they are thought of as instruments or symbolizations of deity. Even when they are thought of as deities, this does not exclude a sense and apprehension of a spiritual godhead, since visible corporeal beings may have invisible souls and spiritual attributes, and even the stars may be thought of as "seats of celestial spirits." An idol is usually considered as either the deity itself or his permanent tenement; a fetish is an object which has been given a magical or divine power, either because of its having been the temporary home of the deity, or because it has been formed or handled or otherwise spiritually influenced by such deity. The idol is generally communal, the fetish private; the idol is protective, the fetish is usually not for the common good. (See Jevons, Idea of Cod in Early Religions, 1910.) Relics and symbolic figures do not become "images" in the objectionable sense until reverence changes to worship. Until comparatively recent times, the Hebrews seem to have offered no religious objection to "artistic" images, as is proved not only from the description of Solomon's temple, but also from the discoveries of the highly decorated temple of Yahweh at Syene dating from the 6th century B.C., and from ruins of synagogues dating from the pre-Christian and early Christian periods (PEF, January, 1908; The Expositor, December, 1907; Expository Times, January and February, 1908). The Second Commandment was not an attack upon artists and sculptors but upon idolaters. Decoration by means of graven figures was not in ancient times condemned, though, as Josephus shows, by the time of the Seleucids all plastic art was regarded with suspicion. The brazen serpent was probably destroyed in Hezekiah's time because it had ceased to be an ancient artistic relic and had become an object of worship (see below). So the destruction of the ark and altar and temple, which for so long a time had been the means of holy worship, became at last a prophetic hope ( Isaiah 6:7   Jeremiah 3:6   Amos 5:25   Hosea 6:6 ; compare  Zechariah 14:20 ). While the temple is not naturally thought of as an "image," it was as truly so as any Bethel. An idol was the temple in miniature-a dwelling-place of the god. When an image became the object of worship or a means by which a false god was worshipped, it became antagonistic to the First and Second Commandments respectively.  2. Origin:  The learned author of the article on "Image Worship" in the Encyclopedia Biblica (11th edition) disposes too easily of this question when he suggests that image-worship is "a continuance by adults of their childish games with dolls.. Idolatrous cults repose largely on make-believe."  Compare the similar statement made from a very different standpoint by the author of Great Is Diana of the Ephesians, or the Original of Idolatry (1695): "All Superstitions are to the People but like several sports to children, which varying in their several seasons yield them pretty entertainment," etc.  No universal institution or custom is founded wholly on superstition. If it does not answer to some real human need, and "if its foundations are not laid broad and deep in the nature of things, it must perish" (J.G. Fraser, Psyche's Task, 1909, 103; compare Salomon Reinach, Revue des etudes grecques, 1906, 324). Image-worship is too widespread and too natural to humanity, as is proved in modern centuries as well as in the cruder earlier times, to have its basis and source in any mere external and accidental circumstances. All modern research tends to corroborate our belief that this is psychological rather than ecclesiastical in its origin. It is not imposed externally; it comes from within, and naturally accompanies the organic unfoldment of the human animal in his struggle toward self-expression. This is now generally acknowledged to be true of religious feeling and instinct (see especially Rudolf Eueken, Christianity and the New Idealism, 1909, chapter i; I. King, The Development of Religion, 1910); it ought to be counted equally true of religious expression. Neither can the origin of image-worship or even of magical rites be fully explained, as Fraser thinks, by the ordinary laws of association. These associations only become significant because the devoted worshipper already has a body of beliefs and generalizations which make him attentive to the associations which seem to him religiously or magically important. (Jastrow, Aspects of Rel. Belief and Practice in Babylonia and Assyria; compare James H. Leuba, Psychological Origin and Nature of Religion, 1909; Study of Religions, 1911). So animism must be regarded as a philosophy rather than as an original religious faith, since it is based on an "explanation of phenomena rather than an attitude of mind toward the cause of these phenomena" (EB, 11th edition, article "Animism," and compare Hoffding, Philosophy of Religion, 1906, 138). In whatever ways the various image-worshipping cults arose historically-whether from a primitive demonology or from the apotheosis of natural objects, or from symbolism, or a false connection of cause with effect-in any case it had some human need behind it and human nature beneath it. The presence of the image testifies to faith in the supernatural being represented by the image and to a desire to keep the object of worship near. Prayer is easier when the worshipper can see his god or some sacred thing the god has honored (compare M. L'abbe E. Van Drival, De l'origine et des sources de l'idolatrie, Paris, 1860).  3. Historical Beginnings and Early Development:  The first man was not born with a totem-pole in his fist, nor did the earliest historic men possess images. They lacked temples and altars and ephods and idols, as they lacked the fire-stick and potter's wheel. Religion, which showed itself so strong in the next stage of human life, must have had very firm beginnings in the prehistoric period; but what were its external expressions we do not yet certainly know, except in the methods of burying and caring for the dead. It seems probable that primitive historic man saw in everything that moved an active soul, and that he saw in every extraordinary thing in earth or heaven the expression of a supernatural power. Yet reflective thinking began earlier than Tylor and all the older scientific anthropologists supposed. Those earlier investigators were without extended chronological data, and although ingenuity was exercised in systematizing the beliefs and customs of modern savages, it was necessarily impossible always to determine in this way which were the most primitive cults. Excavations in Babylonia, Egypt and elsewhere have enabled us for the first time to trace with some chronological certainty the religious expressions of earliest historic man. That primitive man was so stupid that he could not tell the difference between men and things, and that therefore totemism or fetishism or a low form of animism was necessarily the first expression of religious thought is a theory which can no longer be held very buoyantly in the face of the new and striking knowledge, material and religious, which is now seen to be incorporated in some of the most ancient myths of mankind. (See e.g. Winekler, Die jungsten Kampfe wider den Panbabylonismus, 1907; Jeremias, The Old Testament in the Light of the Ancient East, 2 volumes, 1911.) The pan-Bab theory, which makes so much use of these texts, is not certain, but the facts upon which theory depends are clear. It is a suggestive fact that among the earliest known deities or symbols of deities mentioned in the most ancient inscriptions are to be found the sun, moon, stars and other great forces of Nature. Out of these conceptions and the mystery of life-which seems to have affected early mankind even more powerfully than ourselves-sprang the earliest known religious language, the myth, which antedated by eons our oldest written texts, since some of these myths appear fully formed in the oldest texts. Rough figures of these solar and stellar deities are found from very early times in Babylonia. So in the earliest Egyptian texts the sun appears as divine and the moon as "the bull among the stars," and rough figures of the gods were carved in human or animal form, or these are represented pictorially by diadems or horns or ostrich feathers, as far back as the IInd Dynasty, while even earlier than this stakes and pillars and heaps of stones are sacred. (See further, HDB, 5th vol, 176; Erman, A Handbook of Egyptian Rel.; Steindorf, Rel. of the Ancient Egyptians, 1905.) These rude and unshaped objects do not testify, as was once supposed, to a lower form of religious development than when sculptured images are found. The shapeless fetish, which not long ago was generally accepted as the earliest form of image, really represents a more advanced stage and higher form of religious expression than the worship of a beautifully or horribly carved image. It has been generally conceded since the days of Robertson Smith that it takes at least as much imagination and reflection to see an expression of deity in imageless matter as in the carved forms. Rude objects untouched by human hand, even in the most highly developed worships, have been most prized. The earliest images were probably natural objects which, because of their peculiar shapes or functions, were thought of either as divine or as made sacred by the touch of deity. Multiplied copies of these objects would naturally be made when worshippers increased or migrations occurred. While images may have been used in the most early cults, yet the highest development of image-worship has occurred among the most civilized peoples. Both deities and idols are less numerous in the early than in the later days of a religion. This is true in India, Assyria, Babylonia, and Egypt, as all experts now agree. Idols are not found among uncivilized peoples, such as the Bushmen, Fuegians, Eskimos, etc. (See e.g. Allen Menzies, History of Rel., 1895.) Images of the gods presuppose a power of discrimination that could only be the result of reflection. The earliest idols known among the Semites were rude stone pillars or unshapen blocks. These, as the fetish, were probably adored, not for themselves, but for the spirit that was supposed to be in them or to have touched them. Deities and idols are multiplied easily, not only by philological, geographical and social causes, but through intertribal and international associations. One thing absolutely proved by recent excavations has been the extent to which the representations of local deities have been modified by the symbolic art of surrounding nations. Babylonia, for example, was influenced by the Syro-Hittite religious art at least as much as by that of Egypt (William Hayes Ward, Cylinders and Other Ancient Oriental Seals, 1909; Clay, Amurru, 1910). Even in adjacent localities the same deity varied greatly in its pictorial representation. See PALESTINE EXPLORATION, and Revue biblique, XIV, 315-48. With the possible exception of one reign in Egypt, during which Ikhnaton refused to allow any deities to be worshipped except the sun discovered and himself, idolatry outside of the Hebrew kingdom was never made a crime against the state until the days of Constantine. Theodosius (392 A.D.) not only placed sacrifices and divination among the capital crimes, but placed a penalty upon anyone who entered a heathen temple.  4. Bible References and Palestinian Customs:  The dignity of the image in common thought in Bible times may be seen from the fact that man is said to have been made in God's image (tselem; compare  1 Samuel 6:5   Numbers 33:52 ), and Christ is said to be "the image of the invisible God" (eikon; compare  Colossians 1:15  with  Romans 1:23 ). The heathen thought of the sun and stars and idols as being images of the gods, but the Hebrews, though Yahweh's temple was imageless, thought of normal humanity as in some true sense possessing a sacred resemblance to Deity, though early Christians taught that only Christ was the Father s "image" in unique and absolute perfection. See  IMAGE . The ordinary words for "image" by a slight change came to mean vermin, carrion, false gods, no gods, carcasses, dung, etc. Heathen gods were undoubtedly accounted real beings by the early Hebrews, and the images of these enemies of Yahweh were doubtless looked upon as possessing an evil associated (?) power. In the earlier Old Testament era, images, idols, and false gods are synonymous; but as early as the 8th century B.C. Hebrew prophets begin to reach the lofty conception that heathen gods are non-existent, or at least practically so, when compared with the ever-living Yahweh, while the idols are "worthless things" or "non-entities" ( Isaiah 2:8, 18, 20 ;  Isaiah 10:10, 11 ; 19:01; 31:07:00; compare  Jeremiah 14:14   Ezekiel 30:13 ; note the satiric term 'elilim, as contrasted with the powerful 'elohim). The many ordinary terms used by the Hebrews for an idol or image mean "copy," simulacrum, "likeness," "representation." These are often, however, so compounded as technically to express a particular form, as "graven" or "carved" image (e.g.  Exodus 20:4   2 Chronicles 33:7 ) of wood or stone, i.e. one cut into shape by a tool; "molten image" (e.g.  Exodus 32:4   Leviticus 19:4 ), i.e. one cast out of melted metal (standing image) ( Leviticus 26:1  the King James Version, and see below), etc. However, a few of the Old Testament terms and modes of worship are unusual, or have a more difficult technical meaning, or have been given a new interest by new discoveries, and such deserve a more extended notice.  5. Most Important Technical Terms:  (1) Matstsebhah ("pillar"):  matstsebhah: These were upright stone pillars, often mentioned in the Old Testament, sometimes as abodes (Bethels) or symbols of deity-especially as used by the heathen-but also as votive offerings, memorial and grave stones ( Genesis 28:18 ;  Genesis 31:45 ;  Genesis 35:14, 20   Joshua 24:26   1 Samuel 7:12 ). The reverence for these stones is closely connected with that found among all Semitic peoples for obelisks ( Genesis 33:20 ;  Genesis 35:7 ), cairns ( Genesis 28:18   Joshua 4:6 ), and circles ( Joshua 4:3, 5, 20 ). Rough stone pillars from time immemorial were used in Semitic worship (Kittel, Hist of the Hebrews, II, 84). They were thought of primitively as dwelling-places of deity, and the stones and the spots where they stood were therefore accounted sacred. From very early times the mystery of life pressed itself upon human attention, and these stones were viewed as phallic images. These images were at first rough and undifferentiated, but became later well defined as male organs. At Tell Zakariyah the end of one is sculptured to represent a human face. Some sort of phallicism underlies all early Semitic religion, the form of which is determined by the attention paid to the date palm, to the breeding of flocks, to astrology, and to social life. This phallicism did not always represent coarse thought, but sometimes a very profound spiritual conception; compare GOLDEN CALF, and note Wiedemann's statement, in HDB, V, 180 that in Egypt the gods Hu, "Taste," and Sa, "Perception," were created from the blood of the sun-god's phallus. These images of fertility and reproduction were naturally connected in Canaan with the worship of the Baals or "lords" of each locality, upon whose favor as possessor of the land fertility depended. They were also naturally associated with the cult of Astarte, the female counterpart of all the Baals (see ASTARTE). In the Old Testament the Baalim and Asherim are almost invariably classed together, although the latter were wooden posts dedicated to a particular goddess, while "Baal" was merely a title which could be given to any male Semitic deity, and sometimes even to his female associate. The matstsebhoth were set up in a "high place" (which see), attracting reverence because of its "elevation, isolation and mystery" (Vincent). Originally these pillars were not considered as idols, but were naturally erected to Yahweh ( Genesis 28:18 ;  Genesis 31:45 ;  Genesis 35:14   Exodus 24:4 ), and even Isaiah (19:19) and Hosea (3:4) approve them, though pillars dedicated to idols must of course be destroyed ( Exodus 23:24 ;  Exodus 34:13   Jeremiah 43:13   Ezekiel 26:11 ). Only in late times or by very far-sighted law-givers were the matstsebhoth erected to Yahweh condemned; but after the centralization of the Yahweh-worship in Jerusalem, these pillars were condemned, even when set up in the name of Yahweh, and the older places of worship with their indiscriminate rituals and necessary heathen affiliations were also wisely discarded ( Leviticus 26:1   Deuteronomy 16:22 ; see also GOLDEN CALF  Jeremiah 7:18 ;  Jeremiah 44:17, 19 ; but see).  (2) 'Asherah ("grove"):  'asherah: Perhaps a goddess (see ASHERAH), but as ordinarily used in the Old Testament, a sacred tree or stump of a tree planted in the earth ( Deuteronomy 16:21 ) or a pole made of wood and set up near the altar ( Judges 6:26   1 Kings 16:33   Isaiah 17:8 ).  It has been supposed that these were primarily symbols of a goddess Asherah or Ashtoreth (Kuenen, Baethgen), and they were certainly in primitive thought connected with the tree cult and the sacred groves so universally honored by the Semites (see especially W.R. Smith, Religion of the Semites, 169, 437; Stade, Geschichte, 160; Fraser, Golden Bough, II, 56-117; John O'Neill, Night of the Gods, II, 57); but the tree of life is closely connected in texts and pictures with the human organ of generation, and there can be no doubt that there is a phallic meaning connected with this sacred stake or pole, as with the matstsebhoth described above. See references in HDB under "Asherah," and compare Transactions of the Victoria Institute, XXXIX, 234; Winckler, Keilinschriftliches Textbuch zum AT. As these wooden posts from earliest times represented the ideas of fertility and were connected with the mystery of life, they naturally became the signs and symbols in many lands of the local gods and goddesses of fertility.  Astarte was by far the most popular deity of ancient Palestine. See  ASHTORETH . The figures of Astarte from the 12th to the 9th century B.C., as found at Gezer, have large hips, disclosing an exaggerated idea of fecundity. In close connection with the Astarte sanctuaries in Palestine were found numberless bodies of little children, none over a week old, undoubtedly representing the sacrifice of the firstborn by these Canaanites (R.A.S. Macalister, Excavation of Gezer, 3 vols). These Asherim were erected at the most sacred Hebrew sanctuaries, at Samaria ( 2 Kings 13:6 ), Bethel ( 2 Kings 23:15 ), and even in the Temple of Jerusalem ( 2 Kings 23:6 ). The crowning act of King Josiah's reformation was to break down these images ( 2 Kings 23:14 ). As the astrological symbol of Baal was the sun, Astarte is often thought of as the moon-goddess, but her symbol was really Venus. She was, however, sometimes called "Queen of Heaven" ( Jeremiah 7:18 ;  Jeremiah 44:17, 19 ; but see Zeitschrift fur alttestamentliche Wissenschaft, VI, 123-30).  (3) Chamman ("sun-image"):  chamman, the King James Version "images," "idols"; the Revised Version (British and American) "sun-images" ( Leviticus 26:30   2 Chronicles 14:5 ;  2 Chronicles 34:4, 7   Isaiah 17:8 ;  Isaiah 27:9   Ezekiel 6:4, 6 ): This worship may originally have come from Babylonia, but the reverence of the sun under the name Baal-hamman had long been common in Palestine before Joshua and the Israelites entered the country. These sun-images were probably obelisks or pillars connected with the worship of some local Baal. The chariot and horses of the sun, mentioned ( 2 Kings 23:11 ) as having an honored place at the western entrance of the Jerusalem Temple, represented not a local but a foreign cult. In Babylonian temples, sacrifices were made to the sun-chariot, which seems to have had a special significance in time of war (Pinches, HDB, IV, 629; see also CHARIOTS OF THE SUN).  6. Obscure Bible References:  (1) Golden Calf and Jeroboam's Calves:  See  GOLDEN CALF .  (2) Brazen Serpent:  Brazen Serpent ( Numbers 21:4-9   2 Kings 4 ).-The serpent, because of its strange, lightning-like power of poisonous attack, its power to shed its skin, and to paralyze its prey, has been the most universally revered of all creatures. Living serpents were kept in Babylonian temples. So the cobra was the guardian of royalty in Egypt, symbolizing the kingly power of life and death. In mythology, the serpent was not always considered a bad demon, enemy of the Creator, but often appears as the emblem of wisdom, especially in connection with health-giving and life-giving gods, such as Ea, savior of mankind from the flood, and special "god of the physicians" in Babylon; Thoth, the god of wisdom in Egypt, who healed the eye of Horus and brought Osiris to life again; Apollo, the embodiment of physical perfection, and his son, Aeseulapius, most famous giver of physical and moral health and curer of disease among the Greeks. Among the Hebrews also a seal (1500-1000 B.C.) shows a worshipper before a horned serpent raised on a pole (Wm. Hayes Ward). In Phoenician mythology the serpent is also connected with wisdom and long life, and it is found on the oldest Hebrew seals and on late Jewish talismans (Revue biblique internationale, July, 1908, 382-94); at Gezer, in Palestine, a small "brazen serpent" (a cobra) was found in the "cave of oracles," and in early Christian art Jesus the Lord of Life is often represented standing triumphantly upon the serpent or holding it in His fist. In the Hebrew narrative found in  Numbers 21 , the serpent evidently appears as a well-known symbol representing the Divine ability to cure disease, being erected before the eyes of the Israelites to encourage faith and stop the plague. It was not a totem, for the totem belongs to a single family and is never set up for the veneration of other families (Ramsay, Cities of Paul, 39). Hezekiah destroyed it because it was receiving idolatrous worship ( 2 Kings 18:4 ), though there is no hint that such worship was ever a part of the official temple cult (Benzinger); for if this had been done, the earlier prophets could hardly have remained silent. The above explanation seems preferable to the one formerly offered that the serpent was merely a copy of the disease-bearer, as the images offered by the Philistines were copies of the ulcers that plagued them ( 1 Samuel 6:4 ).  See further NEHUSHTAN.  (3) Teraphim:  Teraphim (teraphim).-These are usually considered household gods, but this does not necessarily include the idea that they were images of ancestors, though this is not improbable (Nowack, Hebrew Archaeology, II, 23; HDB, II, 190); that they were images of Yahweh is a baseless supposition (see Kautzsch, HDB, V, 643). Sometimes they appear in the house ( 1 Samuel 19:13, 16 ); sometimes in sanctuaries ( Judges 17:5 ;  Judges 18:14 ); sometimes as carried by travelers and armies ( Genesis 31:30   Ezekiel 21:21 ). They are never directly spoken of as objects of worship (yet compare  Genesis 31:30 ), but are mentioned in connection with wizardry ( 2 Kings 23:24 ), and as a means of divination ( Ezekiel 21:21   Zechariah 10:2 ), perhaps not necessarily inconsistent with Yahweh-worship ( Hosea 3:4 ). They were sometimes small and could be easily hidden ( Genesis 31:34 ); at other times larger and in some way resembling a human being ( 1 Samuel 19:13 ). Jewish commentators thought the teraphim were in early times mummified human heads which were represented in later centuries by rude images (Moore, Crit. and Exeg. Commentary on Judges, 1895, 382; see especially Chwolsohn, Die Ssabier u. der Ssabismus, II, 19, 150). Customs of divination by means of such heads were not unknown. In Israel the teraphim were sometimes certainly used in consulting Yahweh ( Judges 17:5 ;  Judges 18:14 ), though their use was later officially condemned ( 2 Kings 23:24 ). The teraphim in the home doubtless correspond in use to the EPHOD (which see) in the sanctuary, and therefore these are frequently connected. Certain small rude images have lately been uncovered in Palestine by Bliss, at Tell el-Hesy, and by Sellin, at Tell Ta`annuk, which are supposed to be teraphim.  (4) Image of Jealousy:  Image of jealousy (cemel).-It is not certain what this statue was which was set up by the door of the inner gate of the Jerusalem temple ( Ezekiel 8:3 ). It was no doubt some idol, perhaps the image of the Asherah ( 2 Kings 21:7 ;  2 Kings 23:6 ), which certainly. had previously been set up in the temple and may have been there again in this day of apostasy. "Jealousy" is not the name of the idol, but it was probably called "image of jealousy" because in a peculiar manner this particular image seems to have been drawing the people from the worship of Yahweh and therefore provoking Him to jealousy.  (5) Chambers of Imagery:  Chambers of imagery (chadhre maskitho).-Does Ezekiel mean that in his heart every man in his chambers of imagery was an idol-worshipper, or does this refer to actual wall decorations in the Jerusalem Temple ( Ezekiel 8:11, 12 )? Most expositors take it literally. W.R. Smith has been followed almost if not quite universally in his supposition that a debased form of vermin-worship is described in the "creeping things and abominable beasts" ( Ezekiel 8:10 ). But while this low and ignorant worship was an ancient cult, it had been banished for centuries from respectable heathen worship, and it seems inconceivable that these Israelites who were of the highest class could have fallen to these depths, or if they had done so that the Tammuz and sun-worship should have been considered so much worse ( Ezekiel 8:13, 14 ). To the writer it seems more probable that the references are to Egyptian or Greek mysteries which would be described by a Hebrew just as Ezekiel describes this secret chamber. It is now known that the Greek mysteries experienced a revival at exactly this era, and it was probably this revival which was making itself felt in Jerusalem, for Greek influence was at this time greatly affecting Palestine (see Duruy, Hist of Greece, II, 126-80, 374; Cobern, Commentary on Ezekiel and Daniel, 80-83, 280-82; and separate articles, CHAMBERS OF IMAGERY; IMAGERY).  (6) Ephod:  Ephod ('ephodh).-There is no doubt that this was the name of a vestment or ritual loin cloth of linen worn by common priests and temple servants and on special occasions by the king ( 1 Samuel 2:18 ;  1 Samuel 22:18   2 Samuel 6:14 ). The ephod of the high priest was an ornamental waist coat on the front of which was fastened the holy breastplate containing the pocket in which were the Urim and Thummim ( Exodus 28:6, 30 ;  Read Complete Article...  
JABESHGILEAD|A town on the east of Jordan, on the top of one of the green hills of Gilead, within the limits of the half tribe of Manasseh, and in full view of Beth-shan. It is first mentioned in connection with the vengeance taken on its inhabitants because they had refused to come up to Mizpeh to take part with Israel against the tribe of Benjamin ( Judges 21:8 -14). After the battles at Gibeah, that tribe was almost extinguished, only six hundred men remaining. An expedition went against Jabesh-Gilead, the whole of whose inhabitants were put to the sword, except four hundred maidens, whom they brought as prisoners and sent to "proclaim peace" to the Benjamites who had fled to the crag Rimmon. These captives were given to them as wives, that the tribe might be saved from extinction ( Judges 21 ). This city was afterwards taken by Nahash, king of the Ammonites, but was delivered by Saul, the newly-elected king of Israel. In gratitude for this deliverance, forty years after this, the men of Jabesh-Gilead took down the bodies of Saul and of his three sons from the walls of Beth-shan, and after burning them, buried the bones under a tree near the city ( 1 Samuel 31:11 -13). David thanked them for this act of piety ( 2 Samuel 2:4 -6), and afterwards transferred the remains to the royal sepulchre ( 21:14 ). It is identified with the ruins of ed-Deir, about 6 miles south of Pella, on the north of the Wady Yabis. 
ENMISHPAT|   EN-MISHPAT  en-mish'-pat.  See  KADESH .
RAMATHAIMZOPHIM|The two heights of the Zophites or of the watchers (only in  1 Samuel 1:1 ), "in the land of Zuph" ( 9:5 ). Ramathaim is another name for Ramah (4). One of the Levitical families descended from Kohath, that of Zuph or Zophai ( 1 Chronicles 6:26 ,  35), had a district assigned to them in Ephraim, which from this circumstance was called "the land of Zuph," and hence the name of the town, "Zophim." It was the birth-place of Samuel and the seat of his authority ( 1 Samuel 2:11 ;  7:17 ). It is frequently mentioned in the history of that prophet and of David ( 15:34 ;  16:13 ;  19:18 -23). Here Samuel died and was buried ( 25:1 ). This town has been identified with the modern Neby Samwil ("the prophet Samuel"), about 4 or 5 miles north-west of Jerusalem. But there is no certainty as to its precise locality. Some have supposed that it may be identical with Arimathea of the New Testament. (see  MIZPAH ). 
GESHEM|Or Gashmu, firmness, probably chief of the Arabs south of Palestine, one of the enemies of the Jews after the return from Babylon ( Nehemiah 2:19 ;  6:1 ,  2). He united with Sanballat and Tobiah in opposing the rebuilding of the wall of Jerusalem. 
BETHER|Dissection or separation, certain mountains mentioned in Cant. 2:17; probably near Lebanon. 
WAGGON|   WAGON,   wag'-un.  See  CART .
TRAVELLER|     trav'-el-er:  Judges 5:6  for halakh nethibhah, "goers on paths";  2 Samuel 12:4  for helekh, literally, "a going";  Job 31:32  for 'arach, participle of a verb meaning "to wander"; Sirach 26:12; 42:3 for hodoiporos, "one making a way."  See  WAYFARING MAN .
SHEBAM|     she'-bam.  See  SEBAM .
PISPA|     pis'-pa (picpa', "dipersion," the King James Version Pispah): A son of Jether, an Asherite ( 1 Chronicles 7:38 ).
LEWDNESS|( Acts 18:14 ), villany or wickedness, not lewdness in the modern sense of the word. The word "lewd" is from the Saxon, and means properly "ignorant," "unlearned," and hence low, vicious ( Acts 17:5 ). 
CHESED|Gain, the son of Nahor ( Genesis 22:22 ). 
RINNAH|     rin'-a (rinnah, "praise to God"; Septuagint: Codex Vaticanus Ana; Codex Alexandrinus Rhannon): A Judahite, according to Massoretic Text a son of Shimon ( 1 Chronicles 4:20 ). But the Septuagint makes him a son of Hanan (Codex Vaticanus Phana; Codex Alexandrinus Anan) by reading "ben" in the next name (Ben-hanan) as "son of."
OREN|Ash or pine, the son of Jerahmeel ( 1 Chronicles 2:25 ). 
NABOTH|Fruits, "the Jezreelite," was the owner of a portion of ground on the eastern slope of the hill of Jezreel ( 2 Kings 9:25 ,  26). This small "plat of ground" seems to have been all he possessed. It was a vineyard, and lay "hard by the palace of Ahab" ( 1 Kings 21:1 ,  2), who greatly coveted it. Naboth, however, refused on any terms to part with it to the king. He had inherited it from his fathers, and no Israelite could lawfully sell his property ( Leviticus 25:23 ). Jezebel, Ahab's wife, was grievously offended at Naboth's refusal to part with his vineyard. By a crafty and cruel plot she compassed his death. His sons also shared his fate ( 2 Kings 9:26 ;  1 Kings 21:19 ). She then came to Ahab and said, "Arise, take possession of the vineyard; for Naboth is not alive, but dead." Ahab arose and went forth into the garden which had so treacherously and cruelly been acquired, seemingly enjoying his new possession, when, lo, Elijah suddenly appeared before him and pronounced against him a fearful doom ( 1 Kings 21:17 -24). Jehu and Bidcar were with Ahab at this time, and so deeply were the words of Elijah imprinted on Jehu's memory that many years afterwards he refers to them ( 2 Kings 9:26 ), and he was the chief instrument in inflicting this sentence on Ahab and Jezebel and all their house ( 9:30 -37). The house of Ahab was extinguished by him. Not one of all his great men and his kinsfolk and his priests did Jehu spare ( 10:11 ). Ahab humbled himself at Elijah's words ( 1 Kings 21:28 ,  29), and therefore the prophecy was fulfilled not in his fate but in that of his son Joram ( 2 Kings 9:25 ). The history of Naboth, compared with that of Ahab and Jezebel, furnishes a remarkable illustration of the law of a retributive providence, a law which runs through all history (Comp.  Psalm 109:17 ,  18). 
JOPPA|Beauty, a town in the portion of Dan ( Joshua 19:46 ; A.V.,  "Japho"), on a sandy promontory between Caesarea and Gaza, and at a distance of 30 miles north-west from Jerusalem. It is one of the oldest towns in Asia. It was and still is the chief sea-port of Judea. It was never wrested from the Phoenicians. It became a Jewish town only in the second century B.C. It was from this port that Jonah "took ship to flee from the presence of the Lord" ( Jonah 1:3 ). To this place also the wood cut in Lebanon by Hiram's men for Solomon was brought in floats ( 2 Chronicles 2:16 ); and here the material for the building of the second temple was also landed ( Ezra 3:7 ). At Joppa, in the house of Simon the tanner, "by the sea-side," Peter resided "many days," and here, "on the house-top," he had his "vision of tolerance" ( Acts 9:36 -43). It bears the modern name of Jaffa, and exibituds all the decrepitude and squalor of cities ruled over by the Turks. "Scarcely any other town has been so often overthrown, sacked, pillaged, burned, and rebuilt." Its present population is said to be about 16,000. It was taken by the French under Napoleon in 1799, who gave orders for the massacre here of 4,000 prisoners. It is connected with Jerusalem by the only carriage road that exists in the country, and also by a railway completed in 1892. It is noticed on monuments B.C. 1600-1300, and was attacked by Sannacharib B.C. 
CHENANIAH|     ken-a-ni'-a (kenanyahu, and kenanyah, literally "established by God"): Chief of the Levites who was over "the songs," or "the carrying" (namely, "of the ark") from the house of Obed-edom to Jerusalem ( 1 Chronicles 15:22, 27 ;  1 Chronicles 26:29 ).
SHOCHO|( 2 Chronicles 28:18 ) = Shochoh ( 1 Samuel 17:1 ) = Shoco ( 2 Chronicles 11:7 ). See SOCOH. 
SHAMIR|A sharp thorn.  (1.) One of the sons of Michah ( 1 Chronicles 24:24 ). (2.) A town among the mountains of Judah ( Joshua 15:48 ); probably Somerah, 2 1/2 miles north-west of Debir. (3.) The residence of Tola, one of the judges, on Mount Ephraim ( Judges 10:1 ,  2). 
SAMARITANS|The name given to the new and mixed inhabitants whom Esarhaddon (B.C. 677), the king of Assyria, brought from Babylon and other places and settled in the cities of Samaria, instead of the original inhabitants whom Sargon (B.C. 721) had removed into captivity ( 2 Kings 17:24 ; Comp.  Ezra 4:2 ,  9,  10). These strangers (Comp.  Luke 17:18 ) amalgamated with the Jews still remaining in the land, and gradually abandoned their old idolatry and adopted partly the Jewish religion. After the return from the Captivity, the Jews in Jerusalem refused to allow them to take part with them in rebuilding the temple, and hence sprang up an open enmity between them. They erected a rival temple on Mount Gerizim, which was, however, destroyed by a Jewish king (B.C. 130). They then built another at Shechem. The bitter enmity between the Jews and Samaritans continued in the time of our Lord: the Jews had "no dealings with the Samaritans" ( John 4:9 ; Comp.  Luke 9:52 ,  53). Our Lord was in contempt called "a Samaritan" ( John 8:48 ). Many of the Samaritans early embraced the gospel ( John 4:5 -42;  Acts 8:25 ;  9:31 ;  15:3 ). Of these Samaritans there still remains a small population of about one hundred and sixty, who all reside in Shechem, where they carefully observe the religious customs of their fathers. They are the "smallest and oldest sect in the world." 
SEIRAH|     se-i'-ra, se'-i-ra (ha-se`irah; Codex Vaticanus Seteirotha; Codex Alexandrinus See irotha; the King James Version, Seirath): The place to which Ehud escaped after his assassination of Eglon, king of Moab ( Judges 3:26 ). The name is from the same root as the foregoing, and probably applied to some shaggy forest. The quarries by which he passed are said to have been by Gilgal ( Judges 3:19 ), but there is nothing to guide us to an identification. Eusebius, in Onomasticon, gives the name, but no indication of the site.
SHEBANIAH|Whom Jehovah hides, or has made grow up.  (1.) A Levite appointed to blow the trumpet before the ark of God ( 1 Chronicles 15:24 ). (2.) Another Levite ( Nehemiah 9:4 ,  5). (3.) A priest ( Nehemiah 10:12 ). (4.) A Levite ( Nehemiah 10:4 ). 
NIGHTHAWK|(Hebrews tahmas) occurs only in the list of unclean birds ( Leviticus 11:16 ;  Deuteronomy 14:15 ). This was supposed to be the night-jar (Caprimulgus), allied to the swifts. The Hebrew word is derived from a root meaning "to scratch or tear the face," and may be best rendered, in accordance with the ancient versions, "an owl" (Strix flammea). The Revised Version renders "night-hawk." 
MATTANAH|A gift, a station of the Israelites ( Numbers 21:18 ,  19) between the desert and the borders of Moab, in the Wady Waleh. 
JADON|Judge, a Meronothite who assisted in rebuilding the walls of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 3:7 ). 
LOVES|     luvz ( Psalm 45:1 , title).  See  PSALMS .
MEHOLATHITE|     me-ho'-la-thit (mecholathi): The Gentiledesignation of Adriel, the son of Barzillai, who married Merab, the daughter of King Saul ( 1 Samuel 18:19   2 Samuel 21:8 ), the name Michal in  2 Samuel 21:8  being doubtless a copyist's error.  See  ABEL-MEHOLAH .
TAVERNS|Taverns, The three  A place on the great "Appian Way," about 11 miles from Rome, designed for the reception of travellers, as the name indicates. Here Paul, on his way to Rome, was met by a band of Roman Christians ( Acts 28:15 ). The "Tres Tabernae was the first mansio or mutatio, that is, halting-place for relays, from Rome, or the last on the way to the city. At this point three roads run into the Via Appia, that from Tusculum, that from Alba Longa, and that from Antium; so necessarily here would be a halting-place, which took its name from the three shops there, the general store, the blacksmith's, and the refreshment-house...Tres Tabernae is translated as Three Taverns, but it more correctly means three shops" (Forbes's Footsteps of St. Paul,  p.20). 
ORPHANS|( Lamentations 5:3 ), i.e., desolate and without protectors. The word occurs only here. In  John 14:18  the word there rendered "comfortless" (R.V.,  "desolate;" marg.,  "orphans") properly means "orphans." The same Greek word is rendered "fatherless" in  James 1:27 . 
BAMOTHBAAL|Heights of Baal, a place on the river Arnon, or in the plains through which it flows, east of Jordan ( Joshua 13:17 ; Comp.  Numbers 21:28 ). It has been supposed to be the same place as Bamoth. 
BEESHTERAH|   ASHTAROTH; ASHTEROTH-KARNAIM;   ash'-ta-roth, as'-ta-roth (`ashtaroth; the King James Version Astaroth; Astaroth, the city of Og, king of Bashan ( Deuteronomy 14 , etc.); `ashteroth qarnayim, the scene of the defeat of the Rephaim by Chedorlaomer ( Genesis 14:5 ): (be`eshterah) a Levitical city in Manasseh East of the Jordan ( Joshua 21:27 )): The name probably means "house" or "temple of Ashtoreth." It is identical with Ashtaroth of  1 Chronicles 6:71 . Ashtaroth is the plural of ASHTORETH (which see). The name denotes a place associated with the worship of this goddess. Ashteroth-karnaim is mentioned only once in canonical Scripture unless we accept Gratz's restoration, when Karnaim appears as a city taken by Israel: "Have we not taken to us horns (qarnayim) by our own strength?" ( Amos 6:13 ). It is identical with Carnion or Carnaim of 1 and 2 Maccabees, a city of Gilead with a temple of Atar-gatis. The name Ashtaroth has been identified with Astertu in the lists of Tahutmes III of the XVIIIth Egyptian Dynasty; and with Ashtarti of the Tell el-Amarna Letters. Its claim to antiquity is therefore well established.  As far as the Biblical record is concerned, the names at the head of this article might stand for one and the same city, Ashtaroth being a contraction from Ashteroth-karnaim. But in the days of Eusebius and Jerome, we learn from the Onomasticon, there were two forts of this name 9 miles apart, lying between Adara (Der`ah) and Abila (Abil), while Ashtaroth, the ancient city of Og, king of Bashan, lay 6 miles from Adara. Carnaim Ashtaroth, which is evidently identical with Ashteroth-karnaim, they describe as a large village in the angle of Bashan where tradition places the home of Job. This seems to point to Tell `Ashtara, a hill which rises about 80 ft. above the plain, 2 miles South of el-Merkez, the seat of the governor of the Chauran. Three-quarters of a mile North of el-Merkez, at the south end of a ridge on which the village of Sheikh Ca'ad is built, stands the weley of the stone of Job, Weley Sakhret 'Ayyub. By the large stone under the dome Job was said to have sat to receive his friends during his affliction.  An Egyptian inscription, found by Schumacher, proves the stone to be a monument of the time of Rameses II. At the foot of the hill is pointed out the bath of Job. In el-Merkez the building known as Deir 'Ayyub, "Monastery of Job," is now part of the barracks. There is also shown the tomb of Job. The stream which flows southward past Tell `Ashtara, is called Moyet en-Neby 'Ayyub, "stream of the prophet Job," and is said to have risen where the patriarch stamped his foot on his recovery. It is to be noted also that the district lying in the angle formed by Nahr er-Raqqad and the Yarmuk River is called to this day ez-Zawiyet esh-sharqiyeh, "the eastern angle" (i.e. of the Jaulan). The term may in Jerome's time have covered the land east of the `Allan, although this is now part of the Chauran. At Tell `Ashtara there are remains pointing to a high antiquity. The site was also occupied during the Middle Ages. Perhaps here we should locate Carnaim Ashtaroth of the Onomasticon. It does not, however, agree with the description of Carnaim in 1 and 2 Maccabees. The Ashtaroth of the Onomasticon may have been at el-Muzerib, on the great pilgrimage road, about 6 Roman miles from Der'ah-the distance indicated by Eusebius. The old fortress here was situated on an island in the middle of the lake, Baheiret el-Bajjeh. A full description of the place is given in Schumacher's Across the Jordan, 137. It must have been a position of great strength in antiquity; but the ancient name has not been recovered.  Some would place Ashteroth-karnaim, the Carnaim of the Maccabees, at Tell 'Ash`ari, a site 10 Roman miles North of Der`ah, and 4 1/2 Roman miles S 2 of Tell `Ashtara. This clearly was "a place hard to besiege, and difficult of access by reason of the narrowness of the approaches on all sides" (2 Maccabees 12:21). It crowns a promontory which stands out between the deep gorge of the Yarmuk River and a great chasm, at the head of which is a waterfall. It could be approached only by the neck connecting it with the mainland; and here it was guarded by a triple wall, the ruins of which are seen today. The remains of a temple close by the bridge over the Yarmuk may mark the scene of the slaughter by Judas.  The whole question however is obscure. Eusebius is clearly guilty of confusion, with his two Ashtaroth-karnaims and his Carnaim Ashtaroth. All the places we have named lie considerably North of a line drawn from Tell Abel to Der`ah. For light upon the problem of identification we must wait the results of excavation.  W. Ewing  BEESHTERAH  be-esh'-te-ra ( Joshua 21:27 ).  See  ASHTAROTH .
HANIEL|     han'-i-el.  See  HANNIEL .
PHRYGIA|Dry, an irregular and ill-defined district in Asia Minor. It was divided into two parts, the Greater Phrygia on the south, and the Lesser Phrygia on the west. It is the Greater Phrygia that is spoken of in the New Testament. The towns of Antioch in Pisidia ( Acts 13:14 ), Colosse, Hierapolis, Iconium, and Laodicea were situated in it. 
RAHAM|Merciful, one of the descendants of Caleb, the son of Hezron ( 1 Chronicles 2:44 ). 
ELIEZER|God his help.  (1.) "Of Damascus," the "steward" (R.V.,  "possessor") of Abraham's house ( Genesis 15:2 ,  3). It was probably he who headed the embassy sent by Abraham to the old home of his family in Padan-aram to seek a wife for his son Isaac. The account of this embassy is given at length in  Genesis 24 . (2.) The son of Becher, and grandson of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 7:8 ). (3.) One of the two sons of Moses, born during his sojourn in Midian ( Exodus 18:4 ;  1 Chronicles 23:15 ,  17). He remained with his mother and brother Gershom with Jethro when Moses returned to Egypt. ( Exodus 18:4 ). They were restored to Moses when Jethro heard of his departure out of Egypt. (4.) One of the priests who blew the trumpet before the ark when it was brought to Jerusalem ( 1 Chronicles 15:24 ). (5.) Son of Zichri, and chief of the Reubenites under David ( 1 Chronicles 27:16 ). (6.) A prophet in the time of Jehoshaphat ( 2 Chronicles 20:37 ). Others of this name are mentioned  Luke 3:29 ;  Ezra 8:16 ;  10:18 , 23, 31. 
GOLAN|Exile, a city of Bashan ( Deuteronomy 4:43 ), one of the three cities of refuge east of Jordan, about 12 miles north-east of the Sea of Galilee ( Joshua 20:8 ). There are no further notices of it in Scripture. It became the head of the province of Gaulanitis, one of the four provinces into which Bashan was divided after the Babylonish captivity, and almost identical with the modern Jaulan, in Western Hauran, about 39 miles in length and 18 in breath. 
MATTHIAS|Gift of God.  Acts 1:23 . 
NETHANEEL|Given of God.  (1.) The son of Zuar, chief of the tribe of Issachar at the Exodus ( Numbers 1:8 ;  2:5 ). (2.) One of David's brothers ( 1 Chronicles 2:14 ). (3.) A priest who blew the trumpet before the ark when it was brought up to Jerusalem ( 1 Chronicles 15:24 ). (4.) A Levite ( 1 Chronicles 24:6 ). (5.) A temple porter, of the family of the Korhites ( 1 Chronicles 26:4 ). (6.) One of the "princes" appointed by Jehoshaphat to teach the law through the cities of Judah ( 2 Chronicles 17:7 ). (7.) A chief Levite in the time of Josiah ( 2 Chronicles 35:9 ). (8.)  Ezra 10:22 . (9.)  Nehemiah 12:21 . (10.) A priest's son who bore a trumpet at the dedication of the walls of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 12:36 ). 
ZORAH|Place of wasps, a town in the low country of Judah, afterwards given to Dan ( Joshua 19:41 ;  Judges 18:2 ), probably the same as Zoreah ( Joshua 15:33 ). This was Samson's birthplace ( Judges 13:2 ,  25), and near it he found a grave ( 16:31 ). It was situated on the crest of a hill overlooking the valley of Sorek, and was fortified by Rehoboam ( 2 Chronicles 11:10 ). It has been identified with Sur'ah, in the Wady Surar, 8 miles west of Jerusalem. It is noticed on monuments in the fifteenth century B.C. as attacked by the Abiri or Hebrews. 
COMMANDMENTS|Commandments, the Ten: ( Exodus 34:28 ;  Deuteronomy 10:4 ,  marg. "ten words") i.e., the Decalogue (q.v.), is a summary of the immutable moral law. These commandments were first given in their written form to the people of Israel when they were encamped at Sinai, about fifty days after they came out of Egypt ( Exodus 19:10 -25). They were written by the finger of God on two tables of stone. The first tables were broken by Moses when he brought them down from the mount ( 32:19 ), being thrown by him on the ground. At the command of God he took up into the mount two other tables, and God wrote on them "the words that were on the first tables" ( 34:1 ). These tables were afterwards placed in the ark of the covenant ( Deuteronomy 10:5 ;  1 Kings 8:9 ). Their subsequent history is unknown. They are as a whole called "the covenant" ( Deuteronomy 4:13 ), and "the tables of the covenant" ( 9:9 ,  11;  Hebrews 9:4 ), and "the testimony." They are obviously "ten" in number, but their division is not fixed, hence different methods of numbering them have been adopted. The Jews make the "Preface" one of the commandments, and then combine the first and second. The Roman Catholics and Lutherans combine the first and second and divide the tenth into two. The Jews and Josephus divide them equally. The Lutherans and Roman Catholics refer three commandments to the first table and seven to the second. The Greek and Reformed Churches refer four to the first and six to the second table. The Samaritans add to the second that Gerizim is the mount of worship. (see  LAW .) 
SHAARAIM|Two gates.  (1.) A city in the plain of Judah ( 1 Samuel 17:52 ); called also Sharaim ( Joshua 15:36 ). (2.) A town in Simeon ( 1 Chronicles 4:31 ). 
GORGEOUSLY|   GORGEOUS;   gor'-jus, gor'-jus-li (mikhlol; lampros): Mikhlol occurs twice in the Old Testament, translated in the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American) "most gorgeously" ( Ezekiel 23:12 ); in  Ezekiel 38:4 , the King James Version translates "all sorts" (of armor), the Revised Version (British and American) "clothed in full armor." Lampros ("shining," "bright"), is only once translated "gorgeous" ( Luke 23:11 ); "Herod. arrayed him in a gorgeous robe," the Revised Version (British and American) "gorgeous apparel." We have also in  Luke 7:25 , "They that are gorgeously appareled (endoxos, "splendid," "glorious"). are in kings' courts." They were scarcely to be looked for among the prophets, or in the new community of Jesus.  W. L. Walker
RACHEL|Ewe, "the daughter", "the somewhat petulant, peevish, and self-willed though beautiful younger daughter" of Laban, and one of Jacob's wives ( Genesis 29:6 ,  28). He served Laban fourteen years for her, so deep was Jacob's affection for her. She was the mother of Joseph ( Genesis 30:22 -24). Afterwards, on Jacob's departure from Mesopotamia, she took with her her father's teraphim ( 31:34 ,  35). As they journeyed on from Bethel, Rachel died in giving birth to Benjamin ( 35:18 ,  19), and was buried "in the way to Ephrath, which is Bethlehem. And Jacob set a pillar upon her grave". Her sepulchre is still regarded with great veneration by the Jews. Its traditional site is about half a mile from Jerusalem. This name is used poetically by Jeremiah ( 31:15 -17) to denote God's people mourning under their calamities. This passage is also quoted by Matthew as fulfilled in the lamentation at Bethlehem on account of the slaughter of the infants there at the command of Herod ( Matthew 2:17 ,  18).
IBNEIAH|     ib-ne'-ya (yibhneyah, "Yah buildeth up"): A Benjamite, son of Jeroham ( 1 Chronicles 9:8 ).
HELI|Elevation, father of Joseph in the line of our Lord's ancestry ( Luke 3:23 ). 
ISUI|     is'-u-i.  See  ISHVI .
VINEYARDS|   , MEADOW (PLAIN) OF THE  ( Judges 11:33 ).  See  ABEL-CHERAMIM ;  MEADOW .  PLAIN OF THE VINEYARDS  See  ABEL-CHERAMIM .
REPHIDIM|Supports, one of the stations of the Israelites, situated in the Wady Feiran, near its junction with the Wady esh-Sheikh. Here no water could be found for the people to drink, and in their impatience they were ready to stone Moses, as if he were the cause of their distress. At the command of God Moses smote "the rock in Horeb," and a copious stream flowed forth, enough for all the people. After this the Amalekites attacked the Israelites while they were here encamped, but they were utterly defeated ( Exodus 17:1 ,  8-16). They were the "first of the nations" to make war against Israel ( Numbers 24:20 ). Leaving Rephidim, the Israelites advanced into the wilderness of Sinai ( Exodus 19:1 ,  2;  Numbers 33:14 ,  15), marching probably through the two passes of the Wady Solaf and the Wady esh-Sheikh, which converge at the entrance to the plain er-Rahah, the "desert of Sinai," which is two miles long and about half a mile broad. (see  SINAI ; MERIBAH.) 
EUTYCHUS|Fortunate, ( Acts 20:9 -12), a young man of Troas who fell through drowsiness from the open window of the third floor of the house where Paul was preaching, and was "taken up dead." The lattice-work of the window being open to admit the air, the lad fell out and down to the court below. Paul restored him to life again. (Comp.  1 Kings 17:21 ;  2 Kings 4:34. ) 
SIBBOLETH|     sib'o-leth (cibboleth).  See  SHIBBOLETH .
SOUNDINGS|     sound'-ingz.  See  SHIPS AND BOATS, III, 2 .
PUNON|     pu'-non (punon): A desert camp of the Israelites, the second after leaving Mt. Hor ( Numbers 33:42, 43 ). Eusebius (Onom 299 85; 123 9) mentions an Idumean village, North of Petra, in the desert, where convicts were mining copper, called Phinon or Phainon. These are doubtless identical.  See  WANDERINGS OF ISRAEL .
JOANNES|     jo-an'-es, jo-an'-ez (Ioannes; the King James Version, Johannes):  (1) Son of Acatan (1 Esdras 8:38), called also "Johanan" in  Ezra 8:12 .  (2) Son of Bebai (1 Esdras 9:29), called "Jehohanan" in  Ezra 10:28 .
PUAH|Splendid.  (1.) One of the two midwives who feared God, and refused to kill the Hebrew male children at their birth ( Exodus 1:15 -21). (2.) A descendant of Issachar ( Judges 10:1 ). 
REHOBOAM|He enlarges the people, the successor of Solomon on the throne, and apparently his only son. He was the son of Naamah "the Ammonitess," some well-known Ammonitish princess ( 1 Kings 14:21 ;  2 Chronicles 12:13 ). He was forty-one years old when he ascended the throne, and he reigned seventeen years (B.C. 975-958). Although he was acknowledged at once as the rightful heir to the throne, yet there was a strongly-felt desire to modify the character of the government. The burden of taxation to which they had been subjected during Solomon's reign was very oppressive, and therefore the people assembled at Shechem and demanded from the king an alleviation of their burdens. He went to meet them at Shechem, and heard their demands for relief ( 1 Kings 12:4 ). After three days, having consulted with a younger generation of courtiers that had grown up around him, instead of following the advice of elders, he answered the people haughtily (6-15). "The king hearkened not unto the people; for the cause was from the Lord" (Comp.  11:31 ). This brought matters speedily to a crisis. The terrible cry was heard (Comp.  2 Samuel 20:1 ): "What portion have we in David? Neither have we inheritance in the son of Jesse: To your tents, O Israel: Now see to thine own house, David" ( 1 Kings 12:16 ). And now at once the kingdom was rent in twain. Rehoboam was appalled, and tried concessions, but it was too late (18). The tribe of Judah, Rehoboam's own tribe, alone remained faithful to him. Benjamin was reckoned along with Judah, and these two tribes formed the southern kingdom, with Jerusalem as its capital; while the northern ten tribes formed themselves into a separate kingdom, choosing Jeroboam as their king. Rehoboam tried to win back the revolted ten tribes by making war against them, but he was prevented by the prophet Shemaiah (21-24;  2 Chronicles 11:1 -4) from fulfilling his purpose. (see  JEROBOAM .) In the fifth year of Rehoboam's reign, Shishak (q.v.), one of the kings of Egypt of the Assyrian dynasty, stirred up, no doubt, by Jeroboam his son-in-law, made war against him. Jerusalem submitted to the invader, who plundered the temple and virtually reduced the kingdom to the position of a vassal of Egypt ( 1 Kings 14:25 ,  26;  2 Chronicles 12:5 -9). A remarkable memorial of this invasion has been discovered at Karnac, in Upper Egypt, in certain sculptures on the walls of a small temple there. These sculptures represent the king, Shishak, holding in his hand a train of prisoners and other figures, with the names of the captured towns of Judah, the towns which Rehoboam had fortified ( 2 Chronicles 11:5 -12). The kingdom of Judah, under Rehoboam, sank more and more in moral and spiritual decay. "There was war between Rehoboam and Jeroboam all their days." At length, in the fifty-eighth year of his age, Rehoboam "slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David" ( 1 Kings 14:31 ). He was succeeded by his son Abijah. (see  EGYPT .) 
LAODICEANS|   , EPISTLE TO THE  la-od-i-se'-anz, (en te Laodikeon ekklesia.... ten ek Laodikias, "in the church of the Laodiceans.... the epistle from Laodicea,"  Colossians 4:16 ):  I. EXPLANATIONS OF PAUL'S STATEMENT  1. Written by the Laodiceans?  2. Written by Paul from Laodicea?  3. An Epistle Addressed to the Laodiceans  II. EVIDENCE FAVORING EPISTLE TO EPHESIANS  1. Marcion's Opinion  2. References in Ephesians and Other Epistles  3. Ephesian Church Jewish in Origin  4. Ephesians and Colossians, Sister Epistles  5. Recapitulation  III. LAODICEA DISPLACED BY EPHESUS  1. A Circular Epistle  2. Proof from Biblical Prologues  IV. REASON FOR SUCH AN EPISTLE  Paul here writes to the Colossians, "And when this epistle hath been read among you, cause that it be read also in the church of the Laodiceans; and that ye also read the epistle from Laodicea." What was or what is this epistle?  I. Explanations of Paul's Statement.  The words used by the apostle may mean:  (1) a letter written by the Laodiceans;  (2) an epistle written by Paul from Laodicea;  (3) an epistle written to the Laodiceans, and to be procured from them by the Colossians.  1. Written by the Laodiceans?:  The words may mean a letter written by the Laodiceans. But here it is sufficient to refer to the fact that Paul enjoins the Colossians to procure and to read "the epistle from Laodicea." How could a command of this kind be given in reference to an epistle written by third parties? How could Paul know that a copy of it had been made by the Laodiceans before sending it off? How could he tell that the Laodiceans would be willing to give away a copy of it? The suppositions involved by this hypothesis are incredible. Besides, the context regards the Epistle to the Colossians, and "that from Laodicea," as companion epistles, of which the two churches are to make an interchange, so that each church is directed to read both.  2. Written by Paul from Laodicea?:  Or, the words may refer to an epistle written by Paul from Laodicea. And it has been suggested that the epistle of which we are in search may be 1 Timothy, 1 Thessalonians, 2 Thessalonians, or Galatians. But in the case of these epistles, the probability is that every one of them was written elsewhere than from Laodicea. At the time when Paul wrote to Colosse, he was a prisoner in Rome, and for this reason alone, it was impossible that he could, at any recent date, have written any epistle from Laodicea. But his own statement ( Colossians 2:1 ) is that those in Laodicea had not seen his face in the flesh. As he had never been in Laodicea, he could, not have written any epistle from that city.  3. An Epistle Addressed to the Laodiceans:  A third possibility is a letter written:  (1) not by Paul, but by some other person. But the whole tone of the passage does not favor this suggestion in the least;  (2) by Paul, but that the epistle is lost; this is the ordinary interpretation;  (3) the apocryphal Latin epistle. "To the Laodiceans."  This spurious epistle is a mere compilation clumsily put together; it has no marks of authenticity. Lightfoot (Colossians, 282) gives its general character thus: it "is a cento of Pauline phrases strung together without any definite connection or any clear object. They are taken chiefly from the Epistle to the Philippians, but here and there one is borrowed elsewhere, e.g. from the Epistle to the Galatians. Of course, it closes with an injunction to the Laodiceans to exchange epistles with the Colossians. The apostle's injunction in  Colossians 4:16  suggested the forgery, and such currency as it ever attained was due to the support which that passage was supposed to give to it. Unlike most forgeries, it had no ulterior aim. It has no doctrinal peculiarities. It is quite harmless, so far as falsity and stupidity combined can ever be regarded as harmless" (Lightfoot, in the work quoted 282).  See  APOCRYPHAL EPISTLES .  (4) The only other alternative is that "the epistle from Laodicea" is an epistle to the Laodiceans from Paul himself, which he directs the Colossians to procure from Laodicea. There seems to be not only a high degree of probability, but proof, that the epistle from Laodicea is the epistle known as the Epistle to the Ephesians. Paul therefore had written an epistle to Laodicea, a city which he had twice already mentioned in the Epistle to the Colossians, "For I would have you know how greatly I strive for you, and for them at Laodicea" ( Colossians 2:1 ): "Salute the brethren that are in Laodicea, and Nymphas, and the church that is in their house" ( Colossians 4:15 ). Accepting  Colossians 4:16  to mean that he wrote to Laodicea at the same time as he wrote to Colosse, what has become of the former ep.? Do we know nothing more of it now than is contained in this reference to it in Colossians? The fact that it was, by Paul's express command, to be communicated to at least the two churches in Colosse and Laodicea, would make its disappearance and loss very strange.  II. Evidence Favoring Epistle to Ephesians.  But is there any warrant for concluding that it is lost at all? A statement of the facts of the case seems to show that the epistle which Paul wrote to the Laodiceans is extant, but only under another title. The lines of evidence which seem to show that the so-called Epistle to the Ephesians is in reality the epistle written by Paul to the Laodiceans are these:  It is well known that the words "at Ephesus" ( Ephesians 1:1 ) in the inscription of the epistle are very doubtful. The Revised Version (British and American) reads in the margin, "Some very ancient authorites omit `at Ephesus.' " Among the authorities which omit "at Ephesus" are the Vatican and Sinaitic manuscripts, the best and most ancient authorities existing.  1. Marcion's Opinion:  Tertullian asserts that the heretics, i.e. Marcion, had altered the title, "the Epistle to the Ephesians," to "the Epistle to the Laodiceans." But this accusation does not carry with it any doctrinal or heretical charge against Marcion in this respect. "It is not likely," says Moule (Eph, 25), "that Marcion was guilty here, where the change would have served no dogmatic purpose." And the fact that at that very early period, the first half of the 2nd century, it was openly suggested that the destination of the epistle was Laodicea, is certainly entitled to weight, especially in view of the other fact already mentioned, which is of no less importance, that "at Ephesus" is omitted in the two great manuscripts, the Vatican and the Sinaitic.  2. References in Ephesians and Other Epistles:  The "Epistle to the Ephesians" could not be, primarily at least, addressed to Ephesus, because Paul speaks of his readers as persons in regard to whose conversion from heathenism to the faith of Christ he had just recently heard: "For this cause I also, having heard of the faith in the Lord Jesus which is among you, and the love which ye show toward all the saints, cease not to give thanks for you, making mention of you in my prayers" ( Ephesians 1:15 f ). These words could not well be used in regard to the church at Ephesus, which Paul himself had founded, and in reference to persons among whom he had lived for three years, and where he even knew personally "every one" of the Christians ( Acts 20:31 ).  And in  Ephesians 3:1  the King James Version, he writes: "For this cause I, Paul, the prisoner of Jesus Christ for you Gentiles, if ye have heard of the dispensation of the grace of God which is given me to you-ward." But how could he ever doubt that the elders of the church in Ephesus ( Acts 20:17 ), as well as the members of that important church, were ignorant of the fact that a dispensation of the grace of God had been given to him? The inquiry, whether his readers had heard of the one great fact on which his ministry was based, could not apply in any degree to the Christians in Ephesus. The apostle and the Ephesians had a clear and intimate mutual knowledge. They knew him and valued him and loved him well. When he bade the elders of the church farewell, they all fell on his neck and kissed him ( Acts 20:37 ).  Clearly therefore the statement that he had just recently heard of their conversion, and his inquiry whether they had heard that a dispensation of the grace of God had been entrusted to him, do not and cannot describe the members of the church in Ephesus. "It is plain," writes Moule (Eph, 26), "that the epistle does not bear an Ephesian destination on the face of it."  In the Epistle to the Corinthians there are many local references, as well as allusions to the apostle's work in Corinth. In the Epistle to the Galatians there are also many references to his work among the people of the churches in Galatia. The same is the case in the Epistle to the Philippians, several names being mentioned of persons known to the apostle. In the two Epistles to the Thessalonians, references also occur to his work among them.  Turning to the Epistle to the Colossians, and to that to the Romans-Colossae and Rome being cities which he had not visited previous to his writing to the churches there-he knows several persons in Colosse; and in the case of the Epistle to the Romans, he mentions by name no fewer than twenty-six persons in that city.  How is it then that in "the Epistle to the Ephesians" there are no references at all to the three years which he spent in Ephesus? And how also is there no mention of any one of the members of the church or of the elders whom he knew so intimately and so affectionately? "Ephesians" is inexplicable on the ordinary assumption that Ephesus was the city to which the epistle was addressed. The other theory, that the epistle was a circular one, sent in the first instance to Laodicea, involves no such difficulty.  3. Ephesian Church Jewish in Origin:  Another indication in regard to the primary destination of the epistle is in the words, "ye, the Gentiles in the flesh, who are called Uncircumcision by that which is called Circumcision, in the flesh, made by hands; that ye were at that time separate from Christ, alienated from the commonwealth of Israel, and strangers from the covenants of the promise, having no hope and without God in the world" ( Ephesians 2:11, 12 ). Do these words describe the church in Ephesus? Was the church there Gentilein its origin? Very far from this, for as a matter of fact it began by Paul preaching the gospel to the Jews, as is narrated at length by Luke in  Acts 18 . Then in  Acts 19 , Paul comes again to Ephesus, where he went into the synagogue and spake boldly for the space of three months, but when divers were hardened and believed not, but spake evil of the Way before the multitude, he separated the disciples, disputing daily in the school of one Tyrannus.  Here, therefore, is definite proof that the church in Ephesus was not Gentilein its origin. It was distinctly Jewish, but a Gentileelement had also been received into it. Now the church to which Paul writes "the Epistle to the Ephesians" was not Jewish at all. He does not speak to his readers in any other way than "you Gentiles."  4. Ephesians and Colossians Sister Epistles:  But an important consideration is that the "Epistle to the Ephesians" was written by Paul at the same sitting almost as that to the Colossians. These two are sister epistles, and these along with the Epistle to Philemon were written and sent off at the same time, Onesimus and Tychicus carrying the Epistle to the Colossians ( Colossians 4:7, 8, 9 ), Onesimus being the bearer of that to Philem, while Tychicus in addition to carrying the Colossian epistle was also the messenger who carried "the Epistle to the Ephesians" ( Ephesians 6:21 ).  A close scrutiny of Colossians and "Ephesians" shows, to an extent without a parallel elsewhere in the epistles of the New Testament, a remarkable similarity of phraseology. There are only two verses in the whole of Colossians to which there is no parallel in "Ephesians." The same words are used, while the thought is so varied and so rich, that the one epistle is in no sense a copy or repetition of the other (see list of parallelisms, etc., in Paul's Epistles to Colosse and Laodicea, T. and T. Clark, Edinburgh). Both epistles come warm and instinct with life from the full heart of the great apostle who had not, up to that time, visited either city, but on whom, none the less, there came daily the care of all the churches.  5. Recapitulation:  To recapitulate:  (1) The words "at Ephesus" in the inscription of the epistle are wanting in the two oldest and best manuscripts.  (2) Paul speaks of his readers as persons of whose conversion to Christ he knew only by report. Similarly he speaks of them as knowing only by hearsay of his commission as an apostle of Christ. Also, though he had lived in Ephesus for three years, this epistle does not contain a single salutation.  (3) He speaks of his readers as forming a church exclusively of the Gentiles. But the church in Ephesus, so far from being exclusively gentile, was actually Jewish in origin.  (4) "Ephesians" was written at the same sitting as Colossians, and the same messenger, Tychicus, carried them both.  Therefore as the epistle was not, and could not be, addressed to Ephesus, the conclusion is that it was addressed to some church, and that it was not a treatise sent to the Christian church generally. The words of the first verse of the ep., "to the saints that are," proves that the name of the place to which it was addressed is all that is lost from the manuscripts, but that the name of the city was there originally, as the epistle came from Paul's hand.  Now Paul wrote an epistle to Laodicea at the same time as he wrote to Colosse. He dispatched both epistles by Tychicus. The thought and feeling and even the diction of the two epistles are such that no other explanation is possible but that they came warm from the heart of the same writer at the same time. On all these grounds the conclusion seems inevitable that the Epistle to Laodicea is not lost at all, but that it is identical with the so-called "Epistle to the Ephesians."  III. Laodicea Displaced by Ephesus.  1. A Circular Epistle:  How then did Ephesus displace Laodicea? It is explained at once if theory is adopted that the epistle was a "circular" one addressed not to Laodicea only, but to other cities. We know e.g. that the apostle orders it to be taken to the church in Colosse and read there. So also it might have been sent to other cities, such as Hierapolis ( Colossians 4:13 ) and Ephesus. Hence, if the church in Laodicea were not careful to see that the epistle was returned to them, by those churches to whom they had sent it, it can easily be understood how a copyist in any of those cities might leave out the words "in Laodicea," as not agreeing with the name of the city where the manuscript actually was at the time. As copies were multiplied, the words "in Ephesus" would be suggested, as the name of the chief city of Asia, from which province the epistle had come to the knowledge of the whole Christian church, and to which, in point of fact, Paul had sent it. The feeling would be natural, that it was in keeping with the fitness of things, that Paul, who had rounded the church in Ephesus, should have written an epistle to the church there.  2. Proof from Biblical Prologues:  In an article upon "Marcion and the Canon" by Professor J. Rendel Harris, LL.D., in the The Expository Times, June, 1907, there is reference to the Revue Benedictine for January of that year, which contained a remarkable article by de Bruyne, entitled "Biblical Prologues of Marcionite Origin," in which the writer succeeded in showing that a very widely spread series of prefaces to the Pauline Epistles, which occur in certain Latin Bibles, must have been taken from a Marcionite Bible. Professor Rendel Harris adds that the prefaces in question may go back to Marcion himself, for in any case the Marcionite hand, from which they come, antedates the Latin tradition in which the prologues are imbedded. "It is clear from Tertullian's polemic against Marcion, that the Pauline Epistles stood in the following order in the Marcionite Canon: Galatians, 1 and 2 Corinthians, Romans, 1 and 2 Thessalonians, then Ephesians (which Marcion calls by the name of the Epistle to the Laodiceans), Colossians, Philippians, and Philemon..... Let us turn to the prologues that are current in Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) and other manuscripts for Ephesians and Colossains: the Ephesian prologue runs as follows: `Ephesii sunt Asiani. Hi accepto verbo veritatis perstiterunt in fide. Ho conlaudat apostolus, scribens eis a Roma de carcere!' When, however, we turn to the Colossian prologue, we find that it opens as follows: `Colossenses et hi sicut Laodicenses sunt Asiani. Et ipsi praeventi erant a pseudapostolis, nec ad hos accessit apostolus sed et hos per epistolam recorrigit,' etc.  "From this it is clear that originally the prologue to the Laodiceans preceded the prologue to Colossians, and that the  Ephesian prologue is a substitute for the Laodicean prologue, which can be partly reconstructed from the references to it in the Colossian prologue. We can see that it had a statement that the Laodiceans belonged to Asia Minor, that they had been under the influence of false apostles, and had never been visited by Paul, who corrects their error by an epistle....  "We have now shown that the original Canon had `Laodiceans, Colossians.' It is interesting to observe how some Latin manuscripts naively admit this: `You must know that the epistle which we have as that written to the Ephesians, the heretics, and especially the Marcionites, entitle the Epistle to the Laodiceans.' "  IV. Reason for Such an Epistle.  Assuming therefore that the "Epistle to the Ephesians" is the epistle which Paul wrote to the Laodiceans, various questions arise, such as, Why did he write to the church there? What was there in the state of the church in Laodicea to call for an epistle from him? Was there any heresy there, like the false teaching which existed in the neighboring church in Colosse?  The answer to such questions is that though we do not possess much information, yet these churches in the province of Asia had many things in common. They had originated at the same time, during the two whole years of Paul's residence in Ephesus. They were composed of men of the same races, and speaking the same languages. They were subject to the same influences of doctrinal error. The errors into which any one church fell could not fail to affect the others also. These churches were permeated to a large extent by the same ideas, derived both from the current philosophy and from their ancestral heathen religions. They would, therefore, one and all, require the same apostolic instruction and exhortation. This epistle, accordingly, bears a close resemblance to the Epistle to the Colossians, just for the reason that the circumstances of the church in Laodicea were similar to those of the church in Colosse; and also, that the thoughts which filled Paul's heart as he wrote to Colosse were adapted, in the first place, to counteract the false teaching in Colosse, but they are also the foundation of all Christian experience, and the very life of all Christian truth and doctrine. These are the great thoughts of Christ the Creator of all things, Christ the Upholder of all things, Christ the Reconciler of all things. Such thoughts filling Paul's heart would naturally find expression in language bearing a close resemblance to that in which he had just written to Colosse.  It is no more astonishing that Paul should have written to Laodicea, than that he also wrote to Colosse, which was probably the least important of all the cities and churches mentioned in the apostle's work and career. Neither is it any more to be wondered at that he should have written so profound an epistle as that to "the Ephesians," than that he should also have given directions that it be sent on to Colosse and read there; for this reason, that the exposition of Christ's great love to the church and of His giving Himself for it-the doctrine of the grace of God-is the very corrective required by the errors of the false teachers at Colosse, and is also the groundwork of Christian truth and experience for all ages.  NOTE: A very remarkable circumstance in regard to the apocryphal Epistle to the Laodiceans is mentioned by Nestle in the preface to his edition of the Latin New Testament, published in Stuttgart in 1906. He writes that "the Epistle to the Laodiceans was for a thousand years part of very many Latin Bibles, and obtained a place in pre-Lutheran German Bibles, together with Jerome's Epistle to Damasus."  John Rutherfurd
BAALHAMON|Place of a multitude, a place where Solomon had an extensive vineyard (Cant. 8:11). It has been supposed to be identical with Baal-gad, and also with Hammon in the tribe of Asher ( Joshua 19:28 ). Others identify it with Belamon, in Central Palestine, near Dothaim. 
LEBANON|White, "the white mountain of Syria," is the loftiest and most celebrated mountain range in Syria. It is a branch running southward from the Caucasus, and at its lower end forking into two parallel ranges, the eastern or Anti-Lebanon, and the western or Lebanon proper. They enclose a long valley ( Joshua 11:17 ) of from 5 to 8 miles in width, called by Roman writers Coele-Syria, now called el-Buka'a, "the valley," a prolongation of the valley of the Jordan. Lebanon proper, Jebel es-Sharki, commences at its southern extremity in the gorge of the Leontes, the ancient Litany, and extends north-east, parallel to the Mediterranean coast, as far as the river Eleutherus, at the plain of Emesa, "the entering of Hamath" ( Numbers 34:8 ;  1 Kings 8:65 ), in all about 90 geographical miles in extent. The average height of this range is from 6,000 to 8,000 feet; the peak of Jebel Mukhmel is about 10,200 feet, and the Sannin about 9,000. The highest peaks are covered with perpetual snow and ice. In the recesses of the range wild beasts as of old still abound ( 2 Kings 14:9 ; Cant. 4:8). The scenes of the Lebanon are remarkable for their grandeur and beauty, and supplied the sacred writers with many expressive similes ( Psalm 29:5 ,  6;  72:16 ;  104:16 -18; Cant. 4:15;  Isaiah 2:13 ;  35:2 ;  60:13 ;  Hosea 14:5 ). It is famous for its cedars (Cant. 5:15), its wines ( Hosea 14:7 ), and its cool waters ( Jeremiah 18:14 ). The ancient inhabitants were Giblites and Hivites ( Joshua 13:5 ;  Judges 3:3 ). It was part of the Phoenician kingdom ( 1 Kings 5:2 -6). The eastern range, or Anti-Lebanon, or "Lebanon towards the sunrising," runs nearly parallel with the western from the plain of Emesa till it connects with the hills of Galilee in the south. The height of this range is about 5,000 feet. Its highest peak is Hermon (q.v.), from which a number of lesser ranges radiate. Lebanon is first mentioned in the description of the boundary of Palestine ( Deuteronomy 1:7 ;  11:24 ). It was assigned to Israel, but was never conquered ( Joshua 13:2 -6;  Judges 3:1 -3). The Lebanon range is now inhabited by a population of about 300,000 Christians, Maronites, and Druses, and is ruled by a Christian governor. The Anti-Lebanon is inhabited by Mohammedans, and is under a Turkish ruler.
MIKLOTH|Staves.  (1.) An officer under Dodai, in the time of David and Solomon ( 1 Chronicles 27:4 ). (2.) A Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 8:32 ;  9:37 ,  38). 
ISRAEL|The name conferred on Jacob after the great prayer-struggle at Peniel ( Genesis 32:28 ), because "as a prince he had power with God and prevailed." (see  JACOB .) This is the common name given to Jacob's descendants. The whole people of the twelve tribes are called "Israelites," the "children of Israel" ( Joshua 3:17 ;  7:25 ;  Judges 8:27 ;  Jeremiah 3:21 ), and the "house of Israel" ( Exodus 16:31 ;  40:38 ). This name Israel is sometimes used emphatically for the true Israel ( Psalm 73:1 : Isaiah 45:17;  49:3 ;  John 1:47 ;  Romans 9:6 ;  11:26 ). After the death of Saul the ten tribes arrogated to themselves this name, as if they were the whole nation ( 2 Samuel 2:9 ,  10,  17,  28;  3:10 ,  17;  19:40 -43), and the kings of the ten tribes were called "kings of Israel," while the kings of the two tribes were called "kings of Judah." After the Exile the name Israel was assumed as designating the entire nation.  Israel, Kingdom of (B.C. 975-B.C. 722). Soon after the death of Solomon, Ahijah's prophecy ( 1 Kings 11:31 -35) was fulfilled, and the kingdom was rent in twain. Rehoboam, the son and successor of Solomon, was scarcely seated on his throne when the old jealousies between Judah and the other tribes broke out anew, and Jeroboam was sent for from Egypt by the malcontents ( 12:2 , 3). Rehoboam insolently refused to lighten the burdensome taxation and services which his father had imposed on his subjects ( 12:4 ), and the rebellion became complete. Ephraim and all Israel raised the old cry, "Every man to his tents, O Israel" ( 2 Samuel 20:1 ). Rehoboam fled to Jerusalem ( 1 Kings 12:1 -18;  2 Chronicles 10 ), and Jeroboam was proclaimed king over all Israel at Shechem, Judah and Benjamin remaining faithful to Solomon's son. War, with varying success, was carried on between the two kingdoms for about sixty years, till Jehoshaphat entered into an alliance with the house of Ahab. Extent of the kingdom. In the time of Solomon the area of Palestine, excluding the Phoenician territories on the shore of the Mediterranean, did not much exceed 13,000 square miles. The kingdom of Israel comprehended about 9,375 square miles. Shechem was the first capital of this kingdom ( 1 Kings 12:25 ), afterwards Tirza ( 14:17 ). Samaria was subsequently chosen as the capital ( 16:24 ), and continued to be so till the destruction of the kingdom by the Assyrians ( 2 Kings 17:5 ). During the siege of Samaria (which lasted for three years) by the Assyrians, Shalmaneser died and was succeeded by Sargon, who himself thus records the capture of that city: "Samaria I looked at, I captured; 27,280 men who dwelt in it I carried away" ( 2 Kings 17:6 ) into Assyria. Thus after a duration of two hundred and fifty-three years the kingdom of the ten tribes came to an end. They were scattered throughout the East. (see  CAPTIVITY .) "Judah held its ground against Assyria for yet one hundred and twenty-three years, and became the rallying-point of the dispersed of every tribe, and eventually gave its name to the whole race. Those of the people who in the last struggle escaped into the territories of Judah or other neighbouring countries naturally looked to Judah as the head and home of their race. And when Judah itself was carried off to Babylon, many of the exiled Israelites joined them from Assyria, and swelled that immense population which made Babylonia a second Palestine." After the deportation of the ten tribes, the deserted land was colonized by various eastern tribes, whom the king of Assyria sent thither ( Ezra 4:2 ,  10;  2 Kings 17:24 -29). (see  KINGS .) In contrast with the kingdom of Judah is that of Israel.  (1.) "There was no fixed capital and no religious centre.  (2.) The army was often insubordinate.  (3.) The succession was constantly interrupted, so that out of nineteen kings there were no less than nine dynasties, each ushered in by a revolution.  (4.) The authorized priests left the kingdom in a body, and the priesthood established by Jeroboam had no divine sanction and no promise; it was corrupt at its very source." (Maclean's O. T. Hist.) 
EVENINGS|   , BETWEEN THE  The time of day (the Revised Version (British and American) reads "at even," margin, "between the two evenings") when the Passover lamb was slain ( Exodus 12:6   Numbers 9:3 ), or the offering made of the evening portion of the continual burnt offering ( Numbers 28:4 ).  See preceding article.
MICHRI|Prize of Jehovah, a Benjamite, the father of Uzzi ( 1 Chronicles 9:8 ). 
DIOSCURI|     di-os'-ku-ri (Dioscouroi; in  Acts 28:11 , the King James Version Castor and Pollux, the Revised Version (British and American) thE TWIN BROTHERS; in margin, "Dioscuri"): The sign of the ship on which Paul sailed from Melita to Syracuse and Rhegium. The Dioscuri (i.e. sons of Zeus), Castor and Pollux, are the two chief stars in the constellation of the Twins. Some 4,000 years B.C. they served as pointers to mark the beginning of the new year by setting together with the first new moon of springtime. The constellation of the Twins was supposed to be especially favorable to sailors, hence, ships were often placed under the protection of the twin gods.  E. W. Maunder
ZOAR|Small, a town on the east or south-east of the Dead Sea, to which Lot and his daughters fled from Sodom ( Genesis 19:22 ,  23). It was originally called Bela ( 14:2 ,  8). It is referred to by the prophets Isaiah ( 15:5 ) and Jeremiah ( 48:34 ). Its ruins are still seen at the opening of the ravine of Kerak, the Kir-Moab referred to in  2 Kings 3 , the modern Tell esh-Shaghur. 
BAALZEPHON|Baal of the north, an Egyptian town on the shores of the Gulf of Suez ( Exodus 14:2 ;  Numbers 33:7 ), over against which the children of Israel encamped before they crossed the Red Sea. It is probably to be identified with the modern Jebel Deraj or Kulalah, on the western shore of the Gulf of Suez. Baal-zapuna of the Egyptians was a place of worship. 
IBLEAM|People-waster, a city assigned to Manasseh ( Joshua 17:11 ), from which the Israelites, however, could not expel the Canaanites ( Judges 1:27 ). It is also called Bileam ( 1 Chronicles 6:70 ). It was probably the modern Jelamah, a village 2 1/2 miles north of Jenin. 
SARGON|(In the inscriptions,  "Sarra-yukin" [the god] has appointed the king; also "Sarru-kinu, " the legitimate king.) On the death of Shalmaneser (B.C. 723), one of the Assyrian generals established himself on the vacant throne, taking the name of "Sargon," after that of the famous monarch, the Sargon of Accad, founder of the first Semitic empire, as well as of one of the most famous libraries of Chaldea. He forthwith began a conquering career, and became one of the most powerful of the Assyrian monarchs. He is mentioned by name in the Bible only in connection with the siege of Ashdod ( Isaiah 20:1 ). At the very beginning of his reign he besieged and took the city of Samaria ( 2 Kings 17:6 ;  18:9 -12). On an inscription found in the palace he built at Khorsabad, near Nieveh, he says, "The city of Samaria I besieged, I took; 27,280 of its inhabitants I carried away; fifty chariots that were among them I collected," etc. The northern kingdom he changed into an Assyrian satrapy. He afterwards drove Merodach-baladan (q.v.), who kept him at bay for twelve years, out of Babylon, which he entered in triumph. By a succession of victories he gradually enlarged and consolidated the empire, which now extended from the frontiers of Egypt in the west to the mountains of Elam in the east, and thus carried almost to completion the ambitious designs of Tiglath-pileser (q.v.). He was murdered by one of his own soldiers (B.C. 705) in his palace at Khorsabad, after a reign of sixteen years, and was succeeded by his son Sennacherib. 
DIBON|Pining; wasting.  (1.) A city in Moab ( Numbers 21:30 ); called also Dibon-gad ( 33:45 ), because it was built by Gad and Dimon ( Isaiah 15:9 ). It has been identified with the modern Diban, about 3 miles north of the Arnon and 12 miles east of the Dead Sea. (see  Moabite Stone .) (2.) A city of the tribe of Judah, inhabited after the Captivity ( Nehemiah 11:25 ); called also Dimonah ( Joshua 15:22 ). It is probably the modern ed-Dheib. 
BILEAM|     bil'-e-am (bil`am; Iblaam): A town in the territory of Manasseh assigned to the Kohathite Levites ( 1 Chronicles 6:70 ), probably the same as Ibleam ( Joshua 17:11 , etc.), and identical with the modern Bel`ameh, half a mile South of Jenin.
HEPHERITES|   HEPHER;   he'-fer, he'-fer-its (chepher, chephri):  (1) Septuagint Hopher ( Numbers 26:32 ;  Numbers 27:1   Joshua 17:2 f ), the head of a family or clan of the tribe of Manasseh. The clan is called the Hepherites in  Numbers 26:32 .  (2) Septuagint Hephal ( 1 Chronicles 4:6 ), a man of Judah.  (3) Septuagint Hopher ( 1 Chronicles 11:36 ), one of David's heroes.
ZIZAH|A Gershonite Levite ( 1 Chronicles 23:11 ). 
SHASHAI|     sha'-shi (shashay; Sesei): One of the sons of Bani who had married foreign wives ( Ezra 10:40 ) = "Sesis" in 1 Esdras 9:34.
HARODITE|An epithet applied to two of David's heroes ( 2 Samuel 23:25 ). (Comp.  1 Chronicles 11:27. ) 
FULNESS| (1.) Of time ( Galatians 4:4 ), the time appointed by God, and foretold by the prophets, when Messiah should appear.  (2.) Of Christ ( John 1:16 ), the superabundance of grace with which he was filled.  (3.) Of the Godhead bodily dwelling in Christ ( Colossians 2:9 ), i.e., the whole nature and attributes of God are in Christ.  (4.)  Ephesians 1:23 , the church as the fulness of Christ, i.e., the church makes Christ a complete and perfect head. 
ESAU|Hairy, Rebekah's first-born twin son ( Genesis 25:25 ). The name of Edom, "red", was also given to him from his conduct in connection with the red lentil "pottage" for which he sold his birthright (30,  31). The circumstances connected with his birth foreshadowed the enmity which afterwards subsisted between the twin brothers and the nations they founded ( 25:22 ,  23,  26). In process of time Jacob, following his natural bent, became a shepherd; while Esau, a "son of the desert," devoted himself to the perilous and toilsome life of a huntsman. On a certain occasion, on returning from the chase, urged by the cravings of hunger, Esau sold his birthright to his brother, Jacob, who thereby obtained the covenant blessing ( Genesis 27:28 ,  29,  36;  Hebrews 12:16 ,  17). He afterwards tried to regain what he had so recklessly parted with, but was defeated in his attempts through the stealth of his brother ( Genesis 27:4 ,  34,  38). At the age of forty years, to the great grief of his parents, he married ( Genesis 26:34 ,  35) two Canaanitish maidens, Judith, the daughter of Beeri, and Bashemath, the daughter of Elon. When Jacob was sent away to Padan-aram, Esau tried to conciliate his parents ( Genesis 28:8 ,  9) by marrying his cousin Mahalath, the daughter of Ishmael. This led him to cast in his lot with the Ishmaelite tribes; and driving the Horites out of Mount Seir, he settled in that region. After some thirty years' sojourn in Padan-aram Jacob returned to Canaan, and was reconciled to Esau, who went forth to meet him ( 33:4 ). Twenty years after this, Isaac their father died, when the two brothers met, probably for the last time, beside his grave ( 35:29 ). Esau now permanently left Canaan, and established himself as a powerful and wealthy chief in the land of Edom (q.v.). Long after this, when the descendants of Jacob came out of Egypt, the Edomites remembered the old quarrel between the brothers, and with fierce hatred they warred against Israel. 
PHALTIEL|     fal'-ti-el (palTi'el; Syriac "Psaltiel"; Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) and the King James Version Salathiel): "The captain of the people" who came to Esdras between his first and second vision (2 Esdras 5:16). Fritzsche (Libri Apocrypha vet. test.) reads "Phalthiel."  See  PALTIEL .
HAMAN|(of Persian origin), magnificent, the name of the vizier (i.e.,  the prime minister) of the Persian king Ahasuerus ( Esther 3:1 ,  etc.). He is called an "Agagite," which seems to denote that he was descended from the royal family of the Amalekites, the bitterest enemies of the Jews, as Agag was one of the titles of the Amalekite kings. He or his parents were brought to Persia as captives taken in war. He was hanged on the gallows which he had erected for Mordecai the Jew ( Esther 7:10 ). (See Esther.) 
JIPHTHAHEL|     jif'-tha-el.  See  IPHTAH-EL .
BEELIADA|     be-e-li'-a-da (be`elyadha`, "the Lord knows"; ELIADA, which see; compare HPN, 144, 192, note 1, 202): A son of David ( 1 Chronicles 14:7 ).
REZIN|Firm; a prince, a king of Syria, who joined Pekah (q.v.) in an invasion of the kingdom of Judah ( 2 Kings 15:37 ;  16:5 -9;  Isaiah 7:1 -8). Ahaz induced Tiglath-pileser III. to attack Damascus, and this caused Rezin to withdraw for the purpose of defending his own kingdom. Damascus was taken, and Rezin was slain in battle by the Assyrian king, and his people carried into captivity, B.C. 732 ( 2 Kings 16:9 ). 
ELLASAR|The oak or heap of Assyria, a territory in Asia of which Arioch was king ( Genesis 14:1 ,  9). It is supposed that the old Chaldean town of Larsa was the metropolis of this kingdom, situated nearly half-way between Ur (now Mugheir) and Erech, on the left bank of the Euphrates. This town is represented by the mounds of Senkereh, a little to the east of Erech. 
JARESIAH|     jar-e-si'-a: the King James Version for JAARESHIAH (which see).
JOHA|     jo'-ha (yocha, meaning unknown, but perhaps = yo'ach "Joah"; see HPN, 283, note 4):  (1) A Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 8:16 ).  (2) One of David's mighty men ( 1 Chronicles 11:45 ).
GOODS|   COMMUNITY OF   ko-mu'-ni-ti, (hapanta koina eichon, literally, "They had all things (in) common"): In  Acts 2:44 , it is said that, in the infant church at Jerusalem, "all that believed were together, and had all things common," and ( Acts 4:34 ) "as many as were possessors of lands or houses sold them, and brought the prices of the things that were sold, and laid them at the apostles' feet." The inference from this, that there was an absolute disposal of all the property of all the members of the church, and that its proceeds were contributed to a common fund, has been disputed upon the ground that the example of Barnabas in selling "a field" for this purpose ( Acts 4:37 ) would not have been mentioned, if this had been the universal rule. The thought conveyed is that all believers in that church held their property as a trust from the Lord, for the benefit of the entire brotherhood, and, as there was need, did as Barnabas.  No commandment, of which record has been preserved, prescribed any such course. It came from the spontaneous impulse of the sense of brotherhood in Christ, when the band of disciples was still small, making them in a sense one family, and under the external constraint of extreme want and persecution. So much there was, that they realized, under such conditions they had in common, that they were ready to extend this to all things. It was, in a sense, a continuance of the practice of a common purse in the band of immediate followers of our Lord during his ministry. The penalty inflicted on Ananias and Sapphira was not for any failure to comply fully with this custom, but because this freedom which they possessed ( Acts 5:4 ) they falsely professed to have renounced, thus receiving in the estimation of their brethren a credit that was not their due. This custom did not last long. It was possible only within a limited circle, and under very peculiar circumstances. The New Testament recognizes the right of individual property and makes no effort to remove the differences that exist among believers themselves. The community of goods which it renders possible is spiritual ( 1 Corinthians 3:21 f ), and not one of visible and external things. With respect to the latter, it enjoins upon the Christian, as a steward of God, the possession and administration of property for the progress of the kingdom of God, and the highest interests of men. The spirit of  Acts 4:34  is always to pervade the association of believers as a true Christian community. Meyer, on the above passage, has suggested that it is not unlikely that the well-known poverty of the church at Jerusalem, and its long dependence upon the alms of other churches, may be connected with this early communistic practice, which, however justifiable and commendable at the time, bore its inevitable fruits in a subsequent season of great scarcity and lack of employment.  H. E. Jacobs  GOODS  goodz (rekhush, Tubh; ta huparchonta): In the Old Testament rekhush ("substance") is most frequently translated "goods," as in  Genesis 14:11, 12, 16, 21 , etc.; Tubh is also 3 times so translated in the King James Version ( Genesis 24:10 , the Revised Version (British and American) "goodly things," margin "all the goods";  Nehemiah 9:25 , the Revised Version (British and American) "good things";  Job 20:21 , the Revised Version (British and American) "prosperity"). Other words, are 'on ( Job 20:10 , the Revised Version (British and American) "wealth"); Chayil ("force,"  Numbers 31:9 ; Ze 1:13, the Revised Version (British and American) "wealth"); Tobh ( Deuteronomy 28:11 , the Revised Version (British and American) "for good";  Ecclesiastes 5:11 ); mela'khah ("work,"  Exodus 22:8, 11 ); nikhcin (Aramaic "riches,"  Ezra 6:8 ;  Ezra 7:26 ); Qinyan, "getting" ( Ezekiel 38:12 f ). We have ta huparchonta (literally, "the things existing") in  Matthew 24:47 , "ruler over all his goods," the Revised Version (British and American) "all that he hath," etc. Agathos is translated "goods" in  Luke 12:18 ; skeuos ("instrument") in  Matthew 12:29   Mark 3:27 ; ta sa ("the things belonging to thee") in  Luke 6:30 ; ousia ("substance") in  Luke 15:12 , the Revised Version (British and American) "substance"; huparxis ("existence," "substance") in  Acts 2:45 ; plouteo ("to be rich") in  Revelation 3:17 , the Revised Version (British and American) "have gotten riches." In the Revised Version (British and American) "goods" stands instead of "carriage" ( Judges 18:21 ), of "stuff" ( Luke 17:31 ), of "good" (1  John 3:17 ). "Goods" was used in the sense of "possessions" generally; frequently in this sense in Apocrypha (1 Esdras 6:32); ta huparchonta (Tobit 1:20); Ecclesiasticus 5:1, "Set not thy heart upon thy goods" (chrema), etc.  W. L. Walker
RAKKON|A place upon the shore, a town belonging to Dan ( Joshua 19:46 ). It is now Tell er-Rakkeit, 6 miles north of Joppa, on the sea-shore, near the mouth of the river `Aujeh, i.e., "yellow water." (see  KANAH .) 
ESHKALONITE|     esh'-ka-lon-it.  See  ASHKELONITES .
EZBON|     ez'-bon:  (1) ('etsbon; Peshitta, 'etsba`on; Septuagint Thasoban): A son of Gad ( Genesis 46:16 ) = Ozni of  Numbers 26:16  (see OZNI).  (2) ('etsbon; Septuagint Asebon): In  1 Chronicles 7:7  is said to be a grandson of Benjamin. Curtis (Ch., 148) holds that the genealogical table there is that of Zebulun and not Benjamin, and says that Ezbon suggests Ibzan ( Judges 12:8-10 ), a minor judge of Bethlehem of Zebulun (Moore, Judges, 310).
ROBOAM|     ro-bo'-am (Rhoboam). the King James Version; Greek form of "Rehoboam" (thus the Revised Version (British and American)) ( Matthew 1:7 ); successor of Solomon.
EBEDMELECH|A servant of the king; probably an official title, an Ethiopian, "one of the eunuchs which was in the king's house;" i.e., in the palace of Zedekiah, king of Judah. He interceded with the king in Jeremiah's behalf, and was the means of saving him from death by famine ( Jeremiah 38:7 -13: Comp.  39:15 -18). 
LEAH|Weary, the eldest daughter of Laban, and sister of Rachel ( Genesis 29:16 ). Jacob took her to wife through a deceit of her father ( Genesis 29:23 ). She was "tender-eyed" (17). She bore to Jacob six sons (32-35), also one daughter, Dinah ( 30:21 ). She accompanied Jacob into Canaan, and died there before the time of the going down into Egypt ( Genesis 31 ), and was buried in the cave of Machpelah ( 49:31 ). 
INTREATY|   INTREAT; ; (ENTREAT)  in-tret', in-tret'-i: The two forms are derived from the same verb. In 1611 the spelling was indifferently "intreat" or "entreat." In editions of the King James Version since 1760 "intreat" is used in the sense of "to beg"; "entreat" in the sense of "deal with." As examples of "intreat" see  Exodus 8:8 , "Intreat the Lord" (tsa`aq);  Ruth 1:16 , "Intreat me not to leave thee" (pagha`);  2 Corinthians 8:4 , "praying us with much entreaty" paraklesis). In  Genesis 25:21  "intreat" is used to indicate the success of a petition. For entreat see  Genesis 12:16 , "He entreated Abraham well";  Acts 27:3 , "And Julius courteously entreated Paul" (philanthropos chresamenos, literally, "to use in a philanthropic way"); compare also  James 3:17 , where eupeithes, literally, "easily persuaded," is translated "easy to be entreated."  The Revised Version changes all passages of the King James Version where "intreat" is found to "entreat," with the exception of those mentioned below. The meaning of "entreat" is "to ask," "to beseech," "to supplicate":  Job 19:17  reads "and my supplication to the children" (hannothi, the King James Version "though I entreated for the children," the Revised Version, margin "I make supplication").  Jeremiah 15:11  reads, "I will cause the enemy to make supplication" (hiphga'ti), instead, the King James Version "I will cause the enemy to entreat" (the Revised Version margin "I will intercede for thee with the enemy").  1 Timothy 5:1  changes the King James Version "intreat" to "exhort."  Philippians 4:3  renders the King James Version "entreat" by "beseech."  Russell Benjamin Miller
SHUR|An enclosure; a wall, a part, probably, of the Arabian desert, on the north-eastern border of Egypt, giving its name to a wilderness extending from Egypt toward Philistia ( Genesis 16:7 ;  20:1 ;  25:18 ;  Exodus 15:22 ). The name was probably given to it from the wall (or shur) which the Egyptians built to defend their frontier on the north-east from the desert tribes. This wall or line of fortifications extended from Pelusium to Heliopolis. 
IMRAH|     im'-ra (yimrah): A descendant of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 7:36 ).
SILAS|Wood, a prominent member of the church at Jerusalem; also called Silvanus. He and Judas, surnamed Barsabas, were chosen by the church there to accompany Paul and Barnabas on their return to Antioch from the council of the apostles and elders ( Acts 15:22 ), as bearers of the decree adopted by the council. He assisted Paul there in his evangelistic labours, and was also chosen by him to be his companion on his second missionary tour ( Acts 16:19 -24). He is referred to in the epistles under the name of Silvanus ( 2 Corinthians 1:19 ;  1 Thessalonians 1:1 ;  2 Thessalonians 1:1 ;  1 Peter 5:12 ). There is no record of the time or place of his death. 
SHERIFFS|( Dan. 3:2 ), Babylonian officers. 
ITTAHKAZIN|   ITTAH-KAZIN  it-a-ka'-zin (`ittah qatsin):  Joshua 19:13  the King James Version for Eth-kazin. Ittah is correctly Eth with He locale, meaning "toward Eth."
BENHANAN|   BEN-HANAN  ben-ha'-nan (ben-chanan, "son of grace"): A son of Shimon of the house of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:20 ).
HABOR|The united stream, or, according to others, with beautiful banks, the name of a river in Assyria, and also of the district through which it flowed ( 1 Chronicles 5:26 ). There is a river called Khabur which rises in the central highlands of Kurdistan, and flows south-west till it falls into the Tigris, about 70 miles above Mosul. This was not, however, the Habor of Scripture. There is another river of the same name (the Chaboras) which, after a course of about 200 miles, flows into the Euphrates at Karkesia, the ancient Circesium. This was, there can be little doubt, the ancient Habor. 
ZACCAI|Pure, one whose "sons" returned with Zerubbabel to Jerusalem ( Ezra 2:9 ;  Nehemiah 7:14 ). (see  ZABBAI .) 
HATTIL|     hat'-il (chaTTil): A company of servants of Solomon appearing in the post-exilic literature ( Ezra 2:57   Nehemiah 7:59 ). Same called "Agia" in 1 Esdras 5:34.
SHALMANESER|     shal-ma-ne'-zer (shalman'ecer; Septuagint Samennasar, Salmandsar): The name of several Assyrian kings. See  ASSYRIA ;  CAPTIVITY . It is Shalmaneser IV who is mentioned in the Biblical history ( 2 Kings 17:3 ;  2 Kings 18:9 ). He succeeded Tiglathpileser on the throne in 727 B.C., but whether he was a son of his predecessor, or a usurper, is not apparent. His reign was short, and, as no annals of it have come to light, we have only the accounts contained in 2 Kings for his history. In the passages referred to above, we learn that Hoshea, king of Israel, who had become his vassal, refused to continue the payment of tribute, relying upon help from So, king of Egypt. No help, however, came from Egypt, and Hoshea had to face the chastising forces of his suzerain with his own unaided resources, the result being that he was taken prisoner outside Samaria and most likely carried away to Nineveh. The Biblical narrative goes on to say that the king of Assyria came up throughout all the land, and went up to Samaria and besieged it 3 years. There is reason to believe that, as the siege of Samaria was proceeding, Shalmaneser retired to Nineveh and died, for, when the city was taken in 722 B.C., it is Sargon who claims, in his copious annals, to have captured it and carried its inhabitants into captivity. It is just possible that Shalman ( Hosea 10:14 ) is a contraction for Shalmaneser, but the identity of Shalman and of Beth-arbel named in the same passage is not sufficiently made out.  LITERATURE.  Schrader, COT, I, 258;; McCurdy, HPM, I, 387;.  T. Nicol
HEGAI|Eunuch, had charge of the harem of Ahasuerus ( Esther 2:8 ). 
TIGRIS|     ti'-gris (Tigris, the Greek equivalent of the Hebrew chiddeqel): One of the rivers of Eden going "eastward to Assyria" ( Genesis 2:14  margin), called the Great River ( Daniel 10:4 ), elsewhere mentioned in the apocryphal books, as in Tob 6:1; Judith 1:6; Ecclesiasticus 24:25, called Diglath in Josephus, and Diglit in Pliny, now called in Mesopotamia Dijleh, generally supposed to be a Semitic corruption of Tigra, meaning originally an arrow, which from its rapidity of motion is symbolized. The Tigris rises in the mountains of Armenia, latitude 38 degrees 10 minutes, longitude 39 degrees 20 minutes, only a few miles from the main branch of the Euphrates. After pursuing a tortuous southeasterly course for 150 miles, it is joined by the east branch at Osman Kieui, some distance below Diarbekr. Here the stream is 450 ft. wide and 3 or 4 ft. deep. Passing through numerous mountain gorges for another 150 miles, it emerges into the region of low hills about Nineveh, and a little below into the great alluvial plain of Mesopotamia. Thence in its course to Bagdad it is joined by the Great Zab, the Lesser Zab, the Adhem, and the Diyaleh rivers, bringing a large amount of water from the Zagros Mountains. At Bagdad the overflows from the Euphrates in high water often increase the inundations. The flood season begins early in the month of March, reaching its climax about May 1, declining to its natural level by midsummer. In October and November, the volume of water increases considerably, but not so much as to overflow its banks. Below Bagdad, throughout the region of Babylonia proper, the Tigris joins with the Euphrates in furnishing the water for irrigation so successfully used in ancient times. English engineers are at present with great promise of success aiming to restore the irrigating systems of the region and the prosperity of ancient times. The total length of the river is 1,146 miles. It now joins the Euphrates about 40 miles Northwest of the Persian Gulf, the two streams there forming the Shat el Arab, but in early historical times they entered the Persian Gulf by separate mouths, the Gulf then extending a considerable distance above the present junction of the rivers, the sediment of the streams having silted up the head of the Gulf to that distance.  See also  EDEN .  George Frederick Wright
REBA|Fourth, one of the Midianite chiefs slain by the Israelites in the wilderness ( Numbers 31:8 ;  Joshua 13:21 ). 
DABERATH|Pasture, a Levitical town of Issachar ( Joshua 19:12 ;  21:28 ), near the border of Zebulum. It is the modern small village of Deburich, at the base of Mount Tabor. Tradition has incorrectly made it the scene of the miracle of the cure of the lunatic child ( Matthew 17:14 ). 
ELIAS|The Greek form of Elijah ( Matthew 11:14 ;  16:14 ,  etc.), which the Revised Version has uniformly adopted in the New Testament. (see  ELIJAH .) 
GIRGASHITE|Dwelling in clayey soil, the descendants of the fifth son of Canaan ( Genesis 10:16 ), one of the original tribes inhabiting the land of Canaan before the time of the Israelites ( Genesis 15:21 ;  Deuteronomy 7:1 ). They were a branch of the great family of the Hivites. Of their geographical position nothing is certainly known. Probably they lived somewhere in the central part of Western Palestine. 
MOZA|A going forth.  (1.) One of the sons of Caleb ( 1 Chronicles 2:46 ). (2.) The son of Zimri, of the posterity of Saul ( 1 Chronicles 8:36 ,  37;  9:42 ,  43). 
SIGNS|    OF THE HEAVENS  See  ASTRONOMY, sec . I, 4.  SIGNS, NUMERICAL  nu-mer'-i-kal.  See  NUMBER .
SHINAR|Shinar, The Land of  LXX. and Vulgate "Senaar;" in the inscriptions, "Shumir;" probably identical with Babylonia or Southern Mesopotamia, extending almost to the Persian Gulf. Here the tower of Babel was built ( Genesis 11:1 -6), and the city of Babylon. The name occurs later in Jewish history ( Isaiah 11:11 ;  Zechariah 5:11 ). Shinar was apparently first peopled by Turanian tribes, who tilled the land and made bricks and built cities. Then tribes of Semites invaded the land and settled in it, and became its rulers. This was followed in course of time by an Elamite invasion; from which the land was finally delivered by Khammurabi, the son of Amarpel ("Amraphel,  king of Shinar, "  Genesis 14:1 ), who became the founder of the new empire of Chaldea. (see  AMRAPHEL .) 
GIAH|     gi'-a (giach): A place on the route followed by Abner in his flight, pursued by Joab ( 2 Samuel 2:24 ). Septuagint renders Gai, corresponding to the Hebrew ge, "valley." The form giach may be due to corruption of the text.
PASHUR|Release.  (1.) The son of Immer (probably the same as Amariah,   Nehemiah 10:3 ;  12:2 ), the head of one of the priestly courses, was "chief governor [Hebrews paqid nagid, meaning "deputy governor"] of the temple" ( Jeremiah 20:1 ,  2). At this time the nagid, or "governor," of the temple was Seraiah the high priest ( 1 Chronicles 6:14 ), and Pashur was his paqid, or "deputy." Enraged at the plainness with which Jeremiah uttered his solemn warnings of coming judgements, because of the abounding iniquity of the times, Pashur ordered the temple police to seize him, and after inflicting on him corporal punishment (forty stripes save one,   Deuteronomy 25:3 ; Comp.  2 Corinthians 11:24 ), to put him in the stocks in the high gate of Benjamin, where he remained all night. On being set free in the morning, Jeremiah went to Pashur ( Jeremiah 20:3 ,  5), and announced to him that God had changed his name to Magor-missabib, i.e., "terror on every side." The punishment that fell upon him was probably remorse, when he saw the ruin he had brought upon his country by advising a close alliance with Egypt in opposition to the counsels of Jeremiah ( 20:4 -6). He was carried captive to Babylon, and died there. (2.) A priest sent by king Zedekiah to Jeremiah to inquire of the Lord ( 1 Chronicles 24:9 ;  Jeremiah 21:1 ;  38:1 -6). He advised that the prophet should be put to death. (3.) The father of Gedaliah. He was probably the same as (1). 
CHALDEA|The southern portion of Babylonia, Lower Mesopotamia, lying chiefly on the right bank of the Euphrates, but commonly used of the whole of the Mesopotamian plain. The Hebrew name is Kasdim, which is usually rendered "Chaldeans" ( Jeremiah 50:10 ;  51:24 , 35). The country so named is a vast plain formed by the deposits of the Euphrates and the Tigris, extending to about 400 miles along the course of these rivers, and about 100 miles in average breadth. "In former days the vast plains of Babylon were nourished by a complicated system of canals and water-courses, which spread over the surface of the country like a network. The wants of a teeming population were supplied by a rich soil, not less bountiful than that on the banks of the Egyptian Nile. Like islands rising from a golden sea of waving corn stood frequent groves of palm-trees and pleasant gardens, affording to the idler or traveller their grateful and highly-valued shade. Crowds of passengers hurried along the dusty roads to and from the busy city. The land was rich in corn and wine." Recent discoveries, more especially in Babylonia, have thrown much light on the history of the Hebrew patriarchs, and have illustrated or confirmed the Biblical narrative in many points. The ancestor of the Hebrew people, Abram, was, we are told, born at "Ur of the Chaldees." "Chaldees" is a mistranslation of the Hebrew Kasdim, Kasdim being the Old Testament name of the Babylonians, while the Chaldees were a tribe who lived on the shores of the Persian Gulf, and did not become a part of the Babylonian population till the time of Hezekiah. Ur was one of the oldest and most famous of the Babylonian cities. Its site is now called Mugheir, or Mugayyar, on the western bank of the Euphrates, in Southern Babylonia. About a century before the birth of Abram it was ruled by a powerful dynasty of kings. Their conquests extended to Elam on the one side, and to the Lebanon on the other. They were followed by a dynasty of princes whose capital was Babylon, and who seem to have been of South Arabian origin. The founder of the dynasty was Sumu-abi ("Shem is my father"). But soon afterwards Babylonia fell under Elamite dominion. The kings of Babylon were compelled to acknowledge the supremacy of Elam, and a rival kingdom to that of Babylon, and governed by Elamites, sprang up at Larsa, not far from Ur, but on the opposite bank of the river. In the time of Abram the king of Larsa was Eri-Aku, the son of an Elamite prince, and Eri-Aku, as has long been recognized, is the Biblical "Arioch king of Ellasar" ( Genesis 14:1 ). The contemporaneous king of Babylon in the north, in the country termed Shinar in Scripture, was Khammu-rabi. (see  BABYLON ; see  ABRAHAM ; AMRAPHEL.) 
MITYLENE|The chief city of the island of Lesbos, on its east coast, in the AEgean Sea. Paul, during his third missionary journey, touched at this place on his way from Corinth to Judea ( Acts 20:14 ), and here tarried for a night. It lies between Assos and Chios. It is now under the Turkish rule, and bears the name of Metelin. 
THEOPHILUS|Lover of God, a Christian, probably a Roman, to whom Luke dedicated both his Gospel ( Luke 1:3 ) and the Acts of the Apostles ( 1:1 ). Nothing beyond this is known of him. From the fact that Luke applies to him the title "most excellent", the same title Paul uses in addressing Felix ( Acts 23:26 ;  24:3 ) and Festus ( 26:25 ), it has been concluded that Theophilus was a person of rank, perhaps a Roman officer. 
BIZIOTHIAH|     biz-yo-thi'-a, biz-joth'-ja (bizyotheyah; Septuagint hai komai auton, literally "their villages"; the King James Version Bizjothjah, "place of Jah's olives" (Young), or "contempt of Jah" (Strong)): According to Massoretic Text, a town in the south of Judah, near Beersheba ( Joshua 15:28 ). Septuagint reads "and her daughters," only one consonant of Massoretic Text being read differently; and so We, Hollenberg, Di and others The Septuagint has probably preserved the original text (compare  Nehemiah 11:27 ).
NAHARI|   NAHARAI;   na'-ha-ri, (nacharay), na'-ha-ri (nachray): One of David's heroes, Joab's armor-bearer ( 2 Samuel 23:37 , the King James Version "Nahari";  1 Chronicles 11:39 ).
JESUITES|     jes'-u-its.  See  ISHVI .
TABEEL|A Persian governor of Samaria, who joined others in the attempt to prevent the rebuilding of Jerusalem ( Ezra 4:7 ). 
CUTTINGS|    IN THE FLESH  (sereT, sareTeth): For relatives or friends to cut or beat themselves even to free blood-flowing, especially in the violence of grief in mourning for their dead (see BURIAL; MOURNING), was a widely prevalent custom among ancient peoples, and is well-nigh universal among uncivilized races today (see Spencer, Prin. of Soc., 3rd edition, I, 163). The fact is abundantly attested for most of the nations of antiquity, but there are two notable exceptions, the Egyptians (Herod. ii.61, 85; Wilkinson, Anc. Egyptian II, 374), and the Hebrews ( Deuteronomy 14:1   Leviticus 21:5 ). According to Plutarch (Sol. 21) Solon forbade the women of Athens to beat themselves to the effusion of blood, and the laws of the Twelve Tables, quoted by Cic. (De leg. ii.23) contained a like injunction. Among the ancient Arabs the forbidden practice was associated, as among the Hebrews, with the cutting off of the hair (Wellhausen, Skizzen, III, 160).  That the prohibition among the Hebrews was urgently called for is made clear by the way it is dealt with by the Law and the prophets. The Law of Holiness reads: "Ye are the children of Yahweh your God: ye shall not cut yourselves" ( Deuteronomy 14:1 ), or "make any incision" (sereT;  Leviticus 19:28 , sareTeth; Septuagint entomis) in the flesh "for the dead." Probably the earliest reference to the custom as actually prevalent among the Hebrews is in  Hosea 7:14  (ERVm). It was widely prevalent in the time of Jeremiah among his countrymen, even as among the Philistines ( Jeremiah 47:5 ) and the Moabites ( Jeremiah 48:37 ; compare  Amos 8:10   Isaiah 3:24 ;  Isaiah 15:2 ;  Isaiah 22:12   Micah 1:16   Ezekiel 7:18 ).  In seeking for the reason or purpose underlying all such prohibitions, we may note, first, that the "cuttings" and "baldness" forbidden are alike said to be "for the dead." Not less explicitly are they said to be incompatible with Israel's unique relation to Yahweh-a relation at once of sonship ( Deuteronomy 14:1 ) and of consecration ( Deuteronomy 14:2 ). Moreover such mutilations of the body are always dealt with as forming part of the religious rites of the heathen (as of the Canaanitish Baal ( 1 Kings 18:28 ) note "after their manner," see article in HDB, under the word). Both such shedding of blood and the dedication of the hair are found in almost all countries of that day in intimate connection with the rituals of burial and the prevailing belief in the necessity of propitiating the spirit of the deceased. The conclusion, then, seems clearly warranted that such tokens of grief were prohibited because they carried with them inevitably ideas and associations distinctly heathen in character and so incompatible with the pure religion of Yahweh, and unworthy of those who had attained to the dignity of the sons ("children") of Yahweh.  See also  STIGMATA, MARK;  LITERATURE .  Benzinger, Heb Arch., section 23; Nowack, Heb Arch., I, 33; Tylor, Prim. Cult.; W. R. Smith, Rel Semitic, Lect IX; and Comm., Knobel-Dillmann, Exodus-Leviticus on  Leviticus 19:28 ; Driver, De on 14:1; and Lightfoot, Galatians on 6:17.  George B. Eager
PRESSFAT|     pres'-fat ( Haggai 2:16  in the King James Version, the English Revised Version "winefat," the American Standard Revised Version "winevat").  See  WINE .
CARCHEMISH|Fortress of Chemosh, a city on the west bank of the Euphrates ( Jeremiah 46:2 ;  2 Chronicles 35:20 ), not, as was once supposed, the Circesium at the confluence of the Chebar and the Euphrates, but a city considerably higher up the river, and commanding the ordinary passage of the Euphrates; probably identical with Hierapolis. It was the capital of the kingdom of the northern Hittites. The Babylonian army, under Nebuchadnezzar, the son of Nabopolassar, here met and conquered the army of Pharaoh-necho, king of Egypt (B.C. 607). It is mentioned in monuments in B.C. 1600 and down to B.C. 717. 
PRISCILLA|The wife of Aquila ( Acts 18:2 ), who is never mentioned without her. Her name sometimes takes the precedence of his ( Romans 16:3 ;  2 Timothy 4:19 ). She took part with Aquila (q.v.) in insturcting Apollos ( Acts 18:26 ). 
JEDIAEL|Known by God.  (1.) One of the sons of Benjamin, whose descendants numbered 17,200 warriors ( 1 Chronicles 7:6 ,  10,  11). (2.) A Shimrite, one of David's bodyguard ( 1 Chronicles 11:45 ). Probably same as in 12:20. (3.) A Korhite of the family of Ebiasaph, and one of the gate-keepers to the temple ( 1 Chronicles 26:2 ). 
SEALSKIN|     sel'-skin: The rendering of the Revised Version (British and American) ( Exodus 25:5   Ezekiel 16:10 ) for `or tachash, the Revised Version margin "porpoise-skin," the King James Version "badgers' skin." A seal, Monachus albiventer, is found in the Mediterranean, though not in the Red Sea, but it is likely that tachash means the dugong, which is found in the Red Sea.  See  BADGER ;  PORPOISE .
ROGELIM|Fullers, a town of Gilead, the residence of Barzillai the Gileadite ( 2 Samuel 17:27 ;  19:31 ), probably near to Mahanaim. 
GOYIM|     goi'-yim.  See  GOIIM .
KIR|A wall or fortress, a place to which Tiglath-pileser carried the Syrians captive after he had taken the city of Damascus ( 2 Kings 16:9 ;  Amos 1:5 ;  9:7 ). Isaiah ( 22:6 ), who also was contemporary with these events, mentions it along with Elam. Some have supposed that Kir is a variant of Cush (Susiana), on the south of Elam.  Kir of Moab Isaiah 15:1. The two strongholds of Moab were Ar and Kir, which latter is probably the Kir-haraseth ( 16:7 ) following.
JEGARSAHADUTHA|Pile of testimony, the Aramaic or Syriac name which Laban gave to the pile of stones erected as a memorial of the covenant between him and Jacob ( Genesis 31:47 ), who, however, called it in Hebrew by an equivalent name, Galeed (q.v.). 
JERICHO|Place of fragrance, a fenced city in the midst of a vast grove of palm trees, in the plain of Jordan, over against the place where that river was crossed by the Israelites ( Joshua 3:16 ). Its site was near the `Ain es-Sultan, Elisha's Fountain ( 2 Kings 2:19 -22), about 5 miles west of Jordan. It was the most important city in the Jordan valley ( Numbers 22:1 ;  34:15 ), and the strongest fortress in all the land of Canaan. It was the key to Western Palestine. This city was taken in a very remarkable manner by the Israelites ( Joshua 6 ). God gave it into their hands. The city was "accursed" (Hebrews herem,  "devoted" to Jehovah), and accordingly ( Joshua 6:17 ; Comp.  Leviticus 27:28 ,  29;  Deuteronomy 13:16 ) all the inhabitants and all the spoil of the city were to be destroyed, "only the silver, and the gold, and the vessels of brass and of iron" were reserved and "put into the treasury of the house of Jehovah" ( Joshua 6:24 ; Comp.  Numbers 31:22 ,  23,  50-54). Only Rahab "and her father's household, and all that she had," were preserved from destruction, according to the promise of the spies ( Joshua 2:14 ). In one of the Amarna tablets Adoni-zedec (q.v.) writes to the king of Egypt informing him that the `Abiri (Hebrews) had prevailed, and had taken the fortress of Jericho, and were plundering "all the king's lands." It would seem that the Egyptian troops had before this been withdrawn from Palestine. This city was given to the tribe of Benjamin ( Joshua 18:21 ), and it was inhabited in the time of the Judges ( Judges 3:13 ;  2 Samuel 10:5 ). It is not again mentioned till the time of David ( 2 Samuel 10:5 ). "Children of Jericho" were among the captives who returned under Zerubbabel  Ezra 2:34 ;  Nehemiah 7:36 q.v.) the Bethelite attempted to make it once more a fortified city ( 1 Kings 16:34 ). Between the beginning and the end of his undertaking all his children were cut off. In New Testament times Jericho stood some distance to the south-east of the ancient one, and near the opening of the valley of Achor. It was a rich and flourishing town, having a considerable trade, and celebrated for the palm trees which adorned the plain around. It was visited by our Lord on his last journey to Jerusalem. Here he gave sight to two blind men ( Matthew 20:29 -34;  Mark 10:46 -52), and brought salvation to the house of Zacchaeus the publican ( Luke 19:2 -10). The poor hamlet of er-Riha, the representative of modern Jericho, is situated some two miles farther to the east. It is in a ruinous condition, having been destroyed by the Turks in 1840. "The soil of the plain," about the middle of which the ancient city stood, "is unsurpassed in fertility; there is abundance of water for irrigation, and many of the old aqueducts are almost perfect; yet nearly the whole plain is waste and desolate...The climate of Jericho is exceedingly hot and unhealthy. This is accounted for by the depression of the plain, which is about 1,200 feet below the level of the sea." There were three different Jerichos, on three different sites, the Jericho of Joshua, the Jericho of Herod, and the Jericho of the Crusades. Er-Riha, the modern Jericho, dates from the time of the Crusades. Dr. Bliss has found in a hollow scooped out for some purpose or other near the foot of the biggest mound above the Sultan's Spring specimens of Amorite or pre-Israelitish pottery precisely identical with what he had discovered on the site of ancient Lachish. He also traced in this place for a short distance a mud brick wall in situ, which he supposes to be the very wall that fell before the trumpets of Joshua. The wall is not far from the foot of the great precipice of Quarantania and its numerous caverns, and the spies of Joshua could easily have fled from the city and been speedily hidden in these fastnesses. 
HERODION|A Christian at Rome whom Paul salutes and calls his "kinsman" ( Romans 16:11 ). 
JAHDAI|Grasper, a descendant of Caleb, of the family of Hezron ( 1 Chronicles 2:47 ). 
SHERAH|     she'-ra.  See  SHEERAH .
KENAN|     ke'-nan (qenan; Kainan): A son of Enosh, the son of Seth ( Genesis 5:9, 10, 12, 13, 14   1 Chronicles 1:2 ). the King James Version form (except in  1 Chronicles 1:2 ), is "Cainan."
RAGUEL|Friend of God, ( Numbers 10:29 )=Reuel (q.v.),  Exodus 2:18 , the father-in-law of Moses, and probably identical with Jethro (q.v.). 
COURSES|When David was not permitted to build the temple, he proceeded, among the last Acts of his life, with the assistance of Zadok and Ahimelech, to organize the priestly and musical services to be conducted in the house of God.  (1.) He divided the priests into twenty-four courses ( 1 Chronicles 24:1 -19), sixteen being of the house of Eleazar and eight of that of Ithamar. Each course was under a head or chief, and ministered for a week, the order being determined by lot.  (2.) The rest of the 38,000 Levites ( 23:4 ) were divided also into twenty-four courses, each to render some allotted service in public worship: 4,000 in twenty-four courses were set apart as singers and musicians under separate leaders (25); 4,000 as porters or keepers of the doors and gates of the sanctuary ( 26:1 -19); and 6,000 as officers and judges to see to the administration of the law in all civil and ecclesiastical matters (20-32). This arrangement was re-established by Hezekiah ( 2 Chronicles 31:2 ); and afterwards the four sacerdotal courses which are said to have returned from the Captivity were re-divided into the original number of twenty-four by Ezra ( 6:18 ). 
ZEBOIIM|     ze-boi'-im (tsebhoyim; the Septuagint uniformly Sebo(e)im; the King James Version, Zeboim): One of the cities in the Vale of Siddim, destroyed with Sodom and Gomorrah. It is always mentioned next to Admah ( Genesis 10:19 ;  Genesis 14:2, 8   Deuteronomy 29:23   Hosea 11:8 ). It is not to be confounded with Zeboim mentioned in  1 Samuel 13:18  and  Nehemiah 11:34 . The site has not been positively identified, but must be determined by the general questions connected with the Vale of Siddim.  See  SIDDIM, VALE OF .
DATES|     dats (debhash): Arabic, dibbs ( 2 Chronicles 31:5 , King James Version margin); English Versions of the Bible HONEY (which see). See also  PALM TREE .
BETHAZMAVETH|   BETH-AZMAVETH  beth-az-ma'-veth ( Nehemiah 7:28 ).  See  AZMAVETH .
SHAMLAI|     sham'-la-i, sham'-li.  See  SALMAI .
SEMEIN|     se-me'-in (Codex Sinaiticus, Codex Vaticanus Semeein; Codex Alexandrinus Semeei, Textus Receptus of the New Testament, Semei; the King James Version, Semei): An ancestor of Jesus in Luke's genealogy ( Luke 3:26 ).
MENI|Isaiah 65:11, marg. (A.V.,  "that number;" R.V.,  "destiny"), probably an idol which the captive Israelites worshipped after the example of the Babylonians. It may have been a symbol of destiny. LXX., tuche. 
MEKONAH|A base or foundation, a town in the south of Judah ( Nehemiah 11:28 ), near Ziklag. 
TELAIM|Young lambs, a place at which Saul gathered his army to fight against Amalek ( 1 Samuel 15:4 ); probably the same as Telem (2). 
PHARPAR|Swift, one of the rivers of Damascus ( 2 Kings 5:12 ). It has been identified with the `Awaj, "a small lively river." The whole of the district watered by the `Awaj is called the Wady el-`Ajam, i.e., "the valley of the Persians", so called for some unknown reason. This river empties itself into the lake or marsh Bahret Hijaneh, on the east of Damascus. One of its branches bears the modern name of Wady Barbar, which is probably a corruption of Pharpar. 
GAZITES|     gaz'-its:  Inhabitants of Gaza, who were Philistines when the Israelites came into contact with them ( Joshua 13:3   Judges 16:2 ), but there was an older stratum of population which occupied the place before the invasion of the Philistines, probably of Amorite stock.
JEDAIAH| (1.) Invoker of Jehovah. The son of Shimri, a chief Simeonite ( 1 Chronicles 4:37 ). (2.) One of those who repaired the walls of Jerusalem after the return from Babylon ( Nehemiah 3:10 ). (3.) Knowing Jehovah. The chief of one of the courses of the priests ( 1 Chronicles 24:7 ). (4.) A priest in Jerusalem after the Exile ( 1 Chronicles 9:10 ). 
GEDERITE|     ge'-der-it, ge-de'-rit (gedheri): Inhabitant of GEDER, which see ( 1 Chronicles 27:28 ).
JEUEL|Snatched away by God, a descendant of Zerah ( 1 Chronicles 9:6 ). 
KEZIZ|Abrupt; cut off, a city of the tribe of Benjamin ( Joshua 18:21 ). 
OHOLIBAH|     W. W. Davies
SHEBARIM|Breaks; ruins, a place near Ai ( Joshua 7:5 ; R.V. marg.,  "the quarries"). 
MAZZAROTH|Prognostications, found only  Job 38:32 , probably meaning "the twelve signs" (of the zodiac), as in the margin (Comp.  2 Kings 23:5 ). 
ZEDEKIAH|Righteousness of Jehovah.  (1.) The last king of Judah. He was the third son of Josiah, and his mother's name was Hamutal, the daughter of Jeremiah of Libnah, and hence he was the brother of Jehoahaz ( 2 Kings 23:31 ;  24:17 ,  18). His original name was Mattaniah; but when Nebuchadnezzar placed him on the throne as the successor to Jehoiachin he changed his name to Zedekiah. The prophet Jeremiah was his counsellor, yet "he did evil in the sight of the Lord" ( 2 Kings 24:19 ,  20;  Jeremiah 52:2 ,  3). He ascended the throne at the age of twenty-one years. The kingdom was at that time tributary to Nebuchadnezzar; but, despite the strong remonstrances of Jeremiah and others, as well as the example of Jehoiachin, he threw off the yoke of Babylon, and entered into an alliance with Hophra, king of Egypt. This brought up Nebuchadnezzar, "with all his host" ( 2 Kings 25:1 ), against Jerusalem. During this siege, which lasted about eighteen months, "every worst woe befell the devoted city, which drank the cup of God's fury to the dregs" ( 2 Kings 25:3 ;  Lamentations 4:4 ,  5,  10). The city was plundered and laid in ruins. Zedekiah and his followers, attempting to escape, were made captive and taken to Riblah. There, after seeing his own children put to death, his own eyes were put out, and, being loaded with chains, he was carried captive (B.C. 588) to Babylon ( 2 Kings 25:1 -7;  2 Chronicles 36:12 ;  Jeremiah 32:4 , 5;  34:2 ,  3;  39:1 -7;  52:4 -11;  Ezek. 12:12 ), where he remained a prisoner, how long is unknown, to the day of his death. After the fall of Jerusalem, Nebuzaraddan was sent to carry out its complete destruction. The city was razed to the ground. Only a small number of vinedressers and husbandmen were permitted to remain in the land ( Jeremiah 52:16 ). Gedaliah, with a Chaldean guard stationed at Mizpah, ruled over Judah ( 2 Kings 25:22 ,  24;  Jeremiah 40:1 ,  2,  5,  6). (2.) The son of Chenaanah, a false prophet in the days of Ahab ( 1 Kings 22:11 ,  24;  2 Chronicles 18:10 ,  23). (3.) The son of Hananiah, a prince of Judah in the days of Jehoiakim ( Jeremiah 36:12 ).  
OG|Gigantic, the king of Bashan, who was defeated by Moses in a pitched battle at Edrei, and was slain along with his sons ( Deuteronomy 1:4 ), and whose kingdom was given to the tribes of Reuben and Gad and half the tribe of Manasseh ( Numbers 21:32 -35;  Deuteronomy 3:1 -13). His bedstead (or rather sarcophagus) was of iron (or ironstone), 9 cubits in length and 4 cubits in breadth. His overthrow was afterwards celebrated in song ( Psalm 135:11 ;  136:20 ). (see  SIHON .) 
KITRON|Knotty, a city of Zebulun ( Judges 1:30 ), called also Kattath ( Joshua 19:15 ); supposed to be "Cana of Galilee." 
MAGORMISSABIB|Fear on every side, ( Jeremiah 20:3 ), a symbolical name given to the priest Pashur, expressive of the fate announced by the prophet as about to come upon him. Pashur was to be carried to Babylon, and there die. 
COTES|Pens or enclosures for flocks ( 2 Chronicles 32:28 ,  "cotes for flocks;" R.V.,  "flocks in folds"). 
CORDS|   , SMALL  kordz (schoinion, the diminutive of schoinos, "a rush," hence, "a rope of rushes"): Translated "small cords" ( John 2:15  the King James Version; the Revised Version (British and American) "cords"). The same word is translated "ropes" in  Acts 27:32 . See also  Job 41:2  margin.
SALCAH|Wandering, a city of Bashan assigned to the half tribe of Manasseh ( Deuteronomy 3:10 ;  Joshua 12:5 ;  13:11 ), identified with Salkhad, about 56 miles east of Jordan. 
NACHON|Prepared, the owner of a thrashing-floor near which Uzzah was slain ( 2 Samuel 6:6 ); called also Chidon ( 1 Chronicles 13:9 ). 
KINAH|An elegy, a city in the extreme south of Judah ( Joshua 15:22 ). It was probably not far from the Dead Sea, in the Wady Fikreh. 
HILEN|     hi-len (chilen): A city in the hill country of Judah, probably West or Southwest of Hebron, assigned with its suburbs to the Levites ( 1 Chronicles 6:58  (Hebrew 43)). The form of the name in  Joshua 15:51 ;  Joshua 21:15  is HOLON (which see).
JOSEDECH|   ; JOSEDEK  jos'-e-dek, jos'e-dek (Iosedek): Father of Jeshua (1 Esdras 5:5). In  Haggai 1:1  the Revised Version (British and American), the relationship is described as "Joshua the son of JEHOZADAK (which see), the high priest."
KARKAA|A floor; bottom, a place between Adar and Azmon, about midway between the Mediterranean and the Dead Sea ( Joshua 15:3 ). 
HASHBADANA|Consideration in judging, stood at Ezra's left hand when he read the law ( Nehemiah 8:4 ). 
CARMI|Vine-dresser.  (1.) The last named of the four sons of Reuben ( Genesis 46:9 ). (2.) A descendant of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:1 ). He is elsewhere ( 2:18 ) called Caleb (q.v.). (3.) The son of Zimri, and the father of Achan ( Joshua 7:1 ), "the troubler of Israel." 
OBED|Serving; worshipping.  (1.) A son of Boaz and Ruth ( Ruth 4:21 ,  22), and the grandfather of David ( Matthew 1:5 ). (2.)  1 Chronicles 2:34 -38. (3.)  1 Chronicles 26:7 . (4.)  2 Chronicles 23:1 . 
HIRAH|     hi'-ra (chirah; Septuagint Eiras): A native of Adullam, and a "friend" of Judah ( Genesis 38:1, 12 ). The Septuagint and the Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) both describe him as Judah's "shepherd."
PRAYERS|    OF CHRIST  1. The Lord's Prayer  2. Christ's Doctrine of Prayer: Sacredness, Importunity, Conditions  3. Prayers Offered by Christ  (1) The High-priestly Prayer  (2) The Prayer in Gethsemane  (3) The Prayers on the Cross  (4) Prayer after the Resurrection  (5) General Conclusions  In the history and doctrine of prayer, nothing is more important than the light shed upon the subject by the prayers of Jesus. These are to be studied in connection with His teaching concerning prayer found in the model of the Lord's Prayer, and general statements and hints to His disciples.  1. The Lord's Prayer:  This model of prayer is given in two forms ( Matthew 6:9-13   Luke 11:2-4 ). The differences of form show that exactness of similarity in words is not essential. The prayer includes adoration, supplication for the Kingdom, for personal needs, for forgiveness, for deliverance from temptation and the ascription of glory. It is at once individual and universal; it sets the recognition of divine things first, and yet clearly asserts the ethical and social relations of life.  See  LORD'S PRAYER, THE .  2. Christ's Doctrine of Prayer: Sacredness, Importunity, Conditions:  That men should pray is taken for granted ( Matthew 6:5 ). Its sacredness is involved in the command for privacy ( Matthew 6:6 ); its importunity ( Luke 11:5-9 ;  Luke 18:1-8 ); its necessary conditions of humility, absence of self righteousness ( Luke 18:9-14 ), of display and repetition ( Matthew 6:7 ); necessity of faith and a forgiving spirit ( Mark 11:24-26 ); of agreement in social prayer ( Matthew 18:19 ); submission to the will of Christ, "in my name" ( John 14:13 ).  3. Prayers Offered by Christ:  In  Matthew 11:25, 26  the King James Version, Christ thanks God: "Thou hast hid these things from the wise and prudent, and hast revealed them unto babes. Even so, Father: for so it seemed good in thy sight." This language shows the essence of prayer to be not the mere expression of need and request for what is required, but resort to God. The prayer gives us insight into the deeper experience of the Son with the Father, and His perfect submission to the Father's will, with thanksgiving even for what might seem inexplicable. It thus illustrates the truth that the highest form of prayer is found in the serenity of the soul.    Matthew 14:23  narrates the retirement of the Lord to a "mountain apart to pray." No word of what the prayer was is given, but the record is suggestive. Following a day of severe toil and probably excitement, Jesus betakes Himself to prayer. The reality, the true humanity of the Christ, are here revealed. The former prayer may almost be regarded as that of the Son of God addressed to the Father in the sublime communion of the Godhead. This passage emphatically is a prayer-scene of the Son of Man. The association of this incident of prayer in Christ's life with the miracle of walking on the sea (an example of miracle in the person of the Lord Himself, and not performed on another) opens up an interesting question of the relation of the supernatural and the natural. Here perhaps lies an explanation of the true significance of the miraculous. The communion of the Lord with a supreme Father had filled the physical nature of Jesus with spiritual forces which extended the power of the spirit over the material world beyond the limits by which man is bound in his normal and sinful condition (see Lange, Commentary on Mt;  Matthew 15:36 ; compare 14:19). Christ's recognition of God as the Giver of food, in thanks at the meal, or "asking a blessing," should be noted as an example which in modern times is largely ignored or followed as a mere formality. But it is significant; it expresses that intense and all-compelling sense of the divine which ever dwelt in Him; of which prayer is an expression, and which is evoked so naturally and becomingly at a social meal. In  Matthew 17:21 , our Lord's reference to prayer as a necessary condition of miraculous power, in the light of  Mark 7:34 , where "looking up to heaven, he sighed, and saith unto him (the deaf man), Ephphatha," may imply His own prayer in connection with the exercise of miraculous energy. This is apparently indicated in  John 11:41, 42 , although, as above, it is the expression of the intimate relation between Christ and the Father, which is the essence of prayer, and in which relation He ever exercised the fullest power of God Himself.  Matthew 19:13  records that little children were brought to Him that He should put His hands on them and pray. That He prayed is not related, but 19:15 relates that He laid His hands on them and, presumably, with the imposition, prayed. The scene is most suggestive, in the light of our Lord's words. In  Matthew 19:14  and in 26:26 Our Lord blesses the bread or gives thanks at the institution of the Supper, and has set the mode of celebration universally adopted, even giving the term Eucharist ("giving of thanks") to the service.  (1) The High-priestly Prayer.  This prayer ( John 17 ) is the special prayer of the Lord, and may be regarded as the sole example furnished by the evangelists of our Lord's method of prayer. The thanksgiving in  Matthew 11:25  is the only other instance of any extent in the report of the prayers of Jesus, but even that is brief compared to what is here furnished. The fullness of this prayer clearly shows that it was uttered in the hearing of the disciples. Their relation to it is remarkable. Auditors, they yet could not share in it. At the same time, it was a profound revelation to them both of the relation of the Master to God, and the character of the work which He had come to perform, and the part which they were to take in it. John gives us no hint as to the place in which it was spoken; 14:31 indicates a departure from the upper room. But apparently the prayer was offered where the discourses of John 15 and 16 were delivered. It has been suggested by Westcott that some spot in the temple courts was the scene of John 15; 16 and 17. It has been generally supposed that the ornament of the Golden Vine would naturally suggest the figure of the Vine and Branches which our Lord employs.  John 18:1  shows that the prayer was offered before the Lord and His disciples had passed over the brook Kidron. The determination of the exact spot is certainly impossible, except the probability that the words were spoken in the vicinity of the temple.  The first part of the prayer ( John 17:1-5 ) is an expression of profound communion between the Son and the Father, and the prayer that the Father should glorify the Son, but with the supreme end of the Father's own glory. The absolutely unique character of Christ's relation to God is the calm assertion of  John 17:4 . Its consciousness of completeness in the work which He had received from God, impossible for the children of men, marks the supreme nature of the Son of God.  In the second part of the prayer ( John 17:6-19 ), our Lord prays for His disciples, to whom He has revealed Himself and His relation to God ( John 17:7, 8 ). He prays that they may be kept by the Father, and for their unity. Their separation from the world is declared ( John 17:14 ), and our Lord prays that they may be kept from the evil that is in the world, which is alien from them as it is from Him.  In the third portion of the prayer Christ's relation to His ultimate followers is referred to. Their unity is sought, not an external unity, but the deep, spiritual unity found by the indwelling of Christ in them and God in Christ. The prayer closes by the declaration that Christ's knowledge of the Father is revealed to His people, and the end and crown of all is to be the indwelling of God's love in man by the dwelling of Christ in him.  This prayer is unique, not merely among the prayers of our Lord, but also among the prayers of humanity. While it is distinctly a petition, it is at the same time a communion. In one or two places our Lord expresses His will, thus setting Himself upon a level with God. The fact of this prayer of triumph in which every petition is virtually a declaration of the absolute certainty of its realization, immediately preceding the prayer of Gethsemane, is both difficult and suggestive. The anomaly is a powerful argument for the historic reality. The explanation of these contrasted moods is to be found in the depth of our Lord's nature, and especially in the complete consistency of His dual nature with the spheres to which each nature belongs. He is most divine; He is most human. In the fullness of the reach of the prayer and its calm confidence, the believer may find a ceaseless and inexhaustible source of comfort and encouragement. Attention might be called to the remarkable forecast of the history and experience of the church which the prayer furnishes.  (2) The Prayer in Gethsemane.  This is recorded by the three Synoptics ( Matthew 26:36-44   Mark 14:22-40   Luke 22:39-46 ), and is probably referred to in  Hebrews 5:7 . Brief though the prayer is, it exhibits most clearly recognition of God's infinite power, a clear object sought by the prayer, and perfect submission to God's will. All the elements of prayer, as it can be offered by man, are here except the prayer for forgiveness. It is to be noted that the prayer was three times repeated. This is not to be regarded as inconsistent with our Lord's prohibition of repetition. It was vain repetition which was forbidden. The intensity of the prayer is expressed by its threefold utterance (compare Paul's prayer in regard to the thorn in  2 Corinthians 12:8 ).  (3) The Prayers on the Cross.  In  Matthew 27:46   Mark 15:34 , Christ uses the prayer of  Psalm 22:1 . In the moment of complete desolation, the Sufferer claimed His unbroken relationship with God. This is the victory of the atoning sacrifice.  Luke 23:34  records the prayer of intercession for those who crucified Him; in 23:46 is the calm committal of His spirit to the Father. Prayer here again assumes its highest form in the expression of recognition and trust. Thus the three prayers on the cross not only reveal the intimate relation of our Lord to the Father, but they also illustrate prayer such as man may offer. They represent supplication, intercession, communion. Prayer thus expresses our relation to God, to others, to ourselves; our trust, our love, our need. In all things He was made like unto His brethren, except without sin (see POINTS). His prayers on the cross illustrate His high-priestly office. It rises at that intense crisis to its supreme manifestation and activity.  (4) Prayer after the Resurrection.  It is to be observed that after His resurrection there is no record of any prayer, offered by Christ. In the supper at Emmaus He "blessed" the bread ( Luke 24:30 ); and the ascension took place in the midst of blessing ( Luke 24:51 ), suggestive of the course of the church as ever beneath the benediction of the Lord, to be ended only at the final consummation. The act of eating the fish and honeycomb ( Luke 24:43 ) seems to have been unaccompanied by any act of specifically religious form. Mark, with characteristic regard to details, records Christ's "looking up to heaven" ( Mark 6:41 ;  Mark 7:34 );  John 11:41  refers to a similar act, and adds the Lord's words of thanksgiving that God had heard Him (see also  John 17:1 ). The gesture was usual in association with Christ's prayers; it is appropriate and suggestive. Luke narrates that Christ prayed at His baptism ( Luke 3:21 ); that He spent a night in prayer before choosing the Twelve ( Luke 6:12, 13 ); that the transfiguration was preceded by prayer ( Luke 9:29 ); and records the prayer in the garden ( Luke 22:41-45 ). The third evangelist thus in addition to the notes of our Lord's prayers in retirement, which the other evangelists record, adds these instances of the special relation of prayer to events of critical importance.  (5) General Conclusions.  The following conclusions as to prayer may be drawn from the records of Christ' prayers:  (1) Prayer is the highest exercise of man's spiritual nature.  (2) It is natural to the soul even in perfect accord with God.  (3) It is not only the expression of need, the supply of which is sought of God, but by the example of Christ it is the highest expression of trust, submission and union with God.  (4) It is to be used both in solitude and in society; it is personal and intercessory.  (5) It may be accompanied by the plea of Christ's name, and for Christ's sake.  These are the laws which should direct it; that is to say, it should be based upon the merit and the intercession of Christ, and should be addressed to God under the limitations of the Kingdom of the Lord and His purposes for good, both for the interest of the suppliant and others, under the conditions of the interest of the whole Kingdom.  L. D. Bevan
HUKOK|     hu'-kok.  See  HELKATH .
ZACHARIAH|Remembered by the Lord.  (1.) Son of Jeroboam II., king of Israel. On the death of his father there was an interregnum of ten years, at the end of which he succeeded to the throne, which he occupied only six months, having been put to death by Shallum, who usurped the throne. "He did that which was evil in the sight of the Lord, as his fathers had done" ( 2 Kings 14:29 ;  15:8 -12). In him the dynasty of Jehu came to an end. (2.) The father of Abi, who was the mother of Hezekiah ( 2 Kings 18:2 ). 
RANGES| (1.)  Leviticus 11:35 . Probably a cooking furnace for two or more pots, as the Hebrew word here is in the dual number; or perhaps a fire-place fitted to receive a pair of ovens. (2.)  2 Kings 11:8 . A Hebrew word is here used different from the preceding, meaning "ranks of soldiers." The Levites were appointed to guard the king's person within the temple ( 2 Chronicles 23:7 ), while the soldiers were his guard in the court, and in going from the temple to the palace. The soldiers are here commanded to slay any one who should break through the "ranks" (as rendered in the R.V.) to come near the king. In  2 Kings 11:15  the expression, "Have her forth without the ranges," is in the Revised Version, "Have her forth between the ranks;" i.e., Jehoiada orders that Athaliah should be kept surrounded by his own guards, and at the same time conveyed beyond the precincts of the temple. 
HARUMAPH|     ha-roo'-maf (charumaph): Father of Jedaiah who assisted in repairing the walls of Jerusalem under Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 3:10 ).
JOSIBIAH|     jos-i-bi'-a. See JOSHIBIAH.
SHOELATCHET|   SHOE; SHOE-LATCHET  shoo, shoo'-lach-et (na`al, literally, "that which is fastened," with denominative verb na`al, "to provide with shoes" ( 2 Chronicles 28:15   Ezekiel 16:10 ); hupodema (Sirach 46:19;  Matthew 3:11 , etc.), from the verb hupodeo ( Mark 6:9   Ephesians 6:15 ), "to bind under," sandalion, "sandal" (Judith 10:4; 16:09;  Mark 6:9   Acts 12:8 ); the King James Version, the Revised Version margin also have "shoe" for min`al, "bar" (so the Revised Version (British and American) text) in  Deuteronomy 33:25 ; the "latchet" is either serokh, "twisted thing" ( Genesis 14:23   Isaiah 5:27 ), or himas, "leather thong" ( Mark 1:7   Luke 3:16   John 1:27 )): The na`al was a simple piece of leather tied on the foot with the serokh, so easy of construction that its low cost was proverbial ( Amos 2:6 ;  Amos 8:6 ; Sir 46:19; compare  Genesis 14:23 ), and to be without it was a sign of extreme poverty ( 2 Chronicles 28:15   Isaiah 20:2 ). Women, however, might have ornamental sandals ( Songs 7:1 ; Jdt 16:9), and Ezekiel names "sealskin" (16:10) as a particularly luxurious material, but the omission of sandals from the list of  Isaiah 3:18-23  shows that they were not commonly made articles of great expense. The hupodema was likewise properly a sandal, but the word was also used to denote a shoe that covered the foot. The contrast between hupodema in  Matthew 10:10  and sandalion in  Mark 6:9  seems to show that this meaning is not unknown in the New Testament, the "shoe" being regarded as an article of luxury (compare  Luke 15:22 ). But in  Matthew 3:11  and parallel's, only the sandal can be meant.  Sandals were not worn indoors, so that putting them on was a sign of readiness for activity ( Exodus 12:11   Acts 12:8   Ephesians 6:15 ), the more wealthy having them brought ( Matthew 3:11 ) and fastened ( Mark 1:7  and parallel's) by slaves. When one entered a house they were removed; all the more, naturally, on entering a sanctuary ( Exodus 3:5   Joshua 5:15   Acts 7:33 ). Mourners, however, did not wear them even out of doors, as a sign of grief ( Ezekiel 24:17, 23 ), perhaps for the same reason that other duties of the toilet were neglected ( 2 Samuel 12:20 , etc.). A single long journey wore out a pair of sandals ( Joshua 9:5, 13 ), and the preservation of "the latchet of their shoes" from being broken ( Isaiah 5:27 ) would require almost miraculous help.    Ruth 4:7  states as a "custom in former times in Israel," that when any bargain was closed "a man drew off his shoe, and gave it to his neighbor." This was of course simply a special form of earnest-money, used in all transactions. In  Deuteronomy 25:9  the custom appears in a different light. If a man refused to perform his duty to his deceased brother's wife, the elders of the city were to remove his shoe and disgrace him publicly, "And his name shall be called in Israel, The house of him that hath his shoe loosed." The removal of the shoe is apparently connected with the rite in  Ruth 4:7  as a renunciation of the man's privilege. But the general custom seems to have become obsolete, for the removal of the shoe is now a reproach. The meaning of  Psalm 60:8  parallel 108:9, "Upon (margin "unto") Edom will I cast my shoe," is uncertain. `al, may mean either "upon" or "unto." If the former, some (otherwise unsubstantiated) custom of asserting ownership of land may be meant. If the latter, the meaning is "Edom I will treat as a slave," to whom the shoes are cast on entering a house.  Burton Scott Easton
BARIAH|Fugitive, one of Shemaiah's five sons. Their father is counted along with them in  1 Chronicles 3:22 . 
SHOMER|Watchman.  (1.) The mother of Jehozabad, who murdered Joash ( 2 Kings 12:21 ); called also Shimrith, a Moabitess ( 2 Chronicles 24:26 ). (2.) A man of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 7:32 ); called also Shamer (34). 
PARUAH|Flourishing, the father of Jehoshaphat, appointed to provide monthly supplies for Solomon from the tribe of Issachar ( 1 Kings 4:17 ). 
CHESIL|Ungodly, a town in the south of Judah ( Joshua 15:30 ); probably the same as Bethul ( 19:4 ) and Bethuel ( 1 Chronicles 4:30 ); now Khelasa. 
MAHALATH|A lute; lyre.  (1.) The daughter of Ishmael, and third wife of Esau ( Genesis 28:9 ); called also Bashemath ( Genesis 36:3 ). (2.) The daughter of Jerimoth, who was one of David's sons. She was one of Rehoboam's wives ( 2 Chronicles 11:18 ).  Mahalath Leannoth Maschil This word leannoth seems to point to some kind of instrument unknown ( Psalm 88 ,  title). The whole phrase has by others been rendered, "On the sickness of affliction: a lesson;" or, "Concerning afflictive sickness: a didactic psalm."  Mahalath Maschil In the title of  Psalm 53 , denoting that this was a didactic psalm, to be sung to the accompaniment of the lute or guitar. Others regard this word "mahalath" as the name simply of an old air to which the psalm was to be sung. Others, again, take the word as meaning "sickness," and regard it as alluding to the contents of the psalm. 
PARAH|The heifer, a town in Benjamin ( Joshua 18:23 ), supposed to be identical with the ruins called Far'ah, about 6 miles north-east of Jerusalem, in the Wady Far'ah, which is a branch of the Wady Kelt. 
LODEBAR|No pasture, ( 2 Samuel 17:27 ), a town in Gilead not far from Mahanaim, north of the Jabbok ( 9:4 ,  5). It is probably identical with Debir ( Joshua 13:26 ). 
GEMARIAH|Jehovah has made perfect.  (1.) The son of Shaphan, and one of the Levites of the temple in the time of Jehoiakim ( Jeremiah 36:10 ;  2 Kings 22:12 ). Baruch read aloud to the people from Gemariah's chamber, and again in the hearing of Gemariah and other scribes, the prophecies of Jeremiah ( Jeremiah 36:11 -20), which filled him with terror. He joined with others in entreating the king not to destroy the roll of the prophecies which Baruch had read (21-25). (2.) The son of Hilkiah, who accompanied Shaphan with the tribute-money from Zedekiah to Nebuchadnezzar, and was the bearer at the same time of a letter from Jeremiah to the Jewish captives at Babylon ( Jeremiah 29:3 ,  4). 
TALITHA|Talitha cumi ( Mark 5:41 ), a Syriac or Aramaic expression, meaning, "Little maid, arise." Peter, who was present when the miracle was wrought, recalled the actual words used by our Lord, and told them to Mark. 
JEHUBBAH|     je-hub'-a (yechubbah, meaning unknown): A descendant of Asher, mentioned in  1 Chronicles 7:34 , where Qere is wechubbah, "and Hubbah," but Kethibh is yachbah; the Septuagint's Codex Vaticanus follows the Qere.
MESHA|Middle district, Vulgate, Messa.  (1.) A plain in that part of the boundaries of Arabia inhabited by the descendants of Joktan ( Genesis 10:30 ). (2.) Hebrews meysh'a, "deliverance," the eldest son of Caleb ( 1 Chronicles 2:42 ), and brother of Jerahmeel. (3.) Hebrews id, a king of Moab, the son of Chemosh-Gad, a man of great wealth in flocks and herds ( 2 Kings 3:4 ). After the death of Ahab at Ramoth-Gilead, Mesha shook off the yoke of Israel; but on the ascension of Jehoram to the throne of Israel, that king sought the help of Jehoshaphat in an attempt to reduce the Moabites again to their former condition. The united armies of the two kings came unexpectedly on the army of the Moabites, and gained over them an easy victory. The whole land was devastated by the conquering armies, and Mesha sought refuge in his last stronghold, Kir-harasheth (q.v.). Reduced to despair, he ascended the wall of the city, and there, in the sight of the allied armies, offered his first-born son a sacrifice to Chemosh, the fire-god of the Moabites. This fearful spectacle filled the beholders with horror, and they retired from before the besieged city, and recrossed the Jordan laden with spoil ( 2 Kings 3:25 -27). The exploits of Mesha are recorded in the Phoenician inscription on a block of black basalt found at Dibon, in Moab, usually called the "Moabite stone" (q.v.). 
BOZEZ|     bo'-zez (botsets; Bazes, probably from an obsolete root batsats, corresponding to the Arabic batstsa, "to shine" or "to ooze"): The name of the northern of the two cliffs that stand one on each side of the gorge of Michmash ( 1 Samuel 14:4 ). It catches the sun during most of the day, while the southern cliff is in the shade. To this circumstance it may owe its name, "shining." "The contrast is surprising and picturesque between the dark coal color of the south side, and the ruddy or tawny tints of the northern cliff, crowned with the gleaming white of the upper chalky strata. The picture is unchanged since the day when Jonathan looked over to the white camping ground of the Philistines, and Bozez must have then shone as brightly as it does now, in the full light of an eastern sun" (Conder, Tent Work, 256).  W. Ewing
ISHBAH|     ish'-ba (yishbach): A member of the tribe of Judah, father of Eshtemoa ( 1 Chronicles 4:17 ).
RACHAB|=Rahab, a name found in the genealogy of our Lord ( Matthew 1:5 ). 
EZAR|     e'-zar.  See  EZER .
JOKIM|Whom Jehovah has set up, one of the descendants of Shelah ( 1 Chronicles 4:22 ). 
JECHILIAH|     jek-i-li'-a (yekhilyah). See  JECHOLIAH ; Kethibh and  2 Chronicles 26:3  the Revised Version (British and American), where Qere is yekholyah = "Jecoliah" (the King James Version).
SHUTHELAH|   ; SHUTHELAHITES  shoo-the'-la, shoo'-the-la, shoo-the'-la-hits, shoo'-the-la-hits (shuthalchi): A son of Ephraim ( Numbers 26:35, 36 ; compare  1 Chronicles 7:20, 21 ), and his descendants.  See  GENEALOGY .
JEMIMA|Dove, the eldest of Job's three daughters born after his time of trial ( Job 42:14 ). 
ZUZIMS|Restless; sprouting, were smitten "in Ham" by Chedorlaomer and his allies ( Genesis 14:5 ). Some have identified this tribe with the Zamzummims (q.v.). 
ELATH|Grove; trees, ( Deuteronomy 2:8 ), also in plural form Eloth ( 1 Kings 9:26 ,  etc.); called by the Greeks and Romans Elana; a city of Idumea, on the east, i.e., the Elanitic, gulf, or the Gulf of Akabah, of the Red Sea. It is first mentioned in  Deuteronomy 2:8 . It is also mentioned along with Ezion-geber in  1 Kings 9:26 . It was within the limits of Solomon's dominion, but afterwards revolted. It was, however, recovered and held for a time under king Uzziah ( 2 Kings 14:22 ). Now the ruin Aila. 
EDUTH|     e'-duth (`edhuth, "testimony," a technical term for the Ten Commandments or for the Law):  In  Psalm 60  title, "set to Shushan Eduth" (literally, "a lily (is) the testimony"); 80 title, "set to Shoshannim Eduth" (literally, "lilies (is) the testimony"). The Hebrew words appear to be intended to designate a melody by the first few words ordinarily associated with it.  See  PSALMS .  SHOSHANNIM EDUTH  sho-shan'-im e'-duth.  See  SONG ;  PSALMS .  SHUSHAN EDUTH  shoo'-shan e'-duth.  See  SONG ;  PSALMS .
MELCHISEDEC|   MELCHIZEDEK;   mel-kiz'e-dek, and (the King James Version in the book of Hebrews) (malki-tsedheq, "Tsedheq, or Tsidhiq is my king" ( Genesis 14:18   Psalm 110:4 ); Melchisedek ( Hebrews 5:6, 10 ;  Hebrews 6:20 ;  Hebrews 7:1, 10, 11, 15, 17 )): The name is explained in  Hebrews 7:2  as "king of righteousness," with "-i" as the old genitive ending; but the correct explanation is no doubt the one given above; compare Adoni-zedek in  Joshua 10:1 , where Septuagint with  Judges 1:5-7  has Adonibezek. Melchizedek was king of Salem (= Jerusalem) and "a priest unto 'El `Elyon" ( Genesis 14:18 ). He brought bread and wine to Abraham after the latter's victory over the kings, and also bestowed upon him the blessing of 'El `Elyon. Abraham gave him "a tenth of all," i.e. of the booty probably, unless it be of all his possessions.  Genesis 14:22  identifies Yahweh with 'El `Elyon, the title of the Deity as worshipped at Jerusalem; and so  Hebrews 7:1 ;, following Septuagint of  Genesis 14:18 ;, calls Melchizedek. "priest of God Most High," i.e. Yahweh.  Skinner (Gen, 271, where Josephus, Ant, XVI, vi, 2, and Am M 6:1 are cited) points out that the Maccabees were called "high priests of God most high." Hence, some hold that the story of Melchizedek is an invention of Judaism, but Gunkel (Genesis 3, 285;) maintains that he is a traditional, if not a historical, character.    Psalm 110:4  makes the klng-priest who is addressed there a virtual successor of Melchizedek, and the kings of Jerusalem might well, as Gunkel suggests, have been considered successors of Melchizedek in the same way that Charlemagne was regarded as the successor of the Caesars, and the latter as successors of the Pharaohs in Egypt. This leads naturally to an early date being ascribed to  Psalm 110 .  The thought of a priest after the order of Melchizedek is taken up by the author of Hebrews. He wanted to prove the claim of Christ to be called priest. It was impossible, even had he so wished, to consider Jesus as an Aaronic priest, for He was descended from the tribe of Judah and not from that of Levi (7:14). The words of  Psalm 110:4  are taken to refer to Him ( Hebrews 5:5 f ), and in  Hebrews 7:5 ; the order of Melchizedek is held to be higher than that of Aaron, for the superiority of Melchizedek was acknowledged by Abraham (a) when he paid tithes to Melchizedek and (b) when he was blessed by Melchizedek, for "the less is blessed of the better." It might be added that Jesus can be considered a priest after the order of Melchizedek in virtue of His descent from David, if the latter be regarded as successor to Melchizedek But the author of He does not explicitly say this. Further, Aaron is only a "type" brought forward in He to show the more excellent glory of the work of Jesus, whereas Melchizedek is "made like unto the Son of God" (7:3), and Jesus is said to be "after the likeness of Melchizedek" (7:15).    Hebrews 7:1 ; presents difficulties. Where did the author get the material for this description of Melchizedek?  (1) Melchizedek is said to be "without father, without mother, (i.e.) without genealogy"; and  (2) he is described as "having neither beginning of days nor end of life"; he "abideth a priest continually."  The answer is perhaps to be had among the Tell el-Amarna Letters, among which are at least 6, probably 8, letters from a king of Urusalim to Amenophis IV, king of Egypt, whose "slave" the former calls himself. Urusalim is to be identified with Jerusalem, and the letters belong to circa 1400 B.C. The name of this king is given as Abd-Khiba (or Abd-chiba), though Hommel, quoted by G.A. Smith, Jerusalem, II, 14, note 7, reads Chiba. Zimmer, in ZA, 1891, 246, says that it can be read Abditaba, and so Sayce (HDB, III, 335b) calls him `ebhedh tobh. The king tells his Egyptian overlord, "Neither my father nor my mother set me in this place: the mighty arm of the king (or, according to Sayce, "the arm of the mighty king") established me in my father's house" (Letter 102 in Berlin collection, ll. 9-13; also number 103, ll. 25-28; number 104, ll. 13-15; see, further, H. Winckler, Die Thontafeln von Tell-el-Amarna; Knudtzon, Beitrage zur Assyriologie, IV, 101;, 279;, cited by G.A. Smith, Jerusalem, II, 8, note 1).  It thus becomes clear that possibly tradition identified Melchizedek with Abd-Khiba. At any rate the idea that Melchizedek was "without father, without mother, (i.e.) without genealogy" can easily be explained if the words of Abd-Khiba concerning himself can have been also attributed to Melchizedek. The words meant originally that he acknowledged that he did not come to the throne because he had a claim on it through descent; he owed it to appointment. But Jewish interpretation explained them as implying that he had no father or mother.  Psalm 110:4  had spoken of the king there as being "a priest for ever after the order of Melchizedek," and this seems to have been taken to involve the perpetuity of Melchizedek also as priest. Melchizedek was then thought of as "having neither beginning of days" = "without father, without mother, without genealogy," and again as not having "end of life" = "abideth a priest continually." Hence, he is "made like unto the son of God," having neither beginning of days nor end of life. We get another New Testament example of Jewish interpretation in  Galatians 4:21 ;. We have no actual proof that Melchizedek is identical with Abd-Khiba; possibly the reference to the former as being "without father," etc., is not to be explained as above. But why should Melchizedek, and he alone, of all the Old Testament characters be thought of in this way?  Westcott, Hebrews, 199, has a suggestive thought about Melchizedek: "The lessons of his appearance lie in the appearance itself. Abraham marks a new departure..... But before the fresh order is established we have a vision of the old in its superior majesty; and this, on the eve of disappearance, gives its blessing to the new."  On the references to Melchizedek in Philo see Westcott, op. cit., 201; F. Rendall, Hebrews, App., 58;; and especially (with the passages and other authorities cited there) G. Milligan, Theology of Epistle to the Hebrews, 203;.  The conclusions we come to are:  (1) There was a tradition in Jerusalem of Melchizedek, a king in pre-Israelitish times, who was also priest to 'El `Elyon. This is the origin of  Genesis 14:18 ;, where 'El `Elyon is identified with Yahweh.  (2)  Psalm 110  makes use of this tradition and the Psalmist's king is regarded as Melchizedek's successor.  (3) The Epistle to the Hebrews makes use of  (a)  Psalm 110 , which is taken to be a prophecy of Christ, (b) of  Genesis 14:18 ;, and  (c) of oral tradition which was not found in the Old Testament. It is this unwritten tradition that is possibly explained by the Tell el-Amarna Letters. See , further, articles by Sayce, Driver, and Hommel in Expository Times, VII, VIII.  See also  JERUSALEM .  David Francis Roberts
HAGGIAH|     ha-gi'-a (chaggiyah, "feast of Yah"): Named in  1 Chronicles 6:30  as among the descendants of Levi.
JERIBAI|     jer'-i-bi, jer-i-ba'-i (yeribhay, meaning uncertain): One of David's mighty men of the armies ( 1 Chronicles 11:46 ); one of the names not found in the list in  2 Samuel 23:24-29  a.
LUDIM|Probably the same as Lud (2) (Comp.  Genesis 10:13 ;  1 Chronicles 1:11 ). They are associated ( Jeremiah 46:9 ) with African nations as mercenaries of the king of Egypt. 
DUMAH|Silence, (Comp.  Psalm 94:17 ), the fourth son of Ishmael; also the tribe descended from him; and hence also the region in Arabia which they inhabited ( Genesis 25:14 ;  1 Chronicles 1:30 ). There was also a town of this name in Judah ( Joshua 15:52 ), which has been identified with ed-Domeh, about 10 miles southwest of Hebron. The place mentioned in the "burden" of the prophet Isaiah ( 21:11 ) is Edom or Idumea. 
MADMANNAH|Dunghill, the modern el-Minyay, 15 miles south-south-west of Gaza ( Joshua 15:31 ;  1 Chronicles 2:49 ), in the south of Judah. The Pal. Mem., however, suggest Umm Deimneh, 12 miles north-east of Beersheba, as the site. 
NETAIM|     na'-ta-im, ne'-ta-im, ne-ta'-im neTa`im; Codex Vaticanus Azaeim; Codex Alexandrinus Ataeim): In  1 Chronicles 4:23  the King James Version reads "those that dwell among plants and hedges," the Revised Version (British and American) "the inhabitants of Netaim and Gederah." The latter may be taken as correct. Gederah was in the Judean Shephelah. Here also we should seek for Netaim; but no likely identification has yet been suggested.
OSNAPPAR|     os-nap'-ar ( Ezra 4:10 ).  See  ASHURBANIPAL .
ZABBUD|Gift,  Ezra 8:14 . 
GEDERAH|The fortress; a fortified place, a town in the plain (shephelah) of Judah ( Joshua 15:36 ). This is a very common Canaanite and Phoenician name. It is the feminine form of Geder ( 12:13 ); the plural form is Gederoth ( 15:41 ). This place has by some been identified with Jedireh, a ruin 9 miles from Lydda, toward Eleutheropolis, and 4 miles north of Sur'ah (Zorah), in the valley of Elah. 
ZABUD|Gift, the son of Nathan, who was "king's friend" in the court of Solomon ( 1 Kings 4:5 ). 
SERJEANTS|     sar'-jents, -jants (rhabdouchoi): In  Acts 16:35, 38  the word (literally, "holders of rods," corresponding to Roman "lictors," thus the Revised Version margin) is used of the officers in attendance on the Philippian magistrates, whose duty it was to execute orders in scourging, etc., in this case in setting prisoners free. Paul and Silas, however, as Romans, refused thus to be "privily" dismissed.
MUFFLERS|( Isaiah 3:19 ), veils, light and tremulous. Margin, "spangled ornaments." 
HEADBANDS|(Hebrews kishshurim), properly girdles or belts for the waist ( Isaiah 3:20 ,  R.V.,  "sashes;"  Jeremiah 2:32 ,  rendered "attire",  i.e.,  a girdle round the waist). 
HACALIAH|     hak-a-li'-a (chakhalyah, meaning doubtful, perhaps "wait for Yahweh"; the King James Version Hachaliah): Father of Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 11 ;  Nehemiah 10:1 ).
MITHREDATH|Given by Mithra, or dedicated to Mithra, i.e., the sun, the Hebrew form of the Greek name Mithridates.  (1.) The "treasurer" of King Cyrus ( Ezra 1:8 ). (2.)  Ezra 4:7 , a Persian officer in Samaria. 
GOLIATH|Great.  (1.) A famous giant of Gath, who for forty days openly defied the armies of Israel, but was at length slain by David with a stone from a sling ( 1 Samuel 17:4 ). He was probably descended from the Rephaim who found refuge among the Philistines after they were dispersed by the Ammonites ( Deuteronomy 2:20 ,  21). His height was "six cubits and a span," which, taking the cubit at 21 inches, is equal to 10 1/2 feet. David cut off his head ( 1 Samuel 17:51 ) and brought it to Jerusalem, while he hung the armour which he took from him in his tent. His sword was preserved at Nob as a religious trophy ( 21:9 ). David's victory over Goliath was the turning point in his life. He came into public notice now as the deliverer of Israel and the chief among Saul's men of war ( 18:5 ), and the devoted friend of Jonathan. (2.) In  2 Samuel 21:19  there is another giant of the same name mentioned as slain by Elhanan. The staff of his apear "was like a weaver's beam." The Authorized Version interpolates the words "the brother of" from  1 Chronicles 20:5 , where this giant is called Lahmi. 
MNASON|Reminding, or remembrancer, a Christian of Jerusalem with whom Paul lodged ( Acts 21:16 ). He was apparently a native of Cyprus, like Barnabas ( 11:19 ,  20), and was well known to the Christians of Caesarea ( 4:36 ). He was an "old disciple" (R.V.,  "early disciple"), i.e., he had become a Christian in the beginning of the formation of the Church in Jerusalem. 
MANNERS|   MANNER;   man'-er, man'-erz (dabhar, derekh, mishpaT; ethos, houtos):  1. As Used in the Old Testament:  "Manner" (probably from manus, "the hand," mode of handling things, or acting) is in the Bible in general equivalent  (1) to way, custom, habit, etc.,  (2) to kind or sort.  There are some special senses, however, and archaic usages. It is frequently the translation of dabhar, "speaking," "word," "thing" ( Genesis 18:25 , "That be far from thee to do after this manner" (i.e. in this way);  Genesis 32:19 , "On this manner shall ye speak unto Esau" (in this way);  Genesis 39:19 , "After this manner (in this way) did thy servant to me";  Exodus 22:9 , "every manner of trespass" (every kind, sort, or way);  Deuteronomy 15:2   1 Samuel 17:27, 30  bis); also of derekh, "way" ( Genesis 19:31 , "after the manner of all the earth (way);  1 Samuel 21:5  the King James Version "(the bread) is in a manner common"; "manner" here might be taken as equivalent to "way" or "measure," but the passage is a difficult one and the text uncertain; the Revised Version (British and American) omits "manner," and in the text makes the reference to be to the journey, not to the bread, but in the margin it has "common (bread)";  Isaiah 10:24, 26 , after the manner of Egypt" (after the way or fate of Egypt); so also  Amos 4:10 ;  Amos 8:14 , the manner of Beer-sheba liveth" the Revised Version (British and American) "the way," margin "manner, the reference here being to the religious way, or manner of worship); of mishpaT, "judgment," "ordinance," hence, also "manner" or "custom" ( Genesis 40:13   Exodus 21:9   2 Kings 1:7 , "what manner of man" (sort or kind);  2 Kings 17:26  the King James Version;  1 Chronicles 24:19   Ezekiel 11:12 , "after the manners (the Revised Version (British and American) "ordinances") of the nations"); torah, "instruction," "law," is also translated "manner" ( 2 Samuel 7:19 , "(is) this the manner (margin "law") of man, O Lord God?" the Revised Version (British and American) "and this (too) after the manner of men, O Lord Yahweh," margin "and is this the law of man, O Lord Yahweh?"). Other words are: 'orach, "path," "custom" ( Genesis 18:11 ); dobher, "leading," "pasture" (compare "sheep-walk," "sheep-fold");  Isaiah 5:17 , "Then shall the lambs feed after their manner," the Revised Version (British and American) "as in their pasture" (in  Micah 2:12 , the same word is translated the King James Version "fold," the Revised Version (British and American) "pasture"); demuth, "likeness" ( Ezekiel 23:15 ); dath, "law," "sentence" ( Esther 2:12 ); chuqqah, "statute," "custom" ( Leviticus 20:23 ) in the King James Version. In  Numbers 5:13  "with the manner" is supplied to "taken" (in adultery). "Manner" here is an old law-French phrase, "a thief taken with the mainour"-that is, with the thing stolen upon him in manu (in his hand) (Blackstone, Comm., IV, xxiii), the Revised Version (British and American) "in the act" (compare  John 8:4  "in the very act"); gam, "also" is translated ( 1 Samuel 19:24 ) "in like manner," the Revised Version (British and American) "also."  2. As Used in the Apocrypha:  In Apocrypha, 2 Maccabees 4:13 the King James Version, we have "increase of heathenish manners," the Revised Version (British and American) "an extreme of Greek fashions"; 2 Maccabees 6:9, the "manners of the Gentiles," the Revised Version (British and American) "the Greek rites"; in 2 Esdras 9:19, the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American), "manners" appears in the sense of "morals"; compare  1 Corinthians 15:33 , the Revised Version (British and American) "Evil companionships corrupt good morals."  3. As Used in the New Testament:  In the New Testament various words and phrases are rendered by "manner"; we have ethos, "custom," "usage," "manner" ( John 19:40   Acts 15:1 , the Revised Version (British and American) "custom"); kata to eiothos ( Luke 4:16 , the Revised Version (British and American) "as his custom was"); tropos a "turning," "manner," "way" ( Jude 1:7 ); hon tropon, "in which manner" ( Acts 1:11 ); houtos, "thus," "so," "accordingly," is "after this manner," "in like manner" ( Matthew 6:9   Mark 13:29  the King James Version); in  Acts 15:23 , "after this manner" stands in the King James Version for "by their hands," the Revised Version (British and American) "thus"; pos ( Acts 20:18 ), "after what manner"; agoge, "course of life" ( 2 Timothy 3:10 , the Revised Version (British and American) "conduct"); biosis, "mode of life" ( Acts 26:4 ); in  1 Corinthians 15:33 , we have manners in the moral sense, "Evil communications corrupt good manners," the American Standard Revised Version "Evil companionships corrupt good morals."  Acts 13:18  is interesting because of diversities of rendering; the King James Version has "suffered he their manners in the wilderness," margin "etropophoresen, perhaps for etrophophoresen, bore, or fed them as a nurse beareth or feedeth her child,  Deuteronomy 1:31  (2 Maccabees 7:27) according to Septuagint, and so Chrysostom"; the English Revised Version text, same as the King James Version margin "Many ancient authorities read `bear he them as a nursing father in the wilderness.' See  Deuteronomy 1:31  "; the American Standard Revised Version (text) "as a nursing-father bare he them in the wilderness," margin "Many ancient authorities read `Suffered he their manners in the wilderness.' See  Deuteronomy 9:7 ." The Greek words differ only by a single letter, and authorities are pretty equally divided.  Among other changes the Revised Version (British and American) has frequently "ordinance" for "manner" ( Leviticus 5:10 , etc.) and "custom" ( Ruth 4:7   John 19:40   Hebrews 10:25 , etc.); "manner of" is introduced ( 1 Samuel 4:8 , etc.); "manner of" and "manner" omitted ( Genesis 25:23   Exodus 35:29 , etc.); "what manner of house" for "where is the house" ( Isaiah 66:1 ); "manner of life" for "conversation" ( Galatians 1:13   Ephesians 4:22 ); "after the manner of men" for "as a man" ( Romans 3:5   1 Corinthians 9:8 ); "how to inquire concerning these things" ( Acts 25:20 ) for "of such manner of questions"; "in an unworthy manner," the American Standard Revised Version, for "unworthily" ( 1 Corinthians 11:27 ); "who" for "what manner of man" ( Mark 4:41   Luke 8:25 , "who then is this?"); in  Luke 9:55 , "Ye know not what manner of spirit ye are of" is omitted, with the margin "Some ancient authorities add and said, Ye know not what manner of spirit ye are of."  W, L. Walker
JERIJAH|     je-ri'-ja ( 1 Chronicles 26:31 ).  See  JERIAH .
ESTHER|The queen of Ahasuerus, and heroine of the book that bears her name. She was a Jewess named Hadas'sah (the myrtle), but when she entered the royal harem she received the name by which she henceforth became known ( Esther 2:7 ). It is a Syro-Arabian modification of the Persian word satarah, which means a star. She was the daughter of Abihail, a Benjamite. Her family did not avail themselves of the permission granted by Cyrus to the exiles to return to Jerusalem; and she resided with her cousin Mordecai, who held some office in the household of the Persian king at "Shushan in the palace." Ahasuerus having divorced Vashti, chose Esther to be his wife. Soon after this he gave Haman the Agagite, his prime minister, power and authority to kill and extirpate all the Jews throughout the Persian empire. By the interposition of Esther this terrible catastrophe was averted. Haman was hanged on the gallows he had intended for Mordecai ( Esther 7 ); and the Jews established an annual feast, the feast of Purim (q.v.), in memory of their wonderful deliverance. This took place about fifty-two years after the Return, the year of the great battles of Plataea and Mycale (B.C. 479). Esther appears in the Bible as a "woman of deep piety, faith, courage, patriotism, and caution, combined with resolution; a dutiful daughter to her adopted father, docile and obedient to his counsels, and anxious to share the king's favour with him for the good of the Jewish people. There must have been a singular grace and charm in her aspect and manners, since `she obtained favour in the sight of all them that looked upon her' ( Esther 2:15 ). That she was raised up as an instrument in the hand of God to avert the destruction of the Jewish people, and to afford them protection and forward their wealth and peace in their captivity, is also manifest from the Scripture account." Esther, Book of The authorship of this book is unknown. It must have been obviously written after the death of Ahasuerus (the Xerxes of the Greeks), which took place B.C. 465. The minute and particular account also given of many historical details makes it probable that the writer was contemporary with Mordecai and Esther. Hence we may conclude that the book was written probably about B.C. 444-434, and that the author was one of the Jews of the dispersion. This book is more purely historical than any other book of Scripture; and it has this remarkable peculiarity that the name of God does not occur in it from first to last in any form. It has, however, been well observed that "though the name of God be not in it, his finger Isaiah" The book wonderfully exhibits the providential government of God. 
METHUSHAEL|     me-thu'-sha-el (methusha'el): A descendant of Cain, and father of Lamech in the Cainite genealogy ( Genesis 4:18 ). The meaning of the name is doubtful. Dillmann suggested "suppliant or man of God."
SHOBI|Captor, son of Nahash of Rabbah, the Ammonite. He showed kindness to David when he fled from Jerusalem to Mahanaim ( 2 Samuel 17:27 ). 
LAODICEA|The city of this name mentioned in Scripture lay on the confines of Phrygia and Lydia, about 40 miles east of Ephesus ( Revelation 3:14 ), on the banks of the Lycus. It was originally called Diospolis and then Rhoas, but afterwards Laodicea, from Laodice, the wife of Antiochus II., king of Syria, who rebuilt it. It was one of the most important and flourishing cities of Asia Minor. At a very early period it became one of the chief seats of Christianity ( Colossians 2:1 ;  4:15 ;  Revelation 1:11 ,  etc.). It is now a deserted place, called by the Turks Eski-hissar or "old castle."  Laodicea, Epistle from ( Colossians 4:16 ), was probably the Epistle to the Ephesians, as designed for general circulation. It would reach the Colossians by way of Laodicea. 
JAMES| (1.) The son of Zebedee and Salome; an elder brother of John the apostle. He was one of the twelve. He was by trade a fisherman, in partnership with Peter ( Matthew 20:20 ;  27:56 ). With John and Peter he was present at the transfiguration ( Matthew 17:1 ;  Mark 9:2 ), at the raising of Jairus's daughter ( Mark 5:37 -43), and in the garden with our Lord ( 14:33 ). Because, probably, of their boldness and energy, he and John were called Boanerges, i.e., "sons of thunder." He was the first martyr among the apostles, having been beheaded by King Herod Agrippa ( Acts 12:1 ,  2), A.D. 44. (Comp.  Matthew 4:21 ;  20:20 -23). (2.) The son of Alphaeus, or Cleopas, "the brother" or near kinsman or cousin of our Lord ( Galatians 1:18 ,  19), called James "the Less," or "the Little," probably because he was of low stature. He is mentioned along with the other apostles ( Matthew 10:3 ;  Mark 3:18 ;  Luke 6:15 ). He had a separate interview with our Lord after his resurrection ( 1 Corinthians 15:7 ), and is mentioned as one of the apostles of the circumcision ( Acts 1:13 ). He appears to have occupied the position of head of the Church at Jerusalem, where he presided at the council held to consider the case of the Gentiles ( Acts 12:17 ;  15:13 -29: 21:18-24). This James was the author of the epistle which bears his name. James, Epistle of (1.) Author of, was James the Less, the Lord's brother, one of the twelve apostles. He was one of the three pillars of the Church ( Galatians 2:9 ). (2.) It was addressed to the Jews of the dispersion, "the twelve tribes scattered abroad." (3.) The place and time of the writing of the epistle were Jerusalem, where James was residing, and, from internal evidence, the period between Paul's two imprisonments at Rome, probably about A.D. 62. (4.) The object of the writer was to enforce the practical duties of the Christian life. "The Jewish vices against which he warns them are, formalism, which made the service of God consist in washings and outward ceremonies, whereas he reminds them ( 1:27 ) that it consists rather in active love and purity; fanaticism, which, under the cloak of religious zeal, was tearing Jerusalem in pieces ( 1:20 ); fatalism, which threw its sins on God ( 1:13 ); meanness, which crouched before the rich ( 2:2 ); falsehood, which had made words and oaths play-things ( 3:2 -12); partisanship ( 3:14 ); evil speaking ( 4:11 ); boasting ( 4:16 ); oppression ( 5:4 ). The great lesson which he teaches them as Christians is patience, patience in trial ( 1:2 ), patience in good works ( 1:22 -25), patience under provocation ( 3:17 ), patience under oppression ( 5:7 ), patience under persecution ( 5:10 ); and the ground of their patience is that the coming of the Lord draweth nigh, which is to right all wrong ( 5:8 )." "Justification by works," which James contends for, is justification before man, the justification of our profession of faith by a consistent life. Paul contends for the doctrine of "justification by faith;" but that is justification before God, a being regarded and accepted as just by virtue of the righteousness of Christ, which is received by faith. 
MAHATH|Grasping.  (1.) A Kohathite Levite, father of Elkanah ( 1 Chronicles 6:35 ). (2.) Another Kohathite Levite, of the time of Hezekiah ( 2 Chronicles 29:12 ). 
JOZABAD|Whom Jehovah bestows.  (1.) One of the Benjamite archers who joined David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:4 ). (2.) A chief of the tribe of Manasseh ( 1 Chronicles 12:20 ). 
LASHA|Fissure, a place apparently east of the Dead Sea ( Genesis 10:19 ). It was afterwards known as Callirhoe, a place famous for its hot springs. 
MAACATHITES|     ma-ak'-a-thits (hama`akhathi); Septuagint: Codex Vaticanus ho Machatei; Codex Alexandrinus Machathi): Mentioned in Scripture are Ahasbai M ( 2 Samuel 23:34 ), Jaazaniah ( 2 Kings 25:23 ), Naham ( 1 Chronicles 4:19 ) and Jezaniah ( Jeremiah 40:8 ). See preceding article.
JOED|     jo'-ed (yo`edh, "Yahweh is witness"): A "son" of Benjamin ( Nehemiah 11:7 ), wanting in  1 Chronicles 9:7 .
METHUSAEL|Champion of El; man of God, a descendant of Cain ( Genesis 4:18 ), so called, perhaps, to denote that even among the descendants of Cain God had not left himself without a witness. 
EMIMS|Terrors, a warlike tribe of giants who were defeated by Chedorlaomer and his allies in the plain of Kiriathaim. In the time of Abraham they occupied the country east of Jordan, afterwards the land of the Moabites ( Genesis 14:5 ;  Deuteronomy 2:10 ). They were, like the Anakim, reckoned among the Rephaim, and were conquered by the Moabites, who gave them the name of Emims, i.e., "terrible men" ( Deuteronomy 2:11 ). The Ammonites called them Zamzummims ( 2:20 ). 
HADASSAH|Myrtle, the Jewish name of Esther (q.v.),  Esther 2:7 . 
ZAIR|Little, a place probably east of the Dead Sea, where Joram discomfited the host of Edom who had revolted from him ( 2 Kings 8:21 ). 
GESHUR|Bridge, the name of a district or principality of Syria near Gilead, between Mount Hermon and the Lake of Tiberias ( 2 Samuel 15:8 ;  1 Chronicles 2:23 ). The Geshurites probably inhabited the rocky fastness of Argob, the modern Lejah, in the north-east corner of Bashan. In the time of David it was ruled by Talmai, whose daughter he married, and who was the mother of Absalom, who fled to Geshur after the murder of Amnon ( 2 Samuel 13:37 ). 
JEREMIAS|     jer-e-mi'-as (Ieremias):  (1) Named among the sons of Baani as one of those who had married foreign wives (1 Esdras 9:34). In  Ezra 10:33  we find, "Jeremai" among the sons of Hashum. In 1 Esdras it should come in 9:33 before Manasses.  (2) See  JEREMIAH (general article) .
PRINCES|   , THE SEVEN  prin'-sez, -siz.  See  PRINCE, (1), (b) .
SANSANNAH|A palm branch, or a thorn bush, a town in the south (the negeb) of Judah ( Joshua 15:31 ); called also Hazarsusah ( 19:5 ), or Hazar-susim ( 1 Chronicles 4:31 ). 
CUCKOW|   ; CUCKOO  kook'-oo, kuk'-oo (shachaph; laros; Latin Cuculus canorus): The Hebrew root from which the word shachaph is derived means "to be lean" and "slender," and in older versions of the Bible was translated cuckow (cuckoo). It was mentioned twice in the Bible ( Leviticus 11:16 , and practically the same in  Deuteronomy 14:15  the King James Version "cuckoo"), in the list of unclean birds. The Latin term by which we designate the bird is very similar to the Arabic, and all names for it in different countries are so nearly the same that they prove themselves based on its double cry, "cuck-oo," or the single note "kowk" or "gouk." The bird is as old as history, and interesting because the European species placed its eggs in the nests of other birds, which gave rise to much fiction concerning its habits. The European bird is a brownish gray with white bars underneath, and larger than ours, which are a beautiful olive gray, with tail feathers of irregular length touched with white, knee tufts, black or yellow bill, according to species, and beautiful sleek head and shining eyes. Our birds build their own nests, attend their young with care and are much loved for their beauty. Their food is not repulsive in any species; there never was any reason why they should have been classed among the abominations, and for these reasons scientists in search of a "lean, slender" bird of offensive diet and habit have selected the "sea-mew" (which see) which is substituted for cuckoo in the Revised Version (British and American) with good natural-history reason to sustain the change.  Gene Stratton-Porter
STONES|Stones, Precious Frequently referred to ( 1 Kings 10:2 ;  2 Chronicles 3:6 ;  9:10 ;  Revelation 18:16 ;  21:19 ). There are about twenty different names of such stones in the Bible. They are figuratively introduced to denote value, beauty, durability (Cant. 5:14;  Isaiah 54:11 ,  12;  Lamentations 4:7 ). 
TADMOR|Palm, a city built by Solomon "in the wilderness" ( 2 Chronicles 8:4 ). In  1 Kings 9:18 , where the word occurs in the Authorized Version, the Hebrew text and the Revised Version read "Tamar," which is properly a city on the southern border of Palestine and toward the wilderness (Comp.  Ezek. 47:19 ;  48:28 ). In  2 Chronicles 8:14  Tadmor is mentioned in connection with Hamath-zobah. It is called Palmyra by the Greeks and Romans. It stood in the great Syrian wilderness, 176 miles from Damascus and 130 from the Mediterranean and was the centre of a vast commercial traffic with Western Asia. It was also an important military station. (see  SOLOMON .) "Remains of ancient temples and palaces, surrounded by splendid colonnades of white marble, many of which are yet standing, and thousands of prostrate pillars, scattered over a large extent of space, attest the ancient magnificence of this city of palms, surpassing that of the renowned cities of Greece and Rome." 
JIBSAM|     jib'-sam.  See  IBSAM .
LAPIDOTH|Torches. Deborah is called "the wife of Lapidoth" ( Judges 4:4 ). Some have rendered the expression "a woman of a fiery spirit," under the supposition that Lapidoth is not a proper name, a woman of a torch-like spirit. 
ENGINES| (1.) Hebrews hishalon i.e., "invention" (as in  Ecclesiastes 7:29 ) contrivances indicating ingenuity. In  2 Chronicles 26:15  it refers to inventions for the purpose of propelling missiles from the walls of a town, such as stones (the Roman balista) and arrows (the catapulta). (2.) Hebrews mechi kobollo, i.e., the beating of that which is in front a battering-ram ( Ezek. 26:9 ), the use of which was common among the Egyptians and the Assyrians. Such an engine is mentioned in the reign of David ( 2 Samuel 20:15 ). 
CUMI|   TALITHA   ta-le'-tha koo'-me (talitha koumi): Derived from the Aramaic Talyetha' qumi, "damsel, arise"), which in the New Testament manuscripts is transliterated variously (Westcott-Hort, Taleitha koum, otherwise Talitha koumi). We have no data for determining how far Jesus employed the Aramaic language, but Mark (5:41) notes its use in this tender incident, and there is strong probability that Aramaic was used normally, if not exclusively, by Christ. There is, however, no ground for attributing any magical significance to the use of the Aramaic words in connection with this miracle.  CUMI  koo'-me, ku'-mi.  See  TALITHA CUMI .
SACHAR|Hire.  (1.) One of David's heroes ( 1 Chronicles 11:35 ); called also Sharar ( 2 Samuel 23:33 ). (2.) A son of Obed-edom the Gittite, and a temple porter ( 1 Chronicles 26:4 ). 
MURDERERS|     mur'-der-erz ( Acts 21:38  the King James Version, the Revised Version (British and American) "assassins"): Represents a word only once mentioned in the New Testament, the Greek word sikarios, Latin sicarius from sica, "a small sword," or "dagger." The word describes the hired assassin, of whom there were bands in the pay of agitators in Rome in the last days of the Republic, who employed them to remove surreptitiously their political opponents. In the later days of the Jewish commonwealth, Judea became infested with the same type of ruffian, and it is natural that the Roman commandant at Jerusalem should describe them by the name so well known in the imperial city.  See  ASSASSINS .  T. Nicol.
COZEBA|     ko-ze'-ba ( 1 Chronicles 4:22 ).  See  ACHZIB .
BETHHACCEREM|House of a vineyard, a place in the tribe of Judah ( Nehemiah 3:14 ) where the Benjamites were to set up a beacon when they heard the trumpet against the invading army of the Babylonians ( Jeremiah 6:1 ). It is probable that this place is the modern `Ain Karim, or "well of the vineyards," near which there is a ridge on which are cairns which may have served as beacons of old, one of which is 40 feet high and 130 in diameter. 
SOSTHENES|Safe in strength, the chief ruler of the synagogue at Corinth, who was seized and beaten by the mob in the presence of Gallio, the Roman governor, when he refused to proceed against Paul at the instigation of the Jews ( Acts 18:12 -17). The motives of this assault against Sosthenes are not recorded, nor is it mentioned whether it was made by Greeks or Romans. Some identify him, but without sufficient grounds, with one whom Paul calls "Sosthenes our brother," a convert to the faith ( 1 Corinthians 1:1 ). 
SAMOTHRACIA|An island in the AEgean Sea, off the coast of Thracia, about 32 miles distant. This Thracian Samos was passed by Paul on his voyage from Troas to Neapolis ( Acts 16:11 ) on his first missionary journey. It is about 8 miles long and 6 miles broad. Its modern name is Samothraki. 
RUHAMAH|Having obtained mercy, a symbolical name given to the daughter of Hosea ( 2:1 ). 
OSHEA|     o-she'-a, o'-she-a (the Revised Version (British and American) "Hoshea" ( Numbers 13:8, 16 )): The original name of Joshua, the son of Nun, changed by Moses ( Numbers 13:16 ) from Hoshea (hoshea`, "help") to Joshua (yehoshua`, "help of Yahweh").  See  JOSHUA .
PUVAH|   PUAH;   pu'-a, pu'-va: (1) pu'ah: One of the Hebrew midwives whom the king of Egypt commanded to kill all male children of the Hebrews at birth. The midwives, fearing God, refused to obey, pretending that the children of the Hebrew women were usually born before they arrived. Their act is spoken of as being meritorious in the eyes of the Lord, who is said to have rewarded them by making "houses" for them ( Exodus 1:15-20 ). In the Midrash, Ex Rabba', Puah is identified with Miriam, and Shiphrah, the other midwife, with her mother Jochebed. According to another tradition Puah was a proselyte.  (2) pu'ah, in  1 Chronicles 7:1 ; puwwah, in  Genesis 46:13   Numbers 26:23 ; written also "Pua" the King James Version, and "Puvah" Revised Version: Second son of Issachar, ancestor of the Punites, enumerated in the desert census taken by Moses and Eleazar.  (3) pu'ah: Member of the tribe of Issachar, mentioned ( Judges 10:1 ) as the son of Dodo and the father of Tola, the judge.  Ella Davis Isaacs  PUVAH  pu'-va.  See  PUAH .
CHAPT|     (chathath): The Hebrew term chathath means "broken," "terrified" or "dismayed." This term as it occurs in  Jeremiah 14:4  is rendered "chapt" in English Versions of the Bible, "cracked" in the American Standard Revised Version, and "dismayed" in the Revised Version, margin. Inasmuch as the Hebrew term means "broken," it is not incorrectly rendered "chapt" or "chapped," which means to be cracked Open.
BASMATH|   BASEMATH; BASHEMATH;   bas'-e-math, bash'-e-math, bas'-math (basemath, "fragrant"):  (1) Basemath, one of the wives of Esau, a daughter of Elon, the Hittite ( Genesis 26:34 ; the King James Version Bashemath), probably identical with or a sister of Adah whom he also married ( Genesis 36:2 ). Compare ADAH.  (2) Basemath (the King James Version Bashemath), another wife of Esau, a daughter of Ishmael and a sister of Nebaioth ( Genesis 36:3, 4, 10, 13, 17 ). This wife is also called Mahalath ( Genesis 28:9 ), and is of the house of Abraham. Esau married her because his father was not pleased with his other wives who were daughters of Canaan. Compare MAHALATH.  (3) Basemath (the King James Version Basmath), the daughter of Solomon, and wife of Ahimaaz, a commissariat-officer in the service of Solomon ( 1 Kings 4:15 ).  A. L. Breslich  BASMATH  bas'-math.  See  BASEMATH .
NAHALAL|     na'-hal-al (nachalal; Codex Vaticanus, Baithman; Codex Alexandrinus Naalol, and other forms): A city in the territory of Zebulun assigned with its suburbs to the Merarite Levites, out of which the Canaanite inhabitants were not driven ( Joshua 19:15 , the King James Version (incorrectly) "Nahallal";  Joshua 21:35   Judges 1:30 , "Nahalol"). In the Talmud Jerusalem (Meg., i.1) it is identified with Mahlul. This name might correspond either with `Ain Mahil, or with Ma`lul. The former lies about 3 1/2 miles Northeast of Nazareth on a hill near the eastern boundary of Zebulun. The latter is situated about 3 1/2 miles West of Nazareth, near the southern border of Zebulun. The change of "n" to "m" is not unusual.  W. Ewing
BAALE|Baale of Judah Lords of Judah, a city in the tribe of Judah from which David brought the ark into Jerusalem ( 2 Samuel 6:2 ). Elsewhere ( 1 Chronicles 13:6 ) called Kirjath-jearim. (see  BAALAH .) 
MAON|Habitation, a town in the tribe of Judah, about 7 miles south of Hebron, which gave its name to the wilderness, the district round the conical hill on which the town stood. Here David hid from Saul, and here Nabal had his possessions and his home ( 1 Samuel 23:24 ,  25;  25:2 ). "Only some small foundations of hewn stone, a square enclosure, and several cisterns are now to be seen at Maon. Are they the remains of Nabal's great establishment?" The hill is now called Tell M'ain. 
SHELEPH|     she'-lef (shaleph, in pause; Septuagint Saleph): Son of Joktan ( Genesis 10:26   1 Chronicles 1:20 ). Sheleph is the name of a Yemenite tribe or district, named on Sabean inscriptions and also by Arabian geographers, located in Southern Arabia.
PATMOS|A small rocky and barren island, one of the group called the "Sporades," in the AEgean Sea. It is mentioned in Scripture only in  Revelation 1:9 . It was on this island, to which John was banished by the emperor Domitian (A.D. 95), that he received from God the wondrous revelation recorded in his book. This has naturally invested it with the deepest interest for all time. It is now called Patmo. (See John.) 
CHUN|One of the cities of Hadarezer, king of Syria. David procured brass (i.e.,  bronze or copper) from it for the temple ( 1 Chronicles 18:8 ). It is called Berothai in  2 Samuel 8:8 ; probably the same as Berothah in  Ezek. 47:16 . 
JEATHERAI|   ; JEATERAI  je-ath'-e-ri, jeat'-e-ri (Revised Version (British and American)), (the King James Version) (ye'atheray, meaning unknown): A descendant of Gershom, "son" of Levi ( 1 Chronicles 6:21 (Hebrew 6 )), and probably an ancestor of Asaph (so commentators); in 6:39-43 the corresponding name is "Ei." The difference in the Hebrew words is not great.
MEUNIM|     me-u'-nim (the King James Version Mehunim).  See  MAON .
KELAIAH|     ke-la'-ya, ke-li'-a (qelayah, "swift for Yah"[?]; Kolios; Codex Vaticanus, Konos): One of the priests who had "foreign wives" ( Ezra 10:23 , also "Kelita"). In parallel list of 1 Esdras 9:23, he again has a double name-"Colius" and "Calitas." A "Kelita" is named as helping Ezra at the expounding of the law ( Nehemiah 8:7 ; compare 1Es 9:48, "Calitas"), and also among the signatories of the covenant ( Nehemiah 10:9 ; for nature of covenant see  Nehemiah 10:28 ). They may not, however, be the same person.
SIBBECAI|The Lord sustains, one of David's heroes ( 1 Chronicles 11:29 ), general of the eighth division of the army ( 27:11 ). He slew the giant Saph in the battle of Gob ( 2 Samuel 21:18 ; R.V.,  "Sibbechai"). Called also Mebunnai ( 23:27 ). 
ITHNAN|     ith'-nan (yithnan): A town in the South of Judah mentioned along with Hazor and Ziph ( Joshua 15:23 ), apparently the "Ethnan" of Jerome (Onom 118 13). Not identified.
GILGAL|Rolling.  (1.) From the solemn transaction of the reading of the law in the valley of Shechem between Ebal and Gerizim the Israelites moved forward to Gilgal, and there made a permanent camp ( Joshua 9:6 ;  10:6 ). It was "beside the oaks of Moreh," near which Abraham erected his first altar ( Genesis 12:6 ,  7). This was one of the three towns to which Samuel resorted for the administration of justice ( 1 Samuel 7:16 ), and here also he offered sacrifices when the ark was no longer in the tabernacle at Shiloh ( 1 Samuel 10:8 ;  13:7 -9). To this place, as to a central sanctuary, all Israel gathered to renew their allegiance to Saul ( 11:14 ). At a later period it became the scene of idolatrous worship ( Hosea 4:15 ;  9:15 ). It has been identified with the ruins of Jiljilieh, about 5 miles south-west of Shiloh and about the same distance from Bethel. (2.) The place in "the plains of Jericho," "in the east border of Jericho," where the Israelites first encamped after crossing the Jordan ( Joshua 4:19 ,  20). Here they kept their first Passover in the land of Canaan ( 5:10 ) and renewed the rite of circumcision, and so "rolled away the reproach" of their Egyptian slavery. Here the twelve memorial stones, taken from the bed of the Jordan, were set up; and here also the tabernacle remained till it was removed to Shiloh ( 18:1 ). It has been identified with Tell Jiljulieh, about 5 miles from Jordan. (3.) A place, probably in the hill country of Ephraim, where there was a school of the prophets ( 2 Kings 4:38 ), and whence Elijah and Elisha, who resided here, "went down" to Bethel ( 2:1 , 2). It is mentioned also in  Deuteronomy 11:30 . It is now known as Jiljilia, a place 8 miles north of Bethel. 
NEHEMIAH|Comforted by Jehovah.  (1.)  Ezra 2:2 ;  Nehemiah 7:7 .  (2.)  Nehemiah 3:16 . (3.) The son of Hachaliah ( Nehemiah 1:1 ), and probably of the tribe of Judah. His family must have belonged to Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 2:3 ). He was one of the "Jews of the dispersion," and in his youth was appointed to the important office of royal cup-bearer at the palace of Shushan. The king, Artaxerxes Longimanus, seems to have been on terms of friendly familiarity with his attendant. Through his brother Hanani, and perhaps from other sources ( Nehemiah 1:2 ;  2:3 ), he heard of the mournful and desolate condition of the Holy City, and was filled with sadness of heart. For many days he fasted and mourned and prayed for the place of his fathers' sepulchres. At length the king observed his sadness of countenance and asked the reason of it. Nehemiah explained it all to the king, and obtained his permission to go up to Jerusalem and there to act as tirshatha, or governor of Judea. He went up in the spring of B.C. 446 (eleven years after Ezra), with a strong escort supplied by the king, and with letters to all the pashas of the provinces through which he had to pass, as also to Asaph, keeper of the royal forests, directing him to assist Nehemiah. On his arrival he set himself to survey the city, and to form a plan for its restoration; a plan which he carried out with great skill and energy, so that the whole was completed in about six months. He remained in Judea for thirteen years as governor, carrying out many reforms, notwithstanding much opposition that he encountered ( Nehemiah 13:11 ). He built up the state on the old lines, "supplementing and completing the work of Ezra," and making all arrangements for the safety and good government of the city. At the close of this important period of his public life, he returned to Persia to the service of his royal master at Shushan or Ecbatana. Very soon after this the old corrupt state of things returned, showing the worthlessness to a large extent of the professions that had been made at the feast of the dedication of the walls of the city ( Nehemiah 12 . See Ezra). Malachi now appeared among the people with words of stern reproof and solemn warning; and Nehemiah again returned from Persia (after an absence of some two years), and was grieved to see the widespread moral degeneracy that had taken place during his absence. He set himself with vigour to rectify the flagrant abuses that had sprung up, and restored the orderly administration of public worship and the outward observance of the law of Moses. Of his subsequent history we know nothing. Probably he remained at his post as governor till his death (about B.C. 413) in a good old age. The place of his death and burial is, however, unknown. "He resembled Ezra in his fiery zeal, in his active spirit of enterprise, and in the piety of his life: but he was of a bluffer and a fiercer mood; he had less patience with transgressors; he was a man of action rather than a man of thought, and more inclined to use force than persuasion. His practical sagacity and high courage were very Markedly shown in the arrangement with which he carried through the rebuilding of the wall and balked the cunning plans of the `adversaries.' The piety of his heart, his deeply religious spirit and constant sense of communion with and absolute dependence upon God, are strikingly exhibited, first in the long prayer recorded in ch. 1:5-11, and secondly and most remarkably in what have been called his `interjectional prayers', those short but moving addresses to Almighty God which occur so frequently in his writings, the instinctive outpouring of a heart deeply moved, but ever resting itself upon God, and looking to God alone for aid in trouble, for the frustration of evil designs, and for final reward and acceptance" (Rawlinson). Nehemiah was the last of the governors sent from the Persian court. Judea after this was annexed to the satrapy of Coele-Syria, and was governed by the high priest under the jurisdiction of the governor of Syria, and the internal government of the country became more and more a hierarchy.  Nehemiah, Book of The author of this book was no doubt Nehemiah himself. There are portions of the book written in the first person (ch. 1-7;  12:27 -47,  and 13). But there are also portions of it in which Nehemiah is spoken of in the third person (ch. 8; 9; 10). It is supposed that these portions may have been written by Ezra; of this, however, there is no distinct evidence. These portions had their place assigned them in the book, there can be no doubt, by Nehemiah. He was the responsible author of the whole book, with the exception of ch. 12:11, 22, 23. The date at which the book was written was probably about B.C. 431-430, when Nehemiah had returned the second time to Jerusalem after his visit to Persia. The book, which may historically be regarded as a continuation of the book of Ezra, consists of four parts.  (1.) An account of the rebuilding of the wall of Jerusalem, and of the register Nehemiah had found of those who had returned from Babylon (ch. 1-7).  (2.) An account of the state of religion among the Jews during this time (8-10).  (3.) Increase of the inhabitants of Jerusalem; the census of the adult male population, and names of the chiefs, together with lists of priests and Levites (11- 12:1 -26).  (4.) Dedication of the wall of Jerusalem, the arrangement of the temple officers, and the reforms carried out by Nehemiah ( 12:27 -ch. 13). This book closes the history of the Old Testament. Malachi the prophet was contemporary with Nehemiah.
ELIHOREPH|     el-i-ho'-ref ('elichoreph, "God of autumn"?):  A scribe of Solomon and son of Shisha ( 1 Kings 4:3 ).
EZIONGEBER|The giant's backbone (so called from the head of a mountain which runs out into the sea), an ancient city and harbour at the north-east end of the Elanitic branch of the Red Sea, the Gulf of Akabah, near Elath or Eloth ( Numbers 33:35 ;  Deuteronomy 2:8 ). Here Solomon built ships, "Tarshish ships," like those trading from Tyre to Tarshish and the west, which traded with Ophir ( 1 Kings 9:26 ;  2 Chronicles 8:17 ); and here also Jehoshaphat's fleet was shipwrecked ( 1 Kings 22:48 ;  2 Chronicles 20:36 ). It became a populous town, many of the Jews settling in it ( 2 Kings 16:6 ,  "Elath"). It is supposed that anciently the north end of the gulf flowed further into the country than now, as far as `Ain el-Ghudyan, which is 10 miles up the dry bed of the Arabah, and that Ezion-geber may have been there. 
PLUMBLINE|   PLUMB-LINE; PLUMMET  plum'-lin, plum'-et, plum'-it.  See  TOOLS .
GETHER|     ge'-ther (gether): In  Genesis 10:23  named as one of the 4 sons of Aramaic In  1 Chronicles 1:17  mentioned simply among the sons of Shem.
ELIAM|God's people.  (1.) The father of Bathsheba, the wife of Uriah ( 2 Samuel 11:3 ). In  1 Chronicles 3:5  his name is Ammiel. (2.) This name also occurs as that of a Gilonite, the son of Ahithophel, and one of David's thirty warriors ( 2 Samuel 23:34 ). perhaps these two were the same person. 
ISHMAELITES|     ish'-ma-el-its (yishme`e'lim): The supposed descendants of Ishmael, the son of Abraham and Hagar, whom Abraham sent away from him after the birth of Isaac ( Genesis 21:14-21 ). The sons of Ishmael are given in  Genesis 25:13, 14 ; they were twelve in number and gave rise to as many tribes, but the term Ishmaelite has a broader signification, as appears from  Genesis 37:28 . 36, where it is identified with Midianite. From  Genesis 16:12  it may be inferred that it was applied to the Bedouin of the desert region East of the Jordan generally, for the character there assigned to Ishmael, "His hand shall be against every man, and every man's hand against him," fits the habits of Bedouin in all ages. Such was the character of the Midianites as described in  Judges 7 , who are again identified with the Ishmaelites (8:24). These references show that the Ishmaelites were not confined to the descendants of the son of Abraham and Hagar, but refer to the desert tribes in general, like "the children of the east" ( Judges 7:12 ).  H. Porter
RECHABITES|The descendants of Rechab through Jonadab or Jehonadab. They belonged to the Kenites, who accompanied the children of Israel into Palestine, and dwelt among them. Moses married a Kenite wife ( Judges 1:16 ), and Jael was the wife of "Heber the Kenite" ( 4:17 ). Saul also showed kindness to the Kenites ( 1 Samuel 15:6 ). The main body of the Kenites dwelt in cities, and adopted settled habits of life ( 30:29 ); but Jehonadab forbade his descendants to drink wine or to live in cities. They were commanded to lead always a nomad life. They adhered to the law laid down by Jonadab, and were noted for their fidelity to the old-established custom of their family in the days of Jeremiah (35); and this feature of their character is referred to by the prophet for the purpose of giving point to his own exhortation. They are referred to in  Nehemiah 3:14  and  1 Chronicles 2:55 . Dr. Wolff (1839) found in Arabia, near Mecca, a tribe claiming to be descendants of Jehonadab; and recently a Bedouin tribe has been found near the Dead Sea who also profess to be descendants of the same Kenite chief. 
GABBAI|     gab'-a-i (gabbay, "collector"): One of the chiefs of the Benjamites in Jerusalem after the return from the Babylonian captivity ( Nehemiah 11:8 ).
SCORPIONS|Mentioned along with serpents ( Deuteronomy 8:15 ). Used also figuratively to denote wicked persons ( Ezek. 2:6 ;  Luke 10:19 ); also a particular kind of scourge or whip ( 1 Kings 12:11 ). Scorpions were a species of spider. They abounded in the Jordan valley. 
MIJAMIN|     mij'-a-min (miyamin; the King James Version Miamin):  (1) One of those who had married foreign wives ( Ezra 10:25 ). He is also called Maelus (1 Esdras 9:26).  (2) The one to whom fell the lot for the 6th priestly course ( 1 Chronicles 24:9 ). His family returned with Zerubbabel and Joshua ( Nehemiah 12:5 ).  (3) A signatory of the Covenant ( Nehemiah 10:7 ).
ELIJAH|Whose God is Jehovah.  (1.) "The Tishbite," the "Elias" of the New Testament, is suddenly introduced to our notice in  1 Kings 17:1  as delivering a message from the Lord to Ahab. There is mention made of a town called Thisbe, south of Kadesh, but it is impossible to say whether this was the place referred to in the name given to the prophet. Having delivered his message to Ahab, he retired at the command of God to a hiding-place by the brook Cherith, beyond Jordan, where he was fed by ravens. When the brook dried up God sent him to the widow of Zarephath, a city of Zidon, from whose scanty store he was supported for the space of two years. During this period the widow's son died, and was restored to life by Elijah ( 1 Kings 17:2 -24). During all these two years a famine prevailed in the land. At the close of this period of retirement and of preparation for his work (Comp.  Galatians 1:17 ,  18) Elijah met Obadiah, one of Ahab's officers, whom he had sent out to seek for pasturage for the cattle, and bade him go and tell his master that Elijah was there. The king came and met Elijah, and reproached him as the troubler of Israel. It was then proposed that sacrifices should be publicly offered, for the purpose of determining whether Baal or Jehovah were the true God. This was done on Carmel, with the result that the people fell on their faces, crying, "The Lord, he is the God." Thus was accomplished the great work of Elijah's ministry. The prophets of Baal were then put to death by the order of Elijah. Not one of them escaped. Then immediately followed rain, according to the word of Elijah, and in answer to his prayer ( James 5:18 ). Jezebel, enraged at the fate that had befallen her priests of Baal, threatened to put Elijah to death ( 1 Kings 19:1 -13). He therefore fled in alarm to Beersheba, and thence went alone a day's journey into the wilderness, and sat down in despondency under a juniper tree. As he slept an angel touched him, and said unto him, "Arise and eat; because the journey is too great for thee." He arose and found a cake and a cruse of water. Having partaken of the provision thus miraculously supplied, he went forward on his solitary way for forty days and forty nights to Horeb, the mount of God, where he took up his abode in a cave. Here the Lord appeared unto him and said, "What dost thou here, Elijah?" In answer to his despondent words God manifests to him his glory, and then directs him to return to Damascus and anoint Hazael king over Syria, and Jehu king over Israel, and Elisha to be prophet in his room ( 1 Kings 19:13 -21; Comp.  2 Kings 8:7 -15;  9:1 -10). Some six years after this he warned Ahab and Jezebel of the violent deaths they would die ( 1 Kings 21:19 -24;  22:38 ). He also, four years afterwards, warned Ahaziah (q.v.), who had succeeded his father Ahab, of his approaching death ( 2 Kings 1:1 -16). (see  NABOTH .) During these intervals he probably withdrew to some quiet retirement, no one knew where. His interview with Ahaziah's messengers on the way to Ekron, and the account of the destruction of his captains with their fifties, suggest the idea that he may have been in retirement at this time on Mount Carmel. The time now drew near when he was to be taken up into heaven ( 2 Kings 2:1 -12). He had a presentiment of what was awaiting him. He went down to Gilgal, where was a school of the prophets, and where his successor Elisha, whom he had anointed some years before, resided. Elisha was solemnized by the thought of his master's leaving him, and refused to be parted from him. "They two went on," and came to Bethel and Jericho, and crossed the Jordan, the waters of which were "divided hither and thither" when smitten with Elijah's mantle. Arrived at the borders of Gilead, which Elijah had left many years before, it "came to pass as they still went on and talked" they were suddenly separated by a chariot and horses of fire; and "Elijah went up by a whirlwind into heaven, "Elisha receiving his mantle, which fell from him as he ascended. No one of the old prophets is so frequently referred to in the New Testament. The priests and Levites said to the Baptist ( John 1:25 ), "Why baptizest thou, if thou be not that Christ, nor Elias?" Paul ( Romans 11:2 ) refers to an incident in his history to illustrate his argument that God had not cast away his people. James ( 5:17 ) finds in him an illustration of the power of prayer. (See also  Luke 4:25 ;  9:54. ) He was a type of John the Baptist in the sternness and power of his reproofs ( Luke 9:8 ). He was the Elijah that "must first come" ( Matthew 11:11 ,  14), the forerunner of our Lord announced by Malachi. Even outwardly the Baptist corresponded so closely to the earlier prophet that he might be styled a second Elijah. In him we see "the same connection with a wild and wilderness country; the same long retirement in the desert; the same sudden, startling entrance on his work ( 1 Kings 17:1 ;  Luke 3:2 ); even the same dress, a hairy garment, and a leathern girdle about the loins ( 2 Kings 1:8 ;  Matthew 3:4 )." How deep the impression was which Elijah made "on the mind of the nation may be judged from the fixed belief, which rested on the words of Malachi ( 4:5 ,  6), which many centuries after prevailed that he would again appear for the relief and restoration of the country. Each remarkable person as he arrives on the scene, be his habits and characteristics what they may, the stern John equally with his gentle Successor, is proclaimed to be Elijah ( Matthew 11:13 ,  14;  16:14 ;  17:10 ;  Mark 9:11 ;  15:35 ;  Luke 9:7 ,  8;  John 1:21 ). His appearance in glory on the mount of transfiguration does not seem to have startled the disciples. They were `sore afraid,' but not apparently surprised." (2.) The Elijah spoken of in  2 Chronicles 21:12 -15 is by some supposed to be a different person from the foregoing. He lived in the time of Jehoram, to whom he sent a letter of warning (Comp.  1 Chronicles 28:19 ;  Jeremiah 36 ), and acted as a prophet in Judah; while the Tishbite was a prophet of the northern kingdom. But there does not seem any necessity for concluding that the writer of this letter was some other Elijah than the Tishbite. It may be supposed either that Elijah anticipated the character of Jehoram, and so wrote the warning message, which was preserved in the schools of the prophets till Jehoram ascended the throne after the Tishbite's translation, or that the translation did not actually take place till after the accession of Jehoram to the throne ( 2 Chronicles 21:12 ;  2 Kings 8:16 ). The events of  2 Kings 2  may not be recorded in chronological order, and thus there may be room for the opinion that Elijah was still alive in the beginning of Jehoram's reign.
JAALAM|Concealer, the second of Esau's three sons by Aholibamah ( Genesis 36:5 ,  14). 
GAZZAM|     gaz'-am (gazzam, "devouring"):  Head of a family of Nethinim who returned from exile ( Ezra 2:48   Nehemiah 7:51 ; APC 1Esdras 5:31, "Gazera").
SYRIA|(Hebrews Aram), the name in the Old Testament given to the whole country which lay to the north-east of Phoenicia, extending to beyond the Euphrates and the Tigris. Mesopotamia is called ( Genesis 24:10 ;  Deuteronomy 23:4 ) Aram-naharain (=Syria of the two rivers), also Padan-aram ( Genesis 25:20 ). Other portions of Syria were also known by separate names, as Aram-maahah ( 1 Chronicles 19:6 ), Aram-beth-rehob ( 2 Samuel 10:6 ), Aram-zobah ( 2 Samuel 10:6 ,  8). All these separate little kingdoms afterwards became subject to Damascus. In the time of the Romans, Syria included also a part of Palestine and Asia Minor. "From the historic annals now accessible to us, the history of Syria may be divided into three periods: The first, the period when the power of the Pharaohs was dominant over the fertile fields or plains of Syria and the merchant cities of Tyre and Sidon, and when such mighty conquerors as Thothmes III. and Rameses II. could claim dominion and levy tribute from the nations from the banks of the Euphrates to the borders of the Libyan desert. Second, this was followed by a short period of independence, when the Jewish nation in the south was growing in power, until it reached its early zenith in the golden days of Solomon; and when Tyre and Sidon were rich cities, sending their traders far and wide, over land and sea, as missionaries of civilization, while in the north the confederate tribes of the Hittites held back the armies of the kings of Assyria. The third, and to us most interesting, period is that during which the kings of Assyria were dominant over the plains of Syria; when Tyre, Sidon, Ashdod, and Jerusalem bowed beneath the conquering armies of Shalmaneser, Sargon, and Sennacherib; and when at last Memphis and Thebes yielded to the power of the rulers of Nineveh and Babylon, and the kings of Assyria completed with terrible fulness the bruising of the reed of Egypt so clearly foretold by the Hebrew prophets.", Boscawen. 
ORACLES|   SIBYLLINE   sib'-i-lin, -lin or'-a-k'-lz.  See  APOCALYPTIC LITERATURE, sec . B, V.  ORACLES, SIBYLLINE  sib'-i-lin, -lin.  See  APOCALYPTIC LITERATURE, sec . V.
NEGEB|     neg'-eb (ha-neghebh, "the negeb" or simply, neghebh, from a root meaning "to be dry," and therefore in the first instance implying the "dry" or "parched regions," hence, in the Septuagint it is usually translated eremos, "desert," also nageb):  1. Meaning:  As the Negeb lay to the South of Judah, the word came to be used in the sense of "the South," and is so used in a few passages (e.g.  Genesis 13:14 ) and in such is translated lips (see GEOGRAPHY). The English translation is unsuitable in several passages, and likely to lead to confusion. For example, in  Genesis 13:1  Abram is represented as going "into the South" when journeying northward from Egypt toward Bethel; in  Numbers 13:22  the spies coming from the "wilderness of Zin" toward Hebron are described as coming "by the South," although they were going north. The difficulty in these and many other passages is at once obviated if it is recognized that the Negeb was a geographical term for a definite geographical region, just as Shephelah, literally, "lowland," was the name of another district of Palestine. In the Revised Version (British and American) "Negeb" is given in margin, but it would make for clearness if it were restored to the text.  2. Description:  This "parched" land is generally considered as beginning South of edition Dahariyeb-the probable site of DEBIR (which see)-and as stretching South in a series of rolling hills running in a general direction of East to West until the actual wilderness begins, a distance of perhaps 70 miles (see NATURAL FEATURES). To the East it is bounded by the Dead Sea and the southern Ghor, and to the West there is no defined boundary before the Mediterranean. It is a land of sparse and scanty springs and small rainfall; in the character of its soil it is a transition from the fertility of Canaan to the wilderness of the desert; it is essentially a pastoral land, where grazing is plentiful in the early months and where camels and goats can sustain life, even through the long summer drought. Today, as through most periods of history, it is a land for the nomad rather than the settled inhabitant, although abundant ruins in many spots testify to better physical conditions at some periods (see I, 5, below). The direction of the valleys East or West, the general dryness, and the character of the inhabitants have always made it a more or less isolated region without thoroughfare. The great routes pass along the coast to the West or up the Arabah to the East. It formed an additional barrier to the wilderness beyond it; against all who would lead an army from the South, this southern frontier of Judah was always secure. Israel could not reach the promised land by this route, through the land of the Amalekites ( Numbers 13:29 ;  Numbers 14:43-45 ).  3. Old Testament References:  The Negeb was the scene of much of Abram's wanderings ( Genesis 12:9 ;  Genesis 13:1, 3 ; 20:1); it was in this district that Hagar met with the angel ( Genesis 16:7, 14 ); Isaac ( Genesis 24:62 ) and Jacob ( Genesis 37:1 ;  Genesis 46:5 ) both dwelt there. Moses sent the spies through this district to the hill country ( Numbers 13:17, 22 ); the Amalekites then dwelt there ( Numbers 13:29 ) and apparently, too, in some parts of it, the Avvim ( Joshua 13:3, 4 ). The inheritance of the children of Simeon, as given in  Joshua 19:1-9 , was in the Negeb, but in  Joshua 15:21-32  these cities are credited to Judah (see SIMEON). Achish allotted to David, in response to his request, the city of ZIKLAG (q.v) in the Negeb ( 1 Samuel 27:5 f ); the exploits of David were against various parts of this district described as the Negeb of Judah, the Negeb of the Jerahmeelites, and the Negeb of the Kenites, while in  1 Samuel 30:14  we have mention of the Negeb of the Cherethites and the Negeb of Caleb. To this we may add the Negeb of Arad ( Judges 1:16 ). It is impossible to define the districts of these various clans (see separate articles under these names). The, Negeb, together with the "hill-country" and the "Shephelah," was according to Jeremiah (17:26; 32:44:00; 33:13) to have renewed prosperity after the captivity of Judah was ended.  4. Later History:  When Nebuchadnezzar took Jerusalem the Edomites sided with the Babylonians (compare  Lamentations 4:21 ;  Ezekiel 35:3-15   Obadiah 1:10-16 ), and during the absence of the Jews they advanced north and occupied all the Negeb and Southern Judea as far as Hebron (see JUDAEA). Here they annoyed the Jews in Maccabean times until Judas expelled them from Southern Judea (164 B.C.) and John Hyrcanus conquered their country and compelled them to become Jews (109 B.C.). It was to one of the cities here-Malatha-that Herod Agrippa withdrew himself (Josephus, Ant, XVIII, vi, 2).  The palmy days of this district appear to have been during the Byzantine period: the existing ruins, so far as they can be dated at all, belong to this time. Beersheba was an important city with a bishop, and Elusa (mentioned by Ptolemy in the 2nd century) was the seat of a bishop in the 4th, 5th and 6th centuries. After the rise of Mohammedanism the land appears to have lapsed into primitive conditions. Although lawlessness and want of any central control may account for much of the retrogression, yet it is probable that Professor Ellsworth Huntington (loc. cit.) is right in his contention that a change of climate has had much to do with the rise and fall of civilization and settled habitation in this district. The district has long been given over to the nomads, and it is only quite recently that the Turkish policy of planting an official with a small garrison at Beersheba and at `Aujeh has produced some slight change in the direction of a settled population and agricultural pursuits.  5. Its Ancient Prosperity:  It is clear that in at least two historic periods the Negeb enjoyed a very considerable prosperity. What it may have been in the days of the Patriarchs it is difficult to judge; all we read of them suggests a purely nomadic life similar to the Bedouin of today but with better pasturage. In the division of the land among the tribes mention is made of many cities-the Hebrew mentions 29 ( Joshua 15:21-32 ;  Joshua 19:1-9   1 Chronicles 4:28-33 )-and the wealth of cattle evidently was great (compare  1 Samuel 15:9 ;  1 Samuel 27:9 ;  1 Samuel 30:16   2 Chronicles 14:14 ). The condition of things must have been far different from that of recent times.  The extensive ruins at Bir es Seba` (Beersheba) Khalasa (Elusa), Ruheibeh (REHOBOTH, which see), `Aujeh and other cities, together with the signs of orchards, vineyards and gardens scattered widely around these and other sites, show how comparatively well populated this area was in Byzantine times in particular. Professor Huntington (loc. cit.) concludes from these ruins that the population of the large towns of the Negeb alone at this period must have amounted to between 45,000 and 50,000. The whole district does not support 1,000 souls today.  LITERATURE.  Robinson, BR (1838); Wilton, The Negeb, or "South Country" of Scripture (1863); E.H. Palmer, The Desert of the Exodus, II (1871); Trumbull, Kadesh-Barnea (1884); G. A. Smith, HGHL, chapter xiii (1894); E. Huntington, Palestine and Its Transformation, chapter vi, etc.  E. W. G. Masterman
ISHIAH|     i-shi'-ya.  See  ISSHIAH .
SUCHATHITES|     su'-kath-its.  See  SUCATHITES .
MOAB|The seed of the father, or, according to others, the desirable land, the eldest son of Lot ( Genesis 19:37 ), of incestuous birth. (2.) Used to denote the people of Moab ( Numbers 22:3 -14;  Judges 3:30 ;  2 Samuel 8:2 ;  Jeremiah 48:11 ,  13). (3.) The land of Moab ( Jeremiah 48:24 ), called also the "country of Moab" ( Ruth 1:2 ,  6;  2:6 ), on the east of Jordan and the Dead Sea, and south of the Arnon ( Numbers 21:13 ,  26). In a wider sense it included the whole region that had been occupied by the Amorites. It bears the modern name of Kerak. In the Plains of Moab, opposite Jericho ( Numbers 22:1 ;  26:63 ;  Joshua 13:32 ), the children of Israel had their last encampment before they entered the land of Canaan. It was at that time in the possession of the Amorites ( Numbers 21:22 ). "Moses went up from the plains of Moab unto the mountain of Nebo, to the top of Pisgah," and "died there in the land of Moab, according to the word of the Lord" ( Deuteronomy 34:5 ,  6). "Surely if we had nothing else to interest us in the land of Moab, the fact that it was from the top of Pisgah, its noblest height, this mightiest of the prophets looked out with eye undimmed upon the Promised Land; that it was here on Nebo, its loftiest mountain, that he died his solitary death; that it was here, in the valley over against Beth-peor, he found his mysterious sepulchre, we have enough to enshrine the memory in our hearts." 
EVILDOERS|   EVIL-DOERS  e-v'-l-doo'-erz mere`im; from ra`-a`; kakopoios, always plural:  Malefactors or offenders of God's law. Used generally of the ungodly, as, "Fret not thyself because of evil-doers." ( Psalm 37:1 ). Sometimes also of personal offenders: "He hath delivered the soul of the needy from the hand of evil-doers." ( Jeremiah 20:13 ).
ONESIPHORUS|Bringing profit, an Ephesian Christian who showed great kindness to Paul at Rome. He served him in many things, and had oft refreshed him. Paul expresses a warm interest in him and his household ( 2 Timothy 1:16 -18;  4:19 ). 
NETOPHATHI|   ; NETOPHATHITES  ne-tof'-a-thi, ne-tof'-a-thits.  See  NETOPHAH .
GEBALITES|( 1 Kings 5:18  R.V.,  in A.V. incorrectly rendered,  after the Targum,  "stone-squarers, " but marg. "Giblites"), the inhabitants of Gebal (2). 
BAALHAZOR|Having a courtyard, or Baal's village, the place on the borders of Ephraim and Benjamin where Absalom held the feast of sheep-shearing when Amnon was assassinated ( 2 Samuel 13:23 ). Probably it is the same with Hazor ( Nehemiah 11:33 ), now Tell' Asur, 5 miles north-east of Bethel. 
ISHOD|     i'-shod, ish'-od (`ishehodh): the King James Version  1 Chronicles 7:18  for ISHHOD (which see).
DEKAR|     de'-kar (deqer, "lancer"): Father of one of Solomon's commissaries ( 1 Kings 4:9  the King James Version). See  BEN-DEKER .
RUDIMENTS|     roo'-di-ments (stoicheia, plural of stoicheion ( Galatians 4:3, 9   Colossians 2:8, 20   Hebrews 5:12   2 Peter 3:10, 12 )): This word occurs 7 t in the New Testament, and the King James Version translates it in three different ways. In the two passages in Galatians, and in the two in 2 Peter, it is rendered "elements." In the two passages in Colossians, it is translated "rudiments." In He it is rendered "first principles."  1. Etymological Meaning:  The etymological meaning of the word is, that which belongs to a row or rank, hence any first thing, an element, first principle. It denotes, specially  (1) the letters of the alphabet, the spoken sounds, as the elements of speech;  (2) the material elements of the universe, the physical atoms of which the world is composed;  (3) the heavenly bodies;  (4) the elements, rudiments, fundamental principles of any art, science or discipline; compare the phrase, "the a, b, c."  2. Use of Term in the New Testament:  (1) The New Testament use of the word, where it always occurs in the plural, is as follows: In  2 Peter 3:10, 12 , "The elements shall be dissolved with fervent heat," that is, the physical elements of the world and of the heavens are to be consumed, or subjected to change, by means of fire. In  Hebrews 5:12 , the King James Version "Ye have need that one teach you again which be the first principles of the oracles of God." This means that the Hebrew Christians had not made the advance expected, in grace and in the knowledge of God, but were in need of instruction in the elementary truths of the Christian faith.  (2) The Pauline use of the term is in Galatians and Colossians; see references as above. In  Galatians 4:3, 9  the King James Version Paul writes, "When we were children, (we) were in bondage under the elements of the world"; "How turn ye again to the weak and beggarly elements, whereunto ye desire again to be in bondage?" The apostle here means the ceremonial precepts of the worship of the Jews. These requirements involved much and protracted difficulty in their observance; they were "a yoke.... which neither our fathers nor we were able to bear" ( Acts 15:10 ). Yet the Galatian converts were tuning back again to these legal ordinances, and desired to be in bondage to them. These elements were "of the world," they had reference to material and not to spiritual things, they were formal and sensuous. They were "weak," for they had no power to rescue man from condemnation, and they could not save him from sin. They were "beggarly," for they brought no endowment of the heavenly riches. By these epithets Paul signifies that rites, ordinances, sacrifices, observance of days and seasons belonged to the elementary stages of the Jewish religion, which had now attained its end and purpose in the coming of Christ and His work. These things were necessary at the time they were divinely instituted, but the time had come when they were no longer required. They contained and conveyed an elementary knowledge, and were intended, from the first, to lead to an advance in the moral and spiritual life, which is now revealed in Christ.  It has been thought by some that what is meant by "elements" or "rudiments" in Galatians and Colossians is the physical elements, presided over by angels, and that this is in some way connected with the worship of angels, to which Paul refers in  Colossians 2:18 . The Jews believed that there were, angels of fire and of the wind, and of the other physical elements. The apostle therefore wished to show the foolishness of the worship of angels and of the heavenly bodies which they were supposed to control.  This latter meaning of the term is a possible, but not a probable one. The interpretation, already first given, which understands "elements" to mean the ordinances of Jewish legalism, is most in harmony with the gospel and with the teaching of Paul. "This is probably the correct interpretation, both as simpler in itself and as suiting the context better. Paul seems to be dwelling still on the rudimentary character of the law, as fitted for an earlier stage in the world's history" (Lightfoot, Commentary on Galatians, 167).  In  Colossians 2:8  the King James Version Paul writes, "Beware lest any man spoil you.... after the rudiments of the world, and not after Christ"; and in  Colossians 2:20 , the King James Version "Wherefore if ye be dead with Christ from the rudiments of the world, why.... are ye subject to ordinances?" The meaning of the term here is the elements of religious training, the ceremonial precepts of the Jewish Law. In Colossians and Galatians the meaning is that the systems of the false teachers, both in Colosse and in Galatia, laid stress on Jewish ritual, ceremonial law and ascetic observances-things of this world, belonging to the visible sphere, things elementary, and intended, so far as the Jewish Law is concerned, simply as a preparation for the coming of Christ. Such were the rudiments of the world, so far as their source was Jewish. On their heathen side they were still more decidedly anti-Christian. Both of these tendencies, Jewish and heathen, were "not according to Christ." For Christ Himself who atoned for sin, and who now lives and reigns, delivers believers from all such methods, as well as from the need of them.  John Rutherfurd
BILGAI|   BILGAH;   bil'-ga bil'-ga-i (bilgah; bilgay, "cheerfulness"): A priest or priestly family in the time of the Return ( Nehemiah 12:5 ), and (under the form of "Bilgai,"  Nehemiah 10:8 ) in the time of Nehemiah. According to  1 Chronicles 24:14 , Bilgah is the 15th of the 24 divisions of the priests who officiated in the Temple. In the Septuagint, the names read Belgai, Belga and Balgas. The traditional explanation of the name is "rejuvenation"; modern exegetes explain it as "cheerfulness."
MATTENAI|     mat-e-na'-i, mat'-e-ni (mattenay, "liberal"):  (1) (2) Two who married foreign wives, one a son of Hashum ( Ezra 10:33 ; in 1Es 9:33 "Altanneus"); the other a son of Bani ( Ezra 10:37 ).  (3) A priest in the days of Joiakim son of Jeshua ( Nehemiah 12:19 ), representing the house of Joiarib.
GALATIANS|Galatians, Epistle to The genuineness of this epistle is not called in question. Its Pauline origin is universally acknowledged. Occasion of. The churches of Galatia were founded by Paul himself ( Acts 16:6 ;  Galatians 1:8 ;  4:13 ,  19). They seem to have been composed mainly of converts from heathenism ( 4:8 ), but partly also of Jewish converts, who probably, under the influence of Judaizing teachers, sought to incorporate the rites of Judaism with Christianity, and by their active zeal had succeeded in inducing the majority of the churches to adopt their views ( 1:6 ;  3:1 ). This epistle was written for the purpose of counteracting this Judaizing tendency, and of recalling the Galatians to the simplicity of the gospel, and at the same time also of vindicating Paul's claim to be a divinely-commissioned apostle. Time and place of writing. The epistle was probably written very soon after Paul's second visit to Galatia ( Acts 18:23 ). The references of the epistle appear to agree with this conclusion. The visit to Jerusalem, mentioned in  Galatians 2:1 -10, was identical with that of  Acts 15 , and it is spoken of as a thing of the past, and consequently the epistle was written subsequently to the council of Jerusalem. The similarity between this epistle and that to the Romans has led to the conclusion that they were both written at the same time, namely, in the winter of A.D. 57-8, during Paul's stay in Corinth ( Acts 20:2 ,  3). This to the Galatians is written on the urgency of the occasion, tidings having reached him of the state of matters; and that to the Romans in a more deliberate and systematic way, in exposition of the same great doctrines of the gospel. Contents of. The great question discussed is, Was the Jewish law binding on Christians? The epistle is designed to prove against the Jews that men are justified by faith without the works of the law of Moses. After an introductory address ( Galatians 1:1 -10) the apostle discusses the subjects which had occasioned the epistle. (1) He defends his apostolic authority ( 1:11 -19;  2:1 -14); (2) shows the evil influence of the Judaizers in destroying the very essence of the gospel (3 and 4); (3) exhorts the Galatian believers to stand fast in the faith as it is in Jesus, and to abound in the fruits of the Spirit, and in a right use of their Christian freedom (5- 6:1 -10); (4) and then concludes with a summary of the topics discussed, and with the benediction. The Epistle to the Galatians and that to the Romans taken together "form a complete proof that justification is not to be obtained meritoriously either by works of morality or by rites and ceremonies, though of divine appointment; but that it is a free gift, proceeding entirely from the mercy of God, to those who receive it by faith in Jesus our Lord." In the conclusion of the epistle ( 6:11 ) Paul says, "Ye see how large a letter I have written with mine own hand." It is implied that this was different from his ordinary usage, which was simply to write the concluding salutation with his own hand, indicating that the rest of the epistle was written by another hand. Regarding this conclusion, Lightfoot, in his Commentary on the epistle, says: "At this point the apostle takes the pen from his amanuensis, and the concluding paragraph is written with his own hand. From the time when letters began to be forged in his name ( 2 Thessalonians 2:2 ;  3:17 ) it seems to have been his practice to close with a few words in his own handwriting, as a precaution against such forgeries...In the present case he writes a whole paragraph, summing up the main lessons of the epistle in terse, eager, disjointed sentences. He writes it, too, in large, bold characters (Gr. pelikois grammasin), that his hand-writing may reflect the energy and determination of his soul." (see  JUSTIFICATION .) 
SEMEI|Mentioned in the genealogy of our Lord ( Luke 3:26 ). 
BETHHARAN|   BETH-HARAN  beth-ha'-ran (beth haran): A fenced city East of the Jordan ( Numbers 32:36 ) identical with BETH-HARAM, which see.
UPHAZ|Probably another name for Ophir ( Jeremiah 10:9 ). Some, however, regard it as the name of an Indian colony in Yemen, southern Arabia; others as a place on or near the river Hyphasis (now the Ghana), the south-eastern limit of the Punjaub. 
NOBAH|Howling.  (1.)  Numbers 32:42 . (2.) The name given to Kenath (q.v.) by Nobah when he conquered it. It was on the east of Gilead ( Judges 8:11 ). 
HOUSETOP|     hous'-top.  See  HOUSE .
BETHMARCABOTH|   BETH-MARCABOTH  beth-mar'-ka-both (beth ha-markabhoth; Baithmachereb, "the house of chariots"): Mentioned along with Hazar-susah, "the station of horses" ( Joshua 19:5   1 Chronicles 4:31 ) as cities in the Negeb near Ziklag. It is tempting to connect these stations with "the cities for his chariots, and the cities for his horsemen" which Solomon built ( 1 Kings 9:19 ; compare  1 Kings 10:26 ). The site of Beth-marcaboth has not been identified, but Guerin (La Terre Sainte. Jerusalem et le Nord de la Judee, II, 230) suggests Khan Yunas, Southwest of Gaza, as a suitable chariot city.  E. W. G. Masterman
INNOCENTS|   , MASSACRE OF THE  in'-o-sents, mas'-a-ker,  I. MEANING AND HISTORY OF THE TERM  II. ANALYSIS OF NARRATIVE WITH SPECIAL REFERENCE TO MOTIVE  1. Focus of Narrative-Residence at Nazareth  2. Corollaries from Above Facts  3. Marks of Historicity  I. Meaning and History of the Term.  The conventional, ecclesiastical name given to the slaughter by HEROD, I (which see) of children two years old and under in Bethlehem and its environs at the time of the birth of Christ ( Matthew 2:16 ). The accepted title for this event may be traced through Augustine to Cyprian.  Irenaeus (died 202 A.D.) calls these children "martyrs," and in a very beautiful passage interprets the tragedy which ended their brief lives as a gracious and tender "sending before" into His kingdom by the Lord Himself.  Cyprian (died 258 A.D.) says: "That it might be manifest that they who are slain for Christ's sake are innocent, innocent infancy was put to death for his name's sake" (Ep. lv. 6).  Augustine (born 354 A.D.), following Cyprian, speaks of the children, formally, as "the Innocents" (Commentary on  Psalm 43:5 ).  The ecclesiastical treatment of the incident is remarkable because of the exaggeration which was indulged in as to the extent of the massacre and the number of victims. At an early date the Greek church canonized 14,000, and afterward, by a curious misinterpretation of  Revelation 14:1, 3 , the number was increased to 144,000.  According to Milman the liturgy of the Church of England retains a reminiscence of this ancient error in the use of  Revelation 14  on Holy Innocents' Day (see History of Christianity, I, 107, note e). This exaggeration, of which there is no hint in the New Testament, is worthy of note because the most serious general argument against the historicity of the narrative is drawn from the silence of Josephus. As in all probability there could not have been more than twenty children involved (compare Farrar, Life of Christ, I, 45, note), the incident could not have bulked very largely in the series of horrors perpetrated or planned by Herod in the last months of his life (see Farrar, The Herods, 144).  II. Analysis of Narrative with Special Reference to Motive.  In estimating the value of such a narrative from the viewpoint of historicity, the first and most important step is to gauge the motive. Why was the story told? This question is not always easy to answer, but in the present instance there is a very simple and effective test at hand.  1. Focus of Narrative-Residence at Nazareth:  In Matthew's infancy section ( Matthew 1 ;  Matthew 2 ) there are five quotations from the Old Testament which are set into the narrative of events. These five quotations represent the cardinal and outstanding points of interest. The quotations are placed thus:  (1) at the Virgin Birth ( Matthew 1:23 );  (2) at the birth at Bethlehem ( Matthew 2:6 );  (3) at the visit to Egypt ( Matthew 2:15 );  (4) at the murder of the children ( Matthew 2:18 );  (5) at the Nazareth residence ( Matthew 2:23 ).  It will be noticed at once as peculiar and significant that no quotation is attached to the visit of the Magi. This omission is the more noteworthy because in  Numbers 24:7   Psalm 72:15   Isaiah 60:6 , and numerous references to the ingathering of the Gentiles there are such beautiful and appropriate passages to link with the visit of the strangers from the far East. This peculiar omission, on the part of a writer so deeply interested in prophecy and its fulfillment and so keen to seize upon appropriate and suggestive harmonies, in a section constructed with a view to such harmonies, can be explained only on the ground that the visit of the Magi did not, in the writer's view of events, occupy a critical point of especial interest. Their visit is told, not for its own sake, but because of its connection with the murder of the children and the journey to Egypt. The murder of the children is of interest because it discloses the character of Herod and the perils surrounding the newborn Messiah. It also explains the visit to Egypt and the subsequent residence at Nazareth. The latter is evidently the objective point, because it is given a place by itself and marked by a quotation. Moreover, the one evidence of overstrain in the narrative is in the ambiguous and obscure statement by which the Old Testament is brought into relationship with the Nazareth residence. The center of interest in the entire section which is concerned with Herod and the Magi is the Nazareth residence. The story is told for the express purpose of explaining why the heir of David, who was born at Bethlehem, lived at Nazareth.  This brings the narrative of Matthew into striking relationship with that of Luke. The latter's concern is to show how it was that the Messiah who lived at Nazareth was born at Bethlehem. We have here one of the undesigned unities which bind together these two narratives which are seemingly so divergent. That Matthew says nothing about a previous residence at Nazareth and that Luke says nothing about a forced return thither may be explained, in accordance with the balance of probabilities, on the ground, either that each evangelist was ignorant of the fact omitted by himself, or that in his condensed and rapid statement he did not see fit to mention it. In any case the harmony immeasurably outweighs the discrepancy.  2. Corollaries from Above Facts:  The fact that the focus of the entire narrative lies in the residence of Jesus at Nazareth effectually disposes of a number of current hypotheses as to its origin.  (1) The idea that it is merely legend told for the purpose of literary embellishment. The dovetailing of what would be the main item into the rest of the narrative and its subordination to secondary features cannot be explained on this hypothesis. The absence of adornment by available passages from the Old Testament alone is conclusive on this point (see Allen, "Matthew," ICC, 14, 15).  (2) The idea that the story is told for the purpose of illustrating the scope of the Messiah's influence beyond Israel. Here, again, the subordinate position assigned to the story of the Magi together with the absence of Old Testament material is conclusive. Moreover, the history of the Magi is abruptly dropped with the statement of their return home. Interest in them flags as soon as their brief connection with the movement of the history through Herod ceases. And the intensely Hebraic character of Matthew's infancy section as a whole is incidental evidence pointing in the same direction (compare remarks of the writer, Birth and Infancy of Jesus Christ, 70).  (3) The idea that the story is told to emphasize the wonder-element in connection with the birth of Christ. The facts contradict this. In addition to the primary consideration, the subordinate position, there are others of great value. That the Magi were providentially guided to the feet of the Messiah is evidently the firm conviction of the narrator. The striking feature of the story is that with this belief in his mind he keeps so strictly within the limits of the natural order. In  Matthew 2:9  and 12 only is there apparent exception. Of these the statement in 2:9 is the only one peculiar to this part of the narrative. Two things are to be remembered concerning it: It is clear that the verse cannot be interpreted apart from a clear understanding of the whole astronomical occurrence of which it forms a part.  It is also evident that  Matthew 2:9  must not be interpreted apart from the context. From the viewpoint of a wonder-tale the writer makes a fatal blunder at the most critical point of his story. The popular notion that the Magi were miraculously led to the Messiah finds no support in the text. The Magi did not come to Bethlehem, but to Jerusalem, asking: "Where is he that is born King of the Jews?"  Matthew 2:9  comes after this statement and after the conclave called by Herod in which Bethlehem was specified. In view of all this it seems clear that the Magi were led, not miraculously, but in accordance with the genius of their own system, and that the Providential element lay in the striking coincidence of their visit and the birth of Jesus. The interest of the writer was not in the wonder-element, else, infallibly, he would have sharpened its outlines and expurgated all ambiguity as to the nature of the occurrence.  We may now glance at the positive evidence for the historicity of the event.  3. Marks of Historicity:  (1) The centering of the narrative upon the residence of Jesus at Nazareth. This not only brings Luke's Gospel in support of the center, but groups the story around a point of known interest to the first generation of believers. It is interesting to note that the residence in Egypt has independent backing of a sort. There are in existence two stories, one traced by Origen through Jews of his own day to earlier times, and the other in the Talmud, which connect Jesus with Egypt and attempt to account for His miracles by reference to Egyptian magic (see Plummer, "Matthew," Ex. Comm., 17, 18).  (2) The fact that the story of the Magi is told so objectively and with such personal detachment. Both Jews and early Christians had strong views both as to astrology and magic in general (see Plummer, op. cit., 15), but the author of this Gospel tells the story without emphasis and without comment and from the viewpoint of the Magi. His interest is purely historical and matter-of-fact.  (3) The portrait of Herod the Great. So far as Herod is concerned the incident is usually discussed with exclusive reference to the savagery involved. By many it is affirmed that we have here a hostile and unfair portrait. This contention could hardly be sustained even if the question turned entirely upon the point of savagery. But there is far more than savagery in the incident.  (a) In the first place there is this undeniable element of inherent probability in the story. Practically all of Herod's murders, including those of his beloved wife and his sons, were perpetrated under the sway of one emotion and in obedience to a single motive. They were in practically every instance for the purpose of consolidating or perpetuating his power. He nearly destroyed his own immediate family in the half-mad jealousy that on occasion drove him to the very limits of ferocity, simply because they were accused of plotting against him. The accusations were largely false, but the suspicion doomed those accused. The murder of the Innocents was another crime of the same sort. The old king was obsessed by the fear of a claimant to his petty throne; the Messianic hope of the Jews was a perpetual secret torment, and the murder of the children, in the attempt to reach the child whose advent threatened him, was at once so original in method and so characteristic in purpose as to give an inimitable veri-similitude to the whole narrative. There are also other traits of truth.  (b) Herod's prompt discovery of the visit of the Magi and their questions is in harmony with what we know of the old ruler's watchfulness and his elaborate system of espionage.  (c) Characteristic also is the subtlety with which he deals with the whole situation. How striking and vivid, with all its rugged simplicity, is the story of the king's pretended interest in the quest of the strangers, the solemn conclave of Jewish leaders with himself in the role of earnest inquirer, his urgent request for information that he may worship also, followed by his swift anger (note that ethumothe, "was wroth," verse 16, is not used elsewhere in the New Testament) at being deceived, and the blind but terrible stroke of his questing vengeance.  All these items are so true to the man, to the atmosphere which always surrounded him, and to the historic situation, that we are forced to conclude, either that we have veracious history more or less directly received from one who was an observer of the events described, or the work of an incomparably clever romancer.  Louis Matthews Sweet  MASSACRE OF THE INNOCENTS  mas'-a-ker.  See  INNOCENTS, MASSACRE OF THE .  SLAUGHTER, OF THE INNOCENTS  slo'-ter.  See  INNOCENTS, MASSACRE OF THE .
KEMUEL|Helper of God, or assembly of God.  (1.) The third son of Nahor ( Genesis 22:21 ). (2.) Son of Shiphtan, appointed on behalf of the tribe of Ephraim to partition the land of Canaan ( Numbers 34:24 ). (3.) A Levite ( 1 Chronicles 27:17 ). 
ITHAI|     ith'-a-i.  See  ITTAI .
TAHPANHES|     ta'-pan-hez, ta-pan'-hez (usually in the Old Testament tachpanchec; Septuagint Taphnas; Coptic, Taphnes): The various spellings of the Hebrew text are fairly well indicated in the King James Version by Tahapanes ( Jeremiah 2:16 ); Tahpanhes ( Jeremiah 43:7-9 ;  Jeremiah 44:1 ;  Jeremiah 46:14 ); Tehaphnehes ( Ezekiel 30:18 ), while an Egyptian queen (XXIst Dynasty) is named Tahpenes ( 1 Kings 11:19, 20 ). Tahpanhes was a city on the eastern frontier of Lower Egypt, represented today by Tell Defenneh, a desert mound lying some 20 miles Southwest from Pelusium (Biblical "Sin") and a little North of the modern Al-Kantarah ("the bridge"), marking the old caravan route from Egypt to Palestine, Mesopotamia and Assyria. Its Egyptian name is unknown, but it was called Daphnai, by the Greeks, and by the modern Arabs Def'neh. The site is now desolate, but it was a fertile district when watered by the Pelusiac branch of the Nile (compare  Isaiah 19:6, 7 ). Tahpanhes was so powerful that Jeremiah can say that it, with Memphis, has "broken the crown" of Israel's head (2:16), and Ezekiel can speak of its "daughters" (colonies or suburban towns), and names it with Heliopolis and Bubastis when the "yokes Septuagint "sceptres") of Egypt" shall be broken by Yahweh (30:18). In a later passage Jeremiah describes the flight of the Jews from their ruined capital to Tahpanhes after the death of Gedaliah (43:1-7) and prophesies that Nebuchadnezzar shall invade Egypt and punish it, establishing his throne upon the brick pavement (the King James Version "kiln") which is at the entry of Pharaoh's royal palace at Tahpanhes ( Jeremiah 43:8-11 ). He calls Tahpanhes as a witness to the desolation of the cities of Judah ( Jeremiah 44:1 ), but prophesies an equal destruction of Tahpanhes and other Egyptian cities (probably occupied by fugitive Jews) when Nebuchadnezzar shall smite them ( Jeremiah 46:14 ).  This invasion of Egypt by Nebuchadnezzar was for a long time strenuously denied (e.g. as late as 1889 by Kuenen, Historisch-critisch Onderzoek, 265-318); but since the discovery and publication (1878) of fragments of Nebuchadnezzar's annals in which he affirms his invasion of Egypt in his 37th year (568-567 B.C.), most scholars have agreed that the predictions of Jeremiah (43:9-13; 44:30) uttered shortly after 586 B.C. and of Ezekiel (29:19) uttered in 570 B.C. were fulfilled, "at least in their general sense" (Driver, Authority and Archaeology, 116). Three cuneiform inscriptions of Nebuchadnezzar were found by Arabs probably on or near this site. The excavation of Tahpanhes in 1886 by W. M. Flinders Petrie made it "highly probable that the large oblong platform of brickwork close to the palace fort built at this spot by Psammetichus I, circa 664 B.C., and now called Kasr Bint el-Yehudi, `the castle of the Jew's daughter,' is identical with the quadrangle `which is at the entry of Pharaoh's house in Tahpanhes' in which Jeremiah was commanded to bury the stones as a token that Nebuchadnezzar would spread his pavilion over them when he led his army into Egypt" (ibid., 117). Josephus explicitly mentions that Nebuchadnezzar, when he captured Tahpanhes, carried off a Jewish contingent from that city (Ant., IX, vii). Dr. Petrie found that while a small fort had existed here since the Rameside era (compare Herodotus ii.17), yet the town was practically founded by Psammetichus I, continued prosperous for a century or more, but dwindled to a small village in Ptolemaic times. Many sealings of wine jars stamped with the cartouches of Psammetichus I and Amosis were found in situ. Tahpanhes being the nearest Egyptian town to Palestine, Jeremiah and the other Jewish refugees would naturally flee there (43:7). It is not at all unlikely that Nebuchadnezzar's invasion of Egypt was partly due to Egypt's favorable reception of these refugees.  The pottery found at Tahpanhes "shows on the whole more evidence of Greeks than Egyptians in the place..... Especially between 607-587 B.C. a constant intercourse with the Greek settlers must have been going on and a wider intercourse than even a Greek colony in Palestine would have produced..... The whole circumstances were such as to give the best possible opportunity for the permeation of Greek words and Greek ideas among the upper classes of the Jewish exiles" (Petrie, Nebesheh and Defenneh, 1888, 50). This was, however, only one of many places where the Greeks and Hebrews met freely in this century (see e.g. Duruy, History of Greece, II, 126-80; Cobern, Daniel, 301-307). A large foreign traffic is shown at Tahpanhes in which no doubt the Jews took part. Discoveries from the 6th century B.C. included some very finely painted pottery, "full of archaic spirit and beauty," many amulets and much rich jewelry and bronze and iron weapons, a piece of scale armor, thousands of arrow heads, and three seals of a Syrian type. One of the few inscriptions prays the blessing of Neit upon "all beautiful souls." There was also dug up a vast number of minute weights evidently used for weighing precious metals, showing that the manufacture of jewelry was carried on here on a large scale. One of the most pathetic and suggestive "finds" from this century, which witnessed the Babylonian captivity, consisted of certain curious figures of captives, carved in limestone, with their legs bent backward from their knees and their ankles and elbows bound together (Petrie, op. cit., chapters ix-xii).  Camden M. Cobern
JESHUAH|   JESHUA;   jesh'-u-a, je-shu'-a (yeshua`, "Yahweh is deliverance" or "opulence"; compare JOSHUA):  (1) the King James Version "Jeshuah," head of the 9th course of priests, and possibly of "the house of Jeshua" ( 1 Chronicles 24:11   Ezra 2:36   Nehemiah 7:39 ).  (2) A Levite of Hezekiah's time ( 2 Chronicles 31:15 ).  (3) Son of Jozadak = Joshua the high priest ( Ezra 2:2 ;  Ezra 3:2, 8 ; 4:03; 5:02; 10:18  Nehemiah 7:7 ;  Nehemiah 12:1, 7, 10, 26 ); see JOSHUA (4) = "Jesus" (1 Esdras 5:48 and Sirach 49:12).  (4) A man of Pahath-moab, some of whose descendants returned from Babylon to Jerusalem with Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:6   Nehemiah 7:11 ) = "Jesus" (1 Esdras 58).  (5) Head of a Levitical house which had oversight of the workmen in the temple ( Ezra 2:40 ;  Ezra 3:9   Nehemiah 7:43 ). He is mentioned again in  Nehemiah 8:7  as taking part in explaining the Torah to the people, in  Nehemiah 9:4  (compare 12:8) as leading in the worship, and in 10:9 (Hebrew 10) as sealing the covenant; this Jeshua is called son of Azaniah ( Nehemiah 10:9 ). To these references should be added probably  Nehemiah 12:24 , where commentators read, "Jeshua, Binnui, Kadmiel" for "Jeshua the son of Kadmiel." Perhaps Jozabad ( Ezra 8:33 ) is a "son" of this same Jeshua; compare  Ezra 8:33  = 1 Esdras 8:63, where the King James Version is "Jesu," the Revised Version (British and American) "Jesus." He is the same as Jessue (the King James Version), Jesus (Revised Version) (1 Esdras 5:26).  (6) Father of Ezer, a repairer of the wall ( Nehemiah 3:19 ).  (7) JOSHUA, son of Nun ( Nehemiah 8:17 ) (which see).  David Francis Roberts
JOTBAH|     jot'-ba (yoTbah, "pleasantness"): The home of Meshullemeth, the mother of King Amon, daughter of Haruz ( 2 Kings 21:19 ). It may be the same as JOTBATHAH (which see).
MARESHAH|Possession, a city in the plain of Judah ( John 15:44 ). Here Asa defeated Zerah the Ethiopian ( 2 Chronicles 14:9 ,  10). It is identified with the ruin el-Mer'ash, about 1 1/2 mile south of Beit Jibrin. 
PALTI|Deliverance from the Lord, one of the spies representing the tribe of Benjamin ( Numbers 13:9 ). 
KEDRON|The valley, now quite narrow, between the Mount of Olives and Mount Moriah. The upper part of it is called the Valley of Jehoshaphat. The LXX., in  1 Kings 15:13 , translate "of the cedar." The word means "black," and may refer to the colour of the water or the gloom of the ravine, or the black green of the cedars which grew there.  John 18:1 , "Cedron," only here in New Testament. (see  KIDRON .) 
KIBZAIM|Two heaps, a city of Ephraim, assigned to the Kohathite Levites, and appointed as a city of refuge ( Joshua 21:22 ). It is also called Jokmeam ( 1 Chronicles 6:68 ). 
SUKKIIM|     suk'-i-im (cukkiyim): Named in  2 Chronicles 12:3  as a tribe that took part with Libyans and Cretans in the invasion of Judea by Shishak. The identification is uncertain.
TSADHE|     tsa-tha' ("ts"): The eighteenth letter of the Hebrew alphabet, and as such employed in  Psalm 119  to designate the 18th part, every verse of which begins with this letter. It is transliterated in this Encyclopedia as "ts". It came also to be used for the number 90. For name, etc., see ALPHABET; TSADHE.
BIMHAL|     bim'-hal (bimhal): A descendant of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 7:33 ).
MISPAR|     mis'-par (micpar): An exile who returned with Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:2 ). the King James Version spells the name "Mizpar." In the parallel verse of Nehemiah it appears as "Mispereth" ( Nehemiah 7:7 ).
GERA|Grain.  (1.) The son of Bela and grandson of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:3 ,  5, 7). (2.) The father of Ehud the judge ( Judges 3:15 ). (3.) The father of Shimei, who so grossly abused David ( 2 Samuel 16:5 ;  19:16 ,  18). 
HASSOPHERETH|     has-o-fe'-reth.  See  SOPHERETH .
LEBONAH|Frankincense, a town near Shiloh, on the north side of Bethel ( Judges 21:19 ). It has been identified with el-Lubban, to the south of Nablus. 
LENTILES|(Hebrews `adashim), a species of vetch ( Genesis 25:34 ;  2 Samuel 23:11 ), common in Syria under the name addas. The red pottage made by Jacob was of lentils ( Genesis 25:29 -34). They were among the provisions brought to David when he fled from Absalom ( 2 Samuel 17:28 ). It is the Ervum lens of Linnaeus, a leguminous plant which produces a fruit resembling a bean. 
ENAIM|     e-na'-im (`enayim, "place of a fountain"; Ainan;  Genesis 38:14  (the King James Version "in an open place";  Genesis 38:21  the King James Version "openly")):  A place which lay between Adullam and Timnath; probably the same as Enam ( Joshua 15:34 ). Also mentioned in close connection with Adullam. It was in the Shephelah of Judah. The Talmud (Pesik. Rab. 23) mentions a Kephar Enaim. Conder proposes Khurbet Wady `Alin, which is an ancient site, evidently of great strength and importance, lying between Kh. `Ain Shems and the village of Deir Aban. The ruins crown a lofty and almost isolated hill; the greatest objection to the identification is that there is no fountain at all in the immediate neighborhood. There may have been one in earlier times. See  PEF, III, 128 .  E. W. G. Masterman
JESHER|Uprightness, the first of the three sons of Caleb by Azubah ( 1 Chronicles 2:18 ). 
SHALEM|Perfect, a place (probably the village of Salim) some 2 miles east of Jacob's well. There is an abundant supply of water, which may have been the reason for Jacob's settling at this place ( Genesis 33:18 -20). The Revised Version translates this word, and reads, "Jacob came in peace to the city of Shechem," thus not regarding it as a proper name at all. 
SEMACHIAH|     sem-a-ki'-a (cemakhyahu, "Yah has sustained"): A Korahite family of gatekeepers ( 1 Chronicles 26:7 ). Perhaps the same name should be substituted for "Ismachiah" in  2 Chronicles 31:13  (see HPN, 291, 295).
IJEABARIM|Ruins of Abarim, the forty-seventh station of the Israelites in the wilderness, "in the border of Moab" ( Numbers 33:44 ). 
HAMMON|Warm springs.  (1.) A town in the tribe of Asher, near Zidon ( Joshua 19:28 ), identified with `Ain Hamul. (2.) A Levitical city of Naphtali ( 1 Chronicles 6:76 ). 
SUCCOTH|Booths.  (1.) The first encampment of the Israelites after leaving Ramesses ( Exodus 12:37 ); the civil name of Pithom (q.v.). (2.) A city on the east of Jordan, identified with Tell Dar'ala, a high mound, a mass of debris, in the plain north of Jabbok and about one mile from it ( Joshua 13:27 ). Here Jacob ( Genesis 32:17 ,  30;  33:17 ), on his return from Padan-aram after his interview with Esau, built a house for himself and made booths for his cattle. The princes of this city churlishly refused to afford help to Gideon and his 300 men when "faint yet pursuing" they followed one of the bands of the fugitive Midianites after the great victory at Gilboa. After overtaking and routing this band at Karkor, Gideon on his return visited the rulers of the city with severe punishment. "He took the elders of the city, and thorns of the wilderness and briers, and with them he taught the men of Succoth" ( Judges 8:13 -16). At this place were erected the foundries for casting the metal-work for the temple ( 1 Kings 7:46 ). 
LIBYANS|   LIBYA;   lib'-i-a, lib'-i-anz: In the Old Testament the word occurs in the King James Version in  2 Chronicles 12:3 ;  2 Chronicles 16:8   Nahum 3:9  for "Lubim" (thus the Revised Version (British and American)). the Revised Version (British and American), however, retains "Libyans" in  Daniel 11:43 . In  Jeremiah 46:9   Ezekiel 30:5 ;  Ezekiel 38:5 , the words are replaced in the Revised Version (British and American) by PUT (which see). In the New Testament the word "Libya" (Libue) occurs, in close connection with CYRENE (which see) ( Acts 2:10 ). Greek and Roman writers apply the term to the African continent, generally excluding Egypt.  See  LUBIM .
BENEBERAK|   BENE-BERAK  ben-e-be'-rak (bene beraq; Banebarak): A town in the territory of Dan ( Joshua 19:45 ), represented by the modern village Ibn Ibraq, about an hour Southeast of Jaffa.
PHALTI|Deliverance of the Lord, the son of Laish of Gallim ( 1 Samuel 25:44 )= Phaltiel ( 2 Samuel 3:15 ). Michal, David's wife, was given to him. 
ZATTU|Id., one whose descendants returned from the Captivity with Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:8 ;  Nehemiah 7:13 ); probably the same as Zatthu. 
SCALES|     skalz  (1) qasqeseth "fish-scales";  (2) meghinnah, maghen, "scales of the crocodile";  (3) lepis, with verb lepizo "scale away" (Tobit 3:17; 11:13)):  (1) The first Hebrew word qasqeseth means the imbricated scales of fish, which together with the dorsal fin were a distinguishing mark of all fish allowed as food to the Israelite ( Leviticus 11:9   Deuteronomy 14:9 f ). In the figurative sense the word is used of a coat of mail ( 1 Samuel 17:5, 38 ).  (2) Meghinnah from maghen, literally, "a buckler" or "small shield" ( 2 Chronicles 23:9   Jeremiah 46:3 ), is used in the description of the crocodile (see LEVIATHAN) for the horny scales or scutes imbedded in the skin, not imbricated upon it ( Job 41:15  (Hebrew verse 7)).  (3) The Greek lepis, which in classical language has a much wider range of meaning than the above Hebrew words ("rind," "husk," "shell," "fish-scale," "scale of snake," "flake of metal and of snow," etc.), is found in the New Testament description of Paul's recovery from temporary blindness, "And straightway there fell from his eyes as it were scales, and he received his sight" ( Acts 9:18 ).  There is nothing in the words of the sacred text which compels us to think of literal scales. (In Tobit, however, a literal flaking-off of foreign substance is meant.) We have here rather a description of the sensation which terminated the three days' period of blindness which the apostle suffered after his meeting with the risen Lord on the road to Damascus. The apostle himself does not use this expression in his own graphic description of the same experience: "In that very hour I looked upon him" ( Acts 22:13 ). The phrase has, however, come into English, for we speak of "scales falling from one's eyes" when we mean a sudden illumination or remembrance or a dissipation of harassing doubt.  In  Isaiah 40:12 ; the Revised Version (British and American)  Proverbs 16:11  for peles, in the sense of "instrument for weighing."  See  BALANCE .  H. L. E. Luering
BETHUL|     beth'-ul, be'-thul (bethul):  See  BETHUEL ;  CHESIL .
MAHLON|Sickly, the elder of Elimelech the Bethlehemite's two sons by Naomi. He married Ruth and died childless ( Ruth 1:2 ,  5;  4:9 ,  10), in the land of Moab. 
MIDIANITE|An Arabian tribe descended from Midian. They inhabited principally the desert north of the peninsula of Arabia. The peninsula of Sinai was the pasture-ground for their flocks. They were virtually the rulers of Arabia, being the dominant tribe. Like all Arabians, they were a nomad people. They early engaged in commercial pursuits. It was to one of their caravans that Joseph was sold ( Genesis 37:28 ,  36). The next notice of them is in connection with Moses' flight from Egypt ( Exodus 2:15 -21). Here in Midian Moses became the servant and afterwards the son-in-law of Reuel or Jethro, the priest. After the Exodus, the Midianites were friendly to the Israelites so long as they traversed only their outlying pasture-ground on the west of the Arabah; but when, having passed the southern end of Edom, they entered into the land of Midian proper, they joined with Balak, the king of Moab, in a conspiracy against them ( Numbers 22:4 -7). Balaam, who had been sent for to curse Israel, having utterly failed to do so, was dismissed by the king of Moab; nevertheless he still tarried among the Midianites, and induced them to enter into correspondence with the Israelites, so as to bring them into association with them in the licentious orgies connected with the worship of Baal-Peor. This crafty counsel prevailed. The Israelites took part in the heathen festival, and so brought upon themselves a curse indeed. Their apostasy brought upon them a severe punishment. A plague broke out amongst them, and more than twenty-four thousand of the people perished ( Numbers 25:9 ). But the Midianites were not to be left unpunished. A terrible vengeance was denounced against them. A thousand warriors from each tribe, under the leadership of Phinehas, went forth against them. The Midianites were utterly routed. Their cities were consumed by fire, five of their kings were put to death, and the whole nation was destroyed ( Joshua 13:21 ,  22). Balaam also perished by the sword, receiving the "wages of his unrighteousness" ( Numbers 31:8 ;  2 Peter 2:15 ). The whole of the country on the east of Jordan, now conquered by the Israelites (see  SIHON ; OG), was divided between the two tribes of Reuben and Gad and the half tribe of Manasseh. Some two hundred and fifty years after this the Midianites had regained their ancient power, and in confederation with the Amalekites and the "children of the east" they made war against their old enemies the Israelites, whom for seven years they oppressed and held in subjection. They were at length assailed by Gideon in that ever-memorable battle in the great plain of Esdraelon, and utterly destroyed ( Judges 6:1 -ch. 7). Frequent allusions are afterwards made to this great victory ( Psalm 83:10 ,  12;  Isaiah 9:4 ;  10:6 ). They now wholly pass away from the page of history both sacred and profane. 
TAREA|     ta'-re-a, ta-re'-a (ta'area`, a copyist's mistake ( 1 Chronicles 8:35 ) for tacharea, "the shrewd one," in  1 Chronicles 9:41 ; Codex Vaticanus Theree; Codex Alexandrinus Tharee; Lucian, Tharaa; in  1 Chronicles 9:41 , Codex Vaticanus Tharach; Codex Alexandrinus Thara; Lucian, Tharaa; see TAHREA): A descendant of Saul mentioned in a genealogy of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 9:41 ).
UNQUENCHABLE|    FIRE  un-kwench'-a-b'-l, pur asbestos): The phrase occurs in  Matthew 3:12  and its parallel  Luke 3:17  in the words of the Baptist on the Messianic judgment: "The chaff he will burn up with unquenchable fire"; but also on the lips of Christ Himself in  Mark 9:43 , where the "unquenchable fire" is equated with "Gehenna" (which see). The same idea lies in 9:48, "The fire is not quenched" (ou sbennutai), and is implied in the numerous allusions to fire as the instrument of punishment and destruction in the Gospels and other parts of the New Testament (e.g. "the Gehenna of fire,"  Matthew 5:22  margin, etc.; "furnace of fire,"  Matthew 13:40, 42, 50 ; "eternal fire,"  Matthew 25:41 ; compare also  2 Thessalonians 1:8   2 Peter 3:7 ;  Jude 1:7   Revelation 19:20 ;  Revelation 20:10, 14, 15 ;  Revelation 21:8 ). For Old Testament analogies compare  Isaiah 1:31 ;  Isaiah 34:10 ;  Isaiah 66:24   Jeremiah 4:4 ;  Jeremiah 7:20 ;  Jeremiah 17:27 ;  Jeremiah 21:12   Ezekiel 20:47, 48 . The language is obviously highly metaphorical, conveying the idea of an awful and abiding judgment, but is not to be pressed as teaching a destruction in the sense of annihilation of the wicked. An unquenchable fire is not needed for a momentary act of destruction. Even in the view of Edward White, the wicked survive the period of judgment to which these terms relate.  See  PUNISHMENT, EVERLASTING .  James Orr  FIRE, UNQUENCHABLE  See  UNQUENCHABLE FIRE .
TIMNITE|A man of Timnah. Samson's father-in-law is so styled ( Judges 15:6 ). 
NAAMAH|The beautiful.  (1.) The daughter of Lamech and Zillah ( Genesis 4:22 ). (2.) The daughter of the king of Ammon, one of the wives of Solomon, the only one who appears to have borne him a son, viz., Rehoboam ( 1 Kings 14:21 ,  31). (3.) A city in the plain of Judah ( Joshua 15:41 ), supposed by some to be identified with Na'aneh, some 5 miles south-east of Makkedah. 
THELASAR|     the-la'-sar (tela'ssar, telassar).  See  TELASSAR .
SHOA|Opulent, the mountain district lying to the north-east of Babylonia, anciently the land of the Guti, or Kuti, the modern Kurdistan. The plain lying between these mountains and the Tigris was called su-Edina, i.e., "the border of the plain." This name was sometimes shortened into Suti and Su, and has been regarded as = Shoa ( Ezek. 23:23 ). Some think it denotes a place in Babylon. (see  PEKOD .) 
DATHAN|Welled; belonging to a fountain, a son of Eliab, a Reubenite, who joined Korah (q.v.) in his conspiracy, and with his accomplices was swallowed up by an earthquake ( Numbers 16:1 ;  26:9 ;  Deuteronomy 11:6 ;  Psalm 106:17 ). 
RIMMON|Pomegranate.  (1.) A man of Beeroth ( 2 Samuel 4:2 ), one of the four Gibeonite cities. (See  Joshua 9:17. ) (2.) A Syrian idol, mentioned only in  2 Kings 5:18 . (3.) One of the "uttermost cities" of Judah, afterwards given to Simeon ( Joshua 15:21 ,  32;  19:7 ;  1 Chronicles 4:32 ). In  Joshua 15:32  Ain and Rimmon are mentioned separately, but in 19:7 and  1 Chronicles 4:32  (Comp.  Nehemiah 11:29 ) the two words are probably to be combined, as forming together the name of one place, Ain-Rimmon=the spring of the pomegranate. It has been identified with Um er-Rumamin, about 13 miles south-west of Hebron. (4.) "Rock of," to which the Benjamites fled ( Judges 20:45 ,  47;  21:13 ), and where they maintained themselves for four months after the fearful battle at Gibeah, in which they were almost exterminated, 600 only surviving out of about 27,000. It is the present village of Rummon, "on the very edge of the hill country, with a precipitous descent toward the Jordan valley," supposed to be the site of Ai. 
MANAHATHITES|     man'-a-hath-its (menuchoth ( 1 Chronicles 2:52 ), manachti ( 1 Chronicles 2:54 ); Septuagint: Codex Vaticanus Monaio; Codex Alexandrinus Ammanith ( 1 Chronicles 2:52 ); Codex Vaticanus Malathei; Codex Alexandrinus Manath, ( 1 Chronicles 2:54 ); the King James Version, Manahethites): These men were the inhabitants of Manahath. They were descendants of Caleb, one-half being the progeny of Shobal, and the other of Salma. In  1 Chronicles 2:52  the Revised Version (British and American) transliterates "Menuhoth," but Manahathites is preferable.
JOSES|     jo'-sez, jo'-zez (Ioses): (1) One of the brethren of Jesus ( Mark 6:3 ; in  Matthew 13:55  the Greek is "Joseph," and the Revised Version (British and American) so renders).  (2) A son of Mary, perhaps identical with (1) ( Matthew 27:56   Mark 15:40, 47 ).  See  BRETHREN OF THE LORD .  (3) A name of Barnabas ( Acts 4:36  the King James Version, where again Greek and the Revised Version (British and American) have "Joseph").  See  BARNABAS .
LIONS|The most powerful of all carnivorous animals. Although not now found in Palestine, they must have been in ancient times very numerous there. They had their lairs in the forests ( Jeremiah 5:6 ;  12:8 ;  Amos 3:4 ), in the caves of the mountains (Cant. 4:8;  Nahum 2:12 ), and in the canebrakes on the banks of the Jordan ( Jeremiah 49:19 ;  50:44 ;  Zechariah 11:3 ). No fewer than at least six different words are used in the Old Testament for the lion.  (1.) Gor (i.e.,  a "suckling"), the lion's whelp ( Genesis 49:9 ;  Jeremiah 51:38 ,  etc.).  (2.) Kephir (i.e.,  "shaggy"), the young lion ( Judges 14:5 ;  Job 4:10 ;  Psalm 91:13 ;  104:21 ), a term which is also used figuratively of cruel enemies ( Psalm 34:10 ;  35:17 ;  58:6 ;  Jeremiah 2:15 ).  (3.) 'Ari (i.e.,  the "puller" in pieces), denoting the lion in general, without reference to age or sex ( Numbers 23:24 ;  2 Samuel 17:10 ,  etc.).  (4.) Shahal (the "roarer"), the mature lion ( Job 4:10 ;  Psalm 91:13 ;  Proverbs 26:13 ;  Hosea 5:14 ).  (5.) Laish, so called from its strength and bravery ( Job 4:11 ;  Proverbs 30:30 ;  Isaiah 30:6 ). The capital of Northern Dan received its name from this word.  (6.) Labi, from a root meaning "to roar," a grown lion or lioness ( Genesis 49:9 ;  Numbers 23:24 ;  24:9 ;  Ezek. 19:2 ;  Nahum 2:11 ). The lion of Palestine was properly of the Asiatic variety, distinguished from the African variety, which is larger. Yet it not only attacked flocks in the presence of the shepherd, but also laid waste towns and villages ( 2 Kings 17:25 ,  26) and devoured men ( 1 Kings 13:24 ,  25). Shepherds sometimes, single-handed, encountered lions and slew them ( 1 Samuel 17:34 ,  35;  Amos 3:12 ). Samson seized a young lion with his hands and "rent him as he would have rent a kid" ( Judges 14:5 ,  6). The strength ( Judges 14:18 ), courage ( 2 Samuel 17:10 ), and ferocity ( Genesis 49:9 ) of the lion were proverbial.
MARALAH|Trembling, a place on the southern boundary of Zebulun ( Joshua 19:11 ). It has been identified with the modern M'alul, about 4 miles south-west of Nazareth. 
SINS|   REMISSION OF   re-mish'-un (aphesis, paresis): The two Greek words, of which the latter occurs only in  Romans 3:25 , were translated by the same English word in the King James Version. In the Revised Version (British and American), paresis is translation "passing over." It is contrasted with the other term as pretermission with remission. Remission is exemption from the consequences of an offense, forgiveness; pretermission is the suspension of the penalty (Philippi, Ellicott, Trench (Synonyms, XXXIII), Weiss; compare  Acts 17:30 ). Cremer (Lexicon of N T Gr) regards the meaning of the two words as identical, except that the one refers to the Old Testament and the other to the New Testament. Sins are remitted when the offender is treated as though the offense had never been committed. Remission is restricted to the penalty, while forgiveness refers more particularly to the person, although it may be used also of the sin itself. Remission also is used of offenses against God's law; forgiveness, against either divine or human law.  See  ABSOLUTION ;  FORGIVENESS .  H. E. Jacobs  RETENTION OF SINS  re-ten'-shun, (krateo, "to lay fast hold of" ( John 20:23 )): The opposite of "the remission of sins." Where there was no evidence of repentance and faith, the community of believers were unauthorized to give assurance of forgiveness, and, therefore, could only warn that the guilt of sin was retained, and that the sinner remained beneath God's judgment.  While such retention has its place in connection with all preaching of the gospel, since the offers of grace are conditional, it is especially exercised, like the absolution, in the personal dealing of a pastor with a communicant, preparatory to the reception of the Lord's Supper. As the absolution is properly an assurance of individual forgiveness, so the retention is an assurance of individual non-forgiveness. That the retention is exercised by the ministry, not as an order, but as the representatives of the congregation of believers to which Christ gave the power of the keys, is shown by Alford, Greek Testament, on above passage. See also Melanchthon, Appendix to the "Schmalkald Articles."  H. E. Jacobs
BABYLON|Babylon, kingdom of Called "the land of the Chaldeans" ( Jeremiah 24:5 ; Ezek,   12:13 ), was an extensive province in Central Asia along the valley of the Tigris from the Persian Gulf northward for some 300 miles. It was famed for its fertility and its riches. Its capital was the city of Babylon, a great commercial centre ( Ezek. 17:4 ;  Isaiah 43:14 ). Babylonia was divided into the two districts of Accad in the north, and Summer (probably the Shinar of the Old Testament) in the south. Among its chief cities may be mentioned Ur (now Mugheir or Mugayyar), on the western bank of the Euphrates; Uruk, or Erech ( Genesis 10:10 ) (now Warka), between Ur and Babylon; Larsa (now Senkereh), the Ellasar of  Genesis 14:1 , a little to the east of Erech; Nipur (now Niffer), south-east of Babylon; Sepharvaim ( 2 Kings 17:24 ), "the two Sipparas" (now Abu-Habba), considerably to the north of Babylon; and Eridu, "the good city" (now Abu-Shahrein), which lay originally on the shore of the Persian Gulf, but is now, owing to the silting up of the sand, about 100 miles distant from it. Another city was Kulunu, or Calneh ( Genesis 10:10 ). The salt-marshes at the mouths of the Euphrates and Tigris were called Marratu, "the bitter" or "salt", the Merathaim of  Jeremiah 50:21 . They were the original home of the Kalda, or Chaldeans. The most famous of the early kings of Babylonia were Sargon of Accad (B.C.3800) and his son, Naram-Sin, who conquered a large part of Western Asia, establishing their power in Palestine, and even carrying their arms to the Sinaitic peninsula. A great Babylonian library was founded in the reign of Sargon. Babylonia was subsequently again broken up into more than one state, and at one time fell under the domination of Elam. This was put an end to by Khammu-rabi (Amraphel), who drove the Elamites out of the country, and overcame Arioch, the son of an Elamite prince. From this time forward Babylonia was a united monarchy. About B.C. 1750 it was conquered by the Kassi, or Kosseans, from the mountains of Elam, and a Kassite dynasty ruled over it for 576 years and 9 months. In the time of Khammu-rabi, Syria and Palestine were subject to Babylonia and its Elamite suzerain; and after the overthrow of the Elamite supremacy, the Babylonian kings continued to exercise their influence and power in what was called "the land of the Amorites." In the epoch of the Kassite dynasty, however, Canaan passed into the hands of Egypt. In B.C. 729, Babylonia was conquered by the Assyrian king Tiglath-pileser III.; but on the death of Shalmaneser IV. it was seized by the Kalda or "Chaldean" prince Merodach-baladan ( 2 Kings 20:12 -19), who held it till B.C. 709, when he was driven out by Sargon. Under Sennacherib, Babylonia revolted from Assyria several times, with the help of the Elamites, and after one of these revolts Babylon was destroyed by Sennacherib, B.C. 689. It was rebuilt by Esarhaddon, who made it his residence during part of the year, and it was to Babylon that Manasseh was brought a prisoner ( 2 Chronicles 33:11 ). After the death of Esarhaddon, Saul-sumyukin, the viceroy of Babylonia, revolted against his brother the Assyrian king, and the revolt was suppressed with difficulty. When Nineveh was destroyed, B.C. 606, Nabopolassar, the viceroy of Babylonia, who seems to have been of Chaldean descent, made himself independent. His son Nebuchadrezzar (Nabu-kudur-uzur), after defeating the Egyptians at Carchemish, succeeded him as king, B.C. 604, and founded the Babylonian empire. He strongly fortified Babylon, and adorned it with palaces and other buildings. His son, Evil-merodach, who succeeded him in B.C. 561, was murdered after a reign of two years. The last monarch of the Babylonian empire was Nabonidus (Nabu-nahid), B.C. 555-538, whose eldest son, Belshazzar (Bilu-sar-uzur), is mentioned in several inscriptions. Babylon was captured by Cyrus, B.C. 538, and though it revolted more than once in later years, it never succeeded in maintaining its independence.  The Greek form of BABEL; Semitic form Babilu, meaning "The Gate of God." In the Assyrian tablets it means "The city of the dispersion of the tribes." The monumental list of its kings reaches back to B.C. 2300, and includes Khammurabi, or Amraphel (q.v.), the contemporary of Abraham. It stood on the Euphrates, about 200 miles above its junction with the Tigris, which flowed through its midst and divided it into two almost equal parts. The Elamites invaded Chaldea (i.e.,  Lower Mesopotamia,  or Shinar,  and Upper Mesopotamia,  or Accad,  now combined into one) and held it in subjection. At length Khammu-rabi delivered it from the foreign yoke, and founded the new empire of Chaldea (q.v.), making Babylon the capital of the united kingdom. This city gradually grew in extent and grandeur, but in process of time it became subject to Assyria. On the fall of Nineveh (B.C. 606) it threw off the Assyrian yoke, and became the capital of the growing Babylonian empire. Under Nebuchadnezzar it became one of the most splendid cities of the ancient world. After passing through various vicissitudes the city was occupied by Cyrus, "king of Elam," B.C. 538, who issued a decree permitting the Jews to return to their own land ( Ezra 1 ). It then ceased to be the capital of an empire. It was again and again visited by hostile armies, till its inhabitants were all driven from their homes, and the city became a complete desolation, its very site being forgotten from among men. On the west bank of the Euphrates, about 50 miles south of Bagdad, there is found a series of artificial mounds of vast extent. These are the ruins of this once famous proud city. These ruins are principally (1) the great mound called Babil by the Arabs. This was probably the noted Temple of Belus, which was a pyramid about 480 feet high. (2) The Kasr (i.e.,  "the palace"). This was the great palace of Nebuchadnezzar. It is almost a square, each side of which is about 700 feet long. The little town of Hillah, near the site of Babylon, is built almost wholly of bricks taken from this single mound. (3) A lofty mound, on the summit of which stands a modern tomb called Amran ibn-Ali. This is probably the most ancient portion of the remains of the city, and represents the ruins of the famous hanging-gardens, or perhaps of some royal palace. The utter desolation of the city once called "The glory of kingdoms" ( Isaiah 13:19 ) was foretold by the prophets ( Isaiah 13:4 -22;  Jeremiah 25:12 ;  50:2 ,  3;  Dan. 2:31 -38). The Babylon mentioned in  1 Peter 5:13  was not Rome, as some have thought, but the literal city of Babylon, which was inhabited by many Jews at the time Peter wrote. In  Revelation 14:8 ;  16:19 ;  17:5 ; and 18:2, "Babylon" is supposed to mean Rome, not considered as pagan, but as the prolongation of the ancient power in the papal form. Rome, pagan and papal, is regarded as one power. "The literal Babylon was the beginner and supporter of tyranny and idolatry...This city and its whole empire were taken by the Persians under Cyrus; the Persians were subdued by the Macedonians, and the Macedonians by the Romans; so that Rome succeeded to the power of old Babylon. And it was her method to adopt the worship of the false deities she had conquered; so that by her own act she became the heiress and successor of all the Babylonian idolatry, and of all that was introduced into it by the immediate successors of Babylon, and consequently of all the idolatry of the earth." Rome, or "mystical Babylon," is "that great city which reigneth over the kings of the earth" ( 17:18 ). 
JAKAN|     ja'-kan (ya`aqan).  See  JAAKAN .
HELEK|A portion, ( Joshua 17:2 ), descended from Manasseh. 
OBAL|Stripped, the eight son of Joktan ( Genesis 10:28 ); called also Ebal ( 1 Chronicles 1:22 ). 
GRECIANS|Hellenists, Greek-Jews; Jews born in a foreign country, and thus did not speak Hebrew ( Acts 6:1 ;  9:29 ), nor join in the Hebrew services of the Jews in Palestine, but had synagogues of their own in Jerusalem.  Joel 3:6  =Greeks. 
MAASAI|     ma'-a-si, ma-as'-i (ma`say; the King James Version, Maasiai): A priest, son of Abdid ( 1 Chronicles 9:12 ).
SECHU|A hill or watch-tower, a place between Gibeah and Ramah noted for its "great well" ( 1 Samuel 19:22 ); probably the modern Suweikeh, south of Beeroth. 
CUTHA|     ku'-tha (Koutha; 1 Esdras 5:32, the King James Version Coutha): Head of a family of temple servants who returned with Zerubbabel from Babylon; not mentioned in the canonical lists.
JAHDO|     ja'-do (yachdo, meaning uncertain; Kittel suggests yachday = Jahdai): In  1 Chronicles 5:14 , a Gileadite.
SHAASHGAZ|Servant of the beautiful, a chief eunuch in the second house of the harem of king Ahasuerus ( Esther 2:14 ). 
PERAZIM|Perazim, Mount Mount of breaches, only in Isaiah 28:21. It is the same as BAAL- (q.v.), where David gained a victory over the Philistines ( 2 Samuel 5:20 ). 
PASDAMMIM|The border of blood = Ephes-dammim (q.v.), between Shochoh and Azekah ( 1 Samuel 17:1 ;  1 Chronicles 11:13 ). 
OZEM|Strong.  (1.) One of David's brothers; the sixth son of Jesse ( 1 Chronicles 2:15 ). (2.) A son of Jerahmeel ( 1 Chronicles 2:25 ). 
ZELOPHEHAD|First-born, of the tribe of Manasseh, and of the family of Gilead; died in the wilderness. Having left no sons, his daughters, concerned lest their father's name should be "done away from among his family," made an appeal to Moses, who, by divine direction, appointed it as "a statute of judgment" in Israel that daughters should inherit their father's portion when no sons were left ( Numbers 27:1 -11). But that the possession of Zelophehad might not pass away in the year of jubilee from the tribe to which he belonged, it was ordained by Moses that his daughters should not marry any one out of their father's tribe; and this afterwards became a general law ( Numbers 36 ). 
MONEYCHANGERS|   MONEY-CHANGERS  chan'-jers (kollubistes, from kollubos, "a small coin," so "a money-changer," or "banker" ( Matthew 21:12   Mark 11:15 ; "changers" in  John 2:15 ; compare  John 2:14 , where kermatistes, "a dealer in small bits," or "change," is also rendered "changers"); compare trapezites, "one who sits at a table," "a money-changer," "a banker" or "broker"; one who both exchanges money for a small fee and pays interest on deposits ( Matthew 25:27 , the King James Version "exchangers," the American Standard Revised Version "bankers")): The profession of money-changer in Palestine was made necessary by the law requiring every male Israelite who had reached the age of 20 years to pay into the treasury of the sanctuary a half-shekel at every numbering of the people, an offering to Yahweh, not even the poor being exempt. It seems to have become an annual tax, and was to be paid in the regular Jewish half-shekel ( Exodus 30:11-15 ). Since the Jews, coming up to the feasts, would need to exchange the various coins in common circulation for this Jewish piece, there were money-changers who exacted a premium for the exchange. This fee was a kollubos (about 31 cents in U.S. money, i.e. in 1915), hence, the name kollubistes. The Jews of Christ's day came from many parts of the world, and the business of exchanging foreign coins for various purposes became a lucrative one, the exchangers exacting whatever fee they might. Because of their greed and impiety, Jesus drove them from the courts of the temple.  Edward Bagby Pollard
GAAL|Loathing, the son of Ebed, in whom the Shechemites "placed their confidence" when they became discontented with Abimelech. He headed the revolution, and led out the men of Shechem against Abimelech; but was defeated, and fled to his own home ( Judges 9:26 -46). We hear no more of him after this battle. 
ICONIUM|The capital of ancient Lycaonia. It was first visited by Paul and Barnabas from Antioch-in-Pisidia during the apostle's first missionary journey ( Acts 13:50 ,  51). Here they were persecuted by the Jews, and being driven from the city, they fled to Lystra. They afterwards returned to Iconium, and encouraged the church which had been founded there ( 14:21 , 22). It was probably again visited by Paul during his third missionary journey along with Silas ( 18:23 ). It is the modern Konieh, at the foot of Mount Taurus, about 120 miles inland from the Mediterranean. 
TARES|The bearded darnel, mentioned only in  Matthew 13:25 -30. It is the Lolium temulentum, a species of rye-grass, the seeds of which are a strong soporific poison. It bears the closest resemblance to wheat till the ear appears, and only then the difference is discovered. It grows plentifully in Syria and Palestine. 
HAVENS|Fair Havens  A harbour in the south of Crete, some 5 miles to the east of which was the town of Lasea ( Acts 27:8 ). Here the ship of Alexandria in which Paul and his companions sailed was detained a considerable time waiting for a favourable wind. Contrary to Paul's advice, the master of the ship determined to prosecute the voyage, as the harbour was deemed incommodious for wintering in (9-12). The result was that, after a stormy voyage, the vessel was finally wrecked on the coast of Malta ( 27:40 -44). 
NICOLAITANS|     nik-o-la'-i-tanz Nikolaitai):  1. The Sect:  A sect or party of evil influence in early Christianity, especially in the 7 churches of Asia. Their doctrine was similar to that of Balaam, "who taught Balak to cast a stumblingblock before the children of Israel, to eat things sacrificed to idols, and to commit fornication" ( Revelation 2:14, 15 ). Their practices were strongly condemned by John, who praised the church in Ephesus for "hating their works" ( Revelation 2:6 ), and blamed the church in Pergamum for accepting in some measure their teaching ( Revelation 2:15 ). Except that reference is probably made to their influence in the church at Thyatira also, where their leader was "the woman Jezebel, who calleth herself a prophetess" ( Revelation 2:20 ; compare  Revelation 2:14 ), no further direct information regarding them is given in Scripture.  2. References:  Reference to them is frequent in post-apostolic literature. According to Irenaeus (Adv. Haer., i.26, 3; iii.10, 7), followed by Hippolytus (Philos., vii.36), they were founded by Nicolaus, the proselyte of Antioch, who was one of the seven chosen to serve at the tables ( Acts 6:5 ). Irenaeus, as also Clement of Alexandria (Strom., ii.20), Tertullian and others, unite in condemning their practices in terms similar to those of John; and reference is also made to their Gnostic tendencies. In explanation of the apparent incongruity of such an immoral sect being founded by one of "good report, full of the Spirit and of wisdom" (compare  Acts 6:3 ), Simcox argues that their lapse may have been due to reaction from original principles of a too rigid asceticism. A theory, started in comparatively modern times, and based in part on the similarity of meaning of the Greek "Nikolaus," and the Hebrew "Balaam," puts forward the view that the two sects referred to under these names were in reality identical. Yet if this were so, it would not have been necessary for John to designate them separately.  3. Nicolaitan Controversy:  The problem underlying the Nicolaitan controversy, though so little direct mention is made of it in Scripture, was in reality most important, and concerned the whole relation of Christianity to paganism and its usages. The Nicolaitans disobeyed the command issued to the Gentilechurches, by the apostolic council held at Jerusalem in 49-50 A.D., that they should refrain from the eating of "things sacrificed to idols" ( Acts 15:29 ). Such a restriction, though seemingly hard, in that it prevented the Christian communities from joining in public festivals, and so brought upon them suspicion and dislike, was yet necessary to prevent a return to a pagan laxity of morals. To this danger the Nicolaitans were themselves a glaring witness, and therefore John was justified in condemning them. In writing to the Corinthians, Paul gives warning against the same evil practices, basing his arguments on consideration for the weaker brethren (compare 1 Corinthians 8).  LITERATURE.  Simcox, "Revelation" in the Cambridge Bible; H. Cowan in Hastings, Dictionary of the Bible (five volumes), article "Nicolaitans"; H.B. Swete, The Apocalypse of John, lxxff;, 27, 28, 37.  C. M. Kerr
DEHAITES|     de-ha'-tez (dehawe'; the King James Version Dehavites): A people enumerated in  Ezra 4:9  with Elamites, ere, as among those settled by the Assyrian king Osnappar (Assurbanipal) in Samaria. The identification is uncertain.
TEARS|     terz (dim`ah; dakrua): In the instances recorded in Scripture weeping is more frequently associated with mental distress than with physical pain. Eastern peoples show none of the restraint of emotion in lamentation which is characteristic of modern Occidentals, and there are many records of this manifestation of woe, even among men accustomed to hardships and warfare, such as David and his soldiers. The flow of tears is the evidence of sorrow in prospect of approaching death in  Psalm 39:12   2 Kings 20:5 ;  Isaiah 38:5 , and of the suffering consequent on oppression ( Ecclesiastes 4:1 ), or defeat in battle ( Isaiah 16:9 ), or hopeless remorse, as with Esau ( Hebrews 12:17 , probably referring to  Genesis 27:34 ). The Psalmist describes his condition of distress metaphorically as feeding on the bread of tears and having tears to drink ( Psalm 80:5 ;  Psalm 42:3 ). Tears in the figurative sense of anxiety for the future are referred to in  Psalm 126:5   Mark 9:24  the King James Version, and the tears accompanying penitence in  Luke 7:38  (44 the Revised Version margin). Jeremiah is sometimes called the "weeping prophet" on account of his expressive hyperbole in  Jeremiah 9:1, 18  (see also 14:7; 31:16:00;  Lamentations 1:2 ;  Lamentations 2:11, 18  and ten other passages). Conversely the deliverance from grief or anxiety is described as the wiping away of tears ( Psalm 116:8   Isaiah 25:8   Revelation 7:17 ;  Revelation 21:4 ).  The expression in  Psalm 56:8  in which the Psalmist desires that God should remember his wanderings and his tears has given rise to a curious mistake. There is a paronomasia in the passage as he pleads that God should record his wanderings (Hebrew, nodh) and that his tears should be put into God's no'-dh (receptacle or bottle). No'dh literally means a leathern or skin bottle, as is evident from  Psalm 119:83  and  Joshua 9:4-13 . The request is obviously figurative, as there is no evidence that there was even a symbolical collection of tears into a bottle in any Semitic funeral ritual, and there is no foundation whatever for the modern identification of the long, narrow perfume jars so frequently found in late Jewish and Greek-Jewish graves, as "lachrymatories" or tear bottles.  See  BOTTLE .  Alexander Macalister
SHIMRI|Watchman.  (1.) A Simeonite ( 1 Chronicles 4:37 ). (2.) The father of one of the "valiant men" of David's armies ( 1 Chronicles 11:45 ). (3.) Assisted at the purification of the temple in the time of Hezekiah ( 2 Chronicles 29:13 ). 
SHIMEATH|     shim'-e-ath (shim`ath, or shim`ath; the Septuagint in 2 Kings, Iemouath, Codex Vaticanus in 2 Chronicles, Sama, Codex Alexandrinus Samath, Lucian, Samaath): Father of Jozacar ( 2 Kings 12:21  (22)), one of the murderers of Joash, king of Judah. According to  2 Chronicles 24:26  Shimeath is an Ammonitess and the mother, not the father, of Jozacar. Many textual emendations have been suggested (compare HDB, article "Shimeath"), but they are unnecessary, as the Chronicler's revised version of the incident in Kings was a deliberate one. The Chronicler was a sturdy opponent of intermarriage, and in the story of the assassination of King Joash he saw an opportunity to strike a blow against the hated practice. In the older account in Kings the names of the conspirators are given as "Jozakar the son of shim`ath, and Jehozabad the son of shemer." The two names are both masculine; but the final taw (t) of the former looked to the Chronicler like the feminine ending and offered him his opportunity. In his account, the one of the two murderers (dastardly villains, even though the king had merited death) was "the son of (shim`ath), the Ammonitess" and the other was "the son of (shimrith), the Moabitess" (compare Torrey, Ezra Studies, 212;).  Horace J. Wolf.
NEPHUSIM|   NEPHISH; NEPHISIM; NEPHISHESIM;   ne'-fish, ne-fi'-sim, ne-fish'-e-sim, ne-fusim (nephicim, nephucim): The former is the Kethibh (Hebrew: "written") form of the name adopted in the Revised Version (British and American); the latter the Qere (Hebrew "read") form, adopted in the King James Version and the Revised Version margin ( Ezra 2:50 ).  See  NAPHISH ;  NEPHUSHESIM .
FIRSTFRUITS|The first-fruits of the ground were offered unto God just as the first-born of man and animals. The law required,  (1.) That on the morrow after the Passover Sabbath a sheaf of new corn should be waved by the priest before the altar ( Leviticus 23:5 ,  6,  10,  12;  2:12 ). (2.) That at the feast of Pentecost two loaves of leavened bread, made from the new flour, were to be waved in like manner ( Leviticus 23:15 ,  17;  Numbers 28:26 ). (3.) The feast of Tabernacles was an acknowledgement that the fruits of the harvest were from the Lord ( Exodus 23:16 ;  34:22 ). (4.) Every individual, besides, was required to consecrate to God a portion of the first-fruits of the land ( Exodus 22:29 ;  23:19 ;  34:26 ;  Numbers 15:20 ,  21). (5.) The law enjoined that no fruit was to be gathered from newly-planted fruit-trees for the first three years, and that the first-fruits of the fourth year were to be consecrated to the Lord ( Leviticus 19:23 -25). Jeremiah ( 2:3 ) alludes to the ordinance of "first-fruits," and hence he must have been acquainted with the books of Exodus, Leviticus, and Numbers, where the laws regarding it are recorded. 
PERIDA|Kernel,  Nehemiah 7:57 . (see  PERUDA .) 
GERUTH|    CHIMHAM  ge'-rooth kim'-ham (geruth kimham): If the reading geruth is correct, a "lodging-place" or "khan" on the highway to Egypt, may be meant ( Jeremiah 41:17 ). It may have been built by Chimham son of Barzillai; or it may have been named from him as owner of the land on which it stood. But probably with Josephus we should read gidhroth, "hurdles" or "sheep pens" (Ant., X, ix, 5).
URIAH|The Lord is my light.  (1.) A Hittite, the husband of Bathsheba, whom David first seduced, and then after Uriah's death married. He was one of the band of David's "mighty men." The sad story of the curel wrongs inflicted upon him by David and of his mournful death are simply told in the sacred record ( 2 Samuel 11:2 - 12:26 ). (see  BATHSHEBA ; DAVID.) (2.) A priest of the house of Ahaz ( Isaiah 8:2 ). (3.) The father of Meremoth, mentioned in  Ezra 8:33 . 
BEROTHAI|   BEROTHAH  be-ro'-tha ( Ezekiel 47:16 : berothah; Septuagint Codex Vaticanus, Abthera; or BEROTHAH 2Sa 8:8; berothai, where for mibberothai Septuagint reads ek ton eklekton poleon, "from the select cities"): Probably two forms of the same name.  Ezekiel 47:16  places it on the ideal northern frontier of Israel, between Damascus and Hamath. According to  2 Samuel 8:8  it was a city of Hadadezer, king of Zobah. In the parallel passage ( 1 Chronicles 18:8 ) Cun is given in place of Berothai. Its site is unknown. Ewald connected it with Beirut (so also apparently H. P. Smith, ICC, "Samuel," 307), but Ezekiel's description excludes this view. Others have sought it in the Wady Brissa, in the East slope of Lebanon, North of Baalbec. A more plausible conjecture identifies it with Bereitan (Brithen), a village somewhat South of Baalbec (Baedeker, Pal3, 369). Possibly, however, the ideal northern frontier line should be drawn farther south. See  HETHLON ;  ZEDAD ; ZOBAH.  C. H. Thomson
HELPS|( 1 Corinthians 12:28 ) may refer to help (i.e.,  by interpretation) given to him who speaks with tongues, or more probably simply help which Christians can render to one another, such as caring for the poor and needy, etc. 
KARTAH|City, a town in the tribe of Zebulun assigned to the Levites of the family of Merari ( Joshua 21:34 ). It is identical with Kattath ( 19:15 ), and perhaps also with Kitron ( Judges 1:30 ). 
NERGAL|The great dog; that is, lion, one of the chief gods of the Assyrians and Babylonians ( 2 Kings 17:30 ), the god of war and hunting. He is connected with Cutha as its tutelary deity. 
SHENAZAR|     she-na'-zar: the King James Version = the Revised Version (British and American) SHENAZZAR (which see).
JETHRO|His excellence, or gain, a prince or priest of Midian, who succeeded his father Reuel. Moses spent forty years after his exile from the Egyptian court as keeper of Jethro's flocks. While the Israelites were encamped at Sinai, and soon after their victory over Amalek, Jethro came to meet Moses, bringing with him Zipporah and her two sons. They met at the "mount of God," and "Moses told him all that the Lord had done unto Pharaoh" ( Exodus 18:8 ). On the following day Jethro, observing the multiplicity of the duties devolving on Moses, advised him to appoint subordinate judges, rulers of thousands, of hundreds, of fifties, and of tens, to decide smaller matters, leaving only the weightier matters to be referred to Moses, to be laid before the Lord. This advice Moses adopted ( Exodus 18 ). He was also called Hobab (q.v.), which was probably his personal name, while Jethro was an official name. (see  MOSES .)
WILLOWS| (1.) Hebrews `arabim ( Leviticus 23:40 ;  Job 40:22 ;  Isaiah 15:7 ;  44:3 ,  4;  Psalm 137:1 ,  2). This was supposed to be the weeping willow, called by Linnaeus Salix Babylonica, from the reference in  Psalm 137 . This tree is frequently found "on the coast, overhanging wells and pools. There is a conspicuous tree of this species over a pond in the plain of Acre, and others on the Phoenician plain." There are several species of the salix in Palestine, but it is not indigenous to Babylonia, nor was it cultivated there. Some are of opinion that the tree intended is the tamarisk or poplar. (2.) Hebrews tzaphtzaphah ( Ezek. 17:5 ), called by the Arabs the safsaf, the general name for the willow. This may be the Salix AEgyptica of naturalists. Tristram thinks that by the "willow by the water-courses," the Nerium oleander, the rose-bay oleander, is meant. He says, "It fringes the Upper Jordan, dipping its wavy crown of red into the spray in the rapids under Hermon, and is nutured by the oozy marshes in the Lower Jordan nearly as far as to Jericho...On the Arnon, on the Jabbok, and the Yarmuk it forms a continuous fringe. In many of the streams of Moab it forms a complete screen, which the sun's rays can never penetrate to evaporate the precious moisture. The wild boar lies safely ensconced under its impervious cover." 
ZARHITES|     zar'-hits.  See  ZERAH, (1), (4) .
TAHATH|    (1)  ta'-hath (tachath, "below"): A wilderness station of the Israelites ( Numbers 33:26, 27 ), between Makheloth and Terah.  See  WANDERINGS OF ISRAEL .  TAHATH (2)  (1) A Kohathite Levite ( 1 Chronicles 6:24 ).  (2) The name is mentioned twice among the sons of Ephraim ( 1 Chronicles 7:20 ); two families may be meant, or perhaps the name has been accidentally repeated.
SHIGGAION|From the verb shagah, "to reel about through drink," occurs in the title of  Psalm 7 . The plural form, shigionoth, is found in  Habakkuk 3:1 . The word denotes a lyrical poem composed under strong mental emotion; a song of impassioned imagination accompanied with suitable music; a dithyrambic ode. 
PEKAH|Open-eyed, the son of Remaliah a captain in the army of Pekahiah, king of Israel, whom he slew, with the aid of a band of Gileadites, and succeeded (B.C. 758) on the throne ( 2 Kings 15:25 ). Seventeen years after this he entered into an alliance with Rezin, king of Syria, and took part with him in besieging Jerusalem ( 2 Kings 15:37 ;  16:5 ). But Tiglath-pilser, who was in alliance with Ahaz, king of Judah, came up against Pekah, and carried away captive many of the inhabitants of his kingdom ( 2 Kings 15:29 ). This was the beginning of the "Captivity." Soon after this Pekah was put to death by Hoshea, the son of Elah, who usurped the throne ( 2 Kings 15:30 ;  16:1 -9. Comp.  Isaiah 7:16 ;  8:4 ;  9:12 ). He is supposed by some to have been the "shephard" mentioned in  Zechariah 11:16 . 
MERCURIUS|The Hermes (i.e.,  "the speaker") of the Greeks ( Acts 14:12 ), a heathen God represented as the constant attendant of Jupiter, and the god of eloquence. The inhabitants of Lystra took Paul for this god because he was the "chief speaker." 
SOSIPATER|(see  SOPATER .) 
PHYGELUS|   ; PHYGELLUS  fi-je'-lus, fi-jel'-us (Phugellos; Tischendorf and Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek, with others, read Phugelos, Phygellus or Phygelus ( 2 Timothy 1:15 ); the King James Version): One of the Christians who deserted Paul at the time of his 2nd imprisonment at Rome. Paul mentions him, along with Hermogenes, as being among those "that are in Asia," who turned away from him then. What is meant may be that Phygelus and Hermogenes, along with other native Christians from proconsular Asia, were in Rome when he was brought before the emperor's tribunal the second time, and that they had not merely taken no measures to stand by and support him, but that they had deserted him.  The meaning, however, may be that the turning away of Phygelus and Hermogenes from Paul took place, not in Rome, but in Asia itself.  The times during and immediately following the Neronic persecution were more dreadful than can easily be conceived, and the temptation was strong to forsake the Christian name, and to do so in a wholesale fashion. A great community like the Christian church in Ephesus or in Rome felt the terrible pressure of those times, when for a mere word-a word, however, denying the Lord who bought them-men were at once set free from persecution, from the loss of property or of home, and from death. 1 Peter records how the aftermath of the Neronic persecution had extended far indeed from Rome, where it had originated. Peter asks the Christians not to give way under "the fiery trial" which is trying them ( 1 Peter 4:12 ), and those whom he thus addresses were the members of the church throughout Pontus, Galatia, Cappadocia, Asia and Bithynia ( 1 Peter 1:1 ). The epistles to the seven churches in Asia in the Apocalypse also show how sorely persecution had raged throughout that province.  See  PERSECUTION .  But in addition to the temptation to deny Christ's name and to go back to heathenism or to Judaism, there was also another which pressed upon some of the churches, the temptation to repudiate the authority of Paul. Many passages in the New Testament show how the name of Paul was sometimes very lightly esteemed, and how his authority was repudiated, e.g. by persons in Corinth, and in the churches of Galatia.  What is said here is, that among the Christians of proconsular Asia, i.e. of Ephesus and the churches in the valley of the Cayster, there was a widespread defection from that loyalty to Paul which was to be expected from those who owed to him all that they possessed of the knowledge of Christ's salvation. "All that are in Asia turned away from me; of whom are Phygelus and Hermogenes." On the whole, all the necessary conditions of these words are satisfied by a reference to Rome and to Paul's environment there, and perhaps this is the more probable meaning.  See  HERMOGENES .  John Rutherfurd
BETHANATH|House of response, one of the fenced cities of Naphtali ( Joshua 19:38 ). It is perhaps identical with the modern village `Ainata, 6 miles west of Kedesh. 
ISSACHAR|Hired ( Genesis 30:18 ). "God hath given me," said Leah, "my hire (Hebrews sekhari)...and she called his name Issachar." He was Jacob's ninth son, and was born in Padan-aram (Comp.  28:2 ). He had four sons at the going down into Egypt ( 46:13 ;  Numbers 26:23 ,  25). Issachar, Tribe of, during the journey through the wilderness, along with Judah and Zebulun ( Numbers 2:5 ), marched on the east of the tabernacle. This tribe contained 54,400 fighting men when the census was taken at Sinai. After the entrance into the Promised Land, this tribe was one of the six which stood on Gerizim during the ceremony of the blessing and cursing ( Deuteronomy 27:12 ). The allotment of Issachar is described in  Joshua 19:17 -23. It included the plain of Esdraelon (=Jezreel), which was and still is the richest portion of Palestine ( Deuteronomy 33:18 ,  19;  1 Chronicles 12:40 ). The prophetic blessing pronounced by Jacob on Issachar corresponds with that of Moses ( Genesis 49:14 ,  15; Comp.  Deuteronomy 33:18 ,  19). 
TROAS|A city on the coast of Mysia, in the north-west of Asia Minor, named after ancient Troy, which was at some little distance from it (about 4 miles) to the north. Here Paul, on his second missionary journey, saw the vision of a "man of Macedonia," who appeared to him, saying, "Come over, and help us" ( Acts 16:8 -11). He visited this place also on other occasions, and on one of these visits he left his cloak and some books there ( 2 Corinthians 2:12 ;  2 Timothy 4:13 ). The ruins of Troas extend over many miles, the site being now mostly covered with a forest of oak trees. The modern name of the ruins is Eski Stamboul i.e., Old Constantinople. 
BEKA|     be'-ka (beqa`, "half"): Half a shekel, the amount contributed by each male of the Israelites for the use of the Sanctuary ( Exodus 38:26 ). Its value varied according to the standard used, but on the ordinary, or Phoenician, standard it would represent about 122 grams.  See  WEIGHTS AND MEASURES .
CHELAL|     ke'-lal (kelal, "perfection"): One of the bene Pachath-Mo'abh who took "strange wives" ( Ezra 10:30 ).
CAPHTORIM|   CAPHTOR;   kaf'-tor, kaf'-tor-im (kaphtor, kaphtorim; Kappadokia, Gaphtorieim, Kaphtoriem).  1. First Theory: Crete:  The country and people whence came the Philistines ( Genesis 10:14  =  1 Chronicles 1:12  (here the clause "whence went forth the Philistines" should, probably come after Caphtorim);  Deuteronomy 2:23   Jeremiah 47:4   Amos 9:7 ). Jeremiah (loc. cit.) calls it an "island"; there is evidence of ancient connection between Crete and Philistia; and the Philistines are called Cherethites, which may mean Cretans (see CHERETHITES). These considerations have led many to identify Caphtor with the important island of Crete. It should be noted, however, that the word 'i, used by Jeremiah, denotes not only "isle," but also "coastland."  2. Second Theory: Phoenicia:  Ebers (Aegypten und die Bucher Moses, 130) thought that Caphtor represented the Egyptian Kaft-ur, holding that Kaft was the Egyptian name for the colonies of Phoenicians in the Delta, extended to cover the Phoenicians in the north and their colonies. Kaft-ur, therefore, would mean "Greater Phoenicia." But the discovery of Kaptar among the names of countries conquered by Ptolemy Auletes in an inscription on the Temple of Kom Ombo is fatal to this theory.  3. Third Theory: Cilicia:  A third theory would identify Caphtor with the Kafto of the Egyptian inscriptions. As early as the time of Thotmes III the inhabitants of this land, the Kafti, are mentioned in the records. In the trilingual inscription of Canopus the name is rendered in Greek by Phoinike, "Phoenicia." This seems to be an error, as the Kafti portrayed on the monuments have no features in common with the Semites. They certainly represent a western type. It is held that the Egyptian Kafto is a district in Asia Minor, probably Cilicia. The sea-pirates, the purasati, whom Rameses III subdued (circa 1200 B.C.), entered Syria from the north. The "R" in the name is the Egyptian equivalent of the Semitic "L". Therefore Purasati = Pilishti, "Philistines." And so it is proposed to identify Caphtor with Cilicia. A serious objection to this theory is the absence of the final "r" in Kafto. McCurdy's suggestion (HDB) that it represents a Hebrew waw, written as a vowel-letter in an original Kafto, does not carry conviction.  It is impossible to give a certain decision; but the balance of probability seems still inclined to the first theory.  W. Ewing
MARAH|Bitterness, a fountain at the sixth station of the Israelites ( Exodus 15:23 ,  24;  Numbers 33:8 ) whose waters were so bitter that they could not drink them. On this account they murmured against Moses, who, under divine direction, cast into the fountain "a certain tree" which took away its bitterness, so that the people drank of it. This was probably the `Ain Hawarah, where there are still several springs of water that are very "bitter," distant some 47 miles from `Ayun Mousa. 
METHUSELAH|Man of the dart, the son of Enoch, and grandfather of Noah. He was the oldest man of whom we have any record, dying at the age of nine hundred and sixty-nine years, in the year of the Flood ( Genesis 5:21 -27;  1 Chronicles 1:3 ). 
COSAM|     ko'-sam (Kosam): An ancestor of Jesus in Luke's genealogy in the 5th generation before Zerubbabel ( Luke 3:28 ).
ISSHIAH|     is-shi'-a (yishshiyahu, "Yah exists"; the King James Version Ishiah):  (1) Mentioned among David's heroes, a greatgrandson of Tola ( 1 Chronicles 7:3 ).  (2) Mentioned among the men who came to David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:6 ; the King James Version "Jesiah").  (3) A member of the priesthood of the house of Rehabiah ( 1 Chronicles 24:21 ; the King James Version "Jesiah").  (4) Another Levitical priest of the house of Uzziel ( 1 Chronicles 23:20 ;  1 Chronicles 24:25 ).
ITHLAH|     ith'-la (yithlah; the King James Version Jetblah): A town in the territory of Dan, named with Aijalon and Elon (Joshua 19:42).
HAZIEL|     ha'-zi-el (chazi'el, "God sees"): A Levite of the sons of Shimei, of David's time ( 1 Chronicles 23:9 ).
LAMEDH|     la'-meth: The 12th letter of Hebrew alphabet; transliterated in this Encyclopedia as "1". It came also to be used for the number 30. For name, etc., see ALPHABET.
BELA|A thing swallowed.  (1.) A city on the shore of the Dead Sea, not far from Sodom, called also Zoar. It was the only one of the five cities that was spared at Lot's intercession ( Genesis 19:20 , 23). It is first mentioned in  Genesis 14:2 ,8. (2.) The eldest son of Benjamin ( Numbers 26:38 ; "Belah, "  Genesis 46:21 ). (3.) The son of Beor, and a king of Edom ( Genesis 36:32 ,  33;  1 Chronicles 1:43 ). (4.) A son of Azaz ( 1 Chronicles 5:8 ). 
STUDS|     studz (nequddoth, "engraving," "stud"): Ornaments consisting of small silver points which it was proposed ( Songs 1:11 ) to affix to the new golden "plaits" (the Revised Version) or "borders" (the King James Version), and which were to replace the strung beads of the bride's necklace.
PHOENICE|     fe-ni'-se (Phoinix).  See  PHOENIX .
LAZARUS|An abbreviation of Eleazar, whom God helps.  (1.) The brother of Mary and Martha of Bethany. He was raised from the dead after he had lain four days in the tomb ( John 11:1 -44). This miracle so excited the wrath of the Jews that they sought to put both Jesus and Lazarus to death. (2.) A beggar named in the parable recorded  Luke 16:19 -31. 
FISHHOOKS|Were used for catching fish ( Amos 4:2 ; Comp.  Isaiah 37:29 ;  Jeremiah 16:16 ;  Ezek. 29:4 ;  Job 41:1 ,  2;  Matthew 17:27 ). 
CHEPHIRAH|Village, one of the four cities of the Gibeonitish Hivites with whom Joshua made a league ( 9:17 ). It belonged to Benjamin. It has been identified with the modern Kefireh, on the west confines of Benjamin, about 2 miles west of Ajalon and 11 from Jerusalem. 
JEHOZABAD|Jehovah-given.  (1.) The son of Obed-edom ( 1 Chronicles 26:4 ), one of the Levite porters. (2.) The son of Shomer, one of the two conspirators who put king Jehoash to death in Millo in Jerusalem ( 2 Kings 12:21 ). (3.)  2 Chronicles 17:18 . 
EUBULUS|     u-bu'-lus (Euboulos, literally, "of good counsel,"  2 Timothy 4:21 ):  One of the members of the church in Rome at the time of Paul's second imprisonment in that city.  The apostle mentions how, at his first answer to the charges brought against him at the emperor's tribunal, the Roman Christians as a whole proved disloyal to him "no one took my part, but all forsook me" ( 2 Timothy 4:16 ). In these circumstances when the desertion of Paul by the Christians in Rome was so disheartening, it is pleasing to find that there were some among them who were true, and Eubulus was one of these. Paul therefore in writing the last of all his epistles sends to Timothy a greeting from Eubulus.  Nothing more is known in regard to Eubulus. As his name is Greek, he was probably a Gentile by birth. John Rutherfurd
ELIDAD|Whom God has loved, son of Chislon, and chief of the tribe of Benjamin; one of those who were appointed to divide the Promised Land among the tribes ( Numbers 34:21 ). 
LAMPSTAND|   LAMP;   lamp'-stand (nir, ner, lappidh, Phoenician lampadh, whence lampas; luchnos is also used): Ner or nir is properly "light" or "a light-giving thing," hence, "lamp," and is so rendered in the Revised Version (British and American), but often "candle" in the King James Version. Its use in connection with the tabernacle and the temple ( Exodus 25:37   2 Chronicles 4:20 f ), where oil was employed for light ( Exodus 35:14   Leviticus 24:2 ), shows that this is its proper meaning. Lappidh is properly "a torch" and is thus rendered generally in the Revised Version (British and American), but "lamp" in  Isaiah 62:1 , where it is used as a simile. the King James Version renders it "lamp" usually, but "torch" in  Nahum 2:3 ;  Zechariah 12:6 . In  Job 12:5  the Revised Version (British and American) renders it "for misfortune," regarding it as composed of the noun pidh, and the preposition l-. Lampas in Greek corresponds to it, but luchnos is also rendered in the Revised Version (British and American) "lamp," while the King James Version gives "candle," as in  Matthew 5:15  and corresponding passages in the other Gospels.  1. Forms and History:  Lamps were in use in very remote times, though we have few allusions to them in the early history of Egypt. There are indications that they were used there. Niches for lamps are found in the tombs of Tell el-Amarna (Archaeological Survey of Egypt, Tell el-Amarna Letters, Part IV, 14). Lampstands are also represented (ibid., Part III, 7). Torches were of course used before lamps, and are mentioned in Genesis (15:17 the Revised Version (British and American)), but clay lamps were used in Canaan by the Amorites before the Israelites took possession. The excavations in Palestine have furnished thousands of specimens, and have enabled us to trace the development from about 2000 B.C. onward. The exploration carried out at Lachish (Tell Hesy) and Gezer (Tell Jezer) by the Palestine Exploration Fund has given ample material for the purpose, and the numerous examples from tombs all over Palestine and Syria have supplied a great variety of forms.  2. Figurative Use:  "Lamp" is used in the sense of a guide in  Psalm 119:105   Proverbs 6:23 , and for the spirit, which is called the lamp of Yahweh in man ( Proverbs 20:27 ), and it of course often signifies the light itself. It is used also for the son who is to succeed and represent his father ( 1 Kings 15:4 ), and it perhaps is employed in this sense in the phrase, "The lamp of the wicked shall be put out" ( Job 21:17   Proverbs 13:9 ; and perhaps  Job 18:6 ).  The early Canaanite or Amorite lamp was a shallow, saucer-like bowl with rounded bottom and vertical rim, slightly pointed or pinched on one side where the lighted end of the wick was placed. This form continued into Jewish times, but was gradually changed until the spout was formed by drawing the rim of the sides together, forming a narrow open channel, the remainder of the rim being rolled outward and flattened, the bottom being also flattened. This was the early Hebrew pattern and persisted for centuries. The open bowl was gradually closed in, first at the spout, where the rim of one side was lapped over the other, and finally the whole surface was closed with only an orifice in the center for receiving the oil, and at the same time the spout was lengthened. This transformation is seen in lamps of the Seleucid period, or from around 300 B.C. These lamps have usually a circular foot and sometimes a string-hole on one side. The next development was a circular bowl with a somewhat shorter spout, sometimes being only a bulge in the rim, so that the orifice for the wick falls in the rim, the orifice for filling being quite small at the bottom of a saucer-like depression in the center of the bowl. There is sometimes a loop handle affixed on the side opposite to the spout. Sometimes the handle is horizontal, but commonly vertical. This form is called Roman, and the bowl is often ornamented with mythological human or animal figures (Fig. 5). Other forms are elongated, having numerous wick holes (Fig. 6). The mythological and animal forms were rejected by the Jews as contrary to their traditions, and they made lamps with various other designs on the bowl, such as vine leaves, cups, scrolls, etc. (Figs. 7-11). One very marked Jewish design is the seven-branched candlestick ( Exodus 25:32 ) of the temple (Fig. 12). The lamps of the parable of the Ten Virgins were probably similar to these ( Matthew 25:1 ). The latest form of the clay lamp was what is called Byzantine, the bowl of which has a large orifice in the center and tapers gradually to the spout (Fig. 13); they are ornamented commonly with a palm branch between the central orifice and the wickhole, or with a cross. Sometimes there is an inscription on the margin (Fig. 13). The words on this read Phos ku(riou) pheni pasin kale,"The light of the Lord shines to all (beautifully?)." Others read, "The Lord is my light"; "beautiful light," etc. These inscriptions determine the period as being Christian. In Roman times, and earlier also, bronze was much used for the finer lamps, often with covers for the orifice and sometimes with chain and ring for hanging. Very elaborate designs in this material occur.  These terra-cotta lamps are found in the tombs and burial places throughout Palestine and Syria, and they were evidently deposited there in connection with the funeral rites. Very few are found in Canaanite tombs, but they become numerous in later times and especially in the early Christian centuries. The symbolism in their use for funeral purposes is indicated by the inscriptions above mentioned (see PEFS, 1904, 326;; Explorations in Palestine, by Bliss. Maclister and Wunsch, 4to, published by the Palestine Exploration Fund). These lamps were used by the peasants of the country down to recent times, when petroleum has superseded olive oil for lighting. The writer has seen lamps of the Jewish and Roman period with surface blackened with recent usage. Olive oil was commonly used, but terebinth oil also (Thomson, LB, III, 472).  H. Poster
JOKSHAN|Snarer, the second son of Abraham and Keturah ( Genesis 25:2 ,  3;  1 Chronicles 1:32 ). 
COUNSELLOR|An adviser ( Proverbs 11:14 ;  15:22 ), a king's state counsellor ( 2 Samuel 15:12 ). Used once of the Messiah ( Isaiah 9:6 ). In  Mark 15:43 ,  Luke 23:50 , the word probably means a member of the Jewish Sanhedrim. 
OPHNI|Mouldy, a city of Benjamin ( Joshua 18:24 ). 
GUNI|   ; GUNITES  gu'-ni, gu'-nits (guni):  (1) The name of a Naphtalite clan ( Genesis 46:24   Numbers 26:48   1 Chronicles 7:13 ). In  Numbers 26:48  the gentilic "Gunites" is also found, having in Hebrew the same form, with the article.  (2) The head of a Gadite family ( 1 Chronicles 5:15 ).
SINA|     si'-na: In  Acts 7:38  the King James Version, the Revised Version (British and American) "Sinai" (which see).
WITHS|   WITHES, , GREEN  withs, (yetharim lachim, margin "new bowstrings," the King James Version margin "new (moist) cords" ( Judges 16:7 ); Septuagint neura hugra): The material with which Samson was bound by Delilah ( Judges 16:8 ) was probably some moist "gut" such as was used for bowstrings. Compare metharim, "bowstrings" ( Psalm 21:12 ; yether,  Job 30:11   Psalm 11:2 ); lahim, translated "green," means "fresh," "sappy" or "moist."
BASHEMATH|Sweet-smelling.  (1.) The daughter of Ishmael, the last of Esau's three wives ( Genesis 36:3 ,  4,  13), from whose son Reuel four tribes of the Edomites sprung. She is also called Mahalath ( Genesis 28:9 ). It is noticeable that Esau's three wives receive different names in the genealogical table of the Edomites ( Genesis 36 ) from those given to them in the history ( Genesis 26:34 ;  28:9 ). (2.) A daughter of Solomon, and wife of Ahimaaz, one of his officers ( 1 Kings 4:15 ). 
DEMETRIUS| (1.) A silversmith at Ephesus, whose chief occupation was to make "silver shrines for Diana" (q.v.),  Acts 19:24 ,i.e., models either of the temple of Diana or of the statue of the goddess. This trade brought to him and his fellow-craftsmen "no small gain," for these shrines found a ready sale among the countless thousands who came to this temple from all parts of Asia Minor. This traffic was greatly endangered by the progress of the gospel, and hence Demetrius excited the tradesmen employed in the manufacture of these shrines, and caused so great a tumult that "the whole city was filled with confusion." (2.) A Christian who is spoken of as having "a good report of all men, and of the truth itself" (3  John 1:12 ). 
KORHITES|A Levitical family descended from Korah ( Exodus 6:24 ;  1 Chronicles 12:6 ;  26:1 ;  2 Chronicles 20:19 ). 
HOLON|     ho'-lon (cholon or chowlon):  (1) One of the towns in the hill country of Judah ( Joshua 15:51 ) assigned to the Levites 21:15). In  1 Chronicles 6:58  (Hebrew 43), it is HILEN (which see). The site may be the important ruins of Beit`Alam (see PEF, III, 313, 321, Sh XXI).  (2) Probably once an important town in the "plain," i.e. plateau, of Moab ( Jeremiah 48:21 ); the site is unknown.
JOSECH|     jo'-sek (Iosech, Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek; Ioseph, Textus Receptus of the New Testament; the King James Version, Joseph): An ancestor of Jesus in Luke's genealogy ( Luke 3:26 ).
REZIA|     re-zi'-a.  See  RIZIA .
SHAGEE|     sha'-ge (shaghe'; Codex Vaticanus Sola; Codex Alexandrinus Sage; the King James Version Shage): The father of Jonathan, one of David's heroes ( 1 Chronicles 11:34 ).
CHISLEV|   CHISLEU;   kis'-lu, kis'-lev.  See  KISLEV .
BAASEIAH|     ba-a-si'a, ba-a-se'-ya ba`aseyah, ("the Lord is bold"): Perhaps for ma`aseyah, after the Greek Maasai, B, Maasai, "the work of the Lord." Compare Gray, Studies in Hebrew Proper Names, 293. An ancestor of Asaph, the musician ( 1 Chronicles 6:40 ).
MECHERATHITE|     me-ke'-rath-it (mekherathi, "dweller in Mecharah"): Possibly this is a misreading of "Maachathite" (the King James Version). It is the description of Hepher, one of David's valiant men ( 1 Chronicles 11:36 ).  In the Wallel list of  2 Samuel 23 , especially 23:34, the "Maachathite" is mentioned without name in the place in the list given to Hepher in  1 Chronicles 11:36 . The variations do not destroy the conviction that the list is virtually the same.
BECORATH|     be-ko'-rath (bekhorath, "the first birth"; the King James Version Bechorath): A forefather of Saul of the tribe of Benjamin ( 1 Samuel 9:1 ).
MESHACH|The title given to Mishael, one of the three Hebrew youths who were under training at the Babylonian court for the rank of Magi ( Dan. 1:7 ;  2:49 ;  3:12 -30). This was probably the name of some Chaldean god. 
HADAD|Adod, brave (?), the name of a Syrian god.  (1.) An Edomite king who defeated the Midianites ( Genesis 36:35 ;  1 Chronicles 1:46 ). (2.) Another Edomite king ( 1 Chronicles 1:50 ,  51), called also Hadar ( Genesis 36:39 ;  1 Chronicles 1:51 ). (3.) One of "the king's seed in Edom." He fled into Egypt, where he married the sister of Pharaoh's wife ( 1 Kings 11:14 -22). He became one of Solomon's adversaries. Hadad, sharp, (a different name in Hebrew from the preceding), one of the sons of Ishmael ( 1 Chronicles 1:30 ). Called also Hadar ( Genesis 25:15 ). 
RINGSTREAKED|     ring'-strekt (the King James Version and the English Revised Version ringstraked):  Genesis 30:35, 39, 40 ;  Genesis 31:8  (twice), 10, 12 for `aqodh. In the context of  Genesis 30:35 , etc., `aqodh certainly denotes defective coloring of some sort, but the exact meaning of the word is uncertain. The translation "ringstreaked" ("marked with circular bands") comes from connecting the word with the Hebrew root `-q-d, "to bind" ( Genesis 22:9 ), but this connection is dubious.
URIJAH|The lord is my light.  (1.) A high priest in the time of Ahaz ( 2 Kings 16:10 -16), at whose bidding he constructed an idolatrous altar like one the king had seen at Damascus, to be set up instead of the brazen altar. (2.) One of the priests who stood at the right hand of Ezra's pulpit when he read and expounded the law ( Nehemiah 8:4 ). (3.) A prophet of Kirjath-jearim in the reign of Jehoiakim, king of Judah ( Jeremiah 26:20 -23). He fled into Egypt from the cruelty of the king, but having been brought back he was beheaded and his body "cast into the graves of the common people." 
PITHON|     pi'-thon (pithon): A grandson of Meribbaal, or Mephibosheth ( 1 Chronicles 8:35 ;  1 Chronicles 9:41 ).
SOCOH|   ; SOCO  so'-ko (sokkhoh, "branches"), (sokho (in Chronicles only); Socho, most usual, but many forms in Septuagint and in the King James Version: Socoh, Shochoh, Shoco, Shocho):  (1) A city in the Shephelah of Judah mentioned along with Jarmuth, Adullam, Azekah, etc. ( Joshua 15:35 ); the Philistines "gathered together at Socoh, which belongeth to Judah, and encamped between Socoh and Azekah" ( 1 Samuel 17:1 ); it is mentioned as one of the districts from which Solomon drew his supplies ( 1 Kings 4:10 , the King James Version "Sochoh"); the association of Socoh in this verse with Hepher is worth noticing in connection with  1 Chronicles 4:18  ("Heber"). Soco (the King James Version "Shoco") was one of the cities fortified by Rehoboam for the defense of Judah ( 2 Chronicles 11:7 ); it was captured by the Philistines in the time of Ahaz ( 2 Chronicles 28:18 ). The site is, without doubt, Khirbet esh Shuweikeh (Shuweikeh is a diminutive of Shaukeh, "a thorn"), a rounded, elongated hilltop, showing clear traces of ancient city walls. The situation is one of considerable natural strength on the south side of the Vale of Elah just where the Wady ec Cur makes a sweep to the West and becomes the Wady es Sunt. Like so many such ancient sites, the hill has very steep slopes on 3 sides (South, West, and North), and is isolated from the ridge of higher ground to the East by a narrow neck of lower ground. In the valley to the Southwest is a plentiful spring. The site was known to Jerome in the 4th century. He described it as 8 or 9 Roman miles from Eleutheropolis (Beit Jibrin) (PEF, III, 53, 125, Sh XVII, BR, II, 21). The Sucathites ( 1 Chronicles 2:55 ) were probably inhabitants of Soco.  (2) A city of Judah in the South, associated ( Joshua 15:48 ) with Shamir and Jattir. This is doubtless Khirbet Shuweikeh, a large ruin occupying a low hill, 10 miles Southwest of Hebron; there are many caves and rock-cut cisterns as well as drafted stones. Cheyne doubtfully locates the Socoh of  1 Kings 4:10  here. See  PEF, 404, 410, Sh XXV ; B R, I, 494.  E. W. G. Masterman
NAHARAI|Snorer, a Berothite, one of David's heroes, and armour-bearer of Joab ( 1 Chronicles 11:39 ). 
KIRJATHSEPHER|City of books,  Joshua 15:15 ; same as Kirjath-sannah (q.v.), now represented by the valley of ed-Dhaberiyeh, south-west of Hebron. The name of this town is an evidence that the Canaanites were acquainted with writing and books. "The town probably contained a noted school, or was the site of an oracle and the residence of some learned priest." The "books" were probably engraved stones or bricks. 
STANDARDS|     stand'-ardz.  See  WAR, 5 ;  BANNER ; ASTRONOMY, sec. II, 7.
SONS|   BRIDE-CHAMBER,  (CHILDREN) OF THE  (hoi huioi tou numphonos): These were friends or companions of the bridegroom and were usually very numerous ( Matthew 9:15   Mark 2:19   Luke 5:34 ). Any wedding guest might be included in the expression, or anyone who took part in the bridal procession and remained for the wedding-feast (see MARRIAGE). In the above passages "the sons of the bride-chamber" are the disciples of Christ.  GOD, SON (SONS) OF  See  SONS OF GOD (OLD TESTAMENT) ;  SONS OF GOD (NEW TESTAMENT) .  GREECE, SONS OF  "I will stir up thy sons, O Zion, against thy sons, O Greece, and will make thee as the sword of a mighty man" ( Zechariah 9:13 ). The passage doubtless refers to the captive Hebrews who are held by the Greeks. The exhortation is to insurrection against the Greeks. Although bearing a striking similarity to the passage in  Joel 3:6 , there is evidently no connection between the two. In the first, there was conflict between the nations; in the second, simply a reflection upon Tyre and Sidon for having sold into Greece certain Jewish captives. From a Jewish standpoint the Maccabean wars were really between Jews and Greeks.  See  JAVAN ;  ASMONEANS .
GAHAM|     ga'-ham (gacham):  A son of Nahor, brother of Abraham, by his concubine Reumah ( Genesis 22:24 ).
ROBBERS|    OF TEMPLES  (hierosuloi, "guilty of sacrilege"): A term used by the town clerk of Ephesus ( Acts 19:37 , the King James Version "robbers of churches"). As the temple of Diana (Artemas) had a great treasure-chamber, the offense might not be unknown among them; compare  Romans 2:22 .  In 2 Maccabees 4:42 the King James Version the epithet "church-robber" (the Revised Version (British and American) "author of the sacrilege") is applied to LYSIMACHUS (which see).  TEMPLES, ROBBERS OF  (hierosuloi; the King James Version "robbers of churches,"  Acts 19:37 ): To explain this as "sacrilegious persons" is irreconcilable with the contrast in  Romans 2:22 . In  Deuteronomy 7:25 , the Jews were commanded entirely to destroy the gold and silver idols, ornaments of the heathen temples. The sin reproved is that of making that a matter of gain which, without regard to its value, they should have destroyed. "Dost thou, who regardest the mere touch of an idol as a horrible defilement, presume to rob their temples?" There is abundant evidence to show that this crime was not unusual. When the town-clerk of Ephesus declares the companions of Paul innocent of such charge, his words imply that the fact that they were Jews rendered them liable to such suspicion. So Josephus goes out of his way (Ant., IV, viii, 10) to deny that Jews ever committed the crime.  H. E. Jacobs  CHURCHES, ROBBERS OF  church'-iz.  See  ROBBERS OF TEMPLES .
HUSHAI|Quick, "the Archite," "the king's friend" ( 1 Chronicles 27:33 ). When David fled from Jerusalem, on account of the rebellion of Absalom, and had reached the summit of Olivet, he there met Hushai, whom he sent back to Jerusalem for the purpose of counteracting the influence of Ahithophel, who had joined the ranks of Absalom ( 2 Samuel 15:32 ,  37;  16:16 -18). It was by his advice that Absalom refrained from immediately pursuing after David. By this delay the cause of Absalom was ruined, for it gave David time to muster his forces. 
HORMAH|Banning; i.e., placing under a "ban," or devoting to utter destruction. After the manifestation of God's anger against the Israelites, on account of their rebellion and their murmurings when the spies returned to the camp at Kadesh, in the wilderness of Paran, with an evil report of the land, they quickly repented of their conduct, and presumed to go up "to the head of the mountain," seeking to enter the Promised Land, but without the presence of the Lord, without the ark of the convenant, and without Moses. The Amalekites and the Canaanites came down and "smote and discomfited them even unto Hormah" ( Numbers 14:45 ). This place, or perhaps the watch-tower commanding it, was originally called Zephath ( Judges 1:17 ), the modern Sebaiteh. Afterwards ( Numbers 21:1 -3) Arad, the king of the Canaanites, at the close of the wanderings, when the Israelites were a second time encamped at Kadesh, "fought against them, and took some of them prisoners." But Israel vowed a vow unto the Lord utterly to destroy the cities of the Canaanites; they "banned" them, and hence the place was now called Hormah. But this "ban" was not fully executed till the time of Joshua, who finally conquered the king of this district, so that the ancient name Zephath became "Hormah" ( Joshua 12:14 ;  Judges 1:17 ).
ELPARAN|Oak of Paran, a place on the edge of the wilderness bordering the territory of the Horites ( Genesis 14:6 ). This was the farthest point to which Chedorlaomer's expedition extended. It is identified with the modern desert of et-Tih. (see  PARAN .) 
NOPH|The Hebrew name of an Egyptian city ( Isaiah 19:13 ;  Jeremiah 2:16 ;  44:1 ;  46:14 ,  19;  Ezek. 30:13 ,  16). In  Hosea 9:6  the Hebrew name is Moph, and is translated "Memphis," which is its Greek and Latin form. It was one of the most ancient and important cities of Egypt, and stood a little to the south of the modern Cairo, on the western bank of the Nile. It was the capital of Lower Egypt. Among the ruins found at this place is a colossal statue of Rameses the Great. (see  MEMPHIS .) 
GAI|     ga'-i (gay'):  In the Revised Version (British and American) of  1 Samuel 17:52  for the King James Version "valleys." the Revised Version, margin notes: "The Syriac and some editions of the Septuagint have Gath" (thus also Wellhausen, Budde, Driver, etc.).
DIBLAIM|Doubled cakes, the mother of Gomer, who was Hosea's wife ( Hosea 1:3 ). 
ENAN|     e'-nan (`enan, "having fountains," or "eyes," i.e. "keen-eyed"; in Septuagint Ainan):  The father of Ahira, and prince of Naphtali at the first census of Israel ( Numbers 1:15 ;  Numbers 2:29 ;  Numbers 7:78, 83 ; 10:27).
GADITES|     gad'-its:  Members of the tribe of Gad ( Deuteronomy 3:12 , etc.).
MAHANAIM|Two camps, a place near the Jabbok, beyond Jordan, where Jacob was met by the "angels of God," and where he divided his retinue into "two hosts" on his return from Padan-aram ( Genesis 32:2 ). This name was afterwards given to the town which was built at that place. It was the southern boundary of Bashan ( Joshua 13:26 ,  30), and became a city of the Levites ( 21:38 ). Here Saul's son Ishbosheth reigned ( 2 Samuel 2:8 ,  12), while David reigned at Hebron. Here also, after a troubled reign, Ishbosheth was murdered by two of his own bodyguard ( 2 Samuel 4:5 -7), who brought his head to David at Hebron, but were, instead of being rewarded, put to death by him for their cold-blooded murder. Many years after this, when he fled from Jerusalem on the rebellion of his son Absalom, David made Mahanaim, where Barzillai entertained him, his headquarters, and here he mustered his forces which were led against the army that had gathered around Absalom. It was while sitting at the gate of this town that tidings of the great and decisive battle between the two hosts and of the death of his son Absalom reached him, when he gave way to the most violent grief ( 2 Samuel 17:24 -27). The only other reference to Mahanaim is as a station of one of Solomon's purveyors ( 1 Kings 4:14 ). It has been identified with the modern Mukhumah, a ruin found in a depressed plain called el-Bukie'a, "the little vale," near Penuel, south of the Jabbok, and north-east of es-Salt. 
SARDITE|     sar'-dit.  See  SERED .
SHALLUN|     shal'-un (shallun, not in the Septuagint): Another form of Shallum, the son of Col-hozeh. He was the ruler of the district of Mizpah. He assisted Nehemiah in building the wall of Jerusalem and in repairing the gate by the Pool of Siloah at the King's Gardens (Nehemiah 3:15). 
BETH|Occurs frequently as the appellation for a house, or dwelling-place, in such compounds as the words immediately following: 
JECHOLIAH|     jek-o-li'-a (yekholyahu;  2 Kings 15:2  the King James Version = yekholyah, Qere in  2 Chronicles 26:3 , "Yah is able" or "Yah has been able"): The mother of King Uzziah (Azariah) of Judah. The Revised Version (British and American) has "Jecoliah" in 2 Kings and so the King James Version in 2 Ch.
LOVINGKINDNESS|     luv-ing-kind'-nes (hecedh): "Lovingkindness" in the King James Version always represents this word (30 times), but of hecedh there are many other renderings, e.g. "mercy" (frequently), "kindness" (38), "goodness" (12). The word is derived from chacadh, meaning, perhaps, "to bend or bow oneself," "to incline oneself"; hence, "to be gracious or merciful." the English Revised Version has not many changes, but in the American Standard Revised Version "lovingkindness" is invariably employed when checedh is used of God, and, as a rule, "kindness" when it is used of man, as in  Genesis 21:23   Judges 1:24  (the King James Version "mercy," the Revised Version (British and American) "deal kindly");  Ruth 3:10   2 Chronicles 32:32 ;  2 Chronicles 35:26  (the King James Version "goodness,"); margin "Hebrew: kindness" the Revised Version (British and American) "good deeds");  Job 6:14 , etc. Of the uses of the word as on man's part toward God, the only occurrences are:  Jeremiah 2:2 , "I remember for thee the kindness of thy youth, the love of thine espousals," etc.;  Hosea 6:4, 6 , "Your goodness (the Revised Version margin "or kindness") is as a morning cloud," "I desire goodness (the King James Version "mercy," the Revised Version margin "Kindness"), and not sacrifice," which last passage may denote kindness as toward man.  When used of God checedh denotes, in general, "the Divine Love condescending to His creatures, more especially to sinners, in unmerited kindness" (Delitzsch). It is frequency associated with forgiveness, and is practically equivalent to "mercy" or "mercifulness" ( Exodus 20:6 ), "showing lovingkindness (the English Revised Version "mercy") unto thousands of them that love me";  Exodus 34:6 , "slow to anger, and abundant in lovingkindness (the English Revised Version "plenteous in mercy")"; (34:7) "keeping lovingkindness (the English Revised Version "mercy") for thousands, forgiving iniquity and transgression and sin" (compare  Numbers 14:18 );  Micah 7:18 , "He retaineth not his anger for ever, because he delighteth in lovingkindness" (the English Revised Version "mercy"). This quality in Yahweh was one by which He sought to bind His people to Himself. It is greatly magnified in the Old Testament, highly extolled and gloried in, in many of the psalms (Psalm 136 has the constant refrain, "For his lovingkindness endureth forever"). In  Deuteronomy 7:12  it is associated with the covenant, and in  2 Samuel 7:15  with the covenant with David (compare  Isaiah 55:3 , etc.). It was something that could always be relied on.  Being such an essential and distinctive quality of God, the prophets taught that it should also characterize His people. It is part of the Divine requirement in  Micah 6:8 , "to love kindness" (compare  Zechariah 7:9 , "Show kindness and compassion every man to his brother"). The want of it in the nation was a cause of Yahweh's controversy with them, e.g.  Hosea 4:1 , "There is no truth, nor goodness (checedh) (the King James Version and the English Revised Version "mercy"), nor knowledge of God in the land";  Hosea 12:6 , "Therefore turn thou to thy God: keep kindness (the King James Version and the English Revised Version "mercy") and justice, and wait for thy God continually." Cheyne (Encyclopedia Biblica) regards checedh as denoting paternal affection on God's part, answered by filial and loyal affection and brotherly love on man's part (philadelphia in the New Testament).  The word "lovingkindness" does not occur in the New Testament, but as its equivalents we have such terms as "mercy" "goodness," "kindness," "brotherly love" (see special articles).  W. L. Walker
SHULAMITE|The same, as some think, with "Shunammite," from "Shunem:" otherwise, the import of the word is uncertain (Cant. 6:13; R.V.,  "Shulammite"). 
MECONAH|     me-ko'-na (mekhonah; Machna): A town apparently in the neighborhood of Ziklag, named only in  Nehemiah 11:28 , as reoccupied by the men of Judah after the Captivity. It is not identified.
PILTAI|     pil'-ti, pil-ta'-i (pilTay, probably "Yahweh delivers"): One of the priests, described as "the chiefs of the fathers," in the days of Joiakim ( Nehemiah 12:17 ).
HUL|Circle, the second son of Aram ( Genesis 10:23 ), and grandson of Shem. 
FAITHFULNESS|   FAITHFUL;   fath'-fool, fath'-fool-nes: 1. Faithfulness of God in the Old Testament  2. Faithfulness of God in the New Testament  LITERATURE  Faithfulness is a quality or attribute applied in the Scripture to both God and man. This article is limited to the consideration of the Scripture teaching concerning the meaning of faithfulness in its application to God.  Faithfulness is one of the characteristics of God's ethical nature. It denotes the firmness or constancy of God in His relations with men, especially with His people. It is, accordingly, one aspect of God's truth and of His unchangeableness. God is true not only because He is really God in contrast to all that is not God, and because He realizes the idea of Godhead, but also because He is constant or faithful in keeping His promises, and therefore is worthy of trust (see TRUTH). God, likewise, is unchangeable in His ethical nature. This unchangeableness the Scripture often connects with God's goodness and mercy, and also with His constancy in reference to His covenant promises, and this is what the Old Testament means by the Faithfulness of God (see UNCHANGEABLENESS).  1. Faithfulfulness of God in the Old Testament:  In the Old Testament this attribute is ascribed to God in passages where the Hebrew words denoting faithfulness do not occur. It is implied in the covenant name Yahweh as unfolded in  Exodus 3:13-15 , which not only expresses God's self-existence and unchangeableness, but, as the context indicates, puts God's immutability in special relation to His gracious promises, thus denoting God's unchangeable faithfulness which is emphasized in the Old Testament to awaken trust in God ( Deuteronomy 7:9   Psalm 36:5 (Hebrew 6 );  Isaiah 11:5   Hosea 12:6, 9 ). (For fuller remarks on the name Yahweh in  Exodus 3:13-15 , see article UNCHANGEABLENESS.) It is, moreover, God's faithfulness as well as His immutability which is implied in those passages where God is called a rock, as being the secure object of religious trust ( Deuteronomy 32:4, 15   Psalm 18:2 (Hebrew 3 ); 42:9 (Hebrew 10);  Isaiah 17:10 , etc.). This same attribute is also implied where God reveals Himself to Moses and to Israel as the God of Abraham, Isaac and Jacob, and their fathers' God ( Exodus 3:6, 15, 16 ). The truth concerning God here taught is not simply that He stood in a gracious relation to the Patriarchs, but that He is faithful to His gracious promise to their fathers, and that what He was to them He will continue to be to Moses and to Israel. This is the fundamental idea in the Old Testament concerning the faithfulness of God.  This can be seen also from the Hebrew words which are used to express this quality of God's nature and activity. These words are ne'eman, the Niphal participle of the verb 'aman used as an adjective-"faithful"-and the nouns 'emeth and 'emunah-"faithfulness." The verbal stem 'aman means "to be secure or firm." In the Qal it denotes the firmness of that which supports something, being used in the participle of a nurse who carries a child ( Numbers 11:12   2 Samuel 4:4   Isaiah 49:23 ). In the Niphal it denotes the firmness of that which is supported, for example, a child which is carried ( Isaiah 60:4 ); a well-founded house ( 1 Samuel 2:35 ;  1 Samuel 25:28 ); a wall which firmly holds a nail ( Isaiah 22:23, 15 ); a kingdom firmly established ( 2 Samuel 7:16 ); persons secure in political station ( Isaiah 7:9 ); a heart which is faithful ( Nehemiah 9:8 ). Hence, in the Niphal the verb comes to have the meaning of being true in the sense of the agreement of words and assertions with reality; for example, of words and revelations ( Genesis 42:20   Hosea 5:9 ); and of persons ( Isaiah 8:2   Jeremiah 42:5 ). It has also the meaning of being faithful, being applied to men in  Numbers 12:7   Psalm 101:6   Nehemiah 13:13 , etc. In this sense the term is applied to the covenant-keeping Yahweh to express the truth that He is firm or constant, that is, faithful in regard to His covenant promises, and will surely fulfill them ( Deuteronomy 7:9   Isaiah 49:7 ; and possibly  Hosea 11:12  ( Hebrew 12:1 )).  A similar use is made of the nouns 'emeth and 'emunah. Apart from the instances where 'emeth denotes the idea of truth or the correspondence of words and ideas with reality, and the instances where it denotes the agreement of acts and words with the inner disposition, that is, sincerity, it is also used to denote the idea of faithfulness as above defined. As regards the noun 'emunah, apart from a few passages where it is doubtful whether it means truth or faithfulness, it usually denotes the latter idea. Both these nouns, then, are used to signify the idea of faithfulness, that is, constancy or firmness, especially in the fulfillment of all obligations. In this sense these words are not only applied to men, but also to God to express the idea that He is always faithful to His covenant promises. It is this attribute of God which the Psalmist declares ( Psalm 40:10 (Hebrew 11 )), and the greatness of which he affirms by saying that God's faithfulness reacheth to the clouds ( Psalm 36:5 (Hebrew 6 )). It is this which he makes the object of praise ( Psalm 89:1, 2 (Hebrew 2, 3 );  Psalm 92:2  (Hebrew 3)); and which he says should be praised and reverenced by all men ( Psalm 89:5, 8 (Hebrew 6, 9 )). And even this faithfulness is itself characterized by constancy, if we may so speak, for the Psalmist says that it endures to all generations ( Psalm 100:5 ). Being thus a characteristic of God, it also characterizes His salvation, and becomes the basis of confidence that God will hear prayer ( Psalm 143:1 ). It thus becomes the security of the religious man ( Psalm 91:4 ); and the source of God's help to His people ( Psalm 31:5 (Hebrew 6 )). Accordingly in the teaching of prophecy, the salvation of the covenant people rests upon no claim or merit of their own, but solely upon Yahweh's mercy, grace and faithfulness. When Israel incurred God's judgments, it might have appeared as if His promise was to fail, but, so far from this being true, as Yahweh, He is faithful to His word of promise which stands forever ( Isaiah 40:8 ). Even from eternity His counsels are characterized by faithfulness and truth ( Isaiah 25:1 ); and this is not because of Israel's faithfulness, but it is for His own sake that Yahweh blotteth out their transgressions ( Isaiah 43:22-25   Micah 7:18-20 ). It is, moreover, this same characteristic of Yahweh which is asserted in many cases where the Hebrew words 'emeth and 'emunah are translated by the word "truth" in the King James Version. In  Exodus 34:6  it is God's faithfulness ('emeth) which is referred to, since it evidently signifies His constancy from generation to generation; and in  Deuteronomy 32:4  it is also God's faithfulness ('emunah) which is mentioned, since it is contrasted with the faithlessness of Israel. The same is true of 'emeth in  Micah 7:20   Psalm 31:5  (Hebrew 6)); 91:04:00; 146:06:00. This is also true of the numerous instances where God's mercy and truth ('emeth) are combined, His mercy being the source of His gracious promises, and His truth the faithfulness with which He certainly fulfills them ( Psalm 25:10 ;  Psalm 57:3 (Hebrew 4 ); 61:7 (Hebrew 8); 85:10 (Hebrew 11); 86:15). And since the covenant-keeping Yahweh is faithful, faithfulness comes also to be a characteristic of the New Covenant which is everlasting ( Psalm 89:28  (Hebrew 29)); compare also for a similar thought,  Isaiah 54:8 ;  Jeremiah 31:35 ;  Hosea 2:19 ;  Ezekiel 16:60 .  It is in this connection, moreover, that God's faithfulness is closely related to His righteousness in the Old Testament. In the second half of the prophecy of Isaiah and in many of the psalms, righteousness is ascribed to God because He comes to help and save His people. Thus righteousness as a quality parallel with grace, mercy and faithfulness is ascribed to God ( Isaiah 41:10 ;  Isaiah 42:6 ;  Isaiah 45:13, 19, 21 ;  Isaiah 63:1 ). It appears in these places to widen out from its exclusively judicial or forensic association and to become a quality of God as Saviour of His people. Accordingly this attribute of God is appealed to in the Psalms as the basis of hope for salvation and deliverance ( Psalm 31:1 (Hebrew 2 ); 35:24:00; 71:02:00; 143:11). Hence, this attribute is associated with God's mercy and grace ( Psalm 36:5 (Hebrew 6 ); 36:9 (Hebrew 10); 89:14 (Hebrew 15)); also with His faithfulness ( Zechariah 8:8   Psalm 36:6 (Hebrew 7 ));  Psalm 40:10  (Hebrew 11); 88:11, 12 (Hebrew 12, 13); 89:14 (Hebrew 15); 96:13:00; 119:137, 142; 143:1). Accordingly the Old Testament conception of the righteousness of God has been practically identified with His covenant faithfulness, by such writers as Kautzsch, Riehm and Smend, Ritschl's definition of it being very much the same. Moreover, Ritschl, following Diestel, denied that the idea of distributive and retributive justice is ascribed to God in the Old Testament. In regard to this latter point, it should be remarked in passing that this denial that the judicial or forensic idea of righteousness is ascribed to God in the Old Testament breaks down, not only in view of the fact that the Old Testament does ascribe this attribute to God in many ways, but also in view of the fact that in a number of passages the idea of retribution is specifically referred to the righteousness of God (see RIGHTEOUSNESS; compare against Diestel and Ritschl, Dalman, Die richterliche Gerechtigkeit im Alten Testament).  That which concerns us, however, in regard to this close relation between righteousness and faithfulness is to observe that this should not be pressed to the extent of the identification of righteousness with covenant faithfulness in these passages in the Psalms and the second half of Isaiah. The idea seems to be that Israel has sinned and has no claim upon Yahweh, finding her only hope of deliverance in His mercy and faithfulness. But this very fact that Yahweh is merciful and faithful becomes, as it were, Israel's claim, or rather the ground of Israel's hope of deliverance from her enemies. Hence, in the recognition of this claim of His people, God is said to be righteous in manifesting His mercy and faithfulness, so that His righteousness, no less than His mercy and faithfulness, becomes the ground of His people's hope. Righteousness is thus closely related in these cases to faithfulness, but it is not identified with it, nor has it in all cases lost entirely its forensic tone. This seems to be, in general, the meaning of righteousness in the Psalms and the second half of Isaiah, with which may also be compared  Micah 6:9   Zechariah 8:8 .  The emphasis which this attribute of God has in the Old Testament is determined by the fact that throughout the whole of the Old Testament the covenant relation of Yahweh to His people is founded solely in God's grace, and not on any merit of theirs. If this covenant relation had been based on any claim of Israel, faithfulness on God's part might have been taken for granted. But since Yahweh's covenant relation with Israel and His promises of salvation spring solely from, and depend wholly upon, the grace of God, that which gave firm assurance that the past experience of God's grace would continue in the future was this immutable faithfulness of Yahweh. By it the experience of the fathers was given a religious value for Israel from generation to generation. And even as the faithfulness of God bridged over the past and the present, so also it constituted the connecting link between the present and the future, becoming thus the firm basis of Israel's hope; compare  Psalm 89  which sets forth the faithfulness of God in its greatness, its firmness as the basis of the covenant and the ground it affords of hope for future help from Yahweh, and for hope that His covenant shall endure forever. When God's people departed from Him all the more emphasis was put upon His faithfulness, so that the only hope of His wayward people lay not only in His grace and mercy but also in His faithfulness, which stands in marked contrast with the faithlessness and inconstancy of His people. This is probably the meaning of the difficult verse  Hosea 11:12  (Hebrew 12:1).  2. Faithfulness of God in the New Testament:  In the New Testament teaching concerning the faithfulness of God the same idea of faithfulness to His gracious promises is emphasized and held up as the object of a confident trust in God. This idea is usually expressed by the adjective pistos, and once by the noun pistis, which more frequently has the active sense of faith or trust.  An attempt has been made by Wendt (SK, 1883, 511; Teaching of Jesus, English translation, I, 259) to interpret the words aletheia and alethes in many instances, especially in the Johannine writings, as denoting faithfulness and rectitude, after the analogy of the Septuagint rendering eleos kai aletheia for the Hebrew phrase "mercy and truth," in which truth is equivalent to faithfulness. But the most that could be inferred from the fact that the Septuagint uses the word aletheia to translate the Hebrew word 'emeth, and in about one-half the cases where 'emunah occurs, would be that those Greek words might have been prepared for such a use in the New Testament. But while it is true that there is one usage of these words in John's writings in an ethical sense apparently based on the Old Testament use of 'emeth and 'emunah, the Greek words do not have this meaning when employed to denote a characteristic of God. Neither is the adjective alethinos so used.  See TRUTH .  In the Epistles of Paul the word aletheia occurs quite frequently to denote the truth revealed by God to man through reason and conscience, and to denote the doctrinal content of the gospel. In two passages, however, the words alethes and aletheia seem to signify the faithfulness of God ( Romans 3:4, 7 ;  Romans 15:8 ). In the former passage Paul is contrasting the faithfulness of God with the faithlessness of men, the word alethes, 3:4, and aletheia, 3:7, apparently denoting the same Divine characteristic as the word pistis, 3:3. In the latter passage ( Romans 15:8 ), the vindication of God's covenant faithfulness, through the realization of His promises to the fathers, is declared to have been the purpose of the ministry of Jesus Christ to the Jews.  This faithfulness of God to His covenant promises is frequently emphasized by Paul, the words he employs being the noun pistis (once) and the adjective: pistos. The noun pistis is used once by Paul in this sense ( Romans 3:3 ). In this place Paul is arguing that the unbelief of the Jews cannot make void God's faithfulness. Both Jew and Gentile, the apostle had said, are on the same footing as regards justification. Nevertheless the Jews had one great advantage in that they were the people to whom the revelation of God's gracious promises had been committed. These promises will certainly be fulfilled, notwithstanding the fact that some of the Jews were unfaithful, because the fulfillment of these promises depends not on human conduct but on the faithfulness of God, which cannot be made void by human faithlessness and unbelief. And to the supposition that man's faithlessness could make of none effect God's faithfulness, Paul replies `let God be faithful (alethes) and every man a liar' ( Romans 3:4 ), by which Paul means to say that in the fulfillment of God's promises, in spite of the fact that men are faithless, the faithfulness of God will be abundantly vindicated, even though thereby every man should be proven untrue and faithless. And not only so, but human faithlessness will give an opportunity for a manifestation of the faithfulness (aletheia) of God, abounding to His glory ( Romans 3:7 ). God's faithfulness here is His unchangeable constancy and fidelity to His covenant promises; and it is this fidelity to His promises, or the fact that God's gracious gifts and election are without any change of mind on His part, which gave to Paul the assurance that all Israel should finally be saved ( Romans 11:25-29 ). Moreover this covenant faithfulness of God is grounded in His very nature, so that Paul's hope of eternal life rests on the fact that God who cannot lie promised it before the world began ( Titus 1:2 ); and the certainty that God will abide faithful notwithstanding human faithlessness rests on the fact that God cannot deny Himself ( 2 Timothy 2:13 ). It is because God is faithful that His promises in Christ are yea and amen ( 2 Corinthians 1:18, 20 ). This attribute of God, moreover, is the basis of Paul's confident assurance that God will preserve the Christian in temptation ( 1 Corinthians 10:13 ); and establish him and preserve him from evil ( 2 Thessalonians 3:3 ). And since God is faithful and His gracious promises trustworthy, this characteristic attaches to the "faithful sayings" in the Pastoral Epistles which sum up the gospel, making them worthy of trust and acceptance ( 1 Timothy 1:15 ;  1 Timothy 4:9   Titus 3:8 ).  This faithfulness of God in the sense of fidelity to His promises is set forth as the object of sure trust and hope by the writer of the Epistle to the Hebrews. It was the basis of Sarah's faith that she would bear a child when she was past age ( Hebrews 11:11 ); and it is because God is faithful to His promise in Christ that we can draw nigh to Him with full assurance of faith, holding fast without wavering the profession of hope ( Hebrews 10:23 ).  John also ascribes this attribute to God. Since one of the most precious of God's promises through Christ is the pardon of sin through the "blood of Jesus Christ," John says that God's faithfulness, as well as His righteousness, is manifested in the forgiveness of sin (1  John 1:9 ).  The faithfulness of God is viewed from a slightly different point by Peter when he tells his readers that those who suffer as Christians and in accordance with God's will should "commit their soul's in well-doing unto a faithful Creator" ( 1 Peter 4:19 ). The quality of faithfulness, which in the Scripture is more frequently ascribed to God in His relation to man as gracious Saviour, and as the ground of hope in His gracious promises, is here applied by Peter to God in His relation to man as his Creator, and is made the ground of comfort under persecution and suffering. The omission of the article before the words "faithful Creator" makes emphatic that this is a characteristic of God as Creator, and the position of the words in the sentence throws great emphasis on this attribute of God as the basis of comfort under suffering. It is as if Peter would say to suffering Christians, "You suffer not by chance but in accordance with God's will; He, the almighty Creator, made you, and since your suffering is in accordance with His will, you ought to trust yourselves to Him who as your Creator is faithful." It is, of course, Christians who are to derive this comfort, but the faithfulness of God is extended here to cover all His relations to His people, and to pledge all His attributes in their behalf.  This attribute is also ascribed to Christ in the New Testament. Where Jesus is called a faithful high priest, the idea expressed is His fidelity to His obligations to God and to His saving work ( Hebrews 2:17 ;  Hebrews 3:2, 6 ). But when in the Book of Revelation Jesus Christ is called the "faithful witness" or absolutely the "Faithful and True," it is clear that the quality of faithfulness, in the most absolute sense in which it is characteristic of God in contrast with human changeableness, is ascribed to Christ ( Revelation 1:5 ;  Revelation 3:14 ;  Revelation 19:11 ). This is especially clear in the last-named passage. The heavens themselves open to disclose the glorified Christ, and He appears not only as a victorious warrior whose name is faithful and true, but also as the one in whom these attributes have their highest realization, and of whom they are so characteristic as to become the name of the exalted Lord. This clearly implies the Deity of Jesus.  In summing up the Scripture teaching concerning God's faithfulness, three things are noteworthy. In the first place, this characteristic of God is usually connected with His gracious promises of salvation, and is one of those attributes which make God the firm and secure object of religious trust. As is the case with all the Scripture teaching concerning God, it is the religious value of His faithfulness which is made prominent. In the second place, the so-called moral attributes, of which this is one, are essential in order to constitute God the object of religion, along with the so-called incommunicable attributes such as Omnipotence, Omnipresence and Unchangeableness. Take away either class of attributes from God, and He ceases to be God, the object of religious veneration and trust. And in the third place, while these moral attributes, to which faithfulness belongs, have been called "communicable," to distinguish them from the "incommunicable" attributes which distinguish God from all that is finite, it should never be forgotten that, according to the Scripture, God is faithful in such an absolute sense as to contrast Him with men who are faithful only in a relative sense, and who appear as changeable and faithless in comparison with the faithfulness of God.  See RIGHTEOUSNESS ;  TRUTH ; UNCHANGEABLENESS.  LITERATURE.  Besides the Commentaries on the appropriate passages, see Oehler, Theology of the Old Testament, English translation, 95, 112 505: Dillmann, Handbuch der alttest. Theol., 268-76, 269-70; Schlatter, Der Glaube im New Testament, 21-22, 259-60. In the works on New Testament theology this subject is treated under the sections on the truthfulness of God.  On the relation of God's truth and faithfulness, see Wendt, Der Gebrauch der Worter, und im New Testament, SK, 1883, 511; Stanton, article "Truth," in HDB, IV, 816; and the above-mentioned work of Schlatter. On the relation of the faithfulness to the righteousness of God, see Diestel, "Die Idee der Gerechtigkeit vorzuglich im Altes Testament," Jahrbucher fur deutsche Theologie, 1860, 173; Kautzsch, Ueber die Derivate des Stammes im Altes Testament Sprachgebrauch; Riehm, Altes Testament Theol., 271; Smend, Alttest. Religionsgeschichte, 363; Ritschl, Justification and Reconciliation; Dalman, Die richterliche Gerechtigkeit im Altes Testament; and the above-mentioned Old Testament Theologies of Dillmann and Oehler.  Gaspar Wistar Hodge
CHEDORLAOMER|(= Khudur-Lagamar of the inscriptions), king of Elam. Many centuries before the age of Abraham, Canaan and even the Sinaitic peninsula had been conquered by Babylonian kings, and in the time of Abraham himself Babylonia was ruled by a dynasty which claimed sovereignity over Syria and Palestine. The kings of the dynasty bore names which were not Babylonian, but at once South Arabic and Hebrew. The most famous king of the dynasty was Khammu-rabi, who united Babylonia under one rule, and made Babylon its capital. When he ascended the throne, the country was under the suzerainty of the Elamites, and was divided into two kingdoms, that of Babylon (the Biblical Shinar) and that of Larsa (the Biblical Ellasar). The king of Larsa was Eri-Aku ("the servant of the moon-god"), the son of an Elamite prince, Kudur-Mabug, who is entitled "the father of the land of the Amorites." A recently discovered tablet enumerates among the enemies of Khammu-rabi, Kudur-Lagamar ("the servant of the goddess Lagamar") or Chedorlaomer, Eri-Aku or Arioch, and Tudkhula or Tidal. Khammu-rabi, whose name is also read Ammi-rapaltu or Amraphel by some scholars, succeeded in overcoming Eri-Aku and driving the Elamites out of Babylonia. Assur-bani-pal, the last of the Assyrian conquerors, mentions in two inscriptions that he took Susa 1635 years after Kedor-nakhunta, king of Elam, had conquered Babylonia. It was in the year B.C. 660 that Assur-bani-pal took Susa. 
MATTHAN|Gift, one of our Lord's ancestry ( Matthew 1:15 ). 
GAMMADIM|( Ezek. 27:11 ) brave warriors; R.V. marg., "valorous men;" others interpret this word as meaning "short-swordsmen," or "daring ones", the name of a class of men who were defenders of the towers of Tyre. 
JOIADA|(whom Jehovah favours) = Jehoiada.  (1.)  Nehemiah 3:6 .  (2.) One of the high priests ( 12:10 ,  11,  22). 
EBEZ|     e'-bez ('ebhets, meaning unknown; Rhebes; the King James Version Abez):  One of the 16 cities in Issachar ( Joshua 19:20 ). The name seems to be cognate to that of the judge Ibzan ( Judges 12:8-10 ). All else concerning it is conjecture.
HEZRONITES|     hez'-ron-its (ha-chetsrowni and ha-chetsroni; Septuagint ho Asronei): The name of the descendants of Hezron the son of Reuben ( Numbers 26:6 ), and of the descendants of Hezron the son of Perez ( Numbers 26:21 ).
IOB|     yob (yobh; the King James Version Job): Third son of Issachar ( Genesis 46:13 ). In parallel passages ( Numbers 26:24   1 Chronicles 7:1 ) the name is Jashub (yashubh), which the versions in Genesis also support as the correct form.
JEZREEL|God scatters.  (1.) A town of Issachar ( Joshua 19:18 ), where the kings of Israel often resided ( 1 Kings 18:45 ;  21:1 ;  2 Kings 9:30 ). Here Elijah met Ahab, Jehu, and Bidkar; and here Jehu executed his dreadful commission against the house of Ahab ( 2 Kings 9:14 -37;  10:1 -11). It has been identified with the modern Zerin, on the most western point of the range of Gilboa, reaching down into the great and fertile valley of Jezreel, to which it gave its name. (2.) A town in Judah ( Joshua 15:56 ), to the south-east of Hebron. Ahinoam, one of David's wives, probably belonged to this place ( 1 Samuel 27:3 ). (3.) A symbolical name given by Hosea to his oldest son ( Hosea 1:4 ), in token of a great slaughter predicted by him, like that which had formerly taken place in the plain of Esdraelon (Comp.  Hosea 1:4 ,  5).  Jezreel, Blood of The murder perpetrated here by Ahab and Jehu ( Hosea 1:4 ; Comp.  1 Kings 18:4 ;  2 Kings 9:6 -10).  Jezreel, Day of The time predicted for the execution of vengeance for the deeds of blood committed there ( Hosea 1:5 ).  Jezreel, Ditch of ( 1 Kings 21:23 ; Comp. 13), the fortification surrounding the city, outside of which Naboth was executed.  Jezreel, Fountain of Where Saul encamped before the battle of Gilboa ( 1 Samuel 29:1 ). In the valley under Zerin there are two considerable springs, one of which, perhaps that here referred to, "flows from under a sort of cavern in the wall of conglomerate rock which here forms the base of Gilboa. The water is excellent; and issuing from crevices in the rocks, it spreads out at once into a fine limpid pool forty or fifty feet in diameter, full of fish" (Robinson). This may be identical with the "well of Harod" ( Judges 7:1 ; Comp.  2 Samuel 23:25 ), probably the `Ain Jalud, i.e., the "spring of Goliath."  Jezreel, Portion of The field adjoining the city ( 2 Kings 9:10 ,  21,  36,  37). Here Naboth was stoned to death ( 1 Kings 21:13 ).  Jezreel, Tower of One of the turrets which guarded the entrance to the city ( 2 Kings 9:17 ).  Jezreel, Valley of Lying on the northern side of the city, between the ridges of Gilboa and Moreh, an offshoot of Esdraelon, running east to the Jordan ( Joshua 17:16 ;  Judges 6:33 ;  Hosea 1:5 ). It was the scene of the signal victory gained by the Israelites under Gideon over the Midianites, the Amalekites, and the "children of the east" ( Judges 6:3 ). Two centuries after this the Israelites were here defeated by the Philistines, and Saul and Jonathan, with the flower of the army of Israel, fell ( 1 Samuel 31:1 -6). This name was in after ages extended to the whole of the plain of Esdraelon (q.v.). It was only this plain of Jezreel and that north of Lake Huleh that were then accessible to the chariots of the Canaanites (Comp.  2 Kings 9:21 ;  10:15 ). 
MAKHELOTH|Assemblies, a station of the Israelites in the desert ( Numbers 33:25 ,  26). 
PADANARAM|The plain of Aram, or the plain of the highlands, ( Genesis 25:20 ;  28:2 ,  5-7;  31:18 ,  etc.), commonly regarded as the district of Mesopotamia (q.v.) lying around Haran. 
BOSCATH|     bos'-kath.  See  BOZKATH .
FATHERS|   APOSTOLIC   An appellation usually given to the writers of the 1st century who employed their pens in the cause of Christianity. See  SUB-APOSTOLIC LITERATURE .  APOSTOLIC FATHERS, EPISTLES OF  See  SUB-APOSTOLIC LITERATURE .
ZOAN|(Old Egypt. Sant= "stronghold, " the modern San). A city on the Tanitic branch of the Nile, called by the Greeks Tanis. It was built seven years after Hebron in Palestine ( Numbers 13:22 ). This great and important city was the capital of the Hyksos, or Shepherd kings, who ruled Egypt for more than 500 years. It was the frontier town of Goshen. Here Pharaoh was holding his court at the time of his various interviews with Moses and Aaron. "No trace of Zoan exists; Tanis was built over it, and city after city has been built over the ruins of that" (Harper,  Bible and Modern Discovery). Extensive mounds of ruins, the wreck of the ancient city, now Mark its site ( Isaiah 19:11 ,  13;  30:4 ;  Ezek. 30:14 ). "The whole constitutes one of the grandest and oldest ruins in the world." This city was also called "the Field of Zoan" ( Psalm 78:12 ,  43) and "the Town of Rameses" (q.v.), because the oppressor rebuilt and embellished it, probably by the forced labour of the Hebrews, and made it his northern capital. 
HAGGI|     hag'-i (chaggi, "festive"): The second son of Gad ( Genesis 46:16   Numbers 26:15 ). The latter refers to his descendants as Haggites, of whom nothing else is known.
KEDEMAH|Eastward, the last-named of the sons of Ishmael ( Genesis 25:15 ). 
SHEVA|Hebrews Shebher.  (1.) The son of Caleb ( 1 Chronicles 2:49 ). (2.) Hebrews Sheva', one of David's scribes ( 2 Samuel 20:25 ). 
SEPHARVITES|     se'-far-vits, se-far'-vits> (cepharwim): In 2 Kings 17:31, the inhabitants of SEPHARVAIM (which see), planted by the king of Assyria in Samaria. They continued there to burn their children to their native gods.
HURAI|Linen-worker, one of David's heroes, a native of the valley of Mount Gaash ( 1 Chronicles 11:32 ). 
JEEZERITES|     je-e'-zer-its.  See  ABIEZER .
TAHAN|   ; TAHANITES  ta'-han, ta'-han-its (tachan, tachani): The name of two Ephraimites who lived toward the end of the exodus of the Israelites (circa 1415 B.C.).  (1) The head of one of the families of the tribe of Ephraim ( Numbers 26:35 ).  (2) The son of Telah and father of Ladan, also of the tribe of Ephraim ( 1 Chronicles 7:25 f ).
SELFWILL|   SELF-WILL  self-wil' (ratson; authades): Found once in the Old Testament ( Genesis 49:6 , "In their self-will they hocked an ox") in the death song of Jacob (see HOCK). The idea is found twice in the New Testament in the sense of "pleasing oneself": "not self-willed, not soon angry" ( Titus 1:7 ); and "daring, self-willed, they tremble not to rail at dignities" ( 2 Peter 2:10 ). In all these texts it stands for a false pride, for obstinacy, for "a pertinacious adherence to one's will or wish, especially in opposition to the dictates of wisdom or propriety or the wishes of others."elfare of his neighbor, just as Christ pleased not Himself ( Romans 15:3 ); also to leaders ( 1 Corinthians 16:16 ), and to earthly rulers ( Romans 13:1 ).  Henry E. Dosker
ELTEKEH|God is its fear, a city in the tribe of Dan. It was a city of refuge and a Levitical city ( Joshua 21:23 ). It has been identified with Beit-Likia, north-east of latrum. 
CROOKBACKED|   CROOK-BACKED  krook'-bakt (gibben; kurtos): A disqualification for the priesthood ( Leviticus 21:20 ); was probably an angular curvature of the spine, usually the result of tubercular caries of the vertebrae. It was by no means uncommon in ancient Egypt, where I have found a considerable number of spines affected with this disease. Some Talmudic authorities explain it as meaning "very dark colored," but this is unlikely.  The woman bound by the spirit of infirmity and unable to lift herself ( Luke 13:11-17 ) was affected with senile kyphosis, a chronic bone disease often found among aged men (and more frequently women) whose lives have been spent in agricultural labor. In these the vertebrae become altered in shape so that it is impossible to straighten the back. Some rabbinical authorities believed all deformities to be due to Satan, and to this our Lord seems to have alluded in his rebuke to those who caviled at His healing on the Sabbath. I have found this condition in some Egyptian skeletons, and have seen it in a Palestinian fellah. A skeleton affected with a similar curvature was found buried under the threshold of a house at Gezer, where she had evidently been offered as a foundation sacrifice.  Alex. Macalister
ZABBAI|Wanderer; pure.  (1.)  Ezra 10:28 . (2.) The father of Baruch, who "earnestly repaired" part of the wall of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 3:20 ; marg.,  "Zaccai"). 
REHUM|Merciful.  (1.) One of "the children of the province" who returned from the Captivity ( Ezra 2:2 ); the same as "Nehum" ( Nehemiah 7:7 ). (2.) The "chancellor" of Artaxerxes, who sought to stir him up against the Jews ( Ezra 4:8 -24) and prevent the rebuilding of the walls and the temple of Jerusalem. (3.) A Levite ( Nehemiah 3:17 ). (4.)  Nehemiah 10:25 . (5.) A priest ( Nehemiah 12:3 ). 
DECREES|Decrees of God "The decrees of God are his eternal, unchangeable, holy, wise, and sovereign purpose, comprehending at once all things that ever were or will be in their causes, conditions, successions, and relations, and determining their certain futurition. The several contents of this one eternal purpose are, because of the limitation of our faculties, necessarily conceived of by us in partial aspects, and in logical relations, and are therefore styled Decrees." The decree being the act of an infinite, absolute, eternal, unchangeable, and sovereign Person, comprehending a plan including all his works of all kinds, great and small, from the beginning of creation to an unending eternity; ends as well as means, causes as well as effects, conditions and instrumentalities as well as the events which depend upon them, must be incomprehensible by the finite intellect of man. The decrees are eternal ( Acts 15:18 ;  Ephesians 1:4 ;  2 Thessalonians 2:13 ), unchangeable ( Psalm 33:11 ;  Isaiah 46:9 ), and comprehend all things that come to pass ( Ephesians 1:11 ;  Matthew 10:29 ,  30;  Ephesians 2:10 ;  Acts 2:23 ;  4:27 ,  28;  Psalm 17:13 ,  14). The decrees of God are (1) efficacious, as they respect those events he has determined to bring about by his own immediate agency; or (2) permissive, as they respect those events he has determined that free agents shall be permitted by him to effect. This doctrine ought to produce in our minds "humility, in view of the infinite greatness and sovereignty of God, and of the dependence of man; confidence and implicit reliance upon wisdom, rightenousness, goodness, and immutability of God's purpose." 
MERARITES|The descendants of Merari ( Numbers 26:57 ). They with the Gershonites and the Kohathites had charge of the tabernacle, which they had to carry from place to place ( Numbers 3:20 ,  33-37;  4:29 -33). In the distribution of the oxen and waggons offered by the princes ( Numbers 7 ), Moses gave twice as many to the Merarites (four waggons and eight oxen) as he gave to the Gershonites, because the latter had to carry only the lighter furniture of the tabernacle, such as the curtains, hangings, etc., while the former had to carry the heavier portion, as the boards, bars, sockets, pillars, etc., and consequently needed a greater supply of oxen and waggons. This is a coincidence illustrative of the truth of the narrative. Their place in marching and in the camp was on the north of the tabernacle. The Merarites afterwards took part with the other Levitical families in the various functions of their office ( 1 Chronicles 23:6 ,  21-23;  2 Chronicles 29:12 ,  13). Twelve cities with their suburbs were assigned to them ( Joshua 21:7 ,  34-40). 
ERITES|   ERI;   e'-ri, e'-rits (`eri, "watcher"):  The fifth of the seven sons of Gad ( Genesis 46:16   Numbers 26:16 ).  Patronymic, Erites (same place), a clan of Gad.
DODAVAHU|     do-dav'-a-hu (dodhawahu, "loved of God"; the King James Version Dodavah): Father of Eliezer of Mareshah, a prophet in the days of Jehoshaphat ( 2 Chronicles 20:37 ).
TATNAI|Gift, a Persian governor (Hebrews pehah,  i.e.,  "satrap;" modern "pasha") "on this side the river", i.e., of the whole tract on the west of the Euphrates. This Hebrew title pehah is given to governors of provinces generally. It is given to Nehemiah ( 5:14 ) and to Zerubbabel ( Haggai 1:1 ). It is sometimes translated "captain" ( 1 Kings 20:24 ;  Dan. 3:2 ,  3), sometimes also "deputy" ( Esther 8:9 ;  9:3 ). With others, Tatnai opposed the rebuilding of the temple ( Ezra 5:6 ); but at the command of Darius, he assisted the Jews ( 6:1 -13). 
GEDOR|A wall.  (1.) A city in the mountains or hill country of Judah ( Joshua 15:58 ), identified with Jedar, between Jerusalem and Hebron. (2.)  1 Chronicles 4:39 , the Gederah of  Joshua 15:36 , or the well-known Gerar, as the LXX. read, where the patriarchs of old had sojourned and fed their flocks ( Genesis 20:1 ,  14,  15;  26:1 ,  6,  14). (3.) A town apparently in Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 12:7 ), the same probably as Geder ( Joshua 12:13 ). 
KENIZZITE| (1.) The name of a tribe referred to in the covenant God made with Abraham ( Genesis 15:19 ). They are not mentioned among the original inhabitants of Canaan ( Exodus 3:8 ;  Joshua 3:10 ), and probably they inhabited some part of Arabia, in the confines of Syria. (2.) A designation given to Caleb (R.V.,   Numbers 32:12 ; A.V.,  Kenezite). 
CABINS|Only in  Jeremiah 37:16  (R.V.,  "cells"), arched vaults or recesses off a passage or room; cells for the closer confinement of prisoners. 
PTOLEMAIS|A maritime city of Galilee ( Acts 21:7 ). It was originally called "Accho" (q.v.), and received the name Ptolemais from Ptolemy Soter when he was in possession of Coele-Syria. 
PHILADELPHIA|Brotherly love, a city of Lydia in Asia Minor, about 25 miles south-east of Sardis. It was the seat of one of the "seven churches" ( Revelation 3:7 -12). It came into the possession of the Turks in A.D. 1392. It has several times been nearly destroyed by earthquakes. It is still a town of considerable size, called Allahshehr, "the city of God." 
ELISHEBA|God is her oath, the daughter of Amminadab and the wife of Aaron ( Exodus 6:23 ). 
ZEBOIM|Gazelles or roes.  (1.) One of the "five cities of the plain" of Sodom, generally coupled with Admah ( Genesis 10:19 ;  14:2 ;  Deuteronomy 29:23 ;  Hosea 11:8 ). It had a king of its own (Shemeber), and was therefore a place of some importance. It was destroyed along with the other cities of the plain. (2.) A valley or rugged glen somewhere near Gibeah in Benjamin ( 1 Samuel 13:18 ). It was probably the ravine now bearing the name Wady Shakh-ed-Dub'a, or "ravine of the hyena," north of Jericho. (3.) A place mentioned only in  Nehemiah 11:34 , inhabited by the Benjamites after the Captivity. 
HARHUR|Fever, one of the Nethinim ( Ezra 2:51 ). 
LEVITES|   PRIESTS AND   (kohen, "priest"; nothing is definitely known as to the origin of the word; Lewi, "Levite," on which see LEVI):  I. DIFFERENT VIEWS OF THE HISTORY  1. The Old View  2. The Graf-Wellhausen View  3. Mediating Views  4. An Alternative View  II. THE DATA OF THE PRIESTLY CODE (P) IN THE PENTATEUCH  1. The Levites  2. Aaron and His Sons  III. THE OTHER PORTIONS OF THE PENTATEUCH  IV. FROM MOSES TO MALACHI  1. The Sources Other than Ezekiel  (1) The Custody of the Ark  (2) On Its Return from the Philistines  (3) In Abinadab's House  2. Ezekiel  V. EZRA, NEHEMIAH, CHRONICLES  1. Estimates of the Chronicler  2. His Data  VI. LEGAL PROVISIONS  LITERATURE  In some Minaean inscriptions found at El-`Ola, dating back about 1200-800 B.C. (Hommel in Hilprecht, Explorations in Bible Lands, 719), certain "priests and priestesses of the god Wadd are designated by the term lawi, feminine lawi`at" (op. cit., 749). It is not known whether this is due to Israelite influence.  I. Different Views of the History.  1. The Old View:  There are great divergences of opinion among modern writers as to the true course of history and the dating of the different documents. It will therefore be best to sketch these views in rough outline, and then give the evidence of the various authorities, together with the reasons that in each case arise naturally from the consideration of that evidence.  The old belief was that the whole of the Pentateuchal laws were the work of Moses, that the account of the subsequent history given in the Books of Chronicles was correct, that Ezekiel's vision, if taken literally, could not be reconciled with the other known facts and was inexplicable, and that in the case of all other discrepancies harmonistic explanations should be adopted.  2. The Graf-Wellhausen View:  The modern critical school have traversed every one of these doctrines. The Chronicler is declared to be in constant and irreconcilable conflict with the older authorities, harmonistic explanations are uniformly rejected, the Pentateuch is denied to Moses and split up into a variety of sources of different ages, and Ezekiel gains a place of honor as representing a stage in a continuous and normal development. The subject is thus inextricably linked with the Pentateuchal problem, and reference must be made to the article PENTATEUCH for an explanation of the supposed documents and a consideration of the analysis with its nomenclature. On the other hand the present article and the article SANCTUARY (which see) explain and discuss the most widely held theory of the historical development into which the history of the supposed Pentateuchal sources has been fitted.  The dominant theory is that of Wellhausen. According to this, "Levite" was originally a term denoting professional skill, and the early Levites were not members of the tribe of Levi, but professional priests. Anybody could sacrifice. "For a simple altar no priest was required, but only for a house which contained a sacred image; this demanded watching and attendance" (Wellhausen, Prolegomena, 130). The whole Levitical Law was unknown and the distinction between priests and Levites unheard of. There were a few great sanctuaries and one influential priesthood, that of Shiloh (afterward at Nob). With the monarchy the priesthood became more important. The royal priests at Jerusalem grew in consequence and influence until they overshadowed all the others. Deuteronomy recognized the equal priestly right of all Levites, and Josiah's reformation placed the sons of Zadok, who were the priests of Jerusalem and not descendants of Aaron, in a position of decisive superiority. Then Ezekiel drew a new and previously unknown distinction between "the priests the Levites, the sons of Zadok" who are "keepers of the charge of the altar," and the other Levites who were made "keepers of the charge of the house" as a punishment for having ministered in the high places. The Priestly Code takes up this distinction and represents it as being of Mosaic origin, making of the sons of Zadok "sons of Aaron." "In this way arose as an illegal consequence of Josiah's reformation, the distinction between priests and Levites. With Ezekiel this distinction is still an innovation requiring justification and sanction; with the Priestly Code it is a `statute forever,' although even yet not absolutely undisputed, as appears from the priestly version of the story of Korah's company. For all Judaism subsequent to Ezra, and so for Christian tradition, the Priestly Code in this matter also has been authoritative. Instead of the Deuteronomic formula `the priests the Levites,' we henceforward have `the priests and the Levites,' particularly in Chronicles" (op. cit., 147). From that time onward the priests and Levites are two sharply distinguished classes. It is an essential part of this theory that the Chronicler meant his work to be taken as literal history, correctly representing the true meaning of the completed law.  See  CRITICISM .  3. Mediating Views:  There have been various attempts to construct less thoroughgoing theories on the same data. As a rule, these views accept in some form the documentary theory of the Pentateuch and seek to modify the Wellhausen theory in two directions, either by attributing earlier dates to one or more of the Pentateuchal documents-especially to the Priestly Code-or else by assigning more weight to some of the statements of Chronicles (interpreted literally). Sometimes both these tendencies are combined. None of these views has met with any great measure of success in the attempt to make headway against the dominant Wellhausen theory, and it will be seen later that all alike make shipwreck on certain portions of the evidence.  4. An Alternative View:  The independent investigations on which the present article is based have led the writer to a view that diverges in important particulars from any of these, and it is necessary to state it briefly before proceeding to the evidence. In one respect it differs from all the rival schemes, not merely in result, but also in method, for it takes account of versional evidence as to the state of the texts. Subject to this it accepts the Mosaic authenticity of all the Pentateuchal legislation and the clear and consentient testimony of the Law and the Prophets (i.e. of the two earlier and more authoritative portions of the Hebrew Canon), while regarding Chronicles as representing a later interpretation, not merely of the history, but also of the legal provisions. In outline the story of the priesthood is then as follows: Moses consecrated Aaron and his sons as the priests of the desert tabernacle. He purified the rest of the tribe of Levi as a body of sacred porters for the period of wanderings, but in the legislation of Numbers he made no provision whatever for their performing any duties after the sanctuary obtained a permanent location. At the same time he gave a body of priestly teaching requiring for its administration in settled conditions a numerous and scattered body of priests, such as the house of Aaron alone could not have provided immediately after the entry into Canaan. To meet this, Deuteronomy-the last legislative work of Moses-contains provisions enlarging the rights and duties of the Levites and conferring on them a priestly position. The earlier distinction was thus largely obliterated, though the high-priestly dignity remained in the house of Aaron till the time of Solomon, when it was transferred from the house of Eli to that of Zadok, who, according to Ezekiel's testimony, was a Levite (but see below, IV, 1). So matters remained till the exile, when Ezekiel put forward a scheme which together with many ideal elements proposed reforms to insure the better application of the Mosaic principle of the distinction between holy and profane to greatly altered circumstances. Taking his inspiration from the wilderness legislation, he instituted a fresh division in the tribe of Levi, giving to the sons of Zadok a position similar to that once held by the sons of Aaron, and degrading all other Levites from the priesthood conferred on them by Deuteronomy to a lower rank. The duties now assigned to this class of "keepers of the charge of the house" were never even contemplated by Moses, but Ezekiel applies to them the old phrases of the Pentateuch which he invests with a new significance. As a result of his influence, the distinction between priests and Levites makes its appearance in post-exilic times, though it had been unknown to all the writers of the second division of the Hebrew Canon. At the same time a meaning was read into the provisions of the Law which their original author could not have contemplated, and it was this interpretation which is presented (at any rate to some extent) in Chronicles, and has given us the current tradition. Many of the Chronicler's statements are, however, not meant to be taken literally, and could not have been so taken by his original public.  II. The Data of the Priestly Code (P) in the Pentateuch.  1. The Levites:  To arrive at an objective conclusion it is necessary, in the first instance, to examine the facts without such bias as any view put forward by any other author, ancient or modern, sacred or profane, might impart. Every legislator is entitled to be judged on his own language, and where he has, so to speak, made his own dictionary, we are compelled to read his meaning into the terms used. The very first of the material references to the Levites drives this truth home. "But appoint thou the Levites over the tabernacle of the testimony, and over all the furniture thereof" ( Numbers 1:50 ). It is necessary to consider whether such expressions are to be read in a wide or a narrow sense. We learn from  Numbers 18:3  that death would be the result of a Levite's touching any of these vessels, and it therefore appears that these words are meant to be construed narrowly. "They shall bear the tabernacle, and all the furniture thereof; and they shall minister unto it," are the next words (1:50); but yet we read later of the Kohathites who were to bear it that "they shall not touch the sanctuary, lest they die" (4:15). This shows that the service in question is strictly limited to a service of porterage after the articles have been wrapped up by Aaron and his sons. By no possibility could it include such a task as cleaning the vessels. It is then further directed that the Levites are to take down and set up the dwelling and camp round about it. All these are desert services and desert services only. Then we read that "the Levites shall keep the charge of the tabernacle (dwelling) of the testimony. This concludes the first material passage ( Numbers 1:50-53 ). The other passages of Numbers only amplify these directions; they never change them. But some phrases are used which must be more particularly considered.  (1) Technical Phrases.  We hear that the Levites are "to serve the service of the tent of meeting," and this looks as if it might refer to some general duties, but the context and the kindred passages always forbid this interpretation.  Numbers 7:5  ff; is an admirable instance. Six wagons are there assigned to the Levites for this service, two to the Gershonites and four to the Merarites. "But unto the sons of Kohath he gave none, because the service of the sanctuary belonged unto them; they bare it upon their shoulders." Here service is transport and nothing else. Again we read of the charge of the Levites in the tent of meeting, e.g. 4:25 f. If we look to see what this was, we find that it consisted of transporting portions of the tent that had been packed up. The "in" of English Versions of the Bible does not represent the meaning of the Hebrew fairly; for the context makes it clear that the legislator means "in respect to." "But they shall not go in to see the sanctuary even for a moment, lest they die" (4:20). In English idiom we cannot speak of the transport of portions of a dismantled tent as service in that tent. One other expression requires notice, the phrase "keep the charge" which is distinguished in 8:26 from "doing service." The exact meaning cannot be determined. It appears to denote something kindred to service, but of a less exacting nature, perhaps the camping round the tent and the guardianship of the articles on the march. We shall see hereafter by comparison with other books that in P it does not bear the same meaning as elsewhere.  (2) Other Legal Provisions.  The Levites were to act under the orders of Aaron and his sons, who were to assign to each man his individual functions ( Numbers 3 ;  Numbers 4 , etc.). They were to undergo a special rite of purification ( Numbers 8 ), but not of consecration. They were taken in place of the firstborn ( Numbers 3 ). The age for beginning service is given in  Numbers 4  as 30 years, but in  Numbers 8:24  as 25 years, if the text is sound. The age for ceasing to serve was 50. In many passages the versions suggest that a good many phrases are textually doubtful, and it is probable that when a critical text of the Pentateuch is formed on scientific principles, a good many superfluous expressions will be found not to be original; but there is no reason to suppose that any real difference in the meaning of the passages would be revealed by such a text.  The story of Korah is easily misunderstood. It appears from  Numbers 16:3  that his real object was to put himself on an equality with Moses and Aaron, and this is the "priesthood" referred to in 16:10.  Numbers 18  reinforces the earlier passages. It is noteworthy as showing that in the conception of the legislator the Levites were not to come near the vessels or the altar (18:3). The penalty is death for both Levites and priests.  (3) Contrast with Ezekiel and Chronicles.  The impression as to the meaning of P which may be gathered from an examination of its statements is powerfully reinforced when they are tested by reference to Ezekiel and Chronicles,  Ezekiel 44:9-14  seems to demand of the Levites some service as gatekeepers, the slaying of burnt offering and sacrifice for the people and a keeping of "the charge of the house, for all the service thereof," which in the light of 44:7 appears to mean in his terminology, not a service of transport, but an entry into the house and the performance of certain duties there. The Priestly Code (P), on the contrary, knows nothing of gatekeepers, regards the slaying of the burnt offering and sacrifice as the duty of the individual sacrificant ( Leviticus 1 ;  Leviticus 3 ), and-if, as Wellhausen thinks, it refers to the temple-it would have visited with death a Levite who was present in the places in which Ezekiel requires him to minister. Similarly with the Chronicler. For instance, he the Levites being `for the service of the.... in the courts and over the chambers, and over the cleansing of every holy thing' ( 1 Chronicles 23:28 ), but P knows nothing of any chambers, would not have allowed the Levites to touch (much less clean) many of the holy things, and regarded service simply as porterage. In  1 Chronicles 23:31  the Levites are to offer burnt offerings on certain occasions; in P their approach to the altar would have meant death both to themselves and the priests ( Numbers 18:3 ). Other instances will be found in PS, 238 f.  (4) What the Foregoing Proves.  In view of these facts it is impossible to hold that the Levites in P represent a projection of the Levites of the second temple or any post-Mosaic age into the desert period. To P they are a body of sacred porters. The temple of course could not be carried about, and it cannot be held that in this respect the legislation mirrors later circumstances. "Secondly, the net result of such a scheme would be to create a body of Levites for use during the period of wanderings and never thereafter. As soon as the desert age was over the whole tribe would find their occupation gone. How can we conceive that any legislator deliberately sat down and invented such a scheme centuries after the epoch to which it relates, well knowing that in so far as his scheme purported to be a narrative of events it was fictitious from beginning to end, and in so far as it might be regarded as a legislation applicable to his own or any future day, there was not a line in it that could conceivably be put into practice? If any theorist can be conceived as acting in this way, how are we to suppose that his work would meet with acceptance?.... Thirdly, P neither embodies the views of Ezekiel nor finds an accurate reflection in Chronicles. The facts are such as to enable us to say definitely that P is not in line with them. It is impossible to assume that he appointed the death penalty for certain acts if performed by Levites because he really wished the Levites to perform those acts" (PS, 241).  2. Aaron and His Sons:  Priests and Levites also speaks of Aaron the priest and the sons of Aaron the priest. It is doubtful whether the expression "the sons of Aaron the priests," which occurs frequently in the Massoretic Text, is ever original; the Massoretic expression is nowhere supported by all the authorities. "The phrase `Aaron the high priest' is entirely unknown to Priests and Levites. Where the high priest's name is given the only qualifying apposition possible in his usage is `the priest.' " Aaron and his sons, unlike the Levites, were consecrated, not merely purified.  At this point two features only of the legislation need be noticed: the inadequacy of the staff to post-conquest conditions and the signs of date. For example, the leprosy laws ( Leviticus 13 f ) postulate the presence of priests to inspect and isolate the patient. "Remembering that on the critical theory P assumes the capital at Jerusalem as self-evident, we must ask how such provisions were to work after the conquest. During the desert period nothing could have been simpler, but what was to happen when the Israelites dwelt all over Canaan from Beersheba to Dan?" (PS, 246). The difficulty is immensely increased if we postulate an exilic or post-exilic date, when the Jewish center of gravity was in Babylonia and there were large colonies in Egypt and elsewhere. And "What are we to say when we read of leprous garments ( Leviticus 13:47 )? Was a man to make the pilgrimage from Babylonia to Jerusalem to consult a priest about a doubtful garment? And what about the leper's offerings in  Leviticus 14  ? Could they conceivably have been meant to apply to such circumstances?" (PS, 247). The case is no better with the law of leprous houses, which is expressed to apply to the post-conquest period ( Leviticus 4:33-5:3 ). The notification to the priest and his inspections require a priesthood scattered all over the country, i.e. a body far more numerous than the house of Aaron at the date of the conquest. Such instances could easily be multiplied from the legislation; one more only will be cited on account of its importance to the history of the priesthood. According to Leviticus, the individual sacrificant is to kill the victims and flay the burnt offerings. How could such procedure be applied to such sacrifices as those of Solomon ( 1 Kings 8:63 )? With the growth of luxury the sacrifices would necessarily become too large for such a ritual, and the wealthy would grow in refinement and object to performing such tasks personally. This suggests the reason for later abuses and for the modifications of Ezekiel and the representations of the Chronicler.  Result of the Evidence.  Thus, the evidence of P is unfavorable alike to the Wellhausen and the mediating views. The indications of date are consistently Mosaic, and it seems impossible to fit the laws into the framework of any other age without reading them in a sense that the legislator can be shown not to have contemplated. On the other hand P is a torso. It provides a large body of Levites who would have nothing to do after the conquest, and a corpus of legislation that could not have been administered in settled conditions by the house of Aaron alone.  III. The Other Portions of the Pentateuch.  In  Exodus 19:22, 24  we read of priests, but a note has come down to us that in the first of those verses Aquila had "elders," not "priests," and this appears to be the correct reading in both places, as is shown by the prominence of the elders in the early part of the chapter. In Hebrew the words differ by only two letters. It is said by Wellhausen that in  Exodus 33:7-11  (E) Joshua has charge of the ark. This rests on a mistranslation of  Exodus 33:7 , which should be rendered (correcting English Versions of the Bible), `And Moses used to take a (or the) tent and pitch it for himself without the camp.' It is inconceivable that Moses should have taken the tent of the ark and removed it to a distance from the camp for his private use, leaving the ark bared and unguarded. Moreover, if he had done so, Joshua could not have been in charge of the ark, seeing that he was in this tent while the ark (ex hypothesi) remained in the camp. Nor had the ark yet been constructed. Nor was Joshua in fact a priest or the guardian of the ark in E:  (1) in the Book of Joshua E knows of priests who carry the ark and are quite distinct from Joshua (3;);  (2) in  Deuteronomy 31:14  (E) Joshua is not resident in the tent of meeting;  (3) in E, Aaron and Eleazar are priests ( Deuteronomy 10:6 ), and the Levitical priesthood is the only one recognized ( Deuteronomy 33:10 );  (4) there is no hint anywhere of Joshua's discharging any priestly duty whatsoever.  The whole case rests on his presence in the tent in  Exodus 33:7-11 , and, as shown in the article PENTATEUCH (which see), this passage should stand after  Exodus 13:22 .  Then it is said that in  Exodus 4:14   Judges 17:7 , "Levite" denotes profession, not ancestry. In the latter passage the youth whom Micah made a priest was of Levitical descent, being the grandson of Moses ( Judges 17:13 ), and the case rests on the phrase, "of the family of Judah." Neither of the Septuagintal translations had this text (Field, Hexapla, at the place), which therefore cannot be supported, since it cannot be suggested that Moses belonged to the tribe of Judah. As to  Exodus 4:14 , the phrase "Aaron thy brother the Levite" is merely an adaptation of the more usual, "Aaron, son of Amram, the Levite," rendered necessary by the fact that his brother Moses is the person addressed. The Wellhausen theory here is shown to be untenable in PS, 250 and RE3, XI, 418.    Exodus 32:26-29  foreshadows the sacred character of Levi, and  Deuteronomy 10:6  (E) knows the hereditary Aaronic priesthood. In D the most important passage is  Deuteronomy 18:6-8 . In 18:7 three Septuagintal manuscripts omit the words "the Levites," and if this be a gloss, the whole historic sense of the passage is changed. It now contains an enactment that any Levite coming to the religious capital may minister there "as all his brethren do, who stand there," etc., i.e. like the descendants of Aaron. "The Levites" will then be the explanation of a glossator who was imbued with the latest post-exilic ideas, and thought that "his brethren" must mean those of his fellow-Levites who were not descended from Aaron. The passage is supplemented by 21:5, giving to the Levites judicial rights, and 24:8 assigning to them the duty of teaching the leprosy regulations. Together with 33:10 (E), `they shall teach thy judgments to Jacob and thy law to Israel: they shall put incense in thy nostrils and whole burnt-offering on thine altar,' these passages complete the provisions of P in giving to the Levites an occupation in place of their transport duties, and providing the necessary staff for administering the legislation when the Israelites were no longer massed together in a single camp, but scattered over the country. We shall see in the next section that this view of the meaning of the Law was taken by every writer of the second part of the Canon who touches on the subject. Everywhere we are confronted with the legitimacy of a Levitical priesthood; nowhere is there any mention of an exclusive Aaronic right. Smaller points which cannot be discussed here are examined in PS. It only remains to notice that these provisions fully explain the frequent Deuteronomic locution, "the priests the Levites." One other remark must be made. Though it is not expressly stated, we may assume that consecration would be necessary in the case of any Levite acting on the provisions of  Deuteronomy 18:6-8 , and was not mentioned because in Hebrew antiquity it went without saying that every priest must be consecrated (compare  Judges 17 ).  IV. From Moses to Malachi.  1. The Sources Other than Ezekiel:  Joshua adds but little to our information. In 18:7 the priesthood is called the inheritance of the Levites, and it is singular that the Wellhausen critics attribute this to a priestly redactor, though such a writer should ex hypothesi have been jealous to withhold the priesthood from the Levites. It is very interesting to find that in  Joshua 3 ;  Joshua 4 , all the different critical documents speak in exactly the same terms of "the priests that bare the ark." The priestly writer ought, on the Wellhausen theory, to have said "the Levites." The expression "the priests the Levites" is found alternating with the expression "the priests." All this points to the construction put upon the provisions of the Law in the preceding section, and finds fresh confirmation in Judges, where we see Micah rejoicing at having a Levite as a priest ( Judges 17:13 ), thus showing that the sacred character of the tribe was recognized in the earliest post-Mosaic times. The lay sacrifices in this and the following books are explained under SANCTUARY; SACRIFICE (which see).  The period of the early kings shows us kings blessing the people (e.g.  2 Samuel 6:18 ). It is claimed that this is the priestly blessing, but without evidence, and there seems no more reason to see special priestly rights here than in David's blessing his household ( 2 Samuel 6:20 ), or the frequent blessings of the Bible (e.g. Genesis passim, especially "in thee will Israel bless,"  Genesis 48:20 ), while in  1 Kings 8:55  ff; we actually have the words of the blessing delivered on one of those occasions by Solomon, and it is quite unlike the blessing of the priests (Numbers 6:22;).  Textual criticism disposes of the supposed priesthood of certain non-Levitical persons. In  2 Samuel 8:18  the Massoretic Text makes David's sons "priests," but this reading was unknown to the Septuagint, Symmachus, and Theodotion (Field, ad. loc.). The Septuagint has "aularches," i.e. chamberlains. That this represents a different Hebrew word is proved by the Septuagintal list of 3 Ki 2:46 (not extant in Hebrew), where we read that Benaiah, son of Jehoiada, was "over the aularchy and over the brick-making." It cannot be suggested that this represents an original Hebrew "over the priesthood and over the brick-making," and accordingly we must concede the existence of some secular court office which was rendered by this Greek phrase. Hitzig and Cheyne conjecture that tsokhenim should be read for kohanim. This word gives the sense required (see  Isaiah 22:15 ) Revised Version margin "steward"). In  2 Samuel 20:26  we read that Ira, ha-ya'iri ("the Jairite"), was a priest, but the Syriac version supported by Lucian and 23:38 reads ha-yattiri ("the Jattirite"). Jattir was a priestly city. In  1 Kings 4:5  Nathan's son is described as `priest friend of the king,' but the Septuagint reads only "friend of the king" (compare especially  1 Chronicles 27:33  ff;  2 Samuel 15:32 ), and at another period Nathan's son held the kindred secular office of king's counselor (the Septuagint 3 Ki 2:46, a fact that is certainly unfavorable to the view that he ever held priestly office). There can therefore be no doubt that the word "priest," kohen has arisen through dittography of the preceding word nathan, Nathan.  Various dealings with the ark and the age of Samuel require notice. As a boy, Samuel himself is given into the service of Eli. It has been argued that he really officiated as a priest, though probably (if the Chronicler's data is rejected) not of the Levitical descent. The answer is to be found in his age. Weaning sometimes took place at as late an age as three, and accordingly, the boy may have been as much as four years old when he was taken to Shiloh ( 1 Samuel 1:24 ). His mother used to bring him a little cloak ( 1 Samuel 2:19 ) every year, and this notice also shows his extreme youth. In view of this, it cannot be seriously contended that he performed any priestly service. He must have been something like a page, and he performed some duties of a porter, opening the door-valves of the temple at Shiloh ( 1 Samuel 3:15 ).  (1) The Custody of the Ark  When the ark was captured by the Philistines, it was in the charge of priests. When David brought it to Jerusalem, it was again placed in priestly custody, but there is an interregnum of some 20 years ( 1 Samuel 7:2 ).  Read Complete Article...    COURSE OF PRIESTS AND LEVITES  See  PRIESTS AND LEVITES .  LEVITES  le'-vits.  See  PRIESTS AND LEVITES .
HARIM|Flat-nosed.  (1.) The head of the second course of priests ( 1 Chronicles 24:8 ).  (2.)  Ezra 2:32 , 39;  Nehemiah 7:35 , 42.  (3.)  Nehemiah 3:11 .  (4.) 12:3.  (5.) 10:5 
HEZRAI|   HEZRO;   hez'-ro, hez'-ra-i, hez'-ri (chezro,  2 Samuel 23:35   1 Chronicles 11:37 , but the Qere of  2 Samuel 23:35  is chezray. The ancient versions almost unanimously support the form Hezrai): A Carmelite, i.e. an inhabitant of Carmel. See  CARMELITE . One of David's thirty "mighty men."
JEBERECHIAH|     je-ber-e-ki'-a (yebherekhyahu, "Yah blesses"): The father of the Zechariah whom Isaiah (8:2) took as a witness of his prophecy against Syria and Ephraim (circa 734 B.C.).
THEUDAS|Thanksgiving, referred to by Gamaliel in his speech before the council at Jerusalem ( Acts 5:36 ). He headed an insurrection against the Roman authority. Beyond this nothing is known of him. 
LAADAN|     la,'-a-dan.  See  LADAN .
POWDERS|     pou'-derz ('abheqath rokhel): The "powders of the merchant" in  Songs 3:6  were probably perfumes, as they are associated with myrrh and frankincense in the account of the festal procession of the litter of Solomon. They may have been some sweet-scented wood in powder, or else some form of incense.
BENO|     be'-no (beno, "his son"): The son of Jaaziah of the house of Levi ( 1 Chronicles 24:26, 27 ).
HEBREWS|( Acts 6:1 ) were the Hebrew-speaking Jews, as distinguished from those who spoke Greek. (see  GREEKS .)  Hebrews, Epistle to (1.) Its canonicity. All the results of critical and historical research to which this epistle has been specially subjected abundantly vindicate its right to a place in the New Testament canon among the other inspired books. (2.) Its authorship. A considerable variety of opinions on this subject has at different times been advanced. Some have maintained that its author was Silas, Paul's companion. Others have attributed it to Clement of Rome, or Luke, or Barnabas, or some unknown Alexandrian Christian, or Apollos; but the conclusion which we think is best supported, both from internal and external evidence, is that Paul was its author. There are, no doubt, many difficulties in the way of accepting it as Paul's; but we may at least argue with Calvin that there can be no difficulty in the way of "embracing it without controversy as one of the apostolical epistles." (3.) Date and place of writing. It was in all probability written at Rome, near the close of Paul's two years' imprisonment ( Hebrews 13:19 , 24). It was certainly written before the destruction of Jerusalem ( 13:10 ). (4.) To whom addressed. Plainly it was intended for Jewish converts to the faith of the gospel, probably for the church at Jerusalem. The subscription of this epistle is, of course, without authority. In this case it is incorrect, for obviously Timothy could not be the bearer of it ( 13:23 ). (5.) Its design was to show the true end and meaning of the Mosaic system, and its symbolical and transient character. It proves that the Levitical priesthood was a "shadow" of that of Christ, and that the legal sacrifices prefigured the great and all-perfect sacrifice he offered for us. It explains that the gospel was designed, not to modify the law of Moses, but to supersede and abolish it. Its teaching was fitted, as it was designed, to check that tendency to apostatize from Christianity and to return to Judaism which now showed itself among certain Jewish Christians. The supreme authority and the transcendent glory of the gospel are clearly set forth, and in such a way as to strengthen and confirm their allegiance to Christ. (6.) It consists of two parts: (a) doctrinal (1- 10:18 ), (b) and practical ( 10:19 -ch. 13). There are found in it many references to portions of the Old Testament. It may be regarded as a treatise supplementary to the Epistles to the Romans and Galatians, and as an inspired commentary on the book of Leviticus. 
JAKIM|Establisher.  (1.) Chief of the twelfth priestly order ( 1 Chronicles 24:12 ). (2.) A Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 8:19 ). (3.) Margin in  Matthew 1:11  means Jehoiakim. 
HURI|     hu'-ri (churi, "linen weaver"): One of the immediate descendants of Gad, and father of Abihail, a chief man of his family ( 1 Chronicles 5:14 ).
HAKUPHA|     ha-ku'-fa (chaqupha' "incitement"). A family name of some of the Nethinim who returned with Zerubbabel from Babylon ( Ezra 2:51   Nehemiah 7:53 ).
MAGADAN|     mag'-a-dan, ma-ga'-dan (Magadan; the reading of the Textus Receptus of the New Testament, Magdala (the King James Version), but Magdala is unsupported): This name appears only in  Matthew 15:39 . In the parallel passage,  Mark 8:10 , its place is taken by Dalmanutha. From these two passages it is reasonable to infer that "the borders of Magadan" and "the parts of Dalmanutha" were contiguous. We may perhaps gather from the narrative that they lay on the western shore of the Sea of Galilee. After the feeding of the 4,000, Jesus and His disciples came to these parts. Thence they departed to "the other side" ( Mark 8:13 ), arriving at Bethsaida. This is generally believed to have been Bethsaida Julias, Northeast of the sea, whence He set out on His visit to Caesarea Philippi. In this case we might look for Dalmanutha and Magadan somewhere South of the Plain of Gennesaret, at the foot of the western hills. Stanley (SP, 383) quotes Schwarz to the effect that a cave in the face of these precipitous slopes bears the name of Teliman or Talmanutha. If this is true, it points to a site for Dalmanutha near `Ain el-Fuliyeh. Magadan might then be represented by el-Mejdel, a village at the Southwest corner of the Plain of Gennesaret. It is commonly identified with Magdala, the home of Mary Magdalene, but without any evidence. The name suggests that this was the site of an old Hebrew mighdal, "tower" or "fortress." The village with its ruins is now the property of the German Roman Catholics. The land in the plain has been purchased by a colony of Jews, and is once more being brought under cultivation.  The identification with Magdala is made more probable by the frequent interchange of "l" for "n", e.g. Nathan (Hebrew), Nethel (Aramaic).  W. Ewing
TAHCHEMONITE|     ta-ke'-mo-nit, ta'-ke-mon-it (tachkemoni): Name of a family to which Jashobeam, the chief captain in David's army, belonged ( 2 Samuel 23:8   1 Chronicles 11:11 ). In 1 Chronicles it is "Hachmonite."
ELNATHAN|Whom God has given.  (1.) An inhabitant of Jerusalem, the father of Nehushta, who was the mother of king Jehoiachin ( 2 Kings 24:8 ). Probably the same who tried to prevent Jehoiakim from burning the roll of Jeremiah's prophecies ( Jeremiah 26:22 ;  36:12 ).  (2.)  Ezra 8:16 . 
ELISHAH|The oldest of the four sons of Javan ( Genesis 10:4 ), whose descendants peopled Greece. It has been supposed that Elishah's descendants peopled the Peloponnesus, which was known by the name of Elis. This may be meant by "the isles of Elishah" ( Ezek. 27:7 ). 
SHIPHMITE|Probably the designation of Zabdi, who has charge of David's vineyards ( 1 Chronicles 27:27 ). 
SHOPHACH|     sho'-fak.  See  SHOBACH .
HEROD|Herod Agrippa I. Son of Aristobulus and Bernice, and grandson of Herod the Great. He was made tetrarch of the provinces formerly held by Lysanias II., and ultimately possessed the entire kingdom of his grandfather, Herod the Great, with the title of king. He put the apostle James the elder to death, and cast Peter into prison ( Luke 3:1 ;  Acts 12:1 -19). On the second day of a festival held in honour of the emperor Claudius, he appeared in the great theatre of Caesarea. "The king came in clothed in magnificent robes, of which silver was the costly brilliant material. It was early in the day, and the sun's rays fell on the king, so that the eyes of the beholders were dazzled with the brightness which surrounded him. Voices here and there from the crowd exclaimed that it was the apparition of something divine. And when he spoke and made an oration to them, they gave a shout, saying, 'It is the voice of a god, and not of a man.' But in the midst of this idolatrous ostentation an angel of God suddenly smote him. He was carried out of the theatre a dying man." He died (A.D. 44) of the same loathsome malady which slew his grandfather ( Acts 12:21 -23), in the fifty-fourth year of his age, having reigned four years as tetrarch and three as king over the whole of Palestine. After his death his kingdom came under the control of the prefect of Syria, and Palestine was now fully incorporated with the empire.  Herod Antipas Herod's son by Malthace ( Matthew 14:1 ;  Luke 3:1 ,  19;  9:7 ;  Acts 13:1 ). (see  ANTIPAS .)  Herod Archelaus ( Matthew 2:22 ), the brother of Antipas (q.v.).  Herod Arippa II. The son of Herod Agrippa I. and Cypros. The emperor Claudius made him tetrarch of the provinces of Philip and Lysanias, with the title of king ( Acts 25:13 ;  26:2 ,  7). He enlarged the city of Caesarea Philippi, and called it Neronias, in honour of Nero. It was before him and his sister that Paul made his defence at Caesarea ( Acts 25:12 -27). He died at Rome A.D. 100, in the third year of the emperor Trajan.  Herod Philip I. ( Mark 6:17 ), the son of Herod the Great by Mariamne, the daughter of Simon, the high priest. He is distinguished from another Philip called "the tetrarch." He lived at Rome as a private person with his wife Herodias and his daughter Salome.  Herod Philip II. The son of Herod the Great and Cleopatra of Jerusalem. He was "tetrarch" of Batanea, Iturea, Trachonitis, and Auranitis. He rebuilt the city of Caesarea Philippi, calling it by his own name to distinguish it from the Caesarea on the sea-coast which was the seat of the Roman government. He married Salome, the daughter of Herodias ( Matthew 16:13 ;  Mark 8:27 ;  Luke 3:1 ).  Herod the Great ( Matthew 2:1 -22;  Luke 1:5 ;  Acts 23:35 ), the son of Antipater, an Idumaean, and Cypros, an Arabian of noble descent. In the year B.C. 47 Julius Caesar made Antipater, a "wily Idumaean," procurator of Judea, who divided his territories between his four sons, Galilee falling to the lot of Herod, who was afterwards appointed tetrarch of Judea by Mark Antony (B.C. 40), and also king of Judea by the Roman senate. He was of a stern and cruel disposition. "He was brutish and a stranger to all humanity." Alarmed by the tidings of one "born King of the Jews," he sent forth and "slew all the children that were in Bethlehem, and in all the coasts thereof, from two years old and under" ( Matthew 2:16 ). He was fond of splendour, and lavished great sums in rebuilding and adorning the cities of his empire. He rebuilt the city of Caesarea (q.v.) on the coast, and also the city of Samaria (q.v.), which he called Sebaste, in honour of Augustus. He restored the ruined temple of Jerusalem, a work which was begun B.C. 20, but was not finished till after Herod's death, probably not till about A.D. 50 ( John 2:20 ). After a troubled reign of thirty-seven years, he died at Jericho amid great agonies both of body and mind, B.C. 4, i.e., according to the common chronology, in the year in which Jesus was born. After his death his kingdom was divided among three of his sons. Of these, Philip had the land east of Jordan, between Caesarea Philippi and Bethabara, Antipas had Galilee and Peraea, while Archelaus had Judea and Samaria. 
TIMNA|     tim'-na (timna`; Thamna): A conbubine of Eliphaz, Esau's son, and the mother of Amalek ( Genesis 36:12 ). But in  Genesis 36:22  and  1 Chronicles 1:39  Timna is the sister of Lotan, and in  Genesis 36:40  and  1 Chronicles 1:51  a chief or elan of Edom (see TIMNAH (3)). These variations are to be expected when the origin of genealogies is recalled. (In Genesis, English Versions of the Bible read, contrary to rule, "Timnah.") Gunkel's theory is that  Genesis 36:12  is a later insertion in P.
MOABITES|   MOAB;   mo'-ab, mo'-ab-its (Moab, mo'abh, Moabite Stone, M-'-B; Greek (Septuagint) Moab, he Moabeitis, Moabitis; Moabite, mo'abhi; Moabites, bene mo'abh):  1. The Land:  Moab was the district East of the Dead Sea, extending from a point some distance North of it to its southern end. The eastern boundary was indefinite, being the border of the desert which is irregular. The length of the territory was about 50 miles and the average width about 30. It is a high tableland, averaging some 3,000 ft. above the level of the Mediterranean and 4,300 ft. above that of the Dead Sea. The aspect of the land, as one looks at it from the western side of the Dead Sea, is that of a range of mountains with a very precipitous frontage, but the elevation of this ridge above the interior is very slight. Deep chasms lead down from the tableland to the Dead Sea shore, the principal one being the gorge of the river Arnon, which is about 1,700 ft. deep and 2 or more miles in width at the level of the tableland, but very narrow at the bottom and with exceedingly precipitous banks. About 13 miles back from the mouth of the river the gorge divides, and farther back it subdivides, so that several valleys are formed of diminishing depth as they approach the desert border. These are referred to in  Numbers 21:14  as the "valleys of the Arnon." The "valley of Zered" ( Numbers 21:12 ), which was on the southern border, drops down to the southern end of the Dead Sea, and although not so long or deep as the Arnon, is of the same nature in its lower reaches, very difficult to cross, dividing into two branches, but at a point much nearer the sea. The stream is not so large as the Arnon, but is quite copious, even in summer. These gorges have such precipitous sides that it would be very difficult for an army to cross them, except in their upper courses near the desert where they become shallow. The Israelites passed them in that region, probably along the present Hajj road and the line of the Mecca Railway. The tableland is fertile but lacks water. The fountains and streams in the valleys and on the slopes toward the Dead Sea are abundant, but the uplands are almost destitute of flowing water. The inhabitants supply themselves by means of cisterns, many of which are ancient, but many of those used in ancient times are ruined. The population must have been far greater formerly than now. The rainfall is usually sufficient to mature the crops, although the rain falls in winter only. The fertility of the country in ancient times is indicated by the numerous towns and villages known to have existed there, mentioned in Scripture and on the Moabite Stone, the latter giving some not found elsewhere. The principal of these were: Ar ( Numbers 21:15 ); Ataroth, Dibon, Jazer, Nimrah, Nebo ( Numbers 32:3 ); Beth-peor ( Deuteronomy 3:29 ); Beth-diblaim, Bozrah, Kerioth ( Jeremiah 48:22-24 ); Kir ( Isaiah 15:1 ); Medeba, Elealeh, Zoar ( Isaiah 15:2, 4, 5 ); Kirheres ( Isaiah 16:11 ); Sibmah ( Joshua 13:19 ); in all, some 45 place-names in Moab are known, most of the towns being in ruins. Kir of Moab is represented in the modern Kerak, the most important of all and the government center of the district. Madeba now represents the ancient Medeba, and has become noted for the discovery of a medieval map of Palestine, in mosaic, of considerable archaeological value. Rabbath-moab and Heshbon (modern Rabba and Hesban) are miserable villages, and the country is subject to the raids of the Bedouin tribes of the neighboring desert, which discourages agriculture. But the land is still good pasture ground for cattle and sheep, as in ancient times ( Numbers 32:3, 4 ).  2. The People:  The Moabites were of Semitic stock and of kin to the Hebrews, as is indicated by their descent from Lot, the nephew of Abraham ( Genesis 19:30-37 ), and by their language which is practically the same as the Hebrew. This is clear from the inscription on the Moabite Stone, a monument of Mesha, king of Moab, erected about 850 B.C., and discovered among the ruins of Dibon in 1868. It contains 34 lines of about 9 words each, written in the old Phoenician and Hebrew characters, corresponding to the Siloam inscription and those found in Phoenicia, showing that it is a dialect of the Semitic tongue prevailing in Palestine. The original inhabitants of Moab were the Emim ( Deuteronomy 2:10 ), "a people great.... and tall, as the Anakim." When these were deposed by the Moabites we do not know. The latter are not mentioned in the Tell el-Amarna Letters and do not appear on the Egyptian monuments before the 14th century B.C., when they seem to be referred to under the name of Ruten, or Luten or Lotan, i.e. Lot (Paton, Syria and Pal); Muab appears in a list of names on a monument of Rameses III of the XXth Dynasty. The country lay outside the line of march of the Egyptian armies, and this accounts for the silence of its monuments in regard to them.  3. Religion:  The chief deity of Moab was Chemosh (kemosh), frequently mentioned in the Old Testament and on the Moabite Stone, where King Mesha speaks of building a high place in his honor because he was saved by him from his enemies. He represents the oppression of Moab by Omri as the result of the anger of Chemosh, and Mesha made war against Israel by command of Chemosh. He was the national god of Moab, as Molech was of Ammon, and it is pretty certain that he was propitiated by human sacrifices ( 2 Kings 3:27 ). But he was not the only god of Moab, as is clear from the account in  Numbers 25 , where it is also clear that their idolatrous worship was corrupt. They had their Baalim like the nations around, as may be inferred from the place-names compounded with Baal, such as Bamoth-baal, Beth-baal-meon and Baal-peor.  4. History:  We know scarcely anything of the history of the Moabites after the account of their origin in  Genesis 19  until the time of the exodus. It would seem, however, that they had suffered from the invasions of the Amorites, who, under their king Sihon, had subdued the northern part of Moab as far as the Arnon ( Numbers 21:21-31 ). This conquest was no doubt a result of the movement of the Amorites southward, when they were pressed by the great wave of Hittite invasion that overran Northern Syria at the end of the 15th and the early part of the 14th centuries B.C. The Amorites were forced to seek homes in Palestine, and it would seem that a portion of them crossed the Jordan and occupied Northern Moab, and here the Israelites found them as they approached the Promised Land. They did not at first disturb the Moabites in the South, but passed around on the eastern border ( Deuteronomy 2:8, 9 ) and came into conflict with the Amorites in the North ( Numbers 21:21-26 ), defeating them and occupying the territory ( Numbers 21:31-32 ). But when Balak son of Zippor, king of Moab, saw what a powerful people was settling on his border, he made alliance with the Midianites against them and called in the aid of Balaam, but as he could not induce the latter to curse them he refrained from attacking the Israelites ( Numbers 22 ;  Numbers 24 ). The latter, however, suffered disaster from the people of Moab through their intercourse with them ( Numbers 25 ). Some time before the establishment of the kingdom in Israel the Midianites overran Moab, as would appear from the passage in  Genesis 36:35 , but the conquest was not permanent, for Moab recovered its lost territory and became strong enough to encroach upon Israel across the Jordan. Eglon of Moab oppressed Israel with the aid of Ammon and Amalek ( Judges 3:13-14 ), but Eglon was assassinated by Ehud, and the Moabite yoke was cast off after 18 years. Saul smote Moab, but did not subdue it ( 1 Samuel 14:47 ), for we find David putting his father and mother under the protection of the king of Moab when persecuted by Saul ( 1 Samuel 22:3, 4 ). But this friendship between David and Moab did not continue. When David became king he made war upon Moab and completely subjugated it ( 2 Samuel 8:2 ). On the division of the kingdom between Rehoboam and Jeroboam the latter probably obtained possession of Moab ( 1 Kings 12:20 ), but it revolted and Omri had to reconquer it (M S), and it was tributary to Ahab ( 2 Kings 1:1 ). It revolted again in the reign of Ahaziah ( 2 Kings 1:1 ;  2 Kings 3:5 ), and Moab and Ammon made war on Jehoshaphat and Mt. Seir and destroyed the latter, but they afterward fell out among themselves and destroyed each other ( 2 Chronicles 20 ). Jehoshaphat and Jehoram together made an expedition into Moab and defeated the Moabites with great slaughter ( 2 Kings 3 ). But Mesha, king of Moab, was not subdued ( 2 Kings 3:27 ), and afterward completely freed his land from the dominion of Israel (M S). This was probably at the time when Israel and Judah were at war with Hazael of Damascus ( 2 Kings 8:28, 29 ). Bands of Moabites ventured to raid the land of Israel when weakened by the conflict with Hazael ( 2 Kings 13:20 ), but Moab was probably subdued again by Jeroboam II ( 2 Kings 14:25 ), which may be the disaster to Moab recounted in  Isaiah 15 . After Mesha we find a king of the name of Salamanu and another called Chemosh-nadab, the latter being subject to Sargon of Assyria. He revolted against Sennacherib, in alliance with other kings of Syria and Palestine and Egypt, but was subdued by him, and another king, Mutsuri, was subject to Esarhaddon. These items come to us from the Assyrian monuments. When Babylon took the place of Assyria in the suzerainty, Moab joined other tribes in urging Judah to revolt but seems to have come to terms with Nebuchadnezzar before Jerusalem was taken, as we hear nothing of any expedition of that king against her. On the war described in Judith, in which Moab (1:12, etc.) plays a part.  See JUDITH .  At a later date Moab was overrun by the Nabathean Arabs who ruled in Petra and extended their authority on the east side of Jordan even as far as Damascus (Josephus, Ant, XIII, xv, 1, 2). The Moabites lost their identity as a nation and were afterward confounded with the Arabs, as we see in the statement of Josephus (XIII, xiii, 5), where he says that Alexander (Janneus) overcame the Arabians, such as the Moabites and the Gileadites. Alexander built the famous stronghold of Macherus in Moab, on a hill overlooking the Dead Sea, which afterward became the scene of the imprisonment and tragical death of John the Baptist (Josephus, BJ, VII, vi, 2; Ant, XVIII, v, 2;  Mark 6:21-28 ). It was afterward destroyed by the Romans. Kir became a fortress of the Crusaders under the name of Krak (Kerak), which held out against the Moslems until the time of Saladin, who captured it in 1188 A.D.  LITERATURE.  Commentaries on the passages in the Old Testament relating to Moab, and histories of Israel; Paton, Early History of Syria and Palestine; Rawlinson, Ancient Monarchies, especially Assyria and Babylonia; Conder, Heth and Moab; G. A. Smith, HGHL; the Moabite Stone; Josephus.  H. Porter
KIRJATH|City, a city belonging to Benjamin ( Joshua 18:28 ), the modern Kuriet el-`Enab, i.e., "city of grapes", about 7 1/2 miles west-north-west of Jerusalem. 
MELCHISHUA|     mel-ki-shoo'-a (malkishua`, "king's help").  See  MALCHI-SHUA .
MENAHEM|Conforting, the son of Gadi, and successor of Shallum, king of Israel, whom he slew. After a reign of about ten years (B.C. 771-760) he died, leaving the throne to his son Pekahiah. His reign was one of cruelty and oppression ( 2 Kings 15:14 -22). During his reign, Pul (q.v.), king of Assyria, came with a powerful force against Israel, but was induced to retire by a gift from Menahem of 1,000 talents of silver. 
ILLYRICUM|A country to the north-west of Macedonia, on the eastern shores of the Adriatic, now almost wholly comprehended in Dalmatia, a name formerly given to the southern part of Illyricum ( 2 Timothy 4:10 ). It was traversed by Paul in his third missionary journey ( Romans 15:19 ). It was the farthest district he had reached in preaching the gospel of Christ. This reference to Illyricum is in harmony with  Acts 20:2 , inasmuch as the apostle's journey over the parts of Macedonia would bring him to the borders of Illyricum. 
JEKABZEEL|   JEKABZEL  je-kab'-ze-el (yeqabhtse'el, "God gathers";  Nehemiah 11:25 ).  See  KABZEEL .
HAZOR|Enclosed; fortified.  (1.) A stronghold of the Canaanites in the mountains north of Lake Merom ( Joshua 11:1 -5). Jabin the king with his allied tribes here encountered Joshua in a great battle. Joshua gained a signal victory, which virtually completed his conquest of Canaan ( 11:10 -13). This city was, however, afterwards rebuilt by the Canaanites, and was ruled by a king with the same hereditary name of Jabin. His army, under a noted leader of the name of Sisera, swept down upon the south, aiming at the complete subjugation of the country. This powerful army was met by the Israelites under Barak, who went forth by the advice of the prophetess Deborah. The result was one of the most remarkable victories for Israel recorded in the Old Testament ( Joshua 19:36 ;  Judges 4:2 ;  1 Samuel 12:9 ). The city of Hazor was taken and occupied by the Israelites. It was fortified by Solomon to defend the entrance into the kingdom from Syria and Assyria. When Tiglath-pileser, the Assyrian king, invaded the land, this was one of the first cities he captured, carrying its inhabitants captive into Assyria ( 2 Kings 15:29 ). It has been identified with Khurbet Harrah, 2 1/2 miles south-east of Kedesh. (2.) A city in the south of Judah ( Joshua 15:23 ). The name here should probably be connected with the word following, Ithnan, -ITHNAN instead of "Hazor and Ithnan." (3.) A district in Arabia ( Jeremiah 49:28 -33), supposed by some to be Jetor, i.e., Ituraea. (4.) "Kerioth and Hezron" ( Joshua 15:25 ) should be "Kerioth-hezron" (as in the R.V.), the two names being joined together as the name of one place (e.g.,  like Kirjath-jearim), "the same is Hazor" (R.V.). This place has been identified with el-Kuryetein, and has been supposed to be the home of Judas Iscariot. (see  KERIOTH .) 
JESHISHAI|     je-shish'-a-i (yeshishay, "aged"): A Gadite chief (and family?) ( 1 Chronicles 5:14 ).
BIGVAI|     big'-va-i (bighway; Baogei, Bagoua):  (1) The head of one of the families who returned from Babylon with Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:2   Nehemiah 7:7 ), having a large number of his retainers (2,056, according to  Ezra 2:14 ; 2,067, according to  Nehemiah 7:19 ), besides 72 males later under Ezra ( Ezra 8:14 ).  (2) One of those who subscribed the covenant with Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 10:16 ).
ISAAC|Laughter. (1) Israel, or the kingdom of the ten tribes ( Amos 7:9 ,  16). (2.) The only son of Abraham by Sarah. He was the longest lived of the three patriarchs ( Genesis 21:1 -3). He was circumcised when eight days old (4-7); and when he was probably two years old a great feast was held in connection with his being weaned. The next memorable event in his life is that connected with the command of God given to Abraham to offer him up as a sacrifice on a mountain in the land of Moriah ( Genesis 22 ). (see  ABRAHAM .) When he was forty years of age Rebekah was chosen for his wife ( Genesis 24 ). After the death and burial of his father he took up his residence at Beer-lahai-roi ( 25:7 -11), where his two sons, Esau and Jacob, were born (21-26), the former of whom seems to have been his favourite son (27, 28). In consequence of a famine ( Genesis 26:1 ) Isaac went to Gerar, where he practised deception as to his relation to Rebekah, imitating the conduct of his father in Egypt ( 12:12 -20) and in Gerar ( 20:2 ). The Philistine king rebuked him for his prevarication. After sojourning for some time in the land of the Philistines, he returned to Beersheba, where God gave him fresh assurance of covenant blessing, and where Abimelech entered into a covenant of peace with him. The next chief event in his life was the blessing of his sons ( Genesis 27:1 ). He died at Mamre, "being old and full of days" ( 35:27 -29), one hundred and eighty years old, and was buried in the cave of Machpelah. In the New Testament reference is made to his having been "offered up" by his father ( Hebrews 11:17 ;  James 2:21 ), and to his blessing his sons ( Hebrews 11:20 ). As the child of promise, he is contrasted with Ishmael ( Romans 9:7 ,  10;  Galatians 4:28 ;  Hebrews 11:18 ). Isaac is "at once a counterpart of his father in simple devoutness and purity of life, and a contrast in his passive weakness of character, which in part, at least, may have sprung from his relations to his mother and wife. After the expulsion of Ishmael and Hagar, Isaac had no competitor, and grew up in the shade of Sarah's tent, moulded into feminine softness by habitual submission to her strong, loving will." His life was so quiet and uneventful that it was spent "within the circle of a few miles; so guileless that he let Jacob overreach him rather than disbelieve his assurance; so tender that his mother's death was the poignant sorrow of years; so patient and gentle that peace with his neighbours was dearer than even such a coveted possession as a well of living water dug by his own men; so grandly obedient that he put his life at his father's disposal; so firm in his reliance on God that his greatest concern through life was to honour the divine promise given to his race.", Geikie's Hours, etc. 
RAMATHLEHI|Elevation of Lehi, or the jawbone height; i.e., the Ramah of Lehi ( Judges 15:15 -17). The phrase "in the jaw," ver. 19, Authorized Version, is in the margin, also in the Revised Version, "in Lehi." Here Samson slew a thousand Philistines with a jawbone. 
BISHLAM|     bish'-lam (bishlam, "peaceful" (?)): One of three foreign colonists who wrote a letter of complaint against the Jews to Artaxerxes ( Ezra 4:7  = 1 Esdras 2:16). In 1 Esdras the reading is "Belemus." "And in the days of Artaxerxes wrote Bishlam, Mithredath, Tabeel, and the rest of his companions, unto Artaxerxes, king of Persia," etc. ( Ezra 4:7 ). The Septuagint renders Bishlam as en eirene, "in peace," as though it were a phrase rather than a proper name; this is clearly an error.
ONAM|     o'-na ('onam, "vigorous"; compare ONAN):  (1) "Son" of Shobal "son" of Seir the Horite ( Genesis 36:23   1 Chronicles 1:40 ).  (2) "Son" of Jerahmeel by Atarah; perhaps the name is connected with Onan son of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:26, 28 ).
DEHAVITES|Villagers, one of the Assyrian tribes which Asnapper sent to repopulate Samaria ( Ezra 4:9 ). They were probably a nomad Persian tribe on the east of the Caspian Sea, and near the Sea of Azof. 
BERACHIAH|     ber-a-ki'-a.  See  BERECHIAH .
INFLUENCES|     in'-floo-ens-iz (ma`adhannoth): This word occurs only in  Job 38:31  the King James Version, "Canst thou bind the sweet influences of Pleiades?" the Revised Version (British and American) "the cluster of the Pleiades," margin "or chain, or sweet influences"; Delitzsch, Dillmann and others render "fetters," that which binds the group together; "influences," if correct, would refer to the seasons, which were believed to be regulated, so far, by the PLEIADES (which see). In The Wisdom of Solomon 7:25, it is said of Wisdom that she is "a pure influence (aporrhoia, the Revised Version (British and American) "effluence") flowing from the glory of the Almighty."  W. L. Walker
JEMUEL|     je-mu'-el (yemu'el, meaning unknown): A "son" of Simeon ( Genesis 46:10   Exodus 6:15 ) = "Nemuel" in  Numbers 26:12   1 Chronicles 4:24 .  The Syriac version has "Jemuel" in the 4 passages, but Gray (H P N, 307, note 6) thinks "Jemuel" is more probably a correction in Genesis than "Nemuel" in Numbers.
CORNERSTONE|   CORNER-STONE  kor'-ner ston (pinnah, zawith; akrogoniaios): Part of the public or imposing buildings, to which importance has been attached in all ages and in many nations, both on account of its actual service and its figurative meaning. Ordinarily its use in the Bible is figurative, or symbolical. No doubt the original meaning was some important stone, which was laid at the foundation of a building.  (1) With the Canaanites, who preceded Israel in the possession of Palestine, corner-stone laying seems to have been a most sacred and impressive ceremonial. Under this important stone of temples, or other great structures, bodies of children or older persons would be laid, consecrating the building by such human sacrifice (see FORTIFICATION, II, 1). This was one of many hideous rites and practices which Israel was to extirpate. It may throw light on the curse pronounced upon the rebuilding of Jericho ( Joshua 6:26 ; see PEFS, January, 1904, July, 1908).  See  CANAAN .  (2) Old Testament references.-The Hebrew word pinnah, "corner," is found or implied in every occurrence of this idea. Derived from a root signifying "to turn," it means "turning," and therefore "edge" or "corner." Ordinarily it is used with 'ebhen, "stone" ( Psalm 118:22 ); or it may occur alone, having acquired for itself through frequent use the whole technical phrase-idea ( Zechariah 10:4  the King James Version).  Figurative Uses:  While all the passages indicate the stone at the corner, there appear to be two conceptions:  (a) the foundation-stone upon which the structure rested ( Job 38:6   Isaiah 28:16   Jeremiah 51:26 ); or  (b) the topmost or cap-stone, which linked the last tier together ( Psalm 118:22   Zechariah 4:7 ); in both cases it is an important or key-stone, and figurative of the Messiah, who is "the First and the Last."  In  Job 38:6  it beautifully expresses in figures the stability of the earth, which Yahweh created. In  Zechariah 10:4  the leader or ruler in the Messianic age is represented by the corner-stone. The ancient tradition of the one missing stone, when the temple was in building, is reflected in or has been suggested by  Psalm 118:22  (Midrash quoted by Pusey under  Zechariah 4:7 ). It is probable that we should read in  Psalm 144:12  not "corner-stones," but "corner-pillars," or supports (compare Greek Caryatides) from a different Hebrew word, zawith, Brown, Driver, and Briggs, Hebrew and English Lexicon of the Old Testament, under the word  (3) New Testament passages.-  Psalm 118:22  is quoted and interpreted as fulfilled in Jesus Christ in a number of passages:  Matthew 21:42   Mark 12:10   Luke 20:17   Acts 4:11  and  1 Peter 2:7 ; it is also the evident basis for  Ephesians 2:20 .  Isaiah 28:16  is quoted twice in the New Testament:  Romans 9:33 , from Septuagint combined with the words of  Isaiah 8:14 , and in  1 Peter 2:6 , which is quoted with some variation from Septuagint. The Old Testament passages were understood by the rabbis to be Messianic, and were properly so applied by the New Testament writers.  See also  HOUSE .  Edward Mack
PIECES|(1) of silver. In  Psalm 68:30  denotes "fragments," and not properly money. In  1 Samuel 2:36  (Hebrews agorah), properly a "small sum" as wages, weighed rather than coined.  Joshua 24:32  (Hebrews kesitah,  q.v.), supposed by some to have been a piece of money bearing the figure of a lamb, but rather simply a certain amount. (Comp.  Genesis 33:19 ). (2.) The word pieces is omitted in many passages, as  Genesis 20:16 ;  37:28 ;  45:22 , etc. The passage in  Zechariah 11:12 , 13 is quoted in the Gospel ( Matthew 26:15 ), and from this we know that the word to be supplied is "shekels." In all these omissions we may thus warrantably supply this word. (3.) The "piece of money" mentioned in  Matthew 17:27  is a stater=a Hebrew shekel, or four Greek drachmae; and that in  Luke 15:8 , 9, Act 19:19, a Greek drachma=a denarius. (see  PENNY .) 
SUPH|( Deuteronomy 1:1 ,  R.V.; marg.,  "some ancient versions have the Red Sea, " as in the A.V.). Some identify it with Suphah ( Numbers 21:14 ,  marg.,  A.V.) as probably the name of a place. Others identify it with es-Sufah = Maaleh-acrabbim ( Joshua 15:3 ), and others again with Zuph ( 1 Samuel 9:5 ). It is most probable, however, that, in accordance with the ancient versions, this word is to be regarded as simply an abbreviation of Yam-suph, i.e., the "Red Sea." 
CHERETHITES|     ker'-e-thits (kerethim, ha-kerethi; Chelethi "executioners," "life-guardsmen"): A people in South Palestine whose territory bordered upon that of Judah ( 1 Samuel 30:14 ). In  1 Samuel 30:16  this land is apparently identical with that of the Philistines. In  Ezekiel 25:16  the Philistines and the Cherethites are threatened together; while in  Zep 2:5  the Cherethites are evidently the dwellers in "the land of the Philistines," "the inhabitants of the seacoast." Septuagint in both Ezekiel and Zephaniah renders the name "Cretans." The translators may have been "guided only by the sound." But Zeus Cretagenes in Gaza suggests a connection with the island of Crete. See , however, CAPHTOR. It may be taken as certain that the Cherethites were a Philistine clan. In conjunction with the Pelethites they are frequently named as forming the guard of David ( 2 Samuel 8:18 , etc.). It was the custom of many ancient monarchs to have a guard of foreign mercenaries.  W. Ewing
BOZKATH|     boz'-kath (botsqath, "stony"; Septuagint Basedoth): A town in the Shephelah of Judah named between Lachish and Eglon ( Joshua 15:39 ). It was the birthplace of Adaiah the mother of King Josiah ( 2 Kings 22:1 ; the King James Version "Boscath"). The site is not identified.
SHUPPIM|     shup'-im (shuppim):  (1) One of the descendants of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 7:12, 15 ).  (2) One of the porters in the temple ( 1 Chronicles 26:16 ).  See  MUPPIM ;  SHEPHUPHAM .
RHESA|Affection, son of Zorobabel, mentioned in the genealogy of our Lord ( Luke 3:27 ). 
CEPHAS|A Syriac surname given by Christ to Simon ( John 1:42 ), meaning "rock." The Greeks translated it by Petros, and the Latins by Petrus. 
MADAI|Middle land, the third "son" of Japheth ( Genesis 10:2 ), the name by which the Medes are known on the Assyrian monuments. 
ITHRA|     ith'-ra (yithra', "abundance"): The father of Amasa, commanding general in the rebel army of Absalom. It seems that his mother was Abigail, a sister or half-sister of King David ( 1 Chronicles 2:17 ). She is called the sister of Zeruiah, Joab's mother ( 2 Samuel 17:25 ). In this same passage Ithra is called an "Israelite," but in  1 Chronicles 2:17   1 Kings 2:5, 32 , we read: "Jether the Ishmaelite."
CORNERS|   EARTH,  OF THE  The "corners" or "ends" of the earth are its "wings" (kanephoth ha-'arets), i.e. its borders or extremities. The word in general means a wing, because the wing of a bird is used as a covering for its young, and from this meaning it acquires that of the extremity of anything stretched out. It is thus used in  Deuteronomy 22:12 : "Thou shalt make thee fringes upon the four borders (wings) of thy vesture, wherewith thou coverest thyself." It thus also means the coasts or boundaries of the land surface of the earth; its extremities. It is translated "corners" in  Isaiah 11:12 ; "ends" in  Job 37:3, 38:13 . The "four corners" of the earth ( Isaiah 11:12 ) or "land" ( Ezekiel 7:2 ) are therefore simply the extremities of the land in the four cardinal directions.  See also  ASTRONOMY, sec . III, 3.  E. W. Maunder  CORNERS OF THE EARTH  See  EARTH, CORNERS OF THE .
PUNISHMENTS|     pun'-ish-ments ('awon, "fault," "iniquity," "punishment for iniquity," "sin" ( Genesis 4:13   Leviticus 26:41   Job 19:29   Psalm 149:7   Lamentations 4:22   Ezekiel 14:10  margin;  Amos 1:3, 6, 9, 11, 13 ;  Amos 2:1, 4, 6 ), `onesh, "tribute," "fine," "punishment" ( Lamentations 3:39 ), chaTa'ah, or chaTTa'th, "sin" and its retribution, "penalty," "expiation" ( Zechariah 14:19 ); kolasis, "punishment," "torment" ( Matthew 25:46 ), epitimia, "poll tax," hence, "penalty" ( 2 Corinthians 2:6 ), timoria, "vindication," hence, "penalty" ( Hebrews 10:29 ), ekdikesis, "vindication," "retribution" ( 1 Peter 2:14  the King James Version)): A court could inflict for a crime against the person, a sentence of  (1) death in the form of stoning, burning, beheading, or strangling, etc.;  (2) exile to one of the cities of refuge in case of manslaughter ( Numbers 35 ); or  (3) stripes, not to exceed 40, in practice 39 or less ( Deuteronomy 25:3   2 Corinthians 11:24 ).  Offences against property (theft, fraudulent conversion of deposit, embezzlement, robbery) were punished by exacting more than the value of the things taken ( Luke 19:8 ), the excess going to the injured party, thus differing from a fine, which goes into the treasury of the community. The housebreaker was liable to be slain with impunity ( Exodus 22:2 ). A fine in the modern sense is unknown in the Scriptures, unless  Leviticus 5:6-19  be interpreted as referring to such.  1. History of the Hebrew Law concerning Punishment:  The earliest theory of punishment seems to have been that of retaliation-"blood for blood"-and to some extent this principle appears even in the Law of Moses ( Leviticus 21:19, 20   Matthew 5:38 ). Early in the history of the race, punishment was administered for sin and crime. Adam and Eve were driven from the Garden, and Cain, the first murderer, though not executed in retaliation for his deed, had a mark set on him. The words of Lamech ( Genesis 4:24 ) indicate that death was regarded as the fitting punishment for murder, and the same thought apparently was in the minds of the brethren of Joseph ( Genesis 42:21 ). Judah, as head of his family, seems to have had power of life and death ( Genesis 38:24 ), and Abimelech threatens his people with the extreme punishment in case they injure or insult Isaac or his wife ( Genesis 26:11 ). Similar power is ascribed to Pharaoh ( Genesis 41:13 ).  2. The Mosaic Law concerning Punishment:  Under the Law of Moses, the murderer was to be put to death without mercy. Even if he took refuge at the altar in a sanctuary or in an asylum city, he would not be immune from arrest and execution, and the same principle was applied in the case of an animal ( Exodus 21:12, 14, 23, 28, 36  parallel). But punishment under the Mosaic Law was not to be entailed or transmitted ( Deuteronomy 24:16 ), as was the case among the Chaldeans ( Daniel 6:24 ) and the kings of Israel ( 1 Kings 21   2 Kings 9:26 ).  It has been noted that capital punishment is extensively prescribed by the Mosaic Law, and undoubtedly the Law was carried out. This circumstance has been explained by reference to the fact that the nation consisted of newly emancipated slaves, and therefore required harsh measures to keep them in check.  Under the Mosaic Law, the offenses that made one liable to the punishment of death were:  (1) striking or reviling a parent ( Exodus 21:15, 17 );  (2) blasphemy ( Leviticus 24:14, 16, 23   1 Kings 21:10   Matthew 26:65, 66 );  (3) Sabbath-breaking ( Exodus 31:14 ;  Exodus 35:2   Numbers 15:32-36 );  (4) witchcraft and false pretension to prophecy ( Exodus 22:18   Leviticus 20:27   Deuteronomy 13:5 ;  Deuteronomy 18:20   1 Samuel 28:9 );  (5) adultery ( Leviticus 20:10   Deuteronomy 22:22 );  (6) unchastity:  (a) before marriage, but detected afterward ( Deuteronomy 22:21 ),  (b) in case of a woman with someone other than her betrothed ( Deuteronomy 22:23 ),  (c) in a priest's daughter ( Leviticus 21:9 );  (7) rape ( Deuteronomy 22:25 );  (8) incestuous and unnatural connections ( Exodus 22:19   Leviticus 20:11, 14, 16 );  (9) man-stealing ( Exodus 21:16 );  (10) idolatry, actual or virtual, in any form ( Leviticus 20:2   Deuteronomy 13:6 ;  Deuteronomy 17:2-7 );  (11) false witness in capital cases ( Deuteronomy 19:16, 19 ).  A large number of offenses come under the law of punishment by cutting off from the people, the meaning of which expression has led to some controversy. It may signify excommunication or death, and occurs in connection with the following offenses:  (1) breach of morals, such as willful sin in general ( Numbers 15:30, 31 ); incestuous or unclean connections (Leviticus 18:29; 29:9-21);  (2) breach of covenant, brought about through uncircumcision ( Genesis 17:14   Exodus 4:24 ), neglect of Passover ( Numbers 9:13 ), Sabbath-breaking ( Exodus 31:14 ), neglect of Atonement Day ( Leviticus 23:29 ), work done on the Atonement Day ( Leviticus 23:30 ), children offered to Molech ( Leviticus 20:3 ), witchcraft ( Leviticus 20:6 ), anointing an alien with holy oil ( Exodus 30:33 );  (3) breach of ritual, committed by eating leavened bread during Passover ( Exodus 12:15, 19 ), eating fat of sacrifices ( Leviticus 7:25 ), eating blood ( Leviticus 7:27 ;  Leviticus 17:14 ), eating sacrifices while unclean ( Leviticus 7:20, 21 ;  Leviticus 22:3, 4, 9 ), offering too late ( Leviticus 19:8 ), making holy ointment for private use ( Exodus 30:32, 33 ), making perfume for private use ( Exodus 30:38 ), general neglect of purification ( Numbers 19:13, 20 ), not bringing offering after slaying a beast for food ( Leviticus 17:9 ), slaying the animal at a place other than the tabernacle door ( Leviticus 17:4 ), touching holy things illegally ( Numbers 4:15, 18, 20 ).  Of capital punishments that are properly regarded as of Hebrew origin, we note:  (1) Stoning  Stoning, which was the ordinary mode of execution ( Exodus 19:13   Leviticus 20:27   Joshua 7:25   Luke 20:6   Acts 7:58 ;  Acts 14:5 ). The witnesses, of whom there were at least two, were required to cast the first stone ( Deuteronomy 13:9   John 8:7 ). If these failed to cause death, the bystanders proceeded to complete the sentence, whereupon the body was to be suspended until sunset ( Deuteronomy 21:23 ).  (2) Hanging  Hanging is mentioned ( Numbers 25:4   Deuteronomy 21:22 ), probably not as a mode of execution, but rather of exposure after death. It may have been a Canaanitish punishment, since it was practiced by the Gibeonites on the sons of Saul ( 2 Samuel 21:6, 9 ).  (3) Burning  Burning, before the age of Moses, was the punishment of unchastity ( Genesis 38:24 ). The Law prescribes it as a punishment in the case of a priest's daughter ( Leviticus 21:9 ), and in case of incest ( Leviticus 20:14 ), but it is also mentioned as following death by other means ( Joshua 7:25 ), and some believe it was never used except after death. That it was sometimes used as a punishment on living persons among the heathen is shown by Daniel 3.  (4) The Sword or Spear  The sword or spear as an instrument of punishment is named in the Law ( Exodus 19:13 ;  Exodus 32:27   Numbers 25:7 ). It occurs frequently in monarchic and post-Bab times ( Judges 9:5   1 Samuel 15:33   2 Samuel 20:22   1 Kings 19:1   Jeremiah 26:23   Matthew 14:8, 10 ), but among these cases, there are some of assassination rather than of punishment.  (5) Strangling  Strangling as a form of punishment has no Scripture authority, but according to tradition was frequently employed, and is said to have been performed by immersing the convict in clay or mud, and then strangling him by a cloth tied around the neck.  3. Punishments of Foreign Origin: Besides these, which are to be regarded as the ordinary capital punishments, we read of some that were either of foreign introduction or of an irregular kind, such as:  (1) crucifixion (which see);  (2) drowning ( Matthew 18:6  parallel);  (3) sawing asunder or crushing ( 2 Samuel 12:31   Hebrews 11:37 );  (4) torturing ( 1 Chronicles 20:3   Hebrews 11:35 );  (5) precipitation ( 2 Chronicles 25:12   Luke 4:29 );  (6) suffocation (2 Maccabees 13:4-8).  The Persians are said to have filled a high tower a great way up with ashes, and then to have thrown the criminal into it, and continually stirred up the ashes by means of a wheel till he was suffocated (Rawlinson, Ancient Monarchy, III, 246).  See also  HEROD, II, 100 .  Secondary forms of punishment not heretofore mentioned are to be noted as follows:  (1) Blinding or Putting Out of Eyes  Blinding or putting out of eyes in the case of captives ( Judges 16:21   1 Samuel 11:2   2 Kings 25:7 ).  (2) Chaining  Chaining by means of manacles or fetters of copper or iron, similar to our handcuffs fastened on the wrists and ankles and attached to each other by a chain ( Judges 16:21   2 Samuel 3:34   2 Kings 25:7 ); also alluded to in the life of Paul ( Acts 28:20   Ephesians 6:20   2 Timothy 1:16 ); and in the case of Peter ( Acts 12:6 ).  (3) Confiscation of Property  Confiscation of property that had fallen under the ban, i.e. had been singled out for destruction by the special decree of Yahweh, as in  Numbers 21:2   Joshua 6:17 ; or had been reserved for the use of the army ( Deuteronomy 2:35 ;  Deuteronomy 20:14   Joshua 22:8 ); or given over to the priesthood ( Joshua 6:19 ). The term may be extended to include all things vowed or sanctified and those irrevocably devoted or consecrated to God ( Leviticus 27:21, 28 ). The idea is applied with special emphasis to those things which, because of their uncleanness, must not be used by the Israelites, though, through their warfare with the heathen, they might have come into possession of them ( Deuteronomy 7:26   1 Samuel 15:16-23 ).  (4) Dashing in Pieces (Psalms 2:9; Isaiah 13:18).  (5) Divine Visitation.  See VISITATION .  (6) Exposure to Wild Beasts (Leviticus 26:22; 1 Samuel 17:46; Daniel 6).  (7) Flaying  (Rawlinson, Ancient Monarchy, I, 478; Nineveh and Babylon; mentioned figuratively in  Micah 3:3 ).  (8) Forfeiture (Ezra 10:8).  (9) Gallows  Gallows in the modern sense probably were unknown to the ancients. Where the word occurs in  Esther 5:14 ;  Esther 6:4 ;  Esther 7:9, 10 ; 9:13, 15, it probably refers to a beam or pole on which the body was impaled and then elevated to a height of 50 cubits as an object of warning to the people (see "Hanging").  (10) Imprisonment  Imprisonment is frequently referred to in both the Old Testament and the New Testament, indicating that this was a common mode of punishment among both the Israelites and other nations ( Genesis 40:3 ;  Genesis 42:17   Leviticus 24:12   Numbers 15:34   1 Kings 22:27   Jeremiah 37:15, 21   Luke 3:20   Acts 4:3, 10 ;  Acts 23:10 ; and the Epistles of Paul).  See PRISON .  (11) Indignities.  In this term may be included all those outbursts of vengeance or other evil dispositions that were practiced in times or under circumstances when liberties with the prisoner were permitted on the part of bystanders or those who had charge beyond the execution of the judicial decree. Instances are found in the life of Christ ( Matthew 26:59, 67   Luke 22:63   John 18:22 ); also in the life of Paul ( Acts 23:2 ).  (12) Mutilation (Judges 1:6, 7; Ezekiel 23:25; 2 Maccabees 7).  The Law was opposed to thus treating any Israelite, and Samuel, when referring to the arbitrary power of the future king ( 1 Samuel 8:10 ), does not say that he would thus treat "their sons." It was a barbarous custom of the East (see EUNUCH; POLYGAMY), evidently regarded, among the Hebrews, as a heinous practice ( Deuteronomy 23:1 ). The only act authorizing mutilation (except in retaliation) is mentioned in  Deuteronomy 25:11 .  (13) Plucking Off the Hair  Plucking off the hair is alluded to as a mode of punishment in  Nehemiah 13:25   Isaiah 50:6 .  (14) Prison Garments  Prison garments were in vogue to mark the convicts ( Jeremiah 52:33 ).  (15) Restitution  Restitution has been alluded to in the general introduction to this topic.  (16) Retaliation  Retaliation was recognized by Moses as a principle, but the application of it was left to the judge ( Leviticus 24:19-22 ). A fine example of it is found in the law of  Deuteronomy 19:19 .  (17) Scorpions, Chastising with.  Probably the use of thongs armed with pointed pieces of lead or other metal ( 1 Kings 12:11   2 Chronicles 10:14 ).  See SCORPIONS .  (18) Scourging.  Seeseparate article.  (19) Slavery.  Seeseparate article.  (20) Stocks.  See PRISON .  Frank E. Hirsch
CENCHREAE|     sen'-kre-e (Kegchreai, Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek Kenchreai; the King James Version incorrectly Cenchrea): A seaport of Corinth on the eastern side of the isthmus (see CORINTH). Here according to  Acts 18:18 , Paul had his hair shorn before sailing for Syria, since he had a vow. A local church must have been established there by Paul, since Phoebe, the deaconess of Cenchrea, was entrusted with the Epistle to the Romans, and was commended to them in the highest terms by the apostle, who charged them to "assist her in whatsoever matter she may have need" ( Romans 16:1, 2 ).
LASCIVIOUSNESS|     la-siv'-i-us-nes (aselgeia, "licentiousness," "wantonness," "unbridled lust," "shamelessness," "outrageousness"):  1. Sources:  Etymologists assign three probable sources of aselgeia, namely:  (1) from a compound of the alpha privitive (negation) and Selge, a Pisidian city whose inhabitants according to Thayer (New Testament Lexicon) "excelled in strictness of morals," but, according to Trench, a place whose people "were infamous for their vices";  (2) from a compound of "a" intense, and salagein, "to raise a disturbance or noise";  (3) from a compound of the alpha privitive a- and selgo, or thelgo, "exciting disgust or displeasure." It evidently means conduct and character that is unbecoming, indecent, unrestrainedly shameless.  2. As Used in the New Testament:  Mark uses it in 7:22 with uncertainty as to the vice meant. Paul ( 2 Corinthians 12:21 ) classes it with uncleanness and fornication as sins to be repented of; also ( Galatians 5:19 ; compare The Wisdom of Solomon 14:26, "wantonness") puts it in the same catalogue with other works of the flesh; and ( Ephesians 4:19 ) he refers to some aged ones so covetous, that they made trade of themselves by giving "themselves up to lasciviousness." The same word is translated "wantonness" in  Romans 13:13 , meaning wanton manner, filthy words, unchaste movements of the body. Peter ( 1 Peter 4:3 ) mentions those who "walked in lasciviousness, lusts, winebibbings, revellings, carousings, and abominable idolatries." He speaks ( 2 Peter 2:2 ) of "lascivious doings" (the King James Version "pernicious ways"); ( 2 Peter 2:7 ) "lascivious life" (the King James Version "filthy conversation"); and ( 2 Peter 2:18 ) of "lasciviousness" (the King James Version "wantonness"), as a means "to entice in the lusts of the flesh."  Jude 1:4  probably does not refer to any form of sensuality in using the word descriptive of "ungodly men" who perverted the faith of some and denied our only Master.  William Edward Raffety
GAZEZ|     ga'-zez (gazez, "shearer"):  (1) A son of Ephah, Caleb's concubine ( 1 Chronicles 2:46 ).  (2) A second Gazez is mentioned in the same verse as a son of Haran, another son of Ephah.
HORNS|    OF THE ALTAR  (qare-noth ha-mizbeach):  1. The Brazen Altar:  These projections at the four corners of the altar of burnt offering were of one piece with the altar, and were made of acacia wood overlaid with brass ( Exodus 27:2 , "bronze"). In Ezekiel's altar-specifications their position is described as being on a level with the altar hearth ( Ezekiel 43:15 ). Fugitives seeking asylum might cling to the horns of the altar, as did Adonijah ( 1 Kings 1:50 ), which is one proof among many that worshippers had at all times access to the neighborhood of the altar. On certain occasions, as at the consecration of Aaron and his sons ( Exodus 29:12 ), and a sin offering for one of the people of the land ( Leviticus 4:30 ), the horns were touched with sacrificial blood.  2. The Golden Altar:  The altar of incense, standing in the outer chamber of the sanctuary, had also four horns, which were covered with gold ( Exodus 37:25 ). These were touched with blood in the case of a sin offering for a high priest, or for the whole congregation, if they had sinned unwittingly ( Leviticus 4:7, 18 ).  See  ALTAR ;  HORN .  W. Shaw Caldecott  HORNS, RAMS'  See  MUSIC .
KEHELATHAH|Assembly, one of the stations of the Israelites in the desert ( Numbers 33:22 ,  23). 
EPHER|A calf.  (1.) One of the sons of Midian, who was Abraham's son by Keturah ( Genesis 25:4 ). (2.) The head of one of the families of trans-Jordanic Manasseh who were carried captive by Tiglath-pileser ( 1 Chronicles 5:24 ). 
GERGESENES|     gur'-ge-senz, gur-ge-senz': A false reading of "Gadarenes" retained in the King James Version of  Matthew 8:28 .  See  GADARA .
ESROM|     es'-rom, ez'-rom (Esrom):  the King James Version, the Greek form of Hezron (thus the Revised Version (British and American)) ( Matthew 1:3   Luke 3:33 ).
ZAPHNATHPAANEAH|The name which Pharaoh gave to Joseph when he raised him to the rank of prime minister or grand vizier of the kingdom ( Genesis 41:45 ). This is a pure Egyptian word, and has been variously explained. Some think it means "creator," or "preserver of life." Brugsch interprets it as "governor of the district of the place of life", i.e., of Goshen, the chief city of which was Pithom, "the place of life." Others explain it as meaning "a revealer of secrets," or "the man to whom secrets are revealed." 
CONANIAH|Whom Jehovah hath set, a Levite placed over the tithes brought into the temple ( 2 Chronicles 35:9 ). 
DALPHON|     dal'-fon (dalphon, "crafty"): The second of the ten sons of Haman, slain by the Jews ( Esther 9:7 ).
IIM|Ruins.  (1.) A city in the south of Judah ( Joshua 15:29 ). (2.) One of the stations of the Israelites in the wilderness ( Numbers 33:45 ). 
ISHI|My husband, a symbolical name used in  Hosea 2:16  (see  BAALI .) 
GERSHONITES|   GERSHON;   gur'-shon, gur'-shon-its (gereshon, written also gereshom): Firstborn of the 3 sons of Levi ( Exodus 6:16   Numbers 3:17   1 Chronicles 6:1, 16 ;  1 Chronicles 23:6 ). He had two sons, Libni, also known as Ladan ( 1 Chronicles 23:7 ;  1 Chronicles 26:21 ), and Shimei ( Exodus 6:17   Numbers 3:18   1 Chronicles 6:17, 20 ), and consequently two groups of descendants, enumerated in the census taken in the Wilderness of Sinai ( Numbers 3:21 ) and that in the Plains of Moab ( Numbers 26:57 ). In the distribution of functions among the Levites, the Gershonites were charged with the carrying of the curtains, coverings, screens, hangings, cords and instruments of the tabernacle and the tent of meeting on the journeys in the wilderness, under the supervision of Ithamar the son of Aaron. Their function was thus more exalted than that of the Merarites, who carried the boards, and less so than that of the Kohathites, who carried the most holy utensils and symbols. The Gershonites were given two wagons with four oxen-half as many as the Merarites, according to their service ( Numbers 7:7 ). Thirteen cities were assigned to the Gershonites in Northern Palestine by Eleazar and Joshua (Jos 21:6, 27-33, 6:62, 71-76).  Among the Gershonites who achieved distinction in later Biblical times was the family of Asaph, the singers from the time of David to the days of the Second Temple ( 1 Chronicles 6:31-47 ;  1 Chronicles 25:1-7 ; 15:7, 17, 19; 16:5, 7  2 Chronicles 25:15   Ezra 2:41 ;  Ezra 3:10   Nehemiah 11:17, 22 ;  Nehemiah 12:35   1 Chronicles 9:15 ). Other Gershonites named are the heads of the fathers' houses in the days of David in connection with the dividing of the Levites into courses ( 1 Chronicles 23:7-11 ); the superintendents of the treasuries of the house of the Lord of the same time ( 1 Chronicles 26:21, 22 ;  1 Chronicles 29:8 ); and, finally, Gershonites are mentioned among those who cleansed the house of the Lord in the days of Hezekiah ( 2 Chronicles 29:12, 13 ).  Ella Davis Isaacs
JONATHAN|Whom Jehovah gave, the name of fifteen or more persons that are mentioned in Scripture. The chief of these are,  (1.) A Levite descended from Gershom ( Judges 18:30 ). His history is recorded in 17:7-13 and 18:30. The Rabbins changed this name into Manasseh "to screen the memory of the great lawgiver from the stain of having so unworthy an apostate among his near descendants." He became priest of the idol image at Dan, and this office continued in his family till the Captivity. (2.) The eldest son of king Saul, and the bosom friend of David. He is first mentioned when he was about thirty years of age, some time after his father's accession to the throne ( 1 Samuel 13:2 ). Like his father, he was a man of great strength and activity ( 2 Samuel 1:23 ), and excelled in archery and slinging ( 1 Chronicles 12:2 ; 2 Samuel 1:22 ). The affection that evidently subsisted between him and his father was interrupted by the growth of Saul's insanity. At length, "in fierce anger," he left his father's presence and cast in his lot with the cause of David ( 1 Samuel 20:34 ). After an eventful career, interwoven to a great extent with that of David, he fell, along with his father and his two brothers, on the fatal field of Gilboa ( 1 Samuel 31:2 ,  8). He was first buried at Jabesh-gilead, but his remains were afterwards removed with those of his father to Zelah, in Benjamin ( 2 Samuel 21:12 -14). His death was the occasion of David's famous elegy of "the Song of the Bow" ( 2 Samuel 1:17 -27). He left one son five years old, Merib-baal, or Mephibosheth ( 2 Samuel 4:4 ; Comp.  1 Chronicles 8:34 ). (3.) Son of the high priest Abiathar, and one who adhered to David at the time of Absalom's rebellion ( 2 Samuel 15:27 ,  36). He is the last descendant of Eli of whom there is any record. (4.) Son of Shammah, and David's nephew, and also one of his chief warriors ( 2 Samuel 21:21 ). He slew a giant in Gath. 
MEROZ|A plain in the north of Palestine, the inhabitants of which were severely condemned because they came not to help Barak against Sisera ( Judges 5:23  Comp.  21:8 -10;  1 Samuel 11:7 ). It has been identified with Marassus, on a knoll to the north of Wady Jalud, but nothing certainly is known of it. Like Chorazin, it is only mentioned in Scripture in connection with the curse pronounced upon it. 
SHEMEBER|Soaring on high, the king of Zeboiim, who joined with the other kings in casting off the yoke of Chedorlaomer. After having been reconquered by him, he was rescued by Abraham ( Genesis 14:2 ). 
IZRAHIAH|     iz-ra-hi'-a (yizrachyah, "Yah appears, or shines"):  (1) A descendant of Issachar, grandson of Tola, only son of Uzzi ( 1 Chronicles 7:3 ).  (2) The leader of the singing at the purification of the people, on the occasion of Nehemiah's reformation; here rendered "Jezrahiah" ( Nehemiah 12:42 ).
HARUPHITE|A native of Hariph; an epithet given to Shephatiah, one of those who joined David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:5 ). 
MICHAIAH| (1.) The queen-mother of King Abijah ( 2 Chronicles 13:2 ). (see  MAACAH  ). (2.) One of those sent out by Jehoshaphat to instruct the people in the law ( 2 Chronicles 17:7 ). (3.)  2 Kings 22:12 . (4.) The son of Gemariah. He reported to the king's officers Jeremiah's prediction, which he had heard Baruch read ( Jeremiah 36:11 ,  13) from his father Gemariah's chamber in the temple. (5.) A Levite ( Nehemiah 12:35 ). (6.) A priest ( Nehemiah 12:41 ). 
DAYS|   ANCIENT OF   (`attiq yomin, = Aramaic): On `attiq, see ANCIENT (4). The expression is used in reference to God in  Daniel 7:9, 13, 22  and is not intended to suggest the existence of God from eternity. It was the venerable appearance of old age that was uppermost in the writer's mind. "What Daniel sees is not the eternal God Himself, but an aged man, in whose dignified and impressive form God reveals Himself (compare  Ezekiel 1:26 )" (Keil).  DAYS, LAST  See  LAST DAYS .  LAST DAYS  See  ESCHATOLOGY OF THE OLD TESTAMENT .
ELIOENAI|Toward Jehovah are my eyes, the name of several men mentioned in the Old Testament ( 1 Chronicles 7:8 ;  4:36 ;  Ezra 10:22 ,  27). Among these was the eldest son of Neariah, son of Shemaiah, of the descendants of Zerubbabel. His family are the latest mentioned in the Old Testament ( 1 Chronicles 3:23 ,  24). 
SHEPHUPHAN|   SHEPHUPHAM,   she-fu'-fam or she-fu'-fan (shephupham; Codex Vaticanus and Codex Alexandrinus Sophan; Lucian, Sophan ( Numbers 26:39 (43 )); or Shephuphan, shephuphan; Codex Vaticanus Sopharphak, Codex Alexandrinus Sophan, Lucian, Seppham ( 1 Chronicles 8:5 ), "a kind of serpent," Gray, HPN, 95): Eponym of a Benjamite family. The name occurs in  Genesis 46:21  as "Muppim" and in  1 Chronicles 7:12, 15 ;  1 Chronicles 26:16  as "Shuppim." It is almost impossible to arrive at the original form; the gentilic "Shuphamites" appears in  Numbers 26:39  (43).
BEERA|     be-e'-ra, be'-er-a (be'era', expounder):  A descendant of Asher (1 Chronicles 7:37). 
THARA|     tha'-ra, thar'-a (Thara): the King James Version; Greek form of "Terah" (thus,  Luke 3:34  the Revised Version (British and American)).
PERIZZITES|Villagers; dwellers in the open country, the Canaanitish nation inhabiting the fertile regions south and south-west of Carmel. "They were the graziers, farmers, and peasants of the time." They were to be driven out of the land by the descendants of Abraham ( Genesis 15:20 ;  Exodus 3:8 ,  17;  23:23 ;  33:2 ;  34:11 ). They are afterwards named among the conquered tribes ( Joshua 24:11 ). Still lingering in the land, however, they were reduced to servitude by Solomon ( 1 Kings 9:20 ). 
BILHAN|    (3)  bil'-han (bilhan; Balaan):  (1) A Horite chief, son of Ezer ( Genesis 36:27   1 Chronicles 1:42 ).  (2) A descendant of Benjamin, son of Jediael, father of seven sons who were heads of houses in their tribes ( 1 Chronicles 7:10 ).  BILL, BOND, etc.  (1) In the parable of the Unjust Steward ( Luke 16:6 f ) "bill," the King James Version, better "bond," the Revised Version (British and American), is used to translate the Greek grammata, which is the equivalent of the contemporary Hebrew legal term sheTar, "writing." This "writing," in the usage of the times, was an acknowledgment of the taking over or receiving of goods or money that had to be written and signed by the debtor himself. (See Babha' Bathra'  Luke 10:8 .) Edersheim's averment that the Greek word was adopted into the Hebrew (Life and Times of Jesus the Messiah, II, 272), is based, according to competent textual critics, upon a false reading. The Greek, according to Tischendorf, Tregelles, and Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek, is ta grammata, not to gramma (Textus Receptus of the New Testament). The word is indefinite, literally "the letter," and determines nothing involved in controversy.  (2) A question much discussed is, Was "the bond" (the Revised Version (British and American)) merely an acknowledgment of debt, or was it an obligation to pay a fixed annual rental from the produce of a farm? Edersheim, for instance, holds the former view, Lightfoot the latter. That the obligation is stated in the parable in kind-wheat and oil-and not in money-seems to bear against the simple debt theory. Edersheim sets down the remissions spoken of as authorized by the steward as amounting in money value to only about 5 British pounds and 25 British pounds respectively, and thinks they represented not a single but an annual payment (compare Kennedy, 1-vol HDB, and Fraser, DCG, article "Bill").  (3) Still another question has arisen: Was the old "bond" simply altered, or was a new one substituted for it? Here again Lightfoot and Edersheim are in the controversy and on opposite sides. The alteration of the old bond is suggested though not demanded by the language here, and, moreover, would be, Edersheim thinks, in accordance with the probabilities of the case. Such bonds were usually written, not on vellum or papyrus, but on wax-covered tablets, and so could be easily erased or altered by the stylus with its fiat, thick "eraser" (mocheq).  (4) It is probably safe to conclude:  (a) that the "bill" or "bond" had to be written and signed by the person assuming the obligation;  (b) that it was the only formal or legal evidence of the debt incurred; and  (c) that the supervision of the whole transaction belonged of right to "the steward." Should "the steward" conspire with the debtor against the master, the latter, it would appear, would have no check against the fraud.  LITERATURE.  Lightfoot, Hor. Hebrew, edition L. and T., II, 268-73; Edersheim, Life and Times of Jesus the Messiah, II, 272; crit. commentary in the place cited.  George B. Eager
BOCHERU|     bo'-ke-roo (bokheru): A son of Azrikam, Saul's descendant ( 1 Chronicles 8:38  =  1 Chronicles 9:34 ). For the ending ("-u"), compare the forms gashmu ( Nehemiah 6:1, 6 ) and melikhu ( Nehemiah 12:14  the King James Version and the Revised Version, margin).
JAAZANIAH|Heard by Jehovah.  (1.) The son of Jeremiah, and one of the chief Rechabites ( Jeremiah 35:3 ). (2.) The son of Shaphan ( Ezek. 8:11 ). (3.) The son of Azur, one of the twenty-five men seen by Ezekiel ( 11:1 ) at the east gate of the temple. (4.) A Maachathite ( 2 Kings 25:23 ;  Jeremiah 40:8 ;  42:1 ). He is also called Azariah ( Jeremiah 43:2 ). 
SAMECH|     sam'-ek (camekh): The 15th letter of the Hebrew alphabet; transliterated in this Encyclopedia as "c". It came to be used for the number 60. For name, etc., see ALPHABET.
NICODEMUS|The people is victor, a Pharisee and a member of the Sanhedrin. He is first noticed as visiting Jesus by night ( John 3:1 -21) for the purpose of learning more of his doctrines, which our Lord then unfolded to him, giving prominence to the necessity of being "born again." He is next met with in the Sanhedrin ( 7:50 -52), where he protested against the course they were taking in plotting against Christ. Once more he is mentioned as taking part in the preparation for the anointing and burial of the body of Christ ( John 19:39 ). We hear nothing more of him. There can be little doubt that he became a true disciple. 
IRPEEL|     ur'-pe-el, ir'-pe-el (yirpe'el): A city in Benjamin ( Joshua 18:27 ). It may possibly be represented by Rafat, a ruin to the North of el-Jib, the ancient Gibeon.
MARTHA|Bitterness, the sister of Lazarus and Mary, and probably the eldest of the family, who all resided at Bethany ( Luke 10:38 ,  40,  41;  John 11:1 -39). From the residence being called "her house," some have supposed that she was a widow, and that her brother and sister lodged with her. She seems to have been of an anxious, bustling spirit, anxious to be helpful in providing the best things for the Master's use, in contrast to the quiet earnestness of Mary, who was more concerned to avail herself of the opportunity of sitting at his feet and learning of him. Afterwards at a supper given to Christ and his disciples in her house "Martha served." Nothing further is known of her. "Mary and Martha are representatives of two orders of human character. One was absorbed, preoccupied, abstracted; the other was concentrated and single-hearted. Her own world was the all of Martha; Christ was the first thought with Mary. To Martha life was `a succession of particular businesses;' to Mary life 'was rather the flow of one spirit.' Martha was Petrine, Mary was Johannine. The one was a well-meaning, bustling busybody; the other was a reverent disciple, a wistful listener." Paul had such a picture as that of Martha in his mind when he spoke of serving the Lord "without distraction" ( 1 Corinthians 7:35 ). 
JESHURUN|A poetical name for the people of Israel, used in token of affection, meaning, "the dear upright people" ( Deuteronomy 32:15 ;  33:5 ,  26;  Isaiah 44:2 ). 
ELPELET|     el'-pe-let.  See  ELIPHALAT .
CHILMAD|A place or country unknown which, along with Sheba and Asshur, traded with Tyre ( Ezek. 27:23 ). 
IGDALIAH|     ig-da-li'-a (yighdalyahu, "Yah is great"): Ancestor of certain persons who had a "chamber" in the temple in Jeremiah's time ( Jeremiah 35:4 ).
NAARAI|Youthful, a military chief in David's army ( 1 Chronicles 11:37 ), called also Paarai ( 2 Samuel 23:35 ). 
MERED|Rebellion, one of the sons of Ezra, of the tribe of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:17 ). 
LEFTHANDED|( Judges 3:15 ;  20:16 ), one unable to use the right hand skilfully, and who therefore uses the left; and also one who uses the left as well as the right, ambidexter. Such a condition of the hands is due to physical causes. This quality was common apparently in the tribe of Benjamin. 
SARSECHIM|     sar'-se-kim, sar-se-kim (sarckhim): A prince of Nebuchadnezzar, present at the taking of Jerusalem by Nebuchadnezzar in the 11th year of Zedekiah ( Jeremiah 39:3 ). The versions with their various readings-"Nabousachar" "Nabousarach," "Sarsacheim"-point to a corrupt text. The best emendation is the reading "Nebhoshazibhon" (= Nabusezib-anni, "Nebo delivers me"); this is based on the reading in  Jeremiah 39:13 .
GIBEAH|A hill or hill-town, "of Benjamin" ( 1 Samuel 13:15 ), better known as "Gibeah of Saul" ( 11:4 ;  Isaiah 10:29 ). It was here that the terrible outrage was committed on the Levite's concubine which led to the almost utter extirpation of the tribe of Benjamin ( Judges 19 ; 20), only six hundred men surviving after a succession of disastrous battles. This was the birthplace of Saul, and continued to be his residence after he became king ( 1 Samuel 10:26 ;  11:4 ;  15:34 ). It was reckoned among the ancient sanctuaries of Palestine ( 10:26 ;  15:34 ;  23:19 ;  26:1 ;  2 Samuel 21:6 -10), and hence it is called "Gibeah of God" ( 1 Samuel 10:5 ,  R.V. marg.). It has been identified with the modern Tell el-Ful (i.e.,  "hill of the bean"), about 3 miles north of Jerusalem.  Gibeah of Judah ( Joshua 15:57 ), a city in the mountains of Judah, the modern Jeba, on a hill in the Wady Musurr, about 7 1/2 miles west-south-west of Bethlehem.  Gibeah of Phinehas ( Joshua 15:57 ,  R.V. marg.), a city on Mount Ephraim which had been given to Phinehas ( 24:33  "hill, " A.V.; R.V. marg. and Hebrews,  "Gibeah."). Here Eleazar the son of Aaron was buried. It has been identified with the modern Khurbet Jibia, 5 miles north of Guphna towards Shechem. 
ZEBUL|Habitation, the governor of Shechem under Abimelech ( Judges 9:28 ,  30,  36). He informed his master of the intention of the people of Shechem to transfer their allegiance to the Hivite tribe of Hamor. This led to Abimelech's destroying the city, when he put its entire population to the sword, and sowed the ruins with salt ( Judges 9:28 -45). 
ELIUD|     e-li'-ud (Elioud, "God my praise"):  An ancestor of Jesus, four generations before Joseph ( Matthew 1:15 ).
DINAH|Judged; vindicated, daughter of Jacob by Leah, and sister of Simeon and Levi ( Genesis 30:21 ). She was seduced by Shechem, the son of Hamor, the Hivite chief, when Jacob's camp was in the neighbourhood of Shechem. This led to the terrible revenge of Simeon and Levi in putting the Shechemites to death ( Genesis 34 ). Jacob makes frequent reference to this deed of blood with abhorrence and regret ( Genesis 34:30 ;  49:5 -7). She is mentioned among the rest of Jacob's family that went down into Egypt ( Genesis 46:8 ,  15). 
BAALAH|Mistress; city.  (1.) A city in the south of Judah ( Joshua 15:29 ), elsewhere called Balah ( Joshua 19:3 ) and Bilhah ( 1 Chronicles 4:29 ). Now Khurbet Zebalah. (2.) A city on the northern border of the tribe of Judah ( Joshua 15:10 ), called also Kirjath-jearim, q.v. ( 15:9 ;  1 Chronicles 13:6 ), now Kuriet-el-Enab, or as some think, `Erma. (3.) A mountain on the north-western boundary of Judah and Dan ( Joshua 15:11 ). 
RANKS|     ranks (prasid, "a square plot of ground," "a garden-bed"): "They sat down in ranks" ( Mark 6:40 ); the several reclining ranks formed, as it were, separate plots or "garden-beds."
JAHZAH|     ja'-za.  See  JAHAZ .
SLOPES|     slops.  See  ASHDOTH PISGAH .
BEANS|Mentioned in  2 Samuel 17:28  as having been brought to David when flying from Absalom. They formed a constituent in the bread Ezekiel ( 4:9 ) was commanded to make, as they were in general much used as an article of diet. They are extensively cultivated in Egypt and Arabia and Syria. 
MERAB|Increase, the eldest of Saul's two daughters ( 1 Samuel 14:49 ). She was betrothed to David after his victory over Goliath, but does not seem to have entered heartily into this arrangement ( 18:2 ,  17,  19). She was at length, however, married to Adriel of Abel-Meholah, a town in the Jordan valley, about 10 miles south of Bethshean, with whom the house of Saul maintained alliance. She had five sons, who were all put to death by the Gibeonites on the hill of Gibeah ( 2 Samuel 21:8 ). 
VAJEZATHA|Purity; worthy of honour, one of Haman's sons, whom the Jews slew in the palace of Shushan ( Esther 9:9 ). 
CASIPHIA|Silver, a place between Babylon and Jerusalem, where Iddo resided ( Ezra 8:17 ); otherwise unknown. 
KISHION|Hardness, a city of Issachar assigned to the Gershonite Levites ( Joshua 19:20 ), the same as Kishon ( 21:28 ). 
PARBAR|( 1 Chronicles 26:18 ), a place apparently connected with the temple, probably a "suburb" (q.v.), as the word is rendered in  2 Kings 23:11 ; a space between the temple wall and the wall of the court; an open portico into which the chambers of the official persons opened ( 1 Chronicles 26:18 ). 
SYRIANS|     sir'-i-anz ('aram; Suroi; Assyrian Aramu, Arumu, Arimu):  1. Division of Aram  2. A Semitic Race  3. Syria and Israel  4. Under Nabateans and Palmyrenes  5. A Mixed Race, Semitic Type  6. Religion  The terms "Syria" and "Syrians" are used in two senses in the Bible. In the Old Testament they are uniformly "Aram," "Aramaean," while in the New Testament they are used in a wider and more indefinite sense ( Matthew 4:24   Acts 15:23 ;  Acts 18:18   Galatians 1:21 ), and include all the dwellers of the land whether Arameans or not.  1. Division of Aram:  Aram was divided into several districts, comprising, in general, the region to the East of the Jordan, but extending in the North over most of Northern Syria, or from the Orontes eastward, and Northern Mesopotamia. This latter division was called Aram-naharaim-Aram of the two rivers, i.e. Tigris and Euphrates-and is the Nahrina of the Egyptian inscriptions. It is also called Paddan-aram in the Old Testament ( Genesis 25:20 ) or field of Aram ( Hosea 12:12 ). The most important of the divisions of Aram in Old Testament times was Aram-dammesek, the Syria of Damascus, which sometimes dominated all of the other divisions lying to the South, such as Rehob, Tob, Zobah, and Mancab ( 2 Samuel 10:8 ). Geshur was in this region and should be reckoned as an Aramean dis-trict ( 2 Samuel 15:8 ).  2. A Semitic Race:  The Arameans were of Semitic stock and closely akin to the Hebrews. Aram is called a son of Shem ( Genesis 10:22 ), which means a descendant, for we find him afterward called a grandson of Nahor, the brother of Abraham ( Genesis 22:21 ). The Israelites were taught to say "A Syrian (Ara-maean) ready to perish was my father" ( Deuteronomy 26:5 ), and the kinship of the Hebrews and Arameans was further cemented by the marriage of Isaac with Rebekah, the sister of Laban the Syrian, and of Jacob with his daughters ( Genesis 24 ;  Genesis 29 ). The period when the Arameans first appeared in Syria is uncertain, but was probably later than 2000 B.C. When Abraham came from Haran, Damascus was already occupied ( Genesis 15:2 ), and this may have been the oldest settlement of the Arameans in Syria proper, although it is not mentioned on the monuments until long after, in the time of Thothmes III of Egypt, about 1479 B.C. The Syrians were generally hostile to the Hebrews and had wars with them from the time of David onward. David subdued them, although they were aided by the tribes from beyond the Euphrates ( 2 Samuel 10 ), but after the division of the kingdom they often proved too strong for the northern Israelites.  3. Syria and Israel:  In the days of Omri the Syrians of Damascus brought them into subjection, but Ahab recovered all the lost territory and Damascus seems to have been subordinate for a time ( 1 Kings 20:34 ). The king of Damascus afterward regained the supremacy, as appears from the Assyrian records, for in the war of Shalmaneser II with the peoples of Syria we find them led by Ben-hadad of Damascus and, among his subject allies, Ahab, who furnished 2,000 chariots and 10,000 men. Ben-hadad succeeded in uniting most of the petty kingdoms of Syria together in opposition to Assyria, but could not hold them, and they fell, one after another, as well as Damascus itself, into the hands of the great world-power. Jeroboam II recovered the districts that had been taken from Israel by the Syrians ( 2 Kings 14:25 ), but this was only a temporary success, for Rezin extended his authority over all the East-Jordanic region as far as Elath on the Red Sea ( 2 Kings 16:6 ), and he and Pekah joined in an attack upon Judah, but failed on account of the Assyrian advance ( 2 Kings 16:5-9 ). Damascus fell into the hands of Tiglath-pileser in 732 B.C., and the power of the Syrians was completely broken.  4. Under Nabatheans and Palmyrenes:  The Aramaic peoples became prominent again under the Nabateans and Palmyrenes, both of whom were of this stock, as their language is clearly Aramaic. The former established a kingdom extending from the Euphrates to the Red Sea, their capital being Petra, and Damascus was under their control in the reign of their king Aretas (el-Harith) ( 2 Corinthians 11:32 ). This kingdom was absorbed by Rome in the reign of Trajan. The Palmyrenes did not come into prominence until the 3rd century A.D., but became, for a short time, the leading power in Western Asia. In the weakness of Rome, under Gallienus, Odenathus and his still more distinguished wife, Zenobia, dominated all Syria, and the latter dared to dispute with Aurelian the empire of the East. With her fall in 272 A.D. the power of the Arameans was extinguished and never revived.  5. A Mixed Race, Semitic Type:  The Syrians in the broader sense have always been a mixed people, though of a prevailing Semitic type. The earliest layer of Semitic population was the Amorite which was found in Syria when the first Babylonian empire extended its authority over the land. Later appear the Canaanites, Phoenicians, Jebusites, Hivites and other tribes, all of which are classed together as descendants of Canaan in  Genesis 10 , but their Semitic character in historic times is undoubted. The Hyksos who were driven from Egypt to Palestine and Syria were of the same race, as would appear from the Egyptian records. The Arameans formed the next wave of Semitic stock, but there were others, like the Hittites, who were not Semitic, and the Philistines, whose race affinity is doubtful. The Egyptians occupied the country for a long period, but did not contribute much to the population. Some of the tribes brought in by the Assyrians may have been non-Semitic, but most of them were evidently of cognate race ( 2 Kings 17:24 ), and the racial characteristics of the Syrians were not changed. When Alexander and his successors brought in the Greek and Macedoninn elements there was a decided change in the city population, but little in the country districts, and although the Greeks had a powerful influence upon the civilization of the country the Semitic type overcame the admixture of Greek blood and prevailed in the country as a whole. The Romans ruled the country for centuries and established a number of military colonies, but they did not affect the population even as much as the Greeks. When, in the 7th century A.D., the Mohammedan conquest swept over Syria, it brought in another great wave of pure Semitic stock with the numerous Arab settlers, who tended to obliterate any non-Semitic elements that might have existed. The effects of the influx of Europeans in the time of the Crusades were not sufficient to produce any marked change, and the same may be said of all later invasions of Turks and Kurds.  The Syrians, while thus a mixed people to a large extent, have maintained the Semitic type, but they have never, in all their history, been able to unite politically, and have always been divided, when independent. They have been, during the greater part of their history, under foreign domination, as they still are, under Turkish rule.  6. Religion:  The religion of the Syrians in ancient times was undoubtedly similar to that of the Babylonians, as is shown by the names of their gods. The Arameans worshipped Hadad and Rimmon ( 2 Kings 5:18 ), sometimes joined as Hadadrimmon ( Zechariah 12:11 ). Baal, or Bel, Ashtoreth, or Ishtar, were almost universally worshipped, and Nebu, Agli-bol, Melakh-bol, Ati and other deities are found in the Palmyrene inscriptions, showing the Babylonian influence in their cult. This was to be expected from the known prevalence of Babylonian culture throughout Western Asia for centuries.  H. Porter
TELHARESHA|Hill of the wood, a place in Babylon from which some captive Jews returned to Jerusalem ( Ezra 2:59 ;  Nehemiah 7:61 ). 
SHEHARIAH|     she-ha-ri'-a (sheharyah): A Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 8:26 ).
UNCHANGEABLE|   ; UNCHANGEABLENESS  un-chanj'-a-bl, un-chanj'-a-bl-nes:  I. UNCHANGEABLENESS OF GOD A TRUTH OF NATURAL THEOLOGY  II. SCRIPTURAL DOCTRINE OF THE UNCHANGEABLENESS OF GOD  1. Not Lifeless Immobility  2. As Contrasted with the Finite  3. God's Knowledge, Will and Purpose  4. In His Relation to the World  5. His Relations to Men  LITERATURE  The unchangeablehess or immutability of God is that divine attribute which expresses the truth that in His nature and perfections, in His knowledge, will and purpose, He always remains the same in the fullness of His infinite and perfect Being; infinitely exalted above change, becoming and development, which are the specific characteristics of all finite existence. This is one of what theologians have called the incommunicable attributes of God, that is, one of those specific characteristics of the divine nature which make God to be God in distinction from all that is finite. These attributes have also been called negative attributes. By calling them negative, however, it is not meant that they express the nature of God in so far as He is unknowable and incomprehensible by the finite mind, while the positive attributes, such as love and righteousness, express God's nature as revealed and known. Both kinds of attributes can be known only in so far as God reveals Himself, and furthermore the so-called negative attributes involve a positive idea, while the positive ones in turn imply the negation of all finite limitations. Moreover, since the finite mind cannot comprehend the infinite God, back of all that God has revealed of Himself, back even of His absoluteness, eternity and unchangeability, lies the fullness of His infinite Being, unsearchable, unknowable, and incomprehensible alike in His nature and attributes ( Psalm 145:3 ;  Psalm 147:5   Job 11:7-9   Isaiah 40:28 ).  It is these incommunicable attributes, including unchangeableness, which make God to be God, and mark the specific difference between Him and all finite existence. Unchangeableness is, therefore, the characteristic of God's entire nature and of all His attributes. It cannot be limited to His ethical nature or to His love, and, while it is true that these incommunicable attributes are revealed with especial richness in God's saving activity, they cannot be limited to marks of God's saving action or purpose. It is true that God is unchangeable in His love and grace and power to save, but that is only because it is the love and grace and power of the absolute, infinite and immutable God.  I. Unchangeableness of God a Truth of Natural Theology.  As the One infinitely perfect and absolute or self-existent Being, God is exalted far above the possibility of change, because He is independent, self-existent and unlimited by all the causes of change. As uncaused and self-existent, God cannot be changed from without; as infinitely perfect, He cannot suffer change from within; and as eternal and independent of time, which is the "form" of change and mutability, He cannot be subject to any change at all. God's unchangeablehess, therefore, follows from His self-existence and eternity.  II. Scriptural Doctrine of the Unchangeableness of God.  The Scripture doctrine of God reaffirms this truth. It conceives of God as a living Person in relation to the world and man, and at the same time as absolutely unlimited by the world and man, and as absolutely unchangeable. The God who has revealed Himself in the Old Testament and the New Testament is never identified with, or merged in, the processes of Nature. He is complete and perfect in Himself, and is not the result of any process of self-realization. He is so great that His relations to the created universe cannot begin to exhaust His Being, and yet He stands in the closest relations to man and the world as Creator, Preserver, Governor, and Saviour.  1. Not Lifeless Immobility:  On the one hand, then, the Bible never represents the unchangeableness of God as a dead immobility out of all relation to man and the world. This tendency of thought, fearing anthropomorphism, proceeds on the principle that to make any definite predications about God is to limit Him. The logical result of this is to conceive of God as abstract Being or Substance, so that the word "God" becomes only a name for the Unknowable. Over against this error, the Scripture represents God concretely as a Person in relation to the world and man. In the beginning He created the heavens and the earth, and from that time on He is the life of the world, especially of Israel, His chosen people. To bring out this truth anthropomorphisms are employed. God comes and goes, reveals Himself and hides Himself. He repents ( Genesis 6:6   1 Samuel 15:11   Amos 7:3   Joel 2:13 ); He becomes angry ( Numbers 11:1   Psalm 106:40 ); and lays aside His anger ( Deuteronomy 13:17   Hosea 14:4 ). He sustains a different relation to the godly and the wicked ( Proverbs 11:20 ;  Proverbs 12:22 ). In the fullness of time He became incarnate through the Son, and He dwells in His people by His Spirit, their experience of His grace being greater at some times than at others.  But on the other hand, the Scripture always asserts in unmistakable terms the unchangeableness of God. He is unchangeable in His nature. Although the name 'El Shadday, by which He made Himself known in the patriarchal period of revelation, denotes especially God's power, this name by no means exhausts the revelation of God in that period. His unchangeableness is involved in His eternity as made known to Abraham ( Genesis 21:33 ). This attribute finds its clearest expression in the name Yahweh as revealed to Moses, the significance of which is unfolded in the passage  Exodus 3:13-15 . God here reveals Himself to His people as "I AM THAT I AM," using the future tense of the verb "to be," which, as the context shows, is given as the meaning of the name Yahweh. Some recent writers would derive these words from the Hiphil stem of the verb, and affirm that it signifies that God is the giver of life. The verb, however, is in the Qal stem, the tense denoting the changeless continuity of the life and nature of God. The idea expressed is not merely that of self-existence, but also of unchangeableness, and this unchangeableness, as the context clearly indicates (especially  Exodus 3:15 ), is here set forth not simply as belonging to the nature of God in Himself, but is brought into closest connection with His covenant relation to His people, so that the religious value of God's unchangeableness is most clearly implied in this fundamental assertion of the attribute. The same idea of God's immutability is reaffirmed in the prophecy of Isaiah. It is connected with the name Yahweh ( Isaiah 41:4 ; compare also 48:12), where Yahweh affirms that He is the first and, with the last, the same God, thereby asserting not merely His eternity, but also that He is the same in His divine existence throughout all ages. This attribute, moreover, is claimed by Yahweh, and set forth as an especial mark of His Godhead in  Isaiah 44:6 . The unchangeableness of the divine nature is also asserted by the prophet Malachi in a difficult passage (3:6). This is a clear affirmation of the unchangeableness of God, the only question being whether it is set forth as the ground of Israel's confidence, or in contrast with their fickleness, a question which depends partly on that of the text.  In the New Testament the thought of the passage in Exodus 3 is reiterated in the Apocalypse where God is described as He who is and was and is to come ( Revelation 1:4 ). This is an expansion of the covenant name Yahweh in  Exodus 3:13-15 , denoting not merely eternity but also immutability. The phrases "the Alpha and the Omega" ( Revelation 1:8 ;  Revelation 21:6 ;  Revelation 22:13 ); and "the first and the last" ( Revelation 1:17 ;  Revelation 22:13 ); and "the beginning and the end" ( Revelation 21:6 ;  Revelation 22:13 ) bring out the same idea, and are applied to Christ as well as to God, which is a clear indication of our Lord's Deity. The apostle Paul likewise asserts the incorruptibility, eternity and immortality of the divine nature, all of which ideas imply the unchangeableness of God ( Romans 1:23   1 Timothy 1:17 ;  1 Timothy 6:16 ).  2. As Contrasted with the Finite:  Not only is the unchangeableness of God's nature asserted in Scripture, and placed in relation to His dealings with men, but also it is declared to be the distinctive characteristic of God's nature as contrasted with the entire universe of finite being. While the heavens and the earth change and are passing away, God endures forever and forever the same God ( Psalm 102:26-28  (Hebrew versification, 27-29)). The application of the language of this psalm to Christ by the author of the Epistle to the  Hebrews 1:10-12  involves the unchangeableness of Christ, which is again explicitly asserted in this Epistle ( Hebrews 13:8 ), being another clear indication of the way in which the Deity of Jesus Christ pervades the New Testament. This idea of God's immutability, as contrasted with the mutability of finite existence which is His creation, is given expression in the New Testament by the apostle James. As Creator of the heavenly bodies, God is called the Father of lights. While their lights, however, are intermittent, God's light is subject to neither change nor obscuration ( James 1:17 ).  In accordance with this idea of the unchangeableness of God's nature, the Scripture, in ascribing life and personality to Him, never regards God as subject to any process of becoming or self-realization, and the views which so conceive of God are unscriptural whether they proceed upon a unitarian or a trinitarian basis.  3. God's Knowledge, Will and Purpose:  God is also represented in Scripture as unchangeable in His knowledge, will and purpose. He is not a man that He should repent ( 1 Samuel 15:29 ). His purposes, therefore, are unchangeable ( Numbers 23:19   Isaiah 46:11   Proverbs 19:21 ); and His decrees are accordingly likened to "mountains of brass" ( Zechariah 6:1 ). His righteousness is as immutable as mountains ( Psalm 36:6 (Hebrew 7 )); and His power also is unchangeable ( Isaiah 26:4 ). Hence, while the Scripture represents God as sustaining living relations to His creatures, it does not conceive of Him as conditioned or determined in any way by men's acts, in either His knowledge, will, purpose or power. God knows eternally the changing course of events, and He acts differently upon different occasions, but all events, including human actions, are determined by God's unchangeable purpose, so that God's knowledge and actions are not contingent upon anything outside Himself.  Although, therefore, the idea of God as pure abstract Being, out of all relation to the world, is unscriptural, it is no less true that conception of God which represents a reaction from this, and which conceives of God anthropomorphically and as conditioned and determined by the world and man, is also quite contradictory to the Scripture conception of God. This latter tendency goes too far in the opposite direction, and falls into the error of conceiving God's knowledge, will, purpose and power too anthropomorphically, and as limited by the free acts of man. While the opposite tendency kept God out of all relation to the world, this one erects God's relation to the world into something which limits Him. This way of conceiving of God, which is the error of Rationalism, Socinianism and Arminianism, is as unscriptural as that which conceives of God as abstract Being, unknowable, and entirely out of relation to the world.  4. In His Relation to the World:  Unchangeable in His nature and attributes, God is likewise unchangeable in His relation to the world, which relation the Scripture represents as creation and providence, and not as emanation. Hence while everything finite changes, God remains ever the same ( Psalm 102:26-28 ). Consequently, the pantheistic idea is also unscriptural, which idea, going farther than the anthropomorphic and dualistic conception which places the world over against God, completely merges God's Being in the world and its processes of change, affirming that God comes to self-realization in the evolution of the world and man. In its reaction from the denial of God's living relation to the world, this view does not stop with limiting God by reason of this relation, but merges Him completely in the world-development. The Scripture, on the contrary, always conceives of God as immutably free and sovereign in His relation to all the creation.  In accordance with this idea of the unchangeableness of God's nature and attributes, the Bible always maintains God's absoluteness and transcendence of Nature and her processes in all of the relations which He sustains to the finite universe. It came into being by His creative fiat, not by any process of emanation from His Being. He sustains it in existence, and governs it, not by any process of Self-realization in the series of second causes, but from without, by His sovereign will and power. And He intrudes into the series of finite causes miraculously, producing events in Nature which are due solely to His power. When for man's salvation the Son of God became incarnate, it was not by any change of His nature in laying aside some or all of the attributes of Deity, but by assuming a human nature into personal union with the divine nature. The Scripture passages which speak of the incarnation of our Lord clearly indicate that the Son retained His full Deity in "becoming flesh" (compare especially the prologue to John's Gospel and  Philippians 2:6-8 ). Moreover, the Old Testament doctrine of the Spirit of God as the source of life to the world is always at pains to avoid any mingling of the Spirit with the processes of Nature, and the same thing is true of the New Testament doctrine of the indwelling of the Spirit in the believer, always keeping the Spirit distinct from the spirit of man ( Romans 8:16 ).  5. His Relations to Men:  Finally, God is unchangeable not only in relation to the universe, but in His relations to men and especially to His people. This follows from His unchangeable ethical nature. The Scripture often connects the unchangeableness of God with His goodness ( Psalm 100:5   James 1:17 ); with His truthfulness and mercy ( Psalm 100:5 ;  Psalm 117:2 ); and with His covenant promises ( Exodus 3:13 ). In connection with His covenant promises, God's unchangeableness gives the idea of His faithfulness which is emphasized in the Old Testament to awaken trust in God ( Deuteronomy 7:9   Psalm 36:5 (Hebrew 6 );  Psalm 92:2  (Hebrew 3);  Isaiah 11:5   Lamentations 3:23 ). This idea of God's unchangeableness in His covenant promises or His faithfulness is repeated and emphasized in the New Testament. His gifts or graces and election are without repentance ( 1 Thessalonians 5:24   Romans 11:29 ); He is faithful toward men because unchangeably true to His own nature ( 2 Timothy 2:13 ); His faithfulness abides in spite of men's lack of faith ( Romans 3:5 ), and is in many places represented as the basis of our confidence in God who is true to His election and gracious promises ( 1 Corinthians 1:9 ;  1 Corinthians 10:13   2 Thessalonians 3:3   Hebrews 10:23 ;  Hebrews 11:11   1 Peter 4:19   1 John 1:9 ). See FAITHFULNESS . It is thus the religious significance and value of God's unchangeableness which is especially emphasized throughout the Scripture. Because He is unchangeably true to His promises, He is the secure object of religious faith and trust, upon whom alone we can rely in the midst of human change and decay. It is this idea to which expression is given by calling God a rock, the rock of our strength and of our salvation ( Deuteronomy 32:15   Psalm 18:2 (Hebrew 3 ); 42:9 (Hebrew 10); 71:03:00;  Isaiah 17:10 ). God is even eternally a rock, the never-failing object of confidence and trust ( Isaiah 26:4 ).  It appears, therefore, that the Scripture idea of the unchangeableness of God lays emphasis upon four points. First, it is not lifeless immobility, but the unchangeableness of a living Person. Second, it is, however, a real unchangeableness of God's nature, attributes and purpose. Third, this unchangeableness is set forth as one of the specific characteristics of Deity in distinction from all that is finite. Fourth, God's unchangeableness is not dealt with in an abstract or merely theoretic manner, but its religious value is invariably emphasized as constituting God the one true object of religious faith.  LITERATURE.  Besides the commentaries on appropriate passages, and the discussion of the divine attributes in the general works on systematic theology, see Dillmann, Handbuch der alttest. Theol., 1895, 215-20, 243-44; Oehler, Theology of the Old Testament, English translation, 1883, 95, 100; Schultz, Alttest. Theol., 1896, 419; Davidson, The Theology of the Old Testament, 1904, 45-58, 165. For a fuller discussion see Charhock, "The Immutability of God," Works, volume I, 374-419; Dorner, Ueber die richtige Fassung des dogmatischen Begrifts der Unverdnderlichkeit Gottea, u.s.w.; Article I, "Die neueren Laugnungen der Unveranderlichkeit des personlichen Gottes, u.s.w.," JDT, I, 201-77; II, "Die Geschichte der Lehre von der Unveranderlichkeit Gottea bis auf Schleiermacher," JDT, II, 440-500; III, "Dogmatische Erorterung der Lehre von der Unveranderlichkeit Gottes," JDT, III, 579-660; H. Cremer, Die christliche Lehre von den Eigenschaften Gottea, 1897, pub. in the Beitrage zur Forderung christlicher Theol., I, 7-111; see pp. 10;, and especially pp. 102-9.  Caspar Wistar Hodge
SIMEONITES|     sim'-e-on-its.  See  SIMEON .
CHIDON|Dart, the name of the threshing-floor at which the death of Uzzah took place ( 1 Chronicles 13:9 ). In the parallel passage in Samuel ( 2 Samuel 6:6 ) it is called "Nachon's threshing-floor." It was a place not far north-west from Jerusalem. 
ZEBIDAH|     ze-bi'-da, zeb'-i-da (zebhudhah, Qere, whence the King James Version "Zebudah," whereas the Kethibh is zebhidhah; the Qere means "bestowed" and is the feminine of Zabud): Daughter of Pedaiah of Rumah, and mother of King Jehoiakim of Judah ( 2 Kings 23:36 ). The Septuagint's Codex Vaticanus has, however, Iella thugater Edeil ek Krouma, Codex Alexandrinus Eieldaph th. Eieddila ek Rhuma. In  2 Chronicles 36:5  Massoretic Text lacks these names, but the Septuagint Codex Vaticanus has Zechora th. Nereiou ek Rhama; here the name of the king's mother = Hebrew zekhurah, due to a confusion of the Hebrew letter kaph (k) with the Hebrew letter beth (b), and the Hebrew letter resh (r) with the Hebrew letter daleth (d), and thus we find support for the Qere, zebhudhah ("Zebudah," in  2 Kings 23:36  the King James Version). Lucian has confused the names here with those of  2 Kings 24:18 , and has as there, "Amital, the daughter of Jeremiah of Libnah."  David Francis Roberts
THARSHISH|( 1 Kings 10:22 ;  22:48 ). See TARSHISH. 
TAANATHSHILOH|Approach to Shiloh, a place on the border of Ephraim ( Joshua 16:6 ), probably the modern T'ana, a ruin 7 miles south-east of Shechem, on the ridge east of the Mukhnah plain. 
BETHPALET|   BETH-PALET  beth-pa'-let.  See  BETH-PELET .
JOHANAN|Whom Jehovah graciously bestows.  (1.) One of the Gadite heroes who joined David in the desert of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 12:12 ). (2.) The oldest of King Josiah's sons ( 1 Chronicles 3:15 ). (3.) Son of Careah, one of the Jewish chiefs who rallied round Gedaliah, whom Nebuchadnezzar had made governor in Jerusalem ( 2 Kings 25:23 ;  Jeremiah 40:8 ). He warned Gedaliah of the plans of Ishmael against him, a warning which was unheeded ( Jeremiah 40:13 ,  16). He afterwards pursued the murderer of the governor, and rescued the captives ( 41:8 ,  13,  15,  16). He and his associates subsequently fled to Tahpanhes in Egypt ( 43:2 ,  4,  5), taking Jeremiah with them. "The flight of Gedaliah's community to Egypt extinguished the last remaining spark of life in the Jewish state. The work of the ten centuries since Joshua crossed the Jordan had been undone." 
SUSI|The father of Gaddi, who was one of the twelve spies ( Numbers 13:11 ). 
HITTITES|Palestine and Syria appear to have been originally inhabited by three different tribes.  (1.) The Semites, living on the east of the isthmus of Suez. They were nomadic and pastoral tribes.  (2.) The Phoenicians, who were merchants and traders; and  (3.) the Hittites, who were the warlike element of this confederation of tribes. They inhabited the whole region between the Euphrates and Damascus, their chief cities being Carchemish on the Euphrates, and Kadesh, now Tell Neby Mendeh, in the Orontes valley, about six miles south of the Lake of Homs. These Hittites seem to have risen to great power as a nation, as for a long time they were formidable rivals of the Egyptian and Assyrian empires. In the book of Joshua they always appear as the dominant race to the north of Galilee. Somewhere about the twenty-third century B.C. the Syrian confederation, led probably by the Hittites, arched against Lower Egypt, which they took possession of, making Zoan their capital. Their rulers were the Hyksos, or shepherd kings. They were at length finally driven out of Egypt. Rameses II. sought vengeance against the "vile Kheta," as he called them, and encountered and defeated them in the great battle of Kadesh, four centuries after Abraham. (see  JOSHUA .) They are first referred to in Scripture in the history of Abraham, who bought from Ephron the Hittite the field and the cave of Machpelah ( Genesis 15:20 : 23:3-18). They were then settled at Kirjath-arba. From this tribe Esau took his first two wives ( 26:34 ;  36:2 ). They are afterwards mentioned in the usual way among the inhabitants of the Promised Land ( Exodus 23:28 ). They were closely allied to the Amorites, and are frequently mentioned along with them as inhabiting the mountains of Palestine. When the spies entered the land they seem to have occupied with the Amorites the mountain region of Judah ( Numbers 13:29 ). They took part with the other Canaanites against the Israelites ( Joshua 9:1 ;  11:3 ). After this there are few references to them in Scripture. Mention is made of "Ahimelech the Hittite" ( 1 Samuel 26:6 ), and of "Uriah the Hittite," one of David's chief officers ( 2 Samuel 23:39 ;  1 Chronicles 11:41 ). In the days of Solomon they were a powerful confederation in the north of Syria, and were ruled by "kings." They are met with after the Exile still a distinct people ( Ezra 9:1 ; Comp.  Nehemiah 13:23 -28). The Hebrew merchants exported horses from Egypt not only for the kings of Israel, but also for the Hittites ( 1 Kings 10:28 ,  29). From the Egyptian monuments we learn that "the Hittites were a people with yellow skins and `Mongoloid' features, whose receding foreheads, oblique eyes, and protruding upper jaws are represented as faithfully on their own monuments as they are on those of Egypt, so that we cannot accuse the Egyptian artists of caricaturing their enemies. The Amorites, on the contrary, were a tall and handsome people. They are depicted with white skins, blue eyes, and reddish hair, all the characteristics, in fact, of the white race" (Sayce's The Hittites). The original seat of the Hittite tribes was the mountain ranges of Taurus. They belonged to Asia Minor, and not to Syria. 
SKINS|   RAMS'   The skin of the sheep, roughly tanned with all the wool on, is the common winter jacket of the shepherd or peasant, the ram's being considered especially desirable (compare  Hebrews 11:37 ). Hence, the appropriateness of these skins in the covering of the tabernacle ( Exodus 25:5 , etc.).  See  TABERNACLE ;  DYE, DYEING .
BALADAN|He has given a son, the father of the Babylonian king ( 2 Kings 20:12 ;  Isaiah 39:1 ) Merodach-baladan (q.v.). 
DIMNAH|Dunghill, a city of Zebulun given to the Merarite Levites ( Joshua 21:35 ). In  1 Chronicles 6:77  the name "Rimmon" is substituted. 
SHARAI|     sha-ra'-i, sha'-ri (sharay): One of the sons of Bani who had married foreign wives ( Ezra 10:40 ).
LORDS|    OF THE PHILISTINES  (ceren, same as Hebrew word for "axle," probably a native designation): These "lords" ( Joshua 13:3   Judges 3:3 ;  Judges 16:5 , etc.;  1 Samuel 5:8, 11 , etc.), elsewhere called "princes" (sar,  1 Samuel 18:30 ;  1 Samuel 29:3, 4, 9 ), were the petty rulers or kings of the 5 Philistine cities, Gaza, Ashkelon, Ashdod, Ekron, Gath.  See  PHILISTINES .  PHILISTINES, LORDS OF THE  See  PHILISTIA .
ICHABOD|When the tidings of the disastrous defeat of the Israelites in the battle against the Philistines near to Mizpeh were carried to Shiloh, the wife of Phinehas "was near to be delivered. And when she heard the tidings that the ark of God was taken, and that her father-in-law and her husband were dead, she bowed herself and travailed" ( 1 Samuel 4:19 -22). In her great distress she regarded not "the women that stood by her," but named the child that was born "Ichabod" i.e., no glory, saying, "The glory is departed from Isreal;" and with that word on her lips she expired. 
GIANTS| (1.) Hebrews nephilim, meaning "violent" or "causing to fall" ( Genesis 6:4 ). These were the violent tyrants of those days, those who fell upon others. The word may also be derived from a root signifying "wonder," and hence "monsters" or "prodigies." In  Numbers 13:33  this name is given to a Canaanitish tribe, a race of large stature, "the sons of Anak." The Revised Version, in these passages, simply transliterates the original, and reads "Nephilim." (2.) Hebrews rephaim, a race of giants ( Deuteronomy 3:11 ) who lived on the east of Jordan, from whom Og was descended. They were probably the original inhabitants of the land before the immigration of the Canaanites. They were conquered by Chedorlaomer ( Genesis 14:5 ), and their territories were promised as a possession to Abraham ( 15:20 ). The Anakim, Zuzim, and Emim were branches of this stock. In  Job 26:5  (R.V.,  "they that are deceased;" marg.,  "the shades, " the "Rephaim") and  Isaiah 14:9  this Hebrew word is rendered (A.V.) "dead." It means here "the shades," the departed spirits in Sheol. In Samuel 21:16, 18, 20, 33, "the giant" is (A.V.) the rendering of the singular form ha raphah, which may possibly be the name of the father of the four giants referred to here, or of the founder of the Rephaim. The Vulgate here reads "Arapha," whence Milton (in Samson Agonistes) has borrowed the name "Harapha." (See also 1 Chron. 20:5,  6,  8;  Deuteronomy 2:11 ,  20;  3:13 ;  Joshua 15:8 ,  etc.,  where the word is similarly rendered "giant.") It is rendered "dead" in (A.V.)  Psalm 88:10 ;  Proverbs 2:18 ;  9:18 ;  21:16 : in all these places the Revised Version marg. has "the shades." (See also Isaiah 26:14.) (3.) Hebrews `Anakim ( Deuteronomy 2:10 ,  11,  21;  Joshua 11:21 ,  22;  14:12 ,  15; called "sons of Anak, "  Numbers 13:33 ; "children of Anak,  13:22 ;  Joshua 15:14 ), a nomad race of giants descended from Arba ( Joshua 14:15 ), the father of Anak, that dwelt in the south of Palestine near Hebron ( Genesis 23:2 ;  Joshua 15:13 ). They were a Cushite tribe of the same race as the Philistines and the Egyptian shepherd kings. David on several occasions encountered them ( 2 Samuel 21:15 -22). From this race sprung Goliath ( 1 Samuel 17:4 ). (4.) Hebrews `emin, a warlike tribe of the ancient Canaanites. They were "great, and many, and tall, as the Anakims" ( Genesis 14:5 ;  Deuteronomy 2:10 ,  11). (5.) Hebrews Zamzummim (q.v.),  Deuteronomy 2:20  so called by the Amorites. (6.) Hebrews gibbor ( Job 16:14 ), a mighty one, i.e., a champion or hero. In its plural form (gibborim) it is rendered "mighty men" ( 2 Samuel 23:8 -39;  1 Kings 1:8 ;  1 Chronicles 11:9 -47;  29:24. ) The band of six hundred whom David gathered around him when he was a fugitive were so designated. They were divided into three divisions of two hundred each, and thirty divisions of twenty each. The captians of the thirty divisions were called "the thirty," the captains of the two hundred "the three," and the captain over the whole was called "chief among the captains" ( 2 Samuel 23:8 ). The sons born of the marriages mentioned in  Genesis 6:4  are also called by this Hebrew name. 
EDER|Flock.  (1.) A city in the south of Judah, on the border of Idumea ( Joshua 15:21 ). (2.) The second of the three sons of Mushi, of the family of Merari, appointed to the Levitical office ( 1 Chronicles 23:23 ;  24:30 ). 
KADESH|Holy, or Kadesh-Barnea, sacred desert of wandering, a place on the south-eastern border of Palestine, about 165 miles from Horeb. It lay in the "wilderness" or "desert of Zin" ( Genesis 14:7 ;  Numbers 13:3 -26;  14:29 -33;  20:1 ;  27:14 ), on the border of Edom ( 20:16 ). From this place, in compliance with the desire of the people, Moses sent forth "twelve spies" to spy the land. After examining it in all its districts, the spies brought back an evil report, Joshua and Caleb alone giving a good report of the land ( 13:18 -31). Influenced by the discouraging report, the people abandoned all hope of entering into the Promised Land. They remained a considerable time at Kadesh. (see  HORMAH ; KORAH.) Because of their unbelief, they were condemned by God to wander for thirty-eight years in the wilderness. They took their journey from Kadesh into the deserts of Paran, "by way of the Red Sea" ( Deuteronomy 2:1 ). (One theory is that during these thirty-eight years they remained in and about Kadesh.) At the end of these years of wanderings, the tribes were a second time gathered together at Kadesh. During their stay here at this time Miriam died and was buried. Here the people murmured for want of water, as their forefathers had done formerly at Rephidim; and Moses, irritated by their chidings, "with his rod smote the rock twice," instead of "speaking to the rock before their eyes," as the Lord had commanded him (Comp.  Numbers 27:14 ;  Deuteronomy 9:23 ;  Psalm 106:32 ,  33). Because of this act of his, in which Aaron too was involved, neither of them was to be permitted to set foot within the Promised Land ( Numbers 20:12 ,  24). The king of Edom would not permit them to pass on through his territory, and therefore they commenced an eastward march, and "came unto Mount Hor" ( 20:22 ). This place has been identified with `Ain el-Kadeis, about 12 miles east-south-east of Beersheba. (see  SPIES .)  The sacred city of the Hittites, on the left bank of the Orontes, about 4 miles south of the Lake of Homs. It is identified with the great mound Tell Neby Mendeh, some 50 to 100 feet high, and 400 yards long. On the ruins of the temple of Karnak, in Egypt, has been found an inscription recording the capture of this city by Rameses II. (see  PHARAOH .) Here the sculptor "has chiselled in deep work on the stone, with a bold execution of the several parts, the procession of the warriors, the battle before Kadesh, the storming of the fortress, the overthrow of the enemy, and the camp life of the Egyptians." (see  HITTITES .) 
MYSIA|A province in the north-west of Asia Minor. On his first voyage to Europe ( Acts 16:7 ,  8) Paul passed through this province and embarked at its chief port Troas. 
PSALMS|The psalms are the production of various authors. "Only a portion of the Book of Psalms claims David as its author. Other inspired poets in successive generations added now one now another contribution to the sacred collection, and thus in the wisdom of Providence it more completely reflects every phase of human emotion and circumstances than it otherwise could." But it is specially to David and his contemporaries that we owe this precious book. In the "titles" of the psalms, the genuineness of which there is no sufficient reason to doubt, 73 are ascribed to David. Peter and John ( Acts 4:25 ) ascribe to him also the second psalm, which is one of the 48 that are anonymous. About two-thirds of the whole collection have been ascribed to David. Psalms 39, 62, and 77 are addressed to Jeduthun, to be sung after his manner or in his choir. Psalms 50 and 73-83 are addressed to Asaph, as the master of his choir, to be sung in the worship of God. The "sons of Korah," who formed a leading part of the Kohathite singers ( 2 Chronicles 20:19 ), were intrusted with the arranging and singing of  Psalm 42 , 44-49, 84, 85, 87, and 88. In  Luke 24:44  the word "psalms" means the Hagiographa, i.e., the holy writings, one of the sections into which the Jews divided the Old Testament. (see  BIBLE .) None of the psalms can be proved to have been of a later date than the time of Ezra and Nehemiah, hence the whole collection extends over a period of about 1,000 years. There are in the New Testament 116 direct quotations from the Psalter. The Psalter is divided, after the analogy of the Pentateuch, into five books, each closing with a doxology or benediction: (1.) The first book comprises the first 41 psalms, all of which are ascribed to David except 1, 2, 10, and 33, which, though anonymous, may also be ascribed to him. (2.) Book second consists of the next 31 psalms (42-72), 18 of which are ascribed to David and 1 to Solomon (the 72nd). The rest are anonymous. (3.) The third book contains 17 psalms (73-89), of which the 86th is ascribed to David, the 88th to Heman the Ezrahite, and the 89th to Ethan the Ezrahite. (4.) The fourth book also contains 17 psalms (90-106), of which the 90th is ascribed to Moses, and the 101st and 103rd to David. (5.) The fifth book contains the remaining psalms, 44 in number. Of these, 15 are ascribed to David, and the 127th to Solomon. Psalm 136 is generally called "the great hallel." But the Talmud includes also  Psalm 120 -135.  Psalm 113 -118, inclusive, constitute the "hallel" recited at the three great feasts, at the new moon, and on the eight days of the feast of dedication. "It is presumed that these several collections were made at times of high religious life: the first, probably, near the close of David's life; the second in the days of Solomon; the third by the singers of Jehoshaphat ( 2 Chronicles 20:19 ); the fourth by the men of Hezekiah (29,  30,  31); and the fifth in the days of Ezra." The Mosaic ritual makes no provision for the service of song in the worship of God. David first taught the Church to sing the praises of the Lord. He first introduced into the ritual of the tabernacle music and song. Divers names are given to the psalms.  (1.) Some bear the Hebrew designation shir (Gr. ode,  a song). Thirteen have this title. It means the flow of speech, as it were, in a straight line or in a regular strain. This title includes secular as well as sacred song. (2.) Fifty-eight psalms bear the designation (Hebrews) mitsmor (Gr. psalmos,  a psalm), a lyric ode, or a song set to music; a sacred song accompanied with a musical instrument. (3.)  Psalm 145 , and many others, have the designation (Hebrews) tehillah (Gr. hymnos,  a hymn), meaning a song of praise; a song the prominent thought of which is the praise of God. (4.) Six psalms (16,  56-60) have the title (Hebrews) michtam (q.v.). (5.)  Psalm 7  and  Habakkuk 3  bear the title (Hebrews) shiggaion (q.v.). 
BICHRI|     bik'-ri (bikhri, "first born"; compare HPN, 88, 102): Father of Sheba who rebelled against David. Bichri is of the house of Benjamin and the word probably means a "descendant of Becher" ( 2 Samuel 20:1 ). Compare BECHER 1.
SALATHIEL|Whom I asked of God, the son of Jeconiah ( Matthew 1:12 ;  1 Chronicles 3:17 ); also called the son of Neri ( Luke 3:27 ). The probable explanation of the apparent discrepancy is that he was the son of Neri, the descendant of Nathan, and thus heir to the throne of David on the death of Jeconiah (Comp.  Jeremiah 22:30 ). 
ELIPHELEH|God will distinguish him, one of the porters appointed to play "on the Sheminith" on the occasion of the bringing up of the ark to the city of David ( 1 Chronicles 15:18 ,  21). 
ETHANIM|The month of gifts, i.e., of vintage offerings; called Tisri after the Exile; corresponding to part of September and October. It was the first month of the civil year, and the seventh of the sacred year ( 1 Kings 8:2 ). 
SEM|     sem (Sem): the King James Version from the Greek form of Shem; thus the Revised Version (British and American) ( Luke 3:36 ).
CHUZAS|     ku'-zas, chu'-zas (Chouzas; the King James Version Chuza): The steward of Herod Antipas. In  Luke 8:3  we read that his wife Joanna, "and Susanna, and many others," ministered to Christ and His disciples.  See  JOANNA  ( Luke 24:10 ).
REZEPH|Solid; a stone, ( 2 Kings 19:12 ;  Isaiah 37:12 ), a fortress near Haran, probably on the west of the Euphrates, conquered by Sennacherib. 
JEATERAI|   JEATHERAI;   je-ath'-e-ri, jeat'-e-ri (Revised Version (British and American)), (the King James Version) (ye'atheray, meaning unknown): A descendant of Gershom, "son" of Levi ( 1 Chronicles 6:21 (Hebrew 6 )), and probably an ancestor of Asaph (so commentators); in 6:39-43 the corresponding name is "Ei." The difference in the Hebrew words is not great.
BETHANY|House of dates.  (1.) The Revised Version in  John 1:28  has this word instead of Bethabara, on the authority of the oldest manuscripts. It appears to have been the name of a place on the east of Jordan. (2.) A village on the south-eastern slope of the Mount of Olives ( Mark 11:1 ), about 2 miles east of Jerusalem, on the road to Jericho. It derived its name from the number of palm-trees which grew there. It was the residence of Lazarus and his sisters. It is frequently mentioned in connection with memorable incidents in the life of our Lord ( Matthew 21:17 ;  26:6 ;  Mark 11:11 ,  12;  14:3 ;  Luke 24:50 ;  John 11:1 ;  12:1 ). It is now known by the name of el-Azariyeh, i.e., "place of Lazarus," or simply Lazariyeh. Seen from a distance, the village has been described as "remarkably beautiful, the perfection of retirement and repose, of seclusion and lovely peace." Now a mean village, containing about twenty families. 
OTHNI|A lion of Jehovah, a son of Shemaiah, and one of the temple porters in the time of David ( 1 Chronicles 26:7 ). He was a "mighty man of valour." 
BETHABARA|House of the ford, a place on the east bank of the Jordan, where John was baptizing ( John 1:28 ). It may be identical with Bethbarah, the ancient ford of Jordan of which the men of Ephraim took possession ( Judges 7:24 ). The Revised Version reads "Bethany beyond Jordan." It was the great ford, and still bears the name of "the ford," Makhadhet `Abarah, "the ford of crossing over," about 25 miles from Nazareth. (see  BETHBARAH .) 
MEMPHIS|Only in  Hosea 9:6 , Hebrew Moph. In Isaiah 19:13;  Jeremiah 2:16 ;  46:14 , 19;  Ezek. 30:13 , 16, it is mentioned under the name Noph. It was the capital of Lower, i.e., of Northern Egypt. From certain remains found half buried in the sand, the site of this ancient city has been discovered near the modern village of Minyet Rahinch, or Mitraheny, about 16 miles above the ancient head of the Delta, and 9 miles south of Cairo, on the west bank of the Nile. It is said to have been founded by Menes, the first king of Egypt, and to have been in circumference about 19 miles. "There are few remains above ground," says Manning (The Land of the Pharaohs), "of the splendour of ancient Memphis. The city has utterly disappeared. If any traces yet exist, they are buried beneath the vast mounds of crumbling bricks and broken pottery which meet the eye in every direction. Near the village of Mitraheny is a colossal statue of Rameses the Great. It is apparently one of the two described by Herodotus and Diodorus as standing in front of the temple of Ptah. They were originally 50 feet in height. The one which remains, though mutilated, measures 48 feet. It is finely carved in limestone, which takes a high polish, and is evidently a portrait. It lies in a pit, which, during the inundation, is filled with water. As we gaze on this fallen and battered statue of the mighty conqueror who was probably contemporaneous with Moses, it is impossible not to remember the words of the prophet Isaiah, 19:13; 44:16-19, and Jeremiah, 46:19." 
PATROBAS|A Christian at Rome to whom Paul sent salutations ( Romans 16:14 ). 
ELOI|   ; ELOI; LAMA; SABACHTHA; ELI; ELI; LAMA SABACHTHANI  e'-loi, e-lo'i, la'-ma, sa-bakh-tha'-ni, or (Eloi, eloi, lama sabachthanei):  The forms of the first word as translated vary in the two narratives, being in Mark as first above and in Matthew as in second reading.  With some perversions of form probably from  Psalm 22:1  ('eli 'eli lamah `azabhtani). A statement uttered by Jesus on the cross just before his death, translated, "My God, my God, why hast thou forsaken me?" ( Matthew 27:46   Mark 15:34 ).  There is an interesting but difficult problem in connection with the interpretation of this passage. There seems to be a mixture of Aramaic and Hebrew.  The first two words, whether in Hebrew or Aramaic, have sufficient similarity to each other and each sufficient similarity to the name itself to warrant the jeer that Jesus was calling upon Elias, or the sincere supposition of those who might not fully understand the language, that he was actually calling on Elias.  The forms lema and lama used in Matthew and Mark respectively (Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek) represent the various possible forms, the first the Aramaic, and the second the Hebrew. The various readings and translations of the latter word, sabachthani, only add confusion to an effort at ultimate explanation of the real statement. Certainly the influence of the Aramaic played a geat part in the translation and transmission of the original. The spirit revealed by Jesus in this utterance seems to be very much like that displayed in the Garden when He cried out to have the cup removed from Him.  Walter G. Clippinger  ELOI  e'-loi, e-lo'-i.  See  GOD, NAMES OF .
JOELAH|A Benjamite who joined David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:7 ). 
HERMONITES|( Psalm 42:6 ,  7) = "the Hermons", i.e., the three peaks or summits of Hermon, which are about a quarter of a mile apart. 
JONAM|     jo'-nam (Ionam, Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek; Ionan, Textus Receptus of the New Testament; the King James Version Jonan): An ancestor of Jesus in Luke's genealogy ( Luke 3:30 ).
TOCHEN|Measured, a town of Simeon ( 1 Chronicles 4:32 ). 
CANAAN| (1.) The fourth son of Ham ( Genesis 10:6 ). His descendants were under a curse in consequence of the transgression of his father ( 9:22 -27). His eldest son, Zidon, was the father of the Sidonians and Phoenicians. He had eleven sons, who were the founders of as many tribes ( 10:15 -18). (2.) The country which derived its name from the preceding. The name as first used by the Phoenicians denoted only the maritime plain on which Sidon was built. But in the time of Moses and Joshua it denoted the whole country to the west of the Jordan and the Dead Sea ( Deuteronomy 11:30 ). In  Joshua 5:12  the LXX. read, "land of the Phoenicians," instead of "land of Canaan." The name signifies "the lowlands," as distinguished from the land of Gilead on the east of Jordan, which was a mountainous district. The extent and boundaries of Canaan are fully set forth in different parts of Scripture ( Genesis 10:19 ;  17:8 ;  Numbers 13:29 ;  34:8 ). (see  ITES ,  PALESTINE.)  Canaan, the language of: Mentioned in Isaiah 19:18, denotes the language spoken by the Jews resident in Palestine. The language of the Canaanites and of the Hebrews was substantially the same. This is seen from the fragments of the Phoenician language which still survive, which show the closest analogy to the Hebrew. Yet the subject of the language of the "Canaanites" is very obscure. The cuneiform writing of Babylon, as well as the Babylonian language, was taught in the Canaanitish schools, and the clay tablets of Babylonian literature were stored in the Canaanitish libraries. Even the Babylonian divinities were borrowed by the Canaanites. 
SECUNDUS|Second, a Christian of Thessalonica who accompanied Paul into Asia ( Acts 20:4 ). 
PENUEL|Face of God, a place not far from Succoth, on the east of the Jordan and north of the river Jabbok. It is also called "Peniel." Here Jacob wrestled ( Genesis 32:24 -32) "with a man" ("the angel",   Hosea 12:4 . Jacob says of him,  "I have seen God face to face") "till the break of day." A town was afterwards built there ( Judges 8:8 ;  1 Kings 12:25 ). The men of this place refused to succour Gideon and his little army when they were in pursuit of the Midianites ( Judges 8:1 -21). On his return, Gideon slew the men of this city and razed its lofty watch-tower to the ground. 
PALTIEL|Deliverance of God, the prince of Issachar who assisted "to divide the land by inheritance" ( Numbers 34:26 ). 
HATHACH|     ha'-thak (hathakh; Septuagint Hachrathaios): One of the chamberlains of Ahasuerus, appointed to attend on Esther ( Esther 4:5, 6, 9, 10 , the King James Version "Hatach"), through whom she learned from Mordecai of Haman's plot.
PUBLIUS|"the chief man of the island" of Malta ( Acts 28:7 ), who courteously entertained Paul and his shipwrecked companions for three days, till they found a more permanent place of residence; for they remained on the island for three months, till the stormy season had passed. The word here rendered "chief man" (protos) is supposed by some to be properly a Maltese term, the official title of the governor. 
MIRIAM|Their rebellion.  (1.) The sister of Moses and Aaron ( Exodus 2:4 -10;  1 Chronicles 6:3 ). Her name is prominent in the history of the Exodus. She is called "the prophetess" ( Exodus 15:20 ). She took the lead in the song of triumph after the passage of the Red Sea. She died at Kadesh during the second encampment at that place, toward the close of the wanderings in the wilderness, and was buried there ( Numbers 20:1 ). (see  AARON ; MOSES.) (2.)  1 Chronicles 4:17 , one of the descendants of Judah. 
PHALEC|( Luke 3:35 )=Peleg (q.v.),  Genesis 11:16 . 
ESEK|Quarrel, a well which Isaac's herdsmen dug in the valley of Gerar, and so called because the herdsmen of Gerar quarrelled with them for its possession ( Genesis 26:20 ). 
ROSH|( Ezek. 38:2 ,  3;  39:1 ) is rendered "chief" in the Authorized Version. It is left untranslated as a proper name in the Revised Version. Some have supposed that the Russians are here meant, as one of the three Scythian tribes of whom Magog was the prince. They invaded the land of Judah in the days of Josiah. Herodotus, the Greek historian, says: "For twenty-eight years the Scythians ruled over Asia, and things were turned upside down by their violence and contempt." (see  BETHSHEAN .) 
SYRIAMAACHAH|   SYRIA-MAACHAH  sir'-i-a-ma'a-ka.  See  MAACAH ;  SYRIA .
JOKMEAM|Gathering of the people, a city of Ephraim, which was given with its suburbs to the Levites ( 1 Chronicles 6:68 ). It lay somewhere in the Jordan valley ( 1 Kings 4:12 ,  R.V.; but in A.V. incorrectly "Jokneam"). 
LAISHAH|     la-i'-sha, la'-ish-a (layshah, the King James Version, Laish): A place named in  Isaiah 10:30  with Gallim and Anathoth. It should apparently be sought on the North of Jerusalem. Some would identify Gallim with Beit Jala, near Bethlehem. Conder suggests `Isawiyeh on the eastern slope, to the North-Northeast of the Mount of Olives.
KOHELETH|     ko-hel'-eth (qoheleth).  See  ECCLESIASTES .
SALU|     sa'-lu (calu'; Septuagint: Codex Vaticanus Salmon; Codex Alexandrinus Salo; the King James Version has "Salom" in 1 Maccabees 2:26): A prince and the head of a house of the tribe of Simeon and the father of Zimri who was slain by Phinehas along with the Midianite woman whom he had brought to the camp of Israel ( Numbers 25:14 ;  1Ma 2:26 ).
NOGAH|Splendour, one of David's sons, born at Jerusalem ( 1 Chronicles 3:7 ). 
RAAMSES|( Exodus 1:11 ). (see  RAMESES .) 
HAMMATH|Warm springs, one of the "fenced cities" of Naphtali ( Joshua 19:35 ). It is identified with the warm baths (the heat of the water ranging from 136 degrees to 144 degrees) still found on the shore a little to the south of Tiberias under the name of Hummam Tabariyeh ("Bath of Tiberias"). 
HOSEA|Salvation, the son of Beeri, and author of the book of prophecies bearing his name. He belonged to the kingdom of Israel. "His Israelitish origin is attested by the peculiar, rough, Aramaizing diction, pointing to the northern part of Palestine; by the intimate acquaintance he evinces with the localities of Ephraim ( 5:1 ;  6:8 ,  9;  12:12 ;  14:6 ,  etc.); by passages like 1:2, where the kingdom is styled `the land', and 7:5, where the Israelitish king is designated as `our' king." The period of his ministry (extending to some sixty years) is indicated in the superscription ( Hosea 1:1 ,  2). He is the only prophet of Israel who has left any written prophecy.  Hosea, Prophecies of This book stands first in order among the "Minor Prophets." "The probable cause of the location of Hosea may be the thoroughly national character of his oracles, their length, their earnest tone, and vivid representations." This was the longest of the prophetic books written before the Captivity. Hosea prophesied in a dark and melancholy period of Israel's history, the period of Israel's decline and fall. Their sins had brought upon them great national disasters. "Their homicides and fornication, their perjury and theft, their idolatry and impiety, are censured and satirized with a faithful severity." He was a contemporary of Isaiah. The book may be divided into two parts, the first containing chapters 1-3, and symbolically representing the idolatry of Israel under imagery borrowed from the matrimonial relation. The figures of marriage and adultery are common in the Old Testament writings to represent the spiritual relations between Jehovah and the people of Israel. Here we see the apostasy of Israel and their punishment, with their future repentance, forgiveness, and restoration. The second part, containing 4-14, is a summary of Hosea's discourses, filled with denunciations, threatenings, exhortations, promises, and revelations of mercy. Quotations from Hosea are found in  Matthew 2:15 ;  9:15 ;  12:7 ;  Romans 9:25 , 26. There are, in addition, various allusions to it in other places ( Luke 23:30 ;  Revelation 6:16 ,  Comp.  Hosea 10:8 ;  Romans 9:25 ,  26;  1 Peter 2:10 ,  Comp.  Hosea 1:10 ,  etc.). As regards the style of this writer, it has been said that "each verse forms a whole for itself, like one heavy toll in a funeral knell." "Inversions ( 7:8 ;  9:11 ,  13;  12:8 ), anacolutha ( 9:6 ;  12:8 ,  etc.), ellipses ( 9:4 ;  13:9 ,  etc.), paranomasias, and plays upon words, are very characteristic of Hosea ( 8:7 ;  9:15 ;  10:5 ;  11:5 ;  12:11 )." 
KITHLISH|A man's wall, a town in the plain of Judah ( Joshua 15:40 ). It has been identified with Jelameh. 
GIDDEL|     gid'-el (giddel, "very great," "stout"):  (1) The name of the head of a family of Nethinim ( Ezra 2:47  =  Nehemiah 7:49  = APC 1Esdras 5:30 (here as Cathua)).  (2) The name of the head of a family of Solomon's servants ( Ezra 2:56  =  Nehemiah 7:58  = APC 1Esdras 5:33 (here Isdael)).
ETHBAAL|With Baal, a king of Sidon (B.C. 940-908), father of Jezebel, who was the wife of Ahab ( 1 Kings 16:31 ). He is said to have been also a priest of Astarte, whose worship was closely allied to that of Baal, and this may account for his daughter's zeal in promoting idolatry in Israel. This marriage of Ahab was most fatal to both Israel and Judah. Dido, the founder of Carthage, was his granddaughter. 
LOD|   ; LYDDA  (lodh; Ludda):  1. Scriptural Notices:  Ono and Lod and the towns thereof are said to have been built by Shemed, a Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 8:12 ). The children of Lod, Hadid and One, to the number of 725, returned from Babylon with Zerubbabel ( Ezra 2:33   Nehemiah 7:37  (721)). The town lay in the Shephelah, perhaps in ge ha-charashim, "the valley of craftsmen" ( Nehemiah 11:35 ). In the New Testament it appears as Lydda. Here the apostle Peter visited the saints and healed the palsied Arenas ( Acts 9:32 ). Hence he was summoned by messengers from Joppa on the death of Dorcas.  2. History from Maccabean Times:  The three governments of Aphaerema, Lydda and Ramathaim were added to Judea from the country of Samaria by King Demetrius II (1 Maccabees 11:34). Lydda presided over one of the toparchies under Jerusalem, into which Judea was divided (BJ, III, iii, 5). After the death of Julius Caesar the inhabitants of Lydda and certain other towns, having failed to pay the contributions Cassius demanded, were by him sold into slavery. They were freed by Antony (Ant., XIV, xi, 2; xii, 2). Lydda suffered severely under Cestius Gallus (BJ, II, xix, 1). Along with Jamnia it surrendered to Vespasian (BJ, IV, viii, 1). After the fall of Jerusalem it was noted as a seat of rabbinical learning. The classical name of the city was Diospolis. In the 4th century it was connected with the trade in purple. It became the seat of a bishopric, and the bishop of Lydda was present at the Council of Nicea. At Lydda, in 415 A.D., took place the trial of Pelagius for heresy.  Under the Moslems it became capital of the province of Filastin but later it was superseded by er-Ramleh, founded by Khalif Suleiman, whither its inhabitants were removed (Ya'kubi, circa 891 A.D.). Mukaddasi (circa 985) says that in Lydda "there is a great mosque in which are wont to assemble large numbers of people from the capital (er-Ramleh) and from the villages around. In Lydda, too, is that wonderful church (of George) at the gate of which Christ will slay the antichrist" (quoted by Guy le Strange, Palestine under the Moslems, 493). It was rebuilt by the Crusaders; but was destroyed by Saladin after the battle of ChaTTin, 1191 A.D. It was again restored; but in 1271 it was sacked by the Mengels, and from this blow it has never recovered.  3. Identification and Description:  The ancient Lod or Lydda is represented by the modern village of Ludd, on the road to Jerusalem, about 11 miles Southeast of Yafa. It is a station on the Jaffa-Jerusalem Railway. It occupies a picturesque hollow in the plain of Sharon, and is surrounded by gardens and orchards, the beauty of which intensifies by contrast the squalor of the village. It was the reputed birthplace of George, and here he is said to have been buried. The one ruin of importance in the place is that of the church which perpetuates his name.  The town stood on the great caravan road between Babylon and Egypt, near its intersection with that from Joppa to Jerusalem and the East. Its position on these great arteries of commerce meant trade for the inhabitants. "The manufacture and repair of such requisites for the journey as sacks, saddles and strappings would create the skilled labor in cloth, leather, wood and metal that made the neighborhood once the valley of craftsmen" (Mackie, HDB, under the word). Like many other once prosperous cities on these and similar caravan routes, Lydda suffered from diversion of traffic to the sea; and it may be that for none of them is any great revival now possible.  W. Ewing
HUPPIM|     hup'-im (chuppim, "coast-people"): Probably a variant form of HUPHAM (which see). From the only mention made of him ( Genesis 46:21   1 Chronicles 7:12, 15 ), his direct descent is difficult to establish.
NOHAH|     no'-ha (nochah, "rest"): The fourth son of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:2 ). It is probable that in  Judges 20:43 , instead of "a resting-place" we should read "Nohah," which may have been the settlement of the family.
GERASENES|   GERASA;   ger'-a-sa, ger'-a-senz (Gerasa; Gerasenon):  1. Country of the Gerasenes:  The town itself is not named in Scripture, and is referred to only in the expression, "country of the Gerasenes" ( Mark 5:1   Luke 8:26, 37 ; see Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek, Appendix, 11). This describes the district in which Christ met and healed the demoniac from the tombs, where also took place the destruction of the swine. It was on the eastern shore of the Sea of Galilee, and must have been a locality where the steep edges of the Bashan plateau drop close upon the brink of the lake. This condition is fulfilled only by the district immediately South of Wady Semak, North of Qal `at el-Chucn. Here the slopes descend swiftly almost into the sea, and animals, once started on the downward run, could not avoid plunging into the depths. Many ancient tombs are to be seen in the face of the hills. Gerasa itself is probably represented by the ruins of Kurseh on the South side of Wady Semak, just where it opens on the seashore. The ruins of the town are not considerable; but there are remains of a strong wall which must have surrounded the place. Traces of ancient buildings in the vicinity show that there must have been a fairly numerous population in the district.  2. History:  The great and splendid city in the Decapolis is first mentioned as taken after a siege by Alexander Janneus, 85 B.C. (BJ, I, iv, 8). Josephus names it as marking the eastern limit of Peraea (BJ, III, iii, 3). He calls the inhabitants Syrians, when, at the beginning of the Jewish revolt, the district round Gerasa was laid waste. The Syrians made reprisals, and took many prisoners. With these, however, the Gerasenes dealt mercifully, letting such as wished go free, and escorting them to the border (BJ, II, xviii, 1, 5). Lucius Annius, at the instance of Vespasian, sacked and burned the city, with much slaughter (BJ, IV, ix, 1). From this disaster it appears soon to have recovered, and the period of its greatest prosperity lay, probably, in the 2nd and 3nd centuries of our era. It became the seat of a bishopric, and one of its bishops attended the Council of Chalcedon. Reland (Pal, II, 806) notes certain extant coins of Gerasa, from which it is clear that in the 2nd century it was a center of the worship of Artemis. It was besieged by Baldwin II, in 1121 A.D. Mention is made of the strength of the site and the mighty masonry of its walls. William of Tyre calls the city Jarras, and places it 16 miles East of Jordan (Hist, xii, 16). The distance is about 19 miles from the river. It was conquered by the Moslems in the time of Omar (Guy le Strange, Palestine under the Moslems, 462). The sultan of Damascus is said to have fortified it; but there is nothing to show that the Moslems occupied it for any length of time.  3. Description:  Modern Jerash lies on both banks of Wady Jerash, about 6 miles from its confluence with Wady ez-Zerqa (the Jabbok). It is almost 20 miles from Amman (Philadelphia), and 22 from Fahil (Pella). The ruins are wide and imposing and are better preserved than any others on the East of Jordan. They include several splendid temples, theaters, basilica, palaces and baths, with hippodrome and naumachia. The triumphal arch to the South of the city is almost entire. Two paved streets with double colonnades cut through the city at right angles, four massive pedestals still marking the point of intersection. An excellent account of the ruins is given in Thomson's LB, III, 558.  There is nothing above ground of older date than the 2nd and 3rd centuries of our era; but there is no reason to doubt that the Greek city of Gerasa stood on the same site. The presence of a copious spring of sweet water makes it probable that the site has been occupied from olden time; but no trace remains of any ancient city. Some would identify the place with RAMOTH-GILEAD, which see.  The site is now occupied by a colony of Circassians, and there is reason to fear that, unless something is done to preserve them, many valuable remains of antiquity will perish.  W. Ewing
JIPHTAH|     jif'-ta (yiphtach).  See  IPHTAH .
MORDECAI|The son of Jair, of the tribe of Benjamin. It has been alleged that he was carried into captivity with Jeconiah, and hence that he must have been at least one hundred and twenty-nine years old in the twelfth year of Ahasuerus (Xerxes). But the words of Esther do not necessarily lead to this conclusion. It was probably Kish of whom it is said (ver. 6) that he "had been carried away with the captivity." He resided at Susa, the metropolis of Persia. He adopted his cousin Hadassah (Esther), an orphan child, whom he tenderly brought up as his own daughter. When she was brought into the king's harem and made queen in the room of the deposed queen Vashti, he was promoted to some office in the court of Ahasuerus, and was one of those who "sat in the king's gate" ( Esther 2:21 ). While holding this office, he discovered a plot of the eunuchs to put the king to death, which, by his vigilance, was defeated. His services to the king in this matter were duly recorded in the royal chronicles. Haman (q.v.) the Agagite had been raised to the highest position at court. Mordecai refused to bow down before him; and Haman, being stung to the quick by the conduct of Mordecai, resolved to accomplish his death in a wholesale destruction of the Jewish exiles throughout the Persian empire ( Esther 3:8 -15). Tidings of this cruel scheme soon reached the ears of Mordecai, who communicated with Queen Esther regarding it, and by her wise and bold intervention the scheme was frustrated. The Jews were delivered from destruction, Mordecai was raised to a high rank, and Haman was executed on the gallows he had by anticipation erected for Mordecai ( 6:2 - 7:10 ). In memory of the signal deliverance thus wrought for them, the Jews to this day celebrate the feast ( 9:26 -32) of Purim (q.v.). 
JAHAZIAH|     ja-ha-zi'-a: the King James Version for JAHZEIAH (which see).
SHELANITES|     she'-lan-its, she-la'-nits.  See  SHELAH .
HAZELELPONI|     haz-el-el-po'-ni.  See  HAZZELELPONI .
SAPPHIRA|Beautiful, the wife of Ananias (q.v.). She was a partner in his guilt and also in his punishment ( Acts 5:1 -11). 
POTIPHERAH|A priest of On, whose daughter Asenath became Joseph's wife ( Genesis 41:45 ). 
ZAANAIM|Wanderings; the unloading of tents, so called probably from the fact of nomads in tents encamping amid the cities and villages of that region, a place in the north-west of Lake Merom, near Kedesh, in Naphtali. Here Sisera was slain by Jael, "the wife of Heber the Kenite," who had pitched his tent in the "plain [R.V., 'as far as the oak'] of Zaanaim" ( Judges 4:11 ). It has been, however, suggested by some that, following the LXX. and the Talmud, the letter b, which in Hebrew means "in," should be taken as a part of the word following, and the phrase would then be "unto the oak of Bitzanaim," a place which has been identified with the ruins of Bessum, about half-way between Tiberias and Mount Tabor. 
PLAGUES|    OF EGYPT  plagz (niphle'oth, "wonders "from pala', "to be separate," i.e. in a class by themselves; also called negheph, "plague," from naghaph, "to smite" ( Exodus 9:14 ), and negha`, "a stroke," from nagha`, "to touch" ( Exodus 11:1 ; compare  Joshua 24:10 )):  INTRODUCTION  I. NATURAL PHENOMENA  1. Water Turned to Blood  2. The Plague of Frogs  3. The Plague of Lice  4. The Plague of Flies  5. The Plague of Murrain  6. The Plague of Boils  7. The Plague of Hail  8. The Plague of Locusts  9. The Plague of Darkness  10. Death of the Firstborn  II. MIRACULOUS USE OF THE PHENOMENA  1. Intensification  2. Prediction  3. Discrimination  4. Orderliness and Increasing Severity  5. Arrangement to Accomplish Divine Moral Purpose  III. DIVINE MORAL PURPOSE  1. Discrediting of the gods of Egypt  2. Pharaoh Made to Know that Yahweh Is Lord  3. Revelation of God as Saviour  4. Exhibition of the Divine Use of Evil  LITERATURE  Introduction:  The Hebrew words are so used as to give the name "plagues" to all the "wonders" God did against Pharaoh. Thus, it appears that the language in the account in Exodus puts forward the wondrous character of these dealings of Yahweh with Pharaoh. The account of the plagues is found in  Exodus 7:8-12:31   Psalm 78:42-51 ;  Psalm 105:27-36 . These poetical accounts of the plagues have a devotional purpose and do not give a full historical narrative.  Psalm 78  omits plagues 4, 6, 9;  Psalm 105  omits plagues 5 and 6. Both psalms change the order of the plagues. Account of the preparation which led up to the plagues is found in the narrative of the burning bush (see BUSH, BURNING), the meeting of Aaron with Moses, the gathering together of the elders of Israel for instruction and the preliminary wonders before Pharaoh ( Exodus 3 ;  Exodus 4 ). This preparation contemplated two things important to be kept in view in considering the plague, namely, that the consummation of plagues was contemplated from the beginning ( Exodus 4:22, 23 ), and that the skepticism of Israel concerning Moses authority and power was likewise anticipated ( Exodus 4:1 ). It was thus manifestly not an age of miracles when the Israelites were expecting such "wonders" and ready to receive anything marvelous as a divine interposition. This skepticism of Israel is a valuable asset for the credibility of the account of the "wonders." The immediate occasion of the plagues was the refusal of Pharaoh to let the people have liberty for sacrifice, together with the consequent hardening of Pharaoh's heart. No indication of any localizing of the plagues is given except in  Psalm 78:12, 43 , where the "field of Zoan" is mentioned as the scene of the contest between Yahweh and the Egyptians. But this is poetry, and the "field of Zoan" means simply the territory of the great capital Zoan. This expression might be localized in the Delta or it might extend to the whole of Egypt. Discussion of the plagues has brought out various classifications of them, some of which are philosophical, as that of Philo, others fanciful, as that of Origen. Arrangements of the order of the plagues for the purpose of moralizing are entirely useless for historical consideration of the plagues. The only order of any real value is the order of Nature, i.e. the order in which the plagues occurred, which will be found to be the order of the natural phenomena which were the embodiment of the plagues.  Much elaborate effort has been made to derive from the description of the plagues evidence for different documents in the narrative. It is pointed out that Moses (E) declared to Pharaoh that he would smite the waters ( Exodus 7:17 ), and then the account, as it proceeds, tells us that Aaron smote the waters ( Exodus 7:19, 20 ). But this is quite in accord with the preceding statement ( Exodus 4:16 ) that Aaron was to be the spokesman. Moses was to deal with God, Aaron with Pharaoh. Again it is noticed that some of the plagues are ascribed to the immediate agency of Yahweh, some are represented as coming through the mediation of Moses, and still others through the mediation of Moses and Aaron. Certainly this may be an exact statement of facts, and, if the facts were just so, the record of the facts affords no evidence of different documents.  An examination of the account of the plagues as it stands will bring them before us in a most graphic and connected story.  I. The Natural Phenomena.  All the "wonders" represented anywhere in Scripture as done by the power of God are intimately associated with natural phenomena, and necessarily so. Human beings have no other way of perceiving external events than through those senses which only deal with natural phenomena. Accordingly, all theophanies and miraculous doings are embodied in natural events.  The presence of Yahweh with the sacrifice by Abraham was manifested by the passing of a "smoking furnace and a burning lamp" between the pieces of the offerings ( Genesis 15:17  the King James Version). The majesty and power of God at Sinai were manifested in the "cloud" and the "brightness," the "voice" and the "sound of a trumpet" ( Hebrews 12:19 ). The Holy Spirit descended "as a dove" ( Matthew 3:16 ). The Deity of Jesus was attested on the mountain by a "voice" ( Matthew 17:5 ). Jesus Himself was "God.... manifest in the flesh" ( 1 Timothy 3:16  the King James Version). He was "found in fashion as a man' ( Philippians 2:8 ). And all the miracles of Jesus were coupled with sensible phenomena: He spoke to the sea and it was calm; He touched the leper and he was clean; He called to Lazarus and he came forth.  Yet in all these natural events, the miraculous working of God was as clearly seen as the natural phenomena. It is thus to be expected that the "wonders" of God in the land of Pharaoh should also be associated with natural events as well as manifest miraculous elements. The "blood" in the river, the "frogs" hopping about on the land, the "lice," the "flies," the "murrain," the "boils," the "hail," the "locusts," the "darkness," and the "pestilence" are all named as natural phenomena. Long familiarity with the land of Egypt has made it perfectly plain to many intelligent people, also, that nearly, if not quite, all the plagues of Egypt are still in that land as natural phenomena, and occur, when they do occur, very exactly in the order in which we find them recorded in the narrative in Exodus. But natural events in the plagues as in other "wonders" of God embodied miraculous doings.  1. Water Turned to Blood:  The first of the plagues (dam, from 'adham, "to be red" ( Exodus 7:19-25 )) was brought about by the smiting of the water with the rod in the hand of Aaron, and it consisted in the defilement of the water so that it became as "blood." The waters were polluted and the fish died. Even the water in vessels which had been taken from the river became corrupt. The people were forced to get water only from wells in which the river water was filtered through the sand. There are two Egyptian seasons when, at times, the water resembles blood. At the full Nile the water is sometimes of a reddish color, but at that season the water is quite potable and the fish do not die. But a similar phenomenon is witnessed sometimes at the time of the lowest Nile just before the rise begins. Then also the water sometimes becomes defiled and very red, so polluted that the fish die (Bib. Sacra, 1905, 409). This latter time is evidently the time of the first plague. It would be some time in the month of May. The dreadful severity of the plague constituted the "wonder" in this first plague. The startling character of the plague is apparent when it is remembered that Egypt is the product of the Nile, the very soil being all brought down by it, and its irrigation being constantly dependent upon it. Because of this it became one of the earliest and greatest of the gods (Breasted, Development of Religion and Thought in Egypt, 3-47; "Hymn to the Nile," Records of the Past, New Series, III, 46-54). The magicians imitated this plague with their enchantments. Their success may have been by means of sleight of hand or other devices of magic, as may be seen in the East today, with claim of supernatural aid, and as used in western lands for entertainment, as mere cleverness. Or it may be, as has been suggested, that they counted upon the continuance of the plague for at least a time, and so took advantage of the materials the "wonder" had provided.  2. The Plague of Frogs:  Frogs (tsphardeim, probably "marsh-leapers" ( Exodus 8:1-15 )) are very abundant just after the high Nile when the waters begin to recede. Spawn in the mud is hatched by the sun, and the marshes are filled with myriads of these creatures. The frog was the hieroglyph for myriads. The frogs usually remain in the marshes, but in this case they came forth to the horror and disgust of the people. "Frogs in the houses, frogs in the beds, frogs baked with the food in the ovens, frogs in the kneading troughs worked up with the flour; frogs with their monotonous croak, frogs with their cold slimy skins, everywhere-from morning to night, from night to morning-frogs." The frog was also associated with Divinity, was the symbol of Heqt, a form of Hathor, and seems also at times to have been worshipped as divinity. This plague created such horror that thus early Pharaoh came to an agreement ( Exodus 8:8-10 ). A time was set for the disappearance of the frogs that he might know that "there is none like unto Yahweh our God," but when the frogs were dead, Pharaoh hardened his heart ( Exodus 8:15 ). In this plague "the magicians did in like manner with their enchantments" ( Exodus 8:7 ). Frogs were plentiful, and it would not seem to be difficult to claim to have produced some of them.  3. The Plague of Lice:  It is impossible to determine what particular troublesome insect pest of Egypt is meant by the 3rd plague, whether body-lice or mosquitoes or sandflies or ticks or fleas (kinnim, "gnats" ( Exodus 8:16 )). Those who have experience of these pests in Egypt are quite ready to accept any of them as adequate for the plague. Lice seem rather to be ruled out, unless different kinds of lice were sent, as there is no one kind that torments both man and beast. All the other insect pests appear in incredible numbers out of the "dust" when the pools have dried up after the receding of the waters. The assertion that the account of this plague is not complete, because it is not recorded that Pharaoh asked its removal or that Moses secured it, is amazing. Perhaps Pharaoh did not, in fact, ask its removal. There seems also at this time some difficulty in Moses having access to Pharaoh after this plague ( Exodus 8:20 ). Perhaps the plague was not removed at all. The Egyptians are disposed to think it was not! Certainly that season of the year spent in Egypt, not in a dahabiyeh on the Nile, but in a native village, will furnish very satisfying evidence that stinging and biting insects are a very real plague in Egypt yet. The magicians failed with their enchantments and acknowledged that divine power was at work, and seem to have acknowledged that Yahweh was supreme ( Exodus 8:19 ), but Pharaoh would not heed them.  4. The Plague of Flies:  As the seasons pass on, after the recession of the waters, the flies (`arobh, "swarms," probably of flies ( Exodus 8:20-32 )) become more and more numerous until they are almost a plague every year. The increased severity of this plague, and the providential interference to separate between Israel and the Egyptians, drove Pharaoh and his people to such desperation that Pharaoh gave a half-promise of liberty for Israel to sacrifice "in the land." This called out the statement that they would sacrifice the "abomination of the Egyptians." This may have referred to the sacrifice of sheep, which were always held in more or less detestation by Egyptians, or it may have had reference to the sacrifice of heifers, the cow being the animal sacred to the goddess Hathor. The new element of separation between the Israelites and the Egyptians introduced into this plague was another step toward establishing the claims of Yahweh to be the God of all the earth and to have taken Israel under His especial care.  5. The Plague of Murrain:  In addition to the separation established between Israel and the Egyptians, a definite time is now set for the coming of the 5th plague. It is to be noticed also that diseases of cattle (debher, "destruction" ( Exodus 9:1-7 )) and of men follow quickly after the plague of insects. This is in exact accord with the order of Nature as now thoroughly understood through the discovered relation of mosquitoes and flies to the spread of diseases. Rinderpest is still prevalent at times in Egypt, so that beef becomes very scarce in market and is sometimes almost impossible to obtain. It is a fact, also, that the prevalence eft cattle plague, the presence of boils among men (see 6, below) and the appearance of bubonic plague are found to be closely associated together and in this order. The mention of camels as affected by this plague is interesting. It is doubtful if any clear indication of the presence of the camel in Egypt so early as this has yet been found among the monuments of Egypt. There is in the Louvre museum one small antiquity which seems to me to be intended for the camel. But Professor Maspero does not agree that it is so. It would seem likely that the Hyksos, who were Bedouin princes, princes of the desert, would have introduced the beasts of the desert into Egypt. If they did so, that may have been sufficient reason that the Egyptians would not picture it, as the Hyksos and all that was theirs were hated in Egypt.  6. The Plague of Boils:  In the plague of boils (shechin, and 'abha`bu`oth, "boils" ( Exodus 9:8-17 )) ashes were used, probably in the same way and to the same end as the clay was used in opening the eyes of the blind man ( John 9:6 ), i.e. to attract attention and to fasten the mind of the observer upon what the Lord was doing. This plague in the order of its coming, immediately after the murrain, and in the description given of it and in the significant warning of the "pestilence" yet to come ( Exodus 9:15 ), appears most likely to have been pestis minor, the milder form of bubonic plague. Virulent rinder-pest among cattle in the East is regarded as the precursor of plague among men and is believed to be of the same nature. It may well be, as has been thought by some, that the great aversion of the ancient Egyptians to the contamination of the soil by decaying animals was from the danger thereby of starting an epidemic of plague among men (Dr. Merrins, Biblical Sacra, 1908, 422-23).  7. The Plague of Hail:  Hail (baradh, "hail" ( Exodus 9:18-35 )) is rare in Egypt, but is not unknown. The writer has himself seen a very little, and has known of one instance when a considerable quantity of hail as large as small marbles fell. Lightning, also, is not as frequent in Egypt as in many semi-tropical countries, yet great electric storms sometimes occur. This plague is quite accurately dated in the seasons of the year ( Exodus 9:31, 32 ). As the first plague was just before the rising of the Nile, so this one is evidently about 9 months later, when the new crops after the inundation were beginning to mature, January-February. This plague also marks another great step forward in the revelation of Yahweh to Israel and to the Egyptians. First only His power was shown, then His wisdom in the timing of the plagues, and now His mercy appears in the warning to all godly-disposed Egyptians to save themselves, their herds and their servants by keeping all indoors ( Exodus 9:19-21 ). Pharaoh also now distinctly acknowledged Yahweh ( Exodus 9:27 ).  The plague of locusts ('arbeh, "locust" ( Exodus 10:1-20 )) was threatened, and so frightened were the servants of Pharaoh that they persuaded him to try to make some agreement with Moses, but the attempt of Pharaoh still to limit in some way the going of Israel thwarted the plan ( Exodus 10:7-10 ).  8. The Plague of Locusts:  Then devouring swarms of locusts came up over the land from the eastern desert between the Nile and the Red Sea. They devoured every green thing left by the hail. The desperate situation created by the locusts soon brought Pharaoh again to acknowledgment of Yahweh ( Exodus 10:16 ). This was the greatest profession of repentance yet manifested by Pharaoh, but he soon showed that it was deceitful, and again he would not let the people go. When the wind had swept the locusts away, he hardened his heart once more.  9. The Plague of Darkness:  The progress of the seasons has been quite marked from the first plague, just before the rising of the waters, on through the year until now the khamsin period (choshekh, "darkness" from any cause ( Exodus 10:21-29 )) has come. When this dreadful scourge comes with its hot sand-laden breath, more impenetrable than a London fog, it is in very truth a "darkness which may be felt." The dreadful horror of this monster from the desert can hardly be exaggerated. Once again Pharaoh said "Go," but this time he wished to retain the flocks and herds, a hostage for the return of the people ( Exodus 10:24 ). Upon Moses' refusal to accept this condition, he threatened his life. Why had he not done so ere this? Why, indeed, did he let this man Moses come and go with such freedom, defying him and his people in the very palace? Probably Moses' former career in Egypt explains this. If, as is most probable, he had grown up at court with this Merenptah, and had been known as "the son of Pharaoh's daughter," heir to the throne and successor to Rameses II, instead of Merenptah, then this refugee had undoubtedly many friends still in Egypt who would make his death a danger to the reigning Pharaoh.  10. Death of the Firstborn:  No intimation is given of the exact character of the death inflicted on the firstborn (bekhor, "firstborn," "chief" or "best"; compare  Job 18:13   Isaiah 14:30  ( Exodus 11-12:36 )) by the angel of the Lord, or its appearance. But it is already foretold as the "pestilence" ( Exodus 9:15 ). The pestis major or virulent bubonic plague corresponds most nearly in its natural phenomena to this plague. It culminates in a sudden and overwhelming virulence, takes the strongest and best, and then subsides with startling suddenness.  Thus, it appears that probably all the plagues were based upon natural phenomena which still exist in Egypt in the same order, and, when they do occur, find place somewhere during the course of one year.  II. Miraculous Use of the Phenomena.  The miraculous elements in the plagues are no less distinctly manifest than the natural phenomena themselves.  1. Intensification:  There was an intensification of the effect of the various plagues so much beyond all precedent as to impress everyone as being a special divine manifestation, and it was so. There was national horror of the blood-like water, disgust at the frogs, intolerable torture by the stinging insects and flies, utter ruin of the farmers in the loss of the cattle, the beating down of the crops by the hail, and the devouring of every green thing by the locusts, the sufferings and dread of the inhabitants by reason of the boils, the frightful electric storm, the suffocating darkness and, finally, the crushing disaster of the death of the firstborn. All these calamities may be found in Egypt to the present day, but never any of them, not to say all of them, in such overwhelming severity. That all of them should come in one year and all with such devastation was plainly a divine arrangement. Merely natural events do not arrange themselves so systematically. In this systematic severity were seen miracles of power.  2. Prediction:  The prediction of the plagues and the fulfillment of the prediction at the exact time to a day, sometimes to an hour (as the cessation of the thunder and lightning): There was first a general prediction ( Exodus 3:19, 20 ;  Exodus 7:3 ;  Exodus 9:14, 15 ) and an indication as the plagues went on that the climax would be pestilence ( Exodus 9:15 ). Then several of the plagues were specifically announced and a time was set for them; e.g. the flies ( Exodus 8:23 ), the murrain ( Exodus 9:5 ), the hail ( Exodus 9:18 ), the locusts ( Exodus 10:4 ), the death of the firstborn ( Exodus 11:4 ). In some cases a time for the removal of the plague was also specified: e.g. the frogs ( Exodus 8:10 ), the thunder and lightning ( Exodus 9:29 ). In every instance these predictions were exactly fulfilled. In some instances careful foresight might seem to supply in part this ability to predict. Perhaps it was by means of such foresight that the magicians "did so with their enchantments" for the first two plagues. The plague being in existence, foresight might safely predict that it would continue for a little time at least, so that, if the magicians sought for bloody water or called for frogs, they would seem to be successful. But the evidence which Yahweh produced went beyond them, and, at the third plague, they were unable to do anything. These things postulate, on the part of Moses and Aaron, knowledge far beyond human ken. Not only magicians could not do so with their enchantments, but modern science and discoveries are no more able so to predict events. Even meteorological phenomena are only predicted within the limits of reasonable foresight. Such wonders as the plagues of Egypt can in no wise be explained as merely natural. The prediction was a miracle of knowledge.  3. Discrimination:  The discrimination shown in the visitation by the plagues presents another miraculous element more significant and important than either the miracles of power or the miracles of knowledge. God put a difference between the Egyptians and the Israelites, beginning with the plague of flies and continuing, apparently, without exception, until the end. Such miracles of moral purpose admit of no possible explanation but the exercise of a holy will. Merely natural events make no such regular, systematic discriminations.  4. Orderliness and Increasing Severity:  The orderliness and gradually increasing severity of the plagues with such arrangement as brought "judgment upon the gods of Egypt," vindicating Yahweh as Ruler over all, and educating the people to know Yahweh as Lord of all the earth, present an aspect of events distinctly non-natural. Such method reveals also a divine mind at work.  5. Arrangement to Accomplish Divine Moral Purpose:  Last of all and most important of all, the plagues were so arranged as to accomplish in particular a great divine moral purpose in the revelation of God to the Israelites, to the Egyptians and to all the world. This is the distinctive mark of every real miracle. And this leads us directly to the consideration of the most important aspect of the plagues.  III. Divine Moral Purpose.  1. Discrediting of the gods of Egypt:  This discrediting of the gods of Egypt is marked at every step of the progress of the plagues, and the accumulated effect of the repeated discrediting of the gods must have had, and, indeed, had, a great influence upon the Egyptians. The plagues did `execute judgment against the gods of Egypt' ( Exodus 12:12 ), and the people and princes brought great pressure to bear upon Pharaoh to let the people go ( Exodus 10:7 ). The magicians who claimed to represent the gods of Egypt were defeated, Pharaoh himself, who was accounted divine, was humbled, the great god, the Nile, was polluted, frogs defiled the temples and, at last, the sun, the greatest god of Egypt, was blotted out in darkness.  2. Pharaoh Made to Know that Yahweh Is Lord:  Pharaoh was made to know that Yahweh is Lord, and acknowledged it ( Exodus 9:27 ;  Exodus 10:16 ). To this end the issue was clearly drawn. Pharaoh challenged the right of Yahweh to command him ( Exodus 5:2 ), and God required him then to "stand" to the trial until the evidence could be fully presented, in accordance with the fundamental principle that he who makes a charge is bound to stand to it until either he acknowledges its utter falsity or affords opportunity for full presentation of evidence. So we see God made Pharaoh to "stand" ( Exodus 9:16 ) (while the Bible, which speaks in the concrete language of life, calls it the hardening of Pharaoh's heart) until the case was tried out (compare Lamb, Miracle of Science, 126-49).  3. Revelation of God as Saviour:  A more blessed and gracious moral purpose of the plagues was the revelation of God as the Saviour of the world. This began in the revelation at the burning bush, where God, in fire, appeared in the bush, yet the bush was not consumed, but saved. This revelation, thus given to the people, was further evidenced by the separation between Israel and the Egyptians; was made known even to the Egyptians by the warning before the plague of hail, that those Egyptians who had been impressed with the power of God might also learn that He is a God that will save those who give heed unto Him; and, at last, reached its startling climax when the angel of the Lord passed over the blood-marked door the night of the death of the firstborn and the institution of the Passover.  4. Exhibition of the Divine Use of Evil:  Last of all, the plagues had a great moral purpose in that they embodied the divine use of evil in the experience of men in this world. As the experience of Job illustrates the use of evil in the life of the righteous, so the plagues of Egypt illustrate the same great problem of evil in the lot of the wicked. In the one case, as in the other, the wonders of God are so arranged as "to justify the ways of God to men."  The minutely accurate knowledge of life in Egypt displayed by this narrative in the Book of Exodus is inconceivable in an age of so little and difficult intercommunication between nations, except by actual residence of the author in Egypt. This has an important bearing upon the time of the composition of this narrative, and so upon the question of its author.  LITERATURE.  The literature of this subject is almost endless. It will suffice to refer the reader to all the general comms., and the special commentaries on Exodus, for discussion of doctrinal and critical questions. Two admirable recent discussions of the plagues, in English, are Lamb, Miracle of Science, and Merrins, "The Plagues of Egypt," in Bibliotheca Sacra, 1908, July and October.  M. G. Kyle
SHIMMA|     shim'-a.  See  SHAMMAH .
TUBALCAIN|The son of Lamech and Zillah, "an instructor of every artificer in brass and iron" ( Genesis 4:22 ; R.V.,  "the forger of every cutting instrument of brass and iron"). 
EPHLAL|     ef'-lal ('ephlal, "judgment"):  A descendant of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:37 ).
MATTATHIAS|Ibid.  (1.) The son of Amos, in the genealogy of our Lord ( Luke 3:25 ). (2.) The son of Semei, in the same genealogy ( Luke 3:26 ). 
STUMBLINGBLOCK|   STUMBLING-BLOCK; STUMBLING-STONE  stum'-bling-blok, (mikhshol, makhshelah; proskomma, skandalon): These are the most important of the varied renderings of either of two cognate Hebrew words, or of two different Greek words. Sometimes the Greek word for "stone" (lithos) accompanies the principal word. There is no important difference in the meaning of the words or of their renderings. the Revised Version (British and American) generally substitutes "stumbling" for "offence" of the King James Version.  The literal meaning of the Hebrew words-an object which causes one to stumble or fall-appears in such passages as  Leviticus 19:14 : "Thou shalt not.... put a stumblingblock (mikhshol) before the blind" (compare  Jeremiah 6:21 ). But the expression is ordinarily figurative, referring to that which causes material ruin or spiritual downfall, which were closely connected in Old Testament thought ( Psalm 119:165   Ezekiel 21:15 ). The things that lead astray are silver and gold ( Ezekiel 7:19 ); idols ( Ezekiel 14:3   Zephaniah 1:3 , etc.).  One of the New Testament words, skandalon, literally means the stick of a trap to which the bait is attached, and which when touched springs the trap. Figuratively either word refers to a thing or a person that leads one to fall into error, into sin or into destruction: the cross of Christ ( Galatians 5:11   Romans 11:9 ); another's liberty ( 1 Corinthians 8:9 ); Peter in  Matthew 16:23 ; Christ, whose life and character were so different from Jewish expectation ( Romans 9:33 ).  See also  OFFENCE .  George Rice Hovey
SHUNAMMITE|A person of Shunem ( 1 Kings 1:3 ;  2 Kings 4:12 ). The Syr. and Arab. read "Sulamite." 
SELA|=Se'lah, rock, the capital of Edom, situated in the great valley extending from the Dead Sea to the Red Sea ( 2 Kings 14:7 ). It was near Mount Hor, close by the desert of Zin. It is called "the rock" (<a href=
HEZIR|Swine or strong.  (1.) The head of the seventeenth course of the priests ( 1 Chronicles 24:15 ).  (2.)  Nehemiah 10:20 , one who sealed Nehemiah's covenant. 
BERA|Gift, or son of evil, king of Sodom at the time of the invasion of the four kings under Chedorlaomer ( Genesis 14:2 ,  8,  17,  21). 
TELAH|     te'-la (telah; Codex Vaticanus Thalees, Codex Alexandrinus Thale; Lucian, Thala): An Ephraimite ( 1 Chronicles 7:25 ).
GALATIA|Has been called the "Gallia" of the East, Roman writers calling its inhabitants Galli. They were an intermixture of Gauls and Greeks, and hence were called Gallo-Graeci, and the country Gallo-Graecia. The Galatians were in their origin a part of that great Celtic migration which invaded Macedonia about B.C. 280. They were invited by the king of Bithynia to cross over into Asia Minor to assist him in his wars. There they ultimately settled, and being strengthened by fresh accessions of the same clan from Europe, they overran Bithynia, and supported themselves by plundering neighbouring countries. They were great warriors, and hired themselves out as mercenary soldiers, sometimes fighting on both sides in the great battles of the times. They were at length brought under the power of Rome in B.C. 189, and Galatia became a Roman province B.C. 25. This province of Galatia, within the limits of which these Celtic tribes were confined, was the central region of Asia Minor. During his second missionary journey Paul, accompanied by Silas and Timothy ( Acts 16:6 ), visited the "region of Galatia," where he was detained by sickness ( Galatians 4:13 ), and had thus the longer opportunity of preaching to them the gospel. On his third journey he went over "all the country of Galatia and Phrygia in order" ( Acts 18:23 ). Crescens was sent thither by Paul toward the close of his life ( 2 Timothy 4:10 ). 
DOORPOSTS|The Jews were commanded to write the divine name on the posts (mezuzoth') of their doors ( Deuteronomy 6:9 ). The Jews, misunderstanding this injunction, adopted the custom of writing on a slip of parchment these verses ( Deuteronomy 6:4 -9,  and 11:13-21), which they enclosed in a reed or cylinder and fixed on the right-hand door-post of every room in the house. 
JOD|     jod "y": Yodh, the tenth letter of the Hebrew alphabet.  See  ALPHABET ;  JOT ; YODH.
PIBESETH|( Ezek. 30:17 ), supposed to mean. "a cat," or a deity in the form of a cat, worshipped by the Egyptians. It was called by the Greeks Bubastis. The hieroglyphic name is "Pe-bast", i.e., the house of Bast, the Artemis of the Egyptians. The town of Bubasts was situated on the Pelusian branch, i.e., the easternmost branch, of the Delta. It was the seat of one of the chief annual festivals of the Egyptians. Its ruins bear the modern name of Tel-Basta. 
SCRIBES|Anciently held various important offices in the public affairs of the nation. The Hebrew word so rendered (sopher) is first used to designate the holder of some military office ( Judges 5:14 ; A.V.,  "pen of the writer;" R.V.,  "the marshal's staff;" marg.,  "the staff of the scribe"). The scribes acted as secretaries of state, whose business it was to prepare and issue decrees in the name of the king ( 2 Samuel 8:17 ;  20:25 ;  1 Chronicles 18:16 ;  24:6 ;  1 Kings 4:3 ;  2 Kings 12:9 -11;  18:18 -37,  etc.). They discharged various other important public duties as men of high authority and influence in the affairs of state. There was also a subordinate class of scribes, most of whom were Levites. They were engaged in various ways as writers. Such, for example, was Baruch, who "wrote from the mouth of Jeremiah all the words of the Lord" ( Jeremiah 36:4 ,  32). In later times, after the Captivity, when the nation lost its independence, the scribes turned their attention to the law, gaining for themselves distinction by their intimate acquaintance with its contents. On them devolved the duty of multiplying copies of the law and of teaching it to others ( Ezra 7:6 ,  10-12;  Nehemiah 8:1 ,  4,  9,  13). It is evident that in New Testament times the scribes belonged to the sect of the Pharisees, who supplemented the ancient written law by their traditions ( Matthew 23 ), thereby obscuring it and rendering it of none effect. The titles "scribes" and "lawyers" (q.v.) are in the Gospels interchangeable ( Matthew 22:35 ;  Mark 12:28 ;  Luke 20:39 ,  etc.). They were in the time of our Lord the public teachers of the people, and frequently came into collision with him. They afterwards showed themselves greatly hostile to the apostles ( Acts 4:5 ;  6:12 ). Some of the scribes, however, were men of a different spirit, and showed themselves friendly to the gospel and its preachers. Thus Gamaliel advised the Sanhedrin, when the apostles were before them charged with "teaching in this name," to "refrain from these men and let them alone" ( Acts 5:34 -39; Comp.  23:9 ). 
JASHAR|   , BOOK OF  ja'-shar, jash'-ar (cepher ha-yashar; the King James Version Book of Jasher, margin "the book of the upright"): The title of an ancient Hebrew national song-book (literally, "book of the righteous one") from which two quotations are made in the Old Testament:  (1)  Joshua 10:12-14 , the command of Joshua to the sun and moon, "Sun, stand thou still upon Gibeon.. Is not this written in the book of Jashar?" (see BETH-HORON; Septuagint in this place omits the reference to Jashar); and  (2)  2 Samuel 1:8 , "the song of the bow," or lament of David over Saul and Jonathan.  (3) Some conjecture a third extract in  1 Kings 8:12 , "Then spake Solomon, Yahweh hath said that he would dwell in the thick darkness." The words of Yahweh are quoted by Septuagint in 8:53 as "written in the book of the song" (en biblio tes odes), and it is pointed out that the words "the song" (in Hebrew ha-shir) might easily be a corruption of ha-yashar. A similar confusion ("song" for "righteous") may explain the fact that the Peshitta Syriac of Joshua has for a title "the book of praises or hymns." The book evidently was a well-known one, and may have been a gradual collection of religious and national songs. It is conjectured that it may have included the So of Deborah ( Judges 5 ), and older pieces now found in the Pentateuch (e.g.  Genesis 4:23, 14 ;  Genesis 9:25-27 ; 27:27-29); this, however, is uncertain. On the curious theories and speculations of the rabbis and others about the book (that it was the Book of the Law, of Genesis, etc.), with the fantastic reconstructive theory of Dr. Donaldson in his Jasbar, see the full article in HDB.  James Orr
MEONENIM|( Judges 9:37 ; A.V.,  "the plain of Meonenim;" R.V.,  "the oak of Meonenim") means properly "soothsayers" or "sorcerers," "wizards" ( Deuteronomy 18:10 ,  14;  2 Kings 21:6 ;  Micah 5:12 ). This may be the oak at Shechem under which Abram pitched his tent (see  SHECHEM ), the "enchanter's oak," so called, perhaps, from Jacob's hiding the "strange gods" under it ( Genesis 35:4 ). 
HARNEPHER|A chief of the tribe of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 7:36 ). 
TRYPHAENA|     tri-fe'-na (Truphaina; the King James Version, Tryphena): Tryphaena is coupled with "Tryphosa"-among those members of the Christian community at Rome to whom Paul sends greetings ( Romans 16:12 ). He describes them as those "who labor in the Lord." "The names, which might be rendered `Dainty' and `Disdain' (see  James 5:5   Isaiah 66:11 ), are characteristically pagan, and unlike the description" (Denney). They were probably sisters or near relatives, for "it was usual to designate members of the same family by derivatives of the same root" (Lightfoot, Phil, 175). Both names are found in inscriptions connected with the imperial household, "Tryphosa" occurring more frequently than "Tryphaena."  S. F. Hunter
PHINEHAS|Mouth of brass, or from old Egypt, the negro.  (1.) Son of Eleazar, the high priest ( Exodus 6:25 ). While yet a youth he distinguished himself at Shittim by his zeal against the immorality into which the Moabites had tempted the people ( Numbers 25:1 -9), and thus "stayed the plague" that had broken out among the people, and by which twenty-four thousand of them perished. For his faithfulness on that occasion he received the divine approbation (10-13). He afterwards commanded the army that went out against the Midianites ( 31:6 -8). When representatives of the people were sent to expostulate with the two and a half tribes who, just after crossing Jordan, built an altar and departed without giving any explanation, Phinehas was their leader, and addressed them in the words recorded in  Joshua 22:16 -20. Their explanation follows. This great altar was intended to be all ages only a witness that they still formed a part of Israel. Phinehas was afterwards the chief adviser in the war with the Benjamites. He is commemorated in  Psalm 106:30 , 31. (see  ED .) (2.) One of the sons of Eli, the high priest ( 1 Samuel 1:3 ;  2:12 ). He and his brother Hophni were guilty of great crimes, for which destruction came on the house of Eli (31). He died in battle with the Philistines ( 1 Samuel 4:4 ,  11); and his wife, on hearing of his death, gave birth to a son, whom she called "Ichabod," and then she died (19-22). 
MALCHIJAH|     mal-ki'-ja (malkiyah, "Yah is king"; Melcheias, with variants):  (1) A Levite, descendant of Gershom, of those whom David set over the "service of sting" in the worship ( 1 Chronicles 6:40 ).  (2) The head of the 5th course of priests ( 1 Chronicles 24:9 ).  (3) One of the laymen who had taken "strange wives" during the exile ( Ezra 10:25 ); the "Melchias" of 1 Esdras 9:26.  (4) Another of the same name ( Ezra 10:25 ; two in same verse). Called "Asibias" in 1 Esdras 9:26.  (5) Another under the same offense, son of Harim ( Ezra 10:31 ). "Melchias" in 1 Esdras 9:32.  (6) One of the "repairers" who helped with the "tower of the furnaces" ( Nehemiah 3:11 ).  (7) Son of Rechab ruler of Beth-haccerem, repairer of the dung gate ( Nehemiah 3:14 ).  (8) A goldsmith who helped in building the walls of Jerusalem ( Nehemiah 3:31 ).  (9) One of those at Ezra's left hand when he read the law (though possibly one of the above ( Nehemiah 8:4 )). In 1 Esdras 9:44 "Melchias."  (10) One of the covenant signatories ( Nehemiah 10:3 ).  (11) The father of Pashhur ( Nehemiah 11:12   Jeremiah 21:1 ;  Jeremiah 38:1 ).  (12) A priest, a singer at the dedication of the walls of Jerusalem under Ezra and Nehemiah ( Nehemiah 12:42 ).  (13) (malkiyahu as above with u ending): Son of Ham-melech (or, as  1 Kings 22:26   2 Chronicles 28:7  translate it, "king's son"). Jeremiah was cast into his dungeon or pit ( Jeremiah 38:6 ).  The King James Version spells "Malchiah" or "Malchijah" indifferently with "Melchiah" in  Jeremiah 21:1 ; the English Revised Version has "Malchiah" in  Jeremiah 21:1 ;  Jeremiah 38:1, 6 , elsewhere "Malchijah"; the American Standard Revised Version has "Malchijah" throughout.  Henry Wallace
BETHTAPPUAH|House of apples, a town of Judah, now Tuffuh, 5 miles west of Hebron ( Joshua 15:53 ). 
BARKOS|Painter, ( Ezra 2:53 ;  Nehemiah 7:55 ). The father of some of the Nethinim. 
SABTECHA|The fifth son of Cush (id.). 
CHELUBAI|     ke-loo'-bi (kelubhay): Another form of Caleb used in  1 Chronicles 2:9 ; compare  1 Chronicles 2:18, 42 . Caleb is here described as the brother of Jerahmeel, and son of Hezron, a remote ancestor, instead of as the son of Jephunneh.  See  CALEB .
JEBUSI|   JEBUS; ; JEBUSITE  je'-bus, jeb'-u-si, jeb'-u-zit (yebhuc, ha-yebhuci): "Jebus" is an old name for Jerusalem ( Judges 19:10, 11   1 Chronicles 4:5  parallel  2 Samuel 5:6-9 , "the same is Jerus"; see preceding article). "Jebusi" (literally, "Jebusite") is also used as a name for the city in the King James Version ( Joshua 18:16, 28 ; compare  Joshua 15:8 ); the Revised Version (British and American) correctly renders "Jebusite" (see JERUSALEM). "Jebusites," for the people (in the King James Version  Genesis 15:21   Exodus 3:8, 17 , etc.), does not occur in Hebrew in the plural; hence, in the Revised Version (British and American) is always rendered in the singular, "Jebusite." The "Jebusite" is said in  Genesis 10:16   1 Chronicles 1:14  to be the 3rd son of Canaan, i.e. of the country of Canaan. Elsewhere he represents a tribe separate from the Canaanites. He stands between Heth and the Amorite (compare  Numbers 13:29   Joshua 11:3   Ezekiel 16:3, 15 ). In the lists of the peoples inhabiting Palestine the "Jebusite" is always placed last, a fact indicative, probably, of their smaller number.  To what race the Jebusites belonged is doubtful. Their name does not seem Semitic, and they do not make their appearance till after the patriarchal period.  The original name of Jerusalem was Babylonian, Uru-Salim, "the city of Salim," shortened into Salem in  Genesis 14:18  and in the inscriptions of the Egyptian kings Ramses II and Ramses III. In the Tell el-Amarna Letters (1400 B.C.) Jerusalem is still known as Uru-Salim, and its king bears a Hittite name, implying that it was at the time in the possession of the Hittites. His enemies, however, were closing around him, and one of the tablets shows that the city was eventually captured and its king slain. These enemies would seem to have been the Jebusites, since it is after this period that the name "Jebus" makes its appearance for the first time in the Old Testament ( Judges 19:10, 11 ).  The Jebusite king at the time of the conquest was Adoni-zedek, who met his death at Beth-boron ( Joshua 10:1 ; in  Joshua 10:5  the word "Amorite" is used in its Babylonian sense to denote the inhabitants of Canaan generally). The Jebusites were a mountain tribe ( Numbers 13:29   Joshua 11:3 ). Their capital "Jebus" was taken by the men of Judah and burned with fire ( Judges 18 ), but they regained possession of, and held, the fortress till the time of David ( 2 Samuel 5:6 ).  When Jerusalem was taken by David, the lives and property of its Jebusite inhabitants were spared, and they continued to inhabit the temple-hill, David and his followers settling in the new City of David on Mt. Zion ( Joshua 15:8, 63   Judges 1:21 ;  Judges 19:11 ). And as Araunah is called "king" ( 2 Samuel 24:23 ), we may conclude that their last ruler also had been lowed to live. His name is non-Sem, and the various spellings of it (compare  1 Chronicles 21:15 , "Ornan") indicate that the Hebrew writers had some difficulty in pronouncing it. The Jebusites seem ultimately to have blended with the Israelite population.  James Orr
SHEMINITH|Eight; octave, a musical term, supposed to denote the lowest note sung by men's voices ( 1 Chronicles 15:21 ;  Psalm 6 ; 12,  title). 
HEGE|   HEGAI;   he'-ga-i, he'-ge (heghay; Gai ( Esther 2:8, 15 ), and heghe', Hege ( Esther 2:3 )): One of the officers of the Persian king Ahasuerus; a chamberlain or eunuch (keeper of women), into whose custody the "fair young virgins" were delivered from whom the king intended to choose his queen in the place of the discredited Vashti.
HAMATHZOBAH|Fortress of Zobah, ( 2 Chronicles 8:3 ) is supposed by some to be a different place from the foregoing; but this is quite uncertain. 
MINNI|Only in  Jeremiah 51:27 , as the name of a province in Armenia, which was at this time under the Median kings. Armenia is regarded by some as = Har-minni i.e., the mountainous country of Minni. (see  ARMENIA .) 
URI|     u'-ri, oo'-ri (uri (uwri in  1 Kings 4:19 ), "fiery," unless the word be contracted for 'uriyah, "Uriah"):  (1) Son of Hur, and father of Bezalel ( Exodus 31:2 ;  Exodus 35:30 ;  Exodus 38:22   1 Chronicles 2:20   2 Chronicles 1:5 ).  (2) Father of Geber, one of Solomon's 12 provision officers ( 1 Kings 4:19 ; the Septuagint's Codex Vaticanus and Codex Alexandrinus, Adai).  (3) A porter who had married a foreign wife ( Ezra 10:24 ; the Septuagint's Odouth; Codex Alexandrinus Odoue; Lucian Ourias).
SHUA|Wealth.  (1.) A Canaanite whose daughter was married to Judah ( 1 Chronicles 2:3 ). (2.) A daughter of Heber the Asherite ( 1 Chronicles 7:32 ). 
DINAITES|     di'-na-its (dinaye'): A people mentioned in  Ezra 4:9 , as settled in the city of Samaria by Osnappar (Assurbanipal). The identification is uncertain.
EPAPHRAS|Lovely, spoken of by Paul ( Colossians 1:7 ;  4:12 ) as "his dear fellow-servant," and "a faithful minister of Christ." He was thus evidently with him at Rome when he wrote to the Colossians. He was a distinguished disciple, and probably the founder of the Colossian church. He is also mentioned in the Epistle to Philemon ( 1:23 ), where he is called by Paul his "fellow-prisoner." 
HALAH|A district of Media to which captive Israelites were transported by the Assyrian kings ( 2 Kings 17:6 ;  18:11 ;  1 Chronicles 5:26 ). It lay along the banks of the upper Khabur, from its source to its junction with the Jerujer. Probably the district called by Ptolemy Chalcitis. 
VOPHSI|     vof'-si (wophci, meaning unknown): Father of Nahbi the Naphtalite spy ( Numbers 13:14 ); but the text is doubtful. The Septuagint's Codex Vaticanus has Iabei; Codex Alexandrinus, Codex F, and Lucian Iabi.
SYNTYCHE|Fortunate; affable, a female member of the church at Philippi, whom Paul beseeches to be of one mind with Euodias ( Philippians 4:2 , 3). 
SHIPHTAN|Judicial, an Ephraimite prince at the time of the division of Canaan ( Numbers 34:24 ). 
MERARI|Sad; bitter, the youngest son of Levi, born before the descent of Jacob into Egypt, and one of the seventy who accompanied him thither ( Genesis 46:11 ;  Exodus 6:16 ). He became the head of one of the great divisions of the Levites ( Exodus 6:19 ). (see  TES .) 
JEHORAM|Jehovah-exalted.  (1.) Son of Toi, king of Hamath, sent by his father to congratulate David on the occasion of his victory over Hadadezer ( 2 Samuel 8:10 ). (2.) A Levite of the family of Gershom ( 1 Chronicles 26:25 ). (3.) A priest sent by Jehoshaphat to instructruct the people in Judah ( 2 Chronicles 17:8 ). (4.) The son of Ahab and Jezebel, and successor to his brother Ahaziah on the throne of Israel. He reigned twelve years, B.C. 896-884 ( 2 Kings 1:17 ;  3:1 ). His first work was to reduce to subjection the Moabites, who had asserted their independence in the reign of his brother. Jehoshaphat, king of Judah, assisted Jehoram in this effort. He was further helped by his ally the king of Edom. Elisha went forth with the confederated army ( 2 Kings 3:1 -19), and at the solicitation of Jehoshaphat encouraged the army with the assurance from the Lord of a speedy victory. The Moabites under Mesha their king were utterly routed and their cities destroyed. At Kir-haraseth Mesha made a final stand. The Israelites refrained from pressing their victory further, and returned to their own land. Elisha afterwards again befriended Jehoram when a war broke out between the Syrians and Israel, and in a remarkable way brought that war to a bloodless close ( 2 Kings 6:23 ). But Jehoram, becoming confident in his own power, sank into idolatry, and brought upon himself and his land another Syrian invasion, which led to great suffering and distress in Samaria ( 2 Kings 6:24 -33). By a remarkable providential interposition the city was saved from utter destruction, and the Syrians were put to flight ( 2 Kings 7:6 -15). Jehoram was wounded in a battle with the Syrians at Ramah, and obliged to return to Jezreel ( 2 Kings 8:29 ;  9:14 ,  15), and soon after the army proclaimed their leader Jehu king of Israel, and revolted from their allegiance to Jehoram ( 2 Kings 9 ). Jehoram was pierced by an arrow from Jehu's bow on the piece of ground at Jezreel which Ahab had taken from Naboth, and there he died ( 2 Kings 9:21 -29). (5.) The eldest son and successor of Jehoshaphat, king of Judah. He reigned eight years (B.C. 892-885) alone as king of Judah, having been previously for some years associated with his father ( 2 Chronicles 21:5 ,  20;  2 Kings 8:16 ). His wife was Athaliah, the daughter of Ahab and Jezebel. His daughter Jehosheba was married to the high priest Jehoiada. He sank into gross idolatry, and brought upon himself and his kingdom the anger of Jehovah. The Edomites revolted from under his yoke, and the Philistines and the Arabians and Cushites invaded the land, and carried away great spoil, along with Jehoram's wives and all his children, except Ahaziah. He died a painful death from a fearful malady, and was refused a place in the sepulchre of the kings ( 2 Kings 8:16 -24;  2 Chronicles 21 ). 
SINIM|Sinim, The land of ( Isaiah 49:12 ), supposed by some to mean China, but more probably Phoenicia ( Genesis 10:17 ) is intended. 
SHION|     shi'-on (shi'on; Codex Vaticanus Siona, Codex Alexandrinus Seian): A town in the territory of Issachar, named with Shunem, Hapharaim and Anaharath ( Joshua 19:19 ). It is possibly identical with Khirbet Sha'in, near `Ain esh-Sha'in, circa 4 miles Northwest of Mt. Tabor.
IMNITES|     im'-nits (yimni): Descendants of IMNAH (q.v. (1)) ( Numbers 26:44 , the King James Version "Jimnites").
TABERAH|Burning, a place in the wilderness of Paran, where the "fire of the Lord" consumed the murmuring Israelites ( Numbers 11:3 ;  Deuteronomy 9:22 ). It was also called Kibroth-hattaavah (q.v.). 
PHILOLOGUS|     fi-lol'-o-gus (Philologos, "fond of learning," "learned"): The name of a Roman Christian to whom Paul sent greetings ( Romans 16:15 ). His name is coupled with that of Julia, who was probably his wife or sister. Philologus and those united with him in this salutation formed by themselves one of the "house churches" or groups in the Christian community. The name is found in inscriptions connected with the imperial household, with reference to one of which Bishop Lightfoot has the following note: "It has been supposed that the name Philologus was given by the master to the freedman mentioned in this inscription, as being appropriate to his office (Friedlander I, 89, 160)..... If so, some light is thrown on the probable occupation of the Philologus of Paul" (Phil, 177, note 1).  S. F. Hunter
FISHPOOLS|(Cant. 7:4) should be simply "pools," as in the Revised Version. The reservoirs near Heshbon (q.v.) were probably stocked with fish ( 2 Samuel 2:13 ;  4:12 ;  Isaiah 7:3 ;  22:9 ,  11). 
JEZER|     je'-zer (yecher, "form" or "purpose"): A "son" of Naphtali ( Genesis 46:24   Numbers 26:49   1 Chronicles 7:13 ).
KEILAH|Citadel, a city in the lowlands of Judah ( Joshua 15:44 ). David rescued it from the attack of the Philistines ( 1 Samuel 23:1 -8); but the inhabitants proving unfaithful to him, in that they sought to deliver him up to Saul (13), he and his men "departed from Keilah, and went whithersoever they could go." They fled to the hill Hareth, about 3 miles to the east, and thence through Hebron to Ziph (q.v.). "And David was in the wilderness of Ziph, in a wood" ( 1 Samuel 23:15 ). Here Jonathan sought him out, "and strengthened his hand in God." This was the last interview between David and Jonathan ( 23:16 -18). It is the modern Khurbet Kila. Others identify it with Khuweilfeh, between Beit Jibrin (Eleutheropolis) and Beersheba, mentioned in the Amarna tablets. 
TAMAR|Palm.  (1.) A place mentioned by Ezekiel ( 47:19 ;  48:28 ), on the southeastern border of Palestine. Some suppose this was "Tadmor" (q.v.). (2.) The daughter-in-law of Judah, to whose eldest son, Er, she was married ( Genesis 38:6 ). After her husband's death, she was married to Onan, his brother (8), and on his death, Judah promised to her that his third son, Shelah, would become her husband. This promise was not fulfilled, and hence Tamar's revenge and Judah's great guilt ( 38:12 -30). (3.) A daughter of David ( 2 Samuel 13:1 -32;  1 Chronicles 3:9 ), whom Amnon shamefully outraged and afterwards "hated exceedingly," thereby illustrating the law of human nature noticed even by the heathen, "Proprium humani ingenii est odisse quem laeseris", i.e., "It is the property of human nature to hate one whom you have injured." (4.) A daughter of Absalom ( 2 Samuel 14:27 ). 
NAPHISH|Refresher, one of the sons of Ishmael ( Genesis 25:15 ;  1 Chronicles 1:31 ). He was the father of an Arab tribe. 
NAAMAN|Pleasantness, a Syrian, the commander of the armies of Benhadad II. in the time of Joram, king of Israel. He was afflicted with leprosy; and when the little Hebrew slave-girl that waited on his wife told her of a prophet in Samaria who could cure her master, he obtained a letter from Benhadad and proceeded with it to Joram. The king of Israel suspected in this some evil design against him, and rent his clothes. Elisha the prophet hearing of this, sent for Naaman, and the strange interview which took place is recorded in  2 Kings 5 . The narrative contains all that is known of the Syrian commander. He was cured of his leprosy by dipping himself seven times in the Jordan, according to the word of Elisha. His cure is alluded to by our Lord ( Luke 4:27 ). 
PALTITE|The designation of one of David's heroes ( 2 Samuel 23:26 ); called also the Pelonite ( 1 Chronicles 11:27 ). 
NEZIAH|Victory; pure,  Ezra 2:54 ;  Nehemiah 7:56 . 
BETHELITE|A designation of Hiel (q.v.), who rebuilt Jericho and experienced the curse pronounced long before ( 1 Kings 16:34 ). 
MERAIOTH|Rebellions.  (1.) Father of Amariah, a high priest of the line of Eleazar ( 1 Chronicles 6:6 ,  7,  52). (2.)  Nehemiah 12:15 , a priest who went to Jerusalem with Zerubbabel. He is called Meremoth in  Nehemiah 12:3 . 
PILATE|Pilate, Pontius  Probably connected with the Roman family of the Pontii, and called "Pilate" from the Latin pileatus, i.e., "wearing the pileus", which was the "cap or badge of a manumitted slave," as indicating that he was a "freedman," or the descendant of one. He was the sixth in the order of the Roman procurators of Judea (A.D. 26-36). His headquarters were at Caesarea, but he frequently went up to Jerusalem. His reign extended over the period of the ministry of John the Baptist and of Jesus Christ, in connection with whose trial his name comes into prominent notice. Pilate was a "typical Roman, not of the antique, simple stamp, but of the imperial period, a man not without some remains of the ancient Roman justice in his soul, yet pleasure-loving, imperious, and corrupt. He hated the Jews whom he ruled, and in times of irritation freely shed their blood. They returned his hatred with cordiality, and accused him of every crime, maladministration, cruelty, and robbery. He visited Jerusalem as seldom as possible; for, indeed, to one accustomed to the pleasures of Rome, with its theatres, baths, games, and gay society, Jerusalem, with its religiousness and ever-smouldering revolt, was a dreary residence. When he did visit it he stayed in the palace of Herod the Great, it being common for the officers sent by Rome into conquered countries to occupy the palaces of the displaced sovereigns." After his trial before the Sanhedrin, Jesus was brought to the Roman procurator, Pilate, who had come up to Jerusalem as usual to preserve order during the Passover, and was now residing, perhaps, in the castle of Antonia, or it may be in Herod's palace. Pilate came forth from his palace and met the deputation from the Sanhedrin, who, in answer to his inquiry as to the nature of the accusation they had to prefer against Jesus, accused him of being a "malefactor." Pilate was not satisfied with this, and they further accused him (1) of sedition, (2) preventing the payment of the tribute to Caesar, and (3) of assuming the title of king ( Luke 23:2 ). Pilate now withdrew with Jesus into the palace ( John 18:33 ) and examined him in private (37, 38); and then going out to the deputation still standing before the gate, he declared that he could find no fault in Jesus ( Luke 23:4 ). This only aroused them to more furious clamour, and they cried that he excited the populace "throughout all Jewry, beginning from Galilee." When Pilate heard of Galilee, he sent the accused to Herod Antipas, who had jurisdiction over that province, thus hoping to escape the difficulty in which he found himself. But Herod, with his men of war, set Jesus at nought, and sent him back again to Pilate, clad in a purple robe of mockery ( 23:11 ,  12). Pilate now proposed that as he and Herod had found no fault in him, they should release Jesus; and anticipating that they would consent to this proposal, he ascended the judgment-seat as if ready to ratify the decision ( Matthew 27:19 ). But at this moment his wife (Claudia Procula) sent a message to him imploring him to have nothing to do with the "just person." Pilate's feelings of perplexity and awe were deepened by this incident, while the crowd vehemently cried out, "Not this man, but Barabbas." Pilate answered, "What then shall I do with Jesus?" The fierce cry immediately followed. "Let him be crucified." Pilate, apparently vexed, and not knowning what to do, said, "Why, what evil hath he done?" but with yet fiercer fanaticism the crowd yelled out, "Away with him! crucify him, crucify him!" Pilate yielded, and sent Jesus away to be scourged. This scourging was usually inflicted by lictors; but as Pilate was only a procurator he had no lictor, and hence his soldiers inflicted this terrible punishment. This done, the soldiers began to deride the sufferer, and they threw around him a purple robe, probably some old cast-off robe of state ( Matthew 27:28 ;  John 19:2 ), and putting a reed in his right hand, and a crowd of thorns on his head, bowed the knee before him in mockery, and saluted him, saying, "Hail, King of the Jews!" They took also the reed and smote him with it on the head and face, and spat in his face, heaping upon him every indignity. Pilate then led forth Jesus from within the Praetorium ( Matthew 27:27 ) before the people, wearing the crown of thorns and the purple robe, saying, "Behold the man!" But the sight of Jesus, now scourged and crowned and bleeding, only stirred their hatred the more, and again they cried out, "Crucify him, crucify him!" and brought forth this additional charge against him, that he professed to be "the Son of God." Pilate heard this accusation with a superstitious awe, and taking him once more within the Praetorium, asked him, "Whence art thou?" Jesus gave him no answer. Pilate was irritated by his continued silence, and said, "Knowest thou not that I have power to crucify thee?" Jesus, with calm dignity, answered the Roman, "Thou couldest have no power at all against me, except it were given thee from above." After this Pilate seemed more resolved than ever to let Jesus go. The crowd perceiving this cried out, "If thou let this man go, thou art not Caesar's friend." This settled the matter. He was afraid of being accused to the emperor. Calling for water, he washed his hands in the sight of the people, saying, "I am innocent of the blood of this just person." The mob, again scorning his scruples, cried, "His blood be on us, and on our children." Pilate was stung to the heart by their insults, and putting forth Jesus before them, said, "Shall I crucify your King?" The fatal moment had now come. They madly exclaimed, "We have no king but Caesar;" and now Jesus is given up to them, and led away to be crucified. By the direction of Pilate an inscription was placed, according to the Roman custom, over the cross, stating the crime for which he was crucified. Having ascertained from the centurion that he was dead, he gave up the body to Joseph of Arimathea to be buried. Pilate's name now disappears from the Gospel history. References to him, however, are found in the Acts of the Apostles ( 3:13 ;  4:27 ;  13:28 ), and in  1 Timothy 6:13 . In A.D. 36 the governor of Syria brought serious accusations against Pilate, and he was banished to Vienne in Gaul, where, according to tradition, he committed suicide. 
MOLID|     mo'-lid (molidh): A Judahite ( 1 Chronicles 2:29 ).
MATRI|     ma'-tri (maTri, "rainy"): A family of the tribe of Benjamin to which King Saul belonged ( 1 Samuel 10:21  the King James Version).
SOREK|Choice vine, the name of a valley, i.e., a torrent-bed, now the Wady Surar, "valley of the fertile spot," which drains the western Judean hills, and flowing by Makkedah and Jabneel, falls into the sea some eight miles south of Joppa. This was the home of Deliah, whom Samson loved ( Judges 16:4 ). 
CABBON|     kab'-on (kabbon; Chabra): A place in the Shephelah of Judah near Eglon ( Joshua 15:40 ). It is possibly the same as MACHBENA, which see.
SHAPHAN|A coney, a scribe or secretary of king Josiah ( 2 Kings 22:3 -7). He consulted Huldah concerning the newly-discovered copy of the law which was delivered to him by Hilkiah the priest (8-14). His grandson Gedaliah was governor of Judea ( 25:22 ). 
DEVOTIONS|   DEVOTION;   de-vo'-shun, (sebasmata): For the King James Version "your devotions" ( Acts 17:23 ), the Revised Version (British and American) has "the objects of your worship," which is probably the intended meaning of the King James Version. the Revised Version (British and American) reads "devotion" for the King James Version "prayer" in  Job 15:4  (the Revised Version, margin "meditation," Hebrew siach).
IZEHAR|     iz'-e-har, i'-ze-har ( Numbers 3:19  the King James Version).  See  IZHAR .
BAALZEBUB|Fly-lord, the god of the Philistines at Ekron ( 2 Kings 1:2 ,  3,  16). This name was given to the god because he was supposed to be able to avert the plague of flies which in that region was to be feared. He was consulted by Ahaziah as to his recovery. 
HINNOM|A deep, narrow ravine separating Mount Zion from the so-called "Hill of Evil Counsel." It took its name from "some ancient hero, the son of Hinnom." It is first mentioned in  Joshua 15:8 . It had been the place where the idolatrous Jews burned their children alive to Moloch and Baal. A particular part of the valley was called Tophet, or the "fire-stove," where the children were burned. After the Exile, in order to show their abhorrence of the locality, the Jews made this valley the receptacle of the offal of the city, for the destruction of which a fire was, as is supposed, kept constantly burning there. The Jews associated with this valley these two ideas, (1) that of the sufferings of the victims that had there been sacrificed; and (2) that of filth and corruption. It became thus to the popular mind a symbol of the abode of the wicked hereafter. It came to signify hell as the place of the wicked. "It might be shown by infinite examples that the Jews expressed hell, or the place of the damned, by this word. The word Gehenna [the Greek contraction of Hinnom] was never used in the time of Christ in any other sense than to denote the place of future punishment." About this fact there can be no question. In this sense the word is used eleven times in our Lord's discourses ( Matthew 23:33 ;  Luke 12:5 ;  Matthew 5:22 ,  etc.). 
NICOLAUS|   ; NICOLAS  nik-o-la'-us (English Versions of the Bible), nik'-o-las (Nikolaos): One of "the seven" chosen to have the oversight of "the daily ministration" to the poor of the church in Jerusalem ( Acts 6:5 ). He is called "a proselyte of Antioch"; the other 6 were therefore probably Jews by birth. This is the first recorded case of the admission of a proselyte into office in the Christian church. Some of the church Fathers (Irenaeus, Hippolytus, Pseudo-Tertullian) state that he was the founder of the sect called NICOLAITANS (which see) ( Revelation 2:15 ). Other Fathers seem to suggest that this was a vain claim made by this sect in seeking apostolic authority for their opinions. It may be that the opinions of this sect were an antinomian exaggeration of the preaching of Nicolaus.  S. F. Hunter
IRA|Citizen; wakeful.  (1.) A Tekoite, one of David's thirty warriors ( 2 Samuel 23:26 ). (2.) An Ithrite, also one of David's heroes ( 2 Samuel 23:38 ). (3.) A Jairite and priest, a royal chaplain ( 2 Samuel 20:26 ) or confidential adviser (Comp.  2 Samuel 8:18 ;  1 Chronicles 18:17 ). 
MACHPELAH|Portion; double cave, the cave which Abraham bought, together with the field in which it stood, from Ephron the Hittite, for a family burying-place ( Genesis 23 ). It is one of those Bible localities about the identification of which there can be no doubt. It was on the slope of a hill on the east of Hebron, "before Mamre." Here were laid the bodies of Abraham and Sarah, Isaac and Rebekah, Jacob and Leah ( Genesis 23:19 ;  25:9 ;  49:31 ;  50:13 ). Over the cave an ancient Christian church was erected, probably in the time of Justinian, the Roman emperor. This church has been converted into a Mohammedan mosque. The whole is surrounded by the el-Haram i.e., "the sacred enclosure," about 200 feet long, 115 broad, and of an average height of about 50. This building, from the immense size of some of its stones, and the manner in which they are fitted together, is supposed by some to have been erected in the days of David or of Solomon, while others ascribe it to the time of Herod. It is looked upon as the most ancient and finest relic of Jewish architecture. On the floor of the mosque are erected six large cenotaphs as monuments to the dead who are buried in the cave beneath. Between the cenotaphs of Isaac and Rebekah there is a circular opening in the floor into the cavern below, the cave of Machpelah. Here it may be that the body of Jacob, which was embalmed in Egypt, is still preserved (much older embalmed bodies have recently been found in the cave of Deir el-Bahari in Egypt,  see  PHARAOH ), though those of the others there buried may have long ago mouldered into dust. The interior of the mosque was visited by the Prince of Wales in 1862 by a special favour of the Mohammedan authorities. An interesting account of this visit is given in Dean Stanley's Lectures on the Jewish Church. It was also visited in 1866 by the Marquis of Bute, and in 1869 by the late Emperor (Frederick) of Germany, then the Crown Prince of Prussia. In 1881 it was visited by the two sons of the Prince of Wales, accompanied by Sir C. Wilson and others. (See Palestine Quarterly Statement,  October 1882). 
SEBAM|       (sebham; Sebama; the King James Version Shebam):  A town in the upland pasture land given to the tribes of Reuben and Gad. It is named along with Heshbon, Elealeh and Nebo (Nu 32:3). It is probably the same place as Sibmah (the King James Version "Shibmah") in Nu 32:38 (so also Josh 13:19). In the time of Isaiah and Jeremiah it was a Moabite town, but there is no record of how or when it was taken from Israel. It appears to have been famous for the luxuriance of its vines and for its summer fruits (Isa 16:8; Jer 48:32). Eusebius (in Onomasticon) calls it a city of Moab in the land of Gilead which fell to the tribe of Reuben. Jerome (Comm. in Isa 5) says it was about 500 paces from Heshbon, and he describes it as one of the strong places of that region. It may be represented by the modern Simia, which stands on the south side of Wady Chesban, about 2 miles from Chesban. The ancient ruins are considerable, with large sarcophagi; and in the neighboring rock wine presses are cut (PEFM, "Eastern Palestine," 221). W. Ewing
MAMRE|Manliness.  (1.) An Amoritish chief in alliance with Abraham ( Genesis 14:13 ,  24). (2.) The name of the place in the neighbourhood of Hebron (q.v.) where Abraham dwelt ( Genesis 23:17 ,  19;  35:27 ); called also in Authorized Version ( 13:18 ) the "plain of Mamre," but in Revised Version more correctly "the oaks [marg., `terebinths'] of Mamre." The name probably denotes the "oak grove" or the "wood of Mamre," thus designated after Abraham's ally. This "grove" must have been within sight of or "facing" Machpelah (q.v.). The site of Mamre has been identified with Ballatet Selta, i.e., "the oak of rest", where there is a tree called "Abraham's oak," about a mile and a half west of Hebron. Others identify it with er-Rameh, 2 miles north of Hebron. 
EYES|   , BLINDING OF THE  blind'-ing.  See  EYE ;  PUNISHMENTS .  EYES, COVERING, OF THE  kuv'-er-ing:  In  Genesis 20:16 , means forgetfulness of the past, a willingness to overlook the wrong to which Sarah had been exposed.  EYES, DISEASES OF THE  di-zez'-is:  Blindness, defects of sight and diseases of the eye are frequently mentioned in the Scriptures, but usually in general terms. It is probable that in the period covered by the Bible, ophthalmia was as common in Palestine and Egypt as it is now. See  BLINDNESS . The commonest of the diseases at present is the purulent conjunctivitis which is a highly infectious malady affecting people of all ages, but especially children, and whose germs are carried from eye to eye by the flies, which are allowed to walk freely over the diseased eyes. This is one of the most disgusting sights in a Palestine village, but I have been told by mothers that it is esteemed unlucky to drive off the flies. In this manner the disease is propagated. The number of persons in any Palestine village whose eyes are more or less blemished by disease is on this account phenomenally large.  Blindness incapacitated a man from serving in the priesthood ( Leviticus 21:16, 18 ); even a blemish of the eye was regarded as a disqualification ( Leviticus 21:20 ).  The cases in the New Testament of persons blind from their birth (as  John 9:1 ) were probably the results of this ophthalmia, but may have been due to congenital malformation. The interesting psychological record of the difficulty of interpreting the new visual sensations by the blind man healed by our Lord ( Mark 8:22 ) indicates that it was probably not a case of congenital blindness, as the evangelist uses the word apokatestathe ("restored"), but he had been so long blind that he had lost the power of appreciating the sense-impressions. This condition has been often discussed as a psycho-physical problem since the days of Molyneux and Locke (Essay on the Human Understanding, II, 9, 8).  The blindness of Paul was probably a temporary paralysis of the retina from the shock of a dazzling light accentuated by the intense emotion which accompanied his vision on the road to Damascus. The "scales" mentioned in  Acts 9:18  were not material, but his sight was restored as if (hosei) scales had fallen from his eyes. How far this left his eyes weak we do not know, but from his inability to recognize the high priest ( Acts 23:5 ) and from his employing an amanuensis for transcribing his epistles ( Romans 16:22 ), as well as from his writing in characters of large size (pelikos;  Galatians 6:11 ), it is probable that his vision was defective, and this it has been conjectured was the "thorn in the flesh" of  2 Corinthians 12:7 .  Senile blindness, the result either of cataract or retinal degeneration, is mentioned in the cases of Isaac ( Genesis 27:1 ), Jacob ( Genesis 48:10 ) and Eli ( 1 Samuel 4:15 ). The frequency of such senile dimness of sight made the case of Moses the more remarkable that at the age of 120 his eye was not dim ( Deuteronomy 34:7 ).  Tobit's blindness, caused by the irritation of the sparrow's dung (APC Tobit 2:10), was a traumatic conjunctivitis which left an opacity. It is not said that the whiteness was itself sufficiently large to destroy vision. There was with it probably a considerable amount of conjunctival thickening, and it is possible that the remedy might have removed this. It certainly could not remove a cicatricial white spot of the nature of an albugo. The conjecture of a recent commentator that the gall, by coloring the spot, made the eye look as if sight was restored when it really was not, seems ludicrously inept. In any case the historical accuracy of the narrative is so problematical that explanation is unnecessary.  See  BLINDNESS .  Alexander Macalister
JONATH|    ELEM REHOKIM  jo'-nath e'-lem re-ho'-kim (yonath 'elem rechoqim) (Psalm 56, title): "The silent dove of the far ones" (i.e. either of far-off lands, or among aliens), or "The dove of the distant terebinths," in either case indicating the tune to the melody of which the psalm was to be sung.  See  PSALMS ;  SONG .
SHEMUEL|Heard of God.  (1.) The son of Ammihud. He represented Simeon in the division of the land ( Numbers 34:20 ). (2.) Used for "Samuel" ( 1 Chronicles 6:33 ,  R.V.). (3.) A prince of the tribe of Issachar ( 1 Chronicles 7:2 ). 
PARNACH|     par'-nak (parnakh, "gifted"): Father of Elizaphan, the prince of Zebulun ( Numbers 34:25 ).
CARMELITESS|     kar'-mel-it-es, kar-mel-i'-tes (karmelith; Karmelia): A name applied only to Abigail, the wife of Nabal, and subsequently of David, a native of Carmel in Judah ( 1 Samuel 27:3   1 Chronicles 3:1 ).
TIRZAH|     tur'-za (tirtsah; Thersa):  (1) A royal city of the Canaanites, the king of which was slain by Joshua (12:24). It superseded Shechem as capital of the Northern Kingdom ( 1 Kings 14:17 , etc.), and itself gave place in turn to Samaria. Here reigned Jeroboam, Nadab his son, Baasha, Elah and Zimri ( 1 Kings 15:21, 33 ;  1 Kings 16:6, 8, 9, 15 ). Baasha was buried in Tirzah. Here Elah was assassinated while "drinking himself drunk" in the house of his steward; here therefore probably he was buried. Zimri perished in the flames of his palace, rather than fall into Omri's hands. In Tirzah Menahem matured his rebellion against Shallum ( 2 Kings 15:14 ). The place is mentioned in  Songs 6:4  the King James Version, where the Shulammite is said to be "beautiful.... as Tirzah, comely as Jerusalem." The comparison may be due to the charm of its situation. The name may possibly be derived from ratsah, "to delight." Several identifications have been suggested. Buhl (Geographic des alten Palestina, 203) favors et-tireh, on the West of the plain of Makhneh, 4 miles South of Nablus, which he identifies with the Tira-thana of Josephus. He quotes Neubauer to the effect that the later Jews said Tir`an or Tar`ita instead of Tirzah, as weakening the claim of Telluzah, which others (e.g. Robinson, BR, III, 302) incline to. It is a partly ruined village with no spring, but with ancient cisterns, on a hill about 4 miles East of North from Nablus. This was evidently the place intended by Brocardius-Thersa, about 3 miles East of Samaria (Descriptio, VII). A third claimant is Teiasir, a fortress at the point where the road from Abel-meholah joins that from Shechem to Bethshan, fully 11 miles Northeast of Nablus. It is impossible to decide with certainty. The heavy "T" in Telluzah is a difficulty. Teiasir is perhaps too far from Shechem. Buhl's case for identification with eT-Tireh is subject to the same difficulty as Telluzah.  (2) One of the five daughters of Zelophehad ( Numbers 26:33 ;  Numbers 27:1 ;  Numbers 36:11   Joshua 17:3 ).  W. Ewing
JONADAB|=Jehon'adab.  (1.) The son of Rechab, and founder of the Rechabites (q.v.),  2 Kings 10:15 ;  Jeremiah 35:6 , 10. (2.) The son of Shimeah, David's brother (<a 
UZZENSHERAH|A town probably near Beth-horon. It derived its name from the daughter of Ephraim ( 1 Chronicles 7:24 ). 
HACHILAH|The darksome hill, one of the peaks of the long ridge of el-Kolah, running out of the Ziph plateau, "on the south of Jeshimon" (i.e.,  of the "waste"), the district to which one looks down from the plateau of Ziph ( 1 Samuel 23:19 ). After his reconciliation with Saul at Engedi ( 24:1 -8), David returned to Hachilah, where he had fixed his quarters. The Ziphites treacherously informed Saul of this, and he immediately ( 26:1 -4) renewed his pursuit of David, and "pitched in the hill of Hachilah." David and his nephew Abishai stole at night into the midst of Saul's camp, when they were all asleep, and noiselessly removed the royal spear and the cruse from the side of the king, and then, crossing the intervening valley to the height on the other side, David cried to the people, and thus awoke the sleepers. He then addressed Saul, who recognized his voice, and expostulated with him. Saul professed to be penitent; but David could not put confidence in him, and he now sought refuge at Ziklag. David and Saul never afterwards met. ( 1 Samuel 26:13 -25). 
CRESCENS|Increasing, probably one of the seventy disciples of Christ. He was one of Paul's assistants ( 2 Timothy 4:10 ), probably a Christian of Rome. 
LASHARON|   LASSHARON  la-sha'-ron, la-shar'-on (lashsharon or la-sharon, the King James Version Sharon): A royal city of the Canaanites taken by Joshua, named with Aphek ( Joshua 12:18 ). Possibly we should here follow the reading of Septuagint (Codex Vaticanus), "the king of Aphek in Sharon." Eusebius, Onomasticon (s.v. "Saron") mentions a region between Mt. Tabor and the Lake of Tiberias called Sarona. This is probably represented by the ancient site Sarona, on the plateau 6 1/2 miles Southwest 2 of Tiberias. If Massoretic Text is correct, this may be the place intended.
OPHIR| (1.) One of the sons of Joktan ( Genesis 10:29 ). (2.) Some region famous for its gold ( 1 Kings 9:28 ;  10:11 ;  22:48 ;  Job 22:24 ;  28:16 ;  Isaiah 13:12 ). In the LXX. this word is rendered "Sophir," and "Sofir" is the Coptic name for India, which is the rendering of the Arabic version, as also of the Vulgate. Josephus has identified it with the Golden Chersonese, i.e., the Malay peninsula. It is now generally identified with Abhira, at the mouth of the Indus. Much may be said, however, in favour of the opinion that it was somewhere in Arabia. 
FEASTS|    AND FASTS  fests (mo`edh, "an appointed day" or "an assembling," chagh, from chaghagh, "to dance" or possibly "to make a pilgrimage"; tsom, "fast," ta`anith, "a day of affliction"):  I. PRE-EXILIC  A) Annual  1. Passover, 15th-22d Nican  2. Pentecost, 6th Ciwan) Pilgrimage  3. Tabernacles, 15th-22d Tishri) Festivals  4. Shemini `Atsereth, 23d Tishri  5. New Year, Feast of Trumpets, 1st Tishri  6. Atonement, 10th Tishri  B) Periodic  1. Weekly Sabbath  2. New Moon  3. Sabbath Year  4. Jubilee Year  II. POST-EXILIC  1. Feast of Dedication, 25th Kiclew  2. Fast of Esther, 13th 'Adhar  3. Feast of Purim, 14th 'Adhar  4. Fast of the Fourth Month, 17th Tammuz  5. Fast of the Fifth Month, 9th 'Abh  6. Fast of the Seventh Month, 3rd Tishri  7. Fast of the Tenth Month, 10th Tebheth  8. Feast of Acra, 23d Iyar  9. Feast of Nicanor, 18th 'Adhar  10. Feast of Woodcarrying, Midsummer Day, 15th 'Abh  11. New Year for Trees, 15th ShebhaT  12. Bi-weekly Fasts, Mondays and Thursdays after Festivals  13. Second Days of Festivals Instituted  14. New Modes of Observing Old Festivals Instituted  The Nature of the Hebrew Festivals:  The Hebrews had an abundance of holidays, some based, according to their tradition, on agriculture and the natural changes of times and seasons, some on historical events connected with the national or religious life of Israel, and still others simply on immemorial custom. in most instances two or more of these bases coexist, and the emphasis on the natural, the agricultural, the national, or the religious phase will vary with different writers, different context, or different times. Any classification of these feasts and fasts on the basis of original significance must therefore be imperfect.  We should rather classify them as preexilic and post-exilic, because the period of the Babylonian captivity marks a complete change, not only in the kinds of festivals instituted from time to time, but also in the manner of celebrating the old.  I. Pre-exilic.  The pre-exilic list includes the three pilgrimage festivals, the Passover week, Pentecost, and the Feast of Tabernacles, together with the Eighth Day of Assembly at the conclusion of the last of these feasts, and New Year and Atonement Days, the weekly Sabbath and the New Moon.  1. Observances Common to All:  The preexilic festivals were "holy convocations" ( Leviticus 23   Numbers 28 ). Special sacrifices were offered on them in addition to the daily offerings. These sacrifices, however, varied according to the character of the festival ( Numbers 28 ;  Numbers 29 ). On all of them trumpets (chatsotseroth) were blown while the burnt offerings and the peace-offerings were being sacrificed ( Numbers 10:10 ). They were all likened to the weekly Sabbath as days of rest, on which there must be complete suspension of all ordinary work ( Leviticus 16:29 ;  Leviticus 23:7, 8, 21, 24, 25, 28, 35, 36 ).  2. Significance of the Festivals:  The three pilgrimage festivals were known by that name because on them the Israelites gathered at Jerusalem to give thanks for their doubly joyful character. They were of agricultural significance as well as commemorative of national events. Thus, the Passover is connected with the barley harvest; at the same time it is the zeman cheruth, recalling the Exodus from Egypt ( Exodus 12:6   Leviticus 23:5, 8   Numbers 28:16-25   Deuteronomy 16:1-8 ).  Pentecost has an agricultural phase as chagh habikkurim, the celebration of the wheat harvest; it has a religious phase as zeman mattan Thorah in the Jewish liturgy, based on the rabbinical calculation which makes it the day of the giving of the Law, and this religious side has so completely overshadowed the agricultural that among modern Jews the Pentecost has become "confirmation day" ( Exodus 34:26   Leviticus 23:10-14   Numbers 28:26-31 ).  The Feast of Tabernacles is at once the general harvest festival, chagh he-'aciph, and the anniversary of the beginnings of the wanderings in the wilderness ( Exodus 23:16   Leviticus 23:33   Deuteronomy 16:13-15 ). The Eighth Day of Assembly immediately following the last day of Tabernacles ( Leviticus 23:36   Numbers 29:35   John 7:37 ) and closing the long cycle of Tishri festivals seems to have been merely a final day of rejoicing before the pilgrims returned to their homes.  New Year ( Leviticus 23:23-25   Numbers 29:1-6 ) and the Day of Atonement ( Leviticus 16:1 ;  Leviticus 23:26-32   Numbers 29:7-11 ) marked the turning of the year; primarily, perhaps, in the natural phenomena of Palestine, but also in the inner life of the nation and the individual. Hence, the religious significance of these days as days of judgment, penitence and forgiveness soon overshadowed any other significance they may have had. The temple ritual for these days, which is minutely described in the Old Testament and in the Talmud, was the most elaborate and impressive of the year. At the same time Atonement Day was socially an important day of rejoicing.  In addition to these annual festivals the pre-exilic Hebrews celebrated the Sabbath ( Numbers 28:9, 10   Leviticus 23:1-3 ) and the New Moon ( Numbers 10:10 ;  Numbers 28:11-15 ). By analogy to the weekly Sabbath, every seventh year was a Sabbath Year ( Exodus 23:11   Leviticus 25:1-7   Deuteronomy 15:1 ), and every cycle of seven Sabbath years was closed with a Jubilee Year ( Leviticus 25:8-18 ) somewhat after the analogy of the seven weeks counted before Pentecost.  For further details of all of these preexilic festivals see the separate articles.  II. Post-exilic.  In post-exilic times important historical events were made the basis for the institution of new fasts and feasts. When the first temple was destroyed and the people were carried into captivity, "the sacrifice of the body and one's own fat and blood" were substituted for that of animals (see Talmud, Berakhoth 17a). With such a view of their importance, fasts of all sorts were as a matter of course rapidly multiplied. (Note that the Day of Atonement was the only pre-exilic fast.) Of these post-exilic fasts and feasts, the Feast of Dedication (1 Maccabees 4:52-59;  John 10:22 ; Mishna, Ta`anith 2 10; Mo`edh QaTon 3 9; Josephus, Ant, XII, vii; Apion, II, xxxix) and the Feast of Purim ( Esther 3:7 ;  Esther 9:24 ; 2 Maccabees 15:36); and the fasts of the fourth ( Zechariah 8:19 ; Jeremiah 39; 52; Mishna, Ta`anith 4 6), the fifth ( Zechariah 7:3, 1 ;  Zechariah 8:19 ; Ta`anith 4 6), the seventh ( Zechariah 7:5 ;  Zechariah 8:19   Jeremiah 41:1   2 Kings 25:25 ; Cedher `Olam Rabba' 26; Meghillath Ta`anith c. 12), the tenth months ( Zechariah 8:19   2 Kings 25 ), and the Fast of Esther ( Esther 4:16 ;  Esther 9:31 ) have been preserved by Jewish tradition to this day. (The Feast of Dedication, the Feast of Purim and the Fast of Esther are described in separate articles.)  Significance:  The fasts of the fourth, fifth, seventh and tenth months are based on historical incidents connected with one or more national calamities. In several instances the rabbis have by close figuring been able to connect with the dates of the fasts as well as the feasts other important national events than those for which the days were primarily instituted. Not less than four incidents are connected with the fasts of the fourth month (17th of Tammuz):  (a) on this day the Israelites made the golden calf;  (b) Moses broke the tables of law;  (c) the daily sacrifices ceased for want of cattle when the city was closely besieged prior to the destruction of Jerusalem; and  (d) on this day Jerusalem was stormed by Nebuchadnezzar.  The fast of the fifth month (9th day of 'Abh) receives its significance from the fact that the First Temple was destroyed upon this day by Nebuchadnezzar, and the Second Temple on the same day of the year by Titus. In addition it is said that on this day Yahweh decreed that those who left Egypt should not enter the land of promise; the day is also the anniversary of the capture of the city of Bether by the Emperor Hadrian. The fast of the seventh month (the 3rd day of Tishri) commemorates the murder of Gedaliah at Mizpah. That of the tenth month (10th day of Tebheth) commemorates the beginning of the siege of Jerusalem by Nebuchadnezzar.  Other fasts and feasts no doubt were instituted on similar occasions and received a local or temporary observance, for example, the Feast of Acra (1 Maccabees 13:50-52; compare 1:33), to celebrate the recapture of Acra ("the citadel") on the 23rd of 'Iyar 141 B.C., and the Feast of Nicanor, in celebration of the victory over Nicanor on the 13th day of 'Adhar 160 B.C. (1 Maccabees 7:49).  Several other festivals are mentioned in the Talmud and other post-Biblical writings which may have been of even greater antiquity. The Feast of Woodcarrying (Midsummer Day:  Nehemiah 10:34 ; Josephus, BJ, II, vii, 6; Meghillath Ta`anith c.v, p. 32, Mishna, Ta`anith 4 8a), for example, is referred to as the greatest day of rejoicing of the Hebrews, ranking with Atonement Day. It was principally a picnic day to which a religious touch was given by making it the woodgatherers' festival for the Temple. A New Year for trees is mentioned in the Talmud (Ro'sh ha-Shdnah 1 1). The pious, according both to the Jewish tradition and the New Testament, observed many private or semi-public fasts, such as the Mondays, Thursdays and following Monday after Nisan and Tishri (the festival months:  Luke 18:12   Matthew 9:14 ;  Matthew 6:16   Mark 2:18   Luke 5:33   Acts 10:30 ; Meghillah 31a; Ta`anith 12a; Bdbha' Qama' 8 2). The day before Passover was a fast day for the firstborn (Copherim 21 3).  In post-Biblical times the Jews outside of Palestine doubled each of the following days: the opening and closing day of Passover and Tabernacles and Pentecost, because of the capheq, or doubt as to the proper day to be observed, growing out of the delays in the transmission of the official decree of the Sanhedhrin in each season. Differences in hours of sunrise and sunset between Palestine and other countries may have had something to do at least with the perpetuation of the custom. New Year's Day seems to have been doubled from time immemorial, the forty-eight hours counting as one "long day."  Many new modes of observance appear in post-exilic times in connection with the old established festivals, especially in the high festival season of Tishri. Thus the cimchath beth ha-sho'ebhah, "water drawing festival," was celebrated during the week of Tabernacles with popular games and dances in which even the elders took part, and the streets were so brilliantly illuminated with torches that scarcely an eye was closed in Jerusalem during that week (Talmud, Chullin).  The last day of Tabernacles was known in Talmudic times as yom chibbuT `arabhoth, from the custom of beating willow branches, a custom clearly antedating the various symbolical explanations offered for it. Its festivities were connected with the dismantling of the booth. In later times the day was known as hosha`na' rabba', from the liturgical passages beginning with the word hosha`na', recited throughout the feast and "gathered" on that day. The day after Tabernacles has been made cimchath Torah, the Feast of the Law, from the custom of ending on that day the cycle of fifty-two weekly portions read in the synagogues.  In general it may be said that although the actual observance has changed from time to time to meet new conditions, the synagogal calendar of today is made up of the same festivals as those observed in New Testament times.  Ella Davis Isaacs  INGATHERING, FEASTS OF  in'-gath-er-ing.  See  FEASTS AND FASTS ;  BOOTH .  FASTS AND FEASTS  See  FEASTS AND FASTS .
BIRSHA|Son of wickedness, a king of Gomorrah whom Abraham succoured in the invasion of Chedorlaomer ( Genesis 14:2 ). 
TIMON|Honouring, one of the seven deacons at Jerusalem ( Acts 6:5 ). Nothing further is known of him. 
HAMRAN|     ham'-ran.  See  HEMDAN .
EMMOR|An ass,  Acts 7:16 . (see  HAMOR .) 
TAHASH|     ta'-hash (tachash; Tochos; the King James Version Thahash): A son of Nahor by his concubine Reumah ( Genesis 22:24 ). The word tachash means a kind of leather or skin, and perhaps the animal yielding it, probably the "dugong" (compare Brown, Briggs, and Driver). Tachash has been identified by Winckler with Tichis (Egypt), located on the Orontes, North of Kadesh.
RAKEM|     ra'-kem (raqem, the pausal form of reqem): The eponym of a clan of Machir ( 1 Chronicles 7:16 ).  See  REKEM .
FAIRS|(Hebrews `izabhonim), found seven times in  Ezek. 27 , and nowhere else. The Authorized Version renders the word thus in all these instances, except in verse 33, where "wares" is used. The Revised Version uniformly renders by "wares," which is the correct rendering of the Hebrew word. It never means "fairs" in the modern sense of the word. 
BOAZ|Alacrity.  (1.) The husband of Ruth, a wealthy Bethlehemite. By the "levirate law" the duty devolved on him of marrying Ruth the Moabitess ( Ruth 4:1 -13). He was a kinsman of Mahlon, her first husband. (2.) The name given (for what reason is unknown) to one of the two (the other was called Jachin) brazen pillars which Solomon erected in the court of the temple ( 1 Kings 7:21 ;  2 Chronicles 3:17 ). These pillars were broken up and carried to Babylon by Nebuchadnezzar.  Jachin and Boaz The names of two brazen columns set up in Solomon's temple ( 1 Kings 7:15 -22). Each was eighteen cubits high and twelve in circumference ( Jeremiah 52:21 ,  23;  1 Kings 7:17 -21). They had doubtless a symbolical import. 
BABYLONIA|     bab-i-lo'-ni-a  1. Mounds  2. Explorations  3. Names  4. Semites  5. Sumerians  6. Home of the Semites  7. Immigration  8. Language  9. Script  10. Architecture  11. Art  12. Literature  13. Libraries  14. Personal Names  15. History of Kingdoms  16. Kish  17. Lagash  18. Adab  19. Nippur  20. Erech  21. Larsa  22. Shuruppak  23. Kisurra  24. Umma  25. Accad  26. Opis  27. Basime  28. Drehem  29. Urumma  30. First Dynasty of Babylon  31. Sealand Dynasty  32. Cassite Dynasty  33. Cassite Rule  34. Isin Dynasty  35. Nebuchadrezzar I  36. Sealand Dynasty  37. Bit-Bazi Dynasty  38. Other Rulers  39. Babylonian Dynasty  40. Neo-Babylonian Rulers  41. Persian Rulers of Babylon  LITERATURE  Babylonia is a plain which is made up of the alluvial deposits of the mountainous regions in the North, where the Tigris and Euphrates have their source. The land is bounded on the North by Assyria and Mesopotamia; on the East by Elam, separated by the mountains of Elam; on the South by the sea marshes, and the country Kaldu (Chaldaea); and on the West by the Syrian desert. Some of the cities of the lower country were seaport towns in the early period, but now are far inland. This land-making process continues even at the present time at the rate of about 70 ft. a year.  This plain, in the days when Babylonia flourished, sustained a dense population. It was covered with a network of canals, skillfully planned and regulated, which brought prosperity to the land, because of the wonderful fertility of the soil. The neglect of these canals and doubtless, also, the change of climate, have resulted in altered conditions in the country. It has become a cheerless waste. During some months of the year, when the inundations take place, large portions of the land are partially covered with swamps and marshes. At other times it looks like a desolate plain.  1. Mounds:  Throughout the land there are seen, at the present time, ruin-hills or mounds of accumulation of debris, which mark the site of ancient cities. Some of these cities were destroyed in a very early era, and were never rebuilt. Others were occupied for millenniums, and their history extends far into the Christian era. The antiquities generally found in the upper stratum of the mounds which were occupied up to so late a period, show that they were generally inhabited by the Jews, who lived there after the Babylonians had disappeared.  2. Explorations:  The excavations conducted at various sites have resulted in the discovery, besides antiquities of almost every character, of hundreds of thousands of inscriptions on clay and stone, but principally on the former material. At Tello more than 60,000 tablets were found, belonging largely to the administrative archives of the temple of the third millennium B.C. At Nippur about 50,000 inscriptions were found, many of these also belonging to temple archives. But about 20,000 tablets and fragments found in that city came from the library of the school of the priests, which had been written in the third millennium B.C. At Sippar, fully 30,000 tablets were found, many being of the same general character, also representing a library. At Delehem and Djokha, temple archives of the same period as those found at Tello have come to light in great numbers, through the illicit diggings of Arabs. Babylon, Borsippa, Kish, Erech and many other cities have yielded to the explorer and the Arab diggers inscribed documents of every period of Babylonian history, and embracing almost every kind of literature, so that the museums and libraries of America and Europe have stored up unread inscriptions numbering hundreds of thousands. Many also are in the possession of private individuals. After the work of excavating Babylonia has been completed and the inscriptions deciphered, many of the pro-Christian centuries in Babylonian history will be better known than some of those of our Christian era. The ancient history of the Babylonians will be reconstructed by the help of these original sources. Lengthy family genealogies will be known, as indeed in some instances is now the case, as well as the Babylonian contemporaries of Ezekiel, Abraham and all the other Biblical characters.  3. Names:  The Greek name of Babylonia which is in use at the present time is derived from the name of the city of Babylon, the capital and chief city of the land from the time of the First Dynasty of Babylon, about 2000 B.C. (see BABYLON). The name of the land in the very earliest period which is represented by antiquities, and even inscribed objects, is not known. But in a comparatively early age the northern part is called Uri, and the southern part, Engi or En-gira. The second part of the latter name is perhaps the same as in Su-gir, which is thought to be the origin of the Old Testament Shinar. Su-gir and Su-mer are names of the same country. And inasmuch as Mer and Gir were names of the same west Semitic deity, who played an important role in the early history of Babylonia, it is not improbable that the element Su is also to be identified with the ancient name of Mesopotamia. Su is also in Su-bartu, the name of the country to the North. This name is also written Su-Gir.  Subsequent to 2000 B.C. the ideograms read in Sumerian, Uri and Engi, were pronounced in SemBab, Accad and Sumer. The former received its name from the capital of the kingdom Accad, one of the cities mentioned in  Genesis 10:10 . The title, "king of Accad and Sumer" was used by rulers as late as the 1st millennium B.C. The name by which the land is known in the second millennium B.C. is Kar-Duniash, the exact derivation of which is in doubt. Kar means "garden, land" in Semitic and Sumerian; and Duniash being preceded by the determinative for deity, has been regarded as a name of a Cassite god. A more recently advanced explanation is that Duniash is equivalent to Bel-malati, which means "lord of lands." The meaning of the name, as stated, must be regarded as undetermined.  In the time of the late Assyrian empire a nation in the extreme southern part of the land, called by the Greeks Chaldea, which is derived from the name Kaldu, came into existence. In the Assyrian historical inscriptions the land is usually called Bit-Yakin. This people seems to have issued from Aramaic Under Biblical. Merodach-baladan they ruled Babylonia for a time. The Neo-Bab Dynasty, founded by Nabopolassar, is supposed to be Chaldean in origin, in consequence of which the whole land in the Greek period was called Chaldea.  4. Semites:  Two distinct races are found occupying the land when we obtain the first glimpses of its history. The northern part is occupied by the Semites, who are closely allied to the Amorites, Arameans and Arabs; and the southern part by a non-Sem people called Sumerians. Their cultures had been originally distinct, but when they first become known to us there has taken place such an amalgamation that it is only by the knowledge of other Semitic cultures that it is possible to make even a partial differentiation of what was Sem-Bab and what was Sumerian. The Semites, it would almost seem, entered the land after the Sumerians had established themselves, but this can only be re garded as a conjecture.  5. Sumerians:  Although the earliest Sumerian settlement belongs to a remote period, few traces of the pre-historic Sumerian have been found. The archaeological remains indicate that this non-Sem race is not indigenous to the land, and that when they came into the country they had already attained to a fair degree of culture. But there is no evidence, as yet, in what part of the ancient world the elements of their culture were evolved, although various attempts have been made by scholars to locate their original home.  6. Home of the Semites:  The home of the Semites has been placed in different parts of the ancient world. A number of scholars look to Arabia and others to Africa for their original habitation, although their theories generally are not based upon much archaeological evidence. Unquestionably, the previous, if not the original home of the Semitic Babylonians, is to be found in the land of the Amorites, that is in Syria. In the earliest known period of Babylonian history, which apparently belongs to the age not very far removed from the time when the Semites entered Babylonia, Amurru was an important factor in the affairs of the nations, and it was a land which the world conquerors of Babylonia, both Sumerian and Semitic, endeavored to subjugate. This points to the fact that the culture of Amurru was then already old. Egyptian inscriptions fully substantiate this. We look to the land of the Arnorites as the home of the Semitic Babylonians, because of the important part played by the chief god of that land Amurru or Uru, in the Babylonian religion and nomenclature. In fact nearly all of the original names of the Semitic Babylonian sun-deities are derived from the names and epithets of the great Sun-god of the Amorites and Arameans (see Amurru, 108). These and many other considerations point to Amurru, or the land of the Amorites, as the previous home of the Semites who migrated into Babylonia and who eventually became masters of the land.  7. Immigration:  The original settlements in Babylonia, as stated above, belong to a prehistoric time, but throughout the history of the land fresh Semitic migrations have been recognized. In the Isin and First Dynasty of Babylonia, Amorites or Canaanites seem to flood the country. In the second millennium a foreign people known as Cassites ruled Babylonia for nearly six centuries. The nomenclature of the period shows that many Hittites and Mittanaeans as well as Cassites lived in Babylonia. In the first millennium the thousands of names that appear in the contract literature indicate a veritable Babel of races: Egyptians, Elamites, Persians, Medes, Tabalites, Hittites, Cassites, Ammorites, Edomites, notably Hebrews, are among the peoples that occupied the land. The deportation of the Israelites by the Assyrian kings and of the Jews by the Babylonian kings, find confirmation besides the historical inscriptions in the names of Hebrews living in Babylonia in the corresponding periods.  8. Language:  The languages of Babylonia are Semitic and Sumerian. The latter is an agglutinative tongue like the Turkish, and belongs to that great unclassifiable group of languages, called for the sake of convenience, Turanian. It has not been shown, as yet, to be allied to any other known language. The Semitic language known as the Babylonian, with which the Assyrian is practically identical, is of the common Semitic stock. After the Semites entered the land, their language was greatly influenced by the Sumerian tongue. The Semites being originally dependent upon the Sumerian scribes, with whom the script had originated, considered in connection with the fact that the highly developed culture of the Sumerians greatly influenced that of the Semites, brought about the peculiar amalgamation known as Babylonian. The language is, however, distinctively Semitic, but it has a very large percentage of Sumerian loan-words. Not knowing the cognate tongues of the Sumerian, and having a poor understanding of the pronunciation of that language, it is impossible to ascertain, on the other hand, how much the Sumerian language was influenced by the Semites.  In the late period another Semitic tongue was used extensively in the land. It was not because of the position occupied by the Arameans in the political history of western Asia, that their language became the lingua franca of the first millennium B.C. It must have been on account of the widespread migrations of the people. In the time of Sennacherib it seems to have been used as the diplomatic language in Assyria as well as among the Hebrews, as the episode in  2 Kings 18:26  would show. Then we recall the story of Belshazzar, and the edicts of the late period referred to in the Old Testament, which were in Aramaic ( Ezra 4:7 , etc.). In Assyria and Babylonia, many contract tablets have been found with Aramaic reference notes written upon them, showing that this was the language of those who held the documents. The Hebrews after the exile used Aramaic. This would seem to point to Babylonia as the place where they learned the language. The Babylonian language and the cuneiform script continued to be used until the 3rd or 2nd century B.C., and perhaps even later, but it seems that the Aramaic had generally supplanted it, except as the literary and legal language. In short the tongue of the common people or the spoken language in all probability in the late period was Aramaic.  9. Script:  The cuneiform writing upon clay was used both by the Sumerians and the Semites. Whether this script had its origin in the land, or in the earlier home of the Sumerians, remains a question. It is now known that the Elamites had their own system of writing as early as that of the earliest found in Babylonia; and perhaps it will be found that other ancient peoples, who are at the present unknown to us, also used the cuneiform script. A writing similar to the Babylonian was in use at an early time in Cappadocia. The Hittites and other peoples of that region also employed it. The origin of the use of clay as a writing material, therefore, is shrouded in mystery, but as stated above, the system used by the Semites in Babylonian ylonia was developed from the Sumerian.  The script is not alphabetic, but ideographic and phonetic, in that respect similar to the Chinese. There are over 500 characters, each one of which has from one to many values. The combination of two or more characters also has many values. The compilation of the values of the different signs used in various periods by both the Sumerians and Assyrians numbers at the present about 25,000, and the number will probably reach 30,000.  10. Architecture:  The architecture of Babylonia is influenced by the fact that the building material, in this alluvial plain, had to be of brick, which was largely sun-dried, although in certain prosperous eras there is much evidence of kiln-dried bricks having been used. The baked brick used in the earliest period was the smallest ever employed, being about the size of the ordinary brick used at the present time. The size of the bricks in the era prior to the third millennium varied from this to about 6 x 10 x 3 inches at Nippur, Sargon and his son Naram-Sin used a brick, the largest found, about 20 inches square, and about 4 inches in thickness. Following the operations of these kings at Nippur is the work of Ur-Engur, who used a brick about 14 inches square and nearly 4 inches in thickness. This size had been used at Tello prior to Sargon's time, and was thereafter generally employed. It re mained the standard size of brick throughout the succeeding centuries of Babylonian history. Adobes, of which the greater portion of the buildings were constructed, were usually double the thickness of kiln-dried bricks. The pillar made of bricks, as well as the pilaster constructed of the same material, seems to have come into use at a very early age, as is shown by the excavations at Tello.  A large number of Babylonian builders had the brick makers employ brick stamps which gave their names and frequently their titles, besides the name of the temple for which the bricks were intended. These enable the excavator to determine who the builders or restorers were of the buildings uncovered. Naturally, in a building like the temple of Enlil at Nippur, inscribed bricks of many builders covering a period of over 2,000 years were found. These by the help of building inscriptions, which have been found, enable scholars to rewrite considerable of the history of certain Babylonian temples. The walls of the city were also built of clay bricks, principally adobes. The walls usually were of very great thickness.  Clay was also employed extensively in the manufacture of images, weights, drains, playthings, such as animals, baby rattles, etc., and of inscriptions of every kind. Pottery, with the exception of the blue glaze employed in the late period, was usually plain, although some traces of painted pottery have been found. Although every particle of stone found in Babylonia was carried into the country, either by man or by inundations, still in certain periods it was used freely for statues, steles, votive objects, and in all periods for door sockets, weights and seal cylinders. Building operations in stone are scarcely known in Babylonia until perhaps the time of the greatest of all ancient builders, Nebuchadrezzar II, who laid a pavement in the causeway of Babylon, Aa-ibur-sabu, with blocks of stone from a mountain quarry.  See BABYLON .  11. Art:  The sculpture of the Sumerians, although in most instances the hardest of materials was used, is one of the great achievements of their civilization. Enough examples have been found to trace the development of their art from comparatively rude reliefs of the archaic period to the finished sculpture of Gudea's time, third millennium B.C., when it reached a high degree of excellence. The work of the sculpture of this age shows spirit and originality in many respects unique. In the earliest period the Babylonians attempted the round, giving frequently the main figures in full face. The perfection of detail, in their efforts to render true to life, makes their modeling very superior in the history of article The Sumerian seems to have been able to overcome difficulties of technique which later sculptors systematically avoided.  Practically every Babylonian had his own personal seal. He used it as the signature is used at the present time or rather as the little stamp upon which is engraved the name of the individual at the present time, in the Orient, to make an impression upon the letter which was written for him by a public scribe. Thousands of these ancient seals have been found. They were cut out of all kinds of stone and metal. The style in the early period was usually cylindrical, with a hole passing lengthwise through them. In the late period the signet was commonly used. Many of these gems were exquisitely cut by lapidists of rare ability. Some of the very best work of this art belongs to the third millennium B.C. The boldness in outline, and the action displayed are often remarkable. The most delicate saws, drills and other tools must have been employed by the early lapidist. Some of his early work is scarcely surpassed in the present age.  The gold and silver smiths of the early age have left us some beautiful examples of their art and skill. A notable one is the silver vase of Entemena of Lagash, mounted on a bronze pedestal, which stands on four feet. There is a votive inscription engraved about its neck. The bowl is divided into two compartments. On the upper are engraved seven heifers, and on the lower four eagles with extended wings, in some respects related to the totem or the coat of arms of Lagash. While attention to detail is too pronounced, yet the whole is well rendered and indicates remarkable skill, no less striking than the well-known work of their Egyptian contemporaries. Bronze was also used extensively for works of art and utensils. Some remarkable specimens of this craft have been found at Tello.  In studying the magnificent remains of their art, one is thoroughly impressed with the skill displayed, and with the fact that there must have been a long period of development prior to the age to which these works belong, before such creations could have been possible. Although much of the craftsman's work is crude, there is considerable in the sculpture and engraving that is well worthy of study. And in studying these remains one is also impressed with the fact that they were produced in an alluvial plain.  12. Literature:  The literature in a narrow sense is almost entirely confined to the epics, which are of a religious character, and the psalms, hymns, incantations, omens, etc. These are the chief remains of their culture.  See BABYLONIA AND ASSYRIA, RELIGION OF .  In a general sense almost every kind of literature is found among the hundreds of thousands of clay tablets unearthed in Babylonia. The inscribed votive objects are of all kinds and descriptions. The stone vase taken in booty was dedicated to the deity of the conqueror. The beautiful piece of lapis lazuli, agate, cornelian, etc., obtained, was inscribed and devoted in the same way. Slabs, tablets and cones of all shapes and sizes, were inscribed with the king's name and titles, giving the different cities over which he ruled and referring especially to the work that he had accomplished for his deity. From the decipherment of these votive objects much valuable data are gathered for the reconstruction of the ancient history of the land.  The same is true of what are known as building inscriptions, in which accounts of the operations of the kings in restoring and enlarging temples, shrines, walls and other city works are given. Canal digging and dredging, and such works by which the people benefited, are frequently mentioned in these inscriptions.  Epistolary literature, for example, the royal letters of Hammurabi, the diplomatic correspondence found in Egypt (see TELL EL-AMARNA) or the royal letters from the Library of Ashurbanipal (see ASHURBANIPAL), as well as the private correspondence of the people, furnishes valuable historical and philological data.  The thousands of tablets found in the school libraries of Sippar and Nippur, as well as of the library of Ashurbanipal, among which are all kinds of inscriptions used in the schools of the priests and scribes, have furnished a great deal of material for the Assyrian dictionary, and have thrown much light upon the grammar of the language. The legal literature is of the greatest importance for an understanding of the social conditions of the people. It is also valuable for comparative purposes in studying the codes of other peoples.  See CODE OF HAMMURABI .  The commercial or legal transactions, dated in all periods, from the earliest times until the latest, also throw important light upon the social conditions of the people. Many thousands of these documents have been found, by the help of which the very life that pulsated in the streets of Babylonian cities is restored.  The administrative documents from the temple archives also have their value, in that they furnish important data as regards the maintenance of the temples and other institutions; and incidentally much light on the nationality and religion of the people, whose names appear in great numbers upon them. The records are receipts of taxes or rents from districts close by the temples, and of commercial transactions conducted with this revenue. A large portion of these archives consists of the salary payments of storehouse officials and priests. There seems to have been a host of tradesmen and functionaries in connection with the temple. Besides the priest, elder, seer, seeress, sorcerer, sorceress, singer, etc., there were the farmer, weaver, miller, carpenter, smith, butcher, baker, porter, overseer, scribe, measurer, watchman, etc. These documents give us an insight into Babylonian system of bookkeeping, and show how carefully the administrative affairs of the temple were conducted. In fact the temple was provided for and maintained along lines quite similar to many of our modern institutions.  13. Libraries:  The discovery of the Library of Ashurbanipal at Nineveh speaks volumes for the culture of Assyria, but that culture was largely borrowed from the Babylonians. Much that this library contained had been secured from Babylonian libraries by the scribes employed by Ashurbanipal. In every important center there doubtless existed schools and libraries in connection with the temples. At Nippur, in 1890, Dr. J. P. Peters found such a library, but unfortunately, although he termed it such, his Assyriologists did not recognize that one of the greatest discoveries of antiquity had been made. It remained for Dr. J. H. Haynes, a decade later, to discover another portion of this library, which he regarded as such, because of the large number of tablets which he uncovered. Pere Scheil, prior to Dr. Haynes' discovery, had the good fortune while at Sippar to discover a part of the school and library of that important center. Since Professor Scheil's excavations, Arabs have unearthed many inscriptions of this library, which have found their way to museums and into the hands of private individuals.  The plan of the Nippur Library, unearthed by Dr. Haynes, has been published by Mr. C. Fisher, the architect of the Nippur expedition (see Clay, Light on the Old Testament from Babel, 183). Professor Scheil, in publishing his results, has also given a plan of the school he discovered, and a full description of its arrangements, as well as the pedagogical methods that had been employed in that institution of learning. This has also been attempted by others, but in a less scientific manner. One of the striking features of these libraries is the use of the large reference cylinders, quadrangular, pentagonal and hexagonal in shape. There was a hole cut lengthwise through them for the purpose of mounting them like revolving stands. These libraries, doubtless, contained all the works the Babylonians possessed on law, science, literature and religion. There are lexical lists, paradigm tablets, lists of names, of places, countries, temples, rivers, officers, stones, gods, etc. Sufficient tablets have been deciphered to determine their general character. Also hundreds of exercise tablets have been found, showing the progress made by pupils in writing, in mathematics, in grammar, and in other branches of learning. Some tablets appear to have been written after dictation. Doubtless, the excavators found the waste heaps of the school, where these tablets had been thrown for the purpose of working them over again as raw material, for new exercises. The school libraries must have been large. Considering for instance that the ideographic and phonetic values of the cuneiform signs in use numbered perhaps 30,000, even the syllabaries which were required to contain these different values must have been many in number, and especially as tablets, unlike books made of paper, have only two sides to them. And when we take into consideration all the different kinds of literature which have been found, we must realize that these libraries were immense, and numbered many thousands of tablets.  14. Personal Names:  In modern times the meaning of names given children is rarely considered; in fact, in many instances the name has suffered so much through changes that it is difficult to ascertain its original meaning. Then also, at present, in order to avoid confusion the child is given two or more names. It was not so with the ancient Babylonian. Originally the giving of a name was connected with some special circumstance, and though this was not always the case throughout the history of Babylonia, the correct form of the name was always preserved.  The name may have been an expression of their religious faith. It may have told of the joy experienced at the birth of an heir. It may even betray the suffering that was involved at the birth of the child, or the life that the parents had lived. In short, the names afford us an intimate glimpse into the everyday life of the people.  The average Babylonian name is theophorous, and indicates one of the deities worshipped by the family, and often the city. For example, it is suggestive that persons with names compounded with Enlil and Ninib hailed from Nippur. Knowing the deities of the surrounding people we have also important evidence in determining the origin of peoples in Babylonia having foreign names. For example, if a name is composed of the Hittite deity Teshup, or the Amorite deity Amurru, or the Aramean god Dagan, or the Egyptian god Esi (Isis), foreign influence is naturally looked for from the countries represented. Quite frequently the names of foreign deities are compounded with Babylonian elements, often resulting from mixed marriages.  Theophorous names are composed of two, three, four and even five elements. Those having two or three elements predominate. Two-element names have a diety plus a verbal form or a subst.; or vice versa: for example, Nabu-na'id (Nabonidus), "Nebo is exalted," or Shulman-asharedu (Shaimaneser), "Shalman is foremost." Many different combinations are found in three-element names which are composed of the name of the deity, a subst., a verbal form, a pronominal suffix, or some other form of speech, in any of the three positions. Explanations of a few of the familiar Biblical. names follow: Sin-akhe-erba (Sennacherib), "Sin has increased the brothers"; Marduk-apal-iddin (Mero-dach-baladan), "Marduk has given a son"; Ashurakh-iddin (Esarhaddon), "Ashur has given a brother"; Ashur-bani-apal, "Ashur is creating a son"; Nabu-kudurri-usur (Nebuchadrezzar), "O Nebo, protect the boundary"; Amel-Marduk (Evil Merodach), "Man of Marrink"; Bel-shar-usur (Belshazzar), "O Bel, protect the king." Some Babylonian names mentioned in the Bible are really of foreign origin, for example, Amraphel and Sargon. Amraphel originally is west Semitic and is written Hammurabi (pronounced Chammu-rabi, the first letter being the Semitic cheth). Sargon was perhaps originally Aramean, and is composed of the elements shar and the god Gan. When written in cuneiform it was written Shargani, and later Sharrukin, being translated "the true king." Many names in use were not theophorous; for example, such personal names as Ululd, "the month Ulul"; names of animals, as Kalba, "dog," gentilic names, as Akkadai, "the Akkadian," names of crafts, as Pacharu, "potter," etc.  The literature abounds in hypochoristica. One element of a name was used for the sake of shortness, to which usually a hypochoristica suffix was added, like Marduka (Mordecai). That is, the ending a or ai was added to one of the elements of a longer name.  15. History of Kingdoms:  The written history of Babylonia at the present begins from about 4200 B.C. But instead of finding things crude and aboriginal in this, the earliest period, the remains discovered show that the people had attained to a high level of culture. Back of that which is known there must lie a long period of development. This is attested in many ways; for instance, the earliest writing found is so far removed from the original hieroglyphs that it is only possible to ascertain what the original pictures were by knowing the values which the signs possessed. The same conclusion is ascertained by a study of the art and literature. Naturally, as mentioned above, it is not impossible that this development took place in a previous home of the inhabitants.  The history of early Babylonia is at present a conflict of the kings and patesis (priest-kings) of the different city-kingdoms, for supremacy over each other, as well as over the surrounding peoples. The principal states that figure in the early history are: Kish, Lagash, Nippur, Akkad, Umma, Erech, Ur and Opis. At the present time more is known of Lagash, because the excavations conducted at that site were more extensive than at others. This makes much of our knowledge of the history of the land center about that city. And yet it should be stated that the hegemony of Lagash lasted for a long period, and the kingdom will ultimately occupy a prominent position when the final history of the land is written.  Read Complete Article...    BABYLONIA AND ASSYRIA, RELIGION OF  I. DEFINITION  1. First Period  2. Second Period  3. Third Period  II. THE SOURCES  III. THE HISTORY  IV. THE PANTHEON  1. Enlil, Ellil  2. Anu  3. Ea  4. Sin  5. Shamash  6. Ishtar  7. Marduk (Old Testament Merodach)  8. Nabu (Old Testament Nebo)  9. Nergal, the city god of Kutu (Old Testament Guthah)  10. Ninib  11. Ramman  12. Tammuz  13. Asshur  V. HYMNS AND PRAYERS  VI. MAGIC  1. Maqlu  2. Shurpu  VII. THE LAST THINGS  VIII. MYTHS AND EPICS  IX. THE ASTRAL THEORY OF THE UNIVERSE  X. THE RELATIONS WITH THE RELIGION OF ISRAEL  LITERATURE  I. Definition.  The religion of Babylonia and Assyria is that system of belief in higher things with which the peoples of the Tigris and Euphrates valley strove to put themselves into relations, in order to live their lives. The discoveries of the past century have supplied us with a mass of information concerning this faith from which we have been able to secure a greater knowledge of it than of any other ancient oriental religion, except that of Israel. Yet the information which is thus come into our hands is embarrassing because of its very richness, and it will doubtless be a long time before it is possible to speak with certainty concerning many of the problems which now confront us. Progress in the interpretation of the literature is however so rapid that we may now give a much more intelligible account of this religion than could have been secured even so recently as five years ago.  For purposes of convenience, the religion of Babylonia and Assyria may be grouped into three great periods.  1. First Period:  The first of these periods extends from the earliest times, about 3500 B.C., down to the union of the Babylonian states under Hammurabi, about 2000 B.C.  2. Second Period:  The second period extends to the rise of the Chaldean empire under Nabopolassar, 625 B.C., and  3. Third Period:  The third period embraces the brief history of this Chaldean or neo-Babylonian empire under Cyrus, 538 B.C.  The Assyrian religion belongs to the second period, though it extends even into the third period, for Nineveh did not fall until 607 B.C.  II. The Sources.  The primary sources of our knowledge of this religion are to be found in the distinctively religious texts, such as hymns, prayers, priestly rituals and liturgies, and in the vast mass of magical and incantation literature. The major part of this religious literature which has come down to us dates from the reign of Ashurbanipal (668-625 B.C.) though much of it is quite clearly either copied from or based upon much older material. If, however, we relied for our picture of the Babylonian and Assyrian religion exclusively upon these religious texts, we should secure a distorted and in some places an indefinite view. We must add to these in order to perfect the picture practically the whole of the literature of these two peoples.  The inscriptions upon which the kings handed down to posterity an account of their great deeds contain lists of gods whom they invoked, and these must be taken into consideration. The laws also have in large measure a religious basis, and the business inscriptions frequently invoke deities at the end. The records of the astronomers, the state dispatches of kings, the reports of general officers from the field, the handbooks of medicine, all these and many other divisions of a vast literature contribute each its share of religious material. Furthermore, as the religion was not only the faith of the king, but also the faith of the state itself, the progress of the commonwealth to greater power oftentimes carried some local god into a new relationship to other gods, or the decadence of the commonwealth deprived a god of some of his powers or attributes, so that even the distinctively political inscriptions have importance in helping us to reconstruct the ancient literature.  III. The History.  The origin of the Babylonian religion is hid from our eyes in those ancient days of which we know little and can never hope to know much. In the earliest documents which have come down to us written in the Sumerian language, there are found Semitic words or constructions or both. It seems now to be definitely determined that a Sumerian people whose origin is unknown inhabited Babylonia before the coming of the Semites, whose original home was in Arabia. Of the Sumerian faith before a union was formed with the Semites, we know very little indeed. But we may perhaps safely say that among that ancient people, beneath the belief in gods there lay deep in their consciousness the belief in animism. They thought that every object, animate or inanimate, had a zi or spirit. The word seems originally to have meant life. Life manifests itself to us as motion; everything which moves has life. The power of motion separates the animate from the inanimate. All that moves possesses life, the motionless is lifeless or dead.  Besides this belief in animism, the early Sumerians seem to have believed in ghosts that were related to the world of the dead as the zi was related to the world of the living. The lil or ghost was a night demon of baleful influence upon men, and only to be cast out by many incantations. The lil was attended by a serving-maid (ardat lili, "maid of night") which in the later Semitic development was transformed into the feminine lilitu. It is most curious and interesting that this ghost demon of the Sumerians lived on through all the history of the Babylonian religion, and is mentioned even in one of the Old Testament prophets ( Isaiah 34:14 ; Hebrew Lillith, translated "night monster"). The origin of the Semitic religion brought by the ancient Semitic people and united with this Sumerian faith is also lost in the past.  It seems to be quite clear that the gods and the religious ideas which these Semites brought with them from the desert had very little if any importance for the religion which they afterward professed in Babylonia. Some of the names of their gods and images of these they very probably brought with them, but the important thing, it must always be remembered, about the gods is not the names but the attributes which were ascribed to them, and these must have been completely changed during the long history which follows their first contact with the Sumerians. From the Sumerians there flowed a great stream of religious ideas, subject indeed to modifications from time to time down the succeeding centuries. In our study of the pantheon we shall see from time to time how the gods changed their places and how the ideas concerning them were modified by political and other movements. In the very earliest times, besides these ideas of spirits and ghosts, we find also numbers of local gods. Every center of human habitati on had its special patron deity and this deity is always associated with some great natural phenomenon. It was natural that the sun and moon should be made prominent among these gods, but other natural objects and forces were personified and deified, streams, stones and many others.  Our chief source of information concerning the gods of the first period of religious development before the days of Hammurabi is found in the historical inscriptions of the early kings and rulers. Many of these describe offerings of temples and treasures made to the gods, and all of them are religious in tone and filled with ascriptions of praise to the gods. From these early texts Professor Jastrow has extricated the names of the following deities, gods and goddesses. I reproduce his list as the best yet made, but keep in mind that some of the readings are doubtful and some were certainly otherwise read by the Babylonians or Sumerians, though we do not now know how they ought to be read. The progress of Assyrian research is continually providing corrected readings for words hitherto known to us only in ideograms. It is quite to be expected that many of these strange, not to say grotesque, names will some day prove to be quite simple, and easy to utter: En-lil (Ellil, Bel) Belit, Nin-khar-sag, Nin-gir-su, wh o also appears as Dun-gur, Bau, Ga-tum-dug, Nin-dindug, Ea, Nin-a-gal, Gal-dim-zu-ab, Nin-ki, Damgal-nun-na, Nergal, Shamash, A or Malkatu, the wife of Shamash, Nannar, or Sin, Nin-Urum, Innanna, Nana, Anunit, Nina, Ishtar, Anu, Nindar-a, Gal-alim, Nin-shakh, Dun-shagga, Lugalbanda, with a consort Nin-sun, Dumu-zi-zu-ab, Dumu-zi, Lugal-Erim, Nin-e-gal and Ningal, Nin-gish-zi-da, Dun-pa-uddu, Nin-mar, Pa-sag, Nidaba, Ku(?)-anna, Shid, Nin-agid-kha-du, Ninshul-li, En-gubarra, Im-mi-khu(?), Ur-du-zi, Kadi, Nu-ku-sir-da, Ma-ma, Za-ma-ma, Za-za-ru, Impa-ud-du, Ur-e-nun-ta-ud-du-a, Khi-gir-nunna, Khi-shagga, Gur-mu, Zar-mu, Dagan, Damu, Lama, Nesu, Nun-gal, An-makh, Nin-si-na, Nin-asu. In this list great gods and goddesses and all kinds of minor deities are gathered together, and the list looks and sounds hopeless. But these are local deities, and some of them are mere duplications. Nearly every place in early times would have a sun-god or a moon-god or both, and in the political development of the country the moon-god of the conquering city displaced or absorbed the moon-god of the conquered. When we have eliminated these gods, who have practically disappeared, there remains a comparatively small number of gods who outrank all the others.  In the room of some of these gods that disappeared, others, especially in Assyria, found places. There was, however, a strong tendency to diminish the number of the gods. They are in early days mentioned by the score, but as time goes on many of these vanish away and only the few remain. As Jastrow has pointed out, Shalmaneser II (859-825 B.C.) had only eleven gods in his pantheon: Ashur, Anu, Bel, Ea, Sin, Shamash, Ninib, Nergal, Nusku, Belit and Ishtar. Sennacherib (704-681 B.C.) usually mentions only eight; namely, Ashur, Sin, Shamash, Bel (that is, Marduk), Nabu, Nergal, Ishtar of Nineveh and Ishtar of Arbela. But we must not lay much emphasis upon the smallness of this number, for in his building inscriptions at the end he invokes twenty-five deities, and even though some of these are duplicates of other gods, as Jastrow correctly explains, nevertheless the entire list is considerably increased over the eight above mentioned. In the late Babylonian period the worship seems chiefly devoted to Marduk, Nabu, Sin, Shamash and Ishtar. Often there seem little faint indications of a further step forward. Some of the hymns addressed to Shamash seem almost upon the verge of exalting him in such a way as to exclude the other deities, but the step is never taken. The Babylonians, with all their wonderful gifts, were never able to conceive of one god, of one god alone, of one god whose very existence makes logically impossible the existence of any other deity. Monotheism transcends the spiritual grasp of the Babylonian mind.  Amid all this company of gods, amid all these speculations and combinations, we must keep our minds clear, and fasten our eyes upon the one significant fact that stands out above all others. It is that the Babylonians were not able to rise above polytheism; that beyond them, far beyond them, lay that great series of thoughts about God that ascribe to him aloneness, to which we may add the great spiritual ideas which today may roughly be grouped under ethical monotheism. Here and there great thinkers in Babylonia grasped after higher ideas, and were able only to attain to a sort of pantheism of a speculative kind. A personal god, righteous and holy, who loved righteousness. and hated sin, this was not given to them to conceive.  The character of the gods changed indeed as the people who revered them changed. The Babylonians who built vast temples and composed many inscriptions emphasizing the works of peace rather than of war, naturally conceived their deities in a manner different from the Assyrians whose powers were chiefly devoted to conquests in war, but neither the Babylonians nor the Assyrians arose to any such heights as distinguish the Hebrew book of Psalms. As the influence of the Babylonians and Assyrians waned, their go ds declined in power, and none of them survived the onrush of Greek civilization in the period of Alexander.  IV. The Pantheon.  The chief gods of the Babylonian and Assyrian pantheon may now be characterized in turn.  1. Enlil, Ellil:  In the earliest times known to us the greatest of the gods is the god of Nippur whose name in the Sumerian texts is Enlil or Ellil. In the Semitic pantheon of later times he was identified with the god Bel, and it is as Belhe has been chiefly known. During the whole of the first epoch of Babylonian history up to the period of Hammurabi, he is the Lord of the World and the King of the Land. He was originally the hero of the Flood story, but in the form in which it has come down to us Marduk of Babylon has deprived him of these honors. In Nippur was his chief temple, called E-kur or "mountain house." It was built and rebuilt by the kings of Babylonia again and again from the days of Sargon I (3800 B.C.) onward, and no less than twenty kings are known to us who pride themselves on their work of rebuilding this one temple. He is saluted as "the Great Lord, the command of whose mouth cannot be altered and whose grace is steadfast." He would seem, judging from the name of his temple and from some of his attributes, to have been originally a god of the mountains where he must have had his original dwelling-place.  2. Anu:  The name of the god Anu was interpreted as meaning heaven, corresponding to the Sumerian word ana, "heaven," and he came thus to be regarded as the god of heaven as over against Enlil who was the god of earth, and Ea who was the god of the waters. Anu appears first among the great gods in an inscription of Lugalsaggi, and in somewhat later times he made his way to the top of the earliest triad which consists of Ann, Enlil and Ea. His chief seat of worship was Uruk, but in the Assyrian period he was associated with the god Adad in a temple in the city of Asshur. In the myths and epics he fills an important role as the disposer of all events, but he cannot be thought of as quite equal in rank with Enlil in spite of his position in the heavens. Antu or Anatu is mentioned as the wife of Ann, but hers is a colorless figure, and she may probably be regarded as little else than a grammatical invention owing to the desire of the Semites to associate the feminine with the masculine in their languages.  3. Ea:  The reading of the name of the god Ea still remains uncertain. It may perhaps have been Ae, as the Greek Aos would seem to indicate. His chief city of worship was Eridu, which in the earliest period was situated on the Persian Gulf, near the mouths of the Euphrates and the Tigris. His temple was there called E-absu, which means "house of the deeps," interpreted also as "house of wisdom." He must have been a god of great importance in early times, but was left behind by the growing influence of Ellil and in a later period retained honor chiefly because he was assumed to be the. father of the god Marduk, and so was reverenced by the people of the city of Babylon. As the lord of wisdom he filled a great role in exorcisms down to the very last, and was believed to be the god who was most ready to respond to human need in direful circumstances. Ea's wife is called Damkina.  4. Sin:  Sin was the city god of Urn (Ur of the Chaldeans in the Old Testament). He was originally a local god who came early to a lofty position in the canon because he seems always to have been identified with the moon, and in Babylon the moon was always of more importance than the sun because of its use in the calendar. His temple was called E-kishshirgal, i.e. "house of light." His worship was widespread, for at a very early date he had a shrine at Harran in Mesopotamia. His wife is called Ningal, the Great Lady, the Queen, and his name probably appears in Mt. Sinai. He is addressed in hymns of great beauty and was regarded as a most kindly god.  5. Shamash:  The Sun-god, Shamash, ranks next after Sin in the second or later triad, and there can be no doubt that he was from the beginning associated with the sun in the heavens. His seats of worship were Larsa in southern Babylonia and Sippar in northern Babylonia in both of which his temple was called E-bab-bar, "shining house." He also is honored in magnificent hymns in which he is saluted as the enemy and the avenger of evil, but as the benignant furtherer of all good, especially of that which concerns the races of men. All legislation is ascribed to him as the supreme judge in heaven. To him the Babylonians also ascribe similar powers in war to those which the Egyptians accorded to Re. From some of the texts one might have supposed that he would have come to the top of the triad, but this appears not to have been the case, and his influence extended rather in the direction of influencing minor local deities who were judged to be characterized by attributes similar to those ascribed to him in the greater hymns.  6. Ishtar:  The origin and the meaning of the name of the goddess Ishtar are still disputed, but of her rank there can be no doubt. In the very earliest inscriptions known to us she does not seem to have been associated with the planet Venus as she is in later times. She seems rather to have been a goddess of fruitfulness and of love, and in her temple at Uruk temple-prostitution was a feature. In the mythological literature she occupies a high place as the goddess of war and of the chase. Because of this later identification she became the chief goddess of the warlike Assyrians. Little by little she absorbed all the other goddesses and her name became the general word for goddess. Her chief seats of worhip were Uruk in southern Babylonia, where she was worshipped in earliest times under the name of Nana, and Akkad in northern Babylonia, where she was called Anunitu, and Nineveh and Arbela in Assyria. Some of the hymns addressed to her are among the noblest products of Babylonian and Assyrian religion and reach a considerable ethical position. This development of a sexual goddess into a goddess who severely judged the sins of men is one of the strangest phenomena in the history of this religion.  7. Marduk:  Marduk (in the Old Testament Merodach) is the city-god of Babylon where his temple was called E-sagila ("lofty house") and its tower E-teme nanki ("house of the foundation of heaven and earth"). His wife is Sarpanitu, and, as we have already seen, his father was Ea, and in later days Nabu was considered his son. The city of Babylon in the earliest period was insignificant in importance compared with Nippur and Eridu, and this city-god could not therefore lay claim to a position comparable with the gods of these cities, but after Hammurabi had made Babylon the chief city of all Babylonia its god rapidly increased in importance until he absorbed the attributes of the earlier gods and displaced them in the great myths. The speculative philosophers of the neo-Babylonian period went so far as to identify all the earlier gods with him, elevating his worship into a sort of henotheism. His proper name in the later periods was gradually displaced by the appellativc Belu "lord," so that finally he was commonly spoken of as Bel, and his consort was called Belit. He shares with Ishtar and Shamash the honor of having some of the finest hymns, which have come down to us, sung to his name.  8. Nabu:  Nabu (in the Old Testament Nebo) was the city-god of Bor-sippa. His name is clearly Semitic, and means "speaker" or "announcer." In earlier times he seems to have been a more important god than Marduk and was worshipped as the god of vegetation. His temple in Borsippa bore the name E-zida ("perpetual house") with the tower E-uriminanki ("house of the seven rulers of heaven and earth"). In later times he was identified with the planet Mercury.  9. Nergal:  Nergal, the city-god of Kutu (in the Old Testament Cuthah), was the god of the underworld and his wife Eresh-kigal was the sovereign lady of the under-world. He was also the god of plague and of fever, and in later days was associated with the planet Mars, though scholars who are attached to the astral theory (see below) think that he was identified at an earlier date with Saturn. For this view no certain proof has yet been produced.  10. Ninib:  Unfortunately the correct pronunciation of the name of the god Ninib has not yet been secured. He seems originally to have been a god of vegetation, but in the later philosophical period was associated with the planet Saturn, called Kaitaann (Kewan, Chiun,  Amos 5:26  the King James Version, the English Revised Version). As a god of vegetation he becomes also a god of healing and his wife Gula was the chief patroness of physicians. He comes also to be regarded as a mighty hero in war, and, in this capacity generally, he fills a great role in the Assyrian religion.  11. Ramman:  Ramman is the god of storms and thunder among the Babylonians and in the Assyrian pantheon he is usually called Adad. This form of the name is doubtless connected with the Aramaic god Hadad. In the Sumerian period his name seems to have been Ishkur. His wife is called Shala.  12. Tammuz:  The name Tammuz is derived from the Sumerian Dumuzi-zuab ("real child of the water depths"). He is a god of vegetation which is revived by the rains of the spring. Tammuz never became one of the great gods of the pantheon, but his popularity far exceeded that of the many gods who were regarded as greater than he. His worship is associated with that of Ishtar whose paramour he was, and the beautiful story of the descent of Ishtar to Hades was written to describe Ishtar's pursuit of him to the depths of the under-world seeking to bring him up again. His disappearance in the under-world is associated with the disappearance of vegetation under the midsummer heat which revives again when the rain comes and the god appears once more on the earth. The cult of Tammuz survived the decay of Babylonian and Assyrian civilization and made its way into the western world. It was similar in some respects to that of Osiris in Egypt, but was not so beautiful or so humane.  13. Asshur:  The supreme god of Assyria, Asshur, was originally the local god of the city which bears the same name. During the whole of Assyrian history his chief role is as the god of war, but the speculative philosophers of Assyria absorbed into him many of the characteristics of Ellil and Marduk, going even so far as to ascribe to him the chief place in the conflict with the sea monster Tiamat in the creation epoch.  V. Hymns and Prayers.  The religious literature of the Babylonians and Assyrians culminated in a great series of hymns to the gods. These have come down to us from almost all periods of the religious history of the people. Some of them go back to the days of the old city-kingdoms and others were composed during the reign of Nabonidus when the fall of Babylon at the hands of Cyrus was imminent. The greatest number of those that have come down to us are dedicated to Shamash, the Sun-god, but many of the finest, as we have already seen, were composed in honor of Sin, the Moon-god. None of these reached monotheism. All are polytheistic, with perhaps tendencies in the direction of pantheism or henotheism. This incapacity to reach monotheism may have been partially due to the influence of the local city whose tendency was always to hold tightly to the honor of the local god. Babylonia might struggle never so hard to lift Marduk to high and still higher position, but in spite of all its efforts he remains to the very end of the days only one god among many. And even the greatest of the Babylonian kings, Nebuchadrezzar and Nabonidus, continued to pay honor to Shamash in Sippar, whose temple they continually rebuilt and adorned with ever greater magnificence. Better than any description of the hymns is a specimen adequately to show their quality. Here are some lines taken from an ancient Sumerian hymn to the Moon-god which had been copied and preserved with an Assyrian translation in the library of Ashurbanipal: + O Lord, chief of the gods, who alone art exalted on earth and in heaven, Father Nannar, Lord, Anshar, chief of the gods, Father Nannar, Lord, great Ann, chief of the gods, Father Nannar, Lord, Sin, chief of the gods, Father Nanbar, Lord of Ur, chief of the gods, Father Nannar, Lord of E-gish-shir-gal, chief of the gods, Father Nannar, Lord of the veil, brilliant one, chief of the gods, Father Nannar, whose rule is perfect, chief of the gods, Father Nannar, who does march in great majesty, chief of the gods, O strong, young bull, with strong horns, perfect in muscles, with beard of lapis lazuli color, full of glory and perfection, Self-created, full of developed fruit, beautiful to look upon, in whose being one cannot sufficiently sate himself; Mother womb, begetter of all things, who has taken up his exalted habitation among living creatures; O merciful, gracious father, in whose hand rests the life of the whole world, O Lord, thy divinity is full of awe, like the far-off heaven and the broad ocean. O creator of the land, founder of sanctuaries, proclaimer of their names, O father, begetter of gods and men, who dost build dwellings and establish offerings, Who dost call to lordship, dost bestow the scepter, determinest destinies for far-off days. Much of this is full of fine religious feeling, and the exaltation of Sin sounds as though the poet could scarcely acknowledge any other god, but the proof that other gods were invoked in the same terms and by the same kings is plentiful.  Some of these hymns are connected with magical and incantation literature, for they serve to introduce passages which are intended to drive away evil demons. A very few of them on the other hand rise to very lofty conceptions in which the god is praised as a judge of righteousness. A few lines from the greatest of all the hymns addressed to Shamash, the Sun-god, will make this plain:  COLUMN II + Who plans evil-his horn thou dost destroy, 40 Whoever in fixing boundaries annuls rights. The unjust judge thou restrainest with force. Whoever accepts a bribe, who does not judge justly-on him thou imposest sin. But he who does not accept a bribe, who has a care for the oppressed, To him Shamash is gracious, his life he prolongs. 45 The judge who renders a just decision Shall end in a palace, the place of princes shall be his dwelling. - COLUMN III + The seed of those who act unjustly shall not flourish. What their mouth declares in thy presence Thou shalt burn it up, what they purpose wilt thou annul. 15 Thou knowest their transgressions: the declaration of the wicked thou dost cast aside. Everyone, wherever he may be, is in thy care. Thou directest their judgments, the imprisoned dost thou liberate. Thou hearest, O Shamash, petition, prayer, and appeal. Humility, prostration, petitioning, and reverence. 20 With loud voice the unfortunate one cries to thee. The weak, the exhausted, the oppressed, the lowly, Mother, wife, maid appeal to thee. He who is removed from his family, he that dwelleth far from his city. - There is in this hymn no suggestion of magic or sorcery. We cannot but feel how close this poet came to an appreciation of the Sun-god as a judge of men on an ethical basis. How near he was to passing through the vale into a larger religious life!  The prayers are on the whole upon a lower plane, though some of them, notably those of Nebuchadrezzar, reach lofty conceptions. The following may serve as a sufficient example:  O eternal ruler, lord of all being, grant that the name of the king that thou lovest, whose. name thou hast proclaimed. may flourish as seems pleasing to thee. Lead him in the right way. I am the prince that obeys thee, the creature of thy hand. Thou hast created me, and hast entrusted to me dominion over mankind. According to thy mercy, O Lord, which thou bestowest upon all, may thy supreme rule be merciful! The worship of thy divinity implant in my heart! Grant me what seems good to thee, for thou art he that hast fashioned my life.  VI. Magic:  Next in importance to the gods in the Babylonian religion are the demons who had the power to afflict men with manifold diseases of body or mind. A large part of the religion seems to have been given up to an agonized struggle against these demons, and the gods were everywhere approached by prayer to assist men against these demons. An immense mass of incantations, supposed to have the power of driving the demons out, has come down to us. The use of these incantations lay chiefly in the hands of the priests who attached great importance to specific words or sets of words. The test of time was supposed to have shown that certain words were efficacious in certain instances. If in any case the result was not secured, it could only be ascribed to the use of the wrong formula; hence there grew up a great desire to preserve exactly the words which in some cases had brought healing. Later these incantations were gathered into groups or rituals classified according to purpose or use. Of the rituals which have come down to us, the following are the most important:  1. Maqlu:  Maqlu, i.e. "burning," so called because there are in it many symbolic burnings of images or witches. This series is used in the delivering of sufferers from witches or sorcerers.  2. Shurpu:  Shurpu is another word for burning, and this series also deals much in symbolic burnings and for the same purposes as the former. In these incantations we make the acquaintance of a large number of strange demons such as the rabisu, a demon that springs unawares on its victims; the labartu, which attacks women and children; and the lilu and the lilitu, to which reference has been made before, and the utuku, a strong demon.  These incantations are for the most part a wretched jargon without meaning, and a sad commentary on the low position occupied by the religion which has attained such noble heights as that represented in the hymns and prayers. It is strange that the higher forms of religion were not able to drive out the lower, but these incantations continued to be carefully copied and used down to the very end of the Babylonian commonwealth.  VII. The Last Things.  In Babylonia, the great question of all the ages-"If a man die shall he live again?"-was asked and an attempt made to answer it. The answer was usually sad and depressing. After death the souls of men were supposed to continue in existence. It can hardly be called life. The place to which they have gone is called the "land of no return." There they lived in dark rooms amid the dust and the bats covered with a garment of feathers, and under the dominion of Nergal and Ereshkigal. When the soul arrived among the dead he had to pass judgment before the judges of the dead, the Annunaki, but little has been preserved for us concerning the manner of this judgment. There seems to have been at times an idea that it might be possible for the dead to return again to life, for in this underworld there was the water of life, which was used when the god Tammuz returned again to earth. The Babylonians seem not to have attached so much importance to this after-existence as did the Egyptians, but they did practice burial and not cremation, and placed often with the dead articles which might be used in his future existence. In earlier times the dead were buried in their own houses, and among the rich this custom seems to have prevailed until the very latest times. For others the custom of burying in an acropolis was adopted, and near the city of Kutha was an acropolis which was especially famous. In the future world there seem to have been distinctions made among the dead.  Read Complete Article...    ASSYRIA AND BABYLONIA, RELIGION OF  See  BABYLONIA AND ASSYRIA, RELIGION OF .
WEB|  Access the topical results on the Bible Search:  
ELZAPHAN|     el-za'-fan.  See  ELIZAPHAN .
HAZO|Vision, one of the sons of Nahor ( Genesis 22:22 ). 
PEDAIAH|Redemption of the Lord.  (1.) The father of Zebudah, who was the wife of Josiah and mother of king Jehoiakim ( 2 Kings 23:36 ). (2.) The father of Zerubbabel ( 1 Chronicles 3:17 -19). (3.). The father of Joel, ruler of the half-tribe of Manasseh ( 1 Chronicles 27:20 ). (4.)  Nehemiah 3:25 . (5.) A Levite ( 8:4 ). (6.) A Benjamite ( 11:7 ). (7.) A Levite ( 13:13 ). 
ELON|Oak.  (1.) A city of Dan ( Joshua 19:43 ).  (2.) A Hittite, father of Bashemath, Esau's wife ( Genesis 26:34 ).  (3.) One of the sons of Zebulun ( Genesis 46:14 ).  (4.) The eleventh of the Hebrew judges. He held office for ten years ( Judges 12:11 ,  12). He is called the Zebulonite. 
RAMIAH|     ra-mi'-a (ramyah, "Yah has loosened" or "Yah is high"): One of the Israelites, of the sons of Parosh, mentioned in the register of those who had offended in the matter of foreign marriages ( Ezra 10:25 ). The form of the name in 1 Esdras (9:26), "Hiermas," presupposes a Hebrew form yeremyah or possibly yirmeyah = "Jeremiah."
YODH|     yod "y": The 10th letter of the Hebrew alphabet; transliterated in this Encyclopedia as "y". It came also to be used for the number 10.  See JOB, and for name, etc., see ALPHABET.
HOTHAM|   ; HOTHAN  ho'-tham, ho'-than (chotham, "seal"):  (1) An Asherite, son of Heber, family of Beriah ( 1 Chronicles 7:32 ).  (2) An Aroerite, father of two of the mighty men of David ( 1 Chronicles 11:44 ). the King James Version, following Septuagint Chothan, has, incorrectly, Hothan.
BONES|   BONE;   bon (`etsem, `otsem; Aramaic gerem, by extension used for "bony frame," "body," "strength,"  Psalm 35:10 ; "the whole man";  Luke 24:39 , "flesh and bones" = the solid and tangible framework of the body; figuratively the substance, the idea of a thing, the thing, per se): Figurative: Very often we find the use of these words in metaphorical phrases, in which a disease or a discomfort of the body denotes certain emotions or mental attitudes. Thus the expression "rottenness of the bones" ( Proverbs 12:4 ;  Proverbs 14:30 ) signifies the feelings of a man whose wife causes him shame and confusion, or is equivalent to "envy," "jealousy." The translation of the Septuagint in these passages by skolex, "worm," and ses, "maggot," "moth," is incorrect. The same phrase is used in  Habakkuk 3:16  for utter dejectedness through the anticipation of approaching evil. Similarly the "shaking of the bones" ( Job 4:14 ) is expressive of fear, and denotes dejection and sadness in  Jeremiah 23:9 . The "burning of the bones" is found as a symptom of J ob's disease ( Job 30:30 ), and stands for grief, depression of spirits in  Psalm 102:3  and  Lamentations 1:13 , and also for the feeling of Jeremiah, when he attempted to hold back the Divine message ( Jeremiah 20:9 ), while "dryness of bones" ( Proverbs 17:22 ) is the opposite of "good health." Other similar expressions of mental distress are the "piercing of the bones" ( Job 30:17 ), the bones are "troubled" ( Psalm 6:2 ), "out of joint" ( Psalm 22:14 ), "consumed" ( Psalm 31:10  the King James Version), "wasted away" or "waxed old" ( Psalm 32:3 ), "broken" ( Psalm 51:8   Lamentations 3:4 ), "ill at rest" ( Psalm 38:3 ), "bone of my bones," etc. ( Genesis 2:23 ), having the same nature, and the nearest relation ( 2 Samuel 5:1 ) and affection ( Ephesians 5:30 ). In the last-mentioned passage, the Revised Version (British and American) omits "of his flesh, and of his bones" as an interpolation from  Genesis 2:23 . The figs. in  Micah 3:2, 3  are expressive of the most cruel oppression and murder.  H. L. E. Luering
RAPHAH|   RAPHA,   ra'-fa (rapha'):  (1) In the Revised Version margin these names are substituted for "the giant" in  1 Chronicles 20:4, 6, 8  and in  2 Samuel 21:16, 18, 20, 22 . The latter passage states that certain champions of the Philistines who were slain by David's warriors had been born to the raphah in Gath. The text is corrupt; Raphah is probably an eponym. Originally the name of one of the Philistines who was of the body "Rephaites" stood in the text. The plural of this word, or at least a plural of this stem, is REPHAIM (which see).  (2) Raphah (the King James Version "Rapha"), a descendant of Saul ( 1 Chronicles 8:37 ).  See  REPHAIAH .  Horace J. Wolf
HAVOTHJAIR|Hamlets of the enlightener a district in the east of Jordan.  (1.) Jair, the son of Manasseh, took some villages of Gilead and called them by this name ( Numbers 32:41 ). (2.) Again, it is said that Jair "took all the tract of Argob," and called it Bashanhavoth-jair ( Deuteronomy 3:14 ). (See also  Joshua 13:30 ;  1 Kings 4:13 ;  1 Chronicles 2:22 ,  23.) 
JAASAI|   ; JAASAU  ja'-a-si, ja'-a-so.  See  JAASU .
EPHESUS|The capital of proconsular Asia, which was the western part of Asia Minor. It was colonized principally from Athens. In the time of the Romans it bore the title of "the first and greatest metropolis of Asia." It was distinguished for the Temple of Diana (q.v.), who there had her chief shrine; and for its theatre, which was the largest in the world, capable of containing 50,000 spectators. It was, like all ancient theatres, open to the sky. Here were exhibited the fights of wild beasts and of men with beasts. (Comp.  1 Corinthians 4:9 ;  9:24 ,  25;  15:32 .) Many Jews took up their residence in this city, and here the seeds of the gospel were sown immediately after Pentecost ( Acts 2:9 ;  6:9 ). At the close of his second missionary journey (about A.D. 51), when Paul was returning from Greece to Syria ( 18:18 -21), he first visited this city. He remained, however, for only a short time, as he was hastening to keep the feast, probably of Pentecost, at Jerusalem; but he left Aquila and Priscilla behind him to carry on the work of spreading the gospel. During his third missionary journey Paul reached Ephesus from the "upper coasts" ( Acts 19:1 ), i.e., from the inland parts of Asia Minor, and tarried here for about three years; and so successful and abundant were his labours that "all they which dwelt in Asia heard the word of the Lord Jesus, both Jews and Greeks" ( 19:10 ). Probably during this period the seven churches of the Apocalypse were founded, not by Paul's personal labours, but by missionaries whom he may have sent out from Ephesus, and by the influence of converts returning to their homes. On his return from his journey, Paul touched at Miletus, some 30 miles south of Ephesus ( Acts 20:15 ), and sending for the presbyters of Ephesus to meet him there, he delivered to them that touching farewell charge which is recorded in  Acts 20:18 -35. Ephesus is not again mentioned till near the close of Paul's life, when he writes to Timothy exhorting him to "abide still at Ephesus" ( 1 Timothy 1:3 ). Two of Paul's companions, Trophimus and Tychicus, were probably natives of Ephesus ( Acts 20:4 ;  21:29 ;  2 Timothy 4:12 ). In his second epistle to Timothy, Paul speaks of Onesiphorus as having served him in many things at Ephesus ( 2 Timothy 1:18 ). He also "sent Tychicus to Ephesus" ( 4:12 ), probably to attend to the interests of the church there. Ephesus is twice mentioned in the Apocalypse ( 1:11 ;  2:1 ). The apostle John, according to tradition, spent many years in Ephesus, where he died and was buried. A part of the site of this once famous city is now occupied by a small Turkish village, Ayasaluk, which is regarded as a corruption of the two Greek words, hagios theologos; i.e., "the holy divine." 
TAHAPANES|=Tahpanhes=Tehaphnehes, (called "Daphne" by the Greeks,  now Tell Defenneh), an ancient Egyptian city, on the Tanitic branch of the Nile, about 16 miles from Pelusium. The Jews from Jerusalem fled to this place after the death of Gedaliah (q.v.), and sett
PUL| (1.) An Assyrian king. It has been a question whether he was identical with Tiglath-pileser III. (q.v.), or was his predecessor. The weight of evidence is certainly in favour of their identity. Pul was the throne-name he bore in Babylonia as king of Babylon, and Tiglath-pileser the throne-name he bore as king of Assyria. He was the founder of what is called the second Assyrian empire. He consolidated and organized his conquests on a large scale. He subdued Northern Syria and Hamath, and the kings of Syria rendered him homage and paid him tribute. His ambition was to found in Western Asia a kingdom which should embrace the whole civilized world, having Nineveh as its centre. Menahem, king of Israel, gave him the enormous tribute of a thousand talents of silver, "that his hand might be with him" ( 2 Kings 15:19 ;  1 Chronicles 5:26 ). The fact that this tribute could be paid showed the wealthy condition of the little kingdom of Israel even in this age of disorder and misgovernment. Having reduced Syria, he turned his arms against Babylon, which he subdued. The Babylonian king was slain, and Babylon and other Chaldean cities were taken, and Pul assumed the title of "King of Sumer [i.e., Shinar] and Accad." He was succeeded by Shalmanezer IV. (2.) A geographical name in Isaiah 66:19. Probably = Phut ( Genesis 10:6 ;  Jeremiah 46:9 ,  R.V. "Put;"  Ezek. 27:10 ). 
BESODEIAH|     bes-o-de'-ya, bes-o-di'-a (becodheyah, "in the confidence or counsel of Yah"; compare  Jeremiah 23:18, 22 ; and HPN, 207, 221, 286): Father of Meshullam, the builder ( Nehemiah 3:6 ).
BERODACHBALADAN|The king of Babylon who sent a friendly deputation to Hezekiah ( 2 Kings 20:12 ). In Isaiah 39:1 he is called Merodach-baladan (q.v.). 
THESSALONIANS|Thessalonians, Epistles to the  The first epistle to the Thessalonians was the first of all Paul's epistles. It was in all probability written from Corinth, where he abode a "long time" ( Acts 18:11 ,  18), early in the period of his residence there, about the end of A.D. 52. The occasion of its being written was the return of Timotheus from Macedonia, bearing tidings from Thessalonica regarding the state of the church there ( Acts 18:1 -5;  1 Thessalonians 3:6 ). While, on the whole, the report of Timothy was encouraging, it also showed that divers errors and misunderstandings regarding the tenor of Paul's teaching had crept in amongst them. He addresses them in this letter with the view of correcting these errors, and especially for the purpose of exhorting them to purity of life, reminding them that their sanctification was the great end desired by God regarding them. The subscription erroneously states that this epistle was written from Athens. The second epistle to the Thessalonians was probably also written from Corinth, and not many months after the first. The occasion of the writing of this epistle was the arrival of tidings that the tenor of the first epistle had been misunderstood, especially with reference to the second advent of Christ. The Thessalonians had embraced the idea that Paul had taught that "the day of Christ was at hand", that Christ's coming was just about to happen. This error is corrected ( 2:1 -12), and the apostle prophetically announces what first must take place. "The apostasy" was first to arise. Various explanations of this expression have been given, but that which is most satisfactory refers it to the Church of Rome.
EPAENETUS|Commendable, a Christian at Rome to whom Paul sent his salutation ( Romans 16:5 ). He is spoken of as "the first fruits of Achaia" (R.V.,  "of Asia",  i.e.,  of proconsular Asia,  which is probably the correct reading). As being the first convert in that region, he was peculiarly dear to the apostle. He calls him his "well beloved." 
DEDANIM|The descendants of Dedan, the son of Raamah. They are mentioned in Isaiah 21:13 as sending out "travelling companies" which lodged "in the forest of Arabia." They are enumerated also by Ezekiel ( 27:20 ) among the merchants who supplied Tyre with precious things. 
ELKOSHITE|     el'-kosh-it (ha-'elqoshi; Septuagint Elkesaiou, Elkaiseou, Elkeseou):  Used with the article "the Elkoshite" ( Nahum 1:1 ). Probably a gentilic adjective giving the home of the prophet; not definitely identified. Three traditions may be noted:  (1) The Nestorians venerate the supposed tomb of the prophet in the village of Alqush not far from the east bank of the Tigris, about two days' journey almost directly north of Mosul.  (2) Jerome states in the prologue to his commentary on Na that the village of Helkesei in Galilee was pointed out to him as Elkosh. This Helkesei is probably El-Kauzeh between Ramieh and Bint Jebeil.  (3) The treatise De Vitis Prophetarum of the Pseudo-Epiphanius says that Nahum came from "Elkesei beyond Jordan towards Begabor and was of the tribe of Simeon." Nestle has shown that the words "beyond Jordan" are probably a gloss, and that for Begabor should be read Betogabra, the modern Beit Jibrin in Southern Palestine. In favor of this identification may be urged the following facts:  (a) that parallels to the name Elkosh, such as Eltekeh and Eltekon, are found in the southern country;  (b) that the word probably contains the name of the Edomite god Qaush, whose name appears in the names of Edomite kings in the Assyrian inscriptions of the 8th and 7th centuries B.C., such as Qaush-malaka and the like.  (c) that the internal evidence of the prophecy makes the Judean origin of the prophet almost certain.  LITERATURE. Davidson, "Nahum," "Habakkuk," "Zephaniah," in Cambridge Bible, 9-13; G. A. Smith, "Book of the Twelve," in Expositor's Bible, Commentary on Nahum; Billerbeck and Jeremias, Beitraege zur Assyriologie, III, 91; Peiser, ZATW, 1897, 349; Nestle, PEFS, 1879, 136.  Walter R. Betteridge
CLAUDIA|A female Christian mentioned in  2 Timothy 4:21 . It is a conjecture having some probability that she was a British maiden, the daughter of king Cogidunus, who was an ally of Rome, and assumed the name of the emperor, his patron, Tiberius Claudius, and that she was the wife of Pudens. 
ZARETHAN|     zar'-e-than (tsarethan): A city, according to  Joshua 3:16  (omitted, however, by the Septuagint) near Adam, which is probably to be identified with Tell Damieh at the mouth of the Jabbok. In  1 Kings 4:12  it is mentioned in connefection with Bethshean and said to be "beneath Jezreel." In  1 Kings 7:46 , this is said to be at "the ford of Adamah," according to the reading of some, but according to the Massoretic text, "in the clay around between Succoth and Zarethan," where the bronze castings for the temple were made by Solomon's artificers. In  2 Chronicles 4:17 , the name appears as Zeredah, which in  1 Kings 11:26  is said to have been the birthplace of Jeroboam, son of Nebat. In  Judges 7:22 , Gibeon is said to have pursued the Midianites "as far as Bethshittah toward Zererah," which is probably a misreading for Zeredah, arising from the similarity of the Hebrew letters daleth and resh. The place has not been positively identical. From the suggestion that the name means "the great (or lofty) rock," it has without sufficient reason been supposed that it designates the conspicuous peak of Kurn Surtabheh which projects from the mountains of Ephraim into the valley of the Jordan opposite the mouth of the Jabbok.  George Frederick Wright
KIRIATHARBA|   KIRIATH-ARBA  kir-i-ath-ar'-ba.  See  HEBRON .
CHAMBERS|    IN THE HEAVENS  See  ASTRONOMY ;  DIAL OF AHAZ .  CHAMBERS IN THE SOUTH  See  ASTRONOMY ;  SOUTH, CHAMBERS OF THE .  CHAMBERS OF IMAGERY  im'-aj-ri, im'-a-jer-i (maskith): The reference ( Ezekiel 8:12 ) is to chambers in the temple where the elders of Israel were wont to assemble and practice rites of an idolatrous character. What the imagery consisted of, we may gather from 8:10: symbolic representations of beasts and reptiles and "detestable things." It is thought that these symbols were of a zodiacal character. The worship of the planets was in vogue at the time of the prophet among the degenerate Israelites.
UCAL|The name of a person to whom Agur's words are addressed ( Proverbs 30:1 ). 
VANIAH|     va-ni'-a (wanyah, meaning unknown): A son of Bani, who had married a foreign wife ( Ezra 10:36 ). The text is, however, doubtful. The Septuagint Codex Vaticanus has Ouiechoa; Codex Sinaiticus Ouierecho; Codex Alexandrinus Ouounia, Lucian Ouania.
FORCES|Of the Gentiles ( Isaiah 60:5 ,  11; R.V.,  "the wealth of the nations") denotes the wealth of the heathen. The whole passage means that the wealth of the Gentile world should be consecrated to the service of the church. 
ELIPHELEHU|     e-lif'-e-le-hu ('eliphelehu, "May God distinguish him," the King James Version Elipheleh):  The eleventh of the fourteen doorkeepers mentioned as "brethren of the second degree" and as appointed in connection with the bringing up of the ark to Jerusalem by David ( 1 Chronicles 15:18 ).
MICHA| (1.)  2 Samuel 9:12  =MICAH (2). (2.) The son of Zabdi, a Levite of the family of Asaph ( Nehemiah 11:17 ,  22). 
NEHELAMITE|The name given to a false prophet Shemaiah, who went with the captives to Babylon ( Jeremiah 29:24 ,  31,  32). The origin of the name is unknown. It is rendered in the marg, "dreamer." 
JEARIM|Forests, a mountain on the border of Judah ( Joshua 15:10 ). 
SEPHARAD|( Obadiah 1:20 ), some locality unknown. The modern Jews think that Spain is meant, and hence they designate the Spanish Jews "Sephardim," as they do the German Jews by the name "Ashkenazim," because the rabbis call Germany Ashkenaz. Others identify it with Sardis, the capital of Lydia. The Latin father Jerome regarded it as an Assyrian word, meaning "boundary," and interpreted the sentence, "which is in Sepharad," by "who are scattered abroad in all the boundaries and regions of the earth." Perowne says: "Whatever uncertainty attaches to the word Sepharad, the drift of the prophecy is clear, viz., that not only the exiles from Babylon, but Jewish captives from other and distant regions, shall be brought back to live prosperously within the enlarged borders of their own land." 
BELAH|   BELA;   be'-la (bela`, "destruction"; the King James Version Belah,  Genesis 46:21 ):  (1) Bela, the son of Beor, was the first king of Edom previous to the kingdom of Israel and reigned in the city of Dinhabah ( Genesis 36:32   1 Chronicles 1:43 f ). Septuagint Codex Alexandrinus, Balak.  (2) Bela, the firstborn son of Benjamin ( Genesis 46:21   1 Chronicles 7:6   1 Chronicles 8:1 ). He was the head of the family of the Belaites ( Numbers 26:38 ), the father of Addar (called Ard,  Numbers 26:40 ), Gera, Abihud, Abishua, Naaman, Ahoah, Gera, Shephuphan (compare Shephupham,  Numbers 26:39 ), Huram ( 1 Chronicles 8:3-5   Numbers 26:40 ).  (3) Bela, a son of Azaz, of the tribe of Reuben, was a man of great power and wealth. His possessions reached from Nebo to the Euphrates ( 1 Chronicles 5:8 ).  A. L. Breslich
TRYPHOSA|Tryphena and Tryphosa Two female Christians, active workers, whom Paul salutes in his epistle to the Romans ( 16:12 ). 
MIGDOL|Tower.  (1.) A strongly-fortified place 12 miles from Pelusium, in the north of Egypt ( Jeremiah 44:1 ;  46:14 ). This word is rendered "tower" in  Ezek. 29:10 , but the margin correctly retains the name Migdol, "from Migdol to Syene;" i.e., from Migdol in the north to Syene in the south, in other words, the whole of Egypt. (2.) A place mentioned in the passage of the Red Sea ( Exodus 14:2 ;  Numbers 33:7 ,  8). It is probably to be identified with Bir Suweis, about 2 miles from Suez. 
CONIAH|     ko-ni'-a (konyahu, "Jah is creating"): A form of the name Jehoiachin, found in  Jeremiah 22:24, 28 ;  Jeremiah 37:1 .  See  JEHOIACHIN .
CHISLOTHTABOR|   CHISLOTH-TABOR  kis-loth-ta'-bor, kiz'-loth.  See  CHESULLOTH .
MEGIDDON|   MEGIDDO;   me-gid'-o, me-gid'-on (meghiddo, meghiddon; Magiddo, Mageddon, Magdo): A royal city of the Canaanites, the king of which was slain by Joshua ( Joshua 12:21 ). It lay within the territory of Issachar, but was one of the cities assigned to Manasseh ( Joshua 17:11   1 Chronicles 7:29 ). Manasseh, however, was not able to expel the Canaanites, who therefore continued to dwell in that land. Later, when the children of Israel were waxen strong, the Canaanites were put to taskwork ( Joshua 17:12   Judges 1:27 f ). The host of Sisera was drawn to the river Kishon, and here, "by the waters of Megiddo," the famous battle was fought ( Judges 5:19 ). By the time of Solomon, Israel's supremacy was unquestioned. Megiddo was included in one of his administrative districts ( 1 Kings 4:12 ), and it was one of the cities which he fortified ( 1 Kings 9:15 ). Ahaziah, mortally wounded at the ascent of Gur, fled to Megiddo to die ( 2 Kings 9:27 ). At Megiddo, Josiah, king of Judah, attempted to arrest Pharaoh-necoh and his army on their march to the Euphrates against the king of Assyria. Here the Egyptian monarch "slew him.... when he had seen him," and from Megiddo went the sorrowful procession to Jerusalem with Josiah's corpse ( 2 Kings 23:29   2 Chronicles 35:20 ). The sad tale is told again in 1 Esdras 1:25;. "The mourning of Hadadrimmon in the valley of Megiddon" became a poetical expression for the deepest and most despairing grief ( Zechariah 12:11 ).  See also  ARMAGEDDON .  The constant association of Megiddo with Taanach (Tell Ta`anek) points to a position on the south edge of the plain of Esdraelon. In confirmation of this, we read (RP, 1st series, II, 35-47) that Thothmes III captured Megiddo, after having defeated the Palestinian allies who opposed him. He left his camp at Aruna (possibly `Ar`arah), and, following a defile (possibly Wady `Arah), he approached Megiddo from the South We should thus look for the city where the pass opens on the plain; and here, at Khan el-Lejjan, we find extensive ruins on both sides of a stream which turns several mills before falling into the Kishon. We may identify the site with Megiddo, and the stream with "the waters of Megiddo." Pharaoh-necoh would naturally take the same line of march, and his advance could be nowhere more hopefully opposed than at el-Lejjun. Tell el-Mutasellim, a graceful mound hard by, on the edge of the plain, may have formed the acropolis of Megiddo.  The name Mujadda` attaches to a site 3 miles South of Beisan in the Jordan valley. Here Conder would place Megiddo. But while there is a resemblance in the name, the site really suits none of the Biblical data. The phrase "Taanach by the waters of Megiddo" alone confines us to a very limited area. No position has yet been suggested which meets all the conditions as well as el-Lejjun.  The Khan here shows that the road through the pass from Esdraelon to the plain of Sharon and the coast was still much frequented in the Middle Ages.  W. Ewing
ZARA|     za'-ra (Zara): the King James Version ( Matthew 1:3 ) = Greek form of ZERAH (which see).
ZAREAH|     za'-re-a, za-re'-a (tsor`ah): the King James Version in  Nehemiah 11:29  for ZORAH (which see).
TERTIUS|The third, a Roman Christian whom Paul employed as his amanuensis in writing his epistle to the Romans ( 16:22 ). 
NAAMATHITE|The designation of Zophar, one of Job's three friends ( Job 2:11 ;  11:1 ), so called from some place in Arabia, called Naamah probably. 
JAAZIEL|Comforted by God, a Levitical musician ( 1 Chronicles 15:18 ). 
JERUEL|Founded by God, a "desert" on the ascent from the valley of the Dead Sea towards Jerusalem. It lay beyond the wilderness of Tekoa, in the direction of Engedi ( 2 Chronicles 20:16 ,  20). It corresponds with the tract of country now called el-Hasasah. 
KARKOR|Foundation, a place in the open desert wastes on the east of Jordan ( Judges 8:10 ), not far beyond Succoth and Penuel, to the south. Here Gideon overtook and routed a fugitive band of Midianites under Zeba and Zalmunna, whom he took captive. 
ZACCUR|Mindful.  (1.) Father of Shammua, who was one of the spies sent out by Moses ( Numbers 13:4 ). (2.) A Merarite Levite ( 1 Chronicles 24:27 ). (3.) A son of Asaph, and chief of one of the courses of singers as arranged by David ( 1 Chronicles 25:2 ,  10). (4.) Son of Imri ( Nehemiah 3:2 ). (5.) A Levite ( Nehemiah 10:12 ). (6.) The son of Mattaniah ( Nehemiah 13:13 ). 
JERIMOTH|Heights.  (1.) One of the sons of Bela ( 1 Chronicles 7:7 ). (2.)  1 Chronicles 24:30 , a Merarite Levite. (3.) A Benjamite slinger who joined David at Ziklag ( 1 Chronicles 12:5 ). (4.) A Levitical musician under Heman his father ( 1 Chronicles 25:4 ). (5.)  1 Chronicles 27:19 , ruler of Naphtali. (6.) One of David's sons ( 2 Chronicles 11:18 ). (7.) A Levite, one of the overseers of the temple offerings ( 2 Chronicles 31:13 ) in the reign of Hezekiah. 
IDDO| (1.) Timely ( 1 Chronicles 6:21 ). A Gershonite Levite. (2.) Lovely. The son of Zechariah ( 1 Chronicles 27:21 ), the ruler of Manasseh in David's time. (3.) Timely. The father of Ahinadab, who was one of Solomon's purveyors ( 1 Kings 4:14 ). (4.) Lovely. A prophet of Judah who wrote the history of Rehoboam and Abijah ( 2 Chronicles 12:15 ). He has been identified with Oded ( 2 Chronicles 15:1 ). (5.) Lovely. The father of Berachiah, and grandfather of the prophet Zechariah ( Zechariah 1:1 ,  7). He returned from Babylon ( Nehemiah 12:4 ). 
TROGYLLIUM|A town on the western coast of Asia Minor, where Paul "tarried" when on his way from Assos to Miletus, on his third missionary journey ( Acts 20:15 ). 
FLOWERS|Very few species of flowers are mentioned in the Bible although they abounded in Palestine. It has been calculated that in Western Syria and Palestine from two thousand to two thousand five hundred plants are found, of which about five hundred probably are British wild-flowers. Their beauty is often alluded to (Cant. 2:12;  Matthew 6:28 ). They are referred to as affording an emblem of the transitory nature of human life ( Job 14:2 ;  Psalm 103:15 ;  Isaiah 28:1 ;  40:6 ;  James 1:10 ). Gardens containing flowers and fragrant herbs are spoken of (Cant. 4:16;  6:2 ). 
JOAB|Jehovah is his father.  (1.) One of the three sons of Zeruiah, David's sister, and "captain of the host" during the whole of David's reign ( 2 Samuel 2:13 ;  10:7 ;  11:1 ;  1 Kings 11:15 ). His father's name is nowhere mentioned, although his sepulchre at Bethlehem is mentioned ( 2 Samuel 2:32 ). His two brothers were Abishai and Asahel, the swift of foot, who was killed by Abner ( 2 Samuel 2:13 -32), whom Joab afterwards treacherously murdered ( 3:22 -27). He afterwards led the assault at the storming of the fortress on Mount Zion, and for this service was raised to the rank of "prince of the king's army" ( 2 Samuel 5:6 -10;  1 Chronicles 27:34 ). His chief military achievements were, (1) against the allied forces of Syria and Ammon; (2) against Edom ( 1 Kings 11:15 ,  16); and (3) against the Ammonites ( 2 Samuel 10:7 -19;  11:1 ,  11). His character is deeply stained by the part he willingly took in the murder of Uriah ( 11:14 -25). He acted apparently from a sense of duty in putting Absalom to death ( 18:1 -14). David was unmindful of the many services Joab had rendered to him, and afterwards gave the command of the army to Amasa, Joab's cousin ( 2 Samuel 20:1 -13;  19:13 ). When David was dying Joab espoused the cause of Adonijah in preference to that of Solomon. He was afterwards slain by Benaiah, by the command of Solomon, in accordance with his father's injunction ( 2 Samuel 3:29 ;  20:5 -13), at the altar to which he had fled for refuge. Thus this hoary conspirator died without one to lift up a voice in his favour. He was buried in his own property in the "wilderness," probably in the north-east of Jerusalem ( 1 Kings 2:5 ,  28-34). Benaiah succeeded him as commander-in-chief of the army. (2.)  1 Chronicles 4:14 . (3.)  Ezra 2:6 . 
MAASEIAH|The work of Jehovah.  (1.) One of the Levites whom David appointed as porter for the ark ( 1 Chronicles 15:18 ,  20). (2.) One of the "captains of hundreds" associated with Jehoiada in restoring king Jehoash to the throne ( 2 Chronicles 23:1 ). (3.) The "king's son," probably one of the sons of king Ahaz, killed by Zichri in the invasion of Judah by Pekah, king of Israel ( 2 Chronicles 28:7 ). (4.) One who was sent by king Josiah to repair the temple ( 2 Chronicles 34:8 ). He was governor (Hebrews sar,  rendered elsewhere in the Authorized Version "prince, " "chief captain, " chief ruler") of Jerusalem. (5.) The father of the priest Zephaniah ( Jeremiah 21:1 ;  37:3 ). (6.) The father of the false prophet Zedekiah ( Jeremiah 29:21 ). Maase'iah, refuge is Jehovah, a priest, the father of Neriah ( Jeremiah 32:12 ;  51:59 ). 
BARJONA|Son of Jonah, the patronymic of Peter ( Matthew 16:17 ;  John 1:42 ), because his father's name was Jonas. (see  PETER .) 
METHEGAMMAH|Bridle of the mother, a figurative name for a chief city, as in  2 Samuel 8:1 , "David took Metheg-ammah out of the hand of the Philistines" (R.V.,  "took the bridle of the mother-city"); i.e., subdued their capital or strongest city, viz., Gath ( 1 Chronicles 18:1 ). 
HELED|This world, ( 1 Chronicles 11:30 ); called Heleb ( 2 Samuel 23:29 ). 
DIBLATHAIM|Two cakes, a city of Moab, on the east of the Dead Sea ( Numbers 33:46 ;  Jeremiah 48:22 ). 
ESAIAS|The Greek form for Isaiah, constantly used in the Authorized Version of the New Testament ( Matthew 3:3 ;  4:14 ), but in the Revised Version always "Isaiah." 
SERVITOR|Occurs only in  2 Kings 4:43 , Authorized Version (R.V.,  "servant"). The Hebrew word there rendered "servitor" is elsewhere rendered "minister," "servant" ( Exodus 24:13 ;  33:11 ). Probably Gehazi, the personal attendant on Elisha, is here meant. 
SOCHO|A fence; hedge, ( 1 Chronicles 4:18 ; R.V.,  Soco)=So'choh ( 1 Kings 4:10 ; R.V.,  Socoh), Sho'choh ( 1 Samuel 17:1 ; R.V.,  Socoh), Sho'co ( 2 Chronicles 11:7 ; R.V.,  Soco), Sho'cho ( 2 Chronicles 28:18 ; R.V.,  Soco), a city in the plain or lowland of Judah, where the Philistines encamped when they invaded Judah after their defeat at Michmash. It lay on the northern side of the valley of Elah (Wady es-Sunt). It has been identified with the modern Khurbet Shuweikeh, about 14 miles south-west of Jerusalem. In this campaign Goliath was slain, and the Philistines were completely routed. 
ENDS|   EARTH,  OF THE  See  EARTH, CORNERS OF THE .  ENDS OF THE EARTH  See  ASTRONOMY, sec . III, 2.
KISLEV|     kis'-lef (kiclew; the King James Version Chisleu, the Revised Version (British and American) "Chislev"): The 9th month of the Jewish year, corresponding to December. The word is found in  Nehemiah 1:1  and  Zechariah 7:1 . The derivation is uncertain.  See  CALENDAR .
MELCHI|My king.  (1.) The son of Addi, and father of Neri ( Luke 3:28 ).  (2.)  Luke 3:24 . 
HEPHER|A well or stream.  (1.) A royal city of the Canaanites taken by Joshua ( 12:17 ). (2.) The youngest son of Gilead ( Numbers 26:32 ;  27:1 ). (3.) The second son of Asher ( 1 Chronicles 4:6 ). (4.) One of David's heroes ( 1 Chronicles 11:36 ). 
ISPAH|     is'-pa.  See  ISHPAH .
PROCHORUS|     prok'-o-rus (Prochoros): One of "the seven" chosen by the Christian community in Jerusalem to superintend the dispensing of charity to the widows and other poor ( Acts 6:5 ). The name is Greek, and he may have been a Hellenist. According to tradition he became bishop of Nicomedia and died a martyr at Antioch.
ISHVI|     ish'-vi (yishwi, "equal"):  (1) The third son of Asher ( Genesis 46:17   1 Chronicles 7:30 ), and founder of the family of the Ishvites ( Numbers 26:44 , the King James Version "Jesuites"), the King James Version "Isui," "Jesui," and "Ishui."  (2) The name is also found among the sons of Saul ( 1 Samuel 14:49 ), the King James Version "Ishui."
PATHROS|The name generally given to Upper Egypt (the Thebaid of the Greeks), as distinguished from Matsor, or Lower Egypt ( Isaiah 11:11 ;  Jeremiah 44:1 ,  15;  Ezek. 30:14 ), the two forming Mizraim. After the destruction of Jerusalem by Nebuchadnezzar, colonies of Jews settled "in the country of Pathros" and other parts of Egypt. 
IZLIAH|   ; JEZLIAH  iz-li'-a (yizli'ah, "Yah delivers"; the King James Version): A son of Elpaal, of the tribe of Benjamin ( 1 Chronicles 8:18 ).
SEPHARVAIM|Taken by Sargon, king of Assyria ( 2 Kings 17:24 ;  18:34 ;  19:13 ;  Isaiah 37:13 ). It was a double city, and received the common name Sepharvaim, i.e., "the two Sipparas," or "the two booktowns." The Sippara on the east bank of the Euphrates is now called Abu-Habba; that on the other bank was Accad, the old capital of Sargon I., where he established a great library. (see  SARGON .) The recent discovery of cuneiform inscriptions at Tel el-Amarna in Egypt, consisting of official despatches to Pharaoh Amenophis IV. and his predecessor from their agents in Palestine, proves that in the century before the Exodus an active literary intercourse was carried on between these nations, and that the medium of the correspondence was the Babylonian language and script. (see  KIRJATH -SEPHER.) 
BENZOHETH|   BEN-ZOHETH  ben-zo'-heth (ben-zoheth, "son of Zoheth," from a Hebrew root meaning "to be strong(?)"): A son of Ishi of the house of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:20 ).
BUKKI|     buk'-i (buqqi, "mouth of Jah"):  (1) A Danite, son of the tribal prince Jogli ( Numbers 34:22 ); he was one of the representative chiefs who assisted in the division of the land.  (2) Son of Abishua and father of Izzi, a priest, fourth in descent from Aaron, in the line of Eleazar ( 1 Chronicles 6:5, 51 ), and ancestor of Ezra ( Ezra 7:4 ). In 2 Esdras 1:2 the name appears as Borith, and in 1 Esdras 8:2 as Boccas.
MATTAN|Gift.  (1.) A priest of Baal, slain before his altar during the reformation under Jehoiada ( 2 Kings 11:18 ). (2.) The son of Eleazar, and father of Jacob, who was the father of Joseph, the husband of the Virgin Mary ( Matthew 1:15 ). (3.) The father of Shephatiah ( Jeremiah 38:1 ). 
JADDAI|     jad'-i, jad'-a-i.  See  IDDO ;  JADAU .
IRU|     i'-roo (`iru): Eldest son of Caleb ( 1 Chronicles 4:15 ); probably to be read Ir, the syllable "-u" being the conjunction "and" belonging to the following word.
TOPHETH|     to'-feth (ha-topheth, etymology uncertain; the most probable is its connection with a root meaning "burning"-the "place of burning"; the King James Version, Tophet, except in  2 Kings 23:10 ): The references are to such a place: "They have built the high places of Topheth, which is in the valley of the son of Hinnom, to burn their sons and their daughters in the fire" ( Jeremiah 7:31 ). On account of this abomination Topheth and the Valley of Hinnom should be called "The valley of Slaughter: for they shall bury in Topheth, till there be no place to bury," the Revised Version margin "because there shall be no place else" ( Jeremiah 7:32 ); see also  Jeremiah 19:6, 12, 13, 14 . Josiah is said to have "defiled Topheth" as part of his great religious reforms ( 2 Kings 23:10 ). The site of this shameful place would seem to have been either at the lower end of the Valley of Hinnom (see HINNOM, VALLEY OF), near where Akeldama is now pointed out, or in the open ground where this valley joins the Kidron.  E. W. G. Masterman
SYCHEM|see  SHECHEM . 
KADMONITE|     kad'-mon-it (qadhmoni; Kedmonaioi, signifies "the Easterner," or, less probably, "one of the ancient race"): The Kadmonites are mentioned in  Genesis 15:19  along with the Kenites and Kenizzites of Edom, and are doubtless the same as "the children of the east," whose wisdom was celebrated ( 1 Kings 4:30 ). qedhemah, "the East," was a son of Ishmael ( Genesis 25:15 ; compare  Genesis 25:6 ). In an Egyptian story describing the adventures of a political refugee who fled from Egypt in the time of the XIIth Dynasty, it is said that he found a refuge in Canaan in the land of Kaduma or Kedem.  A. H. Sayce
SYMEON|     sim'-e-on (Sumeon): the Revised Version (British and American) in  Luke 3:30   Acts 13:1 ;  Acts 15:14  for the King James Version "Simeon" (which see). The persons are:  (1) An ancestor of Jesus ( Luke 3:30 ).  (2) Symeon, called Niger, one of the prophets and teachers in the church at Antioch ( Acts 13:1 ).  (3) For Simon Peter, see PETER; compare  Acts 15:14 .  See  SIMEON, (4), (5), (6) .
RAISINS|Dried grapes; mentioned  1 Samuel 25:18 ;  30:12 ;  2 Samuel 16:1 ;  1 Chronicles 12:40 . 
SHAHAZUMAH|     sha-ha-zoo'-ma, sha-haz'-oo-ma (shachatsumah; Codex Vaticanus Saleim kata thalassan; Codex Alexandrinus Saseimath; the King James Version Shahazimah, sha-haz'i-mah): A town in the territory of Issachar on the boundary which ran from Tabor to the Jordan ( Joshua 19:22 ). The site, which has not yet been recovered, must be sought, probably, to the Southeast of the mountain.
PISON|Babylonian, the current, broad-flowing, one of the "four heads" into which the river which watered the garden of Eden was divided ( Genesis 2:11 ). Some identify it with the modern Phasis, others with the Halys, others the Jorak or Acampis, others the Jaab, the Indus, the Ganges, etc. 
JASHEN|Sleeping, called also Hashem ( 1 Chronicles 11:34 ); a person, several of whose sons were in David's body-guard ( 2 Samuel 23:32 ). 
EVILMERODACH|Merodach's man, the son and successor of Nebuchadnezzar, king of Babylon ( 2 Kings 25:27 ;  Jeremiah 52:31 ,  34). He seems to have reigned but two years (B.C. 562-560). Influenced probably by Daniel, he showed kindness to Jehoiachin, who had been a prisoner in Babylon for thirty-seven years. He released him, and "spoke kindly to him." He was murdered by Nergal-sharezer=Neriglissar, his brother-in-law, who succeeded him ( Jeremiah 39:3 ,  13). 
LEHABIM|     le-ha'-bim (lehdbhim): Named in  Genesis 10:13   1 Chronicles 1:11  as descendants of Mizraim. They are probably to be identified with the LUBIM (which see), and the one word may be a corruption of the other.
WITHES|   , WITHS, GREEN  withs, (yetharim lachim, margin "new bowstrings," the King James Version margin "new (moist) cords" ( Judges 16:7 ); Septuagint neura hugra): The material with which Samson was bound by Delilah ( Judges 16:8 ) was probably some moist "gut" such as was used for bowstrings. Compare metharim, "bowstrings" ( Psalm 21:12 ; yether,  Job 30:11   Psalm 11:2 ); lahim, translated "green," means "fresh," "sappy" or "moist."
JESHIMON|The waste, probably some high waste land to the south of the Dead Sea ( Numbers 21:20 ;  23:28 ;  1 Samuel 23:19 ,  24); or rather not a proper name at all, but simply "the waste" or "wilderness," the district on which the plateau of Ziph (q.v.) looks down. 
MERIBBAAL|Contender with Baal, ( 1 Chronicles 8:34 ;  9:40 ), elsewhere called Mephibosheth ( 2 Samuel 4:4 ), the son of Jonathan. 
REGEM|     re'-gem (reghem, "friend" (?)): A Calebite, the son of Jahdai ( 1 Chronicles 2:47 ), mentioned as the eponym of a Calebite family or clan.
TIMAEUS|Defiled, the father of blind Bartimaeus ( Mark 10:46 ). 
CHILEAB|Protected by the father, David's second son by Abigail ( 2 Samuel 3:3 ); called also Daniel ( 1 Chronicles 3:1 ). He seems to have died when young. 
IYEABARIM|   IYE-ABARIM  i-ye-ab'-a-rim (`iye ha-`abharim, "the heaps of the Abarim"; the King James Version Ije-abarim; in  Numbers 21:11  the Septuagint reads Codex Vaticanus, Chalglei): A place in the journeyings of Israel named after Oboth, said to be "in the wilderness which is before Moab, toward the sunrising" ( Numbers 21:11 ), "in the border of Moab" ( Numbers 33:44 ). The indications of position here given are not sufficient to guide to any identification, and, so far, nothing has been discovered in the district to help us. Called simply "Iyim" (the King James Version "Iim") in  Numbers 33:45 .
KIRJATHAIM|Two cities; a double city.  (1.) A city of refuge in Naphtali ( 1 Chronicles 6:76 ). (2.) A town on the east of Jordan ( Genesis 14:5 ;  Deuteronomy 2:9 ,  10). It was assigned to the tribe of Reuben ( Numbers 32:37 ). In the time of Ezekiel ( 25:9 ) it was one of the four cities which formed the "glory of Moab" (Comp.  Jeremiah 48:1 ,  23). It has been identified with el-Kureiyat, 11 miles south-west of Medeba, on the south slope of Jebel Attarus, the ancient Ataroth. 
BEZALEEL|In the shadow of God; i.e., "under his protection", the artificer who executed the work of art in connection with the tabernacle in the wilderness ( Exodus 31:2 ;  35:30 ). He was engaged principally in works of metal, wood, and stone; while Aholiab, who was associated with him and subordinate to him, had the charge of the textile fabrics ( 36:1 ,  2;  38:22 ). He was of the tribe of Judah, the son of Uri, and grandson of Hur ( 31:2 ). Mention is made in  Ezra 10:30  of another of the same name. 
JAHZIEL|   JAHZEEL AND   ja'-ze-el (yachtse'el, "God divides," "apportions"): In  Genesis 46:24   Numbers 26:48 ; and 23 manuscripts in  1 Chronicles 7:13 ; (yachatsi'el, same meaning as above):  1 Chronicles 7:13 , a "son" (clan) of Naphtali.  JAHZIEL  ja'-zi-el.  See  JAHZEEL AND JAHZIEL .
THORNS|   CROWN OF   thornz (akdnthinos stephanos): Three of the four evangelists mention the crown of thorns, wherewith the rude Roman soldiers derided the captive Christ ( Matthew 27:29   Mark 15:17   John 19:2 ). All speak of the akanthine (Acanthus) crown, but there is no certainty about the peculiar plant, from the branches of which this crown of cruel mockery was plaited. The rabbinical books. mention no less than twenty-two words in the Bible signifying thorny plants, and the word akantha in the New Testament Greek is a generic and not a specific term. And this word or its adjective is used in the three Gospels, quoted above. It is therefore impossible definitely to determine what was the exact plant or tree, whose thorny branches were selected for this purpose. Tobler (Denkbl., 113, 179) inclines to the Spina Christi, as did Hasselquist. Its botanical name is Zizyphus Spina Christi, It is very common in the East. Its spines are small and sharp, its branches soft, round and pliable, and the leaves look like ivy, with a dark, shiny green color, making them therefore very adaptable to the purpose of the soldiers. Others have designated the Paliurus aculeatus or the Lycium horridum. Both Geikie (Life of Christ, 549) and Farrar (Life of Christ, note 625) point to the Nubk (Zizyphus lotus). Says the latter, "The Nubk struck me, as it has all travelers in Palestine, as being most suitable both for mockery and pain, since its leaves are bright and its thorns singularly strong. But though the Nubk is very common on the shores of Galilee, I saw none of it near Jerusalem." The settlement of the question is manifestly impossible.  Henry E. Dosker
SMITH|  Access the topical results on the Bible Search:  
SENUAH|     se-nu'-a, sen'-u-a (cenu'ah): In the King James Version "A Benjamite" ( Nehemiah 11:9 ); the Revised Version (British and American) has "Hassenuah," transliterating the definite article the King James Version is to be preferred (compare  1 Chronicles 9:7 ).
PELONITE|     pel'-o-nit, pe'-lo-nit, pe-lo'-nit (peloni, a place-name): Two of David's heroes are thus described: (1) "Helez the Pelonite" ( 1 Chronicles 11:27 ) (see PALTITE); and (2) "Ahijah the Pelonite" ( 1 Chronicles 11:36 ).
IZHARITES|     iz'-har-its (yitshari): The descendants of Izhar, son of Kohath, and grandson of Levi ( Numbers 3:19, 27 ). In David's reign some of these were "over the treasures of the house of Yahweh" ( 1 Chronicles 26:23 ), others "were for the outward business over Israel, for officers and judges" (ibid., 26:29).
HANNAH|Favour, grace, one of the wives of Elkanah the Levite, and the mother of Samuel ( 1 Samuel 1 ; 2). Her home was at Ramathaim-zophim, whence she was wont every year to go to Shiloh, where the tabernacle had been pitched by Joshua, to attend the offering of sacrifices there according to the law ( Exodus 23:15 ;  34:18 ;  Deuteronomy 16:16 ), probably at the feast of the Passover (Comp.  Exodus 13:10 ). On occasion of one of these "yearly" visits, being grieved by reason of Peninnah's conduct toward her, she went forth alone, and kneeling before the Lord at the sanctuary she prayed inaudibly. Eli the high priest, who sat at the entrance to the holy place, observed her, and misunderstanding her character he harshly condemned her conduct ( 1 Samuel 1:14 -16). After hearing her explanation he retracted his injurious charge and said to her, "Go in peace: and the God of Israel grant thee thy petition." Perhaps the story of the wife of Manoah was not unknown to her. Thereafter Elkanah and his family retired to their quiet home, and there, before another Passover, Hannah gave birth to a son, whom, in grateful memory of the Lord's goodness, she called Samuel, i.e., "heard of God." After the child was weaned (probably in his third year) she brought him to Shiloh into the house of the Lord, and said to Eli the aged priest, "Oh my lord, I am the woman that stood by thee here, praying unto the Lord. For this child I prayed; and the Lord hath given me my petition which I asked of him: therefore I also have granted him to the Lord; as long as he liveth he is granted to the Lord" ( 1 Samuel 1:27 ,  28,  R.V.). Her gladness of heart then found vent in that remarkable prophetic song ( 2:1 -10; Comp.  Luke 1:46 -55) which contains the first designation of the Messiah under that name ( 1 Samuel 2:10 ,  "Annointed" = "Messiah"). And so Samuel and his parents parted. He was left at Shiloh to minister "before the Lord." And each year, when they came up to Shiloh, Hannah brought to her absent child "a little coat" (Hebrews meil,  a term used to denote the "robe" of the ephod worn by the high priest,   Exodus 28:31 ), a priestly robe, a long upper tunic ( 1 Chronicles 15:27 ), in which to minister in the tabernacle ( 1 Samuel 2:19 ;  15:27 ;  Job 2:12 ). "And the child Samuel grew before the Lord." After Samuel, Hannah had three sons and two daughters. 
ITHRITE|Two of David's warriors so designated ( 2 Samuel 23:38 ;  1 Chronicles 11:40 ). 
HARUM|Elevated, ( 1 Chronicles 4:8 ), a descendant of Judah. 
MAHANEHDAN|Judges 18:12 = "camp of Dan" 13:25 (R.V.,  "Mahaneh-dan"), a place behind (i.e.,  west of) Kirjath-jearim, where the six hundred Danites from Zorah and Eshtaol encamped on their way to capture the city of Laish, which they rebuilt and called "Dan, after the name of their father" ( 18:11 -31). The Palestine Explorers point to a ruin called `Erma, situated about 3 miles from the great corn valley on the east of Samson's home. 
PISGAH|A part, a mountain summit in the land of Moab, in the territory of Reuben, where Balak offered up sacrifices ( Numbers 21:20 ;  23:14 ), and from which Moses viewed the promised land ( Deuteronomy 3:27 ). It is probably the modern Jebel Siaghah. (see  NEBO .) 
ESHTEMOA|Obedience, a town in the mountains of Judah ( Joshua 21:14 ;  1 Chronicles 6:57 ), which was allotted, with the land round it, to the priests. It was frequented by David and his followers during their wanderings; and he sent presents of the spoil of the Amalekites to his friends there ( 1 Samuel 30:28 ). It is identified with es-Semu'a, a village about 3 1/2 miles east of Socoh, and 7 or 8 miles south of Hebron, around which there are ancient remains of the ruined city. It is the centre of the "south country" or Negeb. It is also called "Eshtemoh" ( Joshua 15:50 ). 
CHAINS|   CHAIN;   chan, chanz: Chains were used by the Hebrews:  (1) As ornaments: 'ets`adhah, neTiphah, `anaq, rabhidh, sharsherah, rattoq. As ornaments for the person they were worn about the ankles ( Numbers 31:50   Isaiah 3:20 ) and about the neck ( Songs 4:9   Ezekiel 16:11 ). They were used as ornaments for the ephod and breastplate of the high priest ( Exodus 28:14 ;  Exodus 39:15 ). These chains were of pure gold. Solomon placed chains before the oracle in the temple ( 1 Kings 6:21 ), and these were also of pure gold. They were used as ornaments for graven images ( Isaiah 40:19 ) and around the necks of prized animals. This was true of the camels taken from the Midianites by Gideon ( Judges 8:21, 26 ).  (2) As marks of distinction: rabhidh, hamunekh (hamnikh): That seems to be true of the chain which Pharaoh placed about the neck of Joseph ( Genesis 41:42 ), and of the one which the king of Babylon promised to the wise men ( Daniel 5:7 ).  (3) As means of confining prisoners: nechosheth; halusis: A number of passages that were translated "chains" in the King James Version are translated "fetters" in the Revised Version (British and American) (see  Judges 16:21   2 Samuel 3:34 ). Among the Romans the prisoner was chained to one or two guards ( Acts 12:6, 7 ;  Acts 21:33   Ephesians 6:20   2 Timothy 1:16 ). These chains were perhaps made of copper or an alloy of copper and tin.  (4) As a figurative expression: `anaq. The Psalmist likens pride to a chain about the neck ( Psalm 73:6 ), and in Proverbs it is stated that the young man who hears the instruction of his father and forsakes not the law of his mother shall find that they are chains about his neck ( Proverbs 1:9 ). In  Revelation 20:1  the angel is described as descending with a great chain in his hand. According to the King James Version Peter speaks of the fallen angels as having been delivered into "chains of darkness" ( 2 Peter 2:4 ), seira, and Jude speaks of them as being reserved in "everlasting chains" ( Jude 1:6 , the Revised Version (British and American) "bonds"), desmos.  See also  PUNISHMENTS .  A. W. Fortune
CINNEROTH|     sin'-e-roth (kinneroth).  See  CHINNERETH .
IZRAHITE|The designation of one of David's officers ( 1 Chronicles 27:8 ). 
TORMAH|     tor'-ma (tormah, "fraud"; Codex Vaticanus en kruphe, "in secret," Codex Alexandrinus meta doron, "with gifts"): This name is given in EVm as an alternative to "privily," or "craftily" the Revised Version (British and American) ( Judges 9:31 ). There is no knowledge of such a place. The text is corrupt.
MAHARAI|     ma-har'-a-i, ma'-ha-ri (maharay, "impetuous"): One of David's "braves" ( 2 Samuel 23:28   1 Chronicles 11:30 ;  1 Chronicles 27:13 ). He was one of the 12 monthly captains of David's administration, and took the 10th month in rotation. He was of the family of Zerah, and dwelt in Netophah in Judah.
JAAKOBAH|Heel-catcher, a form of the name Jacob, one of the descendants of Simeon ( 1 Chronicles 4:36 ). 
SHAULITES|   SHAUL;   sha'-ul, sha'-ul-its (sha'ul; Saoul):  (1) A king of Edom ( Genesis 36:37  =  1 Chronicles 1:48 ).  (2) A son of Simeon ( Genesis 46:10   Exodus 6:15   Numbers 26:13   1 Chronicles 4:24 ). The clan was of notoriously impure stock, and, therefore, Shaul is called "the son of a Canaanitish woman" ( Genesis 46:10   Exodus 6:15 ); the clan was of mixed Israelite and Canaanitish descent. The patronymic Shaulites is found in  Numbers 26:13 .  (3) An ancestor of Samuel ( 1 Chronicles 6:24 (Hebrew 9 )); in  1 Chronicles 6:36  he is called "Joel."
BOATS|   SHIPS AND   " I. THE HEBREWS AND THE SEA  II. SHIPS IN THE OLD TESTAMENT AND THE APOCRYPHA  1. Among the Hebrews  (1) In Early Times  (2) During the Monarchy  (3) In Later Times  2. Among Neighboring Nations  (1) Egypt  (2) Assyria and Babylonia  (3) Phoenicia  3. General References  III. SHIPS IN THE NEW TESTAMENT  1. In the Gospels  2. In the Acts of the Apostles  3. In Other Books  LITERATURE  In the Old Testament the following words are found:  (1) The word most commonly used in Hebrew for "a ship" is 'oniyah ( Proverbs 30:19   Jonah 1:3, 4 ), of which the plural 'oniyoth is found most frequently ( Judges 5:17   1 Kings 22:48 f , and many other places).  The collective term for "a navy of ships" is 'oni ( 1 Kings 9:26 ;  1 Kings 10:22 , 'oni Tharshish, "a navy (of ships) of Tarshish"; but  Isaiah 33:21 , 'oni shayit, a "galley with oars").  (2) tsi ( Numbers 24:24   Ezekiel 30:9   Isaiah 33:21 ), tsi 'addir, "gallant ship";  Daniel 11:30 , tsiyim Kittim, "ships of Kittim.'  (3) cephinah, "innermost parts of the ship" the Revised Version (British and American), "sides of the ship" the King James Version ( Jonah 1:5 , the only place where the word is found).  In Apocrypha ploion, is the usual word (The Wisdom of Solomon 14:1; Ecclesiasticus 33:2, etc.), translated "vessel" in The Wisdom of Solomon 14:1, but "ship" elsewhere. For "ship" The Wisdom of Solomon 5:10 has naus. "Boat" in 2 Maccabees 12:3, 6 is for skaphos, and "navy" in 1 Maccabees 1:17; 2 Maccabees 12:9; 14:1 for stolos. In The Wisdom of Solomon 14:6 Noah's ark is called a schedia, a "clumsy ship" (the literal translation "raft" in the Revised Version (British and American) is impossible).  In the New Testament there are four words in use:  (1) naus ( Acts 27:41 , the only place where it occurs, designating the large sea-going vessel in which Paul suffered shipwreck).  (2) ploiarion, "a little boat" ( Mark 3:9  and two other places,  John 6:22 ; 21:8).  (3) ploion, "boat" ( Matthew 4:21, 22  and many other places in the Gospels-the ordinary fishingboat of the Sea of Galilee rendered "boat" uniformly in the Revised Version (British and American) instead of "ship" the King James Version), "ship" ( Acts 20:13 , and all other places where the ship carrying Paul is mentioned, except  Acts 27:41 , as above). In  James 3:4   Revelation 8:9 ;  Revelation 18:17 ;, it is rendered "ship."  (4) skaphe, "boat" ( Acts 27:16, 30, 32 , where it means the small boat of the ship in which Paul was being conveyed as a prisoner to Rome).  Cognate expressions are: "shipmen," 'anshe 'oniyoth ( 1 Kings 9:27 ); nautai ( Acts 27:27, 30  the King James Version, "sailors" the Revised Version (British and American)); "mariners," mallachim ( Jonah 1:15   Ezekiel 27:9, 27, 29 ), shaTim ( Ezekiel 27:8  the King James Version, "rowers" the Revised Version (British and American);  Ezekiel 27:26 , the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American)); "pilot," chobhel ( Jonah 1:6   Ezekiel 27:8, 27, 28, 29 ); "sailing," "voyage," plous ( Acts 21:7 ;  Acts 27:9, 10 , the Revised Version (British and American) "voyage" in all verses).  I. The Hebrews and the Sea.  The Hebrews were a pastoral and agricultural people, and had no inducements to follow a seafaring life. They were possessed of a considerable seaboard along the Mediterranean, but the character of their coast gave little encouragement to navigation. The coast line of the land of Israel from Carmel southward had no bays and no estuaries or river-mouths to offer shelter from storm or to be havens of ships. Solomon landed his timber and other materials for the Temple at Joppa, and tradition has handed down what is called "Solomon's Harbor" there. The builders of the second temple also got timber from Lebanon and conveyed it to Joppa. It was Simon Maccabeus, however, who built its harbor, and the harbor at Joppa was "the first and only harbor of the Jews" (G. A. Smith, HGHL, 136). Caesarea in New Testament times was a place of shipping and possessed a harbor which Josephus declared to be greater than the Piraeus, but it was Herodian and more Greek and Roman than Jewish. It was mostly inhabited by Greeks (Josephus, BJ, III, ix, 1). Now Caesarea has disappeared; and Joppa has only an open roadstead where vessels lie without shelter, and receive and discharge cargo and passengers by means of boats plying between them and the shore. It was in other directions that Israel made acquaintance with the activities of the sea. Of internal navigation, beyond the fishing-boats on the Sea of Galilee which belong exclusively to the New Testament, the ferry boat on the Jordan ( 2 Samuel 19:18 , `abharah) alone receives notice, and even that is not perfectly clear (the Revised Version margin "convoy," but a "ford" is doubtless meant). It is from Tyre and Egypt and even Assyria and Babylonia, rather than from their own waters, that the Hebrew prophets and psalmists drew their pictures of seafaring life.  II. Ships in the Old Testament and Apocrypha.  1. Among the Hebrews:  (1) In Early Times.  In the early books of the Old Testament there are references connecting certain of the tribes, and these northern tribes, with the activities of the sea. In the "Blessing of Jacob" and in the "Blessing of Moses" Zebulun and Issachar are so connected ( Genesis 49:13   Deuteronomy 33:19 ); and in Deborah's Song, which is acknowledged to be a very early fragment of Hebrew literature, Dan and Asher are also spoken of as connected with the life and work of the sea ( Judges 5:17 ). The Oracle of Balaam ( Numbers 24:24 ) looks forward to a day when a fleet from Kittim should take the sea for the destruction of Assyria. "Ships of Kittim" are mentioned in Daniel (11:30). Kittim is referred to in the three greater Prophets ( Isaiah 23:1, 12   Jeremiah 2:10   Ezekiel 27:6 ). The land of Kittim is Cyprus, and in the references in Isaiah it is associated with Tyre and the ships of Tarshish.  (2) During the Monarchy.  It is not till the time of the monarchy that the Hebrews begin to figure as a commercial people. Already in the time of David commercial relations had been established between Israel and Tyre ( 2 Samuel 5:11 f ). The friendly cooperation was continued by Solomon, who availed himself not only of the cedar and the fir at Hiram's command on Lebanon, but also of the skilled service of Hiram's men to bring the timber from the mountains to the sea. Hiram also undertook to make the cedar and the fir into rafts ( 1 Kings 5:9 , dobheroth, the King James Version "floats";  2 Chronicles 2:16 , raphcodhoth, "flotes" the King James Version, "floats" the Revised Version (British and American)) to go by sea and to deliver them to Solomon's men at the place appointed, which the Chronicler tells us was Joppa. From this cooperation in the building of the Temple there grew up a larger connection in the pursuit of sea-borne commerce. It was at Ezion-geber near to Eloth on the Red Sea, in the land of Edom which David had conquered, that Solomon built his fleet, "a navy of ships" ( 1 Kings 9:26-28 ). Hiram joined Solomon in these enterprises which had their center on the Red Sea, and thus the Phoenicians had water communication with the coasts of Arabia and Africa, and even of India. The same partnership existed for the commerce of the West. "For the king (Solomon) had at sea a navy of Tarshish with the navy of Hiram: once every three years came the navy of Tarshish, bringing gold, and silver, ivory, and apes, and peacocks" ( 1 Kings 10:22 ).  Tarshish is the name of the Phoenician colony on the river Tartessus, called also Baetis, the modern Guadalquivir. It was the farthest limit of the western world as known to the Hebrews. Attempts have been made to identify it with Tarsus of Cilicia, but they are not convincing. It is conceived of in Hebrew literature as remote ( Isaiah 66:19   Jonah 1:3 ;  Jonah 4:2 ), as rich ( Psalm 72:10   Jeremiah 10:9 ), as powerful in commerce ( Ezekiel 38:13 ). Ships of Tarshish were no doubt ships actually built for the Tarshish trade ( 2 Chronicles 20:36   Jonah 1:3 ), but the expression became a general designation for large sea-going vessels to any quarter. Ships of Tarshish made a deep impression upon the imagination of the Hebrew people. The Psalmist takes it as a proof of the power of Yahweh that He breaks the ships of Tarshish with an east wind ( Psalm 48:7 ). Isaiah includes them among the great and lofty objects of power and glory which the terror of the Lord would certainly overtake ( Isaiah 2:16 ). Ezekiel regards them as the caravans that bore the merchandise of the mistress of the sea ( Ezekiel 27:25 ). It is in ships of Tarshish that the prophet of the Return sees the exiles borne in crowds to Jerusalem as their natural home ( Isaiah 60:9 ).  From Solomon's time onward the kings of Judah retained their hold upon Eloth ( 1 Kings 22:48   2 Chronicles 20:35-37 ) till it was seized by the Syrians in the days of Ahaz ( 2 Kings 16:6 ).  (3) In Later Times.  As Solomon had the cooperation of Hiram in securing material and craftsmen for the building of the first Temple, so Joshua and Zerubbabel by the favor of Cyrus obtained timber from Lebanon, and masons and carpenters from Sidon and Tyre for the building of the second. Again, cedar trees were brought from Lebanon by sea to Joppa, and thence conveyed to Jerusalem ( Ezra 3:7 ).  From Joppa Jonah fled to avoid compliance with God's command to go to Nineveh and preach repentance there ( Jonah 1:1 ). He found a ship bound for Tarshish as far toward the West as Nineveh to the East. The fare (cakhar) paid by him as a passenger, the hold of the ship in which he stowed himself away (cephinah), the crew (mallachim) the captain or shipmaster (rabh ha-chobhel), the storm, the angry sea, the terrified mariners and their cry to their gods, and the casting of Jonah overboard to appease the raging waters-all make a lifelike picture.  It was in the time of Simon, the last survivor of the Maccabean brothers, that Joppa became a seaport with a harbor for shipping-"Amid all his glory he took Joppa for a haven, and made it an entrance for the isles of the sea" (1 Maccabees 14:5). When Simon reared his monument over the sepulcher of his father and brothers at Modin, he set up seven pyramids with pillars, upon which were carved figures of ships to be "seen of all that sail on the sea" (1 Maccabees 13:29). About this period we hear of ships in naval warfare. When Antiochus IV Epiphanes planned his expedition against Egypt, he had with other armaments "a great navy," presumably ships of war (1 Maccabees 1:17); and at a later time Antiochus VII speaks expressly of "ships of war" (1 Maccabees 15:3).  2. Among Neighboring Nations:  (1) Egypt.  The Egyptians, like other nations of antiquity, had a great horror of the open sea, although they were expert enough in managing their craft upon the Nile. Pharaoh-necoh built up a powerful navy to serve him both in commerce and in war.  See PHARAOH-NECOH .  Of explicit references to Egyptian ships in the Old Testament there are but few. Isaiah speaks of "vessels of papyrus upon the waters" of the Upper Nile, on board of which are the messengers of Cush or Ethiopia returning to tell the tidings of the overthrow of Assyria to the inhabitants of those remote lands (18:2 the King James Version has "bulrushes" instead of "papyrus"). Ezekiel also, foretelling the overthrow of Egypt, speaks of messengers traveling with the news on swift Nile boats to strike terror into the hearts of the "careless Ethiopians" (30:9). When Job compares his days to "the swift ships" ("the ships of reed" the Revised Version margin), the allusion is most likely to Egypt's, these being skiffs with a wooden keel and the rest of bulrushes, sufficient to carry one person, or at most two, and light, to travel swiftly (9:26).  (2) Assyria and Babylonia.  The Assyrians and Babylonians were mainly an inland people, but their rivers gave them considerable scope for navigation. The Assyrian monuments contain representations of naval engagements and of operations on the seacoast. When Isaiah pictures Yahweh as a better defense of Judah than the rivers and streams of Assyria and Egypt are to their people he says, "There Yahweh will be with us in majesty, a place of broad rivers and streams, wherein shall go no galley with oars ('oni shayiT), neither shall gallant ship (tsi 'addir) pass thereby..... Thy tacklings (ropes, cables) are loosed; they could not strengthen the foot of their mast, they could not spread the sail" ( Isaiah 33:21, 23 ). Speaking of Yahweh's wonders to be performed toward His people after Babylon had been overthrown, the prophet declares: "Thus saith Yahweh, your Redeemer, the Holy One of Israel: For your sake I have sent to Babylon, and I will bring down all of them as fugitives, even the Chaldeans, in the ships of their rejoicing" ( Isaiah 43:14 ). In this case, however, the ships are not war ships, but more probably merchant ships, or ships for pleasure, sailing in the Euphrates.  (3) Phoenicia.  It was from the Phoenicians that the Mediterranean peoples learned seamanship and skill in navigation. It is fitting, therefore, that in his dirge over the downfall of the mistress of the sea, Ezekiel should represent Tyre as a gallant ship, well built, well furnished, and well manned, broken by the seas in the depths of the waters, fallen into the heart of the seas in the day of her ruin. Ezekiel's description (chapter 27, with Davidson's notes) brings together more of the features of the ship of antiquity than any other that has come down to us. Her builders have made her perfect in beauty with planks of fir or cypress, mast of cedar, oars of the oak of Bashan, benches or deck of ivory inlaid with boxwood, sail of fine linen with broidered work from Egypt, and an awning of blue and purple from the coastlands of Elisha (possibly Sicily). She is manned with oarsmen of Sidon and Arvad, pilots of the wise men of Tyre, calkers from Gebal to stop up the cracks and seams in her timbers, mariners and men of war from other lands who enhanced her beauty by hanging up the shield and helmet within her. She is freighted with the most varied cargo, the produce of the lands around, her customers, or as they are called, her traffickers, being Tarshish in the far West, Sheba and Arabia in the South, Haran and Asshur in the East, Javan, which is Greece, and Togarmah, which is Armenia, in the North. One or two of the particulars of this description may be commented upon.  (a) As regards rigging, the Phoenician ships of the time of Ezekiel, as seen in Assyrian representations, had one mast with one yard and carried a square sail. Egyptian ships on the Red Sea about the time of the Exodus, from reliefs of the XIXth Dynasty, had one mast and two yards, and carried also one large square sail. The masts and yards were made of fir, or of pine, and the sails of linen, but the fiber of papyrus was employed as well as flax in the manufacture of sail-cloth. The sail had also to serve "for an ensign" (lenes,  Ezekiel 27:7 ). "The flag proper," says Davidson (ad loc.), "seems not to have been used in ancient navigation; its purpose was served by the sail, as for example at the battle of Actium the ship of Antony was distinguished by its purple sail."  (b) As regards the crew, in the two-banked Phoenician ship the rowers of the first bank work their oars over the gunwale, and those of the second through portholes lower down, so that each may have free play for his oar. The calkers were those who filled up seams or cracks in the timbers with tow and covered them over with tar or wax, after the manner of the instruction given to Noah regarding the Ark: "Thou.... shalt pitch it within and without with pitch" ( Genesis 6:14 ).  (c) As regards cargo, it is to be noted that "the persons of men," that is, slaves, formed an article of merchandise in which Javan, Tubal, and Meshech, countries to the North, traded with Tyre.  3. General References:  Of general references to shipping and seafaring life there are comparatively few in the Old Testament. In his great series of Nature-pictures in  Psalm 104 , the Psalmist finds a place for the sea and ships (104:25;), and in  Psalm 107  there is a picture of the storm overtaking them that go down to the sea in ships, and of the deliverance that comes to them when God "bringeth" them into their desired haven" (107:23;). In the Book of Proverbs the ideal woman who brings her food from far is like "the merchant ships" (31:14). In the same book the drunkard, because of his unnatural insensibility to danger, is likened to a man "that lieth down in the midst of the sea, or as he that lieth upon the top of a mast" (23:34); and among the inscrutable things of the world the writer includes "the way of a ship in the midst of the sea" (30:19). In Wisdom, human life is described "as a ship passing through the billowy water, whereof, when it is gone by, there is no trace to be found, neither pathway of its keel in the billows" (Wisd 5:10). The same book notes it as a striking example of the case of a divine and beneficent Providence that "men entrust their lives to a little piece of wood, and passing through the surge on a raft are brought safe to land" (Wisd 14:1-5). The Jews like the Egyptians and the Assyrians had a natural shrinking from the sea, and Ecclesiasticus interprets their feeling when he says: "They that sail on the sea tell of the danger thereof; and when we hear it with our ears, we marvel" (43:24).  III. Ships in the New Testament.  1. In the Gospels:  It is the fishing-boats of the Sea of Galilee which exclusively occupy attention in the Gospels. In the time of our Lord's ministry in Galilee the shores of the Sea were densely peopled, and there must have been many boats engaged in the fishing industry. Bethsaida at the northern end of the Lake and Tarichea at the southern end were great centers of the trade. The boats were probably of a size and build similar to the few employed on the Lake today, which are between 20 and 30 ft. in length and 7 ft. in breadth. The word "launch," of putting a boat or a ship into the sea, has disappeared from the Revised Version (British and American), except in  Luke 8:22 , where it is more appropriate to an inland lake. They were propelled by oars, but no doubt also made use of the sail when the wind was favorable ( Luke 8:23 ), though the pictures which we have in the Gospels are mostly of the boatmen toiling in rowing in the teeth of a gale ( Mark 6:48 ), and struggling with the threatening waves ( Matthew 14:24 ). In the boat on which Jesus and the disciples were crossing the Lake after the feeding of the 5,000, Jesus was in the stern "asleep on the cushion" ( Mark 4:38 , the King James Version "a pillow"; Greek proskephalaion, "headrest"). More than once Jesus made special use of a boat. As He was by the seashore a great concourse of people from all parts made it desirable that "a small boat" (ploiarion) should be in attendance off the shore to receive Him in case of need, though He does not seem to have required it ( Mark 3:9 ). On another occasion, when the crowds were still greater, He went into a boat and sat "in the sea" with the multitude on the sloping beach before Him ( Mark 4:1   Luke 5:3 ). This boat is said in Luke's narrative to have been Simon's, and it seems from references to it as "the boat" on other occasions to have been generally at the disposal of Jesus.  2. In the Acts of the Apostles:  It is Paul's voyages which yield us the knowledge that we possess from Biblical sources of ships in New Testament times. They are recorded for us in the Acts by Luke, who, as Sir William Ramsay puts it, had the true Greek feeling for the sea (St. Paul the Traveler, 21). In Luke's writings there are many nautical terms, peculiar to him, used with great exactitude and precision.  When Paul had appealed to Caesar and was proceeding to Rome in charge of Julius, the centurion, along with other prisoners, a ship of Adramyttium, a coasting vessel, carried the party from Caesarea along the Syrian coast, northward of Cyprus, past Cilicia and Pamphylia, to Myra of Lycia. There the centurion found a ship of Alexandria sailing for Italy, one of the great corn fleet carrying grain from Egypt for the multitudes of Rome. (After the capture of Jerusalem the emperor Titus returned to Italy in such a vessel, touching at Rhegium and landing at Puteoil.) The size of the vessel is indicated by the fact that there were 276 persons on board, crew and passengers all told ( Acts 27:37 ). Luke has made no note of the name of this or of the previous vessels in which Paul had voyaged. Of the presumably larger vessel, also an Alexandrian corn ship bound for Rome, which had wintered in Melita, and which afterward took on board the shipwrecked party ( Acts 28:11 ), "the sign" (parasemon) is given, and she is called "The Twin Brothers." The expression shows that it was in painting or relief; a figurehead, with the Twin Brothers represented, would be given by episemon. The cargo (phortion,  Acts 27:10 , the King James Version and the Revised Version (British and American) "lading") in this case was wheat ( Acts 27:38 ), but another word is used, gomos, by Luke of a ship's load of varied wares ( Acts 21:3 ; compare  Revelation 18:11 ).  Of those engaged in handling the ship we find ( Acts 27:11 ) the master (kubernetes), the owner (naukleros, although this expression seems not quite consistent with the ownership of a grain ship of the imperial service, and Ramsay's distinction between the words, making the former "sailing-master" and the latter "captain," may be better), the sailors ( Acts 27:30 , who treacherously sought to lower the ship's boat on the pretense of laying out anchors from the "foreship" or prow, and to get away from the doomed vessel).  Of operations belonging to the navigation of the vessel in the storm there were  (1) the taking on board of the ship's boat and securing it with ropes ( Acts 27:16 , in which operation Luke seems to have taken part; compare  Acts 27:32 ),  (2) the undergirding of the ship ( Acts 27:17 , using helps, that is taking measures of relief and adopting the expedient, only resorted to in extremities, of passing cables under the keel of the ship to keep the hull together and to preserve the timbers from starting),  (3) the lowering of the gear ( Acts 27:17 , reducing sail, taking down the mainsail and the main yard),  (4) throwing freight overboard and later casting out the tackling of the ship ( Acts 27:19 ),  (5) taking soundings ( Acts 27:28 ),  (6) letting go four anchors from the stern ( Acts 27:29 , stern-anchoring being very unusual, but a necessity in the circumstances),  (7) further lightening the ship by throwing the wheat into the sea ( Acts 27:38 ),  (8) cutting the anchor cables, unlashing the rudders, hoisting up the foresail to the wind, and holding straight for the beach ( Acts 27:40 ).  Of the parts of the ship's equipment there are mentioned "the sounding lead" (bolis, though it is the verb which is here used), "the anchors" (agkurai, of which every ship carried several, and which at successive periods have been made of stone, iron, lead and perhaps other metals, each having two flukes and being held by a cable or a chain), "the rudders" (pedalia, of which every ship had two for steering, which in this case had been lifted out of the water and secured by "bands" to the side of the ship and unlashed when the critical moment came), "the foresail" artemon, not the mainsail, but the small sail at the bow of the vessel which at the right moment was hoisted to the wind to run her ashore), and "the boat" (skaphe, which had been in tow in the wake of the vessel, according to custom still prevalent in those seas-coasting-vessels being sometimes becalmed, when the crew get into the small boat and take the ship in tow, using the oars to get her round a promontory or into a position more favorable for the wind). The season for navigation in those seas in ancient times was from April to October. During the winter the vessels were laid up, or remained in the shelter of some suitable haven. The reason for this was not simply the tempestuous character of the weather, but the obscuration of the heavens which prevented observations being taken for the steering of the ship ( Acts 27:20 ).  3. In Other Books:  In  2 Corinthians 11:25  Paul mentions among sufferings he had endured for Christ's sake that thrice he had suffered shipwreck, and that he had been "a night and a day in the deep," implying that he had been in danger of his life clinging to a spar, or borne upon a hurriedly constructed raft. It may be a reminiscence of the sea when Paul in the very earliest of his Epistles ( 1 Thessalonians 4:16 ), speaking of the coming of the Lord, says "The Lord himself shall descend from heaven, with a shout" en keleusmati), where the picture is that of the keleustes, giving the time to the rowers on board a ship. Although huperetes, was "an underrower" and huperesia, "the crew of a ship" as contrasted with kubernetes, "the sailing-master," the derived meaning of "servant" or "officer" has lost in the New Testament all trace of its origin ( Matthew 5:25   Luke 1:2  and many passages; compare stellein, and sustellein, where the idea of "furling" or "shifting a sail" is entirely lost:  1 Corinthians 7:29   2 Corinthians 8:20 ).  Figurative:  In Hebrews the hope of the gospel is figured as "an anchor.... sure and stedfast, and entering into that which is within the veil" (6:19, especially with Ebrard's note in Alford, at the place). James, showing the power of little things, adduces the ships, large though they be, and driven by fierce winds, turned about by a very small "rudder" (pedalion), as "the impulse of the steersman willeth" ( James 3:4 ). In Revelation there is a representation of the fall of Babylon in language reminiscent of the fall of Tyre ( Ezekiel 27 ), in which lamentations arise from the merchants of the earth who can no more buy her varied merchandise (ton gomon, "cargo" the Revised Version margin), and shipmasters and passengers and seafaring people look in terror and grief upon the smoke of her burning ( Revelation 18:12-18 ).  LITERATURE.  The usual books on Greek and Roman antiquities furnish descriptions and illustrations. Works on the monuments like Layard, Nineveh, II, 379;; Maspero, Ancient Egypt and Assyria; Ball, Light from the East, and Reissner, Cairo Museum Catalogue, "Models of Ships and Boats," 1913, contain descriptions and figured representations which are instructive. On shipping and navigation in classical antiquity Smith of Jordanhill, Voyage and Shipwreck of Paul, is still the standard authority.  T. Nicol
ZARETHSHAHAR|The splendour of the dawn, a city "in the mount of the valley" ( Joshua 13:19 ). It is identified with the ruins of Zara, near the mouth of the Wady Zerka Main, on the eastern shore of the Dead Sea, some 3 miles south of the Callirrhoe. Of this town but little remains. "A few broken basaltic columns and pieces of wall about 200 yards back from the shore, and a ruined fort rather nearer the sea, about the middle of the coast line of the plain, are all that are left" (Tristram's Land of Moab). 
GEHAZI|Valley of vision, Elisha's trusted servant ( 2 Kings 4:31 ;  5:25 ;  8:4 ,  5). He appears in connection with the history of the Shunammite ( 2 Kings 4:14 ,  31) and of Naaman the Syrian. On this latter occasion he was guilty of duplicity and dishonesty of conduct, causing Elisha to denounce his crime with righteous sternness, and pass on him the terrible doom that the leprosy of Naaman would cleave to him and his for ever ( 5:20 -27). He afterwards appeared before king Joram, to whom he recounted the great deeds of his master ( 2 Kings 8:1 -6). 
SALIM|Peaceful, a place near AEnon (q.v.), on the west of Jordan, where John baptized ( John 3:23 ). It was probably the Shalem mentioned in  Genesis 33:18 , about 7 miles south of AEnon, at the head of the great Wady Far'ah, which formed the northern boundary of Judea in the Jordan valley. 
NECHO|Necho II An Egyptian king, the son and successor of Psammetichus (B.C. 610-594), the contemporary of Josiah, king of Judah. For some reason he proclaimed war against the king of Assyria. He led forth a powerful army and marched northward, but was met by the king of Judah at Megiddo, who refused him a passage through his territory. Here a fierce battle was fought and Josiah was slain ( 2 Chronicles 35:20 -24). Possibly, as some suppose, Necho may have brought his army by sea to some port to the north of Dor (Comp.  Joshua 11:2 ;  12:23 ), a Phoenician town at no great distance from Megiddo. After this battle Necho marched on to Carchemish (q.v.), where he met and conquered the Assyrian army, and thus all the Syrian provinces, including Palestine, came under his dominion. On his return march he deposed Jehoahaz, who had succeeded his father Josiah, and made Eliakim, Josiah's eldest son, whose name he changed into Jehoiakim, king. Jehoahaz he carried down into Egypt, where he died ( 2 Kings 23:31 ;  2 Chronicles 36:1 -4). Four years after this conquest Necho again marched to the Euphrates; but here he was met and his army routed by the Chaldeans (B.C. 606) under Nebuchadnezzar, who drove the Egyptians back, and took from them all the territory they had conquered, from the Euphrates unto the "river of Egypt" ( Jeremiah 46:2 ;  2 Kings 24:7 ,  8). Soon after this Necho died, and was succeeded by his son, Psammetichus II. (see  NEBUCHADNEZZAR .) 
BUNNI|     bun'-i (bunni, buni, bunni; compare BANI):  (1) A Levite ( Nehemiah 9:4 ). The repetition of Bani's name in this passage is probably a scribal error. The Syriac version for the second "Bani" reads "Binnui"; but as, in  Nehemiah 10:9  and  Nehemiah 12:8 , Binnui's name comes, as here, between those of Jeshua and Kadmiel, we should substitute Binnui here for the first Bani. The Septuagint renders all three names as if the Hebrew in each case had been bene, "sons of," reducing the proper names in the verse to five. The names probably stand for chief Levitical houses rather than individuals.  (2) Another Levite, one of the overseers of the temple, father of Hashabiah, according to  Nehemiah 11:15 ; but, according to  1 Chronicles 9:14 , Hashabiah is "of the sons of Merari" The reading in Nehemiah is a corruption of the one in Ch.  H. J. Wolf
LUCAS|A friend and companion of Paul during his imprisonment at Rome; Luke (q.v.), the beloved physician ( Philemon 1:24 ;  Colossians 4:14 ). 
SHENAZZAR|     she-naz'-ar (shen'atstsar): A son of Jeconiah (Jehoiachin) and uncle of Zerubbabel ( 1 Chronicles 3:18 , Codex Vaticanus and Codex Alexandrinus Sanesar; Lucian, Sanasar; Vulgate (Jerome's Latin Bible, 390-405 A.D.) Sennaser, Senneser). It is highly probable that Sheshbazzar ( Ezra 1:8, 11 ), "the prince of Judah," and Shenazzar are identical (so Meyer, Rothstein, etc.). The name is difficult; some suggest a corruption of shushbalatstsar, and as equivalent to Sin-usur, "Sin (the moon-god) protect."
PELAIAH|Distinguished of the Lord.  (1.) One of David's posterity ( 1 Chronicles 3:24 ). (2.) A Levite who expounded the law ( Nehemiah 8:7 ). 
CLAUDA|A small island off the southwest coast of Crete, passed by Paul on his voyage to Rome ( Acts 27:16 ). It is about 7 miles long and 3 broad. It is now called Gozzo (R.V.,  "Cauda"). 
BARZILLAI|Of iron.  (1.) A Meholathite, the father of Adriel ( 2 Samuel 21:8 ). (2.) A Gileadite of Rogelim who was distinguished for his loyalty to David. He liberally provided for the king's followers ( 2 Samuel 17:27 ). David on his death-bed, remembering his kindness, commended Barzillai's children to the care of Solomon ( 1 Kings 2:7 ). (3.) A priest who married a daughter of the preceding ( Ezra 2:61 ). 
ELISHUA|God his salvation, a son of David,  2 Samuel 5:15  = Elishama,  1 Chronicles 3:6 . 
IMLAH|   IMLA;   im'-la (yimlah, "fullness"?): Father of the prophet Micaiah ( 1 Kings 22:8, 9   2 Chronicles 18:7, 8 ).
MUSHI|Receding, the second of the two sons of Merari ( Exodus 6:19 ;  Numbers 3:20 ). His sons were called Mushites ( Numbers 3:33 ;  26:58 ). 
JEHALLELEL|   ; JEHALELEEL  je-hal'-e-lel (Revised Version (British and American)), je-ha-le'-le-el (the King James Version) (yehallel'el, "he shall praise God"):  (1) A Judahite ( 1 Chronicles 4:16 ).  (2) A Levite, a descendant of Merari ( 2 Chronicles 29:12 ).
SHARAIM|Two gates ( Joshua 15:36 ), more correctly Shaaraim ( 1 Samuel 17:52 ), probably Tell Zakariya and Kefr Zakariya, in the valley of Elah, 3 1/2 miles north-west of Socoh. 
BALANCINGS|     bal'-ans-ins: "The balancings of the clouds" ( Job 37:16 ), the manner in which they are poised and supported in the air, alike with their mysterious spreadings and motions, challenge the strongest intellect to explain.
CANAANITESS|     ka'-nan-it-es.  See  SHUA ;  BATHSHUA .
MEGIDDO|Place of troops, originally one of the royal cities of the Canaanites ( Joshua 12:21 ), belonged to the tribe of Manasseh ( Judges 1:27 ), but does not seem to have been fully occupied by the Israelites till the time of Solomon ( 1 Kings 4:12 ;  9:15 ). The valley or plain of Megiddo was part of the plain of Esdraelon, the great battle-field of Palestine. It was here Barak gained a notable victory over Jabin, the king of Hazor, whose general, Sisera, led on the hostile army. Barak rallied the warriors of the northern tribes, and under the encouragement of Deborah (q.v.), the prophetess, attacked the Canaanites in the great plain. The army of Sisera was thrown into complete confusion, and was engulfed in the waters of the Kishon, which had risen and overflowed its banks ( Judges 4:5 ). Many years after this (B.C. 610), Pharaohnecho II., on his march against the king of Assyria, passed through the plains of Philistia and Sharon; and King Josiah, attempting to bar his progress in the plain of Megiddo, was defeated by the Egyptians. He was wounded in battle, and died as they bore him away in his chariot towards Jerusalem ( 2 Kings 23:29 ;  2 Chronicles 35:22 -24), and all Israel mourned for him. So general and bitter was this mourning that it became a proverb, to which Zechariah ( 12:11 ,  12) alludes. Megiddo has been identified with the modern el-Lejjun, at the head of the Kishon, under the north-eastern brow of Carmel, on the south-western edge of the plain of Esdraelon, and 9 miles west of Jezreel. Others identify it with Mujedd'a, 4 miles south-west of Bethshean, but the question of its site is still undetermined. 
SHARAR|     sha'-rar.  See  SACAR .
PIHAHIROTH|Place where the reeds grow (LXX. and Copt. read "farmstead"), the name of a place in Egypt where the children of Israel encamped ( Exodus 14:2 ,  9), how long is uncertain. Some have identified it with Ajrud, a fortress between Etham and Suez. The condition of the Isthmus of Suez at the time of the Exodus is not exactly known, and hence this, with the other places mentioned as encampments of Israel in Egypt, cannot be definitely ascertained. The isthmus has been formed by the Nile deposits. This increase of deposit still goes on, and so rapidly that within the last fifty years the mouth of the Nile has advanced northward about four geographical miles. In the maps of Ptolemy (of the second and third centuries A.D.) the mouths of the Nile are forty miles further south than at present. (see  EXODUS .) 
ELIENAI|     el-i-e'-na-i ('eli`enay):  A Benjamite chief ( 1 Chronicles 8:20 ).
JANNAI|     jan'-a-i (Iannai, Tischendorf, Tregelles, Westcott and Hort, The New Testament in Greek; Ianna, Textus Receptus of the New Testament; the King James Version Janna); An ancestor of Jesus in Luke's genealogy, the 5th before Joseph, the husband of Mary ( Luke 3:24 ).
LEBAOTH|     le-ba'-oth, -oth (lebha'oth): A city in the South of the territory of Judah ( Joshua 15:32 ). It is the same as Bethlebaoth of  Joshua 19:6 , which, by a clerical error appears in  1 Chronicles 4:31  as "Beth-biri."
JEHEZKEL|   ; JEHEZEKEL  je-hez'-kel (Revised Version (British and American)), je-hez'-e-kel (the King James Version) (yechezqe'l "God strengthens"):  (1) A priest of David's time ( 1 Chronicles 24:16 ).  (2) Jehezkel in  Ezekiel 1:3  King James Version margin, for EZEKIEL (which see).
MELZAR|Probably a Persian word meaning master of wine, i.e., chief butler; the title of an officer at the Babylonian court ( Dan. 1:11 ,  16) who had charge of the diet of the Hebrew youths. 
ZIZ|Projecting; a flower, a cleft or pass, probably that near En-gedi, which leads up from the Dead Sea ( 2 Chronicles 20:16 ) in the direction of Tekoa; now Tell Hasasah. 
TEBAH|     te'-ba (tebhach): A son of Nahor, the brother of Abraham ( Genesis 22:24 ).
MEHIR|     me'-her (mechir, "price," "hire"): A descendant of Judah, son of Chelub, nephew of Shuah ( 1 Chronicles 4:11 ). Perug, a Chaldee name of equivalent meaning, is given for this person in the Targum of Rabbi Joseph.
IPHTAH|     if'-ta (yiphtach; the King James Version Jiphtah): A town in the Shephelah of Judah, named with Libnab, Ether and Ashan ( Joshua 15:43 ).
JAILOR|     jal'-er.  See  PRISON .
KANAH|Reedy; brook of reeds.  (1.) A stream forming the boundary between Ephraim and Manasseh, from the Mediterranean eastward to Tappuah ( Joshua 16:8 ). It has been identified with the sedgy streams that constitute the Wady Talaik, which enters the sea between Joppa and Caesarea. Others identify it with the river' Aujeh. (2.) A town in the north of Asher ( Joshua 19:28 ). It has been identified with `Ain-Kana, a village on the brow of a valley some 7 miles south-east of Tyre. About a mile north of this place are many colossal ruins strown about. And in the side of a neighbouring ravine are figures of men, women, and children cut in the face of the rock. These are supposed to be of Phoenician origin. 
DIMONAH|   DIMON;   di'-mon, di-mo'-na. See  DIBON .
PEKOD|Probably a place in Babylonia ( Jeremiah 50:21 ;  Ezek. 23:23 ). It is the opinion, however, of some that this word signifies "visitation," "punishment," and allegorically "designates Babylon as the city which was to be destroyed." 
MAAI|     ma-a'-i, ma'i (ma`ay): An Asaphite musician who took part in the ceremony of the dedication of the walls ( Nehemiah 12:36 ).
HATHATH|Terror, son of Othniel ( 1 Chronicles 4:13 ). 
ENCHANTMENTS| (1.) The rendering of Hebrew latim_ or _lehatim, which means "something covered," "muffled up;" secret arts, tricks ( Exodus 7:11 ,  22;  8:7 ,  18), by which the Egyptian magicians imposed on the credulity of Pharaoh. (2.) The rendering of the Hebrew keshaphim, "muttered spells" or "incantations," rendered "sorceries" in Isaiah 47:9, 12, i.e., the using of certain formulae under the belief that men could thus be bound. (3.) Hebrew lehashim, "charming," as of serpents ( Jeremiah 8:17 ; Comp.  Psalm 58:5 ). (4.) Hebrew nehashim, the enchantments or omens used by Balaam ( Numbers 24:1 ); his endeavouring to gain omens favourable to his design. (5.) Hebrew heber ( Isaiah 47:9 ,  12), "magical spells." All kinds of enchantments were condemned by the Mosaic law ( Leviticus 19:26 ;  Deuteronomy 18:10 -12). (see  DIVINATION .) 
GINATH|     gi'-nath (ginath): Father of Tibni, the unsuccessful rival of Omri ( 1 Kings 16:21, 22 ).
MIPHKAD|   ; GATE OF  mif'-kad, (sha`ar ha-miphqadh; the Revised Version (British and American) "Hammiphkad" ( Nehemiah 3:31 )): A gate in, or near, the north end of the east wall of Jerusalem, rebuilt under Nehemiah. Its exact position is uncertain.  See  JERUSALEM .
MICHMETHAH|Hiding-place, a town in the northern border of Ephraim and Manasseh, and not far west of Jordan ( Joshua 16:6 ;  17:7 ). 
PALESTINA|     pal-es-ti'-na (pelesheth):  Exodus 15:14   Isaiah 14:29, 31  the King James Version; changed in the Revised Version (British and American) to PHILISTIA (which see).
WINDOWS|   HEAVEN,  OF  See  ASTRONOMY, sec . III, 4.  WINDOWS OF HEAVEN  See  ASTRONOMY, sec . III, 4.
NIMROD|Firm, a descendant of Cush, the son of Ham. He was the first who claimed to be a "mighty one in the earth." Babel was the beginning of his kingdom, which he gradually enlarged ( Genesis 10:8 -10). The "land of Nimrod" ( Micah 5:6 ) is a designation of Assyria or of Shinar, which is a part of it. 
SILOAM|Siloam, Pool of Sent or sending. Here a notable miracle was wrought by our Lord in giving sight to the blind ( John 9:7 -11). It has been identified with the Birket Silwan in the lower Tyropoeon valley, to the south-east of the hill of Zion. The water which flows into this pool intermittingly by a subterranean channel springs from the "Fountain of the Virgin" (q.v.). The length of this channel, which has several windings, is 1,750 feet, though the direct distance is only 1,100 feet. The pool is 53 feet in length from north to south, 18 feet wide, and 19 deep. The water passes from it by a channel cut in the rock into the gardens below. (see  EN -ROGEL.) Many years ago (1880) a youth, while wading up the conduit by which the water enters the pool, accidentally discovered an inscription cut in the rock, on the eastern side, about 19 feet from the pool. This is the oldest extant Hebrew record of the kind. It has with great care been deciphered by scholars, and has been found to be an account of the manner in which the tunnel was constructed. Its whole length is said to be "twelve hundred cubits;" and the inscription further notes that the workmen, like the excavators of the Mont Cenis Tunnel, excavated from both ends, meeting in the middle. Some have argued that the inscription was cut in the time of Solomon; others, with more probability, refer it to the reign of Hezekiah. A more ancient tunnel was discovered in 1889 some 20 feet below the ground. It is of smaller dimensions, but more direct in its course. It is to this tunnel that Isaiah ( 8:6 ) probably refers. The Siloam inscription above referred to was surreptitiously cut from the wall of the tunnel in 1891 and broken into fragments. These were, however, recovered by the efforts of the British Consul at Jerusalem, and have been restored to their original place.  Siloam, Tower of Mentioned only  Luke 13:4 . The place here spoken of is the village now called Silwan, or Kefr Silwan, on the east of the valley of Kidron, and to the north-east of the pool. It stands on the west slope of the Mount of Olives. As illustrative of the movement of small bands of Canaanites from place to place, and the intermingling of Canaanites and Israelites even in small towns in earlier times, M.C. Ganneau records the following curious fact: "Among the inhabitants of the village (of Siloam) there are a hundred or so domiciled for the most part in the lower quarter, and forming a group apart from the rest, called Dhiabrye, i.e., men of Dhiban. It appears that at some remote period a colony from the capital of king Mesha (Dibon-Moab) crossed the Jordan and fixed itself at the gates of Jerusalem at Silwan. The memory of this migration is still preserved; and I am assured by the people themselves that many of their number are installed in other villages round Jerusalem" (quoted by Henderson,  Palestine). 
RABBITH|     rab'-ith (ha-rabbith; Codex Vaticanus Dabeiron; Codex Alexandrinus Rhabboth): A town in the territory of Issachar ( Joshua 19:20 ) which is probably represented today by Raba, a village in the southern part of the Gilboa range and North of Ibzaq. The "ha" is, of course, the definite article.
PEOR|Opening.  (1.) A mountain peak ( Numbers 23:28 ) to which Balak led Balaam as a last effort to induce him to pronounce a curse upon Israel. When he looked on the tribes encamped in the acacia groves below him, he could not refrain from giving utterance to a remarkable benediction ( 24:1 -9). Balak was more than ever enraged at Balaam, and bade him flee for his life. But before he went he gave expression to that wonderful prediction regarding the future of this mysterious people, whose "goodly tents" were spread out before him, and the coming of a "Star" out of Jacob and a "Sceptre" out of Israel ( 24:14 -17). (2.) A Moabite divinity, called also "Baal-peor" ( Numbers 25:3 ,  5,  18; Comp.  Deuteronomy 3:29 ). 
VALIANTLY|   VALIANT,   val'-yant, val'-yant-li (chayil; ischuros): "Valiant" in the Old Testament is for the most part the translation of chayil, "power," or "might," and is applied to the courageous and to men of war ("mighty men of valor"), as in  1 Samuel 14:52 ;  1 Samuel 31:12   2 Samuel 11:16 , etc.; in some passages ben chayil, "a son of might" ( Judges 21:10   1 Samuel 18:17   2 Samuel 2:7 , etc.). A few other Hebrew words (gibbor, etc.) are thus rendered. In the New Testament the word occurs once in the King James Version ( Hebrews 11:34 , "valiant in fight"; the Revised Version (British and American) "mighty in war"). "Valiantly" is the translation of the same Hebrew word ( Numbers 24:18   Psalm 60:12 , etc.); in one case in the King James Version of chazaq ( 1 Chronicles 19:13 , the American Standard Revised Version "play the man," the English Revised Version "men"). In some instances the Revised Version (British and American) has variations, as "man of valor" for "valiant man" ( 1 Samuel 16:18 ), "valiant" for "strong" ( 1 Chronicles 26:7, 9   Jeremiah 48:14 , etc.).  W. L. Walker
BETHJESHIMOTH|House of wastes, or deserts, a town near Abel-shittim, east of Jordan, in the desert of Moab, where the Israelites encamped not long before crossing the Jordan ( Numbers 33:49 ; A.V.,  "Bethjesimoth"). It was within the territory of Sihon, king of the Amorites ( Joshua 12:3 ). 
HORIM|   HORITE;   ho'-rit, ho'-rim (chori, chorim; Chorraioi): Denoted the inhabitants of Mt. Seir before its occupation by the Edomites ( Deuteronomy 2:12 ). Seir is accordingly called Horite in  Genesis 36:20, 30 , where a list of his descendants is given, who afterward mixed with the invading Edomites. Esau himself married the daughter of the Horite chieftain Anah ( Genesis 36:25 ; see 36:2, where "Hivite" must be corrected into "Horite"). The "Horites" in their "Mt. Seir" were among the nations defeated by the army of Chedorlaomer in the age of Abraham ( Genesis 14:6 ). The Hebrew Horitc, however, is the Khar of the Egyptian inscriptions, a name given to the whole of Southern Palestine and Edom as well as to the adjacent sea. In accordance with this we find in the Old Testament also traces of the existence of the Horites in other parts of the country besides Mt. Seir. In  Genesis 34:2   Joshua 9:7 , the Septuagint (Cod. A) more correctly reads "Horite" instead of "Hivite" for the inhabitants of Shechem and Gibeon, and Caleb is said to be "the son of Hur, the first-born of Ephratah" or Bethlehem ( 1 Chronicles 2:50 ;  1 Chronicles 4:4 ). Hor or Horite has sometimes been explained to mean "cave-dweller"; it more probably, however, denotes the "white" race. The Horites were Semites, and consequently are distinguished in  Deuteronomy 2:12  from the tall race of Rephaim.  A. H. Sayce
GEDEROTHAIM|     ged-e-ro-tha'-im (gedherathayim, "place of enclosures"): Stands as the 15th in a list which professes to give only the names of 14 cities in the Judean Shephelah ( Joshua 15:36 ). the King James Version margin suggests that we might read "or" for "and" after Gederah, but this is impossible. Septuagint reads, "and its cattle shelters." Probably, however, the name has arisen by dittography from the preceding GEDERAH (which see).
KENEZITE|     ke'-nez-it (qenizzi; Kenezaios): the King James Version in  Genesis 15:19  and the Revised Version (British and American) uniformly, spell "Kenizzite." The Kenezites were the clan whose name-father was KENAZ (which see). Their land, along with that of their Canaanite tribes, was promised to Abram ( Genesis 15:19 ). To this clan belonged Jephunneh, the father of Caleb ( Numbers 32:12   Joshua 14:6, 14 ). It had evidently been absorbed by the tribe of Judah. If the Kenezites went down with Jacob into Egypt, they may have become identified with his family there.
JACAN|     ja'-kan (ya`kan, meaning not known; the King James Version, Jachan): A chief of a family descended from Gad ( 1 Chronicles 5:13 ).
SIRION|A breastplate, the Sidonian name of Hermon (q.v.),  Deuteronomy 3:9 ;  Psalm 29:6 . 
LYSTRA|A town of Lycaonia, in Asia Minor, in a wild district and among a rude population. Here Paul preached the gospel after he had been driven by persecution from Iconium ( Acts 14:2 -7). Here also he healed a lame man (8), and thus so impressed the ignorant and superstitious people that they took him for Mercury, because he was the "chief speaker," and his companion Barnabas for Jupiter, probably in consequence of his stately, venerable appearance; and were proceeding to offer sacrifices to them (13), when Paul earnestly addressed them and turned their attention to the true source of all blessings. But soon after, through the influence of the Jews from Antioch in Pisidia and Iconium, they stoned Paul and left him for dead ( 14:19 ). On recovering, Paul left for Derbe; but soon returned again, through Lystra, encouraging the disciples there to steadfastness. He in all likelihood visited this city again on his third missionary tour ( Acts 18:23 ). Timothy, who was probably born here ( 2 Timothy 3:10 ,  11), was no doubt one of those who were on this occasion witnesses of Paul's persecution and his courage in Lystra. 
HERMAS|Mercury, a Roman Christian to whom Paul sends greetings ( Romans 16:14 ). Some suppose him to have been the author of the celebrated religious romance called The Shepherd, but it is very probable that that work is the production of a later generation. 
CALCOL|( 1 Chronicles 2:6 ), sustenance, the same probably as Chalcol ( 1 Kings 4:31 ), one of the four sages whom Solomon excelled in wisdom; for "he was wiser than all men." 
SAMUEL|Heard of God. The peculiar circumstances connected with his birth are recorded in  1 Samuel 1:20 . Hannah, one of the two wives of Elkanah, who came up to Shiloh to worship before the Lord, earnestly prayed to God that she might become the mother of a son. Her prayer was graciously granted; and after the child was weaned she brought him to Shiloh nd consecrated him to the Lord as a perpetual Nazarite ( 1:23 - 2:11 ). Here his bodily wants and training were attended to by the women who served in the tabernacle, while Eli cared for his religious culture. Thus, probably, twelve years of his life passed away. "The child Samuel grew on, and was in favour both with the Lord, and also with men" ( 2:26 ; Comp.  Luke 2:52 ). It was a time of great and growing degeneracy in Israel ( Judges 21:19 -21;  1 Samuel 2:12 -17,  22). The Philistines, who of late had greatly increased in number and in power, were practically masters of the country, and kept the people in subjection ( 1 Samuel 10:5 ;  13:3 ). At this time new communications from God began to be made to the pious child. A mysterious voice came to him in the night season, calling him by name, and, instructed by Eli, he answered, "Speak, Lord; for thy servant heareth." The message that came from the Lord was one of woe and ruin to Eli and his profligate sons. Samuel told it all to Eli, whose only answer to the terrible denunciations ( 1 Samuel 3:11 -18) was, "It is the Lord; let him do what seemeth him good", the passive submission of a weak character, not, in his case, the expression of the highest trust and faith. The Lord revealed himself now in divers manners to Samuel, and his fame and his influence increased throughout the land as of one divinely called to the prophetical office. A new period in the history of the kingdom of God now commenced. The Philistine yoke was heavy, and the people, groaning under the wide-spread oppression, suddenly rose in revolt, and "went out against the Philistines to battle." A fierce and disastrous battle was fought at Aphek, near to Ebenezer ( 1 Samuel 4:1 ,  2). The Israelites were defeated, leaving 4,000 dead "in the field." The chiefs of the people thought to repair this great disaster by carrying with them the ark of the covenant as the symbol of Jehovah's presence. They accordingly, without consulting Samuel, fetched it out of Shiloh to the camp near Aphek. At the sight of the ark among them the people "shouted with a great shout, so that the earth rang again." A second battle was fought, and again the Philistines defeated the Israelites, stormed their camp, slew 30,000 men, and took the sacred ark. The tidings of this fatal battle was speedily conveyed to Shiloh; and so soon as the aged Eli heard that the ark of God was taken, he fell backward from his seat at the entrance of the sanctuary, and his neck brake, and he died. The tabernacle with its furniture was probably, by the advice of Samuel, now about twenty years of age, removed from Shiloh to some place of safety, and finally to Nob, where it remained many years ( 21:1 ). The Philistines followed up their advantage, and marched upon Shiloh, which they plundered and destroyed (Comp.  Jeremiah 7:12 ;  Psalm 78:59 ). This was a great epoch in the history of Israel. For twenty years after this fatal battle at Aphek the whole land lay under the oppression of the Philistines. During all these dreary years Samuel was a spiritual power in the land. From Ramah, his native place, where he resided, his influence went forth on every side among the people. With unwearied zeal he went up and down from place to place, reproving, rebuking, and exhorting the people, endeavouring to awaken in them a sense of their sinfulness, and to lead them to repentance. His labours were so far successful that "all the house of Israel lamented after the Lord." Samuel summoned the people to Mizpeh, one of the loftiest hills in Central Palestine, where they fasted and prayed, and prepared themselves there, under his direction, for a great war against the Philistines, who now marched their whole force toward Mizpeh, in order to crush the Israelites once for all. At the intercession of Samuel God interposed in behalf of Israel. Samuel himself was their leader, the only occasion in which he acted as a leader in war. The Philistines were utterly routed. They fled in terror before the army of Israel, and a great slaughter ensued. This battle, fought probably about B.C. 1095, put an end to the forty years of Philistine oppression. In memory of this great deliverance, and in token of gratitude for the help vouchsafed, Samuel set up a great stone in the battlefield, and called it "Ebenezer," saying, "Hitherto hath the Lord helped us" ( 1 Samuel 7:1 -12). This was the spot where, twenty years before, the Israelites had suffered a great defeat, when the ark of God was taken. This victory over the Philistines was followed by a long period of peace for Israel ( 1 Samuel 7:13 ,  14), during which Samuel exercised the functions of judge, going "from year to year in circuit" from his home in Ramah to Bethel, thence to Gilgal (not that in the Jordan valley,  but that which lay to the west of Ebal and Gerizim), and returning by Mizpeh to Ramah. He established regular services at Shiloh, where he built an altar; and at Ramah he gathered a company of young men around him and established a school of the prophets. The schools of the prophets, thus originated, and afterwards established also at Gibeah, Bethel, Gilgal, and Jericho, exercised an important influence on the national character and history of the people in maintaining pure religion in the midst of growing corruption. They continued to the end of the Jewish commonwealth. Many years now passed, during which Samuel exercised the functions of his judicial office, being the friend and counsellor of the people in all matters of private and public interest. He was a great statesman as well as a reformer, and all regarded him with veneration as the "seer," the prophet of the Lord. At the close of this period, when he was now an old man, the elders of Israel came to him at Ramah ( 1 Samuel 8:4 ,  5,  19-22); and feeling how great was the danger to which the nation was exposed from the misconduct of Samuel's sons, whom he had invested with judicial functions as his assistants, and had placed at Beersheba on the Philistine border, and also from a threatened invasion of the Ammonites, they demanded that a king should be set over them. This request was very displeasing to Samuel. He remonstrated with them, and warned them of the consequences of such a step. At length, however, referring the matter to God, he acceded to their desires, and anointed Saul (q.v.) to be their king ( 11:15 ). Before retiring from public life he convened an assembly of the people at Gilgal (ch. 12), and there solemnly addressed them with reference to his own relation to them as judge and prophet. The remainder of his life he spent in retirement at Ramah, only occasionally and in special circumstances appearing again in public ( 1 Samuel 13 ,  15) with communications from God to king Saul. While mourning over the many evils which now fell upon the nation, he is suddenly summoned (ch.16) to go to Bethlehem and anoint David, the son of Jesse, as king over Israel instead of Saul. After this little is known of him till the time of his death, which took place at Ramah when he was probably about eighty years of age. "And all Israel gathered themselves together, and lamented him, and buried him in his house at Ramah" ( 25:1 ), not in the house itself, but in the court or garden of his house. (Comp.  2 Kings 21:18 ;  2 Chronicles 33:20 ;  1 Kings 2:34 ;  John 19:41 .) Samuel's devotion to God, and the special favour with which God regarded him, are referred to in  Jeremiah 15:1  and  Psalm 99:6 .  Samuel, Books of The LXX. translators regarded the books of Samuel and of Kings as forming one continuous history, which they divided into four books, which they called "Books of the Kingdom." The Vulgate version followed this division, but styled them "Books of the Kings." These books of Samuel they accordingly called the "First" and "Second" Books of Kings, and not, as in the modern Protestant versions, the "First" and "Second" Books of Samuel. The authors of the books of Samuel were probably Samuel, Gad, and Nathan. Samuel penned the first twenty-four chapters of the first book. Gad, the companion of David ( 1 Samuel 22:5 ), continued the history thus commenced; and Nathan completed it, probably arranging the whole in the form in which we now have it ( 1 Chronicles 29:29 ). The contents of the books. The first book comprises a period of about a hundred years, and nearly coincides with the life of Samuel. It contains (1) the history of Eli (1-4); (2) the history of Samuel (5-12); (3) the history of Saul, and of David in exile (13-31). The second book, comprising a period of perhaps fifty years, contains a history of the reign of David (1) over Judah (1-4), and (2) over all Israel (5-24), mainly in its political aspects. The last four chapters of Second Samuel may be regarded as a sort of appendix recording various events, but not chronologically. These books do not contain complete histories. Frequent gaps are met with in the record, because their object is to present a history of the kingdom of God in its gradual development, and not of the events of the reigns of the successive rulers. It is noticeable that the section ( 2 Samuel 11:2 - 12:29 ) containing an account of David's sin in the matter of Bathsheba is omitted in the corresponding passage in  1 Chronicles 20 .
SHIMHI|Famous, a Benjamite ( 1 Chronicles 8:21 ). 
NEGINAH|In the title of  Psalm 61 , denotes the music of stringed instruments ( 1 Samuel 16:16 ;  Isaiah 38:20 ). It is the singular form of Neginoth. 
BIRTHSTOOL|   BIRTH-STOOL  burth'-stool: Found only in  Exodus 1:16 , in connection with Hebrew women in Egypt when oppressed by Pharaoh. The Hebrew ('obhnayim) here rendered "birth-stool" is used in  Jeremiah 18:3 , and is there rendered "potter's wheel." The word is used in both places in the dual form, which points, no doubt, to the fact that the potter's wheel was composed of two discs, and suggests that the birth-stool was similarly double.  See  STOOL .
BIGTHANA|   BIGTHAN;   big'-than big-tha'-na (bighethan, bighethana'; Septuagint omits name): One of the two chamberlains or eunuchs of Xerxes on ("Ahasuerus") who conspired against the king's life, the conspiracy being detected by Mordecai and the culprits hanged ( Esther 2:21 ). Possibly these men had been partially superseded by the degradation of Vashti and were thus prompted to take revenge Xerxes.
SHEMIDAH|   SHEMIDA; ; SHEMIDAITES  she-mi'-da, she-mi'-da-its (shemidha): A Gileadite clan belonging to Manasseh ( Numbers 26:32   Joshua 17:2 , Codex Vaticanus Sumareim; Codex Alexandrinus Semirae; Lucian, Samidae;  1 Chronicles 7:19 , the King James Version "Shemidah," after whom the Shemidaites ( Numbers 26:32 ) were called).
JEHOADDIN|     je-ho-ad'-in.  See  JEHOADDAN .
EBRON|     e'-brun (`ebhron; the King James Version wrongly, Hebron):  A town in the territory of Asher ( Joshua 19:28 ). Probably we should read here Abdon, as in  Joshua 21:30   1 Chronicles 6:74 , the substitution of the Hebrew letter resh ("r") for the Hebrew letter daleth ("d") being a common copyist's error.  See  ABDON .
SHITRAI|     shit'-ri, shit-ra'-i, shit'-ra-i (shiTray): A Sharonite, David's chief shepherd ( 1 Chronicles 27:29 ).
EPHRON|Fawn-like.  (1.) The son of Zohar a Hittite, the owner of the field and cave of Machpelah (q.v.), which Abraham bought for 400 shekels of silver ( Genesis 23:8 -17;  25:9 ;  49:29 ,  30). (2.) A mountain range which formed one of the landmarks on the north boundary of the tribe of Judah ( Joshua 15:9 ), probably the range on the west side of the Wady Beit-Hanina. 
HAZARHATTICON|Village of the midway, a place near Hamath in the confines of Hauran ( Ezek. 47:16 ), probably on the north brow of Hermon. 
ISHUI|   ISHUAI,   ish'-u-i, ish'-u-i (yishwi "level").  See  ISHVI .
CHENANI|     ke-na'-ni (kenani, "planted"): One of the names mentioned in  Nehemiah 9:4 , in connection with the constitution of "congregation." If the names represent houses or families, eight Levitical houses probably sang some well-known psalm on this occasion. If they are names of individual representatives, they were probably deputed to recite or chant some special prayer in order to lead the worship of the people.
PRIESTS|    AND LEVITES  (kohen, "priest"; nothing is definitely known as to the origin of the word; Lewi, "Levite," on which see LEVI):  I. DIFFERENT VIEWS OF THE HISTORY  1. The Old View  2. The Graf-Wellhausen View  3. Mediating Views  4. An Alternative View  II. THE DATA OF THE PRIESTLY CODE (P) IN THE PENTATEUCH  1. The Levites  2. Aaron and His Sons  III. THE OTHER PORTIONS OF THE PENTATEUCH  IV. FROM MOSES TO MALACHI  1. The Sources Other than Ezekiel  (1) The Custody of the Ark  (2) On Its Return from the Philistines  (3) In Abinadab's House  2. Ezekiel  V. EZRA, NEHEMIAH, CHRONICLES  1. Estimates of the Chronicler  2. His Data  VI. LEGAL PROVISIONS  LITERATURE  In some Minaean inscriptions found at El-`Ola, dating back about 1200-800 B.C. (Hommel in Hilprecht, Explorations in Bible Lands, 719), certain "priests and priestesses of the god Wadd are designated by the term lawi, feminine lawi`at" (op. cit., 749). It is not known whether this is due to Israelite influence.  I. Different Views of the History.  1. The Old View:  There are great divergences of opinion among modern writers as to the true course of history and the dating of the different documents. It will therefore be best to sketch these views in rough outline, and then give the evidence of the various authorities, together with the reasons that in each case arise naturally from the consideration of that evidence.  The old belief was that the whole of the Pentateuchal laws were the work of Moses, that the account of the subsequent history given in the Books of Chronicles was correct, that Ezekiel's vision, if taken literally, could not be reconciled with the other known facts and was inexplicable, and that in the case of all other discrepancies harmonistic explanations should be adopted.  2. The Graf-Wellhausen View:  The modern critical school have traversed every one of these doctrines. The Chronicler is declared to be in constant and irreconcilable conflict with the older authorities, harmonistic explanations are uniformly rejected, the Pentateuch is denied to Moses and split up into a variety of sources of different ages, and Ezekiel gains a place of honor as representing a stage in a continuous and normal development. The subject is thus inextricably linked with the Pentateuchal problem, and reference must be made to the article PENTATEUCH for an explanation of the supposed documents and a consideration of the analysis with its nomenclature. On the other hand the present article and the article SANCTUARY (which see) explain and discuss the most widely held theory of the historical development into which the history of the supposed Pentateuchal sources has been fitted.  The dominant theory is that of Wellhausen. According to this, "Levite" was originally a term denoting professional skill, and the early Levites were not members of the tribe of Levi, but professional priests. Anybody could sacrifice. "For a simple altar no priest was required, but only for a house which contained a sacred image; this demanded watching and attendance" (Wellhausen, Prolegomena, 130). The whole Levitical Law was unknown and the distinction between priests and Levites unheard of. There were a few great sanctuaries and one influential priesthood, that of Shiloh (afterward at Nob). With the monarchy the priesthood became more important. The royal priests at Jerusalem grew in consequence and influence until they overshadowed all the others. Deuteronomy recognized the equal priestly right of all Levites, and Josiah's reformation placed the sons of Zadok, who were the priests of Jerusalem and not descendants of Aaron, in a position of decisive superiority. Then Ezekiel drew a new and previously unknown distinction between "the priests the Levites, the sons of Zadok" who are "keepers of the charge of the altar," and the other Levites who were made "keepers of the charge of the house" as a punishment for having ministered in the high places. The Priestly Code takes up this distinction and represents it as being of Mosaic origin, making of the sons of Zadok "sons of Aaron." "In this way arose as an illegal consequence of Josiah's reformation, the distinction between priests and Levites. With Ezekiel this distinction is still an innovation requiring justification and sanction; with the Priestly Code it is a `statute forever,' although even yet not absolutely undisputed, as appears from the priestly version of the story of Korah's company. For all Judaism subsequent to Ezra, and so for Christian tradition, the Priestly Code in this matter also has been authoritative. Instead of the Deuteronomic formula `the priests the Levites,' we henceforward have `the priests and the Levites,' particularly in Chronicles" (op. cit., 147). From that time onward the priests and Levites are two sharply distinguished classes. It is an essential part of this theory that the Chronicler meant his work to be taken as literal history, correctly representing the true meaning of the completed law.  See  CRITICISM .  3. Mediating Views:  There have been various attempts to construct less thoroughgoing theories on the same data. As a rule, these views accept in some form the documentary theory of the Pentateuch and seek to modify the Wellhausen theory in two directions, either by attributing earlier dates to one or more of the Pentateuchal documents-especially to the Priestly Code-or else by assigning more weight to some of the statements of Chronicles (interpreted literally). Sometimes both these tendencies are combined. None of these views has met with any great measure of success in the attempt to make headway against the dominant Wellhausen theory, and it will be seen later that all alike make shipwreck on certain portions of the evidence.  4. An Alternative View:  The independent investigations on which the present article is based have led the writer to a view that diverges in important particulars from any of these, and it is necessary to state it briefly before proceeding to the evidence. In one respect it differs from all the rival schemes, not merely in result, but also in method, for it takes account of versional evidence as to the state of the texts. Subject to this it accepts the Mosaic authenticity of all the Pentateuchal legislation and the clear and consentient testimony of the Law and the Prophets (i.e. of the two earlier and more authoritative portions of the Hebrew Canon), while regarding Chronicles as representing a later interpretation, not merely of the history, but also of the legal provisions. In outline the story of the priesthood is then as follows: Moses consecrated Aaron and his sons as the priests of the desert tabernacle. He purified the rest of the tribe of Levi as a body of sacred porters for the period of wanderings, but in the legislation of Numbers he made no provision whatever for their performing any duties after the sanctuary obtained a permanent location. At the same time he gave a body of priestly teaching requiring for its administration in settled conditions a numerous and scattered body of priests, such as the house of Aaron alone could not have provided immediately after the entry into Canaan. To meet this, Deuteronomy-the last legislative work of Moses-contains provisions enlarging the rights and duties of the Levites and conferring on them a priestly position. The earlier distinction was thus largely obliterated, though the high-priestly dignity remained in the house of Aaron till the time of Solomon, when it was transferred from the house of Eli to that of Zadok, who, according to Ezekiel's testimony, was a Levite (but see below, IV, 1). So matters remained till the exile, when Ezekiel put forward a scheme which together with many ideal elements proposed reforms to insure the better application of the Mosaic principle of the distinction between holy and profane to greatly altered circumstances. Taking his inspiration from the wilderness legislation, he instituted a fresh division in the tribe of Levi, giving to the sons of Zadok a position similar to that once held by the sons of Aaron, and degrading all other Levites from the priesthood conferred on them by Deuteronomy to a lower rank. The duties now assigned to this class of "keepers of the charge of the house" were never even contemplated by Moses, but Ezekiel applies to them the old phrases of the Pentateuch which he invests with a new significance. As a result of his influence, the distinction between priests and Levites makes its appearance in post-exilic times, though it had been unknown to all the writers of the second division of the Hebrew Canon. At the same time a meaning was read into the provisions of the Law which their original author could not have contemplated, and it was this interpretation which is presented (at any rate to some extent) in Chronicles, and has given us the current tradition. Many of the Chronicler's statements are, however, not meant to be taken literally, and could not have been so taken by his original public.  II. The Data of the Priestly Code (P) in the Pentateuch.  1. The Levites:  To arrive at an objective conclusion it is necessary, in the first instance, to examine the facts without such bias as any view put forward by any other author, ancient or modern, sacred or profane, might impart. Every legislator is entitled to be judged on his own language, and where he has, so to speak, made his own dictionary, we are compelled to read his meaning into the terms used. The very first of the material references to the Levites drives this truth home. "But appoint thou the Levites over the tabernacle of the testimony, and over all the furniture thereof" ( Numbers 1:50 ). It is necessary to consider whether such expressions are to be read in a wide or a narrow sense. We learn from  Numbers 18:3  that death would be the result of a Levite's touching any of these vessels, and it therefore appears that these words are meant to be construed narrowly. "They shall bear the tabernacle, and all the furniture thereof; and they shall minister unto it," are the next words (1:50); but yet we read later of the Kohathites who were to bear it that "they shall not touch the sanctuary, lest they die" (4:15). This shows that the service in question is strictly limited to a service of porterage after the articles have been wrapped up by Aaron and his sons. By no possibility could it include such a task as cleaning the vessels. It is then further directed that the Levites are to take down and set up the dwelling and camp round about it. All these are desert services and desert services only. Then we read that "the Levites shall keep the charge of the tabernacle (dwelling) of the testimony. This concludes the first material passage ( Numbers 1:50-53 ). The other passages of Numbers only amplify these directions; they never change them. But some phrases are used which must be more particularly considered.  (1) Technical Phrases.  We hear that the Levites are "to serve the service of the tent of meeting," and this looks as if it might refer to some general duties, but the context and the kindred passages always forbid this interpretation.  Numbers 7:5  ff; is an admirable instance. Six wagons are there assigned to the Levites for this service, two to the Gershonites and four to the Merarites. "But unto the sons of Kohath he gave none, because the service of the sanctuary belonged unto them; they bare it upon their shoulders." Here service is transport and nothing else. Again we read of the charge of the Levites in the tent of meeting, e.g. 4:25 f. If we look to see what this was, we find that it consisted of transporting portions of the tent that had been packed up. The "in" of English Versions of the Bible does not represent the meaning of the Hebrew fairly; for the context makes it clear that the legislator means "in respect to." "But they shall not go in to see the sanctuary even for a moment, lest they die" (4:20). In English idiom we cannot speak of the transport of portions of a dismantled tent as service in that tent. One other expression requires notice, the phrase "keep the charge" which is distinguished in 8:26 from "doing service." The exact meaning cannot be determined. It appears to denote something kindred to service, but of a less exacting nature, perhaps the camping round the tent and the guardianship of the articles on the march. We shall see hereafter by comparison with other books that in P it does not bear the same meaning as elsewhere.  (2) Other Legal Provisions.  The Levites were to act under the orders of Aaron and his sons, who were to assign to each man his individual functions ( Numbers 3 ;  Numbers 4 , etc.). They were to undergo a special rite of purification ( Numbers 8 ), but not of consecration. They were taken in place of the firstborn ( Numbers 3 ). The age for beginning service is given in  Numbers 4  as 30 years, but in  Numbers 8:24  as 25 years, if the text is sound. The age for ceasing to serve was 50. In many passages the versions suggest that a good many phrases are textually doubtful, and it is probable that when a critical text of the Pentateuch is formed on scientific principles, a good many superfluous expressions will be found not to be original; but there is no reason to suppose that any real difference in the meaning of the passages would be revealed by such a text.  The story of Korah is easily misunderstood. It appears from  Numbers 16:3  that his real object was to put himself on an equality with Moses and Aaron, and this is the "priesthood" referred to in 16:10.  Numbers 18  reinforces the earlier passages. It is noteworthy as showing that in the conception of the legislator the Levites were not to come near the vessels or the altar (18:3). The penalty is death for both Levites and priests.  (3) Contrast with Ezekiel and Chronicles.  The impression as to the meaning of P which may be gathered from an examination of its statements is powerfully reinforced when they are tested by reference to Ezekiel and Chronicles,  Ezekiel 44:9-14  seems to demand of the Levites some service as gatekeepers, the slaying of burnt offering and sacrifice for the people and a keeping of "the charge of the house, for all the service thereof," which in the light of 44:7 appears to mean in his terminology, not a service of transport, but an entry into the house and the performance of certain duties there. The Priestly Code (P), on the contrary, knows nothing of gatekeepers, regards the slaying of the burnt offering and sacrifice as the duty of the individual sacrificant ( Leviticus 1 ;  Leviticus 3 ), and-if, as Wellhausen thinks, it refers to the temple-it would have visited with death a Levite who was present in the places in which Ezekiel requires him to minister. Similarly with the Chronicler. For instance, he the Levites being `for the service of the.... in the courts and over the chambers, and over the cleansing of every holy thing' ( 1 Chronicles 23:28 ), but P knows nothing of any chambers, would not have allowed the Levites to touch (much less clean) many of the holy things, and regarded service simply as porterage. In  1 Chronicles 23:31  the Levites are to offer burnt offerings on certain occasions; in P their approach to the altar would have meant death both to themselves and the priests ( Numbers 18:3 ). Other instances will be found in PS, 238 f.  (4) What the Foregoing Proves.  In view of these facts it is impossible to hold that the Levites in P represent a projection of the Levites of the second temple or any post-Mosaic age into the desert period. To P they are a body of sacred porters. The temple of course could not be carried about, and it cannot be held that in this respect the legislation mirrors later circumstances. "Secondly, the net result of such a scheme would be to create a body of Levites for use during the period of wanderings and never thereafter. As soon as the desert age was over the whole tribe would find their occupation gone. How can we conceive that any legislator deliberately sat down and invented such a scheme centuries after the epoch to which it relates, well knowing that in so far as his scheme purported to be a narrative of events it was fictitious from beginning to end, and in so far as it might be regarded as a legislation applicable to his own or any future day, there was not a line in it that could conceivably be put into practice? If any theorist can be conceived as acting in this way, how are we to suppose that his work would meet with acceptance?.... Thirdly, P neither embodies the views of Ezekiel nor finds an accurate reflection in Chronicles. The facts are such as to enable us to say definitely that P is not in line with them. It is impossible to assume that he appointed the death penalty for certain acts if performed by Levites because he really wished the Levites to perform those acts" (PS, 241).  2. Aaron and His Sons:  Priests and Levites also speaks of Aaron the priest and the sons of Aaron the priest. It is doubtful whether the expression "the sons of Aaron the priests," which occurs frequently in the Massoretic Text, is ever original; the Massoretic expression is nowhere supported by all the authorities. "The phrase `Aaron the high priest' is entirely unknown to Priests and Levites. Where the high priest's name is given the only qualifying apposition possible in his usage is `the priest.' " Aaron and his sons, unlike the Levites, were consecrated, not merely purified.  At this point two features only of the legislation need be noticed: the inadequacy of the staff to post-conquest conditions and the signs of date. For example, the leprosy laws ( Leviticus 13 f ) postulate the presence of priests to inspect and isolate the patient. "Remembering that on the critical theory P assumes the capital at Jerusalem as self-evident, we must ask how such provisions were to work after the conquest. During the desert period nothing could have been simpler, but what was to happen when the Israelites dwelt all over Canaan from Beersheba to Dan?" (PS, 246). The difficulty is immensely increased if we postulate an exilic or post-exilic date, when the Jewish center of gravity was in Babylonia and there were large colonies in Egypt and elsewhere. And "What are we to say when we read of leprous garments ( Leviticus 13:47 )? Was a man to make the pilgrimage from Babylonia to Jerusalem to consult a priest about a doubtful garment? And what about the leper's offerings in  Leviticus 14  ? Could they conceivably have been meant to apply to such circumstances?" (PS, 247). The case is no better with the law of leprous houses, which is expressed to apply to the post-conquest period ( Leviticus 4:33-5:3 ). The notification to the priest and his inspections require a priesthood scattered all over the country, i.e. a body far more numerous than the house of Aaron at the date of the conquest. Such instances could easily be multiplied from the legislation; one more only will be cited on account of its importance to the history of the priesthood. According to Leviticus, the individual sacrificant is to kill the victims and flay the burnt offerings. How could such procedure be applied to such sacrifices as those of Solomon ( 1 Kings 8:63 )? With the growth of luxury the sacrifices would necessarily become too large for such a ritual, and the wealthy would grow in refinement and object to performing such tasks personally. This suggests the reason for later abuses and for the modifications of Ezekiel and the representations of the Chronicler.  Result of the Evidence.  Thus, the evidence of P is unfavorable alike to the Wellhausen and the mediating views. The indications of date are consistently Mosaic, and it seems impossible to fit the laws into the framework of any other age without reading them in a sense that the legislator can be shown not to have contemplated. On the other hand P is a torso. It provides a large body of Levites who would have nothing to do after the conquest, and a corpus of legislation that could not have been administered in settled conditions by the house of Aaron alone.  III. The Other Portions of the Pentateuch.  In  Exodus 19:22, 24  we read of priests, but a note has come down to us that in the first of those verses Aquila had "elders," not "priests," and this appears to be the correct reading in both places, as is shown by the prominence of the elders in the early part of the chapter. In Hebrew the words differ by only two letters. It is said by Wellhausen that in  Exodus 33:7-11  (E) Joshua has charge of the ark. This rests on a mistranslation of  Exodus 33:7 , which should be rendered (correcting English Versions of the Bible), `And Moses used to take a (or the) tent and pitch it for himself without the camp.' It is inconceivable that Moses should have taken the tent of the ark and removed it to a distance from the camp for his private use, leaving the ark bared and unguarded. Moreover, if he had done so, Joshua could not have been in charge of the ark, seeing that he was in this tent while the ark (ex hypothesi) remained in the camp. Nor had the ark yet been constructed. Nor was Joshua in fact a priest or the guardian of the ark in E:  (1) in the Book of Joshua E knows of priests who carry the ark and are quite distinct from Joshua (3;);  (2) in  Deuteronomy 31:14  (E) Joshua is not resident in the tent of meeting;  (3) in E, Aaron and Eleazar are priests ( Deuteronomy 10:6 ), and the Levitical priesthood is the only one recognized ( Deuteronomy 33:10 );  (4) there is no hint anywhere of Joshua's discharging any priestly duty whatsoever.  The whole case rests on his presence in the tent in  Exodus 33:7-11 , and, as shown in the article PENTATEUCH (which see), this passage should stand after  Exodus 13:22 .  Then it is said that in  Exodus 4:14   Judges 17:7 , "Levite" denotes profession, not ancestry. In the latter passage the youth whom Micah made a priest was of Levitical descent, being the grandson of Moses ( Judges 17:13 ), and the case rests on the phrase, "of the family of Judah." Neither of the Septuagintal translations had this text (Field, Hexapla, at the place), which therefore cannot be supported, since it cannot be suggested that Moses belonged to the tribe of Judah. As to  Exodus 4:14 , the phrase "Aaron thy brother the Levite" is merely an adaptation of the more usual, "Aaron, son of Amram, the Levite," rendered necessary by the fact that his brother Moses is the person addressed. The Wellhausen theory here is shown to be untenable in PS, 250 and RE3, XI, 418.    Exodus 32:26-29  foreshadows the sacred character of Levi, and  Deuteronomy 10:6  (E) knows the hereditary Aaronic priesthood. In D the most important passage is  Deuteronomy 18:6-8 . In 18:7 three Septuagintal manuscripts omit the words "the Levites," and if this be a gloss, the whole historic sense of the passage is changed. It now contains an enactment that any Levite coming to the religious capital may minister there "as all his brethren do, who stand there," etc., i.e. like the descendants of Aaron. "The Levites" will then be the explanation of a glossator who was imbued with the latest post-exilic ideas, and thought that "his brethren" must mean those of his fellow-Levites who were not descended from Aaron. The passage is supplemented by 21:5, giving to the Levites judicial rights, and 24:8 assigning to them the duty of teaching the leprosy regulations. Together with 33:10 (E), `they shall teach thy judgments to Jacob and thy law to Israel: they shall put incense in thy nostrils and whole burnt-offering on thine altar,' these passages complete the provisions of P in giving to the Levites an occupation in place of their transport duties, and providing the necessary staff for administering the legislation when the Israelites were no longer massed together in a single camp, but scattered over the country. We shall see in the next section that this view of the meaning of the Law was taken by every writer of the second part of the Canon who touches on the subject. Everywhere we are confronted with the legitimacy of a Levitical priesthood; nowhere is there any mention of an exclusive Aaronic right. Smaller points which cannot be discussed here are examined in PS. It only remains to notice that these provisions fully explain the frequent Deuteronomic locution, "the priests the Levites." One other remark must be made. Though it is not expressly stated, we may assume that consecration would be necessary in the case of any Levite acting on the provisions of  Deuteronomy 18:6-8 , and was not mentioned because in Hebrew antiquity it went without saying that every priest must be consecrated (compare  Judges 17 ).  IV. From Moses to Malachi.  1. The Sources Other than Ezekiel:  Joshua adds but little to our information. In 18:7 the priesthood is called the inheritance of the Levites, and it is singular that the Wellhausen critics attribute this to a priestly redactor, though such a writer should ex hypothesi have been jealous to withhold the priesthood from the Levites. It is very interesting to find that in  Joshua 3 ;  Joshua 4 , all the different critical documents speak in exactly the same terms of "the priests that bare the ark." The priestly writer ought, on the Wellhausen theory, to have said "the Levites." The expression "the priests the Levites" is found alternating with the expression "the priests." All this points to the construction put upon the provisions of the Law in the preceding section, and finds fresh confirmation in Judges, where we see Micah rejoicing at having a Levite as a priest ( Judges 17:13 ), thus showing that the sacred character of the tribe was recognized in the earliest post-Mosaic times. The lay sacrifices in this and the following books are explained under SANCTUARY; SACRIFICE (which see).  The period of the early kings shows us kings blessing the people (e.g.  2 Samuel 6:18 ). It is claimed that this is the priestly blessing, but without evidence, and there seems no more reason to see special priestly rights here than in David's blessing his household ( 2 Samuel 6:20 ), or the frequent blessings of the Bible (e.g. Genesis passim, especially "in thee will Israel bless,"  Genesis 48:20 ), while in  1 Kings 8:55  ff; we actually have the words of the blessing delivered on one of those occasions by Solomon, and it is quite unlike the blessing of the priests (Numbers 6:22;).  Textual criticism disposes of the supposed priesthood of certain non-Levitical persons. In  2 Samuel 8:18  the Massoretic Text makes David's sons "priests," but this reading was unknown to the Septuagint, Symmachus, and Theodotion (Field, ad. loc.). The Septuagint has "aularches," i.e. chamberlains. That this represents a different Hebrew word is proved by the Septuagintal list of 3 Ki 2:46 (not extant in Hebrew), where we read that Benaiah, son of Jehoiada, was "over the aularchy and over the brick-making." It cannot be suggested that this represents an original Hebrew "over the priesthood and over the brick-making," and accordingly we must concede the existence of some secular court office which was rendered by this Greek phrase. Hitzig and Cheyne conjecture that tsokhenim should be read for kohanim. This word gives the sense required (see  Isaiah 22:15 ) Revised Version margin "steward"). In  2 Samuel 20:26  we read that Ira, ha-ya'iri ("the Jairite"), was a priest, but the Syriac version supported by Lucian and 23:38 reads ha-yattiri ("the Jattirite"). Jattir was a priestly city. In  1 Kings 4:5  Nathan's son is described as `priest friend of the king,' but the Septuagint reads only "friend of the king" (compare especially  1 Chronicles 27:33  ff;  2 Samuel 15:32 ), and at another period Nathan's son held the kindred secular office of king's counselor (the Septuagint 3 Ki 2:46, a fact that is certainly unfavorable to the view that he ever held priestly office). There can therefore be no doubt that the word "priest," kohen has arisen through dittography of the preceding word nathan, Nathan.  Various dealings with the ark and the age of Samuel require notice. As a boy, Samuel himself is given into the service of Eli. It has been argued that he really officiated as a priest, though probably (if the Chronicler's data is rejected) not of the Levitical descent. The answer is to be found in his age. Weaning sometimes took place at as late an age as three, and accordingly, the boy may have been as much as four years old when he was taken to Shiloh ( 1 Samuel 1:24 ). His mother used to bring him a little cloak ( 1 Samuel 2:19 ) every year, and this notice also shows his extreme youth. In view of this, it cannot be seriously contended that he performed any priestly service. He must have been something like a page, and he performed some duties of a porter, opening the door-valves of the temple at Shiloh ( 1 Samuel 3:15 ).  (1) The Custody of the Ark  When the ark was captured by the Philistines, it was in the charge of priests. When David brought it to Jerusalem, it was again placed in priestly custody, but there is an interregnum of some 20 years ( 1 Samuel 7:2 ).  Read Complete Article...    COURSE OF PRIESTS AND LEVITES  See  PRIESTS AND LEVITES .
FILLETS|Hebrews hashukum, plur., joinings ( Exodus 27:17 ;  38:17 ,  28), the rods by which the tops of the columns around the tabernacle court were joined together, and from which the curtains were suspended ( Exodus 27:10 ,  11;  36:38 ). In  Jeremiah 52:21  the rendering of a different word, hut, meaning a "thread," and designating a measuring-line of 12 cubits in length for the circumference of the copper pillars of Solomon's temple. 
CLOPAS|   ; CLEOPHAS  klo'-pas (Klopas): The former in the Revised Version (British and American), the latter in the King James Version, of  John 19:25 , for the name of the husband of one of the women who stood by the cross of Christ. Upon the philological ground of a variety in pronunciation of the Hebrew root, sometimes identified with Alpheus, the father of James the Less. Said by tradition to have been the brother of Joseph, the husband of Mary; see BRETHREN OF THE LORD. Distinguished from Cleopas, a Greek word, while Clopas is Aramaic
DIBLAH|     dib'-la (dibhlah, "circle"; Deblatha): The name occurs only in  Ezekiel 6:14  (the King James Version "Diblath"), and the place has not been identified. If the reading is correct it may possibly be represented by Dibl, a village in Upper Galilee, South of Tibnin. But more likely it is a scribal error for Riblah.
CARMEL|A park; generally with the article, "the park."  (1.) A prominent headland of Central Palestine, consisting of several connected hills extending from the plain of Esdraelon to the sea, a distance of some 12 miles or more. At the east end, in its highest part, it is 1,728 feet high, and at the west end it forms a promontory to the bay of Acre about 600 feet above the sea. It lay within the tribe of Asher. It was here, at the east end of the ridge, at a place called el-Mukhrakah (i.e.,  the place of burning), that Elijah brought back the people to their allegiance to God, and slew the prophets of Baal ( 1 Kings 18 ). Here were consumed the "fifties" of the royal guard; and here also Elisha received the visit of the bereaved mother whose son was restored by him to life ( 2 Kings 4:25 -37). "No mountain in or around Palestine retains its ancient beauty so much as Carmel. Two or three villages and some scattered cottages are found on it; its groves are few but luxuriant; it is no place for crags and precipices or rocks of wild goats; but its surface is covered with a rich and constant verdure." "The whole mountain-side is dressed with blossom, and flowering shrubs, and fragrant herbs." The western extremity of the ridge is, however, more rocky and bleak than the eastern. The head of the bride in Cant. 7:5 is compared to Carmel. It is ranked with Bashan on account of its rich pastures ( Isaiah 33:9 ;  Jeremiah 50:19 ;  Amos 1:2 ). The whole ridge is deeply furrowed with rocky ravines filled with dense jungle. There are many caves in its sides, which at one time were inhabited by swarms of monks. These caves are referred to in  Amos 9:3 . To them Elijah and Elisha often resorted ( 1 Kings 18:19 ,  42;  2 Kings 2:25 ). On its north-west summit there is an ancient establishment of Carmelite monks. Vineyards have recently been planted on the mount by the German colonists of Haifa. The modern Arabic name of the mount is Kurmul, but more commonly Jebel Mar Elyas, i.e., Mount St. Elias, from the Convent of Elias. (2.) A town in the hill country of Judah ( Joshua 15:55 ), the residence of Nabal ( 1 Samuel 25:2 ,  5,  7,  40), and the native place of Abigail, who became David's wife ( 1 Samuel 27:3 ). Here king Uzziah had his vineyards ( 2 Chronicles 26:10 ). The ruins of this town still remain under the name of Kurmul, about 10 miles south-south-east of Hebron, close to those of Maon. 
MIDIAN|Strife, the fourth son of Abraham by Keturah, the father of the Midianites ( Genesis 25:2 ;  1 Chronicles 1:32 ). 
BETHEZEL|   BETH-EZEL  beth-e'-zel (beth ha-'etsel; oikos echomenous autes; literally, "adjoining house"): A place named along with other cities in the Philistine plain ( Micah 1:11 ). The site has not been identified. By some it is thought to be the same as Azel of  Zechariah 14:5 ; but see AZEL.
JARIB|An adversary.  (1.) A son of Simeon ( 1 Chronicles 4:24 ). (2.) One of the chiefs sent by Ezra to bring up the priests to Jerusalem ( Ezra 8:16 ). (3.)  Ezra 10:18 . 
ELYMAS|Magician or sorcerer, the Arabic name of the Jew Bar-jesus, who withstood Paul and Barnabas in Cyprus. He was miraculously struck with blindness ( Acts 13:11 ). 
HEBRONITES|     he'-brun-its (chebhroni): A family of Levites, descendants of Hebron, third son of Kohath ( Numbers 3:27 ;  Numbers 26:58 , etc.).
JASON|He that will cure, the host of Paul and Silas in Thessalonica. The Jews assaulted his house in order to seize Paul, but failing to find him, they dragged Jason before the ruler of the city ( Acts 17:5 -9). He was apparently one of the kinsmen of Paul ( Romans 16:21 ), and accompanied him from Thessalonica to Corinth. 
TAPPUAH|Apple-region.  (1.) A town in the valley or lowland of Judah; formerly a royal city of the Canaanites ( Joshua 12:17 ;  15:34 ). It is now called Tuffuh, about 12 miles west of Jerusalem. (2.) A town on the border of Ephraim ( Joshua 16:8 ). The "land" of Tappuah fell to Manasseh, but the "city" to Ephraim ( 17:8 ). (3.) En-tappuah, the well of the apple, probably one of the springs near Yassuf ( Joshua 17:7 ). 
BITHIAH|     bi-thi'-a (bithyah; Beththia; Codex Vaticanus, Gelia, "daughter of Yah"): The daughter of a Pharaoh who married Mered, a descendant of Judah ( 1 Chronicles 4:18 ). Whether this Pharaoh was an Egyptian king, or whether it was in this case a Hebrew name, it is difficult to say. The name Bithiah seems to designate one who had become converted to the worship of Yahweh, and this would favor the first supposition. If, as the Revised Version (British and American) reads, the other wife of Mered is distinguished as "the Jewess" (instead of the King James Version "Jehudijah"), this supposition would receive further support.  Frank E. Hirsch
BAALHERMON|Lord of Hermon.  (1.) A city near Mount Hermon inhabited by the Ephraimites ( 1 Chronicles 5:23 ). Probably identical with Baal-gad ( Joshua 11:17 ). (2.) A mountain east of Lebanon ( Judges 3:3 ). Probably it may be the same as Mount Hermon, or one of its three peaks. 
SHAMBLES|     sham'-b'-lz (makellon): A slaughter-house; then a butcher's stall, meat-market. The word is once used in the New Testament in  1 Corinthians 10:25 .
ESARHADDON|Assur has given a brother, successor of Sennacherib ( 2 Kings 19:37 ;  Isaiah 37:38 ). He ascended the throne about B.C. 681. Nothing further is recorded of him in Scripture, except that he settled certain colonists in Samaria ( Ezra 4:2 ). But from the monuments it appears that he was the most powerful of all the Assyrian monarchs. He built many temples and palaces, the most magnificent of which was the south-west palace at Nimrud, which is said to have been in its general design almost the same as Solomon's palace, only much larger ( 1 Kings 7:1 -12). In December B.C. 681 Sennacherib was murdered by two of his sons, who, after holding Nineveh for forty-two days, were compelled to fly to Erimenas of Ararat, or Armenia. Their brother Esarhaddon, who had been engaged in a campaign against Armenia, led his army against them. They were utterly overthrown in a battle fought April B.C. 680, near Malatiyeh, and in the following month Esarhaddon was crowned at Nineveh. He restored Babylon, conquered Egypt, and received tribute from Manasseh of Judah. He died in October B.C. 668, while on the march to suppress an Egyptian revolt, and was succeeded by his son Assur-bani-pal, whose younger brother was made viceroy of Babylonia. 
SHUNEM|Two resting-places, a little village in the tribe of Issachar, to the north of Jezreel and south of Mount Gilboa ( Joshua 19:18 ), where the Philistines encamped when they came against Saul ( 1 Samuel 28:4 ), and where Elisha was hospitably entertained by a rich woman of the place. On the sudden death of this woman's son she hastened to Carmel, 20 miles distant across the plain, to tell Elisha, and to bring him with her to Shunem. There, in the "prophet's chamber," the dead child lay; and Elisha entering it, shut the door and prayed earnestly: and the boy was restored to life ( 2 Kings 4:8 -37). This woman afterwards retired during the famine to the low land of the Philistines; and on returning a few years afterwards, found her house and fields in the possession of a stranger. She appealed to the king at Samaria, and had them in a somewhat remarkable manner restored to her (Comp.  2 Kings 8:1 -6).
NATHANAEL|Given or gift of God, one of our Lord's disciples, "of Cana in Galilee" ( John 21:2 ). He was "an Israelite indeed, in whom was no guile" ( 1:47 ,  48). His name occurs only in the Gospel of John, who in his list of the disciples never mentions Bartholomew, with whom he has consequently been identified. He was one of those to whom the Lord showed himself alive after his resurrection, at the Sea of Tiberias. 
MEROM|Height, a lake in Northern Palestine through which the Jordan flows. It was the scene of the third and last great victory gained by Joshua over the Canaanites ( Joshua 11:5 -7). It is not again mentioned in Scripture. Its modern name is Bakrat el-Huleh. "The Ard el-Huleh, the centre of which the lake occupies, is a nearly level plain of 16 miles in length from north to south, and its breadth from east to west is from 7 to 8 miles. On the west it is walled in by the steep and lofty range of the hills of Kedesh-Naphtali; on the east it is bounded by the lower and more gradually ascending slopes of Bashan; on the north it is shut in by a line of hills hummocky and irregular in shape and of no great height, and stretching across from the mountains of Naphtali to the roots of Mount Hermon, which towers up at the north-eastern angle of the plain to a height of 10,000 feet. At its southern extremity the plain is similarly traversed by elevated and broken ground, through which, by deep and narrow clefts, the Jordan, after passing through Lake Huleh, makes its rapid descent to the Sea of Galilee." The lake is triangular in form, about 4 1/2 miles in length by 3 1/2 at its greatest breadth. Its surface is 7 feet above that of the Mediterranean. It is surrounded by a morass, which is thickly covered with canes and papyrus reeds, which are impenetrable. Macgregor with his canoe, the Rob Roy, was the first that ever, in modern times, sailed on its waters. (see  JORDAN .) 
DANITES|     dan'-its (ha-dani): Occurs as describing those belonging to Dan in  Judges 13:2 ;  Judges 18:1, 11   1 Chronicles 12:35 .
KISHI|     kish'i (qishi, "snarer," "fowler"): Father of Ethan, one of the singers David "set over the service of song" in the house of the Lord ( 1 Chronicles 6:31 ); the "Kushaiah" of  1 Chronicles 15:17  (compare  1 Chronicles 6:44 ).
SHAMMUA|Heard.  (1.) One of the spies sent out by Moses to search the land ( Numbers 13:4 ). He represented the tribe of Reuben. (2.) One of David's sons ( 1 Chronicles 14:4 ;  3:5 ,  "Shimea;"  2 Samuel 5:14 ). (3.) A Levite under Nehemiah ( 11:17 ). 
MAHLI|     ma'-li (machli, "a sick or weak one"):  (1) A son of Merari ( Exodus 6:19 , the King James Version Mahali;  Numbers 3:20 ), grandson of Levi and founder of the Levitical family of MAHLITES (which see).  (2) A son of Mushi, Mahli's brother, bears the same name ( 1 Chronicles 6:47 ;  1 Chronicles 23:23 ;  1 Chronicles 24:30 ). Compare  Ezra 8:18  and 1 Esdras 8:47.
NIMSHI|Saved. Jehu was "the son of Jehoshaphat, the son of Nimshi" ( 2 Kings 9:2 ; Comp.  1 Kings 19:16 ). 
ENOS|Man the son of Seth, and grandson of Adam ( Genesis 5:6 -11;  Luke 3:38 ). He lived nine hundred and five years. In his time "men began to call upon the name of the Lord" ( Genesis 4:26 ), meaning either (1) then began men to call themselves by the name of the Lord (marg.) i.e., to distinguish themselves thereby from idolaters; or (2) then men in some public and earnest way began to call upon the Lord, indicating a time of spiritual revival. 
ZOPHAI|     zo'fi, zo'-fa-i (tsophay, meaning uncertain): In  1 Chronicles 6:26  (Hebrew verse 11) = Zuph, the Qere of  1 Chronicles 6:35  (Hebrew, verse 20), and  1 Samuel 1:1 .  See  ZUPH, (1) .
CASLUHIM|Fortified, a people descended from Mizraim ( Genesis 10:14 ;  1 Chronicles 1:12 ). Their original seat was probably somewhere in Lower Egypt, along the sea-coast to the south border of Palestine. 
JESUS|What, seriously?  You don't know who Jesus is?
